
 
 
 
 Produced by Thierry Alberto, Robert Ledger and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 [Transcriber's Note:
 
 This lecture was taken from Volume III of _The Complete Works of
 Friedrich Nietzsche_, Dr. Oscar Levy, Ed., J. M. Kennedy,
 Translator, 1910]
 
 
 
 
 HOMER AND CLASSICAL PHILOLOGY.
 
 (_Inaugural Address delivered at Bale University, 28th of May 1869._)
 
 
 At the present day no clear and consistent opinion seems to be held
 regarding Classical Philology. We are conscious of this in the circles
 of the learned just as much as among the followers of that science
 itself. The cause of this lies in its many-sided character, in the lack
 of an abstract unity, and in the inorganic aggregation of heterogeneous
 scientific activities which are connected with one another only by the
 name "Philology." It must be freely admitted that philology is to some
 extent borrowed from several other sciences, and is mixed together like
 a magic potion from the most outlandish liquors, ores, and bones. It may
 even be added that it likewise conceals within itself an artistic
 element, one which, on aesthetic and ethical grounds, may be called
 imperatival--an element that acts in opposition to its purely scientific
 behaviour. Philology is composed of history just as much as of natural
 science or aesthetics: history, in so far as it endeavours to comprehend
 the manifestations of the individualities of peoples in ever new
 images, and the prevailing law in the disappearance of phenomena;
 natural science, in so far as it strives to fathom the deepest instinct
 of man, that of speech; aesthetics, finally, because from various
 antiquities at our disposal it endeavours to pick out the so-called
 "classical" antiquity, with the view and pretension of excavating the
 ideal world buried under it, and to hold up to the present the mirror of
 the classical and everlasting standards. That these wholly different
 scientific and aesthetico-ethical impulses have been associated under a
 common name, a kind of sham monarchy, is shown especially by the fact
 that philology at every period from its origin onwards was at the same
 time pedagogical. From the standpoint of the pedagogue, a choice was
 offered of those elements which were of the greatest educational value;
 and thus that science, or at least that scientific aim, which we call
 philology, gradually developed out of the practical calling originated
 by the exigencies of that science itself.
 
 These philological aims were pursued sometimes with greater ardour and
 sometimes with less, in accordance with the degree of culture and the
 development of the taste of a particular period; but, on the other hand,
 the followers of this science are in the habit of regarding the aims
 which correspond to their several abilities as _the_ aims of philology;
 whence it comes about that the estimation of philology in public opinion
 depends upon the weight of the personalities of the philologists!
 
 At the present time--that is to say, in a period which has seen men
 distinguished in almost every department of philology--a general
 uncertainty of judgment has increased more and more, and likewise a
 general relaxation of interest and participation in philological
 problems. Such an undecided and imperfect state of public opinion is
 damaging to a science in that its hidden and open enemies can work with
 much better prospects of success. And philology has a great many such
 enemies. Where do we not meet with them, these mockers, always ready to
 aim a blow at the philological "moles," the animals that practise
 dust-eating _ex professo_, and that grub up and eat for the eleventh
 time what they have already eaten ten times before. For opponents of
 this sort, however, philology is merely a useless, harmless, and
 inoffensive pastime, an object of laughter and not of hate. But, on the
 other hand, there is a boundless and infuriated hatred of philology
 wherever an ideal, as such, is feared, where the modern man falls down
 to worship himself, and where Hellenism is looked upon as a superseded
 and hence very insignificant point of view. Against these enemies, we
 philologists must always count upon the assistance of artists and men of
 artistic minds; for they alone can judge how the sword of barbarism
 sweeps over the head of every one who loses sight of the unutterable
 simplicity and noble dignity of the Hellene; and how no progress in
 commerce or technical industries, however brilliant, no school
 regulations, no political education of the masses, however widespread
 and complete, can protect us from the curse of ridiculous and barbaric
 offences against good taste, or from annihilation by the Gorgon head of
 the classicist.
 
 Whilst philology as a whole is looked on with jealous eyes by these two
 classes of opponents, there are numerous and varied hostilities in other
 directions of philology; philologists themselves are quarrelling with
 one another; internal dissensions are caused by useless disputes about
 precedence and mutual jealousies, but especially by the
 differences--even enmities--comprised in the name of philology, which
 are not, however, by any means naturally harmonised instincts.
 
 Science has this in common with art, that the most ordinary, everyday
 thing appears to it as something entirely new and attractive, as if
 metamorphosed by witchcraft and now seen for the first time. Life is
 worth living, says art, the beautiful temptress; life is worth knowing,
 says science. With this contrast the so heartrending and dogmatic
 tradition follows in a _theory_, and consequently in the practice of
 classical philology derived from this theory. We may consider antiquity
 from a scientific point of view; we may try to look at what has happened
 with the eye of a historian, or to arrange and compare the linguistic
 forms of ancient masterpieces, to bring them at all events under a
 morphological law; but we always lose the wonderful creative force, the
 real fragrance, of the atmosphere of antiquity; we forget that
 passionate emotion which instinctively drove our meditation and
 enjoyment back to the Greeks. From this point onwards we must take
 notice of a clearly determined and very surprising antagonism which
 philology has great cause to regret. From the circles upon whose help we
 must place the most implicit reliance--the artistic friends of
 antiquity, the warm supporters of Hellenic beauty and noble
 simplicity--we hear harsh voices crying out that it is precisely the
 philologists themselves who are the real opponents and destroyers of the
 ideals of antiquity. Schiller upbraided the philologists with having
 scattered Homer's laurel crown to the winds. It was none other than
 Goethe who, in early life a supporter of Wolf's theories regarding
 Homer, recanted in the verses--
 
      With subtle wit you took away
        Our former adoration:
      The Iliad, you may us say,
        Was mere conglomeration.
      Think it not crime in any way:
        Youth's fervent adoration
      Leads us to know the verity,
        And feel the poet's unity.
 
 The reason of this want of piety and reverence must lie deeper; and many
 are in doubt as to whether philologists are lacking in artistic capacity
 and impressions, so that they are unable to do justice to the ideal, or
 whether the spirit of negation has become a destructive and iconoclastic
 principle of theirs. When, however, even the friends of antiquity,
 possessed of such doubts and hesitations, point to our present classical
 philology as something questionable, what influence may we not ascribe
 to the outbursts of the "realists" and the claptrap of the heroes of the
 passing hour? To answer the latter on this occasion, especially when we
 consider the nature of the present assembly, would be highly
 injudicious; at any rate, if I do not wish to meet with the fate of
 that sophist who, when in Sparta, publicly undertook to praise and
 defend Herakles, when he was interrupted with the query: "But who then
 has found fault with him?" I cannot help thinking, however, that some of
 these scruples are still sounding in the ears of not a few in this
 gathering; for they may still be frequently heard from the lips of noble
 and artistically gifted men--as even an upright philologist must feel
 them, and feel them most painfully, at moments when his spirits are
 downcast. For the single individual there is no deliverance from the
 dissensions referred to; but what we contend and inscribe on our banner
 is the fact that classical philology, as a whole, has nothing whatsoever
 to do with the quarrels and bickerings of its individual disciples. The
 entire scientific and artistic movement of this peculiar centaur is
 bent, though with cyclopic slowness, upon bridging over the gulf between
 the ideal antiquity--which is perhaps only the magnificent blossoming of
 the Teutonic longing for the south--and the real antiquity; and thus
 classical philology pursues only the final end of its own being, which
 is the fusing together of primarily hostile impulses that have only
 forcibly been brought together. Let us talk as we will about the
 unattainability of this goal, and even designate the goal itself as an
 illogical pretension--the aspiration for it is very real; and I should
 like to try to make it clear by an example that the most significant
 steps of classical philology never lead away from the ideal antiquity,
 but to it; and that, just when people are speaking unwarrantably of the
 overthrow of sacred shrines, new and more worthy altars are being
 erected. Let us then examine the so-called _Homeric question_ from this
 standpoint, a question the most important problem of which Schiller
 called a scholastic barbarism.
 
 The important problem referred to is _the question of the personality of
 Homer_.
 
 We now meet everywhere with the firm opinion that the question of
 Homer's personality is no longer timely, and that it is quite a
 different thing from the real "Homeric question." It may be added that,
 for a given period--such as our present philological period, for
 example--the centre of discussion may be removed from the problem of the
 poet's personality; for even now a painstaking experiment is being made
 to reconstruct the Homeric poems without the aid of personality,
 treating them as the work of several different persons. But if the
 centre of a scientific question is rightly seen to be where the swelling
 tide of new views has risen up, i.e. where individual scientific
 investigation comes into contact with the whole life of science and
 culture--if any one, in other words, indicates a historico-cultural
 valuation as the central point of the question, he must also, in the
 province of Homeric criticism, take his stand upon the question of
 personality as being the really fruitful oasis in the desert of the
 whole argument. For in Homer the modern world, I will not say has
 learnt, but has examined, a great historical point of view; and, even
 without now putting forward my own opinion as to whether this
 examination has been or can be happily carried out, it was at all
 events the first example of the application of that productive point of
 view. By it scholars learnt to recognise condensed beliefs in the
 apparently firm, immobile figures of the life of ancient peoples; by it
 they for the first time perceived the wonderful capability of the soul
 of a people to represent the conditions of its morals and beliefs in the
 form of a personality. When historical criticism has confidently seized
 upon this method of evaporating apparently concrete personalities, it is
 permissible to point to the first experiment as an important event in
 the history of sciences, without considering whether it was successful
 in this instance or not.
 
 It is a common occurrence for a series of striking signs and wonderful
 emotions to precede an epoch-making discovery. Even the experiment I
 have just referred to has its own attractive history; but it goes back
 to a surprisingly ancient era. Friedrich August Wolf has exactly
 indicated the spot where Greek antiquity dropped the question. The
 zenith of the historico-literary studies of the Greeks, and hence also
 of their point of greatest importance--the Homeric question--was reached
 in the age of the Alexandrian grammarians. Up to this time the Homeric
 question had run through the long chain of a uniform process of
 development, of which the standpoint of those grammarians seemed to be
 the last link, the last, indeed, which was attainable by antiquity. They
 conceived the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_ as the creations of _one single_
 Homer; they declared it to be psychologically possible for two such
 different works to have sprung from the brain of _one_ genius, in
 contradiction to the Chorizontes, who represented the extreme limit of
 the scepticism of a few detached individuals of antiquity rather than
 antiquity itself considered as a whole. To explain the different general
 impression of the two books on the assumption that _one_ poet composed
 them both, scholars sought assistance by referring to the seasons of the
 poet's life, and compared the poet of the _Odyssey_ to the setting sun.
 The eyes of those critics were tirelessly on the lookout for
 discrepancies in the language and thoughts of the two poems; but at this
 time also a history of the Homeric poem and its tradition was prepared,
 according to which these discrepancies were not due to Homer, but
 to those who committed his words to writing and those who sang them. It
 was believed that Homer's poem was passed from one generation to another
 _viva voce_, and faults were attributed to the improvising and at times
 forgetful bards. At a certain given date, about the time of Pisistratus,
 the poems which had been repeated orally were said to have been
 collected in manuscript form; but the scribes, it is added, allowed
 themselves to take some liberties with the text by transposing some
 lines and adding extraneous matter here and there. This entire
 hypothesis is the most important in the domain of literary studies that
 antiquity has exhibited; and the acknowledgment of the dissemination of
 the Homeric poems by word of mouth, as opposed to the habits of a
 book-learned age, shows in particular a depth of ancient sagacity worthy
 of our admiration. From those times until the generation that produced
 Friedrich August Wolf we must take a jump over a long historical vacuum;
 but in our own age we find the argument left just as it was at the time
 when the power of controversy departed from antiquity, and it is a
 matter of indifference to us that Wolf accepted as certain tradition
 what antiquity itself had set up only as a hypothesis. It may be
 remarked as most characteristic of this hypothesis that, in the
 strictest sense, the personality of Homer is treated seriously; that a
 certain standard of inner harmony is everywhere presupposed in the
 manifestations of the personality; and that, with these two excellent
 auxiliary hypotheses, whatever is seen to be below this standard and
 opposed to this inner harmony is at once swept aside as un-Homeric. But
 even this distinguishing characteristic, in place of wishing to
 recognise the supernatural existence of a tangible personality, ascends
 likewise through all the stages that lead to that zenith, with
 ever-increasing energy and clearness. Individuality is ever more
 strongly felt and accentuated; the psychological possibility of a
 _single_ Homer is ever more forcibly demanded. If we descend backwards
 from this zenith, step by step, we find a guide to the understanding of
 the Homeric problem in the person of Aristotle. Homer was for him the
 flawless and untiring artist who knew his end and the means to attain
 it; but there is still a trace of infantile criticism to be found in
 Aristotle--i.e., in the naive concession he made to the public opinion
 that considered Homer as the author of the original of all comic epics,
 the _Margites_. If we go still further backwards from Aristotle, the
 inability to create a personality is seen to increase; more and more
 poems are attributed to Homer; and every period lets us see its degree
 of criticism by how much and what it considers as Homeric. In this
 backward examination, we instinctively feel that away beyond Herodotus
 there lies a period in which an immense flood of great epics has been
 identified with the name of Homer.
 
 Let us imagine ourselves as living in the time of Pisistratus: the word
 "Homer" then comprehended an abundance of dissimilarities. What was
 meant by "Homer" at that time? It is evident that that generation found
 itself unable to grasp a personality and the limits of its
 manifestations. Homer had now become of small consequence. And then we
 meet with the weighty question: What lies before this period? Has
 Homer's personality, because it cannot be grasped, gradually faded away
 into an empty name? Or had all the Homeric poems been gathered together
 in a body, the nation naively representing itself by the figure of
 Homer? _Was the person created out of a conception, or the conception
 out of a person?_ This is the real "Homeric question," the central
 problem of the personality.
 
 The difficulty of answering this question, however, is increased when we
 seek a reply in another direction, from the standpoint of the poems
 themselves which have come down to us. As it is difficult for us at the
 present day, and necessitates a serious effort on our part, to
 understand the law of gravitation clearly--that the earth alters its
 form of motion when another heavenly body changes its position in space,
 although no material connection unites one to the other--it likewise
 costs us some trouble to obtain a clear impression of that wonderful
 problem which, like a coin long passed from hand to hand, has lost its
 original and highly conspicuous stamp. Poetical works, which cause the
 hearts of even the greatest geniuses to fail when they endeavour to vie
 with them, and in which unsurpassable images are held up for the
 admiration of posterity--and yet the poet who wrote them with only a
 hollow, shaky name, whenever we do lay hold on him; nowhere the solid
 kernel of a powerful personality. "For who would wage war with the gods:
 who, even with the one god?" asks Goethe even, who, though a genius,
 strove in vain to solve that mysterious problem of the Homeric
 inaccessibility.
 
 The conception of popular poetry seemed to lead like a bridge over this
 problem--a deeper and more original power than that of every single
 creative individual was said to have become active; the happiest people,
 in the happiest period of its existence, in the highest activity of
 fantasy and formative power, was said to have created those immeasurable
 poems. In this universality there is something almost intoxicating in
 the thought of a popular poem: we feel, with artistic pleasure, the
 broad, overpowering liberation of a popular gift, and we delight in this
 natural phenomenon as we do in an uncontrollable cataract. But as soon
 as we examine this thought at close quarters, we involuntarily put a
 poetic _mass of people_ in the place of the poetising _soul of the
 people_: a long row of popular poets in whom individuality has no
 meaning, and in whom the tumultuous movement of a people's soul, the
 intuitive strength of a people's eye, and the unabated profusion of a
 people's fantasy, were once powerful: a row of original geniuses,
 attached to a time, to a poetic genus, to a subject-matter.
 
 Such a conception justly made people suspicious. Could it be possible
 that that same Nature who so sparingly distributed her rarest and most
 precious production--genius--should suddenly take the notion of
 lavishing her gifts in one sole direction? And here the thorny question
 again made its appearance: Could we not get along with one genius only,
 and explain the present existence of that unattainable excellence? And
 now eyes were keenly on the lookout for whatever that excellence and
 singularity might consist of. Impossible for it to be in the
 construction of the complete works, said one party, for this is far from
 faultless; but doubtless to be found in single songs: in the single
 pieces above all; not in the whole. A second party, on the other hand,
 sheltered themselves beneath the authority of Aristotle, who especially
 admired Homer's "divine" nature in the choice of his entire subject, and
 the manner in which he planned and carried it out. If, however, this
 construction was not clearly seen, this fault was due to the way the
 poems were handed down to posterity and not to the poet himself--it was
 the result of retouchings and interpolations, owing to which the
 original setting of the work gradually became obscured. The more the
 first school looked for inequalities, contradictions, perplexities, the
 more energetically did the other school brush aside what in their
 opinion obscured the original plan, in order, if possible, that nothing
 might be left remaining but the actual words of the original epic
 itself. The second school of thought of course held fast by the
 conception of an epoch-making genius as the composer of the great works.
 The first school, on the other hand, wavered between the supposition of
 one genius plus a number of minor poets, and another hypothesis which
 assumed only a number of superior and even mediocre individual bards,
 but also postulated a mysterious discharging, a deep, national, artistic
 impulse, which shows itself in individual minstrels as an almost
 indifferent medium. It is to this latter school that we must attribute
 the representation of the Homeric poems as the expression of that
 mysterious impulse.
 
 All these schools of thought start from the assumption that the problem
 of the present form of these epics can be solved from the standpoint of
 an aesthetic judgment--but we must await the decision as to the
 authorised line of demarcation between the man of genius and the
 poetical soul of the people. Are there characteristic differences
 between the utterances of the _man of genius_ and the _poetical soul of
 the people_?
 
 This whole contrast, however, is unjust and misleading. There is no
 more dangerous assumption in modern aesthetics than that of _popular
 poetry_ and _individual poetry_, or, as it is usually called, _artistic
 poetry_. This is the reaction, or, if you will, the superstition, which
 followed upon the most momentous discovery of historico-philological
 science, the discovery and appreciation of the _soul of the people_. For
 this discovery prepared the way for a coming scientific view of history,
 which was until then, and in many respects is even now, a mere
 collection of materials, with the prospect that new materials would
 continue to be added, and that the huge, overflowing pile would never be
 systematically arranged. The people now understood for the first time
 that the long-felt power of greater individualities and wills was larger
 than the pitifully small will of an individual man;[1] they now saw that
 everything truly great in the kingdom of the will could not have its
 deepest root in the inefficacious and ephemeral individual will; and,
 finally, they now discovered the powerful instincts of the masses, and
 diagnosed those unconscious impulses to be the foundations and supports
 of the so-called universal history. But the newly-lighted flame also
 cast its shadow: and this shadow was none other than that superstition
 already referred to, which popular poetry set up in opposition to
 individual poetry, and thus enlarged the comprehension of the people's
 soul to that of the people's mind. By the misapplication of a tempting
 analogical inference, people had reached the point of applying in the
 domain of the intellect and artistic ideas that principle of greater
 individuality which is truly applicable only in the domain of the will.
 The masses have never experienced more flattering treatment than in thus
 having the laurel of genius set upon their empty heads. It was imagined
 that new shells were forming round a small kernel, so to speak, and that
 those pieces of popular poetry originated like avalanches, in the drift
 and flow of tradition. They were, however, ready to consider that kernel
 as being of the smallest possible dimensions, so that they might
 occasionally get rid of it altogether without losing anything of the
 mass of the avalanche. According to this view, the text itself and the
 stories built round it are one and the same thing.
 
 [1] Of course Nietzsche saw afterwards that this was not so.--TR.
 
 Now, however, such a contrast between popular poetry and individual
 poetry does not exist at all; on the contrary, all poetry, and of course
 popular poetry also, requires an intermediary individuality. This
 much-abused contrast, therefore, is necessary only when the term
 _individual poem_ is understood to mean a poem which has not grown out
 of the soil of popular feeling, but which has been composed by a
 non-popular poet in a non-popular atmosphere--something which has come
 to maturity in the study of a learned man, for example.
 
 With the superstition which presupposes poetising masses is connected
 another: that popular poetry is limited to one particular period of a
 people's history and afterwards dies out--which indeed follows as a
 consequence of the first superstition I have mentioned. According to
 this school, in the place of the gradually decaying popular poetry we
 have artistic poetry, the work of individual minds, not of masses of
 people. But the same powers which were once active are still so; and the
 form in which they act has remained exactly the same. The great poet of
 a literary period is still a popular poet in no narrower sense than the
 popular poet of an illiterate age. The difference between them is not in
 the way they originate, but it is their diffusion and propagation, in
 short, _tradition_. This tradition is exposed to eternal danger without
 the help of handwriting, and runs the risk of including in the poems the
 remains of those individualities through whose oral tradition they were
 handed down.
 
 If we apply all these principles to the Homeric poems, it follows that
 we gain nothing with our theory of the poetising soul of the people, and
 that we are always referred back to the poetical individual. We are thus
 confronted with the task of distinguishing that which can have
 originated only in a single poetical mind from that which is, so to
 speak, swept up by the tide of oral tradition, and which is a highly
 important constituent part of the Homeric poems.
 
 Since literary history first ceased to be a mere collection of names,
 people have attempted to grasp and formulate the individualities of the
 poets. A certain mechanism forms part of the method: it must be
 explained--i.e., it must be deduced from principles--why this or that
 individuality appears in this way and not in that. People now study
 biographical details, environment, acquaintances, contemporary events,
 and believe that by mixing all these ingredients together they will be
 able to manufacture the wished-for individuality. But they forget that
 the _punctum saliens_, the indefinable individual characteristics, can
 never be obtained from a compound of this nature. The less there is
 known about the life and times of the poet, the less applicable is this
 mechanism. When, however, we have merely the works and the name of the
 writer, it is almost impossible to detect the individuality, at all
 events, for those who put their faith in the mechanism in question; and
 particularly when the works are perfect, when they are pieces of popular
 poetry. For the best way for these mechanicians to grasp individual
 characteristics is by perceiving deviations from the genius of the
 people; the aberrations and hidden allusions: and the fewer
 discrepancies to be found in a poem the fainter will be the traces of
 the individual poet who composed it.
 
 All those deviations, everything dull and below the ordinary standard
 which scholars think they perceive in the Homeric poems, were attributed
 to tradition, which thus became the scapegoat. What was left of Homer's
 own individual work? Nothing but a series of beautiful and prominent
 passages chosen in accordance with subjective taste. The sum total of
 aesthetic singularity which every individual scholar perceived with his
 own artistic gifts, he now called Homer.
 
 This is the central point of the Homeric errors. The name of Homer, from
 the very beginning, has no connection either with the conception of
 aesthetic perfection or yet with the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_. Homer as
 the composer of the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_ is not a historical
 tradition, but an _aesthetic judgment_.
 
 The only path which leads back beyond the time of Pisistratus and helps
 us to elucidate the meaning of the name Homer, takes its way on the one
 hand through the reports which have reached us concerning Homer's
 birthplace: from which we see that, although his name is always
 associated with heroic epic poems, he is on the other hand no more
 referred to as the composer of the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_ than as the
 author of the _Thebais_ or any other cyclical epic. On the other hand,
 again, an old tradition tells of the contest between Homer and Hesiod,
 which proves that when these two names were mentioned people
 instinctively thought of two epic tendencies, the heroic and the
 didactic; and that the signification of the name "Homer" was included in
 the material category and not in the formal. This imaginary contest with
 Hesiod did not even yet show the faintest presentiment of individuality.
 From the time of Pisistratus onwards, however, with the surprisingly
 rapid development of the Greek feeling for beauty, the differences in
 the aesthetic value of those epics continued to be felt more and more:
 the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_ arose from the depths of the flood and
 have remained on the surface ever since. With this process of aesthetic
 separation, the conception of Homer gradually became narrower: the old
 material meaning of the name "Homer" as the father of the heroic epic
 poem, was changed into the aesthetic meaning of Homer, the father of
 poetry in general, and likewise its original prototype. This
 transformation was contemporary with the rationalistic criticism which
 made Homer the magician out to be a possible poet, which vindicated the
 material and formal traditions of those numerous epics as against the
 unity of the poet, and gradually removed that heavy load of cyclical
 epics from Homer's shoulders.
 
 So Homer, the poet of the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_, is an aesthetic
 judgment. It is, however, by no means affirmed against the poet of these
 epics that he was merely the imaginary being of an aesthetic
 impossibility, which can be the opinion of only very few philologists
 indeed. The majority contend that a single individual was responsible
 for the general design of a poem such as the _Iliad_, and further that
 this individual was Homer. The first part of this contention may be
 admitted; but, in accordance with what I have said, the latter part must
 be denied. And I very much doubt whether the majority of those who adopt
 the first part of the contention have taken the following considerations
 into account.
 
 The design of an epic such as the _Iliad_ is not an entire _whole_, not
 an organism; but a number of pieces strung together, a collection of
 reflections arranged in accordance with aesthetic rules. It is certainly
 the standard of an artist's greatness to note what he can take in with a
 single glance and set out in rhythmical form. The infinite profusion of
 images and incidents in the Homeric epic must force us to admit that
 such a wide range of vision is next to impossible. Where, however, a
 poet is unable to observe artistically with a single glance, he usually
 piles conception on conception, and endeavours to adjust his characters
 according to a comprehensive scheme.
 
 He will succeed in this all the better the more he is familiar with the
 fundamental principles of aesthetics: he will even make some believe
 that he made himself master of the entire subject by a single powerful
 glance.
 
 The _Iliad_ is not a garland, but a bunch of flowers. As many pictures
 as possible are crowded on one canvas; but the man who placed them there
 was indifferent as to whether the grouping of the collected pictures was
 invariably suitable and rhythmically beautiful. He well knew that no one
 would ever consider the collection as a whole; but would merely look at
 the individual parts. But that stringing together of some pieces as the
 manifestations of a grasp of art which was not yet highly developed,
 still less thoroughly comprehended and generally esteemed, cannot have
 been the real Homeric deed, the real Homeric epoch-making event. On the
 contrary, this design is a later product, far later than Homer's
 celebrity. Those, therefore, who look for the "original and perfect
 design" are looking for a mere phantom; for the dangerous path of oral
 tradition had reached its end just as the systematic arrangement
 appeared on the scene; the disfigurements which were caused on the way
 could not have affected the design, for this did not form part of the
 material handed down from generation to generation.
 
 The relative imperfection of the design must not, however, prevent us
 from seeing in the designer a different personality from the real poet.
 It is not only probable that everything which was created in those times
 with conscious aesthetic insight, was infinitely inferior to the songs
 that sprang up naturally in the poet's mind and were written down with
 instinctive power: we can even take a step further. If we include the
 so-called cyclic poems in this comparison, there remains for the
 designer of the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_ the indisputable merit of
 having done something relatively great in this conscious technical
 composing: a merit which we might have been prepared to recognise from
 the beginning, and which is in my opinion of the very first order in the
 domain of instinctive creation. We may even be ready to pronounce this
 synthetisation of great importance. All those dull passages and
 discrepancies--deemed of such importance, but really only subjective,
 which we usually look upon as the petrified remains of the period of
 tradition--are not these perhaps merely the almost necessary evils which
 must fall to the lot of the poet of genius who undertakes a composition
 virtually without a parallel, and, further, one which proves to be of
 incalculable difficulty?
 
 Let it be noted that the insight into the most diverse operations of the
 instinctive and the conscious changes the position of the Homeric
 problem; and in my opinion throws light upon it.
 
 We believe in a great poet as the author of the _Iliad_ and the
 _Odyssey--but not that Homer was this poet_.
 
 The decision on this point has already been given. The generation that
 invented those numerous Homeric fables, that poetised the myth of the
 contest between Homer and Hesiod, and looked upon all the poems of the
 epic cycle as Homeric, did not feel an aesthetic but a material
 singularity when it pronounced the name "Homer." This period regards
 Homer as belonging to the ranks of artists like Orpheus, Eumolpus,
 Daedalus, and Olympus, the mythical discoverers of a new branch of art,
 to whom, therefore, all the later fruits which grew from the new branch
 were thankfully dedicated.
 
 And that wonderful genius to whom we owe the _Iliad_ and the _Odyssey_
 belongs to this thankful posterity: he, too, sacrificed his name on the
 altar of the primeval father of the Homeric epic, Homeros.
 
 Up to this point, gentlemen, I think I have been able to put before you
 the fundamental philosophical and aesthetic characteristics of the
 problem of the personality of Homer, keeping all minor details
 rigorously at a distance, on the supposition that the primary form of
 this widespread and honeycombed mountain known as the Homeric question
 can be most clearly observed by looking down at it from a far-off
 height. But I have also, I imagine, recalled two facts to those friends
 of antiquity who take such delight in accusing us philologists of lack
 of piety for great conceptions and an unproductive zeal for
 destruction. In the first place, those "great" conceptions--such, for
 example, as that of the indivisible and inviolable poetic genius,
 Homer--were during the pre-Wolfian period only too great, and hence
 inwardly altogether empty and elusive when we now try to grasp them. If
 classical philology goes back again to the same conceptions, and once
 more tries to pour new wine into old bottles, it is only on the surface
 that the conceptions are the same: everything has really become new;
 bottle and mind, wine and word. We everywhere find traces of the fact
 that philology has lived in company with poets, thinkers, and artists
 for the last hundred years: whence it has now come about that the heap
 of ashes formerly pointed to as classical philology is now turned into
 fruitful and even rich soil.[2]
 
 [2] Nietzsche perceived later on that this statement was,
 unfortunately, not justified.--TR.
 
 And there is a second fact which I should like to recall to the memory
 of those friends of antiquity who turn their dissatisfied backs on
 classical philology. You honour the immortal masterpieces of the
 Hellenic mind in poetry and sculpture, and think yourselves so much more
 fortunate than preceding generations, which had to do without them; but
 you must not forget that this whole fairyland once lay buried under
 mountains of prejudice, and that the blood and sweat and arduous labour
 of innumerable followers of our science were all necessary to lift up
 that world from the chasm into which it had sunk. We grant that
 philology is not the creator of this world, not the composer of that
 immortal music; but is it not a merit, and a great merit, to be a mere
 virtuoso, and let the world for the first time hear that music which lay
 so long in obscurity, despised and undecipherable? Who was Homer
 previously to Wolf's brilliant investigations? A good old man, known at
 best as a "natural genius," at all events the child of a barbaric age,
 replete with faults against good taste and good morals. Let us hear how
 a learned man of the first rank writes about Homer even so late as 1783:
 "Where does the good man live? Why did he remain so long incognito?
 Apropos, can't you get me a silhouette of him?"
 
 We demand _thanks_--not in our own name, for we are but atoms--but in
 the name of philology itself, which is indeed neither a Muse nor a
 Grace, but a messenger of the gods: and just as the Muses descended upon
 the dull and tormented Boeotian peasants, so Philology comes into a
 world full of gloomy colours and pictures, full of the deepest, most
 incurable woes; and speaks to men comfortingly of the beautiful and
 godlike figure of a distant, rosy, and happy fairyland.
 
 It is time to close; yet before I do so a few words of a personal
 character must be added, justified, I hope, by the occasion of this
 lecture.
 
 It is but right that a philologist should describe his end and the means
 to it in the short formula of a confession of faith; and let this be
 done in the saying of Seneca which I thus reverse--
 
      "Philosophia facta est quae philologia fuit."
 
 By this I wish to signify that all philological activities should be
 enclosed and surrounded by a philosophical view of things, in which
 everything individual and isolated is evaporated as something
 detestable, and in which great homogeneous views alone remain. Now,
 therefore, that I have enunciated my philological creed, I trust you
 will give me cause to hope that I shall no longer be a stranger among
 you: give me the assurance that in working with you towards this end I
 am worthily fulfilling the confidence with which the highest authorities
 of this community have honoured me.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Homer and Classical Philology, by

 
 
 
 Produced by Thierry Alberto, Martin Pettit and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE COMPLETE WORKS OF FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
 _First Complete and Authorised English translation in Eighteen Volumes_
 
 EDITED BY
 
 DR OSCAR LEVY
 
 [Illustration: Nietzsche.]
 
 VOLUME EIGHT
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 THIRD EDITION
 
 
 WE PHILOLOGISTS
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 J. M. KENNEDY
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 T. N. FOULIS
 
 13 & 15 FREDERICK STREET
 
 EDINBURGH . AND LONDON
 
 1911
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE TO "WE PHILOLOGISTS"      105
 
 WE PHILOLOGISTS                                109
 
 
 
 
 
 WE PHILOLOGISTS
 
 
 AUTUMN 1874
 
 (PUBLISHED POSTHUMOUSLY)
 
 
 TRANSLATED BY J. M. KENNEDY
 
 AUTHOR OF "THE QUINTESSENCE OF NIETZSCHE," "RELIGIONS AND PHILOSOPHIES
 OF THE EAST," &C.
 
 
      The mussel is crooked inside and rough outside . it is only when we
      hear its deep note after blowing into it that we can begin to
      esteem it at its true value.--(Ind. Spruche, ed Bothlingk, 1 335)
 
      An ugly-looking-wind instrument . but we must first blow into it.
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S INTRODUCTION
 
 The subject of education was one to which Nietzsche, especially during
 his residence in Basel, paid considerable attention, and his insight
 into it was very much deeper than that of, say, Herbert Spencer or even
 Johann Friedrich Herbart, the latter of whom has in late years exercised
 considerable influence in scholastic circles. Nietzsche clearly saw that
 the "philologists" (using the word chiefly in reference to the teachers
 of the classics in German colleges and universities) were absolutely
 unfitted for their high task, since they were one and all incapable of
 entering into the spirit of antiquity. Although at the first reading,
 therefore, this book may seem to be rather fragmentary, there are two
 main lines of thought running through it: an incisive criticism of
 German professors, and a number of constructive ideas as to what
 classical culture really should be.
 
 These scattered aphorisms, indeed, are significant as showing how far
 Nietzsche had travelled along the road over which humanity had been
 travelling from remote ages, and how greatly he was imbued with the
 pagan spirit which he recognised in Goethe and valued in Burckhardt.
 Even at this early period of his life Nietzsche was convinced that
 Christianity was the real danger to culture; and not merely modern
 Christianity, but also the Alexandrian culture, the last gasp of Greek
 antiquity, which had helped to bring Christianity about. When, in the
 later aphorisms of "We Philologists," Nietzsche appears to be throwing
 over the Greeks, it should be remembered that he does not refer to the
 Greeks of the era of Homer or AEschylus, or even of Aristotle, but to the
 much later Greeks of the era of Longinus.
 
 Classical antiquity, however, was conveyed to the public through
 university professors and their intellectual offspring, and these
 professors, influenced (quite unconsciously, of course) by religious and
 "liberal" principles, presented to their scholars a kind of emasculated
 antiquity. It was only on these conditions that the State allowed the
 pagan teaching to be propagated in the schools; and if, where classical
 scholars were concerned, it was more tolerant than the Church had been,
 it must be borne in mind that the Church had already done all the rough
 work of emasculating its enemies, and had handed down to the State a
 body of very innocuous and harmless investigators. A totally erroneous
 conception of what constituted classical culture was thus brought about.
 Where any distinction was actually made, for example, later Greek
 thought was enormously over-rated, and early Greek thought equally
 undervalued. Aphorism 44, together with the first half-dozen or so in
 the book, may be taken as typical specimens of Nietzsche's protest
 against this state of things.
 
 It must be added, unfortunately, that Nietzsche's observations in this
 book apply as much to England as to Germany. Classical teachers here may
 not be rated so high as they are in Germany, but their influence would
 appear to be equally powerful, and their theories of education and of
 classical antiquity equally chaotic. In England as in Germany they are
 "theologians in disguise." The danger of modern "values" to true culture
 may be readily gathered from a perusal of aphorisms that follow: and, if
 these aphorisms enable even one scholar in a hundred to enter more
 thoroughly into the spirit of a great past they will not have been
 penned in vain.
 
                                             J. M. KENNEDY.
 
 LONDON, _July 1911_.
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 To what a great extent men are ruled by pure hazard, and how little
 reason itself enters into the question, is sufficiently shown by
 observing how few people have any real capacity for their professions
 and callings, and how many square pegs there are in round holes: happy
 and well chosen instances are quite exceptional, like happy marriages,
 and even these latter are not brought about by reason. A man chooses his
 calling before he is fitted to exercise his faculty of choice. He does
 not know the number of different callings and professions that exist; he
 does not know himself; and then he wastes his years of activity in this
 calling, applies all his mind to it, and becomes experienced and
 practical. When, afterwards, his understanding has become fully
 developed, it is generally too late to start something new; for wisdom
 on earth has almost always had something of the weakness of old age and
 lack of vigour about it.
 
 For the most part the task is to make good, and to set to rights as well
 as possible, that which was bungled in the beginning. Many will come to
 recognise that the latter part of their life shows a purpose or design
 which has sprung from a primary discord: it is hard to live through it.
 Towards the end of his life, however, the average man has become
 accustomed to it--then he may make a mistake in regard to the life he
 has lived, and praise his own stupidity: _bene navigavi cum naufragium
 feci_ . he may even compose a song of thanksgiving to "Providence."
 
 
 2
 
 On inquiring into the origin of the philologist I find:
 
 1. A young man cannot have the slightest conception of what the Greeks
 and Romans were.
 
 2. He does not know whether he is fitted to investigate into them;
 
 3. And, in particular, he does not know to what extent, in view of the
 knowledge he may actually possess, he is fitted to be a teacher. What
 then enables him to decide is not the knowledge of himself or his
 science; but
 
      (_a_) Imitation.
 
      (_b_) The convenience of carrying on the kind of work which he had
      begun at school.
 
      (_c_) His intention of earning a living.
 
 In short, ninety-nine philologists out of a hundred _should_ not be
 philologists at all.
 
 
 3
 
 The more strict religions require that men shall look upon their
 activity simply as one means of carrying out a metaphysical scheme: an
 unfortunate choice of calling may then be explained as a test of the
 individual. Religions keep their eyes fixed only upon the salvation of
 the individual . whether he is a slave or a free man, a merchant or a
 scholar, his aim in life has nothing to do with his calling, so that a
 wrong choice is not such a very great piece of unhappiness. Let this
 serve as a crumb of comfort for philologists in general; but true
 philologists stand in need of a better understanding: what will result
 from a science which is "gone in for" by ninety-nine such people? The
 thoroughly unfitted majority draw up the rules of the science in
 accordance with their own capacities and inclinations; and in this way
 they tyrannise over the hundredth, the only capable one among them. If
 they have the training of others in their hands they will train them
 consciously or unconsciously after their own image . what then becomes
 of the classicism of the Greeks and Romans?
 
 The points to be proved are--
 
 (_a_) The disparity between philologists and the ancients.
 
 (_b_) The inability of the philologist to train his pupils, even with
 the help of the ancients.
 
 (_c_) The falsifying of the science by the (incapacity of the) majority,
 the wrong requirements held in view; the renunciation of the real aim of
 this science.
 
 
 4
 
 All this affects the sources of our present philology: a sceptical and
 melancholy attitude. But how otherwise are philologists to be produced?
 
 The imitation of antiquity: is not this a principle which has been
 refuted by this time?
 
 The flight from actuality to the ancients: does not this tend to falsify
 our conception of antiquity?
 
 
 5
 
 We are still behindhand in one type of contemplation: to understand how
 the greatest productions of the intellect have a dreadful and evil
 background . the sceptical type of contemplation. Greek antiquity is now
 investigated as the most beautiful example of life.
 
 As man assumes a sceptical and melancholy attitude towards his life's
 calling, so we must sceptically examine the highest life's calling of a
 nation: in order that we may understand what life is.
 
 
 6
 
 My words of consolation apply particularly to the single tyrannised
 individual out of a hundred: such exceptional ones should simply treat
 all the unenlightened majorities as their subordinates; and they should
 in the same way take advantage of the prejudice, which is still
 widespread, in favour of classical instruction--they need many helpers.
 But they must have a clear perception of what their actual goal is.
 
 
 7
 
 Philology as the science of antiquity does not, of course, endure for
 ever; its elements are not inexhaustible. What cannot be exhausted,
 however, is the ever-new adaptation of one's age to antiquity; the
 comparison of the two. If we make it our task to understand our own age
 better by means of antiquity, then our task will be an everlasting
 one.--This is the antinomy of philology: people have always endeavoured
 to understand antiquity by means of the present--and shall the present
 now be understood by means of antiquity? Better: people have explained
 antiquity to themselves out of their own experiences; and from the
 amount of antiquity thus acquired they have assessed the value of their
 experiences. Experience, therefore, is certainly an essential
 prerequisite for a philologist--that is, the philologist must first of
 all be a man; for then only can he be productive as a philologist. It
 follows from this that old men are well suited to be philologists if
 they were not such during that portion of their life which was richest
 in experiences.
 
 It must be insisted, however, that it is only through a knowledge of the
 present that one can acquire an inclination for the study of classical
 antiquity. Where indeed should the impulse come from if not from this
 inclination? When we observe how few philologists there actually are,
 except those that have taken up philology as a means of livelihood, we
 can easily decide for ourselves what is the matter with this impulse for
 antiquity: it hardly exists at all, for there are no disinterested
 philologists.
 
 Our task then is to secure for philology the universally educative
 results which it should bring about. The means: the limitation of the
 number of those engaged in the philological profession (doubtful whether
 young men should be made acquainted with philology at all). Criticism of
 the philologist. The value of antiquity: it sinks with you: how deeply
 you must have sunk, since its value is now so little!
 
 
 8
 
 It is a great advantage for the true philologist that a great deal of
 preliminary work has been done in his science, so that he may take
 possession of this inheritance if he is strong enough for it--I refer to
 the valuation of the entire Hellenic mode of thinking. So long as
 philologists worked simply at details, a misunderstanding of the Greeks
 was the consequence. The stages of this undervaluation are . the
 sophists of the second century, the philologist-poets of the
 Renaissance, and the philologist as the teacher of the higher classes of
 society (Goethe, Schiller).
 
 Valuing is the most difficult of all.
 
 In what respect is one most fitted for this valuing?
 
 --Not, at all events, when one is trained for philology as one is now.
 It should be ascertained to what extent our present means make this last
 object impossible.
 
 --Thus the philologist himself is not the aim of philology.
 
 
 9
 
 Most men show clearly enough that they do not regard themselves as
 individuals: their lives indicate this. The Christian command that
 everyone shall steadfastly keep his eyes fixed upon his salvation, and
 his alone, has as its counterpart the general life of mankind, where
 every man lives merely as a point among other points--living not only as
 the result of earlier generations, but living also only with an eye to
 the future. There are only three forms of existence in which a man
 remains an individual as a philosopher, as a Saviour, and as an artist.
 But just let us consider how a scientific man bungles his life: what
 has the teaching of Greek particles to do with the sense of life?--Thus
 we can also observe how innumerable men merely live, as it were, a
 preparation for a man, the philologist, for example, as a preparation
 for the philosopher, who in his turn knows how to utilise his ant-like
 work to pronounce some opinion upon the value of life. When such
 ant-like work is not carried out under any special direction the greater
 part of it is simply nonsense, and quite superfluous.
 
 
 10
 
 Besides the large number of unqualified philologists there is, on the
 other hand, a number of what may be called born philologists, who from
 some reason or other are prevented from becoming such. The greatest
 obstacle, however, which stands in the way of these born philologists is
 the bad representation of philology by the unqualified philologists.
 
 Leopardi is the modern ideal of a philologist: The German philologists
 can do nothing. (As a proof of this Voss should be studied!)
 
 
 11
 
 Let it be considered how differently a science is propagated from the
 way in which any special talent in a family is transmitted. The bodily
 transmission of an individual science is something very rare. Do the
 sons of philologists easily become philologists? _Dubito_. Thus there is
 no such accumulation of philological capacity as there was, let us say,
 in Beethoven's family of musical capacity. Most philologists begin from
 the beginning, and even then they learn from books, and not through
 travels, &c. They get some training, of course.
 
 
 12
 
 Most men are obviously in the world accidentally; no necessity of a
 higher kind is seen in them. They work at this and that, their talents
 are average. How strange! The manner in which they live shows that they
 think very little of themselves: they merely esteem themselves in so far
 as they waste their energy on trifles (whether these be mean or
 frivolous desires, or the trashy concerns of their everyday calling). In
 the so-called life's calling, which everyone must choose, we may
 perceive a touching modesty on the part of mankind. They practically
 admit in choosing thus. "We are called upon to serve and to be of
 advantage to our equals--the same remark applies to our neighbour and to
 his neighbour, so everyone serves somebody else; no one is carrying out
 the duties of his calling for his own sake, but always for the sake of
 others and thus we are like geese which support one another by the one
 leaning against the other. _When the aim of each one of us is centred in
 another, then we have all no object in existing;_ and this 'existing for
 others' is the most comical of comedies."
 
 
 13
 
 Vanity is the involuntary inclination to set one's self up for an
 individual while not really being one; that is to say, trying to appear
 independent when one is dependent. The case of wisdom is the exact
 contrary: it appears to be dependent while in reality it is independent.
 
 
 14
 
 The Hades of Homer--From what type of existence is it really copied? I
 think it is the description of the philologist: it is better to be a
 day-labourer than to have such an anaemic recollection of the past.--[1]
 
 
 15
 
 The attitude of the philologist towards antiquity is apologetic, or else
 dictated by the view that what our own age values can likewise be found
 in antiquity. The right attitude to take up, however, is the reverse
 one, viz., to start with an insight into our modern topsyturviness, and
 to look back from antiquity to it--and many things about antiquity which
 have hitherto displeased us will then be seen to have been most profound
 necessities.
 
 We must make it clear to ourselves that we are acting in an absurd
 manner when we try to defend or to beautify antiquity: _who_ are we!
 
 
 16
 
 We are under a false impression when we say that there is always some
 caste which governs a nation's culture, and that therefore savants are
 necessary; for savants only possess knowledge concerning culture (and
 even this only in exceptional cases). Among learned men themselves there
 might be a few, certainly not a caste, but even these would indeed be
 rare.
 
 
 17
 
 One very great value of antiquity consists in the fact that its writings
 are the only ones which modern men still read carefully.
 
 Overstraining of the memory--very common among philologists, together
 with a poor development of the judgment.
 
 
 18
 
 Busying ourselves with the culture-epochs of the past: is this
 gratitude? We should look backwards in order to explain to ourselves the
 present conditions of culture: we do not become too laudatory in regard
 to our own circumstances, but perhaps we should do so in order that we
 may not be too severe on ourselves.
 
 
 19
 
 He who has no sense for the symbolical has none for antiquity: let
 pedantic philologists bear this in mind.
 
 
 20
 
 My aim is to bring about a state of complete enmity between our present
 "culture" and antiquity. Whoever wishes to serve the former must hate
 the latter.
 
 
 21
 
 Careful meditation upon the past leads to the impression that we are a
 multiplication of many pasts . so how can we be a final aim? But why
 not? In most instances, however, we do not wish to be this. We take up
 our positions again in the ranks, work in our own little corner, and
 hope that what we do may be of some small profit to our successors. But
 that is exactly the case of the cask of the Danae . and this is useless,
 we must again set about doing everything for ourselves, and only for
 ourselves--measuring science by ourselves, for example with the question
 . What is science to us? not . what are we to science? People really
 make life too easy for themselves when they look upon themselves from
 such a simple historical point of view, and make humble servants of
 themselves. "Your own salvation above everything"--that is what you
 should say; and there are no institutions which you should prize more
 highly than your own soul.--Now, however, man learns to know himself: he
 finds himself miserable, despises himself, and is pleased to find
 something worthy of respect outside himself. Therefore he gets rid of
 himself, so to speak, makes himself subservient to a cause, does his
 duty strictly, and atones for his existence. He knows that he does not
 work for himself alone; he wishes to help those who are daring enough to
 exist on account of themselves, like Socrates. The majority of men are
 as it were suspended in the air like toy balloons; every breath of wind
 moves them.--As a consequence the savant must be such out of
 self-knowledge, that is to say, out of contempt for himself--in other
 words he must recognise himself to be merely the servant of some higher
 being who comes after him. Otherwise he is simply a sheep.
 
 
 22
 
 It is the duty of the free man to live for his own sake, and not for
 others. It was on this account that the Greeks looked upon handicrafts
 as unseemly.
 
 As a complete entity Greek antiquity has not yet been fully valued . I
 am convinced that if it had not been surrounded by its traditional
 glorification, the men of the present day would shrink from it horror
 stricken. This glorification, then, is spurious; gold-paper.
 
 
 23
 
 The false enthusiasm for antiquity in which many philologists live. When
 antiquity suddenly comes upon us in our youth, it appears to us to be
 composed of innumerable trivialities; in particular we believe ourselves
 to be above its ethics. And Homer and Walter Scott--who carries off the
 palm? Let us be honest! If this enthusiasm were really felt, people
 could scarcely seek their life's calling in it. I mean that what we can
 obtain from the Greeks only begins to dawn upon us in later years: only
 after we have undergone many experiences, and thought a great deal.
 
 
 24
 
 People in general think that philology is at an end--while I believe
 that it has not yet begun.
 
 The greatest events in philology are the appearance of Goethe,
 Schopenhauer, and Wagner; standing on their shoulders we look far into
 the distance. The fifth and sixth centuries have still to be discovered.
 
 
 25
 
 Where do we see the effect of antiquity? Not in language, not in the
 imitation of something or other, and not in perversity and waywardness,
 to which uses the French have turned it. Our museums are gradually
 becoming filled up: I always experience a sensation of disgust when I
 see naked statues in the Greek style in the presence of this thoughtless
 philistinism which would fain devour everything.
 
 
 PLANS AND THOUGHTS RELATING TO A WORK ON PHILOLOGY
 
 (1875)
 
 
 26
 
 Of all sciences philology at present is the most favoured . its progress
 having been furthered for centuries by the greatest number of scholars
 in every nation who have had charge of the noblest pupils. Philology has
 thus had one of the best of all opportunities to be propagated from
 generation to generation, and to make itself respected. How has it
 acquired this power?
 
 Calculations of the different prejudices in its favour.
 
 How then if these were to be frankly recognised as prejudices? Would not
 philology be superfluous if we reckoned up the interests of a position
 in life or the earning of a livelihood? What if the truth were told
 about antiquity, and its qualifications for training people to live in
 the present?
 
 In order that the questions set forth above may be answered let us
 consider the training of the philologist, his genesis: he no longer
 comes into being where these interests are lacking.
 
 If the world in general came to know what an unseasonable thing for us
 antiquity really is, philologists would no longer be called in as the
 educators of our youth.
 
 Effect of antiquity on the non-philologist likewise nothing. If they
 showed themselves to be imperative and contradictory, oh, with what
 hatred would they be pursued! But they always humble themselves.
 
 Philology now derives its power only from the union between the
 philologists who will not, or cannot, understand antiquity and public
 opinion, which is misled by prejudices in regard to it.
 
 The real Greeks, and their "watering down" through the philologists.
 
 The future commanding philologist sceptical in regard to our entire
 culture, and therefore also the destroyer of philology as a profession.
 
 
 THE PREFERENCE FOR ANTIQUITY
 
 
 27
 
 If a man approves of the investigation of the past he will also approve
 and even praise the fact--and will above all easily understand it--that
 there are scholars who are exclusively occupied with the investigation
 of Greek and Roman antiquity: but that these scholars are at the same
 time the teachers of the children of the nobility and gentry is not
 equally easy of comprehension--here lies a problem.
 
 Why philologists precisely? This is not altogether such a matter of
 course as the case of a professor of medicine, who is also a practical
 physician and surgeon. For, if the cases were identical, preoccupation
 with Greek and Roman antiquity would be identical with the "science of
 education." In short, the relationship between theory and practice in
 the philologist cannot be so quickly conceived. Whence comes his
 pretension to be a teacher in the higher sense, not only of all
 scientific men, but more especially of all cultured men? This
 educational power must be taken by the philologist from antiquity; and
 in such a case people will ask with astonishment: how does it come that
 we attach such value to a far-off past that we can only become cultured
 men with the aid of its knowledge?
 
 These questions, however, are not asked as a rule: The sway of philology
 over our means of instruction remains practically unquestioned; and
 antiquity _has_ the importance assigned to it. To this extent the
 position of the philologist is more favourable than that of any other
 follower of science. True, he has not at his disposal that great mass of
 men who stand in need of him--the doctor, for example, has far more than
 the philologist. But he can influence picked men, or youths, to be more
 accurate, at a time when all their mental faculties are beginning to
 blossom forth--people who can afford to devote both time and money to
 their higher development. In all those places where European culture has
 found its way, people have accepted secondary schools based upon a
 foundation of Latin and Greek as the first and highest means of
 instruction. In this way philology has found its best opportunity of
 transmitting itself, and commanding respect: no other science has been
 so well favoured. As a general rule all those who have passed through
 such institutions have afterwards borne testimony to the excellence of
 their organisation and curriculum, and such people are, of course,
 unconscious witnesses in favour of philology. If any who have not passed
 through these institutions should happen to utter a word in
 disparagement of this education, an unanimous and yet calm repudiation
 of the statement at once follows, as if classical education were a kind
 of witchcraft, blessing its followers, and demonstrating itself to them
 by this blessing. There is no attempt at polemics . "We have been
 through it all." "We know it has done us good."
 
 Now there are so many things to which men have become so accustomed that
 they look upon them as quite appropriate and suitable, for habit
 intermixes all things with sweetness; and men as a rule judge the value
 of a thing in accordance with their own desires. The desire for
 classical antiquity as it is now felt should be tested, and, as it were,
 taken to pieces and analysed with a view to seeing how much of this
 desire is due to habit, and how much to mere love of adventure--I refer
 to that inward and active desire, new and strange, which gives rise to a
 productive conviction from day to day, the desire for a higher goal, and
 also the means thereto . as the result of which people advance step by
 step from one unfamiliar thing to another, like an Alpine climber.
 
 What is the foundation on which the high value attached to antiquity at
 the present time is based, to such an extent indeed that our whole
 modern culture is founded on it? Where must we look for the origin of
 this delight in antiquity, and the preference shown for it?
 
 I think I have recognised in my examination of the question that all our
 philology--that is, all its present existence and power--is based on the
 same foundation as that on which our view of antiquity as the most
 important of all means of training is based. Philology as a means of
 instruction is the clear expression of a predominating conception
 regarding the value of antiquity, and the best methods of education. Two
 propositions are contained in this statement. In the first place all
 higher education must be a historical one, and secondly, Greek and Roman
 history differs from all others in that it is classical. Thus the
 scholar who knows this history becomes a teacher. We are not here going
 into the question as to whether higher education ought to be historical
 or not; but we may examine the second and ask: in how far is it classic?
 
 On this point there are many widespread prejudices. In the first place
 there is the prejudice expressed in the synonymous concept, "The study
 of the humanities": antiquity is classic because it is the school of the
 humane.
 
 Secondly: "Antiquity is classic because it is enlightened----"
 
 
 28
 
 It is the task of all education to change certain conscious actions and
 habits into more or less unconscious ones; and the history of mankind is
 in this sense its education. The philologist now practises unconsciously
 a number of such occupations and habits. It is my object to ascertain
 how his power, that is, his instinctive methods of work, is the result
 of activities which were formerly conscious, but which he has gradually
 come to feel as such no longer: _but that consciousness consisted of
 prejudices_. The present power of philologists is based upon these
 prejudices, for example the value attached to the _ratio_ as in the
 cases of Bentley and Hermann. Prejudices are, as Lichtenberg says, the
 art impulses of men.
 
 
 29
 
 It is difficult to justify the preference for antiquity since it has
 arisen from prejudices:
 
 1. From ignorance of all non-classical antiquity.
 
 2. From a false idealisation of humanitarianism, whilst Hindoos and
 Chinese are at all events more humane.
 
 3. From the pretensions of school-teachers.
 
 4. From the traditional admiration which emanated from antiquity itself.
 
 5. From opposition to the Christian church; or as a support for this
 church.
 
 6. From the impression created by the century-long work of the
 philologists, and the nature of this work. It must be a gold mine,
 thinks the spectator.
 
 7. The acquirement of knowledge attained as the result of the study. The
 preparatory school of science.
 
 In short, partly from ignorance, wrong impressions, and misleading
 conclusions; and also from the interest which philologists have in
 raising their science to a high level in the estimation of laymen.
 
 Also the preference for antiquity on the part of the artists, who
 involuntarily assume proportion and moderation to be the property of all
 antiquity. Purity of form. Authors likewise.
 
 The preference for antiquity as an abbreviation of the history of the
 human race, as if there were an autochthonous creation here by which all
 becoming might be studied.
 
 The fact actually is that the foundations of this preference are being
 removed one by one, and if this is not remarked by philologists
 themselves, it is certainly being remarked as much as it can possibly be
 by people outside their circle. First of all history had its effect, and
 then linguistics brought about the greatest diversion among philologists
 themselves, and even the desertion of many of them. They have still the
 schools in their hands: but for how long! In the form in which it has
 existed up to the present philology is dying out; the ground has been
 swept from under its feet. Whether philologists may still hope to
 maintain their status is doubtful; in any case they are a dying race.
 
 
 30
 
 The peculiarly significant situation of philologists: a class of people
 to whom we entrust our youth, and who have to investigate quite a
 special antiquity. The highest value is obviously attached to this
 antiquity. But if this antiquity has been wrongly valued, then the whole
 foundation upon which the high position of the philologist is based
 suddenly collapses. In any case this antiquity has been very
 differently valued, and our appreciation of the philologists has
 constantly been guided by it. These people have borrowed their power
 from the strong prejudices in favour of antiquity,--this must be made
 clear.
 
 Philologists now feel that when these prejudices are at last refuted,
 and antiquity depicted in its true colours, the favourable prejudices
 towards them will diminish considerably. _It is thus to the interest of
 their profession not to let a clear impression of antiquity come to
 light; in particular the impression that antiquity in its highest sense
 renders one "out of season?"_ i.e., _an enemy to one's own time._
 
 It is also to the interest of philologists as a class not to let their
 calling as teachers be regarded from a higher standpoint than that to
 which they themselves can correspond.
 
 
 31
 
 It is to be hoped that there are a few people who look upon it as a
 problem why philologists should be the teachers of our noblest youths.
 Perhaps the case will not be always so--It would be much more natural
 _per se_ if our children were instructed in the elements of geography,
 natural science, political economy, and sociology, if they were
 gradually led to a consideration of life itself, and if finally, but
 much later, the most noteworthy events of the past were brought to their
 knowledge. A knowledge of antiquity should be among the last subjects
 which a student would take up; and would not this position of antiquity
 in the curriculum of a school be more honourable for it than the present
 one?--Antiquity is now used merely as a propaedeutic for thinking,
 speaking, and writing; but there was a time when it was the essence of
 earthly knowledge, and people at that time wished to acquire by means of
 practical learning what they now seek to acquire merely by means of a
 detailed plan of study--a plan which, corresponding to the more advanced
 knowledge of the age, has entirely changed.
 
 Thus the inner purpose of philological teaching has been entirely
 altered; it was at one time material teaching, a teaching that taught
 how to live, but now it is merely formal.[2]
 
 
 32
 
 If it were the task of the philologist to impart formal education, it
 would be necessary for him to teach walking, dancing, speaking, singing,
 acting, or arguing . and the so-called formal teachers did impart their
 instruction this way in the second and third centuries. But only the
 training of a scientific man is taken into account, which results in
 "formal" thinking and writing, and hardly any speaking at all.
 
 
 33
 
 If the gymnasium is to train young men for science, people now say there
 can be no more preliminary preparation for any particular science, so
 comprehensive have all the sciences become. As a consequence teachers
 have to train their students generally, that is to say for all the
 sciences--for scientificality in other words; and for that classical
 studies are necessary! What a wonderful jump! a most despairing
 justification! Whatever is, is right,[3] even when it is clearly seen
 that the "right" on which it has been based has turned to wrong.
 
 
 34
 
 It is accomplishments which are expected from us after a study of the
 ancients: formerly, for example, the ability to write and speak. But
 what is expected now! Thinking and deduction . but these things are not
 learnt _from_ the ancients, but at best _through_ the ancients, by means
 of science. Moreover, all historical deduction is very limited and
 unsafe, natural science should be preferred.
 
 
 35
 
 It is the same with the simplicity of antiquity as it is with the
 simplicity of style: it is the highest thing which we recognise and must
 imitate; but it is also the last. Let it be remembered that the classic
 prose of the Greeks is also a late result.
 
 
 36
 
 What a mockery of the study of the "humanities" lies in the fact that
 they were also called "belles lettres" (bellas litteras)!
 
 
 37
 
 Wolf's[4] reasons why the Egyptians, Hebrews, Persians, and other
 Oriental nations were not to be set on the same plane with the Greeks
 and Romans: "The former have either not raised themselves, or have
 raised themselves only to a slight extent, above that type of culture
 which should be called a mere civilisation and bourgeois acquirement, as
 opposed to the higher and true culture of the mind." He then explains
 that this culture is spiritual and literary: "In a well-organised nation
 this may be begun earlier than order and peacefulness in the outward
 life of the people (enlightenment)."
 
 He then contrasts the inhabitants of easternmost Asia ("like such
 individuals, who are not wanting in clean, decent, and comfortable
 dwellings, clothing, and surroundings; but who never feel the necessity
 for a higher enlightenment") with the Greeks ("in the case of the
 Greeks, even among the most educated inhabitants of Attica, the contrary
 often happens to an astonishing degree; and the people neglect as
 insignificant factors that which we, thanks to our love of order, are in
 the habit of looking upon as the foundations of mental culture itself").
 
 
 38
 
 Our terminology already shows how prone we are to judge the ancients
 wrongly: the exaggerated sense of literature, for example, or, as Wolf,
 when speaking of the "inner history of ancient erudition," calls it,
 "the history of learned enlightenment."
 
 
 39
 
 According to Goethe, the ancients are "the despair of the emulator."
 Voltaire said. "If the admirers of Homer were honest, they would
 acknowledge the boredom which their favourite often causes them."
 
 
 40
 
 The position we have taken up towards classical antiquity is at bottom
 the profound cause of the sterility of modern culture; for we have taken
 all this modern conception of culture from the Hellenised Romans. We
 must distinguish within the domain of antiquity itself: when we come to
 appreciate its purely productive period, we condemn at the same time the
 entire Romano-Alexandrian culture. But at the same time also we condemn
 our own attitude towards antiquity, and likewise our philology.
 
 
 41
 
 There has been an age-long battle between the Germans and antiquity,
 _i.e._, a battle against the old culture. It is certain that precisely
 what is best and deepest in the German resists it. The main point,
 however, is that such resistance is only justifiable in the case of the
 Romanised culture; for this culture, even at that time, was a
 falling-off from something more profound and noble. It is this latter
 that the Germans are wrong in resisting.
 
 
 42
 
 Everything classic was thoroughly cultivated by Charles the Great,
 whilst he combated everything heathen with the severest possible
 measures of coercion. Ancient mythology was developed, but German
 mythology was treated as a crime. The feeling underlying all this, in my
 opinion, was that Christianity had already overcome the old religion .
 people no longer feared it, but availed themselves of the culture that
 rested upon it. But the old German gods were feared.
 
 A great superficiality in the conception of antiquity--little else than
 an appreciation of its formal accomplishments and its knowledge--must
 thereby have been brought about. We must find out the forces that stood
 in the way of increasing our insight into antiquity. First of all, the
 culture of antiquity is utilised as an incitement towards the acceptance
 of Christianity . it became, as it were, the premium for conversion, the
 gilt with which the poisonous pill was coated before being swallowed.
 Secondly, the help of ancient culture was found to be necessary as a
 weapon for the intellectual protection of Christianity. Even the
 Reformation could not dispense with classical studies for this purpose.
 
 The Renaissance, on the other hand, now begins, with a clearer sense of
 classical studies, which, however, are likewise looked upon from an
 anti-Christian standpoint: the Renaissance shows an awakening of honesty
 in the south, like the Reformation in the north. They could not but
 clash; for a sincere leaning towards antiquity renders one unchristian.
 
 On the whole, however, the Church succeeded in turning classical studies
 into a harmless direction . the philologist was invented, representing a
 type of learned man who was at the same time a priest or something
 similar. Even in the period of the Reformation people succeeded in
 emasculating scholarship. It is on this account that Friedrich August
 Wolf is noteworthy he freed his profession from the bonds of theology.
 This action of his, however, was not fully understood; for an
 aggressive, active element, such as was manifested by the
 poet-philologists of the Renaissance, was not developed. The freedom
 obtained benefited science, but not man.
 
 
 43
 
 It is true that both humanism and rationalism have brought antiquity
 into the field as an ally; and it is therefore quite comprehensible that
 the opponents of humanism should direct their attacks against antiquity
 also. Antiquity, however, has been misunderstood and falsified by
 humanism . it must rather be considered as a testimony against humanism,
 against the benign nature of man, &c. The opponents of humanism are
 wrong to combat antiquity as well; for in antiquity they have a strong
 ally.
 
 
 44
 
 It is so difficult to understand the ancients. We must wait patiently
 until the spirit moves us. The human element which antiquity shows us
 must not be confused with humanitarianism. This contrast must be
 strongly emphasised: philology suffers by endeavouring to substitute the
 humanitarian, young men are brought forward as students of philology in
 order that they may thereby become humanitarians. A good deal of
 history, in my opinion, is quite sufficient for that purpose. The brutal
 and self-conscious man will be humbled when he sees things and values
 changing to such an extent.
 
 The human element among the Greeks lies within a certain _naivete_,
 through which man himself is to be seen--state, art, society, military
 and civil law, sexual relations, education, party. It is precisely the
 human element which may be seen everywhere and among all peoples, but
 among the Greeks it is seen in a state of nakedness and inhumanity which
 cannot be dispensed with for purposes of instruction. In addition to
 this, the Greeks have created the greatest number of individuals, and
 thus they give us so much insight into men,--a Greek cook is more of a
 cook than any other.
 
 
 45
 
 I deplore a system of education which does not enable people to
 understand Wagner, and as the result of which Schopenhauer sounds harsh
 and discordant in our ears . such a system of education has missed its
 aim.
 
 
 46
 
 (THE FINAL DRAFT OF THE FIRST CHAPTER.)
 
 
      Il faut dire la verite et s'immoler--VOLTAIRE.
 
 
 Let us suppose that there were freer and more superior spirits who were
 dissatisfied with the education now in vogue, and that they summoned it
 to their tribunal, what would the defendant say to them? In all
 probability something like this: "Whether you have a right to summon
 anyone here or not, I am at all events not the proper person to be
 called. It is my educators to whom you should apply. It is their duty to
 defend me, and I have a right to keep silent. I am merely what they have
 made me."
 
 These educators would now be hauled before the tribunal, and among them
 an entire profession would be observed . the philologists. This
 profession consists in the first place of those men who make use of
 their knowledge of Greek and Roman antiquity to bring up youths of
 thirteen to twenty years of age, and secondly of those men whose task it
 is to train specially-gifted pupils to act as future teachers--_i.e._,
 as the educators of educators. Philologists of the first type are
 teachers at the public schools, those of the second are professors at
 the universities.
 
 The first-named philologists are entrusted with the care of certain
 specially-chosen youths, those who, early in life, show signs of talent
 and a sense of what is noble, and whose parents are prepared to allow
 plenty of time and money for their education. If other boys, who do not
 fulfil these three conditions, are presented to the teachers, the
 teachers have the right to refuse them. Those forming the second class,
 the university professors, receive the young men who feel themselves
 fitted for the highest and most responsible of callings, that of
 teachers and moulders of mankind; and these professors, too, may refuse
 to have anything to do with young men who are not adequately equipped or
 gifted for the task.
 
 If, then, the educational system of a period is condemned, a heavy
 censure on philologists is thereby implied: either, as the consequence
 of their wrong-headed view, they insist on giving bad education in the
 belief that it is good; or they do not wish to give this bad education,
 but are unable to carry the day in favour of education which they
 recognise to be better. In other words, their fault is either due to
 their lack of insight or to their lack of will. In answer to the first
 charge they would say that they knew no better, and in answer to the
 second that they could do no better. As, however, these philologists
 bring up their pupils chiefly with the aid of Greek and Roman antiquity,
 their want of insight in the first case may be attributed to the fact
 that they do not understand antiquity, and again to the fact that they
 bring forward antiquity into the present age as if it were the most
 important of all aids to instruction, while antiquity, generally
 speaking, does not assist in training, or at all events no longer does
 so.
 
 On the other hand, if we reproach our professors with their lack of
 will, they would be quite right in attributing educational significance
 and power to antiquity; but they themselves could not be said to be the
 proper instruments by means of which antiquity could exhibit such power.
 In other words, the professors would not be real teachers and would be
 living under false colours, but how, then, could they have reached such
 an irregular position? Through a misunderstanding of themselves and
 their qualifications. In order, then, that we may ascribe to
 philologists their share in this bad educational system of the present
 time, we may sum up the different factors of their innocence and guilt
 in the following sentence: the philologist, if he wishes for a verdict
 of acquittal, must understand three things antiquity, the present time,
 and himself . his fault lies in the fact that he either does not
 understand antiquity, or the present time, or himself.
 
 
 47
 
 It is not true to say that we can attain culture through antiquity
 alone. We may learn something from it, certainly; but not culture as the
 word is now understood. Our present culture is based on an emasculated
 and mendacious study of antiquity. In order to understand how
 ineffectual this study is, just look at our philologists . they, trained
 upon antiquity, should be the most cultured men. Are they?
 
 
 48
 
 Origin of the philologist. When a great work of art is exhibited there
 is always some one who not only feels its influence but wishes to
 perpetuate it. The same remark applies to a great state--to everything,
 in short, that man produces. Philologists wish to perpetuate the
 influence of antiquity and they can set about it only as imitative
 artists. Why not as men who form their lives after antiquity?
 
 
 49
 
 The decline of the poet-scholars is due in great part to their own
 corruption: their type is continually arising again; Goethe and
 Leopardi, for example, belong to it. Behind them plod the
 philologist-savants. This type has its origin in the sophisticism of the
 second century.
 
 
 50
 
 Ah, it is a sad story, the story of philology! The disgusting erudition,
 the lazy, inactive passivity, the timid submission.--Who was ever free?
 
 
 51
 
 When we examine the history of philology it is borne in upon us how few
 really talented men have taken part in it. Among the most celebrated
 philologists are a few who ruined their intellect by acquiring a
 smattering of many subjects, and among the most enlightened of them were
 several who could use their intellect only for childish tasks. It is a
 sad story . no science, I think, has ever been so poor in talented
 followers. Those whom we might call the intellectually crippled found a
 suitable hobby in all this hair-splitting.
 
 
 52
 
 The teacher of reading and writing, and the reviser, were the first
 types of the philologist.
 
 
 53
 
 Friedrich August Wolf reminds us how apprehensive and feeble were the
 first steps taken by our ancestors in moulding scholarship--how even the
 Latin classics, for example, had to be smuggled into the university
 market under all sorts of pretexts, as if they had been contraband
 goods. In the "Gottingen Lexicon" of 1737, J. M. Gesner tells us of the
 Odes of Horace: "ut imprimis, quid prodesse _in severioribus studiis_
 possint, ostendat."
 
 
 54
 
 I was pleased to read of Bentley "non tam grande pretium emendatiunculis
 meis statuere soleo, ut singularem aliquam gratiam inde sperem aut
 exigam."
 
 Newton was surprised that men like Bentley and Hare should quarrel about
 a book of ancient comedies, since they were both theological
 dignitaries.
 
 
 55
 
 Horace was summoned by Bentley as before a judgment seat, the authority
 of which he would have been the first to repudiate. The admiration which
 a discriminating man acquires as a philologist is in proportion to the
 rarity of the discrimination to be found in philologists. Bentley's
 treatment of Horace has something of the schoolmaster about it It would
 appear at first sight as if Horace himself were not the object of
 discussion, but rather the various scribes and commentators who have
 handed down the text: in reality, however, it is actually Horace who is
 being dealt with. It is my firm conviction that to have written a single
 line which is deemed worthy of being commented upon by scholars of a
 later time, far outweighs the merits of the greatest critic. There is a
 profound modesty about philologists. The improving of texts is an
 entertaining piece of work for scholars, it is a kind of riddle-solving;
 but it should not be looked upon as a very important task. It would be
 an argument against antiquity if it should speak less clearly to us
 because a million words stood in the way!
 
 
 56
 
 A school-teacher said to Bentley, "Sir, I will make your grandchild as
 great a scholar as you are yourself." "How can you do that," replied
 Bentley, "when I have forgotten more than you ever knew?"
 
 
 57
 
 Bentley's clever daughter Joanna once lamented to her father that he had
 devoted his time and talents to the criticism of the works of others
 instead of writing something original. Bentley remained silent for some
 time as if he were turning the matter over in his mind. At last he said
 that her remark was quite right; he himself felt that he might have
 directed his gifts in some other channel. Earlier in life, nevertheless,
 he had done something for the glory of God and the improvement of his
 fellow-men (referring to his "Confutation of Atheism"), but afterwards
 the genius of the pagans had attracted him, and, _despairing of
 attaining their level in any other way_, he had mounted upon their
 shoulders so that he might thus be able to look over their heads.
 
 
 58
 
 Bentley, says Wolf, both as man of letters and individual, was
 misunderstood and persecuted during the greater part of his life, or
 else praised maliciously.
 
 Markland, towards the end of his life--as was the case with so many
 others like him--became imbued with a repugnance for all scholarly
 reputation, to such an extent, indeed, that he partly tore up and
 partly burnt several works which he had long had in hand.
 
 Wolf says: "The amount of intellectual food that can be got from
 well-digested scholarship is a very insignificant item."
 
 In Winckelmann's youth there were no philological studies apart from the
 ordinary bread-winning branches of the science--people read and
 explained the ancients in order to prepare themselves for the better
 interpretation of the Bible and the Corpus Juris.
 
 
 59
 
 In Wolf's estimation, a man has reached the highest point of historical
 research when he is able to take a wide and general view of the whole
 and of the profoundly conceived distinctions in the developments in art
 and the different styles of art. Wolf acknowledges, however, that
 Winckelmann was lacking in the more common talent of philological
 criticism, or else he could not use it properly: "A rare mixture of a
 cool head and a minute and restless solicitude for hundreds of things
 which, insignificant in themselves, were combined in his case with a
 fire that swallowed up those little things, and with a gift of
 divination which is a vexation and an annoyance to the uninitiated."
 
 
 60
 
 Wolf draws our attention to the fact that antiquity was acquainted only
 with theories of oratory and poetry which facilitated production,
 [Greek: technai] and _artes_ that formed real orators and poets, "while
 at the present day we shall soon have theories upon which it would be
 as impossible to build up a speech or a poem as it would be to form a
 thunderstorm upon a brontological treatise."
 
 
 61
 
 Wolf's judgment on the amateurs of philological knowledge is noteworthy:
 "If they found themselves provided by nature with a mind corresponding
 to that of the ancients, or if they were capable of adapting themselves
 to other points of view and other circumstances of life, then, with even
 a nodding acquaintance with the best writers, they certainly acquired
 more from those vigorous natures, those splendid examples of thinking
 and acting, than most of those did who during their whole life merely
 offered themselves to them as interpreters."
 
 
 62
 
 Says Wolf again . "In the end, only those few ought to attain really
 complete knowledge who are born with artistic talent and furnished with
 scholarship, and who make use of the best opportunities of securing,
 both theoretically and practically, the necessary technical knowledge"
 True!
 
 
 63
 
 Instead of forming our students on the Latin models I recommend the
 Greek, especially Demosthenes . simplicity! This may be seen by a
 reference to Leopardi, who is perhaps the greatest stylist of the
 century.
 
 
 64
 
 "Classical education" . what do people see in it? Something that is
 useless beyond rendering a period of military service unnecessary and
 securing a degree![5]
 
 
 65
 
 When I observe how all countries are now promoting the advancement of
 classical literature I say to myself, "How harmless it must be!" and
 then, "How useful it must be!" It brings these countries the reputation
 of promoting "free culture." In order that this "freedom" may be rightly
 estimated, just look at the philologists!
 
 
 66
 
 Classical education! Yea, if there were only as much paganism as Goethe
 found and glorified in Winckelmann, even that would not be much. Now,
 however, that the lying Christendom of our time has taken hold of it,
 the thing becomes overpowering, and I cannot help expressing my disgust
 on the point--People firmly believe in witchcraft where this "classical
 education" is concerned. They, however, who possess the greatest
 knowledge of antiquity should likewise possess the greatest amount of
 culture, viz., our philologists; but what is classical about them?
 
 
 67
 
 Classical philology is the basis of the most shallow rationalism always
 having been dishonestly applied, it has gradually become quite
 ineffective. Its effect is one more illusion of the modern man.
 Philologists are nothing but a guild of sky-pilots who are not known as
 such . this is why the State takes an interest in them. The utility of
 classical education is completely used up, whilst, for example, the
 history of Christianity still shows its power.
 
 
 68
 
 Philologists, when discussing their science, never get down to the root
 of the subject . they never set forth philology itself as a problem. Bad
 conscience? or merely thoughtlessness?
 
 
 69
 
 We learn nothing from what philologists say about philology: it is all
 mere tittle-tattle--for example, Jahn's[6] "The Meaning and Place of the
 Study of Antiquity in Germany." There is no feeling for what should be
 protected and defended: thus speak people who have not even thought of
 the possibility that any one could attack them.
 
 
 70
 
 Philologists are people who exploit the vaguely-felt dissatisfaction of
 modern man, and his desire for "something better," in order that they
 may earn their bread and butter.
 
 I know them--I myself am one of them.
 
 
 71
 
 Our philologists stand in the same relation to true educators as the
 medicine-men of the wild Indians do to true physicians What astonishment
 will be felt by a later age!
 
 
 72
 
 What they lack is a real taste for the strong and powerful
 characteristics of the ancients. They turn into mere panegyrists, and
 thus become ridiculous.
 
 
 73
 
 They have forgotten how to address other men; and, as they cannot speak
 to the older people, they cannot do so to the young.
 
 
 74
 
 When we bring the Greeks to the knowledge of our young students, we are
 treating the latter as if they were well-informed and matured men. What,
 indeed, is there about the Greeks and their ways which is suitable for
 the young? In the end we shall find that we can do nothing for them
 beyond giving them isolated details. Are these observations for young
 people? What we actually do, however, is to introduce our young scholars
 to the collective wisdom of antiquity. Or do we not? The reading of the
 ancients is emphasised in this way.
 
 My belief is that we are forced to concern ourselves with antiquity at a
 wrong period of our lives. At the end of the twenties its meaning begins
 to dawn on one.
 
 
 75
 
 There is something disrespectful about the way in which we make our
 young students known to the ancients: what is worse, it is
 unpedagogical; or what can result from a mere acquaintance with things
 which a youth cannot consciously esteem! Perhaps he must learn to
 "_believe_" and this is why I object to it.
 
 
 76
 
 There are matters regarding which antiquity instructs us, and about
 which I should hardly care to express myself publicly.
 
 
 77
 
 All the difficulties of historical study to be elucidated by great
 examples.
 
 Why our young students are not suited to the Greeks.
 
 The consequences of philology.
      Arrogant expectation.
      Culture-philistinism.
      Superficiality.
      Too high an esteem for reading and writing.
      Estrangement from the nation and its needs.
 
 The philologists themselves, the historians, philosophers, and jurists
 all end in smoke.
 
 Our young students should be brought into contact with real sciences.
 
 Likewise with real art.
 
 In consequence, when they grew older, a desire for _real_ history would
 be shown.
 
 
 78
 
 Inhumanity: even in the "Antigone," even in Goethe's "Iphigenia."
 
 The want of "rationalism" in the Greeks.
 
 Young people cannot understand the political affairs of antiquity.
 
 The poetic element: a bad expectation.
 
 
 79
 
 Do the philologists know the present time? Their judgments on it as
 Periclean, their mistaken judgments when they speak of Freytag's[7]
 genius as resembling that of Homer, and so on; their following in the
 lead of the litterateurs, their abandonment of the pagan sense, which
 was exactly the classical element that Goethe discovered in Winckelmann.
 
 
 80
 
 The condition of the philologists may be seen by their indifference at
 the appearance of Wagner. They should have learnt even more through him
 than through Goethe, and they did not even glance in his direction. That
 shows that they are not actuated by any strong need, or else they would
 have an instinct to tell them where their food was to be found.
 
 
 81
 
 Wagner prizes his art too highly to go and sit in a corner with it, like
 Schumann. He either surrenders himself to the public ("Rienzi") or he
 makes the public surrender itself to him. He educates it up to his
 music. Minor artists, too, want their public, but they try to get it by
 inartistic means, such as through the Press, Hanslick,[8] &c.
 
 
 82
 
 Wagner perfected the inner fancy of man . later generations will see a
 renaissance in sculpture. Poetry must precede the plastic art.
 
 
 83
 
 I observe in philologists .
 
 1. Want of respect for antiquity.
 
 2. Tenderness and flowery oratory; even an apologetic tone.
 
 3. Simplicity in their historical comments.
 
 4. Self-conceit.
 
 5. Under-estimation of the talented philologists.
 
 
 84
 
 Philologists appear to me to be a secret society who wish to train our
 youth by means of the culture of antiquity . I could well understand
 this society and their views being criticised from all sides. A great
 deal would depend upon knowing what these philologists understood by the
 term "culture of antiquity"--If I saw, for example, that they were
 training their pupils against German philosophy and German music, I
 should either set about combating them or combating the culture of
 antiquity, perhaps the former, by showing that these philologists had
 not understood the culture of antiquity. Now I observe:
 
 1. A great indecision in the valuation of the culture of antiquity on
 the part of philologists.
 
 2. Something very non-ancient in themselves; something non-free.
 
 3. Want of clearness in regard to the particular type of ancient culture
 they mean.
 
 4. Want of judgment in their methods of instruction, _e.g._,
 scholarship.
 
 5. Classical education is served out mixed up with Christianity.
 
 
 85
 
 It is now no longer a matter of surprise to me that, with such teachers,
 the education of our time should be worthless. I can never avoid
 depicting this want of education in its true colours, especially in
 regard to those things which ought to be learnt from antiquity if
 possible, for example, writing, speaking, and so on.
 
 
 86
 
 The transmission of the emotions is hereditary: let that be recollected
 when we observe the effect of the Greeks upon philologists.
 
 
 87
 
 Even in the best of cases, philologists seek for no more than mere
 "rationalism" and Alexandrian culture--not Hellenism.
 
 
 88
 
 Very little can be gained by mere diligence, if the head is dull.
 Philologist after philologist has swooped down on Homer in the mistaken
 belief that something of him can be obtained by force. Antiquity speaks
 to us when it feels a desire to do so, not when we do.
 
 
 89
 
 The inherited characteristic of our present-day philologists . a certain
 sterility of insight has resulted, for they promote the science, but not
 the philologist.
 
 
 90
 
 The following is one way of carrying on classical studies, and a
 frequent one: a man throws himself thoughtlessly, or is thrown, into
 some special branch or other, whence he looks to the right and left and
 sees a great deal that is good and new. Then, in some unguarded moment,
 he asks himself: "But what the devil has all this to do with me?" In the
 meantime he has grown old and has become accustomed to it all; and
 therefore he continues in his rut--just as in the case of marriage.
 
 
 91
 
 In connection with the training of the modern philologist the influence
 of the science of linguistics should be mentioned and judged; a
 philologist should rather turn aside from it . the question of the early
 beginnings of the Greeks and Romans should be nothing to him . how can
 they spoil their own subject in such a way?
 
 
 92
 
 A morbid passion often makes its appearance from time to time in
 connection with the oppressive uncertainty of divination, a passion for
 believing and feeling sure at all costs: for example, when dealing with
 Aristotle, or in the discovery of magic numbers, which, in Lachmann's
 case, is almost an illness.
 
 
 93
 
 The consistency which is prized in a savant is pedantry if applied to
 the Greeks.
 
 
 94
 
                 (THE GREEKS AND THE PHILOLOGISTS.)
 
 
             THE GREEKS.              THE PHILOLOGISTS are .
 
      render homage to beauty,        babblers and triflers,
      develop the body,               ugly-looking creatures,
      speak clearly,                  stammerers,
      are religious transfigurers     filthy pedants,
        of everyday occurrences,
      are listeners and observers,    quibblers and scarecrows,
      have an aptitude for the        unfitted for the symbolical,
        symbolical,
      are in full possession of       ardent slaves of the State,
        their freedom as men,
      can look innocently out         Christians in disguise,
        into the world,
      are the pessimists of           philistines.
        thought.
 
 
 95
 
 Bergk's "History of Literature": Not a spark of Greek fire or Greek
 sense.
 
 
 96
 
 People really do compare our own age with that of Pericles, and
 congratulate themselves on the reawakening of the feeling of patriotism:
 I remember a parody on the funeral oration of Pericles by G. Freytag,[9]
 in which this prim and strait-laced "poet" depicted the happiness now
 experienced by sixty-year-old men.--All pure and simple caricature! So
 this is the result! And sorrow and irony and seclusion are all that
 remain for him who has seen more of antiquity than this.
 
 
 97
 
 If we change a single word of Lord Bacon's we may say . infimarum
 Graecorum virtutum apud philologos laus est, mediarum admiratio,
 supremarum sensus nullus.
 
 
 98
 
 How can anyone glorify and venerate a whole people! It is the
 individuals that count, even in the case of the Greeks.
 
 
 99
 
 There is a great deal of caricature even about the Greeks . for example,
 the careful attention devoted by the Cynics to their own happiness.
 
 
 100
 
 The only thing that interests me is the relationship of the people
 considered as a whole to the training of the single individuals . and in
 the case of the Greeks there are some factors which are very favourable
 to the development of the individual. They do not, however, arise from
 the goodwill of the people, but from the struggle between the evil
 instincts.
 
 By means of happy inventions and discoveries, we can train the
 individual differently and more highly than has yet been done by mere
 chance and accident. There are still hopes . the breeding of superior
 men.
 
 
 101
 
 The Greeks are interesting and quite disproportionately important
 because they had such a host of great individuals. How was that
 possible? This point must be studied.
 
 
 102
 
 The history of Greece has hitherto always been written optimistically.
 
 
 103
 
 Selected points from antiquity: the power, fire, and swing of the
 feeling the ancients had for music (through the first Pythian Ode),
 purity in their historical sense, gratitude for the blessings of
 culture, the fire and corn feasts.
 
 The ennoblement of jealousy: the Greeks the most jealous nation.
 
 Suicide, hatred of old age, of penury. Empedocles on sexual love.
 
 
 104
 
 Nimble and healthy bodies, a clear and deep sense for the observation of
 everyday matters, manly freedom, belief in good racial descent and good
 upbringing, warlike virtues, jealousy in the [Greek: aristeyein],
 delight in the arts, respect for leisure, a sense for free
 individuality, for the symbolical.
 
 
 105
 
 The spiritual culture of Greece an aberration of the amazing political
 impulse towards [Greek: aristeyein]. The [Greek: polis] utterly opposed
 to new education; culture nevertheless existed.
 
 
 106
 
 When I say that, all things considered, the Greeks were more moral than
 modern men what do I mean by that? From what we can perceive of the
 activities of their soul, it is clear that they had no shame, they had
 no bad conscience. They were more sincere, open-hearted, and passionate,
 as artists are; they exhibited a kind of child-like _naivete_. It thus
 came about that even in all their evil actions they had a dash of purity
 about them, something approaching the holy. A remarkable number of
 individualities: might there not have been a higher morality in that?
 When we recollect that character develops slowly, what can it be that,
 in the long run, breeds individuality? Perhaps vanity, emulation?
 Possibly. Little inclination for conventional things.
 
 
 107
 
 The Greeks as the geniuses among the nations.
 
 Their childlike nature, credulousness.
 
 Passionate. Quite unconsciously they lived in such a way as to procreate
 genius. Enemies of shyness and dulness. Pain. Injudicious actions. The
 nature of their intuitive insight into misery, despite their bright and
 genial temperament. Profoundness in their apprehension and glorifying of
 everyday things (fire, agriculture). Mendacious, unhistorical. The
 significance of the [Greek: polis] in culture instinctively recognised,
 favourable as a centre and periphery for great men (the facility of
 surveying a community, and also the possibility of addressing it as a
 whole). Individuality raised to the highest power through the [Greek:
 polis]. Envy, jealousy, as among gifted people.
 
 
 108
 
 The Greeks were lacking in sobriety and caution. Over-sensibility,
 abnormally active condition of the brain and the nerves; impetuosity and
 fervour of the will.
 
 
 109
 
 "Invariably to see the general in the particular is the distinguishing
 characteristic of genius," says Schopenhauer. Think of Pindar,
 &c.--"[Greek: Sophrosynae]," according to Schopenhauer, has its roots in
 the clearness with which the Greeks saw into themselves and into the
 world at large, and thence became conscious of themselves.
 
 The "wide separation of will and intellect" indicates the genius, and is
 seen in the Greeks.
 
 "The melancholy associated with genius is due to the fact that the will
 to live, the more clearly it is illuminated by the contemplating
 intellect, appreciates all the more clearly the misery of its
 condition," says Schopenhauer. _Cf._ the Greeks.
 
 
 110
 
 The moderation of the Greeks in their sensual luxury, eating, and
 drinking, and their pleasure therein; the Olympic plays and their
 worship . that shows what they were.
 
 In the case of the genius, "the intellect will point out the faults
 which are seldom absent in an instrument that is put to a use for which
 it was not intended."
 
 "The will is often left in the lurch at an awkward moment: hence genius,
 where real life is concerned, is more or less unpractical--its
 behaviour often reminds us of madness."
 
 
 111
 
 We contrast the Romans, with their matter-of-fact earnestness, with the
 genial Greeks! Schopenhauer: "The stern, practical, earnest mode of life
 which the Romans called _gravitas_ presupposes that the intellect does
 not forsake the service of the will in order to roam far off among
 things that have no connection with the will."
 
 
 112
 
 It would have been much better if the Greeks had been conquered by the
 Persians instead of by the Romans.
 
 
 113
 
 The characteristics of the gifted man who is lacking in genius are to be
 found in the average Hellene--all the dangerous characteristics of such
 a disposition and character.
 
 
 114
 
 Genius makes tributaries of all partly-talented people: hence the
 Persians themselves sent their ambassadors to the Greek oracles.
 
 
 115
 
 The happiest lot that can fall to the genius is to exchange doing and
 acting for leisure; and this was something the Greeks knew how to value.
 The blessings of labour! _Nugari_ was the Roman name for all the
 exertions and aspirations of the Greeks.
 
 No happy course of life is open to the genius, he stands in
 contradiction to his age and must perforce struggle with it. Thus the
 Greeks . they instinctively made the utmost exertions to secure a safe
 refuge for themselves (in the _polis_). Finally, everything went to
 pieces in politics. They were compelled to take up a stand against their
 enemies . this became ever more and more difficult, and at last
 impossible.
 
 
 116
 
 Greek culture is based on the lordship of a small class over four to
 nine times their number of slaves. Judged by mere numbers, Greece was a
 country inhabited by barbarians. How can the ancients be thought to be
 humane? There was a great contrast between the genius and the
 breadwinner, the half-beast of burden. The Greeks believed in a racial
 distinction. Schopenhauer wonders why Nature did not take it into her
 head to invent two entirely separate species of men.
 
 The Greeks bear the same relation to the barbarians "as free-moving or
 winged animals do to the barnacles which cling tightly to the rocks and
 must await what fate chooses to send them"--Schopenhauer's simile.
 
 
 117
 
 The Greeks as the only people of genius in the history of the world.
 Such they are even when considered as learners; for they understand this
 best of all, and can do more than merely trim and adorn themselves with
 what they have borrowed, as did the Romans.
 
 The constitution of the _polis_ is a Phoenician invention, even this
 has been imitated by the Hellenes. For a long time they dabbled in
 everything, like joyful dilettanti. Aphrodite is likewise Phoenician.
 Neither do they disavow what has come to them through immigration and
 does not originally belong to their own country.
 
 
 118
 
 The happy and comfortable constitution of the politico-social position
 must not be sought among the Greeks . that is a goal which dazzles the
 eyes of our dreamers of the future! It was, on the contrary, dreadful;
 for this is a matter that must be judged according to the following
 standard: the more spirit, the more suffering (as the Greeks themselves
 prove). Whence it follows, the more stupidity, the more comfort. The
 philistine of culture is the most comfortable creature the sun has ever
 shone upon: and he is doubtless also in possession of the corresponding
 stupidity.
 
 
 119
 
 The Greek _polis_ and the [Greek: aien aristeyein] grew up out of mutual
 enmity. Hellenic and philanthropic are contrary adjectives, although the
 ancients flattered themselves sufficiently.
 
 Homer is, in the world of the Hellenic discord, the pan-Hellenic Greek.
 The [Greek: "agon"] of the Greeks is also manifested in the Symposium in
 the shape of witty conversation.
 
 
 120
 
 Wanton, mutual annihilation inevitable: so long as a single _polis_
 wished to exist--its envy for everything superior to itself, its
 cupidity, the disorder of its customs, the enslavement of the women,
 lack of conscience in the keeping of oaths, in murder, and in cases of
 violent death.
 
 Tremendous power of self-control: for example in a man like Socrates,
 who was capable of everything evil.
 
 
 121
 
 Its noble sense of order and systematic arrangement had rendered the
 Athenian state immortal--The ten strategists in Athens! Foolish! Too big
 a sacrifice on the altar of jealousy.
 
 
 122
 
 The recreations of the Spartans consisted of feasting, hunting, and
 making war . their every-day life was too hard. On the whole, however,
 their state is merely a caricature of the polls, a corruption of Hellas.
 The breeding of the complete Spartan--but what was there great about him
 that his breeding should have required such a brutal state!
 
 
 123
 
 The political defeat of Greece is the greatest failure of culture; for
 it has given rise to the atrocious theory that culture cannot be pursued
 unless one is at the same time armed to the teeth. The rise of
 Christianity was the second greatest failure: brute force on the one
 hand, and a dull intellect on the other, won a complete victory over the
 aristocratic genius among the nations. To be a Philhellenist now means
 to be a foe of brute force and stupid intellects. Sparta was the ruin of
 Athens in so far as she compelled Athens to turn her entire attention
 to politics and to act as a federal combination.
 
 
 124
 
 There are domains of thought where the _ratio_ will only give rise to
 disorder, and the philologist, who possesses nothing more, is lost
 through it and is unable to see the truth . _e.g._ in the consideration
 of Greek mythology. A merely fantastic person, of course, has no claim
 either . one must possess Greek imagination and also a certain amount of
 Greek piety. Even the poet does not require to be too consistent, and
 consistency is the last thing Greeks would understand.
 
 
 125
 
 Almost all the Greek divinities are accumulations of divinities . we
 find one layer over another, soon to be hidden and smoothed down by yet
 a third, and so on. It scarcely seems to me to be possible to pick these
 various divinities to pieces in a scientific manner, for no good method
 of doing so can be recommended: even the poor conclusion by analogy is
 in this instance a very good conclusion.
 
 
 126
 
 At what a distance must one be from the Greeks to ascribe to them such a
 stupidly narrow autochthony as does Ottfried Muller![10] How Christian
 it is to assume, with Welcker,[11] that the Greeks were originally
 monotheistic! How philologists torment themselves by investigating the
 question whether Homer actually wrote, without being able to grasp the
 far higher tenet that Greek art long exhibited an inward enmity against
 writing, and did not wish to be read at all.
 
 
 127
 
 In the religious cultus an earlier degree of culture comes to light a
 remnant of former times. The ages that celebrate it are not those which
 invent it, the contrary is often the case. There are many contrasts to
 be found here. The Greek cultus takes us back to a pre-Homeric
 disposition and culture. It is almost the oldest that we know of the
 Greeks--older than their mythology, which their poets have considerably
 remoulded, so far as we know it--Can this cult really be called Greek? I
 doubt it: they are finishers, not inventors. They _preserve_ by means of
 this beautiful completion and adornment.
 
 
 128
 
 It is exceedingly doubtful whether we should draw any conclusion in
 regard to nationality and relationship with other nations from
 languages. A victorious language is nothing but a frequent (and not
 always regular) indication of a successful campaign. Where could there
 have been autochthonous peoples! It shows a very hazy conception of
 things to talk about Greeks who never lived in Greece. That which is
 really Greek is much less the result of natural aptitude than of adapted
 institutions, and also of an acquired language.
 
 
 129
 
 To live on mountains, to travel a great deal, and to move quickly from
 one place to another . in these ways we can now begin to compare
 ourselves with the Greek gods. We know the past, too, and we almost know
 the future. What would a Greek say, if only he could see us!
 
 
 130
 
 The gods make men still more evil; this is the nature of man. If we do
 not like a man, we wish that he may become worse than he is, and then we
 are glad. This forms part of the obscure philosophy of hate--a
 philosophy which has never yet been written, because it is everywhere
 the _pudendum_ that every one feels.
 
 
 131
 
 The pan-Hellenic Homer finds his delight in the frivolity of the gods;
 but it is astounding how he can also give them dignity again. This
 amazing ability to raise one's self again, however, is Greek.
 
 
 132
 
 What, then, is the origin of the envy of the gods? people did not
 believe in a calm, quiet happiness, but only in an exuberant one. This
 must have caused some displeasure to the Greeks; for their soul was only
 too easily wounded: it embittered them to see a happy man. That is
 Greek. If a man of distinguished talent appeared, the flock of envious
 people must have become astonishingly large. If any one met with a
 misfortune, they would say of him: "Ah! no wonder! he was too frivolous
 and too well off." And every one of them would have behaved exuberantly
 if he had possessed the requisite talent, and would willingly have
 played the role of the god who sent the unhappiness to men.
 
 
 133
 
 The Greek gods did not demand any complete changes of character, and
 were, generally speaking, by no means burdensome or importunate . it was
 thus possible to take them seriously and to believe in them. At the time
 of Homer, indeed, the nature of the Greek was formed . flippancy of
 images and imagination was necessary to lighten the weight of its
 passionate disposition and to set it free.
 
 
 134
 
 Every religion has for its highest images an analogon in the spiritual
 condition of those who profess it. The God of Mohammed . the
 solitariness of the desert, the distant roar of the lion, the vision of
 a formidable warrior. The God of the Christians . everything that men
 and women think of when they hear the word "love". The God of the
 Greeks: a beautiful apparition in a dream.
 
 
 135
 
 A great deal of intelligence must have gone to the making up of a Greek
 polytheism . the expenditure of intelligence is much less lavish when
 people have only _one_ God.
 
 
 136
 
 Greek morality is not based on religion, but on the _polis_.
 
 There were only priests of the individual gods; not representatives of
 the whole religion . _i.e._, no guild of priests. Likewise no Holy Writ.
 
 
 137
 
 The "lighthearted" gods . this is the highest adornment which has ever
 been bestowed upon the world--with the feeling, How difficult it is to
 live!
 
 
 138
 
 If the Greeks let their "reason" speak, their life seems to them bitter
 and terrible. They are not deceived. But they play round life with lies:
 Simonides advises them to treat life as they would a play; earnestness
 was only too well known to them in the form of pain. The misery of men
 is a pleasure to the gods when they hear the poets singing of it. Well
 did the Greeks know that only through art could even misery itself
 become a source of pleasure, _vide tragoediam_.
 
 
 139
 
 It is quite untrue to say that the Greeks only took _this_ life into
 their consideration--they suffered also from thoughts of death and Hell.
 But no "repentance" or contrition.
 
 
 140
 
 The incarnate appearance of gods, as in Sappho's invocation to
 Aphrodite, must not be taken as poetic licence . they are frequently
 hallucinations. We conceive of a great many things, including the will
 to die, too superficially as rhetorical.
 
 
 141
 
 The "martyr" is Hellenic: Prometheus, Hercules. The hero-myth became
 pan-Hellenic: a poet must have had a hand in that!
 
 
 142
 
 How _realistic_ the Greeks were even in the domain of pure inventions!
 They poetised reality, not yearning to lift themselves out of it. The
 raising of the present into the colossal and eternal, _e.g._, by Pindar.
 
 
 143
 
 What condition do the Greeks premise as the model of their life in
 Hades? Anaemic, dreamlike, weak . it is the continuous accentuation of
 old age, when the memory gradually becomes weaker and weaker, and the
 body still more so. The senility of senility . this would be our state
 of life in the eyes of the Hellenes.
 
 
 144
 
 The naive character of the Greeks observed by the Egyptians.
 
 
 145
 
 The truly scientific people, the literary people, were the Egyptians and
 not the Greeks. That which has the appearance of science among the
 Greeks, originated among the Egyptians and later on returned to them to
 mingle again with the old current. Alexandrian culture is an
 amalgamation of Hellenic and Egyptian . and when our world again founds
 its culture upon the Alexandrian culture, then....[12]
 
 
 146
 
 The Egyptians are far more of a literary people than the Greeks. I
 maintain this against Wolf. The first grain in Eleusis, the first vine
 in Thebes, the first olive-tree and fig-tree. The Egyptians had lost a
 great part of their mythology.
 
 
 147
 
 The unmathematical undulation of the column in Paestum is analogous to
 the modification of the _tempo_: animation in place of a mechanical
 movement.
 
 
 148
 
 The desire to find something certain and fixed in aesthetic led to the
 worship of Aristotle: I think, however, that we may gradually come to
 see from his works that he understood nothing about art, and that it is
 merely the intellectual conversations of the Athenians, echoing in his
 pages, which we admire.
 
 
 149
 
 In Socrates we have as it were lying open before us a specimen of the
 consciousness out of which, later on, the instincts of the theoretic man
 originated: that one would rather die than grow old and weak in mind.
 
 
 150
 
 At the twilight of antiquity there were still wholly unchristian
 figures, which were more beautiful, harmonious, and pure than those of
 any Christians: _e.g._, Proclus. His mysticism and syncretism were
 things that precisely Christianity cannot reproach him with. In any
 case, it would be my desire to live together with such people. In
 comparison with them Christianity looks like some crude brutalisation,
 organised for the benefit of the mob and the criminal classes.
 
 Proclus, who solemnly invokes the rising moon.
 
 
 151
 
 With the advent of Christianity a religion attained the mastery which
 corresponded to a pre-Greek condition of mankind: belief in witchcraft
 in connection with all and everything, bloody sacrifices, superstitious
 fear of demoniacal punishments, despair in one's self, ecstatic brooding
 and hallucination, man's self become the arena of good and evil spirits
 and their struggles.
 
 
 152
 
 All branches of history have experimented with antiquity . critical
 consideration alone remains. By this term I do not mean conjectural and
 literary-historical criticism.
 
 
 153
 
 Antiquity has been treated by all kinds of historians and their methods.
 We have now had enough experience, however, to turn the history of
 antiquity to account without being shipwrecked on antiquity itself.
 
 
 154
 
 We can now look back over a fairly long period of human existence . what
 will the humanity be like which is able to look back at us from an
 equally long distance? which finds us lying intoxicated among the debris
 of old culture! which finds its only consolation in "being good" and in
 holding out the "helping hand," and turns away from all other
 consolations!--Does beauty, too, grow out of the ancient culture? I
 think that our ugliness arises from our metaphysical remnants . our
 confused morals, the worthlessness of our marriages, and so on, are the
 cause. The beautiful man, the healthy, moderate, and enterprising man,
 moulds the objects around him into beautiful shapes after his own image.
 
 
 155
 
 Up to the present time all history has been written from the standpoint
 of success, and, indeed, with the assumption of a certain reason in this
 success. This remark applies also to Greek history: so far we do not
 possess any. It is the same all round, however: where are the historians
 who can survey things and events without being humbugged by stupid
 theories? I know of only one, Burckhardt. Everywhere the widest possible
 optimism prevails in science. The question: "What would have been the
 consequence if so and so had not happened?" is almost unanimously thrust
 aside, and yet it is the cardinal question. Thus everything becomes
 ironical. Let us only consider our own lives. If we examine history in
 accordance with a preconceived plan, let this plan be sought in the
 purposes of a great man, or perhaps in those of a sex, or of a party.
 Everything else is a chaos.--Even in natural science we find this
 deification of the necessary.
 
 Germany has become the breeding-place of this historical optimism; Hegel
 is perhaps to blame for this. Nothing, however, is more responsible for
 the fatal influence of German culture. Everything that has been kept
 down by success gradually rears itself up: history as the scorn of the
 conqueror; a servile sentiment and a kneeling down before the actual
 fact--"a sense for the State," they now call it, as if _that_ had still
 to be propagated! He who does not understand how brutal and
 unintelligent history is will never understand the stimulus to make it
 intelligent. Just think how rare it is to find a man with as great an
 intelligent knowledge of his own life as Goethe had . what amount of
 rationality can we expect to find arising out of these other veiled and
 blind existences as they work chaotically with and in opposition to each
 other?
 
 And it is especially naive when Hellwald, the author of a history of
 culture, warns us away from all "ideals," simply because history has
 killed them off one after the other.
 
 
 156
 
 To bring to light without reserve the stupidity and the want of reason
 in human things . that is the aim of _our_ brethren and colleagues.
 People will then have to distinguish what is essential in them, what is
 incorrigible, and what is still susceptible of further improvement. But
 "Providence" must be kept out of the question, for it is a conception
 that enables people to take things too easily. I wish to breathe the
 breath of _this_ purpose into science. Let us advance our knowledge of
 mankind! The good and rational in man is accidental or apparent, or the
 contrary of something very irrational. There will come a time when
 _training_ will be the only thought.
 
 
 157
 
 Surrender to necessity is exactly what I do not teach--for one must
 first know this necessity to be necessary. There may perhaps be many
 necessities; but in general this inclination is simply a bed of
 idleness.
 
 
 158
 
 To know history now means . to recognise how all those who believed in a
 Providence took things too easily. There is no such thing. If human
 affairs are seen to go forward in a loose and disordered way, do not
 think that a god has any purpose in view by letting them do so or that
 he is neglecting them. We can now see in a general way that the history
 of Christianity on earth has been one of the most dreadful chapters in
 history, and that a stop _must_ be put to it. True, the influence of
 antiquity has been observed in Christianity even in our own time, and,
 as it diminishes, so will our knowledge of antiquity diminish also to an
 even greater extent. Now is the best time to recognise it: we are no
 longer prejudiced in favour of Christianity, but we still understand it,
 and also the antiquity that forms part of it, so far as this antiquity
 stands in line with Christianity.
 
 
 159
 
 Philosophic heads must occupy themselves one day with the collective
 account of antiquity and make up its balance-sheet. If we have this,
 antiquity will be overcome. All the shortcomings which now vex us have
 their roots in antiquity, so that we cannot continue to treat this
 account with the mildness which has been customary up to the present.
 The atrocious crime of mankind which rendered Christianity possible, as
 it actually became possible, is the _guilt_ of antiquity. With
 Christianity antiquity will also be cleared away.--At the present time
 it is not so very far behind us, and it is certainly not possible to do
 justice to it. It has been availed of in the most dreadful fashion for
 purposes of repression, and has acted as a support for religious
 oppression by disguising itself as "culture." It was common to hear the
 saying, "Antiquity has been conquered by Christianity."
 
 This was a historical fact, and it was thus thought that no harm could
 come of any dealings with antiquity. Yes, it is so plausible to say that
 we find Christian ethics "deeper" than Socrates! Plato was easier to
 compete with! We are at the present time, so to speak, merely chewing
 the cud of the very battle which was fought in the first centuries of
 the Christian era--with the exception of the fact that now, instead of
 the clearly perceptible antiquity which then existed, we have merely its
 pale ghost; and, indeed, even Christianity itself has become rather
 ghostlike. It is a battle fought _after_ the decisive battle, a
 post-vibration. In the end, all the forces of which antiquity consisted
 have reappeared in Christianity in the crudest possible form: it is
 nothing new, only quantitatively extraordinary.
 
 
 160
 
 What severs us for ever from the culture of antiquity is the fact that
 its foundations have become too shaky for us. A criticism of the Greeks
 is at the same time a criticism of Christianity; for the bases of the
 spirit of belief, the religious cult, and witchcraft, are the same in
 both--There are many rudimentary stages still remaining, but they are by
 this time almost ready to collapse.
 
 This would be a task . to characterise Greek antiquity as irretrievably
 lost, and with it Christianity also and the foundations upon which, up
 to the present time, our society and politics have been based.
 
 
 161
 
 Christianity has conquered antiquity--yes; that is easily said. In the
 first place, it is itself a piece of antiquity, in the second place, it
 has preserved antiquity, in the third place, it has never been in combat
 with the pure ages of antiquity. Or rather: in order that Christianity
 itself might remain, it had to let itself be overcome by the spirit of
 antiquity--for example, the idea of empire, the community, and so forth.
 We are suffering from the uncommon want of clearness and uncleanliness
 of human things; from the ingenious mendacity which Christianity has
 brought among men.
 
 
 162
 
 It is almost laughable to see how nearly all the sciences and arts of
 modern times grow from the scattered seeds which have been wafted
 towards us from antiquity, and how Christianity seems to us here to be
 merely the evil chill of a long night, a night during which one is
 almost inclined to believe that all is over with reason and honesty
 among men. The battle waged against the natural man has given rise to
 the unnatural man.
 
 
 163
 
 With the dissolution of Christianity a great part of antiquity has
 become incomprehensible to us, for instance, the entire religious basis
 of life. On this account an imitation of antiquity is a false tendency .
 the betrayers or the betrayed are the philologists who still think of
 such a thing. We live in a period when many different conceptions of
 life are to be found: hence the present age is instructive to an unusual
 degree; and hence also the reason why it is so ill, since it suffers
 from the evils of all its tendencies at once. The man of the future .
 the European man.
 
 
 164
 
 The German Reformation widened the gap between us and antiquity: was it
 necessary for it to do so? It once again introduced the old contrast of
 "Paganism" and "Christianity"; and it was at the same time a protest
 against the decorative culture of the Renaissance--it was a victory
 gained over the same culture as had formerly been conquered by early
 Christianity.
 
 In regard to "worldly things," Christianity preserved the grosser views
 of the ancients. All the nobler elements in marriage, slavery, and the
 State are unchristian. It _required_ the distorting characteristics of
 worldliness to prove itself.
 
 
 165
 
 The connection between humanism and religious rationalism was emphasised
 as a Saxonian trait by Kochly: the type of this philologist is Gottfried
 Hermann.[13]
 
 
 166
 
 I understand religions as narcotics: but when they are given to such
 nations as the Germans, I think they are simply rank poison.
 
 
 167
 
 All religions are, in the end, based upon certain physical assumptions,
 which are already in existence and adapt the religions to their needs .
 for example, in Christianity, the contrast between body and soul, the
 unlimited importance of the earth as the "world," the marvellous
 occurrences in nature. If once the opposite views gain the mastery--for
 instance, a strict law of nature, the helplessness and superfluousness
 of all gods, the strict conception of the soul as a bodily process--all
 is over. But all Greek culture is based upon such views.
 
 
 168
 
 When we look from the character and culture of the Catholic Middle Ages
 back to the Greeks, we see them resplendent indeed in the rays of higher
 humanity; for, if we have anything to reproach these Greeks with, we
 must reproach the Middle Ages with it also to a much greater extent. The
 worship of the ancients at the time of the Renaissance was therefore
 quite honest and proper. We have carried matters further in one
 particular point, precisely in connection with that dawning ray of
 light. We have outstripped the Greeks in the clarifying of the world by
 our studies of nature and men. Our knowledge is much greater, and our
 judgments are more moderate and just.
 
 In addition to this, a more gentle spirit has become widespread, thanks
 to the period of illumination which has weakened mankind--but this
 weakness, when turned into morality, leads to good results and honours
 us. Man has now a great deal of freedom: it is his own fault if he does
 not make more use of it than he does; the fanaticism of opinions has
 become much milder. Finally, that we would much rather live in the
 present age than in any other is due to science, and certainly no other
 race in the history of mankind has had such a wide choice of noble
 enjoyments as ours--even if our race has not the palate and stomach to
 experience a great deal of joy. But one can live comfortably amid all
 this "freedom" only when one merely understands it and does not wish to
 participate in it--that is the modern crux. The participants appear to
 be less attractive than ever . how stupid they must be!
 
 Thus the danger arises that knowledge may avenge itself on us, just as
 ignorance avenged itself on us during the Middle Ages. It is all over
 with those religions which place their trust in gods, Providences,
 rational orders of the universe, miracles, and sacraments, as is also
 the case with certain types of holy lives, such as ascetics; for we only
 too easily conclude that such people are the effects of sickness and an
 aberrant brain. There is no doubt that the contrast between a pure,
 incorporeal soul and a body has been almost set aside. Who now believes
 in the immortality of the soul! Everything connected with blessedness or
 damnation, which was based upon certain erroneous physiological
 assumptions, falls to the ground as soon as these assumptions are
 recognised to be errors. Our scientific assumptions admit just as much
 of an interpretation and utilisation in favour of a besotting
 philistinism--yea, in favour of bestiality--as also in favour of
 "blessedness" and soul-inspiration. As compared with all previous ages,
 we are now standing on a new foundation, so that something may still be
 expected from the human race.
 
 As regards culture, we have hitherto been acquainted with only one
 complete form of it, _i.e._, the city-culture of the Greeks, based as it
 was on their mythical and social foundations; and one incomplete form,
 the Roman, which acted as an adornment of life, derived from the Greek.
 Now all these bases, the mythical and the politico-social, have changed;
 our alleged culture has no stability, because it has been erected upon
 insecure conditions and opinions which are even now almost ready to
 collapse.--When we thoroughly grasp Greek culture, then, we see that it
 is all over with it. The philologist is thus a great sceptic in the
 present conditions of our culture and training . that is his mission.
 Happy is he if, like Wagner and Schopenhauer, he has a dim presentiment
 of those auspicious powers amid which a new culture is stirring.
 
 
 169
 
 Those who say: "But antiquity nevertheless remains as a subject of
 consideration for pure science, even though all its educational purposes
 may be disowned," must be answered by the words, What is pure science
 here! Actions and characteristics must be judged; and those who judge
 them must stand above them: so you must first devote your attention to
 overcoming antiquity. If you do not do that, your science is not pure,
 but impure and limited . as may now be perceived.
 
 
 170
 
 To overcome Greek antiquity through our own deeds: this would be the
 right task. But before we can do this we must first _know_ it!--There is
 a thoroughness which is merely an excuse for inaction. Let it be
 recollected how much Goethe knew of antiquity: certainly not so much as
 a philologist, and yet sufficient to contend with it in such a way as to
 bring about fruitful results. One _should_ not even know more about a
 thing than one could create. Moreover, the only time when we can
 actually _recognise_ something is when we endeavour to _make_ it. Let
 people but attempt to live after the manner of antiquity, and they will
 at once come hundreds of miles nearer to antiquity than they can do with
 all their erudition.--Our philologists never show that they strive to
 emulate antiquity in any way, and thus _their_ antiquity remains without
 any effect on the schools.
 
 The study of the spirit of emulation (Renaissance, Goethe), and the
 study of despair.
 
 The non-popular element in the new culture of the Renaissance: a
 frightful fact!
 
 
 171
 
 The worship of classical antiquity, as it was to be seen in Italy, may
 be interpreted as the only earnest, disinterested, and fecund worship
 which has yet fallen to the lot of antiquity. It is a splendid example
 of Don Quixotism; and philology at best is such Don Quixotism. Already
 at the time of the Alexandrian savants, as with all the sophists of the
 first and second centuries, the Atticists, &c., the scholars are
 imitating something purely and simply chimerical and pursuing a world
 that never existed. The same trait is seen throughout antiquity . the
 manner in which the Homeric heroes were copied, and all the intercourse
 held with the myths, show traces of it. Gradually all Greek antiquity
 has become an object of Don Quixotism. It is impossible to understand
 our modern world if we do not take into account the enormous influence
 of the purely fantastic. This is now confronted by the principle . there
 can be no imitation. Imitation, however, is merely an artistic
 phenomenon, _i.e._, it is based on appearance . we can accept manners,
 thoughts, and so on through imitation; but imitation can create nothing.
 True, the creator can borrow from all sides and nourish himself in that
 way. And it is only as creators that we shall be able to take anything
 from the Greeks. But in what respect can philologists be said to be
 creators! There must be a few dirty jobs, such as knackers' men, and
 also text-revisers: are the philologists to carry out tasks of this
 nature?
 
 
 172
 
 What, then, is antiquity _now_, in the face of modern art, science, and
 philosophy? It is no longer the treasure-chamber of all knowledge; for
 in natural and historical science we have advanced greatly beyond it.
 Oppression by the church has been stopped. A _pure_ knowledge of
 antiquity is now possible, but perhaps also a more ineffective and
 weaker knowledge.--This is right enough, if effect is known only as
 effect on the masses; but for the breeding of higher minds antiquity is
 more powerful than ever.
 
 Goethe as a German poet-philologist; Wagner as a still higher stage: his
 clear glance for the only worthy position of art. No ancient work has
 ever had so powerful an effect as the "Orestes" had on Wagner. The
 objective, emasculated philologist, who is but a philistine of culture
 and a worker in "pure science," is, however, a sad spectacle.
 
 
 173
 
 Between our highest art and philosophy and that which is recognised to
 be truly the oldest antiquity, there is no contradiction: they support
 and harmonise with one another. It is in this that I place my hopes.
 
 
 174
 
 The main standpoints from which to consider the importance of antiquity:
 
 1. There is nothing about it for young people, for it exhibits man with
 an entire freedom from shame.
 
 2. It is not for direct imitation, but it teaches by which means art has
 hitherto been perfected in the highest degree.
 
 3. It is accessible only to a few, and there should be a _police des
 moeurs,_ in charge of it--as there should be also in charge of bad
 pianists who play Beethoven.
 
 4. These few apply this antiquity to the judgment of our own time, as
 critics of it; and they judge antiquity by their own ideals and are thus
 critics of antiquity.
 
 5. The contract between the Hellenic and the Roman should be studied,
 and also the contrast between the early Hellenic and the late
 Hellenic.--Explanation of the different types of culture.
 
 
 175
 
 The advancement of science at the expense of man is one of the most
 pernicious things in the world. The stunted man is a retrogression in
 the human race: he throws a shadow over all succeeding generations The
 tendencies and natural purpose of the individual science become
 degenerate, and science itself is finally shipwrecked: it has made
 progress, but has either no effect at all on life or else an immoral
 one.
 
 
 176
 
 Men not to be used like things!
 
 From the former very incomplete philology and knowledge of antiquity
 there flowed out a stream of freedom, while our own highly developed
 knowledge produces slaves and serves the idol of the State.
 
 
 177
 
 There will perhaps come a time when scientific work will be carried on
 by women, while the men will have to _create,_ using the word in a
 spiritual sense: states, laws, works of art, &c.
 
 People should study typical antiquity just as they do typical men:
 _i.e._, imitating what they understand of it, and, when the pattern
 seems to lie far in the distance, considering ways and means and
 preliminary preparations, and devising stepping-stones.
 
 
 178
 
 The whole feature of study lies in this: that we should study only what
 we feel we should like to imitate; what we gladly take up and have the
 desire to multiply. What is really wanted is a progressive canon of the
 _ideal_ model, suited to boys, youths, and men.
 
 
 179
 
 Goethe grasped antiquity in the right way . invariably with an emulative
 soul. But who else did so? One sees nothing of a well-thought-out
 pedagogics of this nature: who knows that there is a certain knowledge
 of antiquity which cannot be imparted to youths!
 
 The puerile character of philology: devised by teachers for pupils.
 
 
 180
 
 The ever more and more common form of the ideal: first men, then
 institutions, finally tendencies, purposes, or the want of them. The
 highest form: the conquest of the ideal by a backward movement from
 tendencies to institutions, and from institutions to men.
 
 
 181
 
 I will set down in writing what I no longer believe--and also what I do
 believe. Man stands in the midst of the great whirlpool of forces, and
 imagines that this whirlpool is rational and has a rational aim in
 view: error! The only rationality that we know is the small reason of
 man: he must exert it to the utmost, and it invariably leaves him in the
 lurch if he tries to place himself in the hands of "Providence."
 
 Our only happiness lies in reason; all the remainder of the world is
 dreary. The highest reason, however, is seen by me in the work of the
 artist, and he can feel it to be such: there may be something which,
 when it can be consciously brought forward, may afford an even greater
 feeling of reason and happiness: for example, the course of the solar
 system, the breeding and education of a man.
 
 Happiness lies in rapidity of feeling and thinking: everything else is
 slow, gradual, and stupid. The man who could feel the progress of a ray
 of light would be greatly enraptured, for it is very rapid.
 
 Thinking of one's self affords little happiness. But when we do
 experience happiness therein the reason is that we are not thinking of
 ourselves, but of our ideal. This lies far off; and only the rapid man
 attains it and rejoices.
 
 An amalgamation of a great centre of men for the breeding of better men
 is the task of the future. The individual must become familiarised with
 claims that, when he says Yea to his own will, he also says Yea to the
 will of that centre--for example, in reference to a choice, as among
 women for marriage, and likewise as to the manner in which his child
 shall be brought up. Until now no single individuality, or only the very
 rarest, have been free: they were influenced by these conceptions, but
 likewise by the bad and contradictory organisation of the individual
 purposes.
 
 
 182
 
 Education is in the first place instruction in what is necessary, and
 then in what is changing and inconstant. The youth is introduced to
 nature, and the sway of laws is everywhere pointed out to him; followed
 by an explanation of the laws of ordinary society. Even at this early
 stage the question will arise: was it absolutely necessary that this
 should have been so? He gradually comes to need history to ascertain how
 these things have been brought about. He learns at the same time,
 however, that they may be changed into something else. What is the
 extent of man's power over things? This is the question in connection
 with all education. To show how things may become other than what they
 are we may, for example, point to the Greeks. We need the Romans to show
 how things became what they were.
 
 
 183
 
 If, then, the Romans had spurned the Greek culture, they would perhaps
 have gone to pieces completely. When could this culture have once again
 arisen? Christianity and Romans and barbarians: this would have been an
 onslaught: it would have entirely wiped out culture. We see the danger
 amid which genius lives. Cicero was one of the greatest benefactors of
 humanity, even in his own time.
 
 There is no "Providence" for genius; it is only for the ordinary run of
 people and their wants that such a thing exists: they find their
 satisfaction, and later on their justification.
 
 
 184
 
 Thesis: the death of ancient culture inevitable. Greek culture must be
 distinguished as the archetype; and it must be shown how all culture
 rests upon shaky conceptions.
 
 The dangerous meaning of art: as the protectress and galvanisation of
 dead and dying conceptions; history, in so far as it wishes to restore
 to us feelings which we have overcome. To feel "historically" or "just"
 towards what is already past, is only possible when we have risen above
 it. But the danger in the adoption of the feelings necessary for this is
 very great . let the dead bury their dead, so that we ourselves may not
 come under the influence of the smell of the corpses.
 
 
 THE DEATH OF THE OLD CULTURE.
 
 1. The signification of the studies of antiquity hitherto pursued:
 obscure; mendacious.
 
 2. As soon as they recognise the goal they condemn themselves to death .
 for their goal is to describe ancient culture itself as one to be
 demolished.
 
 3. The collection of all the conceptions out of which Hellenic culture
 has grown up. Criticism of religion, art, society, state, morals.
 
 4. Christianity is likewise denied.
 
 5. Art and history--dangerous.
 
 6. The replacing of the study of antiquity which has become superfluous
 for the training of our youth.
 
 Thus the task of the science of history is completed and it itself has
 become superfluous, if the entire inward continuous circle of past
 efforts has been condemned. Its place must be taken by the science of
 the _future_.
 
 
 185
 
 "Signs" and "miracles" are not believed; only a "Providence" stands in
 need of such things. There is no help to be found either in prayer or
 asceticism or in "vision." If all these things constitute religion, then
 there is no more religion for me.
 
 My religion, if I can still apply this name to something, lies in the
 work of breeding genius . from such training everything is to be hoped.
 All consolation comes from art. Education is love for the offspring; an
 excess of love over and beyond our self-love. Religion is "love beyond
 ourselves." The work of art is the model of such a love beyond
 ourselves, and a perfect model at that.
 
 
 186
 
 The stupidity of the will is Schopenhauer's greatest thought, if
 thoughts be judged from the standpoint of power. We can see in Hartmann
 how he juggled away this thought. Nobody will ever call something
 stupid--God.
 
 
 187
 
 This, then, is the new feature of all the future progress of the world .
 men must never again be ruled over by religious conceptions. Will they
 be any _worse_? It is not my experience that they behave well and
 morally under the yoke of religion; I am not on the side of
 Demopheles[14] The fear of a beyond, and then again the fear of divine
 punishments will hardly have made men better.
 
 
 188
 
 Where something great makes its appearance and lasts for a relatively
 long time, we may premise a careful breeding, as in the case of the
 Greeks. How did so many men become free among them? Educate educators!
 But the first educators must educate themselves! And it is for these
 that I write.
 
 
 189
 
 The denial of life is no longer an easy matter: a man may become a
 hermit or a monk--and what is thereby denied! This conception has now
 become deeper . it is above all a discerning denial, a denial based upon
 the will to be just; not an indiscriminate and wholesale denial.
 
 
 190
 
 The seer must be affectionate, otherwise men will have no confidence in
 him . Cassandra.
 
 
 191
 
 The man who to-day wishes to be good and saintly has a more difficult
 task than formerly . in order to be "good," he must not be so unjust to
 knowledge as earlier saints were. He would have to be a knowledge-saint:
 a man who would link love with knowledge, and who would have nothing to
 do with gods or demigods or "Providence," as the Indian saints likewise
 had nothing to do with them. He should also be healthy, and should keep
 himself so, otherwise he would necessarily become distrustful of
 himself. And perhaps he would not bear the slightest resemblance to the
 ascetic saint, but would be much more like a man of the world.
 
 
 192
 
 The better the state is organised, the duller will humanity be.
 
 To make the individual uncomfortable is my task!
 
 The great pleasure experienced by the man who liberates himself by
 fighting.
 
 Spiritual heights have had their age in history; inherited energy
 belongs to them. In the ideal state all would be over with them.
 
 
 193
 
 The highest judgment on life only arising from the highest energy of
 life. The mind must be removed as far as possible from exhaustion.
 
 In the centre of the world-history judgment will be the most accurate;
 for it was there that the greatest geniuses existed.
 
 The breeding of the genius as the only man who can truly value and deny
 life.
 
 Save your genius! shall be shouted unto the people: set him free! Do all
 you can to unshackle him.
 
 The feeble and poor in spirit must not be allowed to judge life.
 
 
 194
 
 _I dream of a combination of men who shall make no concessions, who
 shall show no consideration, and who shall be willing to be called
 "destroyers": they apply the standard of their criticism to everything
 and sacrifice themselves to truth. The bad and the false shall be
 brought to light! We will not build prematurely: we do not know, indeed,
 whether we shall ever be able to build, or if it would not be better not
 to build at all. There are lazy pessimists and resigned ones in this
 world--and it is to their number that we refuse to belong!_
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] No doubt a reminiscence of the "Odyssey," Bk. ix--TR.
 
 [2] Formal education is that which tends to develop the critical and
 logical faculties, as opposed to material education, which is intended
 to deal with the acquisition of knowledge and its valuation, _e.g._,
 history, mathematics, &c. "Material" education, of course, has nothing
 to do with materialism--TR.
 
 [3] The reference is not to Pope, but to Hegel.--TR.
 
 [4] Friedrich August Wolf (1759-1824), the well-known classical scholar,
 now chiefly remembered by his "Prolegomena ad Homerum."--TR.
 
 [5] Students who pass certain examinations need only serve one year in
 the German Army instead of the usual two or three--TR.
 
 [6] Otto Jahn (1813-69), who is probably best remembered in philological
 circles by his edition of Juvenal.--TR.
 
 [7] Gustav Freytag at one time a famous German novelist--TR.
 
 [8] A well-known anti-Wagnerian musical critic of Vienna.--TR.
 
 [9] See note on p 149.--TR.
 
 [10] Karl Ottfried Muller (1797-1840), classical archaeologist, who
 devoted special attention to Greece--TR.
 
 [11] Friedrich Gottlieb Welcker (1784-1868), noted for his
 ultra-profound comments on Greek poetry--TR.
 
 [12] "We shall once again be shipwrecked." The omission is in the
 original--TR.
 
 [13] Johann Gottfried Jakob Hermann (1772-1848), noted for his works on
 metre and Greek grammar.--TR.
 
 [14] A type in Schopenhauer's Essay "On Religion." See "Parerga and
 Paralipomena"--TR.
 
 
 FINIS.
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 _Printed at_ THE DARIEN PRESS, _Edinburgh_
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of We Philologists, Volume 8 (of 18), by

 
 
 
 Produced by Sue Asscher
 
 
 
 
 
 THUS SPAKE ZARATHUSTRA
 
 A BOOK FOR ALL AND NONE
 
 
 By Friedrich Nietzsche
 
 
 Translated By Thomas Common
 
 
 PG Editor's Note:
 
 Archaic spelling and punctuation usages have not been changed.
 I particular quotations are often not closed for several paragraphs.
 
 DW
 
 
 
 CONTENTS.
 
 
      INTRODUCTION BY MRS FORSTER-NIETZSCHE.
 
 
 
      THUS SPAKE ZARATHUSTRA.
 
      FIRST PART.
 
      Zarathustra's Prologue.
 
      Zarathustra's Discourses.
 
      I.  The Three Metamorphoses.
 
      II.  The Academic Chairs of Virtue.
 
      III.  Backworldsmen.
 
      IV.  The Despisers of the Body.
 
      V.  Joys and Passions.
 
      VI.  The Pale Criminal.
 
      VII.  Reading and Writing.
 
      VIII.  The Tree on the Hill.
 
      IX.  The Preachers of Death.
 
      X.  War and Warriors.
 
      XI.  The New Idol.
 
      XII.  The Flies in the Market-place.
 
      XIII.  Chastity.
 
      XIV.  The Friend.
 
      XV.  The Thousand and One Goals.
 
      XVI.  Neighbour-Love.
 
      XVII.  The Way of the Creating One.
 
      XVIII.  Old and Young Women.
 
      XIX.  The Bite of the Adder.
 
      XX.  Child and Marriage.
 
      XXI.  Voluntary Death.
 
      XXII.  The Bestowing Virtue.
 
 
      SECOND PART.
 
      XXIII.  The Child with the Mirror.
 
      XXIV.  In the Happy Isles.
 
      XXV.  The Pitiful.
 
      XXVI.  The Priests.
 
      XXVII.  The Virtuous.
 
      XXVIII.  The Rabble.
 
      XXIX.  The Tarantulas.
 
      XXX.  The Famous Wise Ones.
 
      XXXI.  The Night-Song.
 
      XXXII.  The Dance-Song.
 
      XXXIII.  The Grave-Song.
 
      XXXIV.  Self-Surpassing.
 
      XXXV.  The Sublime Ones.
 
      XXXVI.  The Land of Culture.
 
      XXXVII.  Immaculate Perception.
 
      XXXVIII.  Scholars.
 
      XXXIX.  Poets.
 
      XL.  Great Events.
 
      XLI.  The Soothsayer.
 
      XLII.  Redemption.
 
      XLIII.  Manly Prudence.
 
      XLIV.  The Stillest Hour.
 
 
      THIRD PART.
 
      XLV.  The Wanderer.
 
      XLVI.  The Vision and the Enigma.
 
      XLVII.  Involuntary Bliss.
 
      XLVIII.  Before Sunrise.
 
      XLIX.  The Bedwarfing Virtue.
 
      L.  On the Olive-Mount.
 
      LI.  On Passing-by.
 
      LII.  The Apostates.
 
      LIII.  The Return Home.
 
      LIV.  The Three Evil Things.
 
      LV.  The Spirit of Gravity.
 
      LVI.  Old and New Tables.
 
      LVII.  The Convalescent.
 
      LVIII.  The Great Longing.
 
      LIX.  The Second Dance-Song.
 
      LX.  The Seven Seals.
 
 
      FOURTH AND LAST PART.
 
      LXI.  The Honey Sacrifice.
 
      LXII.  The Cry of Distress.
 
      LXIII.  Talk with the Kings.
 
      LXIV.  The Leech.
 
      LXV.  The Magician.
 
      LXVI.  Out of Service.
 
      LXVII.  The Ugliest Man.
 
      LXVIII.  The Voluntary Beggar.
 
      LXIX.  The Shadow.
 
      LXX.  Noon-Tide.
 
      LXXI.  The Greeting.
 
      LXXII.  The Supper.
 
      LXIII.  The Higher Man.
 
      LXXIV.  The Song of Melancholy.
 
      LXXV.  Science.
 
      LXXVI.  Among Daughters of the Desert.
 
      LXXVII.  The Awakening.
 
      LXXVIII.  The Ass-Festival.
 
      LXXIX.  The Drunken Song.
 
      LXXX.  The Sign.
 
 
      APPENDIX.
 
      Notes on "Thus Spake Zarathustra" by Anthony M. Ludovici.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION BY MRS FORSTER-NIETZSCHE.
 
 HOW ZARATHUSTRA CAME INTO BEING.
 
 "Zarathustra" is my brother's most personal work; it is the history of
 his most individual experiences, of his friendships, ideals, raptures,
 bitterest disappointments and sorrows. Above it all, however, there
 soars, transfiguring it, the image of his greatest hopes and remotest
 aims. My brother had the figure of Zarathustra in his mind from his very
 earliest youth: he once told me that even as a child he had dreamt of
 him. At different periods in his life, he would call this haunter of his
 dreams by different names; "but in the end," he declares in a note on
 the subject, "I had to do a PERSIAN the honour of identifying him with
 this creature of my fancy. Persians were the first to take a broad and
 comprehensive view of history. Every series of evolutions, according
 to them, was presided over by a prophet; and every prophet had his
 'Hazar,'--his dynasty of a thousand years."
 
 All Zarathustra's views, as also his personality, were early conceptions
 of my brother's mind. Whoever reads his posthumously published writings
 for the years 1869-82 with care, will constantly meet with passages
 suggestive of Zarathustra's thoughts and doctrines. For instance, the
 ideal of the Superman is put forth quite clearly in all his writings
 during the years 1873-75; and in "We Philologists", the following
 remarkable observations occur:--
 
 "How can one praise and glorify a nation as a whole?--Even among the
 Greeks, it was the INDIVIDUALS that counted."
 
 "The Greeks are interesting and extremely important because they reared
 such a vast number of great individuals. How was this possible? The
 question is one which ought to be studied.
 
 "I am interested only in the relations of a people to the rearing of
 the individual man, and among the Greeks the conditions were unusually
 favourable for the development of the individual; not by any means owing
 to the goodness of the people, but because of the struggles of their
 evil instincts.
 
 "WITH THE HELP OF FAVOURABLE MEASURES GREAT INDIVIDUALS MIGHT BE REARED
 WHO WOULD BE BOTH DIFFERENT FROM AND HIGHER THAN THOSE WHO HERETOFORE
 HAVE OWED THEIR EXISTENCE TO MERE CHANCE. Here we may still be hopeful:
 in the rearing of exceptional men."
 
 The notion of rearing the Superman is only a new form of an ideal
 Nietzsche already had in his youth, that "THE OBJECT OF MANKIND SHOULD
 LIE IN ITS HIGHEST INDIVIDUALS" (or, as he writes in "Schopenhauer as
 Educator": "Mankind ought constantly to be striving to produce great
 men--this and nothing else is its duty.") But the ideals he most revered
 in those days are no longer held to be the highest types of men. No,
 around this future ideal of a coming humanity--the Superman--the poet
 spread the veil of becoming. Who can tell to what glorious heights man
 can still ascend? That is why, after having tested the worth of our
 noblest ideal--that of the Saviour, in the light of the new valuations,
 the poet cries with passionate emphasis in "Zarathustra":
 
 "Never yet hath there been a Superman. Naked have I seen both of them,
 the greatest and the smallest man:--
 
 All-too-similar are they still to each other. Verily even the greatest
 found I--all-too-human!"--
 
 The phrase "the rearing of the Superman," has very often been
 misunderstood. By the word "rearing," in this case, is meant the act of
 modifying by means of new and higher values--values which, as laws and
 guides of conduct and opinion, are now to rule over mankind. In general
 the doctrine of the Superman can only be understood correctly in
 conjunction with other ideas of the author's, such as:--the Order
 of Rank, the Will to Power, and the Transvaluation of all Values. He
 assumes that Christianity, as a product of the resentment of the botched
 and the weak, has put in ban all that is beautiful, strong, proud, and
 powerful, in fact all the qualities resulting from strength, and that,
 in consequence, all forces which tend to promote or elevate life have
 been seriously undermined. Now, however, a new table of valuations
 must be placed over mankind--namely, that of the strong, mighty, and
 magnificent man, overflowing with life and elevated to his zenith--the
 Superman, who is now put before us with overpowering passion as the
 aim of our life, hope, and will. And just as the old system of valuing,
 which only extolled the qualities favourable to the weak, the suffering,
 and the oppressed, has succeeded in producing a weak, suffering, and
 "modern" race, so this new and reversed system of valuing ought to rear
 a healthy, strong, lively, and courageous type, which would be a glory
 to life itself. Stated briefly, the leading principle of this new system
 of valuing would be: "All that proceeds from power is good, all that
 springs from weakness is bad."
 
 This type must not be regarded as a fanciful figure: it is not a
 nebulous hope which is to be realised at some indefinitely remote
 period, thousands of years hence; nor is it a new species (in the
 Darwinian sense) of which we can know nothing, and which it would
 therefore be somewhat absurd to strive after. But it is meant to be
 a possibility which men of the present could realise with all their
 spiritual and physical energies, provided they adopted the new values.
 
 The author of "Zarathustra" never lost sight of that egregious example
 of a transvaluation of all values through Christianity, whereby the
 whole of the deified mode of life and thought of the Greeks, as well as
 strong Romedom, was almost annihilated or transvalued in a comparatively
 short time. Could not a rejuvenated Graeco-Roman system of valuing (once
 it had been refined and made more profound by the schooling which
 two thousand years of Christianity had provided) effect another such
 revolution within a calculable period of time, until that glorious type
 of manhood shall finally appear which is to be our new faith and hope,
 and in the creation of which Zarathustra exhorts us to participate?
 
 In his private notes on the subject the author uses the expression
 "Superman" (always in the singular, by-the-bye), as signifying "the most
 thoroughly well-constituted type," as opposed to "modern man"; above
 all, however, he designates Zarathustra himself as an example of the
 Superman. In "Ecco Homo" he is careful to enlighten us concerning the
 precursors and prerequisites to the advent of this highest type, in
 referring to a certain passage in the "Gay Science":--
 
 "In order to understand this type, we must first be quite clear in
 regard to the leading physiological condition on which it depends: this
 condition is what I call GREAT HEALTHINESS. I know not how to express my
 meaning more plainly or more personally than I have done already in
 one of the last chapters (Aphorism 382) of the fifth book of the 'Gaya
 Scienza'."
 
 "We, the new, the nameless, the hard-to-understand,"--it says
 there,--"we firstlings of a yet untried future--we require for a new end
 also a new means, namely, a new healthiness, stronger, sharper, tougher,
 bolder and merrier than all healthiness hitherto. He whose soul
 longeth to experience the whole range of hitherto recognised values
 and desirabilities, and to circumnavigate all the coasts of this ideal
 'Mediterranean Sea', who, from the adventures of his most personal
 experience, wants to know how it feels to be a conqueror, and discoverer
 of the ideal--as likewise how it is with the artist, the saint, the
 legislator, the sage, the scholar, the devotee, the prophet, and the
 godly non-conformist of the old style:--requires one thing above all
 for that purpose, GREAT HEALTHINESS--such healthiness as one not only
 possesses, but also constantly acquires and must acquire, because one
 unceasingly sacrifices it again, and must sacrifice it!--And now, after
 having been long on the way in this fashion, we Argonauts of the ideal,
 more courageous perhaps than prudent, and often enough shipwrecked
 and brought to grief, nevertheless dangerously healthy, always healthy
 again,--it would seem as if, in recompense for it all, that we have a
 still undiscovered country before us, the boundaries of which no one
 has yet seen, a beyond to all countries and corners of the ideal known
 hitherto, a world so over-rich in the beautiful, the strange, the
 questionable, the frightful, and the divine, that our curiosity as well
 as our thirst for possession thereof, have got out of hand--alas! that
 nothing will now any longer satisfy us!--
 
 "How could we still be content with THE MAN OF THE PRESENT DAY
 after such outlooks, and with such a craving in our conscience and
 consciousness? Sad enough; but it is unavoidable that we should look
 on the worthiest aims and hopes of the man of the present day with
 ill-concealed amusement, and perhaps should no longer look at them.
 Another ideal runs on before us, a strange, tempting ideal full of
 danger, to which we should not like to persuade any one, because we
 do not so readily acknowledge any one's RIGHT THERETO: the ideal of
 a spirit who plays naively (that is to say involuntarily and from
 overflowing abundance and power) with everything that has hitherto
 been called holy, good, intangible, or divine; to whom the loftiest
 conception which the people have reasonably made their measure of value,
 would already practically imply danger, ruin, abasement, or at least
 relaxation, blindness, or temporary self-forgetfulness; the ideal of
 a humanly superhuman welfare and benevolence, which will often enough
 appear INHUMAN, for example, when put alongside of all past seriousness
 on earth, and alongside of all past solemnities in bearing, word, tone,
 look, morality, and pursuit, as their truest involuntary parody--and
 WITH which, nevertheless, perhaps THE GREAT SERIOUSNESS only commences,
 when the proper interrogative mark is set up, the fate of the soul
 changes, the hour-hand moves, and tragedy begins..."
 
 Although the figure of Zarathustra and a large number of the leading
 thoughts in this work had appeared much earlier in the dreams and
 writings of the author, "Thus Spake Zarathustra" did not actually come
 into being until the month of August 1881 in Sils Maria; and it was the
 idea of the Eternal Recurrence of all things which finally induced my
 brother to set forth his new views in poetic language. In regard to his
 first conception of this idea, his autobiographical sketch, "Ecce Homo",
 written in the autumn of 1888, contains the following passage:--
 
 "The fundamental idea of my work--namely, the Eternal Recurrence of
 all things--this highest of all possible formulae of a Yea-saying
 philosophy, first occurred to me in August 1881. I made a note of the
 thought on a sheet of paper, with the postscript: 6,000 feet beyond
 men and time! That day I happened to be wandering through the woods
 alongside of the lake of Silvaplana, and I halted beside a huge,
 pyramidal and towering rock not far from Surlei. It was then that the
 thought struck me. Looking back now, I find that exactly two months
 previous to this inspiration, I had had an omen of its coming in the
 form of a sudden and decisive alteration in my tastes--more particularly
 in music. It would even be possible to consider all 'Zarathustra' as a
 musical composition. At all events, a very necessary condition in its
 production was a renaissance in myself of the art of hearing. In a small
 mountain resort (Recoaro) near Vicenza, where I spent the spring of
 1881, I and my friend and Maestro, Peter Gast--also one who had been
 born again--discovered that the phoenix music that hovered over us, wore
 lighter and brighter plumes than it had done theretofore."
 
 During the month of August 1881 my brother resolved to reveal the
 teaching of the Eternal Recurrence, in dithyrambic and psalmodic form,
 through the mouth of Zarathustra. Among the notes of this period, we
 found a page on which is written the first definite plan of "Thus Spake
 Zarathustra":--
 
 "MIDDAY AND ETERNITY."
 
 "GUIDE-POSTS TO A NEW WAY OF LIVING."
 
 Beneath this is written:--
 
 "Zarathustra born on lake Urmi; left his home in his thirtieth year,
 went into the province of Aria, and, during ten years of solitude in the
 mountains, composed the Zend-Avesta."
 
 "The sun of knowledge stands once more at midday; and the serpent
 of eternity lies coiled in its light--: It is YOUR time, ye midday
 brethren."
 
 In that summer of 1881, my brother, after many years of steadily
 declining health, began at last to rally, and it is to this first gush
 of the recovery of his once splendid bodily condition that we owe not
 only "The Gay Science", which in its mood may be regarded as a prelude
 to "Zarathustra", but also "Zarathustra" itself. Just as he was
 beginning to recuperate his health, however, an unkind destiny brought
 him a number of most painful personal experiences. His friends caused
 him many disappointments, which were the more bitter to him, inasmuch as
 he regarded friendship as such a sacred institution; and for the first
 time in his life he realised the whole horror of that loneliness to
 which, perhaps, all greatness is condemned. But to be forsaken is
 something very different from deliberately choosing blessed loneliness.
 How he longed, in those days, for the ideal friend who would thoroughly
 understand him, to whom he would be able to say all, and whom he
 imagined he had found at various periods in his life from his earliest
 youth onwards. Now, however, that the way he had chosen grew ever more
 perilous and steep, he found nobody who could follow him: he therefore
 created a perfect friend for himself in the ideal form of a majestic
 philosopher, and made this creation the preacher of his gospel to the
 world.
 
 Whether my brother would ever have written "Thus Spake Zarathustra"
 according to the first plan sketched in the summer of 1881, if he
 had not had the disappointments already referred to, is now an idle
 question; but perhaps where "Zarathustra" is concerned, we may also say
 with Master Eckhardt: "The fleetest beast to bear you to perfection is
 suffering."
 
 My brother writes as follows about the origin of the first part of
 "Zarathustra":--"In the winter of 1882-83, I was living on the charming
 little Gulf of Rapallo, not far from Genoa, and between Chiavari and
 Cape Porto Fino. My health was not very good; the winter was cold and
 exceptionally rainy; and the small inn in which I lived was so close
 to the water that at night my sleep would be disturbed if the sea were
 high. These circumstances were surely the very reverse of favourable;
 and yet in spite of it all, and as if in demonstration of my belief that
 everything decisive comes to life in spite of every obstacle, it was
 precisely during this winter and in the midst of these unfavourable
 circumstances that my 'Zarathustra' originated. In the morning I used to
 start out in a southerly direction up the glorious road to Zoagli, which
 rises aloft through a forest of pines and gives one a view far out into
 the sea. In the afternoon, as often as my health permitted, I walked
 round the whole bay from Santa Margherita to beyond Porto Fino. This
 spot was all the more interesting to me, inasmuch as it was so dearly
 loved by the Emperor Frederick III. In the autumn of 1886 I chanced to
 be there again when he was revisiting this small, forgotten world
 of happiness for the last time. It was on these two roads that all
 'Zarathustra' came to me, above all Zarathustra himself as a type;--I
 ought rather to say that it was on these walks that these ideas waylaid
 me."
 
 The first part of "Zarathustra" was written in about ten days--that is
 to say, from the beginning to about the middle of February 1883. "The
 last lines were written precisely in the hallowed hour when Richard
 Wagner gave up the ghost in Venice."
 
 With the exception of the ten days occupied in composing the first part
 of this book, my brother often referred to this winter as the hardest
 and sickliest he had ever experienced. He did not, however, mean thereby
 that his former disorders were troubling him, but that he was suffering
 from a severe attack of influenza which he had caught in Santa
 Margherita, and which tormented him for several weeks after his arrival
 in Genoa. As a matter of fact, however, what he complained of most was
 his spiritual condition--that indescribable forsakenness--to which he
 gives such heartrending expression in "Zarathustra". Even the reception
 which the first part met with at the hands of friends and acquaintances
 was extremely disheartening: for almost all those to whom he presented
 copies of the work misunderstood it. "I found no one ripe for many of my
 thoughts; the case of 'Zarathustra' proves that one can speak with the
 utmost clearness, and yet not be heard by any one." My brother was very
 much discouraged by the feebleness of the response he was given, and as
 he was striving just then to give up the practice of taking hydrate
 of chloral--a drug he had begun to take while ill with influenza,--the
 following spring, spent in Rome, was a somewhat gloomy one for him.
 He writes about it as follows:--"I spent a melancholy spring in Rome,
 where I only just managed to live,--and this was no easy matter. This
 city, which is absolutely unsuited to the poet-author of 'Zarathustra',
 and for the choice of which I was not responsible, made me inordinately
 miserable. I tried to leave it. I wanted to go to Aquila--the opposite
 of Rome in every respect, and actually founded in a spirit of enmity
 towards that city (just as I also shall found a city some day), as a
 memento of an atheist and genuine enemy of the Church--a person very
 closely related to me,--the great Hohenstaufen, the Emperor Frederick
 II. But Fate lay behind it all: I had to return again to Rome. In the
 end I was obliged to be satisfied with the Piazza Barberini, after I had
 exerted myself in vain to find an anti-Christian quarter. I fear that
 on one occasion, to avoid bad smells as much as possible, I actually
 inquired at the Palazzo del Quirinale whether they could not provide a
 quiet room for a philosopher. In a chamber high above the Piazza just
 mentioned, from which one obtained a general view of Rome and could
 hear the fountains plashing far below, the loneliest of all songs
 was composed--'The Night-Song'. About this time I was obsessed by an
 unspeakably sad melody, the refrain of which I recognised in the words,
 'dead through immortality.'"
 
 We remained somewhat too long in Rome that spring, and what with the
 effect of the increasing heat and the discouraging circumstances already
 described, my brother resolved not to write any more, or in any case,
 not to proceed with "Zarathustra", although I offered to relieve him
 of all trouble in connection with the proofs and the publisher. When,
 however, we returned to Switzerland towards the end of June, and he
 found himself once more in the familiar and exhilarating air of the
 mountains, all his joyous creative powers revived, and in a note to me
 announcing the dispatch of some manuscript, he wrote as follows: "I have
 engaged a place here for three months: forsooth, I am the greatest fool
 to allow my courage to be sapped from me by the climate of Italy. Now
 and again I am troubled by the thought: WHAT NEXT? My 'future' is the
 darkest thing in the world to me, but as there still remains a great
 deal for me to do, I suppose I ought rather to think of doing this than
 of my future, and leave the rest to THEE and the gods."
 
 The second part of "Zarathustra" was written between the 26th of June
 and the 6th July. "This summer, finding myself once more in the sacred
 place where the first thought of 'Zarathustra' flashed across my mind,
 I conceived the second part. Ten days sufficed. Neither for the second,
 the first, nor the third part, have I required a day longer."
 
 He often used to speak of the ecstatic mood in which he wrote
 "Zarathustra"; how in his walks over hill and dale the ideas would crowd
 into his mind, and how he would note them down hastily in a note-book
 from which he would transcribe them on his return, sometimes working
 till midnight. He says in a letter to me: "You can have no idea of the
 vehemence of such composition," and in "Ecce Homo" (autumn 1888) he
 describes as follows with passionate enthusiasm the incomparable mood in
 which he created Zarathustra:--
 
 "--Has any one at the end of the nineteenth century any distinct notion
 of what poets of a stronger age understood by the word inspiration? If
 not, I will describe it. If one had the smallest vestige of superstition
 in one, it would hardly be possible to set aside completely the idea
 that one is the mere incarnation, mouthpiece or medium of an almighty
 power. The idea of revelation in the sense that something becomes
 suddenly visible and audible with indescribable certainty and accuracy,
 which profoundly convulses and upsets one--describes simply the matter
 of fact. One hears--one does not seek; one takes--one does not ask
 who gives: a thought suddenly flashes up like lightning, it comes with
 necessity, unhesitatingly--I have never had any choice in the matter.
 There is an ecstasy such that the immense strain of it is sometimes
 relaxed by a flood of tears, along with which one's steps either rush
 or involuntarily lag, alternately. There is the feeling that one is
 completely out of hand, with the very distinct consciousness of an
 endless number of fine thrills and quiverings to the very toes;--there
 is a depth of happiness in which the painfullest and gloomiest do not
 operate as antitheses, but as conditioned, as demanded in the sense of
 necessary shades of colour in such an overflow of light. There is an
 instinct for rhythmic relations which embraces wide areas of forms
 (length, the need of a wide-embracing rhythm, is almost the measure of
 the force of an inspiration, a sort of counterpart to its pressure and
 tension). Everything happens quite involuntarily, as if in a tempestuous
 outburst of freedom, of absoluteness, of power and divinity. The
 involuntariness of the figures and similes is the most remarkable
 thing; one loses all perception of what constitutes the figure and
 what constitutes the simile; everything seems to present itself as
 the readiest, the correctest and the simplest means of expression.
 It actually seems, to use one of Zarathustra's own phrases, as if all
 things came unto one, and would fain be similes: 'Here do all things
 come caressingly to thy talk and flatter thee, for they want to ride
 upon thy back. On every simile dost thou here ride to every truth. Here
 fly open unto thee all being's words and word-cabinets; here all being
 wanteth to become words, here all becoming wanteth to learn of thee how
 to talk.' This is MY experience of inspiration. I do not doubt but that
 one would have to go back thousands of years in order to find some one
 who could say to me: It is mine also!--"
 
 In the autumn of 1883 my brother left the Engadine for Germany and
 stayed there a few weeks. In the following winter, after wandering
 somewhat erratically through Stresa, Genoa, and Spezia, he landed in
 Nice, where the climate so happily promoted his creative powers that
 he wrote the third part of "Zarathustra". "In the winter, beneath the
 halcyon sky of Nice, which then looked down upon me for the first time
 in my life, I found the third 'Zarathustra'--and came to the end of my
 task; the whole having occupied me scarcely a year. Many hidden corners
 and heights in the landscapes round about Nice are hallowed to me by
 unforgettable moments. That decisive chapter entitled 'Old and New
 Tables' was composed in the very difficult ascent from the station
 to Eza--that wonderful Moorish village in the rocks. My most creative
 moments were always accompanied by unusual muscular activity. The body
 is inspired: let us waive the question of the 'soul.' I might often have
 been seen dancing in those days. Without a suggestion of fatigue I could
 then walk for seven or eight hours on end among the hills. I slept well
 and laughed well--I was perfectly robust and patient."
 
 As we have seen, each of the three parts of "Zarathustra" was written,
 after a more or less short period of preparation, in about ten days.
 The composition of the fourth part alone was broken by occasional
 interruptions. The first notes relating to this part were written while
 he and I were staying together in Zurich in September 1884. In the
 following November, while staying at Mentone, he began to elaborate
 these notes, and after a long pause, finished the manuscript at Nice
 between the end of January and the middle of February 1885. My brother
 then called this part the fourth and last; but even before, and shortly
 after it had been privately printed, he wrote to me saying that he still
 intended writing a fifth and sixth part, and notes relating to these
 parts are now in my possession. This fourth part (the original MS. of
 which contains this note: "Only for my friends, not for the public")
 is written in a particularly personal spirit, and those few to whom he
 presented a copy of it, he pledged to the strictest secrecy concerning
 its contents. He often thought of making this fourth part public also,
 but doubted whether he would ever be able to do so without considerably
 altering certain portions of it. At all events he resolved to distribute
 this manuscript production, of which only forty copies were printed,
 only among those who had proved themselves worthy of it, and it speaks
 eloquently of his utter loneliness and need of sympathy in those days,
 that he had occasion to present only seven copies of his book according
 to this resolution.
 
 Already at the beginning of this history I hinted at the reasons which
 led my brother to select a Persian as the incarnation of his ideal of
 the majestic philosopher. His reasons, however, for choosing Zarathustra
 of all others to be his mouthpiece, he gives us in the following
 words:--"People have never asked me, as they should have done, what the
 name Zarathustra precisely means in my mouth, in the mouth of the first
 Immoralist; for what distinguishes that philosopher from all others
 in the past is the very fact that he was exactly the reverse of an
 immoralist. Zarathustra was the first to see in the struggle between
 good and evil the essential wheel in the working of things. The
 translation of morality into the metaphysical, as force, cause, end in
 itself, was HIS work. But the very question suggests its own answer.
 Zarathustra CREATED the most portentous error, MORALITY, consequently he
 should also be the first to PERCEIVE that error, not only because he
 has had longer and greater experience of the subject than any other
 thinker--all history is the experimental refutation of the theory of
 the so-called moral order of things:--the more important point is that
 Zarathustra was more truthful than any other thinker. In his teaching
 alone do we meet with truthfulness upheld as the highest virtue--i.e.:
 the reverse of the COWARDICE of the 'idealist' who flees from reality.
 Zarathustra had more courage in his body than any other thinker before
 or after him. To tell the truth and TO AIM STRAIGHT: that is the first
 Persian virtue. Am I understood?... The overcoming of morality through
 itself--through truthfulness, the overcoming of the moralist through his
 opposite--THROUGH ME--: that is what the name Zarathustra means in my
 mouth."
 
 ELIZABETH FORSTER-NIETZSCHE.
 
 Nietzsche Archives,
 
 Weimar, December 1905.
 
 
 
 
 THUS SPAKE ZARATHUSTRA.
 
 
 
 
 FIRST PART. ZARATHUSTRA'S DISCOURSES.
 
 
 
 
 ZARATHUSTRA'S PROLOGUE.
 
 
 1.
 
 When Zarathustra was thirty years old, he left his home and the lake of
 his home, and went into the mountains. There he enjoyed his spirit and
 solitude, and for ten years did not weary of it. But at last his heart
 changed,--and rising one morning with the rosy dawn, he went before the
 sun, and spake thus unto it:
 
 Thou great star! What would be thy happiness if thou hadst not those for
 whom thou shinest!
 
 For ten years hast thou climbed hither unto my cave: thou wouldst have
 wearied of thy light and of the journey, had it not been for me, mine
 eagle, and my serpent.
 
 But we awaited thee every morning, took from thee thine overflow and
 blessed thee for it.
 
 Lo! I am weary of my wisdom, like the bee that hath gathered too much
 honey; I need hands outstretched to take it.
 
 I would fain bestow and distribute, until the wise have once more become
 joyous in their folly, and the poor happy in their riches.
 
 Therefore must I descend into the deep: as thou doest in the
 evening, when thou goest behind the sea, and givest light also to the
 nether-world, thou exuberant star!
 
 Like thee must I GO DOWN, as men say, to whom I shall descend.
 
 Bless me, then, thou tranquil eye, that canst behold even the greatest
 happiness without envy!
 
 Bless the cup that is about to overflow, that the water may flow golden
 out of it, and carry everywhere the reflection of thy bliss!
 
 Lo! This cup is again going to empty itself, and Zarathustra is again
 going to be a man.
 
 Thus began Zarathustra's down-going.
 
 2.
 
 Zarathustra went down the mountain alone, no one meeting him. When he
 entered the forest, however, there suddenly stood before him an old man,
 who had left his holy cot to seek roots. And thus spake the old man to
 Zarathustra:
 
 "No stranger to me is this wanderer: many years ago passed he by.
 Zarathustra he was called; but he hath altered.
 
 Then thou carriedst thine ashes into the mountains: wilt thou now carry
 thy fire into the valleys? Fearest thou not the incendiary's doom?
 
 Yea, I recognise Zarathustra. Pure is his eye, and no loathing lurketh
 about his mouth. Goeth he not along like a dancer?
 
 Altered is Zarathustra; a child hath Zarathustra become; an awakened one
 is Zarathustra: what wilt thou do in the land of the sleepers?
 
 As in the sea hast thou lived in solitude, and it hath borne thee up.
 Alas, wilt thou now go ashore? Alas, wilt thou again drag thy body
 thyself?"
 
 Zarathustra answered: "I love mankind."
 
 "Why," said the saint, "did I go into the forest and the desert? Was it
 not because I loved men far too well?
 
 Now I love God: men, I do not love. Man is a thing too imperfect for me.
 Love to man would be fatal to me."
 
 Zarathustra answered: "What spake I of love! I am bringing gifts unto
 men."
 
 "Give them nothing," said the saint. "Take rather part of their load,
 and carry it along with them--that will be most agreeable unto them: if
 only it be agreeable unto thee!
 
 If, however, thou wilt give unto them, give them no more than an alms,
 and let them also beg for it!"
 
 "No," replied Zarathustra, "I give no alms. I am not poor enough for
 that."
 
 The saint laughed at Zarathustra, and spake thus: "Then see to it that
 they accept thy treasures! They are distrustful of anchorites, and do
 not believe that we come with gifts.
 
 The fall of our footsteps ringeth too hollow through their streets. And
 just as at night, when they are in bed and hear a man abroad long before
 sunrise, so they ask themselves concerning us: Where goeth the thief?
 
 Go not to men, but stay in the forest! Go rather to the animals! Why not
 be like me--a bear amongst bears, a bird amongst birds?"
 
 "And what doeth the saint in the forest?" asked Zarathustra.
 
 The saint answered: "I make hymns and sing them; and in making hymns I
 laugh and weep and mumble: thus do I praise God.
 
 With singing, weeping, laughing, and mumbling do I praise the God who is
 my God. But what dost thou bring us as a gift?"
 
 When Zarathustra had heard these words, he bowed to the saint and said:
 "What should I have to give thee! Let me rather hurry hence lest I take
 aught away from thee!"--And thus they parted from one another, the old
 man and Zarathustra, laughing like schoolboys.
 
 When Zarathustra was alone, however, he said to his heart: "Could it be
 possible! This old saint in the forest hath not yet heard of it, that
 GOD IS DEAD!"
 
 3.
 
 When Zarathustra arrived at the nearest town which adjoineth the forest,
 he found many people assembled in the market-place; for it had been
 announced that a rope-dancer would give a performance. And Zarathustra
 spake thus unto the people:
 
 I TEACH YOU THE SUPERMAN. Man is something that is to be surpassed. What
 have ye done to surpass man?
 
 All beings hitherto have created something beyond themselves: and ye
 want to be the ebb of that great tide, and would rather go back to the
 beast than surpass man?
 
 What is the ape to man? A laughing-stock, a thing of shame. And just the
 same shall man be to the Superman: a laughing-stock, a thing of shame.
 
 Ye have made your way from the worm to man, and much within you is still
 worm. Once were ye apes, and even yet man is more of an ape than any of
 the apes.
 
 Even the wisest among you is only a disharmony and hybrid of plant and
 phantom. But do I bid you become phantoms or plants?
 
 Lo, I teach you the Superman!
 
 The Superman is the meaning of the earth. Let your will say: The
 Superman SHALL BE the meaning of the earth!
 
 I conjure you, my brethren, REMAIN TRUE TO THE EARTH, and believe not
 those who speak unto you of superearthly hopes! Poisoners are they,
 whether they know it or not.
 
 Despisers of life are they, decaying ones and poisoned ones themselves,
 of whom the earth is weary: so away with them!
 
 Once blasphemy against God was the greatest blasphemy; but God died,
 and therewith also those blasphemers. To blaspheme the earth is now the
 dreadfulest sin, and to rate the heart of the unknowable higher than the
 meaning of the earth!
 
 Once the soul looked contemptuously on the body, and then that contempt
 was the supreme thing:--the soul wished the body meagre, ghastly, and
 famished. Thus it thought to escape from the body and the earth.
 
 Oh, that soul was itself meagre, ghastly, and famished; and cruelty was
 the delight of that soul!
 
 But ye, also, my brethren, tell me: What doth your body say about
 your soul? Is your soul not poverty and pollution and wretched
 self-complacency?
 
 Verily, a polluted stream is man. One must be a sea, to receive a
 polluted stream without becoming impure.
 
 Lo, I teach you the Superman: he is that sea; in him can your great
 contempt be submerged.
 
 What is the greatest thing ye can experience? It is the hour of great
 contempt. The hour in which even your happiness becometh loathsome unto
 you, and so also your reason and virtue.
 
 The hour when ye say: "What good is my happiness! It is poverty and
 pollution and wretched self-complacency. But my happiness should justify
 existence itself!"
 
 The hour when ye say: "What good is my reason! Doth it long for
 knowledge as the lion for his food? It is poverty and pollution and
 wretched self-complacency!"
 
 The hour when ye say: "What good is my virtue! As yet it hath not made
 me passionate. How weary I am of my good and my bad! It is all poverty
 and pollution and wretched self-complacency!"
 
 The hour when ye say: "What good is my justice! I do not see that I am
 fervour and fuel. The just, however, are fervour and fuel!"
 
 The hour when ye say: "What good is my pity! Is not pity the cross on
 which he is nailed who loveth man? But my pity is not a crucifixion."
 
 Have ye ever spoken thus? Have ye ever cried thus? Ah! would that I had
 heard you crying thus!
 
 It is not your sin--it is your self-satisfaction that crieth unto
 heaven; your very sparingness in sin crieth unto heaven!
 
 Where is the lightning to lick you with its tongue? Where is the frenzy
 with which ye should be inoculated?
 
 Lo, I teach you the Superman: he is that lightning, he is that frenzy!--
 
 When Zarathustra had thus spoken, one of the people called out: "We have
 now heard enough of the rope-dancer; it is time now for us to see him!"
 And all the people laughed at Zarathustra. But the rope-dancer, who
 thought the words applied to him, began his performance.
 
 4.
 
 Zarathustra, however, looked at the people and wondered. Then he spake
 thus:
 
 Man is a rope stretched between the animal and the Superman--a rope over
 an abyss.
 
 A dangerous crossing, a dangerous wayfaring, a dangerous looking-back, a
 dangerous trembling and halting.
 
 What is great in man is that he is a bridge and not a goal: what is
 lovable in man is that he is an OVER-GOING and a DOWN-GOING.
 
 I love those that know not how to live except as down-goers, for they
 are the over-goers.
 
 I love the great despisers, because they are the great adorers, and
 arrows of longing for the other shore.
 
 I love those who do not first seek a reason beyond the stars for going
 down and being sacrifices, but sacrifice themselves to the earth, that
 the earth of the Superman may hereafter arrive.
 
 I love him who liveth in order to know, and seeketh to know in
 order that the Superman may hereafter live. Thus seeketh he his own
 down-going.
 
 I love him who laboureth and inventeth, that he may build the house for
 the Superman, and prepare for him earth, animal, and plant: for thus
 seeketh he his own down-going.
 
 I love him who loveth his virtue: for virtue is the will to down-going,
 and an arrow of longing.
 
 I love him who reserveth no share of spirit for himself, but wanteth to
 be wholly the spirit of his virtue: thus walketh he as spirit over the
 bridge.
 
 I love him who maketh his virtue his inclination and destiny: thus, for
 the sake of his virtue, he is willing to live on, or live no more.
 
 I love him who desireth not too many virtues. One virtue is more of a
 virtue than two, because it is more of a knot for one's destiny to cling
 to.
 
 I love him whose soul is lavish, who wanteth no thanks and doth not give
 back: for he always bestoweth, and desireth not to keep for himself.
 
 I love him who is ashamed when the dice fall in his favour, and who then
 asketh: "Am I a dishonest player?"--for he is willing to succumb.
 
 I love him who scattereth golden words in advance of his deeds, and
 always doeth more than he promiseth: for he seeketh his own down-going.
 
 I love him who justifieth the future ones, and redeemeth the past ones:
 for he is willing to succumb through the present ones.
 
 I love him who chasteneth his God, because he loveth his God: for he
 must succumb through the wrath of his God.
 
 I love him whose soul is deep even in the wounding, and may succumb
 through a small matter: thus goeth he willingly over the bridge.
 
 I love him whose soul is so overfull that he forgetteth himself, and all
 things are in him: thus all things become his down-going.
 
 I love him who is of a free spirit and a free heart: thus is his
 head only the bowels of his heart; his heart, however, causeth his
 down-going.
 
 I love all who are like heavy drops falling one by one out of the dark
 cloud that lowereth over man: they herald the coming of the lightning,
 and succumb as heralds.
 
 Lo, I am a herald of the lightning, and a heavy drop out of the cloud:
 the lightning, however, is the SUPERMAN.--
 
 5.
 
 When Zarathustra had spoken these words, he again looked at the people,
 and was silent. "There they stand," said he to his heart; "there they
 laugh: they understand me not; I am not the mouth for these ears.
 
 Must one first batter their ears, that they may learn to hear with their
 eyes? Must one clatter like kettledrums and penitential preachers? Or do
 they only believe the stammerer?
 
 They have something whereof they are proud. What do they call it, that
 which maketh them proud? Culture, they call it; it distinguisheth them
 from the goatherds.
 
 They dislike, therefore, to hear of 'contempt' of themselves. So I will
 appeal to their pride.
 
 I will speak unto them of the most contemptible thing: that, however, is
 THE LAST MAN!"
 
 And thus spake Zarathustra unto the people:
 
 It is time for man to fix his goal. It is time for man to plant the germ
 of his highest hope.
 
 Still is his soil rich enough for it. But that soil will one day be
 poor and exhausted, and no lofty tree will any longer be able to grow
 thereon.
 
 Alas! there cometh the time when man will no longer launch the arrow of
 his longing beyond man--and the string of his bow will have unlearned to
 whizz!
 
 I tell you: one must still have chaos in one, to give birth to a dancing
 star. I tell you: ye have still chaos in you.
 
 Alas! There cometh the time when man will no longer give birth to any
 star. Alas! There cometh the time of the most despicable man, who can no
 longer despise himself.
 
 Lo! I show you THE LAST MAN.
 
 "What is love? What is creation? What is longing? What is a star?"--so
 asketh the last man and blinketh.
 
 The earth hath then become small, and on it there hoppeth the last man
 who maketh everything small. His species is ineradicable like that of
 the ground-flea; the last man liveth longest.
 
 "We have discovered happiness"--say the last men, and blink thereby.
 
 They have left the regions where it is hard to live; for they need
 warmth. One still loveth one's neighbour and rubbeth against him; for
 one needeth warmth.
 
 Turning ill and being distrustful, they consider sinful: they walk
 warily. He is a fool who still stumbleth over stones or men!
 
 A little poison now and then: that maketh pleasant dreams. And much
 poison at last for a pleasant death.
 
 One still worketh, for work is a pastime. But one is careful lest the
 pastime should hurt one.
 
 One no longer becometh poor or rich; both are too burdensome. Who still
 wanteth to rule? Who still wanteth to obey? Both are too burdensome.
 
 No shepherd, and one herd! Every one wanteth the same; every one is
 equal: he who hath other sentiments goeth voluntarily into the madhouse.
 
 "Formerly all the world was insane,"--say the subtlest of them, and
 blink thereby.
 
 They are clever and know all that hath happened: so there is
 no end to their raillery. People still fall out, but are soon
 reconciled--otherwise it spoileth their stomachs.
 
 They have their little pleasures for the day, and their little pleasures
 for the night, but they have a regard for health.
 
 "We have discovered happiness,"--say the last men, and blink thereby.--
 
 And here ended the first discourse of Zarathustra, which is also
 called "The Prologue": for at this point the shouting and mirth of the
 multitude interrupted him. "Give us this last man, O Zarathustra,"--they
 called out--"make us into these last men! Then will we make thee a
 present of the Superman!" And all the people exulted and smacked their
 lips. Zarathustra, however, turned sad, and said to his heart:
 
 "They understand me not: I am not the mouth for these ears.
 
 Too long, perhaps, have I lived in the mountains; too much have I
 hearkened unto the brooks and trees: now do I speak unto them as unto
 the goatherds.
 
 Calm is my soul, and clear, like the mountains in the morning. But they
 think me cold, and a mocker with terrible jests.
 
 And now do they look at me and laugh: and while they laugh they hate me
 too. There is ice in their laughter."
 
 6.
 
 Then, however, something happened which made every mouth mute and every
 eye fixed. In the meantime, of course, the rope-dancer had commenced his
 performance: he had come out at a little door, and was going along the
 rope which was stretched between two towers, so that it hung above the
 market-place and the people. When he was just midway across, the little
 door opened once more, and a gaudily-dressed fellow like a buffoon
 sprang out, and went rapidly after the first one. "Go on, halt-foot,"
 cried his frightful voice, "go on, lazy-bones, interloper,
 sallow-face!--lest I tickle thee with my heel! What dost thou here
 between the towers? In the tower is the place for thee, thou shouldst be
 locked up; to one better than thyself thou blockest the way!"--And with
 every word he came nearer and nearer the first one. When, however, he
 was but a step behind, there happened the frightful thing which made
 every mouth mute and every eye fixed--he uttered a yell like a devil,
 and jumped over the other who was in his way. The latter, however, when
 he thus saw his rival triumph, lost at the same time his head and his
 footing on the rope; he threw his pole away, and shot downwards faster
 than it, like an eddy of arms and legs, into the depth. The market-place
 and the people were like the sea when the storm cometh on: they all flew
 apart and in disorder, especially where the body was about to fall.
 
 Zarathustra, however, remained standing, and just beside him fell the
 body, badly injured and disfigured, but not yet dead. After a while
 consciousness returned to the shattered man, and he saw Zarathustra
 kneeling beside him. "What art thou doing there?" said he at last, "I
 knew long ago that the devil would trip me up. Now he draggeth me to
 hell: wilt thou prevent him?"
 
 "On mine honour, my friend," answered Zarathustra, "there is nothing of
 all that whereof thou speakest: there is no devil and no hell. Thy soul
 will be dead even sooner than thy body: fear, therefore, nothing any
 more!"
 
 The man looked up distrustfully. "If thou speakest the truth," said he,
 "I lose nothing when I lose my life. I am not much more than an animal
 which hath been taught to dance by blows and scanty fare."
 
 "Not at all," said Zarathustra, "thou hast made danger thy calling;
 therein there is nothing contemptible. Now thou perishest by thy
 calling: therefore will I bury thee with mine own hands."
 
 When Zarathustra had said this the dying one did not reply further; but
 he moved his hand as if he sought the hand of Zarathustra in gratitude.
 
 7.
 
 Meanwhile the evening came on, and the market-place veiled itself in
 gloom. Then the people dispersed, for even curiosity and terror become
 fatigued. Zarathustra, however, still sat beside the dead man on the
 ground, absorbed in thought: so he forgot the time. But at last it
 became night, and a cold wind blew upon the lonely one. Then arose
 Zarathustra and said to his heart:
 
 Verily, a fine catch of fish hath Zarathustra made to-day! It is not a
 man he hath caught, but a corpse.
 
 Sombre is human life, and as yet without meaning: a buffoon may be
 fateful to it.
 
 I want to teach men the sense of their existence, which is the Superman,
 the lightning out of the dark cloud--man.
 
 But still am I far from them, and my sense speaketh not unto their
 sense. To men I am still something between a fool and a corpse.
 
 Gloomy is the night, gloomy are the ways of Zarathustra. Come, thou cold
 and stiff companion! I carry thee to the place where I shall bury thee
 with mine own hands.
 
 8.
 
 When Zarathustra had said this to his heart, he put the corpse upon his
 shoulders and set out on his way. Yet had he not gone a hundred steps,
 when there stole a man up to him and whispered in his ear--and lo!
 he that spake was the buffoon from the tower. "Leave this town, O
 Zarathustra," said he, "there are too many here who hate thee. The
 good and just hate thee, and call thee their enemy and despiser; the
 believers in the orthodox belief hate thee, and call thee a danger to
 the multitude. It was thy good fortune to be laughed at: and verily thou
 spakest like a buffoon. It was thy good fortune to associate with the
 dead dog; by so humiliating thyself thou hast saved thy life to-day.
 Depart, however, from this town,--or tomorrow I shall jump over thee,
 a living man over a dead one." And when he had said this, the buffoon
 vanished; Zarathustra, however, went on through the dark streets.
 
 At the gate of the town the grave-diggers met him: they shone their
 torch on his face, and, recognising Zarathustra, they sorely derided
 him. "Zarathustra is carrying away the dead dog: a fine thing that
 Zarathustra hath turned a grave-digger! For our hands are too cleanly
 for that roast. Will Zarathustra steal the bite from the devil? Well
 then, good luck to the repast! If only the devil is not a better thief
 than Zarathustra!--he will steal them both, he will eat them both!" And
 they laughed among themselves, and put their heads together.
 
 Zarathustra made no answer thereto, but went on his way. When he had
 gone on for two hours, past forests and swamps, he had heard too much of
 the hungry howling of the wolves, and he himself became a-hungry. So he
 halted at a lonely house in which a light was burning.
 
 "Hunger attacketh me," said Zarathustra, "like a robber. Among forests
 and swamps my hunger attacketh me, and late in the night.
 
 "Strange humours hath my hunger. Often it cometh to me only after a
 repast, and all day it hath failed to come: where hath it been?"
 
 And thereupon Zarathustra knocked at the door of the house. An old man
 appeared, who carried a light, and asked: "Who cometh unto me and my bad
 sleep?"
 
 "A living man and a dead one," said Zarathustra. "Give me something to
 eat and drink, I forgot it during the day. He that feedeth the hungry
 refresheth his own soul, saith wisdom."
 
 The old man withdrew, but came back immediately and offered Zarathustra
 bread and wine. "A bad country for the hungry," said he; "that is why
 I live here. Animal and man come unto me, the anchorite. But bid thy
 companion eat and drink also, he is wearier than thou." Zarathustra
 answered: "My companion is dead; I shall hardly be able to persuade him
 to eat." "That doth not concern me," said the old man sullenly; "he
 that knocketh at my door must take what I offer him. Eat, and fare ye
 well!"--
 
 Thereafter Zarathustra again went on for two hours, trusting to the path
 and the light of the stars: for he was an experienced night-walker, and
 liked to look into the face of all that slept. When the morning dawned,
 however, Zarathustra found himself in a thick forest, and no path was
 any longer visible. He then put the dead man in a hollow tree at his
 head--for he wanted to protect him from the wolves--and laid himself
 down on the ground and moss. And immediately he fell asleep, tired in
 body, but with a tranquil soul.
 
 9.
 
 Long slept Zarathustra; and not only the rosy dawn passed over his head,
 but also the morning. At last, however, his eyes opened, and amazedly he
 gazed into the forest and the stillness, amazedly he gazed into himself.
 Then he arose quickly, like a seafarer who all at once seeth the land;
 and he shouted for joy: for he saw a new truth. And he spake thus to his
 heart:
 
 A light hath dawned upon me: I need companions--living ones; not dead
 companions and corpses, which I carry with me where I will.
 
 But I need living companions, who will follow me because they want to
 follow themselves--and to the place where I will.
 
 A light hath dawned upon me. Not to the people is Zarathustra to speak,
 but to companions! Zarathustra shall not be the herd's herdsman and
 hound!
 
 To allure many from the herd--for that purpose have I come. The people
 and the herd must be angry with me: a robber shall Zarathustra be called
 by the herdsmen.
 
 Herdsmen, I say, but they call themselves the good and just. Herdsmen, I
 say, but they call themselves the believers in the orthodox belief.
 
 Behold the good and just! Whom do they hate most? Him who breaketh up
 their tables of values, the breaker, the lawbreaker:--he, however, is
 the creator.
 
 Behold the believers of all beliefs! Whom do they hate most? Him who
 breaketh up their tables of values, the breaker, the law-breaker--he,
 however, is the creator.
 
 Companions, the creator seeketh, not corpses--and not herds or believers
 either. Fellow-creators the creator seeketh--those who grave new values
 on new tables.
 
 Companions, the creator seeketh, and fellow-reapers: for everything is
 ripe for the harvest with him. But he lacketh the hundred sickles: so he
 plucketh the ears of corn and is vexed.
 
 Companions, the creator seeketh, and such as know how to whet their
 sickles. Destroyers, will they be called, and despisers of good and
 evil. But they are the reapers and rejoicers.
 
 Fellow-creators, Zarathustra seeketh; fellow-reapers and
 fellow-rejoicers, Zarathustra seeketh: what hath he to do with herds and
 herdsmen and corpses!
 
 And thou, my first companion, rest in peace! Well have I buried thee in
 thy hollow tree; well have I hid thee from the wolves.
 
 But I part from thee; the time hath arrived. 'Twixt rosy dawn and rosy
 dawn there came unto me a new truth.
 
 I am not to be a herdsman, I am not to be a grave-digger. Not any more
 will I discourse unto the people; for the last time have I spoken unto
 the dead.
 
 With the creators, the reapers, and the rejoicers will I associate: the
 rainbow will I show them, and all the stairs to the Superman.
 
 To the lone-dwellers will I sing my song, and to the twain-dwellers;
 and unto him who hath still ears for the unheard, will I make the heart
 heavy with my happiness.
 
 I make for my goal, I follow my course; over the loitering and tardy
 will I leap. Thus let my on-going be their down-going!
 
 10.
 
 This had Zarathustra said to his heart when the sun stood at noon-tide.
 Then he looked inquiringly aloft,--for he heard above him the sharp call
 of a bird. And behold! An eagle swept through the air in wide circles,
 and on it hung a serpent, not like a prey, but like a friend: for it
 kept itself coiled round the eagle's neck.
 
 "They are mine animals," said Zarathustra, and rejoiced in his heart.
 
 "The proudest animal under the sun, and the wisest animal under the
 sun,--they have come out to reconnoitre.
 
 They want to know whether Zarathustra still liveth. Verily, do I still
 live?
 
 More dangerous have I found it among men than among animals; in
 dangerous paths goeth Zarathustra. Let mine animals lead me!
 
 When Zarathustra had said this, he remembered the words of the saint in
 the forest. Then he sighed and spake thus to his heart:
 
 "Would that I were wiser! Would that I were wise from the very heart,
 like my serpent!
 
 But I am asking the impossible. Therefore do I ask my pride to go always
 with my wisdom!
 
 And if my wisdom should some day forsake me:--alas! it loveth to fly
 away!--may my pride then fly with my folly!"
 
 Thus began Zarathustra's down-going.
 
 
 
 
 ZARATHUSTRA'S DISCOURSES.
 
 
 
 
 I. THE THREE METAMORPHOSES.
 
 Three metamorphoses of the spirit do I designate to you: how the spirit
 becometh a camel, the camel a lion, and the lion at last a child.
 
 Many heavy things are there for the spirit, the strong load-bearing
 spirit in which reverence dwelleth: for the heavy and the heaviest
 longeth its strength.
 
 What is heavy? so asketh the load-bearing spirit; then kneeleth it down
 like the camel, and wanteth to be well laden.
 
 What is the heaviest thing, ye heroes? asketh the load-bearing spirit,
 that I may take it upon me and rejoice in my strength.
 
 Is it not this: To humiliate oneself in order to mortify one's pride? To
 exhibit one's folly in order to mock at one's wisdom?
 
 Or is it this: To desert our cause when it celebrateth its triumph? To
 ascend high mountains to tempt the tempter?
 
 Or is it this: To feed on the acorns and grass of knowledge, and for the
 sake of truth to suffer hunger of soul?
 
 Or is it this: To be sick and dismiss comforters, and make friends of
 the deaf, who never hear thy requests?
 
 Or is it this: To go into foul water when it is the water of truth, and
 not disclaim cold frogs and hot toads?
 
 Or is it this: To love those who despise us, and give one's hand to the
 phantom when it is going to frighten us?
 
 All these heaviest things the load-bearing spirit taketh upon itself:
 and like the camel, which, when laden, hasteneth into the wilderness, so
 hasteneth the spirit into its wilderness.
 
 But in the loneliest wilderness happeneth the second metamorphosis: here
 the spirit becometh a lion; freedom will it capture, and lordship in its
 own wilderness.
 
 Its last Lord it here seeketh: hostile will it be to him, and to its
 last God; for victory will it struggle with the great dragon.
 
 What is the great dragon which the spirit is no longer inclined to call
 Lord and God? "Thou-shalt," is the great dragon called. But the spirit
 of the lion saith, "I will."
 
 "Thou-shalt," lieth in its path, sparkling with gold--a scale-covered
 beast; and on every scale glittereth golden, "Thou shalt!"
 
 The values of a thousand years glitter on those scales, and
 thus speaketh the mightiest of all dragons: "All the values of
 things--glitter on me.
 
 All values have already been created, and all created values--do I
 represent. Verily, there shall be no 'I will' any more. Thus speaketh
 the dragon.
 
 My brethren, wherefore is there need of the lion in the spirit? Why
 sufficeth not the beast of burden, which renounceth and is reverent?
 
 To create new values--that, even the lion cannot yet accomplish: but to
 create itself freedom for new creating--that can the might of the lion
 do.
 
 To create itself freedom, and give a holy Nay even unto duty: for that,
 my brethren, there is need of the lion.
 
 To assume the right to new values--that is the most formidable
 assumption for a load-bearing and reverent spirit. Verily, unto such a
 spirit it is preying, and the work of a beast of prey.
 
 As its holiest, it once loved "Thou-shalt": now is it forced to find
 illusion and arbitrariness even in the holiest things, that it may
 capture freedom from its love: the lion is needed for this capture.
 
 But tell me, my brethren, what the child can do, which even the lion
 could not do? Why hath the preying lion still to become a child?
 
 Innocence is the child, and forgetfulness, a new beginning, a game, a
 self-rolling wheel, a first movement, a holy Yea.
 
 Aye, for the game of creating, my brethren, there is needed a holy Yea
 unto life: ITS OWN will, willeth now the spirit; HIS OWN world winneth
 the world's outcast.
 
 Three metamorphoses of the spirit have I designated to you: how the
 spirit became a camel, the camel a lion, and the lion at last a child.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra. And at that time he abode in the town which is
 called The Pied Cow.
 
 
 
 
 II. THE ACADEMIC CHAIRS OF VIRTUE.
 
 People commended unto Zarathustra a wise man, as one who could discourse
 well about sleep and virtue: greatly was he honoured and rewarded for
 it, and all the youths sat before his chair. To him went Zarathustra,
 and sat among the youths before his chair. And thus spake the wise man:
 
 Respect and modesty in presence of sleep! That is the first thing! And
 to go out of the way of all who sleep badly and keep awake at night!
 
 Modest is even the thief in presence of sleep: he always stealeth softly
 through the night. Immodest, however, is the night-watchman; immodestly
 he carrieth his horn.
 
 No small art is it to sleep: it is necessary for that purpose to keep
 awake all day.
 
 Ten times a day must thou overcome thyself: that causeth wholesome
 weariness, and is poppy to the soul.
 
 Ten times must thou reconcile again with thyself; for overcoming is
 bitterness, and badly sleep the unreconciled.
 
 Ten truths must thou find during the day; otherwise wilt thou seek truth
 during the night, and thy soul will have been hungry.
 
 Ten times must thou laugh during the day, and be cheerful; otherwise thy
 stomach, the father of affliction, will disturb thee in the night.
 
 Few people know it, but one must have all the virtues in order to sleep
 well. Shall I bear false witness? Shall I commit adultery?
 
 Shall I covet my neighbour's maidservant? All that would ill accord with
 good sleep.
 
 And even if one have all the virtues, there is still one thing needful:
 to send the virtues themselves to sleep at the right time.
 
 That they may not quarrel with one another, the good females! And about
 thee, thou unhappy one!
 
 Peace with God and thy neighbour: so desireth good sleep. And peace also
 with thy neighbour's devil! Otherwise it will haunt thee in the night.
 
 Honour to the government, and obedience, and also to the crooked
 government! So desireth good sleep. How can I help it, if power like to
 walk on crooked legs?
 
 He who leadeth his sheep to the greenest pasture, shall always be for me
 the best shepherd: so doth it accord with good sleep.
 
 Many honours I want not, nor great treasures: they excite the spleen.
 But it is bad sleeping without a good name and a little treasure.
 
 A small company is more welcome to me than a bad one: but they must come
 and go at the right time. So doth it accord with good sleep.
 
 Well, also, do the poor in spirit please me: they promote sleep. Blessed
 are they, especially if one always give in to them.
 
 Thus passeth the day unto the virtuous. When night cometh, then take I
 good care not to summon sleep. It disliketh to be summoned--sleep, the
 lord of the virtues!
 
 But I think of what I have done and thought during the day. Thus
 ruminating, patient as a cow, I ask myself: What were thy ten
 overcomings?
 
 And what were the ten reconciliations, and the ten truths, and the ten
 laughters with which my heart enjoyed itself?
 
 Thus pondering, and cradled by forty thoughts, it overtaketh me all at
 once--sleep, the unsummoned, the lord of the virtues.
 
 Sleep tappeth on mine eye, and it turneth heavy. Sleep toucheth my
 mouth, and it remaineth open.
 
 Verily, on soft soles doth it come to me, the dearest of thieves, and
 stealeth from me my thoughts: stupid do I then stand, like this academic
 chair.
 
 But not much longer do I then stand: I already lie.--
 
 When Zarathustra heard the wise man thus speak, he laughed in his heart:
 for thereby had a light dawned upon him. And thus spake he to his heart:
 
 A fool seemeth this wise man with his forty thoughts: but I believe he
 knoweth well how to sleep.
 
 Happy even is he who liveth near this wise man! Such sleep is
 contagious--even through a thick wall it is contagious.
 
 A magic resideth even in his academic chair. And not in vain did the
 youths sit before the preacher of virtue.
 
 His wisdom is to keep awake in order to sleep well. And verily, if
 life had no sense, and had I to choose nonsense, this would be the
 desirablest nonsense for me also.
 
 Now know I well what people sought formerly above all else when they
 sought teachers of virtue. Good sleep they sought for themselves, and
 poppy-head virtues to promote it!
 
 To all those belauded sages of the academic chairs, wisdom was sleep
 without dreams: they knew no higher significance of life.
 
 Even at present, to be sure, there are some like this preacher of
 virtue, and not always so honourable: but their time is past. And not
 much longer do they stand: there they already lie.
 
 Blessed are those drowsy ones: for they shall soon nod to sleep.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 III. BACKWORLDSMEN.
 
 Once on a time, Zarathustra also cast his fancy beyond man, like all
 backworldsmen. The work of a suffering and tortured God, did the world
 then seem to me.
 
 The dream--and diction--of a God, did the world then seem to me;
 coloured vapours before the eyes of a divinely dissatisfied one.
 
 Good and evil, and joy and woe, and I and thou--coloured vapours did
 they seem to me before creative eyes. The creator wished to look away
 from himself,--thereupon he created the world.
 
 Intoxicating joy is it for the sufferer to look away from his suffering
 and forget himself. Intoxicating joy and self-forgetting, did the world
 once seem to me.
 
 This world, the eternally imperfect, an eternal contradiction's image
 and imperfect image--an intoxicating joy to its imperfect creator:--thus
 did the world once seem to me.
 
 Thus, once on a time, did I also cast my fancy beyond man, like all
 backworldsmen. Beyond man, forsooth?
 
 Ah, ye brethren, that God whom I created was human work and human
 madness, like all the Gods!
 
 A man was he, and only a poor fragment of a man and ego. Out of mine own
 ashes and glow it came unto me, that phantom. And verily, it came not
 unto me from the beyond!
 
 What happened, my brethren? I surpassed myself, the suffering one; I
 carried mine own ashes to the mountain; a brighter flame I contrived for
 myself. And lo! Thereupon the phantom WITHDREW from me!
 
 To me the convalescent would it now be suffering and torment to believe
 in such phantoms: suffering would it now be to me, and humiliation. Thus
 speak I to backworldsmen.
 
 Suffering was it, and impotence--that created all backworlds; and
 the short madness of happiness, which only the greatest sufferer
 experienceth.
 
 Weariness, which seeketh to get to the ultimate with one leap, with
 a death-leap; a poor ignorant weariness, unwilling even to will any
 longer: that created all Gods and backworlds.
 
 Believe me, my brethren! It was the body which despaired of the body--it
 groped with the fingers of the infatuated spirit at the ultimate walls.
 
 Believe me, my brethren! It was the body which despaired of the
 earth--it heard the bowels of existence speaking unto it.
 
 And then it sought to get through the ultimate walls with its head--and
 not with its head only--into "the other world."
 
 But that "other world" is well concealed from man, that dehumanised,
 inhuman world, which is a celestial naught; and the bowels of existence
 do not speak unto man, except as man.
 
 Verily, it is difficult to prove all being, and hard to make it speak.
 Tell me, ye brethren, is not the strangest of all things best proved?
 
 Yea, this ego, with its contradiction and perplexity, speaketh most
 uprightly of its being--this creating, willing, evaluing ego, which is
 the measure and value of things.
 
 And this most upright existence, the ego--it speaketh of the body, and
 still implieth the body, even when it museth and raveth and fluttereth
 with broken wings.
 
 Always more uprightly learneth it to speak, the ego; and the more it
 learneth, the more doth it find titles and honours for the body and the
 earth.
 
 A new pride taught me mine ego, and that teach I unto men: no longer
 to thrust one's head into the sand of celestial things, but to carry it
 freely, a terrestrial head, which giveth meaning to the earth!
 
 A new will teach I unto men: to choose that path which man hath followed
 blindly, and to approve of it--and no longer to slink aside from it,
 like the sick and perishing!
 
 The sick and perishing--it was they who despised the body and the earth,
 and invented the heavenly world, and the redeeming blood-drops; but even
 those sweet and sad poisons they borrowed from the body and the earth!
 
 From their misery they sought escape, and the stars were too remote for
 them. Then they sighed: "O that there were heavenly paths by which to
 steal into another existence and into happiness!" Then they contrived
 for themselves their by-paths and bloody draughts!
 
 Beyond the sphere of their body and this earth they now fancied
 themselves transported, these ungrateful ones. But to what did they owe
 the convulsion and rapture of their transport? To their body and this
 earth.
 
 Gentle is Zarathustra to the sickly. Verily, he is not indignant
 at their modes of consolation and ingratitude. May they become
 convalescents and overcomers, and create higher bodies for themselves!
 
 Neither is Zarathustra indignant at a convalescent who looketh tenderly
 on his delusions, and at midnight stealeth round the grave of his God;
 but sickness and a sick frame remain even in his tears.
 
 Many sickly ones have there always been among those who muse, and
 languish for God; violently they hate the discerning ones, and the
 latest of virtues, which is uprightness.
 
 Backward they always gaze toward dark ages: then, indeed, were delusion
 and faith something different. Raving of the reason was likeness to God,
 and doubt was sin.
 
 Too well do I know those godlike ones: they insist on being believed in,
 and that doubt is sin. Too well, also, do I know what they themselves
 most believe in.
 
 Verily, not in backworlds and redeeming blood-drops: but in the body
 do they also believe most; and their own body is for them the
 thing-in-itself.
 
 But it is a sickly thing to them, and gladly would they get out of their
 skin. Therefore hearken they to the preachers of death, and themselves
 preach backworlds.
 
 Hearken rather, my brethren, to the voice of the healthy body; it is a
 more upright and pure voice.
 
 More uprightly and purely speaketh the healthy body, perfect and
 square-built; and it speaketh of the meaning of the earth.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 IV. THE DESPISERS OF THE BODY.
 
 To the despisers of the body will I speak my word. I wish them neither
 to learn afresh, nor teach anew, but only to bid farewell to their own
 bodies,--and thus be dumb.
 
 "Body am I, and soul"--so saith the child. And why should one not speak
 like children?
 
 But the awakened one, the knowing one, saith: "Body am I entirely, and
 nothing more; and soul is only the name of something in the body."
 
 The body is a big sagacity, a plurality with one sense, a war and a
 peace, a flock and a shepherd.
 
 An instrument of thy body is also thy little sagacity, my brother, which
 thou callest "spirit"--a little instrument and plaything of thy big
 sagacity.
 
 "Ego," sayest thou, and art proud of that word. But the greater
 thing--in which thou art unwilling to believe--is thy body with its big
 sagacity; it saith not "ego," but doeth it.
 
 What the sense feeleth, what the spirit discerneth, hath never its end
 in itself. But sense and spirit would fain persuade thee that they are
 the end of all things: so vain are they.
 
 Instruments and playthings are sense and spirit: behind them there
 is still the Self. The Self seeketh with the eyes of the senses, it
 hearkeneth also with the ears of the spirit.
 
 Ever hearkeneth the Self, and seeketh; it compareth, mastereth,
 conquereth, and destroyeth. It ruleth, and is also the ego's ruler.
 
 Behind thy thoughts and feelings, my brother, there is a mighty lord,
 an unknown sage--it is called Self; it dwelleth in thy body, it is thy
 body.
 
 There is more sagacity in thy body than in thy best wisdom. And who then
 knoweth why thy body requireth just thy best wisdom?
 
 Thy Self laugheth at thine ego, and its proud prancings. "What are these
 prancings and flights of thought unto me?" it saith to itself. "A by-way
 to my purpose. I am the leading-string of the ego, and the prompter of
 its notions."
 
 The Self saith unto the ego: "Feel pain!" And thereupon it suffereth,
 and thinketh how it may put an end thereto--and for that very purpose it
 IS MEANT to think.
 
 The Self saith unto the ego: "Feel pleasure!" Thereupon it rejoiceth,
 and thinketh how it may ofttimes rejoice--and for that very purpose it
 IS MEANT to think.
 
 To the despisers of the body will I speak a word. That they despise is
 caused by their esteem. What is it that created esteeming and despising
 and worth and will?
 
 The creating Self created for itself esteeming and despising, it created
 for itself joy and woe. The creating body created for itself spirit, as
 a hand to its will.
 
 Even in your folly and despising ye each serve your Self, ye despisers
 of the body. I tell you, your very Self wanteth to die, and turneth away
 from life.
 
 No longer can your Self do that which it desireth most:--create beyond
 itself. That is what it desireth most; that is all its fervour.
 
 But it is now too late to do so:--so your Self wisheth to succumb, ye
 despisers of the body.
 
 To succumb--so wisheth your Self; and therefore have ye become despisers
 of the body. For ye can no longer create beyond yourselves.
 
 And therefore are ye now angry with life and with the earth. And
 unconscious envy is in the sidelong look of your contempt.
 
 I go not your way, ye despisers of the body! Ye are no bridges for me to
 the Superman!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 V. JOYS AND PASSIONS.
 
 My brother, when thou hast a virtue, and it is thine own virtue, thou
 hast it in common with no one.
 
 To be sure, thou wouldst call it by name and caress it; thou wouldst
 pull its ears and amuse thyself with it.
 
 And lo! Then hast thou its name in common with the people, and hast
 become one of the people and the herd with thy virtue!
 
 Better for thee to say: "Ineffable is it, and nameless, that which is
 pain and sweetness to my soul, and also the hunger of my bowels."
 
 Let thy virtue be too high for the familiarity of names, and if thou
 must speak of it, be not ashamed to stammer about it.
 
 Thus speak and stammer: "That is MY good, that do I love, thus doth it
 please me entirely, thus only do _I_ desire the good.
 
 Not as the law of a God do I desire it, not as a human law or a human
 need do I desire it; it is not to be a guide-post for me to superearths
 and paradises.
 
 An earthly virtue is it which I love: little prudence is therein, and
 the least everyday wisdom.
 
 But that bird built its nest beside me: therefore, I love and cherish
 it--now sitteth it beside me on its golden eggs."
 
 Thus shouldst thou stammer, and praise thy virtue.
 
 Once hadst thou passions and calledst them evil. But now hast thou only
 thy virtues: they grew out of thy passions.
 
 Thou implantedst thy highest aim into the heart of those passions: then
 became they thy virtues and joys.
 
 And though thou wert of the race of the hot-tempered, or of the
 voluptuous, or of the fanatical, or the vindictive;
 
 All thy passions in the end became virtues, and all thy devils angels.
 
 Once hadst thou wild dogs in thy cellar: but they changed at last into
 birds and charming songstresses.
 
 Out of thy poisons brewedst thou balsam for thyself; thy cow,
 affliction, milkedst thou--now drinketh thou the sweet milk of her
 udder.
 
 And nothing evil groweth in thee any longer, unless it be the evil that
 groweth out of the conflict of thy virtues.
 
 My brother, if thou be fortunate, then wilt thou have one virtue and no
 more: thus goest thou easier over the bridge.
 
 Illustrious is it to have many virtues, but a hard lot; and many a one
 hath gone into the wilderness and killed himself, because he was weary
 of being the battle and battlefield of virtues.
 
 My brother, are war and battle evil? Necessary, however, is the evil;
 necessary are the envy and the distrust and the back-biting among the
 virtues.
 
 Lo! how each of thy virtues is covetous of the highest place; it wanteth
 thy whole spirit to be ITS herald, it wanteth thy whole power, in wrath,
 hatred, and love.
 
 Jealous is every virtue of the others, and a dreadful thing is jealousy.
 Even virtues may succumb by jealousy.
 
 He whom the flame of jealousy encompasseth, turneth at last, like the
 scorpion, the poisoned sting against himself.
 
 Ah! my brother, hast thou never seen a virtue backbite and stab itself?
 
 Man is something that hath to be surpassed: and therefore shalt thou
 love thy virtues,--for thou wilt succumb by them.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 VI. THE PALE CRIMINAL.
 
 Ye do not mean to slay, ye judges and sacrificers, until the animal hath
 bowed its head? Lo! the pale criminal hath bowed his head: out of his
 eye speaketh the great contempt.
 
 "Mine ego is something which is to be surpassed: mine ego is to me the
 great contempt of man": so speaketh it out of that eye.
 
 When he judged himself--that was his supreme moment; let not the exalted
 one relapse again into his low estate!
 
 There is no salvation for him who thus suffereth from himself, unless it
 be speedy death.
 
 Your slaying, ye judges, shall be pity, and not revenge; and in that ye
 slay, see to it that ye yourselves justify life!
 
 It is not enough that ye should reconcile with him whom ye slay. Let
 your sorrow be love to the Superman: thus will ye justify your own
 survival!
 
 "Enemy" shall ye say but not "villain," "invalid" shall ye say but not
 "wretch," "fool" shall ye say but not "sinner."
 
 And thou, red judge, if thou would say audibly all thou hast done in
 thought, then would every one cry: "Away with the nastiness and the
 virulent reptile!"
 
 But one thing is the thought, another thing is the deed, and another
 thing is the idea of the deed. The wheel of causality doth not roll
 between them.
 
 An idea made this pale man pale. Adequate was he for his deed when he
 did it, but the idea of it, he could not endure when it was done.
 
 Evermore did he now see himself as the doer of one deed. Madness, I call
 this: the exception reversed itself to the rule in him.
 
 The streak of chalk bewitcheth the hen; the stroke he struck bewitched
 his weak reason. Madness AFTER the deed, I call this.
 
 Hearken, ye judges! There is another madness besides, and it is BEFORE
 the deed. Ah! ye have not gone deep enough into this soul!
 
 Thus speaketh the red judge: "Why did this criminal commit murder? He
 meant to rob." I tell you, however, that his soul wanted blood, not
 booty: he thirsted for the happiness of the knife!
 
 But his weak reason understood not this madness, and it persuaded him.
 "What matter about blood!" it said; "wishest thou not, at least, to make
 booty thereby? Or take revenge?"
 
 And he hearkened unto his weak reason: like lead lay its words upon
 him--thereupon he robbed when he murdered. He did not mean to be
 ashamed of his madness.
 
 And now once more lieth the lead of his guilt upon him, and once more is
 his weak reason so benumbed, so paralysed, and so dull.
 
 Could he only shake his head, then would his burden roll off; but who
 shaketh that head?
 
 What is this man? A mass of diseases that reach out into the world
 through the spirit; there they want to get their prey.
 
 What is this man? A coil of wild serpents that are seldom at peace among
 themselves--so they go forth apart and seek prey in the world.
 
 Look at that poor body! What it suffered and craved, the poor soul
 interpreted to itself--it interpreted it as murderous desire, and
 eagerness for the happiness of the knife.
 
 Him who now turneth sick, the evil overtaketh which is now the evil: he
 seeketh to cause pain with that which causeth him pain. But there have
 been other ages, and another evil and good.
 
 Once was doubt evil, and the will to Self. Then the invalid became a
 heretic or sorcerer; as heretic or sorcerer he suffered, and sought to
 cause suffering.
 
 But this will not enter your ears; it hurteth your good people, ye tell
 me. But what doth it matter to me about your good people!
 
 Many things in your good people cause me disgust, and verily, not their
 evil. I would that they had a madness by which they succumbed, like this
 pale criminal!
 
 Verily, I would that their madness were called truth, or fidelity,
 or justice: but they have their virtue in order to live long, and in
 wretched self-complacency.
 
 I am a railing alongside the torrent; whoever is able to grasp me may
 grasp me! Your crutch, however, I am not.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 VII. READING AND WRITING.
 
 Of all that is written, I love only what a person hath written with his
 blood. Write with blood, and thou wilt find that blood is spirit.
 
 It is no easy task to understand unfamiliar blood; I hate the reading
 idlers.
 
 He who knoweth the reader, doeth nothing more for the reader. Another
 century of readers--and spirit itself will stink.
 
 Every one being allowed to learn to read, ruineth in the long run not
 only writing but also thinking.
 
 Once spirit was God, then it became man, and now it even becometh
 populace.
 
 He that writeth in blood and proverbs doth not want to be read, but
 learnt by heart.
 
 In the mountains the shortest way is from peak to peak, but for that
 route thou must have long legs. Proverbs should be peaks, and those
 spoken to should be big and tall.
 
 The atmosphere rare and pure, danger near and the spirit full of a
 joyful wickedness: thus are things well matched.
 
 I want to have goblins about me, for I am courageous. The courage which
 scareth away ghosts, createth for itself goblins--it wanteth to laugh.
 
 I no longer feel in common with you; the very cloud which I see
 beneath me, the blackness and heaviness at which I laugh--that is your
 thunder-cloud.
 
 Ye look aloft when ye long for exaltation; and I look downward because I
 am exalted.
 
 Who among you can at the same time laugh and be exalted?
 
 He who climbeth on the highest mountains, laugheth at all tragic plays
 and tragic realities.
 
 Courageous, unconcerned, scornful, coercive--so wisdom wisheth us; she
 is a woman, and ever loveth only a warrior.
 
 Ye tell me, "Life is hard to bear." But for what purpose should ye have
 your pride in the morning and your resignation in the evening?
 
 Life is hard to bear: but do not affect to be so delicate! We are all of
 us fine sumpter asses and assesses.
 
 What have we in common with the rose-bud, which trembleth because a drop
 of dew hath formed upon it?
 
 It is true we love life; not because we are wont to live, but because we
 are wont to love.
 
 There is always some madness in love. But there is always, also, some
 method in madness.
 
 And to me also, who appreciate life, the butterflies, and soap-bubbles,
 and whatever is like them amongst us, seem most to enjoy happiness.
 
 To see these light, foolish, pretty, lively little sprites flit
 about--that moveth Zarathustra to tears and songs.
 
 I should only believe in a God that would know how to dance.
 
 And when I saw my devil, I found him serious, thorough, profound,
 solemn: he was the spirit of gravity--through him all things fall.
 
 Not by wrath, but by laughter, do we slay. Come, let us slay the spirit
 of gravity!
 
 I learned to walk; since then have I let myself run. I learned to fly;
 since then I do not need pushing in order to move from a spot.
 
 Now am I light, now do I fly; now do I see myself under myself. Now
 there danceth a God in me.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 VIII. THE TREE ON THE HILL.
 
 Zarathustra's eye had perceived that a certain youth avoided him. And as
 he walked alone one evening over the hills surrounding the town called
 "The Pied Cow," behold, there found he the youth sitting leaning against
 a tree, and gazing with wearied look into the valley. Zarathustra
 thereupon laid hold of the tree beside which the youth sat, and spake
 thus:
 
 "If I wished to shake this tree with my hands, I should not be able to
 do so.
 
 But the wind, which we see not, troubleth and bendeth it as it listeth.
 We are sorest bent and troubled by invisible hands."
 
 Thereupon the youth arose disconcerted, and said: "I hear Zarathustra,
 and just now was I thinking of him!" Zarathustra answered:
 
 "Why art thou frightened on that account?--But it is the same with man
 as with the tree.
 
 The more he seeketh to rise into the height and light, the more
 vigorously do his roots struggle earthward, downward, into the dark and
 deep--into the evil."
 
 "Yea, into the evil!" cried the youth. "How is it possible that thou
 hast discovered my soul?"
 
 Zarathustra smiled, and said: "Many a soul one will never discover,
 unless one first invent it."
 
 "Yea, into the evil!" cried the youth once more.
 
 "Thou saidst the truth, Zarathustra. I trust myself no longer since I
 sought to rise into the height, and nobody trusteth me any longer; how
 doth that happen?
 
 I change too quickly: my to-day refuteth my yesterday. I often overleap
 the steps when I clamber; for so doing, none of the steps pardons me.
 
 When aloft, I find myself always alone. No one speaketh unto me; the
 frost of solitude maketh me tremble. What do I seek on the height?
 
 My contempt and my longing increase together; the higher I clamber, the
 more do I despise him who clambereth. What doth he seek on the height?
 
 How ashamed I am of my clambering and stumbling! How I mock at my
 violent panting! How I hate him who flieth! How tired I am on the
 height!"
 
 Here the youth was silent. And Zarathustra contemplated the tree beside
 which they stood, and spake thus:
 
 "This tree standeth lonely here on the hills; it hath grown up high
 above man and beast.
 
 And if it wanted to speak, it would have none who could understand it:
 so high hath it grown.
 
 Now it waiteth and waiteth,--for what doth it wait? It dwelleth too
 close to the seat of the clouds; it waiteth perhaps for the first
 lightning?"
 
 When Zarathustra had said this, the youth called out with violent
 gestures: "Yea, Zarathustra, thou speakest the truth. My destruction
 I longed for, when I desired to be on the height, and thou art the
 lightning for which I waited! Lo! what have I been since thou hast
 appeared amongst us? It is mine envy of thee that hath destroyed
 me!"--Thus spake the youth, and wept bitterly. Zarathustra, however, put
 his arm about him, and led the youth away with him.
 
 And when they had walked a while together, Zarathustra began to speak
 thus:
 
 It rendeth my heart. Better than thy words express it, thine eyes tell
 me all thy danger.
 
 As yet thou art not free; thou still SEEKEST freedom. Too unslept hath
 thy seeking made thee, and too wakeful.
 
 On the open height wouldst thou be; for the stars thirsteth thy soul.
 But thy bad impulses also thirst for freedom.
 
 Thy wild dogs want liberty; they bark for joy in their cellar when thy
 spirit endeavoureth to open all prison doors.
 
 Still art thou a prisoner--it seemeth to me--who deviseth liberty
 for himself: ah! sharp becometh the soul of such prisoners, but also
 deceitful and wicked.
 
 To purify himself, is still necessary for the freedman of the spirit.
 Much of the prison and the mould still remaineth in him: pure hath his
 eye still to become.
 
 Yea, I know thy danger. But by my love and hope I conjure thee: cast not
 thy love and hope away!
 
 Noble thou feelest thyself still, and noble others also feel thee still,
 though they bear thee a grudge and cast evil looks. Know this, that to
 everybody a noble one standeth in the way.
 
 Also to the good, a noble one standeth in the way: and even when they
 call him a good man, they want thereby to put him aside.
 
 The new, would the noble man create, and a new virtue. The old, wanteth
 the good man, and that the old should be conserved.
 
 But it is not the danger of the noble man to turn a good man, but lest
 he should become a blusterer, a scoffer, or a destroyer.
 
 Ah! I have known noble ones who lost their highest hope. And then they
 disparaged all high hopes.
 
 Then lived they shamelessly in temporary pleasures, and beyond the day
 had hardly an aim.
 
 "Spirit is also voluptuousness,"--said they. Then broke the wings of
 their spirit; and now it creepeth about, and defileth where it gnaweth.
 
 Once they thought of becoming heroes; but sensualists are they now. A
 trouble and a terror is the hero to them.
 
 But by my love and hope I conjure thee: cast not away the hero in thy
 soul! Maintain holy thy highest hope!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 IX. THE PREACHERS OF DEATH.
 
 There are preachers of death: and the earth is full of those to whom
 desistance from life must be preached.
 
 Full is the earth of the superfluous; marred is life by the
 many-too-many. May they be decoyed out of this life by the "life
 eternal"!
 
 "The yellow ones": so are called the preachers of death, or "the black
 ones." But I will show them unto you in other colours besides.
 
 There are the terrible ones who carry about in themselves the beast of
 prey, and have no choice except lusts or self-laceration. And even their
 lusts are self-laceration.
 
 They have not yet become men, those terrible ones: may they preach
 desistance from life, and pass away themselves!
 
 There are the spiritually consumptive ones: hardly are they born when
 they begin to die, and long for doctrines of lassitude and renunciation.
 
 They would fain be dead, and we should approve of their wish! Let
 us beware of awakening those dead ones, and of damaging those living
 coffins!
 
 They meet an invalid, or an old man, or a corpse--and immediately they
 say: "Life is refuted!"
 
 But they only are refuted, and their eye, which seeth only one aspect of
 existence.
 
 Shrouded in thick melancholy, and eager for the little casualties that
 bring death: thus do they wait, and clench their teeth.
 
 Or else, they grasp at sweetmeats, and mock at their childishness
 thereby: they cling to their straw of life, and mock at their still
 clinging to it.
 
 Their wisdom speaketh thus: "A fool, he who remaineth alive; but so far
 are we fools! And that is the foolishest thing in life!"
 
 "Life is only suffering": so say others, and lie not. Then see to it
 that YE cease! See to it that the life ceaseth which is only suffering!
 
 And let this be the teaching of your virtue: "Thou shalt slay thyself!
 Thou shalt steal away from thyself!"--
 
 "Lust is sin,"--so say some who preach death--"let us go apart and beget
 no children!"
 
 "Giving birth is troublesome,"--say others--"why still give birth? One
 beareth only the unfortunate!" And they also are preachers of death.
 
 "Pity is necessary,"--so saith a third party. "Take what I have! Take
 what I am! So much less doth life bind me!"
 
 Were they consistently pitiful, then would they make their neighbours
 sick of life. To be wicked--that would be their true goodness.
 
 But they want to be rid of life; what care they if they bind others
 still faster with their chains and gifts!--
 
 And ye also, to whom life is rough labour and disquiet, are ye not very
 tired of life? Are ye not very ripe for the sermon of death?
 
 All ye to whom rough labour is dear, and the rapid, new, and strange--ye
 put up with yourselves badly; your diligence is flight, and the will to
 self-forgetfulness.
 
 If ye believed more in life, then would ye devote yourselves less to the
 momentary. But for waiting, ye have not enough of capacity in you--nor
 even for idling!
 
 Everywhere resoundeth the voices of those who preach death; and the
 earth is full of those to whom death hath to be preached.
 
 Or "life eternal"; it is all the same to me--if only they pass away
 quickly!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 X. WAR AND WARRIORS.
 
 By our best enemies we do not want to be spared, nor by those either
 whom we love from the very heart. So let me tell you the truth!
 
 My brethren in war! I love you from the very heart. I am, and was ever,
 your counterpart. And I am also your best enemy. So let me tell you the
 truth!
 
 I know the hatred and envy of your hearts. Ye are not great enough not
 to know of hatred and envy. Then be great enough not to be ashamed of
 them!
 
 And if ye cannot be saints of knowledge, then, I pray you, be at least
 its warriors. They are the companions and forerunners of such saintship.
 
 I see many soldiers; could I but see many warriors! "Uniform" one
 calleth what they wear; may it not be uniform what they therewith hide!
 
 Ye shall be those whose eyes ever seek for an enemy--for YOUR enemy. And
 with some of you there is hatred at first sight.
 
 Your enemy shall ye seek; your war shall ye wage, and for the sake of
 your thoughts! And if your thoughts succumb, your uprightness shall
 still shout triumph thereby!
 
 Ye shall love peace as a means to new wars--and the short peace more
 than the long.
 
 You I advise not to work, but to fight. You I advise not to peace, but
 to victory. Let your work be a fight, let your peace be a victory!
 
 One can only be silent and sit peacefully when one hath arrow and bow;
 otherwise one prateth and quarrelleth. Let your peace be a victory!
 
 Ye say it is the good cause which halloweth even war? I say unto you: it
 is the good war which halloweth every cause.
 
 War and courage have done more great things than charity. Not your
 sympathy, but your bravery hath hitherto saved the victims.
 
 "What is good?" ye ask. To be brave is good. Let the little girls say:
 "To be good is what is pretty, and at the same time touching."
 
 They call you heartless: but your heart is true, and I love the
 bashfulness of your goodwill. Ye are ashamed of your flow, and others
 are ashamed of their ebb.
 
 Ye are ugly? Well then, my brethren, take the sublime about you, the
 mantle of the ugly!
 
 And when your soul becometh great, then doth it become haughty, and in
 your sublimity there is wickedness. I know you.
 
 In wickedness the haughty man and the weakling meet. But they
 misunderstand one another. I know you.
 
 Ye shall only have enemies to be hated, but not enemies to be despised.
 Ye must be proud of your enemies; then, the successes of your enemies
 are also your successes.
 
 Resistance--that is the distinction of the slave. Let your distinction
 be obedience. Let your commanding itself be obeying!
 
 To the good warrior soundeth "thou shalt" pleasanter than "I will." And
 all that is dear unto you, ye shall first have it commanded unto you.
 
 Let your love to life be love to your highest hope; and let your highest
 hope be the highest thought of life!
 
 Your highest thought, however, ye shall have it commanded unto you by
 me--and it is this: man is something that is to be surpassed.
 
 So live your life of obedience and of war! What matter about long life!
 What warrior wisheth to be spared!
 
 I spare you not, I love you from my very heart, my brethren in war!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XI. THE NEW IDOL.
 
 Somewhere there are still peoples and herds, but not with us, my
 brethren: here there are states.
 
 A state? What is that? Well! open now your ears unto me, for now will I
 say unto you my word concerning the death of peoples.
 
 A state, is called the coldest of all cold monsters. Coldly lieth
 it also; and this lie creepeth from its mouth: "I, the state, am the
 people."
 
 It is a lie! Creators were they who created peoples, and hung a faith
 and a love over them: thus they served life.
 
 Destroyers, are they who lay snares for many, and call it the state:
 they hang a sword and a hundred cravings over them.
 
 Where there is still a people, there the state is not understood, but
 hated as the evil eye, and as sin against laws and customs.
 
 This sign I give unto you: every people speaketh its language of good
 and evil: this its neighbour understandeth not. Its language hath it
 devised for itself in laws and customs.
 
 But the state lieth in all languages of good and evil; and whatever it
 saith it lieth; and whatever it hath it hath stolen.
 
 False is everything in it; with stolen teeth it biteth, the biting one.
 False are even its bowels.
 
 Confusion of language of good and evil; this sign I give unto you as
 the sign of the state. Verily, the will to death, indicateth this sign!
 Verily, it beckoneth unto the preachers of death!
 
 Many too many are born: for the superfluous ones was the state devised!
 
 See just how it enticeth them to it, the many-too-many! How it
 swalloweth and cheweth and recheweth them!
 
 "On earth there is nothing greater than I: it is I who am the regulating
 finger of God"--thus roareth the monster. And not only the long-eared
 and short-sighted fall upon their knees!
 
 Ah! even in your ears, ye great souls, it whispereth its gloomy lies!
 Ah! it findeth out the rich hearts which willingly lavish themselves!
 
 Yea, it findeth you out too, ye conquerors of the old God! Weary ye
 became of the conflict, and now your weariness serveth the new idol!
 
 Heroes and honourable ones, it would fain set up around it, the new
 idol! Gladly it basketh in the sunshine of good consciences,--the cold
 monster!
 
 Everything will it give YOU, if YE worship it, the new idol: thus it
 purchaseth the lustre of your virtue, and the glance of your proud eyes.
 
 It seeketh to allure by means of you, the many-too-many! Yea, a hellish
 artifice hath here been devised, a death-horse jingling with the
 trappings of divine honours!
 
 Yea, a dying for many hath here been devised, which glorifieth itself as
 life: verily, a hearty service unto all preachers of death!
 
 The state, I call it, where all are poison-drinkers, the good and the
 bad: the state, where all lose themselves, the good and the bad: the
 state, where the slow suicide of all--is called "life."
 
 Just see these superfluous ones! They steal the works of the inventors
 and the treasures of the wise. Culture, they call their theft--and
 everything becometh sickness and trouble unto them!
 
 Just see these superfluous ones! Sick are they always; they vomit their
 bile and call it a newspaper. They devour one another, and cannot even
 digest themselves.
 
 Just see these superfluous ones! Wealth they acquire and become poorer
 thereby. Power they seek for, and above all, the lever of power, much
 money--these impotent ones!
 
 See them clamber, these nimble apes! They clamber over one another, and
 thus scuffle into the mud and the abyss.
 
 Towards the throne they all strive: it is their madness--as if happiness
 sat on the throne! Ofttimes sitteth filth on the throne.--and ofttimes
 also the throne on filth.
 
 Madmen they all seem to me, and clambering apes, and too eager. Badly
 smelleth their idol to me, the cold monster: badly they all smell to me,
 these idolaters.
 
 My brethren, will ye suffocate in the fumes of their maws and appetites!
 Better break the windows and jump into the open air!
 
 Do go out of the way of the bad odour! Withdraw from the idolatry of the
 superfluous!
 
 Do go out of the way of the bad odour! Withdraw from the steam of these
 human sacrifices!
 
 Open still remaineth the earth for great souls. Empty are still many
 sites for lone ones and twain ones, around which floateth the odour of
 tranquil seas.
 
 Open still remaineth a free life for great souls. Verily, he who
 possesseth little is so much the less possessed: blessed be moderate
 poverty!
 
 There, where the state ceaseth--there only commenceth the man who is not
 superfluous: there commenceth the song of the necessary ones, the single
 and irreplaceable melody.
 
 There, where the state CEASETH--pray look thither, my brethren! Do ye
 not see it, the rainbow and the bridges of the Superman?--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XII. THE FLIES IN THE MARKET-PLACE.
 
 Flee, my friend, into thy solitude! I see thee deafened with the noise
 of the great men, and stung all over with the stings of the little ones.
 
 Admirably do forest and rock know how to be silent with thee. Resemble
 again the tree which thou lovest, the broad-branched one--silently and
 attentively it o'erhangeth the sea.
 
 Where solitude endeth, there beginneth the market-place; and where the
 market-place beginneth, there beginneth also the noise of the great
 actors, and the buzzing of the poison-flies.
 
 In the world even the best things are worthless without those who
 represent them: those representers, the people call great men.
 
 Little do the people understand what is great--that is to say, the
 creating agency. But they have a taste for all representers and actors
 of great things.
 
 Around the devisers of new values revolveth the world:--invisibly it
 revolveth. But around the actors revolve the people and the glory: such
 is the course of things.
 
 Spirit, hath the actor, but little conscience of the spirit. He
 believeth always in that wherewith he maketh believe most strongly--in
 HIMSELF!
 
 Tomorrow he hath a new belief, and the day after, one still newer. Sharp
 perceptions hath he, like the people, and changeable humours.
 
 To upset--that meaneth with him to prove. To drive mad--that meaneth
 with him to convince. And blood is counted by him as the best of all
 arguments.
 
 A truth which only glideth into fine ears, he calleth falsehood and
 trumpery. Verily, he believeth only in Gods that make a great noise in
 the world!
 
 Full of clattering buffoons is the market-place,--and the people glory
 in their great men! These are for them the masters of the hour.
 
 But the hour presseth them; so they press thee. And also from thee
 they want Yea or Nay. Alas! thou wouldst set thy chair betwixt For and
 Against?
 
 On account of those absolute and impatient ones, be not jealous, thou
 lover of truth! Never yet did truth cling to the arm of an absolute one.
 
 On account of those abrupt ones, return into thy security: only in the
 market-place is one assailed by Yea? or Nay?
 
 Slow is the experience of all deep fountains: long have they to wait
 until they know WHAT hath fallen into their depths.
 
 Away from the market-place and from fame taketh place all that is great:
 away from the market-Place and from fame have ever dwelt the devisers of
 new values.
 
 Flee, my friend, into thy solitude: I see thee stung all over by the
 poisonous flies. Flee thither, where a rough, strong breeze bloweth!
 
 Flee into thy solitude! Thou hast lived too closely to the small and the
 pitiable. Flee from their invisible vengeance! Towards thee they have
 nothing but vengeance.
 
 Raise no longer an arm against them! Innumerable are they, and it is not
 thy lot to be a fly-flap.
 
 Innumerable are the small and pitiable ones; and of many a proud
 structure, rain-drops and weeds have been the ruin.
 
 Thou art not stone; but already hast thou become hollow by the numerous
 drops. Thou wilt yet break and burst by the numerous drops.
 
 Exhausted I see thee, by poisonous flies; bleeding I see thee, and torn
 at a hundred spots; and thy pride will not even upbraid.
 
 Blood they would have from thee in all innocence; blood their bloodless
 souls crave for--and they sting, therefore, in all innocence.
 
 But thou, profound one, thou sufferest too profoundly even from small
 wounds; and ere thou hadst recovered, the same poison-worm crawled over
 thy hand.
 
 Too proud art thou to kill these sweet-tooths. But take care lest it be
 thy fate to suffer all their poisonous injustice!
 
 They buzz around thee also with their praise: obtrusiveness, is their
 praise. They want to be close to thy skin and thy blood.
 
 They flatter thee, as one flattereth a God or devil; they whimper before
 thee, as before a God or devil. What doth it come to! Flatterers are
 they, and whimperers, and nothing more.
 
 Often, also, do they show themselves to thee as amiable ones. But that
 hath ever been the prudence of the cowardly. Yea! the cowardly are wise!
 
 They think much about thee with their circumscribed souls--thou art
 always suspected by them! Whatever is much thought about is at last
 thought suspicious.
 
 They punish thee for all thy virtues. They pardon thee in their inmost
 hearts only--for thine errors.
 
 Because thou art gentle and of upright character, thou sayest:
 "Blameless are they for their small existence." But their circumscribed
 souls think: "Blamable is all great existence."
 
 Even when thou art gentle towards them, they still feel themselves
 despised by thee; and they repay thy beneficence with secret
 maleficence.
 
 Thy silent pride is always counter to their taste; they rejoice if once
 thou be humble enough to be frivolous.
 
 What we recognise in a man, we also irritate in him. Therefore be on
 your guard against the small ones!
 
 In thy presence they feel themselves small, and their baseness gleameth
 and gloweth against thee in invisible vengeance.
 
 Sawest thou not how often they became dumb when thou approachedst them,
 and how their energy left them like the smoke of an extinguishing fire?
 
 Yea, my friend, the bad conscience art thou of thy neighbours; for they
 are unworthy of thee. Therefore they hate thee, and would fain suck thy
 blood.
 
 Thy neighbours will always be poisonous flies; what is great in
 thee--that itself must make them more poisonous, and always more
 fly-like.
 
 Flee, my friend, into thy solitude--and thither, where a rough strong
 breeze bloweth. It is not thy lot to be a fly-flap.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XIII. CHASTITY.
 
 I love the forest. It is bad to live in cities: there, there are too
 many of the lustful.
 
 Is it not better to fall into the hands of a murderer, than into the
 dreams of a lustful woman?
 
 And just look at these men: their eye saith it--they know nothing better
 on earth than to lie with a woman.
 
 Filth is at the bottom of their souls; and alas! if their filth hath
 still spirit in it!
 
 Would that ye were perfect--at least as animals! But to animals
 belongeth innocence.
 
 Do I counsel you to slay your instincts? I counsel you to innocence in
 your instincts.
 
 Do I counsel you to chastity? Chastity is a virtue with some, but with
 many almost a vice.
 
 These are continent, to be sure: but doggish lust looketh enviously out
 of all that they do.
 
 Even into the heights of their virtue and into their cold spirit doth
 this creature follow them, with its discord.
 
 And how nicely can doggish lust beg for a piece of spirit, when a piece
 of flesh is denied it!
 
 Ye love tragedies and all that breaketh the heart? But I am distrustful
 of your doggish lust.
 
 Ye have too cruel eyes, and ye look wantonly towards the sufferers.
 Hath not your lust just disguised itself and taken the name of
 fellow-suffering?
 
 And also this parable give I unto you: Not a few who meant to cast out
 their devil, went thereby into the swine themselves.
 
 To whom chastity is difficult, it is to be dissuaded: lest it become the
 road to hell--to filth and lust of soul.
 
 Do I speak of filthy things? That is not the worst thing for me to do.
 
 Not when the truth is filthy, but when it is shallow, doth the
 discerning one go unwillingly into its waters.
 
 Verily, there are chaste ones from their very nature; they are gentler
 of heart, and laugh better and oftener than you.
 
 They laugh also at chastity, and ask: "What is chastity?
 
 Is chastity not folly? But the folly came unto us, and not we unto it.
 
 We offered that guest harbour and heart: now it dwelleth with us--let it
 stay as long as it will!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XIV. THE FRIEND.
 
 "One, is always too many about me"--thinketh the anchorite. "Always once
 one--that maketh two in the long run!"
 
 I and me are always too earnestly in conversation: how could it be
 endured, if there were not a friend?
 
 The friend of the anchorite is always the third one: the third one is
 the cork which preventeth the conversation of the two sinking into the
 depth.
 
 Ah! there are too many depths for all anchorites. Therefore, do they
 long so much for a friend, and for his elevation.
 
 Our faith in others betrayeth wherein we would fain have faith in
 ourselves. Our longing for a friend is our betrayer.
 
 And often with our love we want merely to overleap envy. And often we
 attack and make ourselves enemies, to conceal that we are vulnerable.
 
 "Be at least mine enemy!"--thus speaketh the true reverence, which doth
 not venture to solicit friendship.
 
 If one would have a friend, then must one also be willing to wage war
 for him: and in order to wage war, one must be CAPABLE of being an
 enemy.
 
 One ought still to honour the enemy in one's friend. Canst thou go nigh
 unto thy friend, and not go over to him?
 
 In one's friend one shall have one's best enemy. Thou shalt be closest
 unto him with thy heart when thou withstandest him.
 
 Thou wouldst wear no raiment before thy friend? It is in honour of thy
 friend that thou showest thyself to him as thou art? But he wisheth thee
 to the devil on that account!
 
 He who maketh no secret of himself shocketh: so much reason have ye
 to fear nakedness! Aye, if ye were Gods, ye could then be ashamed of
 clothing!
 
 Thou canst not adorn thyself fine enough for thy friend; for thou shalt
 be unto him an arrow and a longing for the Superman.
 
 Sawest thou ever thy friend asleep--to know how he looketh? What is
 usually the countenance of thy friend? It is thine own countenance, in a
 coarse and imperfect mirror.
 
 Sawest thou ever thy friend asleep? Wert thou not dismayed at thy friend
 looking so? O my friend, man is something that hath to be surpassed.
 
 In divining and keeping silence shall the friend be a master: not
 everything must thou wish to see. Thy dream shall disclose unto thee
 what thy friend doeth when awake.
 
 Let thy pity be a divining: to know first if thy friend wanteth pity.
 Perhaps he loveth in thee the unmoved eye, and the look of eternity.
 
 Let thy pity for thy friend be hid under a hard shell; thou shalt bite
 out a tooth upon it. Thus will it have delicacy and sweetness.
 
 Art thou pure air and solitude and bread and medicine to thy friend?
 Many a one cannot loosen his own fetters, but is nevertheless his
 friend's emancipator.
 
 Art thou a slave? Then thou canst not be a friend. Art thou a tyrant?
 Then thou canst not have friends.
 
 Far too long hath there been a slave and a tyrant concealed in woman.
 On that account woman is not yet capable of friendship: she knoweth only
 love.
 
 In woman's love there is injustice and blindness to all she doth not
 love. And even in woman's conscious love, there is still always surprise
 and lightning and night, along with the light.
 
 As yet woman is not capable of friendship: women are still cats, and
 birds. Or at the best, cows.
 
 As yet woman is not capable of friendship. But tell me, ye men, who of
 you are capable of friendship?
 
 Oh! your poverty, ye men, and your sordidness of soul! As much as ye
 give to your friend, will I give even to my foe, and will not have
 become poorer thereby.
 
 There is comradeship: may there be friendship!
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XV. THE THOUSAND AND ONE GOALS.
 
 Many lands saw Zarathustra, and many peoples: thus he discovered the
 good and bad of many peoples. No greater power did Zarathustra find on
 earth than good and bad.
 
 No people could live without first valuing; if a people will maintain
 itself, however, it must not value as its neighbour valueth.
 
 Much that passed for good with one people was regarded with scorn and
 contempt by another: thus I found it. Much found I here called bad,
 which was there decked with purple honours.
 
 Never did the one neighbour understand the other: ever did his soul
 marvel at his neighbour's delusion and wickedness.
 
 A table of excellencies hangeth over every people. Lo! it is the table
 of their triumphs; lo! it is the voice of their Will to Power.
 
 It is laudable, what they think hard; what is indispensable and hard
 they call good; and what relieveth in the direst distress, the unique
 and hardest of all,--they extol as holy.
 
 Whatever maketh them rule and conquer and shine, to the dismay and envy
 of their neighbours, they regard as the high and foremost thing, the
 test and the meaning of all else.
 
 Verily, my brother, if thou knewest but a people's need, its land,
 its sky, and its neighbour, then wouldst thou divine the law of its
 surmountings, and why it climbeth up that ladder to its hope.
 
 "Always shalt thou be the foremost and prominent above others: no one
 shall thy jealous soul love, except a friend"--that made the soul of a
 Greek thrill: thereby went he his way to greatness.
 
 "To speak truth, and be skilful with bow and arrow"--so seemed it alike
 pleasing and hard to the people from whom cometh my name--the name which
 is alike pleasing and hard to me.
 
 "To honour father and mother, and from the root of the soul to do their
 will"--this table of surmounting hung another people over them, and
 became powerful and permanent thereby.
 
 "To have fidelity, and for the sake of fidelity to risk honour and
 blood, even in evil and dangerous courses"--teaching itself so, another
 people mastered itself, and thus mastering itself, became pregnant and
 heavy with great hopes.
 
 Verily, men have given unto themselves all their good and bad. Verily,
 they took it not, they found it not, it came not unto them as a voice
 from heaven.
 
 Values did man only assign to things in order to maintain himself--he
 created only the significance of things, a human significance!
 Therefore, calleth he himself "man," that is, the valuator.
 
 Valuing is creating: hear it, ye creating ones! Valuation itself is the
 treasure and jewel of the valued things.
 
 Through valuation only is there value; and without valuation the nut of
 existence would be hollow. Hear it, ye creating ones!
 
 Change of values--that is, change of the creating ones. Always doth he
 destroy who hath to be a creator.
 
 Creating ones were first of all peoples, and only in late times
 individuals; verily, the individual himself is still the latest
 creation.
 
 Peoples once hung over them tables of the good. Love which would rule
 and love which would obey, created for themselves such tables.
 
 Older is the pleasure in the herd than the pleasure in the ego: and as
 long as the good conscience is for the herd, the bad conscience only
 saith: ego.
 
 Verily, the crafty ego, the loveless one, that seeketh its advantage in
 the advantage of many--it is not the origin of the herd, but its ruin.
 
 Loving ones, was it always, and creating ones, that created good and
 bad. Fire of love gloweth in the names of all the virtues, and fire of
 wrath.
 
 Many lands saw Zarathustra, and many peoples: no greater power did
 Zarathustra find on earth than the creations of the loving ones--"good"
 and "bad" are they called.
 
 Verily, a prodigy is this power of praising and blaming. Tell me, ye
 brethren, who will master it for me? Who will put a fetter upon the
 thousand necks of this animal?
 
 A thousand goals have there been hitherto, for a thousand peoples have
 there been. Only the fetter for the thousand necks is still lacking;
 there is lacking the one goal. As yet humanity hath not a goal.
 
 But pray tell me, my brethren, if the goal of humanity be still lacking,
 is there not also still lacking--humanity itself?--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XVI. NEIGHBOUR-LOVE.
 
 Ye crowd around your neighbour, and have fine words for it. But I say
 unto you: your neighbour-love is your bad love of yourselves.
 
 Ye flee unto your neighbour from yourselves, and would fain make a
 virtue thereof: but I fathom your "unselfishness."
 
 The THOU is older than the _I_; the THOU hath been consecrated, but not
 yet the _I_: so man presseth nigh unto his neighbour.
 
 Do I advise you to neighbour-love? Rather do I advise you to
 neighbour-flight and to furthest love!
 
 Higher than love to your neighbour is love to the furthest and future
 ones; higher still than love to men, is love to things and phantoms.
 
 The phantom that runneth on before thee, my brother, is fairer than
 thou; why dost thou not give unto it thy flesh and thy bones? But thou
 fearest, and runnest unto thy neighbour.
 
 Ye cannot endure it with yourselves, and do not love yourselves
 sufficiently: so ye seek to mislead your neighbour into love, and would
 fain gild yourselves with his error.
 
 Would that ye could not endure it with any kind of near ones, or their
 neighbours; then would ye have to create your friend and his overflowing
 heart out of yourselves.
 
 Ye call in a witness when ye want to speak well of yourselves; and
 when ye have misled him to think well of you, ye also think well of
 yourselves.
 
 Not only doth he lie, who speaketh contrary to his knowledge, but more
 so, he who speaketh contrary to his ignorance. And thus speak ye
 of yourselves in your intercourse, and belie your neighbour with
 yourselves.
 
 Thus saith the fool: "Association with men spoileth the character,
 especially when one hath none."
 
 The one goeth to his neighbour because he seeketh himself, and the other
 because he would fain lose himself. Your bad love to yourselves maketh
 solitude a prison to you.
 
 The furthest ones are they who pay for your love to the near ones; and
 when there are but five of you together, a sixth must always die.
 
 I love not your festivals either: too many actors found I there, and
 even the spectators often behaved like actors.
 
 Not the neighbour do I teach you, but the friend. Let the friend be the
 festival of the earth to you, and a foretaste of the Superman.
 
 I teach you the friend and his overflowing heart. But one must know how
 to be a sponge, if one would be loved by overflowing hearts.
 
 I teach you the friend in whom the world standeth complete, a capsule
 of the good,--the creating friend, who hath always a complete world to
 bestow.
 
 And as the world unrolled itself for him, so rolleth it together again
 for him in rings, as the growth of good through evil, as the growth of
 purpose out of chance.
 
 Let the future and the furthest be the motive of thy to-day; in thy
 friend shalt thou love the Superman as thy motive.
 
 My brethren, I advise you not to neighbour-love--I advise you to
 furthest love!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XVII. THE WAY OF THE CREATING ONE.
 
 Wouldst thou go into isolation, my brother? Wouldst thou seek the way
 unto thyself? Tarry yet a little and hearken unto me.
 
 "He who seeketh may easily get lost himself. All isolation is wrong": so
 say the herd. And long didst thou belong to the herd.
 
 The voice of the herd will still echo in thee. And when thou sayest,
 "I have no longer a conscience in common with you," then will it be a
 plaint and a pain.
 
 Lo, that pain itself did the same conscience produce; and the last gleam
 of that conscience still gloweth on thine affliction.
 
 But thou wouldst go the way of thine affliction, which is the way unto
 thyself? Then show me thine authority and thy strength to do so!
 
 Art thou a new strength and a new authority? A first motion? A
 self-rolling wheel? Canst thou also compel stars to revolve around thee?
 
 Alas! there is so much lusting for loftiness! There are so many
 convulsions of the ambitions! Show me that thou art not a lusting and
 ambitious one!
 
 Alas! there are so many great thoughts that do nothing more than the
 bellows: they inflate, and make emptier than ever.
 
 Free, dost thou call thyself? Thy ruling thought would I hear of, and
 not that thou hast escaped from a yoke.
 
 Art thou one ENTITLED to escape from a yoke? Many a one hath cast away
 his final worth when he hath cast away his servitude.
 
 Free from what? What doth that matter to Zarathustra! Clearly, however,
 shall thine eye show unto me: free FOR WHAT?
 
 Canst thou give unto thyself thy bad and thy good, and set up thy will
 as a law over thee? Canst thou be judge for thyself, and avenger of thy
 law?
 
 Terrible is aloneness with the judge and avenger of one's own law.
 Thus is a star projected into desert space, and into the icy breath of
 aloneness.
 
 To-day sufferest thou still from the multitude, thou individual; to-day
 hast thou still thy courage unabated, and thy hopes.
 
 But one day will the solitude weary thee; one day will thy pride yield,
 and thy courage quail. Thou wilt one day cry: "I am alone!"
 
 One day wilt thou see no longer thy loftiness, and see too closely thy
 lowliness; thy sublimity itself will frighten thee as a phantom. Thou
 wilt one day cry: "All is false!"
 
 There are feelings which seek to slay the lonesome one; if they do not
 succeed, then must they themselves die! But art thou capable of it--to
 be a murderer?
 
 Hast thou ever known, my brother, the word "disdain"? And the anguish of
 thy justice in being just to those that disdain thee?
 
 Thou forcest many to think differently about thee; that, charge they
 heavily to thine account. Thou camest nigh unto them, and yet wentest
 past: for that they never forgive thee.
 
 Thou goest beyond them: but the higher thou risest, the smaller doth the
 eye of envy see thee. Most of all, however, is the flying one hated.
 
 "How could ye be just unto me!"--must thou say--"I choose your injustice
 as my allotted portion."
 
 Injustice and filth cast they at the lonesome one: but, my brother, if
 thou wouldst be a star, thou must shine for them none the less on that
 account!
 
 And be on thy guard against the good and just! They would fain crucify
 those who devise their own virtue--they hate the lonesome ones.
 
 Be on thy guard, also, against holy simplicity! All is unholy to it that
 is not simple; fain, likewise, would it play with the fire--of the fagot
 and stake.
 
 And be on thy guard, also, against the assaults of thy love! Too readily
 doth the recluse reach his hand to any one who meeteth him.
 
 To many a one mayest thou not give thy hand, but only thy paw; and I
 wish thy paw also to have claws.
 
 But the worst enemy thou canst meet, wilt thou thyself always be; thou
 waylayest thyself in caverns and forests.
 
 Thou lonesome one, thou goest the way to thyself! And past thyself and
 thy seven devils leadeth thy way!
 
 A heretic wilt thou be to thyself, and a wizard and a sooth-sayer, and a
 fool, and a doubter, and a reprobate, and a villain.
 
 Ready must thou be to burn thyself in thine own flame; how couldst thou
 become new if thou have not first become ashes!
 
 Thou lonesome one, thou goest the way of the creating one: a God wilt
 thou create for thyself out of thy seven devils!
 
 Thou lonesome one, thou goest the way of the loving one: thou lovest
 thyself, and on that account despisest thou thyself, as only the loving
 ones despise.
 
 To create, desireth the loving one, because he despiseth! What knoweth
 he of love who hath not been obliged to despise just what he loved!
 
 With thy love, go into thine isolation, my brother, and with thy
 creating; and late only will justice limp after thee.
 
 With my tears, go into thine isolation, my brother. I love him who
 seeketh to create beyond himself, and thus succumbeth.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XVIII. OLD AND YOUNG WOMEN.
 
 "Why stealest thou along so furtively in the twilight, Zarathustra? And
 what hidest thou so carefully under thy mantle?
 
 Is it a treasure that hath been given thee? Or a child that hath been
 born thee? Or goest thou thyself on a thief's errand, thou friend of the
 evil?"--
 
 Verily, my brother, said Zarathustra, it is a treasure that hath been
 given me: it is a little truth which I carry.
 
 But it is naughty, like a young child; and if I hold not its mouth, it
 screameth too loudly.
 
 As I went on my way alone to-day, at the hour when the sun declineth,
 there met me an old woman, and she spake thus unto my soul:
 
 "Much hath Zarathustra spoken also to us women, but never spake he unto
 us concerning woman."
 
 And I answered her: "Concerning woman, one should only talk unto men."
 
 "Talk also unto me of woman," said she; "I am old enough to forget it
 presently."
 
 And I obliged the old woman and spake thus unto her:
 
 Everything in woman is a riddle, and everything in woman hath one
 solution--it is called pregnancy.
 
 Man is for woman a means: the purpose is always the child. But what is
 woman for man?
 
 Two different things wanteth the true man: danger and diversion.
 Therefore wanteth he woman, as the most dangerous plaything.
 
 Man shall be trained for war, and woman for the recreation of the
 warrior: all else is folly.
 
 Too sweet fruits--these the warrior liketh not. Therefore liketh he
 woman;--bitter is even the sweetest woman.
 
 Better than man doth woman understand children, but man is more childish
 than woman.
 
 In the true man there is a child hidden: it wanteth to play. Up then, ye
 women, and discover the child in man!
 
 A plaything let woman be, pure and fine like the precious stone,
 illumined with the virtues of a world not yet come.
 
 Let the beam of a star shine in your love! Let your hope say: "May I
 bear the Superman!"
 
 In your love let there be valour! With your love shall ye assail him who
 inspireth you with fear!
 
 In your love be your honour! Little doth woman understand otherwise
 about honour. But let this be your honour: always to love more than ye
 are loved, and never be the second.
 
 Let man fear woman when she loveth: then maketh she every sacrifice, and
 everything else she regardeth as worthless.
 
 Let man fear woman when she hateth: for man in his innermost soul is
 merely evil; woman, however, is mean.
 
 Whom hateth woman most?--Thus spake the iron to the loadstone: "I hate
 thee most, because thou attractest, but art too weak to draw unto thee."
 
 The happiness of man is, "I will." The happiness of woman is, "He will."
 
 "Lo! now hath the world become perfect!"--thus thinketh every woman when
 she obeyeth with all her love.
 
 Obey, must the woman, and find a depth for her surface. Surface, is
 woman's soul, a mobile, stormy film on shallow water.
 
 Man's soul, however, is deep, its current gusheth in subterranean
 caverns: woman surmiseth its force, but comprehendeth it not.--
 
 Then answered me the old woman: "Many fine things hath Zarathustra said,
 especially for those who are young enough for them.
 
 Strange! Zarathustra knoweth little about woman, and yet he is right
 about them! Doth this happen, because with women nothing is impossible?
 
 And now accept a little truth by way of thanks! I am old enough for it!
 
 Swaddle it up and hold its mouth: otherwise it will scream too loudly,
 the little truth."
 
 "Give me, woman, thy little truth!" said I. And thus spake the old
 woman:
 
 "Thou goest to women? Do not forget thy whip!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XIX. THE BITE OF THE ADDER.
 
 One day had Zarathustra fallen asleep under a fig-tree, owing to the
 heat, with his arms over his face. And there came an adder and bit him
 in the neck, so that Zarathustra screamed with pain. When he had
 taken his arm from his face he looked at the serpent; and then did it
 recognise the eyes of Zarathustra, wriggled awkwardly, and tried to get
 away. "Not at all," said Zarathustra, "as yet hast thou not received
 my thanks! Thou hast awakened me in time; my journey is yet long."
 "Thy journey is short," said the adder sadly; "my poison is fatal."
 Zarathustra smiled. "When did ever a dragon die of a serpent's
 poison?"--said he. "But take thy poison back! Thou art not rich enough
 to present it to me." Then fell the adder again on his neck, and licked
 his wound.
 
 When Zarathustra once told this to his disciples they asked him:
 "And what, O Zarathustra, is the moral of thy story?" And Zarathustra
 answered them thus:
 
 The destroyer of morality, the good and just call me: my story is
 immoral.
 
 When, however, ye have an enemy, then return him not good for evil: for
 that would abash him. But prove that he hath done something good to you.
 
 And rather be angry than abash any one! And when ye are cursed, it
 pleaseth me not that ye should then desire to bless. Rather curse a
 little also!
 
 And should a great injustice befall you, then do quickly five small ones
 besides. Hideous to behold is he on whom injustice presseth alone.
 
 Did ye ever know this? Shared injustice is half justice. And he who can
 bear it, shall take the injustice upon himself!
 
 A small revenge is humaner than no revenge at all. And if the punishment
 be not also a right and an honour to the transgressor, I do not like
 your punishing.
 
 Nobler is it to own oneself in the wrong than to establish one's right,
 especially if one be in the right. Only, one must be rich enough to do
 so.
 
 I do not like your cold justice; out of the eye of your judges there
 always glanceth the executioner and his cold steel.
 
 Tell me: where find we justice, which is love with seeing eyes?
 
 Devise me, then, the love which not only beareth all punishment, but
 also all guilt!
 
 Devise me, then, the justice which acquitteth every one except the
 judge!
 
 And would ye hear this likewise? To him who seeketh to be just from the
 heart, even the lie becometh philanthropy.
 
 But how could I be just from the heart! How can I give every one his
 own! Let this be enough for me: I give unto every one mine own.
 
 Finally, my brethren, guard against doing wrong to any anchorite. How
 could an anchorite forget! How could he requite!
 
 Like a deep well is an anchorite. Easy is it to throw in a stone: if
 it should sink to the bottom, however, tell me, who will bring it out
 again?
 
 Guard against injuring the anchorite! If ye have done so, however, well
 then, kill him also!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XX. CHILD AND MARRIAGE.
 
 I have a question for thee alone, my brother: like a sounding-lead, cast
 I this question into thy soul, that I may know its depth.
 
 Thou art young, and desirest child and marriage. But I ask thee: Art
 thou a man ENTITLED to desire a child?
 
 Art thou the victorious one, the self-conqueror, the ruler of thy
 passions, the master of thy virtues? Thus do I ask thee.
 
 Or doth the animal speak in thy wish, and necessity? Or isolation? Or
 discord in thee?
 
 I would have thy victory and freedom long for a child. Living monuments
 shalt thou build to thy victory and emancipation.
 
 Beyond thyself shalt thou build. But first of all must thou be built
 thyself, rectangular in body and soul.
 
 Not only onward shalt thou propagate thyself, but upward! For that
 purpose may the garden of marriage help thee!
 
 A higher body shalt thou create, a first movement, a spontaneously
 rolling wheel--a creating one shalt thou create.
 
 Marriage: so call I the will of the twain to create the one that is
 more than those who created it. The reverence for one another, as those
 exercising such a will, call I marriage.
 
 Let this be the significance and the truth of thy marriage. But that
 which the many-too-many call marriage, those superfluous ones--ah, what
 shall I call it?
 
 Ah, the poverty of soul in the twain! Ah, the filth of soul in the
 twain! Ah, the pitiable self-complacency in the twain!
 
 Marriage they call it all; and they say their marriages are made in
 heaven.
 
 Well, I do not like it, that heaven of the superfluous! No, I do not
 like them, those animals tangled in the heavenly toils!
 
 Far from me also be the God who limpeth thither to bless what he hath
 not matched!
 
 Laugh not at such marriages! What child hath not had reason to weep over
 its parents?
 
 Worthy did this man seem, and ripe for the meaning of the earth: but
 when I saw his wife, the earth seemed to me a home for madcaps.
 
 Yea, I would that the earth shook with convulsions when a saint and a
 goose mate with one another.
 
 This one went forth in quest of truth as a hero, and at last got for
 himself a small decked-up lie: his marriage he calleth it.
 
 That one was reserved in intercourse and chose choicely. But one time he
 spoilt his company for all time: his marriage he calleth it.
 
 Another sought a handmaid with the virtues of an angel. But all at once
 he became the handmaid of a woman, and now would he need also to become
 an angel.
 
 Careful, have I found all buyers, and all of them have astute eyes. But
 even the astutest of them buyeth his wife in a sack.
 
 Many short follies--that is called love by you. And your marriage
 putteth an end to many short follies, with one long stupidity.
 
 Your love to woman, and woman's love to man--ah, would that it were
 sympathy for suffering and veiled deities! But generally two animals
 alight on one another.
 
 But even your best love is only an enraptured simile and a painful
 ardour. It is a torch to light you to loftier paths.
 
 Beyond yourselves shall ye love some day! Then LEARN first of all to
 love. And on that account ye had to drink the bitter cup of your love.
 
 Bitterness is in the cup even of the best love: thus doth it cause
 longing for the Superman; thus doth it cause thirst in thee, the
 creating one!
 
 Thirst in the creating one, arrow and longing for the Superman: tell me,
 my brother, is this thy will to marriage?
 
 Holy call I such a will, and such a marriage.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXI. VOLUNTARY DEATH.
 
 Many die too late, and some die too early. Yet strange soundeth the
 precept: "Die at the right time!
 
 Die at the right time: so teacheth Zarathustra.
 
 To be sure, he who never liveth at the right time, how could he ever die
 at the right time? Would that he might never be born!--Thus do I advise
 the superfluous ones.
 
 But even the superfluous ones make much ado about their death, and even
 the hollowest nut wanteth to be cracked.
 
 Every one regardeth dying as a great matter: but as yet death is not
 a festival. Not yet have people learned to inaugurate the finest
 festivals.
 
 The consummating death I show unto you, which becometh a stimulus and
 promise to the living.
 
 His death, dieth the consummating one triumphantly, surrounded by hoping
 and promising ones.
 
 Thus should one learn to die; and there should be no festival at which
 such a dying one doth not consecrate the oaths of the living!
 
 Thus to die is best; the next best, however, is to die in battle, and
 sacrifice a great soul.
 
 But to the fighter equally hateful as to the victor, is your grinning
 death which stealeth nigh like a thief,--and yet cometh as master.
 
 My death, praise I unto you, the voluntary death, which cometh unto me
 because _I_ want it.
 
 And when shall I want it?--He that hath a goal and an heir, wanteth
 death at the right time for the goal and the heir.
 
 And out of reverence for the goal and the heir, he will hang up no more
 withered wreaths in the sanctuary of life.
 
 Verily, not the rope-makers will I resemble: they lengthen out their
 cord, and thereby go ever backward.
 
 Many a one, also, waxeth too old for his truths and triumphs; a
 toothless mouth hath no longer the right to every truth.
 
 And whoever wanteth to have fame, must take leave of honour betimes, and
 practise the difficult art of--going at the right time.
 
 One must discontinue being feasted upon when one tasteth best: that is
 known by those who want to be long loved.
 
 Sour apples are there, no doubt, whose lot is to wait until the last
 day of autumn: and at the same time they become ripe, yellow, and
 shrivelled.
 
 In some ageth the heart first, and in others the spirit. And some are
 hoary in youth, but the late young keep long young.
 
 To many men life is a failure; a poison-worm gnaweth at their heart.
 Then let them see to it that their dying is all the more a success.
 
 Many never become sweet; they rot even in the summer. It is cowardice
 that holdeth them fast to their branches.
 
 Far too many live, and far too long hang they on their branches. Would
 that a storm came and shook all this rottenness and worm-eatenness from
 the tree!
 
 Would that there came preachers of SPEEDY death! Those would be the
 appropriate storms and agitators of the trees of life! But I hear only
 slow death preached, and patience with all that is "earthly."
 
 Ah! ye preach patience with what is earthly? This earthly is it that
 hath too much patience with you, ye blasphemers!
 
 Verily, too early died that Hebrew whom the preachers of slow death
 honour: and to many hath it proved a calamity that he died too early.
 
 As yet had he known only tears, and the melancholy of the Hebrews,
 together with the hatred of the good and just--the Hebrew Jesus: then
 was he seized with the longing for death.
 
 Had he but remained in the wilderness, and far from the good and just!
 Then, perhaps, would he have learned to live, and love the earth--and
 laughter also!
 
 Believe it, my brethren! He died too early; he himself would have
 disavowed his doctrine had he attained to my age! Noble enough was he to
 disavow!
 
 But he was still immature. Immaturely loveth the youth, and immaturely
 also hateth he man and earth. Confined and awkward are still his soul
 and the wings of his spirit.
 
 But in man there is more of the child than in the youth, and less of
 melancholy: better understandeth he about life and death.
 
 Free for death, and free in death; a holy Naysayer, when there is no
 longer time for Yea: thus understandeth he about death and life.
 
 That your dying may not be a reproach to man and the earth, my friends:
 that do I solicit from the honey of your soul.
 
 In your dying shall your spirit and your virtue still shine like an
 evening after-glow around the earth: otherwise your dying hath been
 unsatisfactory.
 
 Thus will I die myself, that ye friends may love the earth more for my
 sake; and earth will I again become, to have rest in her that bore me.
 
 Verily, a goal had Zarathustra; he threw his ball. Now be ye friends the
 heirs of my goal; to you throw I the golden ball.
 
 Best of all, do I see you, my friends, throw the golden ball! And so
 tarry I still a little while on the earth--pardon me for it!
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXII. THE BESTOWING VIRTUE.
 
 1.
 
 When Zarathustra had taken leave of the town to which his heart was
 attached, the name of which is "The Pied Cow," there followed him many
 people who called themselves his disciples, and kept him company. Thus
 came they to a crossroad. Then Zarathustra told them that he now wanted
 to go alone; for he was fond of going alone. His disciples, however,
 presented him at his departure with a staff, on the golden handle of
 which a serpent twined round the sun. Zarathustra rejoiced on account
 of the staff, and supported himself thereon; then spake he thus to his
 disciples:
 
 Tell me, pray: how came gold to the highest value? Because it is
 uncommon, and unprofiting, and beaming, and soft in lustre; it always
 bestoweth itself.
 
 Only as image of the highest virtue came gold to the highest value.
 Goldlike, beameth the glance of the bestower. Gold-lustre maketh peace
 between moon and sun.
 
 Uncommon is the highest virtue, and unprofiting, beaming is it, and soft
 of lustre: a bestowing virtue is the highest virtue.
 
 Verily, I divine you well, my disciples: ye strive like me for the
 bestowing virtue. What should ye have in common with cats and wolves?
 
 It is your thirst to become sacrifices and gifts yourselves: and
 therefore have ye the thirst to accumulate all riches in your soul.
 
 Insatiably striveth your soul for treasures and jewels, because your
 virtue is insatiable in desiring to bestow.
 
 Ye constrain all things to flow towards you and into you, so that they
 shall flow back again out of your fountain as the gifts of your love.
 
 Verily, an appropriator of all values must such bestowing love become;
 but healthy and holy, call I this selfishness.--
 
 Another selfishness is there, an all-too-poor and hungry kind, which
 would always steal--the selfishness of the sick, the sickly selfishness.
 
 With the eye of the thief it looketh upon all that is lustrous; with the
 craving of hunger it measureth him who hath abundance; and ever doth it
 prowl round the tables of bestowers.
 
 Sickness speaketh in such craving, and invisible degeneration; of a
 sickly body, speaketh the larcenous craving of this selfishness.
 
 Tell me, my brother, what do we think bad, and worst of all? Is it not
 DEGENERATION?--And we always suspect degeneration when the bestowing
 soul is lacking.
 
 Upward goeth our course from genera on to super-genera. But a horror to
 us is the degenerating sense, which saith: "All for myself."
 
 Upward soareth our sense: thus is it a simile of our body, a simile of
 an elevation. Such similes of elevations are the names of the virtues.
 
 Thus goeth the body through history, a becomer and fighter. And the
 spirit--what is it to the body? Its fights' and victories' herald, its
 companion and echo.
 
 Similes, are all names of good and evil; they do not speak out, they
 only hint. A fool who seeketh knowledge from them!
 
 Give heed, my brethren, to every hour when your spirit would speak in
 similes: there is the origin of your virtue.
 
 Elevated is then your body, and raised up; with its delight, enraptureth
 it the spirit; so that it becometh creator, and valuer, and lover, and
 everything's benefactor.
 
 When your heart overfloweth broad and full like the river, a blessing
 and a danger to the lowlanders: there is the origin of your virtue.
 
 When ye are exalted above praise and blame, and your will would command
 all things, as a loving one's will: there is the origin of your virtue.
 
 When ye despise pleasant things, and the effeminate couch, and cannot
 couch far enough from the effeminate: there is the origin of your
 virtue.
 
 When ye are willers of one will, and when that change of every need is
 needful to you: there is the origin of your virtue.
 
 Verily, a new good and evil is it! Verily, a new deep murmuring, and the
 voice of a new fountain!
 
 Power is it, this new virtue; a ruling thought is it, and around it a
 subtle soul: a golden sun, with the serpent of knowledge around it.
 
 2.
 
 Here paused Zarathustra awhile, and looked lovingly on his disciples.
 Then he continued to speak thus--and his voice had changed:
 
 Remain true to the earth, my brethren, with the power of your virtue!
 Let your bestowing love and your knowledge be devoted to be the meaning
 of the earth! Thus do I pray and conjure you.
 
 Let it not fly away from the earthly and beat against eternal walls with
 its wings! Ah, there hath always been so much flown-away virtue!
 
 Lead, like me, the flown-away virtue back to the earth--yea, back
 to body and life: that it may give to the earth its meaning, a human
 meaning!
 
 A hundred times hitherto hath spirit as well as virtue flown away
 and blundered. Alas! in our body dwelleth still all this delusion and
 blundering: body and will hath it there become.
 
 A hundred times hitherto hath spirit as well as virtue attempted and
 erred. Yea, an attempt hath man been. Alas, much ignorance and error
 hath become embodied in us!
 
 Not only the rationality of millenniums--also their madness, breaketh
 out in us. Dangerous is it to be an heir.
 
 Still fight we step by step with the giant Chance, and over all mankind
 hath hitherto ruled nonsense, the lack-of-sense.
 
 Let your spirit and your virtue be devoted to the sense of the earth,
 my brethren: let the value of everything be determined anew by you!
 Therefore shall ye be fighters! Therefore shall ye be creators!
 
 Intelligently doth the body purify itself; attempting with intelligence
 it exalteth itself; to the discerners all impulses sanctify themselves;
 to the exalted the soul becometh joyful.
 
 Physician, heal thyself: then wilt thou also heal thy patient. Let it be
 his best cure to see with his eyes him who maketh himself whole.
 
 A thousand paths are there which have never yet been trodden; a thousand
 salubrities and hidden islands of life. Unexhausted and undiscovered is
 still man and man's world.
 
 Awake and hearken, ye lonesome ones! From the future come winds with
 stealthy pinions, and to fine ears good tidings are proclaimed.
 
 Ye lonesome ones of to-day, ye seceding ones, ye shall one day be a
 people: out of you who have chosen yourselves, shall a chosen people
 arise:--and out of it the Superman.
 
 Verily, a place of healing shall the earth become! And already is a new
 odour diffused around it, a salvation-bringing odour--and a new hope!
 
 3.
 
 When Zarathustra had spoken these words, he paused, like one who had not
 said his last word; and long did he balance the staff doubtfully in his
 hand. At last he spake thus--and his voice had changed:
 
 I now go alone, my disciples! Ye also now go away, and alone! So will I
 have it.
 
 Verily, I advise you: depart from me, and guard yourselves against
 Zarathustra! And better still: be ashamed of him! Perhaps he hath
 deceived you.
 
 The man of knowledge must be able not only to love his enemies, but also
 to hate his friends.
 
 One requiteth a teacher badly if one remain merely a scholar. And why
 will ye not pluck at my wreath?
 
 Ye venerate me; but what if your veneration should some day collapse?
 Take heed lest a statue crush you!
 
 Ye say, ye believe in Zarathustra? But of what account is Zarathustra!
 Ye are my believers: but of what account are all believers!
 
 Ye had not yet sought yourselves: then did ye find me. So do all
 believers; therefore all belief is of so little account.
 
 Now do I bid you lose me and find yourselves; and only when ye have all
 denied me, will I return unto you.
 
 Verily, with other eyes, my brethren, shall I then seek my lost ones;
 with another love shall I then love you.
 
 And once again shall ye have become friends unto me, and children of one
 hope: then will I be with you for the third time, to celebrate the great
 noontide with you.
 
 And it is the great noontide, when man is in the middle of his course
 between animal and Superman, and celebrateth his advance to the evening
 as his highest hope: for it is the advance to a new morning.
 
 At such time will the down-goer bless himself, that he should be an
 over-goer; and the sun of his knowledge will be at noontide.
 
 "DEAD ARE ALL THE GODS: NOW DO WE DESIRE THE SUPERMAN TO LIVE."--Let
 this be our final will at the great noontide!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 THUS SPAKE ZARATHUSTRA. SECOND PART.
 
 "--and only when ye have all denied me, will I return unto you.
 
 Verily, with other eyes, my brethren, shall I then seek my lost ones;
 with another love shall I then love you."--ZARATHUSTRA, I., "The
 Bestowing Virtue."
 
 
 
 
 XXIII. THE CHILD WITH THE MIRROR.
 
 After this Zarathustra returned again into the mountains to the solitude
 of his cave, and withdrew himself from men, waiting like a sower who
 hath scattered his seed. His soul, however, became impatient and full of
 longing for those whom he loved: because he had still much to give them.
 For this is hardest of all: to close the open hand out of love, and keep
 modest as a giver.
 
 Thus passed with the lonesome one months and years; his wisdom meanwhile
 increased, and caused him pain by its abundance.
 
 One morning, however, he awoke ere the rosy dawn, and having meditated
 long on his couch, at last spake thus to his heart:
 
 Why did I startle in my dream, so that I awoke? Did not a child come to
 me, carrying a mirror?
 
 "O Zarathustra"--said the child unto me--"look at thyself in the
 mirror!"
 
 But when I looked into the mirror, I shrieked, and my heart throbbed:
 for not myself did I see therein, but a devil's grimace and derision.
 
 Verily, all too well do I understand the dream's portent and monition:
 my DOCTRINE is in danger; tares want to be called wheat!
 
 Mine enemies have grown powerful and have disfigured the likeness of
 my doctrine, so that my dearest ones have to blush for the gifts that I
 gave them.
 
 Lost are my friends; the hour hath come for me to seek my lost ones!--
 
 With these words Zarathustra started up, not however like a person in
 anguish seeking relief, but rather like a seer and a singer whom the
 spirit inspireth. With amazement did his eagle and serpent gaze upon
 him: for a coming bliss overspread his countenance like the rosy dawn.
 
 What hath happened unto me, mine animals?--said Zarathustra. Am I not
 transformed? Hath not bliss come unto me like a whirlwind?
 
 Foolish is my happiness, and foolish things will it speak: it is still
 too young--so have patience with it!
 
 Wounded am I by my happiness: all sufferers shall be physicians unto me!
 
 To my friends can I again go down, and also to mine enemies! Zarathustra
 can again speak and bestow, and show his best love to his loved ones!
 
 My impatient love overfloweth in streams,--down towards sunrise and
 sunset. Out of silent mountains and storms of affliction, rusheth my
 soul into the valleys.
 
 Too long have I longed and looked into the distance. Too long hath
 solitude possessed me: thus have I unlearned to keep silence.
 
 Utterance have I become altogether, and the brawling of a brook from
 high rocks: downward into the valleys will I hurl my speech.
 
 And let the stream of my love sweep into unfrequented channels! How
 should a stream not finally find its way to the sea!
 
 Forsooth, there is a lake in me, sequestered and self-sufficing; but the
 stream of my love beareth this along with it, down--to the sea!
 
 New paths do I tread, a new speech cometh unto me; tired have I become--
 like all creators--of the old tongues. No longer will my spirit walk on
 worn-out soles.
 
 Too slowly runneth all speaking for me:--into thy chariot, O storm, do I
 leap! And even thee will I whip with my spite!
 
 Like a cry and an huzza will I traverse wide seas, till I find the Happy
 Isles where my friends sojourn;--
 
 And mine enemies amongst them! How I now love every one unto whom I may
 but speak! Even mine enemies pertain to my bliss.
 
 And when I want to mount my wildest horse, then doth my spear always
 help me up best: it is my foot's ever ready servant:--
 
 The spear which I hurl at mine enemies! How grateful am I to mine
 enemies that I may at last hurl it!
 
 Too great hath been the tension of my cloud: 'twixt laughters of
 lightnings will I cast hail-showers into the depths.
 
 Violently will my breast then heave; violently will it blow its storm
 over the mountains: thus cometh its assuagement.
 
 Verily, like a storm cometh my happiness, and my freedom! But mine
 enemies shall think that THE EVIL ONE roareth over their heads.
 
 Yea, ye also, my friends, will be alarmed by my wild wisdom; and perhaps
 ye will flee therefrom, along with mine enemies.
 
 Ah, that I knew how to lure you back with shepherds' flutes! Ah, that
 my lioness wisdom would learn to roar softly! And much have we already
 learned with one another!
 
 My wild wisdom became pregnant on the lonesome mountains; on the rough
 stones did she bear the youngest of her young.
 
 Now runneth she foolishly in the arid wilderness, and seeketh and
 seeketh the soft sward--mine old, wild wisdom!
 
 On the soft sward of your hearts, my friends!--on your love, would she
 fain couch her dearest one!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXIV. IN THE HAPPY ISLES.
 
 The figs fall from the trees, they are good and sweet; and in falling
 the red skins of them break. A north wind am I to ripe figs.
 
 Thus, like figs, do these doctrines fall for you, my friends: imbibe
 now their juice and their sweet substance! It is autumn all around, and
 clear sky, and afternoon.
 
 Lo, what fullness is around us! And out of the midst of superabundance,
 it is delightful to look out upon distant seas.
 
 Once did people say God, when they looked out upon distant seas; now,
 however, have I taught you to say, Superman.
 
 God is a conjecture: but I do not wish your conjecturing to reach beyond
 your creating will.
 
 Could ye CREATE a God?--Then, I pray you, be silent about all Gods! But
 ye could well create the Superman.
 
 Not perhaps ye yourselves, my brethren! But into fathers and forefathers
 of the Superman could ye transform yourselves: and let that be your best
 creating!--
 
 God is a conjecture: but I should like your conjecturing restricted to
 the conceivable.
 
 Could ye CONCEIVE a God?--But let this mean Will to Truth unto you,
 that everything be transformed into the humanly conceivable, the humanly
 visible, the humanly sensible! Your own discernment shall ye follow out
 to the end!
 
 And what ye have called the world shall but be created by you: your
 reason, your likeness, your will, your love, shall it itself become! And
 verily, for your bliss, ye discerning ones!
 
 And how would ye endure life without that hope, ye discerning ones?
 Neither in the inconceivable could ye have been born, nor in the
 irrational.
 
 But that I may reveal my heart entirely unto you, my friends: IF there
 were gods, how could I endure it to be no God! THEREFORE there are no
 Gods.
 
 Yea, I have drawn the conclusion; now, however, doth it draw me.--
 
 God is a conjecture: but who could drink all the bitterness of this
 conjecture without dying? Shall his faith be taken from the creating
 one, and from the eagle his flights into eagle-heights?
 
 God is a thought--it maketh all the straight crooked, and all that
 standeth reel. What? Time would be gone, and all the perishable would be
 but a lie?
 
 To think this is giddiness and vertigo to human limbs, and even vomiting
 to the stomach: verily, the reeling sickness do I call it, to conjecture
 such a thing.
 
 Evil do I call it and misanthropic: all that teaching about the one, and
 the plenum, and the unmoved, and the sufficient, and the imperishable!
 
 All the imperishable--that's but a simile, and the poets lie too much.--
 
 But of time and of becoming shall the best similes speak: a praise shall
 they be, and a justification of all perishableness!
 
 Creating--that is the great salvation from suffering, and life's
 alleviation. But for the creator to appear, suffering itself is needed,
 and much transformation.
 
 Yea, much bitter dying must there be in your life, ye creators! Thus are
 ye advocates and justifiers of all perishableness.
 
 For the creator himself to be the new-born child, he must also
 be willing to be the child-bearer, and endure the pangs of the
 child-bearer.
 
 Verily, through a hundred souls went I my way, and through a hundred
 cradles and birth-throes. Many a farewell have I taken; I know the
 heart-breaking last hours.
 
 But so willeth it my creating Will, my fate. Or, to tell you it more
 candidly: just such a fate--willeth my Will.
 
 All FEELING suffereth in me, and is in prison: but my WILLING ever
 cometh to me as mine emancipator and comforter.
 
 Willing emancipateth: that is the true doctrine of will and
 emancipation--so teacheth you Zarathustra.
 
 No longer willing, and no longer valuing, and no longer creating! Ah,
 that that great debility may ever be far from me!
 
 And also in discerning do I feel only my will's procreating and evolving
 delight; and if there be innocence in my knowledge, it is because there
 is will to procreation in it.
 
 Away from God and Gods did this will allure me; what would there be to
 create if there were--Gods!
 
 But to man doth it ever impel me anew, my fervent creative will; thus
 impelleth it the hammer to the stone.
 
 Ah, ye men, within the stone slumbereth an image for me, the image of my
 visions! Ah, that it should slumber in the hardest, ugliest stone!
 
 Now rageth my hammer ruthlessly against its prison. From the stone fly
 the fragments: what's that to me?
 
 I will complete it: for a shadow came unto me--the stillest and lightest
 of all things once came unto me!
 
 The beauty of the Superman came unto me as a shadow. Ah, my brethren! Of
 what account now are--the Gods to me!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXV. THE PITIFUL.
 
 My friends, there hath arisen a satire on your friend: "Behold
 Zarathustra! Walketh he not amongst us as if amongst animals?"
 
 But it is better said in this wise: "The discerning one walketh amongst
 men AS amongst animals."
 
 Man himself is to the discerning one: the animal with red cheeks.
 
 How hath that happened unto him? Is it not because he hath had to be
 ashamed too oft?
 
 O my friends! Thus speaketh the discerning one: shame, shame,
 shame--that is the history of man!
 
 And on that account doth the noble one enjoin upon himself not to abash:
 bashfulness doth he enjoin on himself in presence of all sufferers.
 
 Verily, I like them not, the merciful ones, whose bliss is in their
 pity: too destitute are they of bashfulness.
 
 If I must be pitiful, I dislike to be called so; and if I be so, it is
 preferably at a distance.
 
 Preferably also do I shroud my head, and flee, before being recognised:
 and thus do I bid you do, my friends!
 
 May my destiny ever lead unafflicted ones like you across my path, and
 those with whom I MAY have hope and repast and honey in common!
 
 Verily, I have done this and that for the afflicted: but something
 better did I always seem to do when I had learned to enjoy myself
 better.
 
 Since humanity came into being, man hath enjoyed himself too little:
 that alone, my brethren, is our original sin!
 
 And when we learn better to enjoy ourselves, then do we unlearn best to
 give pain unto others, and to contrive pain.
 
 Therefore do I wash the hand that hath helped the sufferer; therefore do
 I wipe also my soul.
 
 For in seeing the sufferer suffering--thereof was I ashamed on account
 of his shame; and in helping him, sorely did I wound his pride.
 
 Great obligations do not make grateful, but revengeful; and when a small
 kindness is not forgotten, it becometh a gnawing worm.
 
 "Be shy in accepting! Distinguish by accepting!"--thus do I advise those
 who have naught to bestow.
 
 I, however, am a bestower: willingly do I bestow as friend to friends.
 Strangers, however, and the poor, may pluck for themselves the fruit
 from my tree: thus doth it cause less shame.
 
 Beggars, however, one should entirely do away with! Verily, it annoyeth
 one to give unto them, and it annoyeth one not to give unto them.
 
 And likewise sinners and bad consciences! Believe me, my friends: the
 sting of conscience teacheth one to sting.
 
 The worst things, however, are the petty thoughts. Verily, better to
 have done evilly than to have thought pettily!
 
 To be sure, ye say: "The delight in petty evils spareth one many a great
 evil deed." But here one should not wish to be sparing.
 
 Like a boil is the evil deed: it itcheth and irritateth and breaketh
 forth--it speaketh honourably.
 
 "Behold, I am disease," saith the evil deed: that is its honourableness.
 
 But like infection is the petty thought: it creepeth and hideth, and
 wanteth to be nowhere--until the whole body is decayed and withered by
 the petty infection.
 
 To him however, who is possessed of a devil, I would whisper this word
 in the ear: "Better for thee to rear up thy devil! Even for thee there
 is still a path to greatness!"--
 
 Ah, my brethren! One knoweth a little too much about every one! And many
 a one becometh transparent to us, but still we can by no means penetrate
 him.
 
 It is difficult to live among men because silence is so difficult.
 
 And not to him who is offensive to us are we most unfair, but to him who
 doth not concern us at all.
 
 If, however, thou hast a suffering friend, then be a resting-place for
 his suffering; like a hard bed, however, a camp-bed: thus wilt thou
 serve him best.
 
 And if a friend doeth thee wrong, then say: "I forgive thee what thou
 hast done unto me; that thou hast done it unto THYSELF, however--how
 could I forgive that!"
 
 Thus speaketh all great love: it surpasseth even forgiveness and pity.
 
 One should hold fast one's heart; for when one letteth it go, how
 quickly doth one's head run away!
 
 Ah, where in the world have there been greater follies than with the
 pitiful? And what in the world hath caused more suffering than the
 follies of the pitiful?
 
 Woe unto all loving ones who have not an elevation which is above their
 pity!
 
 Thus spake the devil unto me, once on a time: "Even God hath his hell:
 it is his love for man."
 
 And lately, did I hear him say these words: "God is dead: of his pity
 for man hath God died."--
 
 So be ye warned against pity: FROM THENCE there yet cometh unto men a
 heavy cloud! Verily, I understand weather-signs!
 
 But attend also to this word: All great love is above all its pity: for
 it seeketh--to create what is loved!
 
 "Myself do I offer unto my love, AND MY NEIGHBOUR AS MYSELF"--such is
 the language of all creators.
 
 All creators, however, are hard.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXVI. THE PRIESTS.
 
 And one day Zarathustra made a sign to his disciples, and spake these
 words unto them:
 
 "Here are priests: but although they are mine enemies, pass them quietly
 and with sleeping swords!
 
 Even among them there are heroes; many of them have suffered too much--:
 so they want to make others suffer.
 
 Bad enemies are they: nothing is more revengeful than their meekness.
 And readily doth he soil himself who toucheth them.
 
 But my blood is related to theirs; and I want withal to see my blood
 honoured in theirs."--
 
 And when they had passed, a pain attacked Zarathustra; but not long had
 he struggled with the pain, when he began to speak thus:
 
 It moveth my heart for those priests. They also go against my taste; but
 that is the smallest matter unto me, since I am among men.
 
 But I suffer and have suffered with them: prisoners are they unto me,
 and stigmatised ones. He whom they call Saviour put them in fetters:--
 
 In fetters of false values and fatuous words! Oh, that some one would
 save them from their Saviour!
 
 On an isle they once thought they had landed, when the sea tossed them
 about; but behold, it was a slumbering monster!
 
 False values and fatuous words: these are the worst monsters for
 mortals--long slumbereth and waiteth the fate that is in them.
 
 But at last it cometh and awaketh and devoureth and engulfeth whatever
 hath built tabernacles upon it.
 
 Oh, just look at those tabernacles which those priests have built
 themselves! Churches, they call their sweet-smelling caves!
 
 Oh, that falsified light, that mustified air! Where the soul--may not
 fly aloft to its height!
 
 But so enjoineth their belief: "On your knees, up the stair, ye
 sinners!"
 
 Verily, rather would I see a shameless one than the distorted eyes of
 their shame and devotion!
 
 Who created for themselves such caves and penitence-stairs? Was it not
 those who sought to conceal themselves, and were ashamed under the clear
 sky?
 
 And only when the clear sky looketh again through ruined roofs, and down
 upon grass and red poppies on ruined walls--will I again turn my heart
 to the seats of this God.
 
 They called God that which opposed and afflicted them: and verily, there
 was much hero-spirit in their worship!
 
 And they knew not how to love their God otherwise than by nailing men to
 the cross!
 
 As corpses they thought to live; in black draped they their corpses;
 even in their talk do I still feel the evil flavour of charnel-houses.
 
 And he who liveth nigh unto them liveth nigh unto black pools, wherein
 the toad singeth his song with sweet gravity.
 
 Better songs would they have to sing, for me to believe in their
 Saviour: more like saved ones would his disciples have to appear unto
 me!
 
 Naked, would I like to see them: for beauty alone should preach
 penitence. But whom would that disguised affliction convince!
 
 Verily, their Saviours themselves came not from freedom and freedom's
 seventh heaven! Verily, they themselves never trod the carpets of
 knowledge!
 
 Of defects did the spirit of those Saviours consist; but into every
 defect had they put their illusion, their stop-gap, which they called
 God.
 
 In their pity was their spirit drowned; and when they swelled and
 o'erswelled with pity, there always floated to the surface a great
 folly.
 
 Eagerly and with shouts drove they their flock over their foot-bridge;
 as if there were but one foot-bridge to the future! Verily, those
 shepherds also were still of the flock!
 
 Small spirits and spacious souls had those shepherds: but, my brethren,
 what small domains have even the most spacious souls hitherto been!
 
 Characters of blood did they write on the way they went, and their folly
 taught that truth is proved by blood.
 
 But blood is the very worst witness to truth; blood tainteth the purest
 teaching, and turneth it into delusion and hatred of heart.
 
 And when a person goeth through fire for his teaching--what doth that
 prove! It is more, verily, when out of one's own burning cometh one's
 own teaching!
 
 Sultry heart and cold head; where these meet, there ariseth the
 blusterer, the "Saviour."
 
 Greater ones, verily, have there been, and higher-born ones, than those
 whom the people call Saviours, those rapturous blusterers!
 
 And by still greater ones than any of the Saviours must ye be saved, my
 brethren, if ye would find the way to freedom!
 
 Never yet hath there been a Superman. Naked have I seen both of them,
 the greatest man and the smallest man:--
 
 All-too-similar are they still to each other. Verily, even the greatest
 found I--all-too-human!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXVII. THE VIRTUOUS.
 
 With thunder and heavenly fireworks must one speak to indolent and
 somnolent senses.
 
 But beauty's voice speaketh gently: it appealeth only to the most
 awakened souls.
 
 Gently vibrated and laughed unto me to-day my buckler; it was beauty's
 holy laughing and thrilling.
 
 At you, ye virtuous ones, laughed my beauty to-day. And thus came its
 voice unto me: "They want--to be paid besides!"
 
 Ye want to be paid besides, ye virtuous ones! Ye want reward for virtue,
 and heaven for earth, and eternity for your to-day?
 
 And now ye upbraid me for teaching that there is no reward-giver,
 nor paymaster? And verily, I do not even teach that virtue is its own
 reward.
 
 Ah! this is my sorrow: into the basis of things have reward and
 punishment been insinuated--and now even into the basis of your souls,
 ye virtuous ones!
 
 But like the snout of the boar shall my word grub up the basis of your
 souls; a ploughshare will I be called by you.
 
 All the secrets of your heart shall be brought to light; and when ye
 lie in the sun, grubbed up and broken, then will also your falsehood be
 separated from your truth.
 
 For this is your truth: ye are TOO PURE for the filth of the words:
 vengeance, punishment, recompense, retribution.
 
 Ye love your virtue as a mother loveth her child; but when did one hear
 of a mother wanting to be paid for her love?
 
 It is your dearest Self, your virtue. The ring's thirst is in you: to
 reach itself again struggleth every ring, and turneth itself.
 
 And like the star that goeth out, so is every work of your virtue: ever
 is its light on its way and travelling--and when will it cease to be on
 its way?
 
 Thus is the light of your virtue still on its way, even when its work
 is done. Be it forgotten and dead, still its ray of light liveth and
 travelleth.
 
 That your virtue is your Self, and not an outward thing, a skin, or
 a cloak: that is the truth from the basis of your souls, ye virtuous
 ones!--
 
 But sure enough there are those to whom virtue meaneth writhing under
 the lash: and ye have hearkened too much unto their crying!
 
 And others are there who call virtue the slothfulness of their vices;
 and when once their hatred and jealousy relax the limbs, their "justice"
 becometh lively and rubbeth its sleepy eyes.
 
 And others are there who are drawn downwards: their devils draw them.
 But the more they sink, the more ardently gloweth their eye, and the
 longing for their God.
 
 Ah! their crying also hath reached your ears, ye virtuous ones: "What I
 am NOT, that, that is God to me, and virtue!"
 
 And others are there who go along heavily and creakingly, like carts
 taking stones downhill: they talk much of dignity and virtue--their drag
 they call virtue!
 
 And others are there who are like eight-day clocks when wound up; they
 tick, and want people to call ticking--virtue.
 
 Verily, in those have I mine amusement: wherever I find such clocks I
 shall wind them up with my mockery, and they shall even whirr thereby!
 
 And others are proud of their modicum of righteousness, and for the sake
 of it do violence to all things: so that the world is drowned in their
 unrighteousness.
 
 Ah! how ineptly cometh the word "virtue" out of their mouth! And when
 they say: "I am just," it always soundeth like: "I am just--revenged!"
 
 With their virtues they want to scratch out the eyes of their enemies;
 and they elevate themselves only that they may lower others.
 
 And again there are those who sit in their swamp, and speak thus from
 among the bulrushes: "Virtue--that is to sit quietly in the swamp.
 
 We bite no one, and go out of the way of him who would bite; and in all
 matters we have the opinion that is given us."
 
 And again there are those who love attitudes, and think that virtue is a
 sort of attitude.
 
 Their knees continually adore, and their hands are eulogies of virtue,
 but their heart knoweth naught thereof.
 
 And again there are those who regard it as virtue to say: "Virtue
 is necessary"; but after all they believe only that policemen are
 necessary.
 
 And many a one who cannot see men's loftiness, calleth it virtue to see
 their baseness far too well: thus calleth he his evil eye virtue.--
 
 And some want to be edified and raised up, and call it virtue: and
 others want to be cast down,--and likewise call it virtue.
 
 And thus do almost all think that they participate in virtue; and at
 least every one claimeth to be an authority on "good" and "evil."
 
 But Zarathustra came not to say unto all those liars and fools: "What do
 YE know of virtue! What COULD ye know of virtue!"--
 
 But that ye, my friends, might become weary of the old words which ye
 have learned from the fools and liars:
 
 That ye might become weary of the words "reward," "retribution,"
 "punishment," "righteous vengeance."--
 
 That ye might become weary of saying: "That an action is good is because
 it is unselfish."
 
 Ah! my friends! That YOUR very Self be in your action, as the mother is
 in the child: let that be YOUR formula of virtue!
 
 Verily, I have taken from you a hundred formulae and your virtue's
 favourite playthings; and now ye upbraid me, as children upbraid.
 
 They played by the sea--then came there a wave and swept their
 playthings into the deep: and now do they cry.
 
 But the same wave shall bring them new playthings, and spread before
 them new speckled shells!
 
 Thus will they be comforted; and like them shall ye also, my friends,
 have your comforting--and new speckled shells!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXVIII. THE RABBLE.
 
 Life is a well of delight; but where the rabble also drink, there all
 fountains are poisoned.
 
 To everything cleanly am I well disposed; but I hate to see the grinning
 mouths and the thirst of the unclean.
 
 They cast their eye down into the fountain: and now glanceth up to me
 their odious smile out of the fountain.
 
 The holy water have they poisoned with their lustfulness; and when they
 called their filthy dreams delight, then poisoned they also the words.
 
 Indignant becometh the flame when they put their damp hearts to the
 fire; the spirit itself bubbleth and smoketh when the rabble approach
 the fire.
 
 Mawkish and over-mellow becometh the fruit in their hands: unsteady, and
 withered at the top, doth their look make the fruit-tree.
 
 And many a one who hath turned away from life, hath only turned away
 from the rabble: he hated to share with them fountain, flame, and fruit.
 
 And many a one who hath gone into the wilderness and suffered thirst
 with beasts of prey, disliked only to sit at the cistern with filthy
 camel-drivers.
 
 And many a one who hath come along as a destroyer, and as a hailstorm
 to all cornfields, wanted merely to put his foot into the jaws of the
 rabble, and thus stop their throat.
 
 And it is not the mouthful which hath most choked me, to know that life
 itself requireth enmity and death and torture-crosses:--
 
 But I asked once, and suffocated almost with my question: What? is the
 rabble also NECESSARY for life?
 
 Are poisoned fountains necessary, and stinking fires, and filthy dreams,
 and maggots in the bread of life?
 
 Not my hatred, but my loathing, gnawed hungrily at my life! Ah, ofttimes
 became I weary of spirit, when I found even the rabble spiritual!
 
 And on the rulers turned I my back, when I saw what they now call
 ruling: to traffic and bargain for power--with the rabble!
 
 Amongst peoples of a strange language did I dwell, with stopped ears: so
 that the language of their trafficking might remain strange unto me, and
 their bargaining for power.
 
 And holding my nose, I went morosely through all yesterdays and to-days:
 verily, badly smell all yesterdays and to-days of the scribbling rabble!
 
 Like a cripple become deaf, and blind, and dumb--thus have I lived long;
 that I might not live with the power-rabble, the scribe-rabble, and the
 pleasure-rabble.
 
 Toilsomely did my spirit mount stairs, and cautiously; alms of delight
 were its refreshment; on the staff did life creep along with the blind
 one.
 
 What hath happened unto me? How have I freed myself from loathing?
 Who hath rejuvenated mine eye? How have I flown to the height where no
 rabble any longer sit at the wells?
 
 Did my loathing itself create for me wings and fountain-divining powers?
 Verily, to the loftiest height had I to fly, to find again the well of
 delight!
 
 Oh, I have found it, my brethren! Here on the loftiest height bubbleth
 up for me the well of delight! And there is a life at whose waters none
 of the rabble drink with me!
 
 Almost too violently dost thou flow for me, thou fountain of delight!
 And often emptiest thou the goblet again, in wanting to fill it!
 
 And yet must I learn to approach thee more modestly: far too violently
 doth my heart still flow towards thee:--
 
 My heart on which my summer burneth, my short, hot, melancholy,
 over-happy summer: how my summer heart longeth for thy coolness!
 
 Past, the lingering distress of my spring! Past, the wickedness of my
 snowflakes in June! Summer have I become entirely, and summer-noontide!
 
 A summer on the loftiest height, with cold fountains and blissful
 stillness: oh, come, my friends, that the stillness may become more
 blissful!
 
 For this is OUR height and our home: too high and steep do we here dwell
 for all uncleanly ones and their thirst.
 
 Cast but your pure eyes into the well of my delight, my friends! How
 could it become turbid thereby! It shall laugh back to you with ITS
 purity.
 
 On the tree of the future build we our nest; eagles shall bring us lone
 ones food in their beaks!
 
 Verily, no food of which the impure could be fellow-partakers! Fire,
 would they think they devoured, and burn their mouths!
 
 Verily, no abodes do we here keep ready for the impure! An ice-cave to
 their bodies would our happiness be, and to their spirits!
 
 And as strong winds will we live above them, neighbours to the eagles,
 neighbours to the snow, neighbours to the sun: thus live the strong
 winds.
 
 And like a wind will I one day blow amongst them, and with my spirit,
 take the breath from their spirit: thus willeth my future.
 
 Verily, a strong wind is Zarathustra to all low places; and this counsel
 counselleth he to his enemies, and to whatever spitteth and speweth:
 "Take care not to spit AGAINST the wind!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXIX. THE TARANTULAS.
 
 Lo, this is the tarantula's den! Wouldst thou see the tarantula itself?
 Here hangeth its web: touch this, so that it may tremble.
 
 There cometh the tarantula willingly: Welcome, tarantula! Black on thy
 back is thy triangle and symbol; and I know also what is in thy soul.
 
 Revenge is in thy soul: wherever thou bitest, there ariseth black scab;
 with revenge, thy poison maketh the soul giddy!
 
 Thus do I speak unto you in parable, ye who make the soul giddy,
 ye preachers of EQUALITY! Tarantulas are ye unto me, and secretly
 revengeful ones!
 
 But I will soon bring your hiding-places to the light: therefore do I
 laugh in your face my laughter of the height.
 
 Therefore do I tear at your web, that your rage may lure you out of your
 den of lies, and that your revenge may leap forth from behind your word
 "justice."
 
 Because, FOR MAN TO BE REDEEMED FROM REVENGE--that is for me the bridge
 to the highest hope, and a rainbow after long storms.
 
 Otherwise, however, would the tarantulas have it. "Let it be
 very justice for the world to become full of the storms of our
 vengeance"--thus do they talk to one another.
 
 "Vengeance will we use, and insult, against all who are not like
 us"--thus do the tarantula-hearts pledge themselves.
 
 "And 'Will to Equality'--that itself shall henceforth be the name of
 virtue; and against all that hath power will we raise an outcry!"
 
 Ye preachers of equality, the tyrant-frenzy of impotence crieth thus in
 you for "equality": your most secret tyrant-longings disguise themselves
 thus in virtue-words!
 
 Fretted conceit and suppressed envy--perhaps your fathers' conceit and
 envy: in you break they forth as flame and frenzy of vengeance.
 
 What the father hath hid cometh out in the son; and oft have I found in
 the son the father's revealed secret.
 
 Inspired ones they resemble: but it is not the heart that inspireth
 them--but vengeance. And when they become subtle and cold, it is not
 spirit, but envy, that maketh them so.
 
 Their jealousy leadeth them also into thinkers' paths; and this is the
 sign of their jealousy--they always go too far: so that their fatigue
 hath at last to go to sleep on the snow.
 
 In all their lamentations soundeth vengeance, in all their eulogies is
 maleficence; and being judge seemeth to them bliss.
 
 But thus do I counsel you, my friends: distrust all in whom the impulse
 to punish is powerful!
 
 They are people of bad race and lineage; out of their countenances peer
 the hangman and the sleuth-hound.
 
 Distrust all those who talk much of their justice! Verily, in their
 souls not only honey is lacking.
 
 And when they call themselves "the good and just," forget not, that for
 them to be Pharisees, nothing is lacking but--power!
 
 My friends, I will not be mixed up and confounded with others.
 
 There are those who preach my doctrine of life, and are at the same time
 preachers of equality, and tarantulas.
 
 That they speak in favour of life, though they sit in their den, these
 poison-spiders, and withdrawn from life--is because they would thereby
 do injury.
 
 To those would they thereby do injury who have power at present: for
 with those the preaching of death is still most at home.
 
 Were it otherwise, then would the tarantulas teach otherwise: and they
 themselves were formerly the best world-maligners and heretic-burners.
 
 With these preachers of equality will I not be mixed up and confounded.
 For thus speaketh justice UNTO ME: "Men are not equal."
 
 And neither shall they become so! What would be my love to the Superman,
 if I spake otherwise?
 
 On a thousand bridges and piers shall they throng to the future, and
 always shall there be more war and inequality among them: thus doth my
 great love make me speak!
 
 Inventors of figures and phantoms shall they be in their hostilities;
 and with those figures and phantoms shall they yet fight with each other
 the supreme fight!
 
 Good and evil, and rich and poor, and high and low, and all names of
 values: weapons shall they be, and sounding signs, that life must again
 and again surpass itself!
 
 Aloft will it build itself with columns and stairs--life itself: into
 remote distances would it gaze, and out towards blissful beauties--
 THEREFORE doth it require elevation!
 
 And because it requireth elevation, therefore doth it require steps, and
 variance of steps and climbers! To rise striveth life, and in rising to
 surpass itself.
 
 And just behold, my friends! Here where the tarantula's den is, riseth
 aloft an ancient temple's ruins--just behold it with enlightened eyes!
 
 Verily, he who here towered aloft his thoughts in stone, knew as well as
 the wisest ones about the secret of life!
 
 That there is struggle and inequality even in beauty, and war for power
 and supremacy: that doth he here teach us in the plainest parable.
 
 How divinely do vault and arch here contrast in the struggle: how with
 light and shade they strive against each other, the divinely striving
 ones.--
 
 Thus, steadfast and beautiful, let us also be enemies, my friends!
 Divinely will we strive AGAINST one another!--
 
 Alas! There hath the tarantula bit me myself, mine old enemy! Divinely
 steadfast and beautiful, it hath bit me on the finger!
 
 "Punishment must there be, and justice"--so thinketh it: "not
 gratuitously shall he here sing songs in honour of enmity!"
 
 Yea, it hath revenged itself! And alas! now will it make my soul also
 dizzy with revenge!
 
 That I may NOT turn dizzy, however, bind me fast, my friends, to this
 pillar! Rather will I be a pillar-saint than a whirl of vengeance!
 
 Verily, no cyclone or whirlwind is Zarathustra: and if he be a dancer,
 he is not at all a tarantula-dancer!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXX. THE FAMOUS WISE ONES.
 
 The people have ye served and the people's superstition--NOT the
 truth!--all ye famous wise ones! And just on that account did they pay
 you reverence.
 
 And on that account also did they tolerate your unbelief, because it
 was a pleasantry and a by-path for the people. Thus doth the master give
 free scope to his slaves, and even enjoyeth their presumptuousness.
 
 But he who is hated by the people, as the wolf by the dogs--is the free
 spirit, the enemy of fetters, the non-adorer, the dweller in the woods.
 
 To hunt him out of his lair--that was always called "sense of right" by
 the people: on him do they still hound their sharpest-toothed dogs.
 
 "For there the truth is, where the people are! Woe, woe to the seeking
 ones!"--thus hath it echoed through all time.
 
 Your people would ye justify in their reverence: that called ye "Will to
 Truth," ye famous wise ones!
 
 And your heart hath always said to itself: "From the people have I come:
 from thence came to me also the voice of God."
 
 Stiff-necked and artful, like the ass, have ye always been, as the
 advocates of the people.
 
 And many a powerful one who wanted to run well with the people, hath
 harnessed in front of his horses--a donkey, a famous wise man.
 
 And now, ye famous wise ones, I would have you finally throw off
 entirely the skin of the lion!
 
 The skin of the beast of prey, the speckled skin, and the dishevelled
 locks of the investigator, the searcher, and the conqueror!
 
 Ah! for me to learn to believe in your "conscientiousness," ye would
 first have to break your venerating will.
 
 Conscientious--so call I him who goeth into God-forsaken wildernesses,
 and hath broken his venerating heart.
 
 In the yellow sands and burnt by the sun, he doubtless peereth thirstily
 at the isles rich in fountains, where life reposeth under shady trees.
 
 But his thirst doth not persuade him to become like those comfortable
 ones: for where there are oases, there are also idols.
 
 Hungry, fierce, lonesome, God-forsaken: so doth the lion-will wish
 itself.
 
 Free from the happiness of slaves, redeemed from Deities and adorations,
 fearless and fear-inspiring, grand and lonesome: so is the will of the
 conscientious.
 
 In the wilderness have ever dwelt the conscientious, the free spirits,
 as lords of the wilderness; but in the cities dwell the well-foddered,
 famous wise ones--the draught-beasts.
 
 For, always, do they draw, as asses--the PEOPLE'S carts!
 
 Not that I on that account upbraid them: but serving ones do they
 remain, and harnessed ones, even though they glitter in golden harness.
 
 And often have they been good servants and worthy of their hire. For
 thus saith virtue: "If thou must be a servant, seek him unto whom thy
 service is most useful!
 
 The spirit and virtue of thy master shall advance by thou being his
 servant: thus wilt thou thyself advance with his spirit and virtue!"
 
 And verily, ye famous wise ones, ye servants of the people! Ye
 yourselves have advanced with the people's spirit and virtue--and the
 people by you! To your honour do I say it!
 
 But the people ye remain for me, even with your virtues, the people with
 purblind eyes--the people who know not what SPIRIT is!
 
 Spirit is life which itself cutteth into life: by its own torture doth
 it increase its own knowledge,--did ye know that before?
 
 And the spirit's happiness is this: to be anointed and consecrated with
 tears as a sacrificial victim,--did ye know that before?
 
 And the blindness of the blind one, and his seeking and groping, shall
 yet testify to the power of the sun into which he hath gazed,--did ye
 know that before?
 
 And with mountains shall the discerning one learn to BUILD! It is
 a small thing for the spirit to remove mountains,--did ye know that
 before?
 
 Ye know only the sparks of the spirit: but ye do not see the anvil which
 it is, and the cruelty of its hammer!
 
 Verily, ye know not the spirit's pride! But still less could ye endure
 the spirit's humility, should it ever want to speak!
 
 And never yet could ye cast your spirit into a pit of snow: ye are not
 hot enough for that! Thus are ye unaware, also, of the delight of its
 coldness.
 
 In all respects, however, ye make too familiar with the spirit; and out
 of wisdom have ye often made an almshouse and a hospital for bad poets.
 
 Ye are not eagles: thus have ye never experienced the happiness of the
 alarm of the spirit. And he who is not a bird should not camp above
 abysses.
 
 Ye seem to me lukewarm ones: but coldly floweth all deep knowledge.
 Ice-cold are the innermost wells of the spirit: a refreshment to hot
 hands and handlers.
 
 Respectable do ye there stand, and stiff, and with straight backs, ye
 famous wise ones!--no strong wind or will impelleth you.
 
 Have ye ne'er seen a sail crossing the sea, rounded and inflated, and
 trembling with the violence of the wind?
 
 Like the sail trembling with the violence of the spirit, doth my wisdom
 cross the sea--my wild wisdom!
 
 But ye servants of the people, ye famous wise ones--how COULD ye go with
 me!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXI. THE NIGHT-SONG.
 
 'Tis night: now do all gushing fountains speak louder. And my soul also
 is a gushing fountain.
 
 'Tis night: now only do all songs of the loving ones awake. And my soul
 also is the song of a loving one.
 
 Something unappeased, unappeasable, is within me; it longeth to find
 expression. A craving for love is within me, which speaketh itself the
 language of love.
 
 Light am I: ah, that I were night! But it is my lonesomeness to be
 begirt with light!
 
 Ah, that I were dark and nightly! How would I suck at the breasts of
 light!
 
 And you yourselves would I bless, ye twinkling starlets and glow-worms
 aloft!--and would rejoice in the gifts of your light.
 
 But I live in mine own light, I drink again into myself the flames that
 break forth from me.
 
 I know not the happiness of the receiver; and oft have I dreamt that
 stealing must be more blessed than receiving.
 
 It is my poverty that my hand never ceaseth bestowing; it is mine envy
 that I see waiting eyes and the brightened nights of longing.
 
 Oh, the misery of all bestowers! Oh, the darkening of my sun! Oh, the
 craving to crave! Oh, the violent hunger in satiety!
 
 They take from me: but do I yet touch their soul? There is a gap 'twixt
 giving and receiving; and the smallest gap hath finally to be bridged
 over.
 
 A hunger ariseth out of my beauty: I should like to injure those I
 illumine; I should like to rob those I have gifted:--thus do I hunger
 for wickedness.
 
 Withdrawing my hand when another hand already stretcheth out to it;
 hesitating like the cascade, which hesitateth even in its leap:--thus do
 I hunger for wickedness!
 
 Such revenge doth mine abundance think of: such mischief welleth out of
 my lonesomeness.
 
 My happiness in bestowing died in bestowing; my virtue became weary of
 itself by its abundance!
 
 He who ever bestoweth is in danger of losing his shame; to him who ever
 dispenseth, the hand and heart become callous by very dispensing.
 
 Mine eye no longer overfloweth for the shame of suppliants; my hand hath
 become too hard for the trembling of filled hands.
 
 Whence have gone the tears of mine eye, and the down of my heart? Oh,
 the lonesomeness of all bestowers! Oh, the silence of all shining ones!
 
 Many suns circle in desert space: to all that is dark do they speak with
 their light--but to me they are silent.
 
 Oh, this is the hostility of light to the shining one: unpityingly doth
 it pursue its course.
 
 Unfair to the shining one in its innermost heart, cold to the
 suns:--thus travelleth every sun.
 
 Like a storm do the suns pursue their courses: that is their travelling.
 Their inexorable will do they follow: that is their coldness.
 
 Oh, ye only is it, ye dark, nightly ones, that extract warmth from the
 shining ones! Oh, ye only drink milk and refreshment from the light's
 udders!
 
 Ah, there is ice around me; my hand burneth with the iciness! Ah, there
 is thirst in me; it panteth after your thirst!
 
 'Tis night: alas, that I have to be light! And thirst for the nightly!
 And lonesomeness!
 
 'Tis night: now doth my longing break forth in me as a fountain,--for
 speech do I long.
 
 'Tis night: now do all gushing fountains speak louder. And my soul also
 is a gushing fountain.
 
 'Tis night: now do all songs of loving ones awake. And my soul also is
 the song of a loving one.--
 
 Thus sang Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXII. THE DANCE-SONG.
 
 One evening went Zarathustra and his disciples through the forest; and
 when he sought for a well, lo, he lighted upon a green meadow peacefully
 surrounded with trees and bushes, where maidens were dancing together.
 As soon as the maidens recognised Zarathustra, they ceased dancing;
 Zarathustra, however, approached them with friendly mien and spake these
 words:
 
 Cease not your dancing, ye lovely maidens! No game-spoiler hath come to
 you with evil eye, no enemy of maidens.
 
 God's advocate am I with the devil: he, however, is the spirit of
 gravity. How could I, ye light-footed ones, be hostile to divine dances?
 Or to maidens' feet with fine ankles?
 
 To be sure, I am a forest, and a night of dark trees: but he who is not
 afraid of my darkness, will find banks full of roses under my cypresses.
 
 And even the little God may he find, who is dearest to maidens: beside
 the well lieth he quietly, with closed eyes.
 
 Verily, in broad daylight did he fall asleep, the sluggard! Had he
 perhaps chased butterflies too much?
 
 Upbraid me not, ye beautiful dancers, when I chasten the little God
 somewhat! He will cry, certainly, and weep--but he is laughable even
 when weeping!
 
 And with tears in his eyes shall he ask you for a dance; and I myself
 will sing a song to his dance:
 
 A dance-song and satire on the spirit of gravity my supremest,
 powerfulest devil, who is said to be "lord of the world."--
 
 And this is the song that Zarathustra sang when Cupid and the maidens
 danced together:
 
 Of late did I gaze into thine eye, O Life! And into the unfathomable did
 I there seem to sink.
 
 But thou pulledst me out with a golden angle; derisively didst thou
 laugh when I called thee unfathomable.
 
 "Such is the language of all fish," saidst thou; "what THEY do not
 fathom is unfathomable.
 
 But changeable am I only, and wild, and altogether a woman, and no
 virtuous one:
 
 Though I be called by you men the 'profound one,' or the 'faithful one,'
 'the eternal one,' 'the mysterious one.'
 
 But ye men endow us always with your own virtues--alas, ye virtuous
 ones!"
 
 Thus did she laugh, the unbelievable one; but never do I believe her and
 her laughter, when she speaketh evil of herself.
 
 And when I talked face to face with my wild Wisdom, she said to me
 angrily: "Thou willest, thou cravest, thou lovest; on that account alone
 dost thou PRAISE Life!"
 
 Then had I almost answered indignantly and told the truth to the angry
 one; and one cannot answer more indignantly than when one "telleth the
 truth" to one's Wisdom.
 
 For thus do things stand with us three. In my heart do I love only
 Life--and verily, most when I hate her!
 
 But that I am fond of Wisdom, and often too fond, is because she
 remindeth me very strongly of Life!
 
 She hath her eye, her laugh, and even her golden angle-rod: am I
 responsible for it that both are so alike?
 
 And when once Life asked me: "Who is she then, this Wisdom?"--then said
 I eagerly: "Ah, yes! Wisdom!
 
 One thirsteth for her and is not satisfied, one looketh through veils,
 one graspeth through nets.
 
 Is she beautiful? What do I know! But the oldest carps are still lured
 by her.
 
 Changeable is she, and wayward; often have I seen her bite her lip, and
 pass the comb against the grain of her hair.
 
 Perhaps she is wicked and false, and altogether a woman; but when she
 speaketh ill of herself, just then doth she seduce most."
 
 When I had said this unto Life, then laughed she maliciously, and shut
 her eyes. "Of whom dost thou speak?" said she. "Perhaps of me?
 
 And if thou wert right--is it proper to say THAT in such wise to my
 face! But now, pray, speak also of thy Wisdom!"
 
 Ah, and now hast thou again opened thine eyes, O beloved Life! And into
 the unfathomable have I again seemed to sink.--
 
 Thus sang Zarathustra. But when the dance was over and the maidens had
 departed, he became sad.
 
 "The sun hath been long set," said he at last, "the meadow is damp, and
 from the forest cometh coolness.
 
 An unknown presence is about me, and gazeth thoughtfully. What! Thou
 livest still, Zarathustra?
 
 Why? Wherefore? Whereby? Whither? Where? How? Is it not folly still to
 live?--
 
 Ah, my friends; the evening is it which thus interrogateth in me.
 Forgive me my sadness!
 
 Evening hath come on: forgive me that evening hath come on!"
 
 Thus sang Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIII. THE GRAVE-SONG.
 
 "Yonder is the grave-island, the silent isle; yonder also are the graves
 of my youth. Thither will I carry an evergreen wreath of life."
 
 Resolving thus in my heart, did I sail o'er the sea.--
 
 Oh, ye sights and scenes of my youth! Oh, all ye gleams of love, ye
 divine fleeting gleams! How could ye perish so soon for me! I think of
 you to-day as my dead ones.
 
 From you, my dearest dead ones, cometh unto me a sweet savour,
 heart-opening and melting. Verily, it convulseth and openeth the heart
 of the lone seafarer.
 
 Still am I the richest and most to be envied--I, the lonesomest one!
 For I HAVE POSSESSED you, and ye possess me still. Tell me: to whom hath
 there ever fallen such rosy apples from the tree as have fallen unto me?
 
 Still am I your love's heir and heritage, blooming to your memory with
 many-hued, wild-growing virtues, O ye dearest ones!
 
 Ah, we were made to remain nigh unto each other, ye kindly strange
 marvels; and not like timid birds did ye come to me and my longing--nay,
 but as trusting ones to a trusting one!
 
 Yea, made for faithfulness, like me, and for fond eternities, must I now
 name you by your faithlessness, ye divine glances and fleeting gleams:
 no other name have I yet learnt.
 
 Verily, too early did ye die for me, ye fugitives. Yet did ye not flee
 from me, nor did I flee from you: innocent are we to each other in our
 faithlessness.
 
 To kill ME, did they strangle you, ye singing birds of my hopes! Yea, at
 you, ye dearest ones, did malice ever shoot its arrows--to hit my heart!
 
 And they hit it! Because ye were always my dearest, my possession and my
 possessedness: ON THAT ACCOUNT had ye to die young, and far too early!
 
 At my most vulnerable point did they shoot the arrow--namely, at you,
 whose skin is like down--or more like the smile that dieth at a glance!
 
 But this word will I say unto mine enemies: What is all manslaughter in
 comparison with what ye have done unto me!
 
 Worse evil did ye do unto me than all manslaughter; the irretrievable
 did ye take from me:--thus do I speak unto you, mine enemies!
 
 Slew ye not my youth's visions and dearest marvels! My playmates took ye
 from me, the blessed spirits! To their memory do I deposit this wreath
 and this curse.
 
 This curse upon you, mine enemies! Have ye not made mine eternal short,
 as a tone dieth away in a cold night! Scarcely, as the twinkle of divine
 eyes, did it come to me--as a fleeting gleam!
 
 Thus spake once in a happy hour my purity: "Divine shall everything be
 unto me."
 
 Then did ye haunt me with foul phantoms; ah, whither hath that happy
 hour now fled!
 
 "All days shall be holy unto me"--so spake once the wisdom of my youth:
 verily, the language of a joyous wisdom!
 
 But then did ye enemies steal my nights, and sold them to sleepless
 torture: ah, whither hath that joyous wisdom now fled?
 
 Once did I long for happy auspices: then did ye lead an owl-monster
 across my path, an adverse sign. Ah, whither did my tender longing then
 flee?
 
 All loathing did I once vow to renounce: then did ye change my nigh ones
 and nearest ones into ulcerations. Ah, whither did my noblest vow then
 flee?
 
 As a blind one did I once walk in blessed ways: then did ye cast
 filth on the blind one's course: and now is he disgusted with the old
 footpath.
 
 And when I performed my hardest task, and celebrated the triumph of
 my victories, then did ye make those who loved me call out that I then
 grieved them most.
 
 Verily, it was always your doing: ye embittered to me my best honey, and
 the diligence of my best bees.
 
 To my charity have ye ever sent the most impudent beggars; around my
 sympathy have ye ever crowded the incurably shameless. Thus have ye
 wounded the faith of my virtue.
 
 And when I offered my holiest as a sacrifice, immediately did your
 "piety" put its fatter gifts beside it: so that my holiest suffocated in
 the fumes of your fat.
 
 And once did I want to dance as I had never yet danced: beyond all
 heavens did I want to dance. Then did ye seduce my favourite minstrel.
 
 And now hath he struck up an awful, melancholy air; alas, he tooted as a
 mournful horn to mine ear!
 
 Murderous minstrel, instrument of evil, most innocent instrument!
 Already did I stand prepared for the best dance: then didst thou slay my
 rapture with thy tones!
 
 Only in the dance do I know how to speak the parable of the highest
 things:--and now hath my grandest parable remained unspoken in my limbs!
 
 Unspoken and unrealised hath my highest hope remained! And there have
 perished for me all the visions and consolations of my youth!
 
 How did I ever bear it? How did I survive and surmount such wounds? How
 did my soul rise again out of those sepulchres?
 
 Yea, something invulnerable, unburiable is with me, something that would
 rend rocks asunder: it is called MY WILL. Silently doth it proceed, and
 unchanged throughout the years.
 
 Its course will it go upon my feet, mine old Will; hard of heart is its
 nature and invulnerable.
 
 Invulnerable am I only in my heel. Ever livest thou there, and art like
 thyself, thou most patient one! Ever hast thou burst all shackles of the
 tomb!
 
 In thee still liveth also the unrealisedness of my youth; and as life
 and youth sittest thou here hopeful on the yellow ruins of graves.
 
 Yea, thou art still for me the demolisher of all graves: Hail to thee,
 my Will! And only where there are graves are there resurrections.--
 
 Thus sang Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIV. SELF-SURPASSING.
 
 "Will to Truth" do ye call it, ye wisest ones, that which impelleth you
 and maketh you ardent?
 
 Will for the thinkableness of all being: thus do _I_ call your will!
 
 All being would ye MAKE thinkable: for ye doubt with good reason whether
 it be already thinkable.
 
 But it shall accommodate and bend itself to you! So willeth your will.
 Smooth shall it become and subject to the spirit, as its mirror and
 reflection.
 
 That is your entire will, ye wisest ones, as a Will to Power; and even
 when ye speak of good and evil, and of estimates of value.
 
 Ye would still create a world before which ye can bow the knee: such is
 your ultimate hope and ecstasy.
 
 The ignorant, to be sure, the people--they are like a river on which a
 boat floateth along: and in the boat sit the estimates of value, solemn
 and disguised.
 
 Your will and your valuations have ye put on the river of becoming; it
 betrayeth unto me an old Will to Power, what is believed by the people
 as good and evil.
 
 It was ye, ye wisest ones, who put such guests in this boat, and gave
 them pomp and proud names--ye and your ruling Will!
 
 Onward the river now carrieth your boat: it MUST carry it. A small
 matter if the rough wave foameth and angrily resisteth its keel!
 
 It is not the river that is your danger and the end of your good and
 evil, ye wisest ones: but that Will itself, the Will to Power--the
 unexhausted, procreating life-will.
 
 But that ye may understand my gospel of good and evil, for that purpose
 will I tell you my gospel of life, and of the nature of all living
 things.
 
 The living thing did I follow; I walked in the broadest and narrowest
 paths to learn its nature.
 
 With a hundred-faced mirror did I catch its glance when its mouth was
 shut, so that its eye might speak unto me. And its eye spake unto me.
 
 But wherever I found living things, there heard I also the language of
 obedience. All living things are obeying things.
 
 And this heard I secondly: Whatever cannot obey itself, is commanded.
 Such is the nature of living things.
 
 This, however, is the third thing which I heard--namely, that commanding
 is more difficult than obeying. And not only because the commander
 beareth the burden of all obeyers, and because this burden readily
 crusheth him:--
 
 An attempt and a risk seemed all commanding unto me; and whenever it
 commandeth, the living thing risketh itself thereby.
 
 Yea, even when it commandeth itself, then also must it atone for its
 commanding. Of its own law must it become the judge and avenger and
 victim.
 
 How doth this happen! so did I ask myself. What persuadeth the living
 thing to obey, and command, and even be obedient in commanding?
 
 Hearken now unto my word, ye wisest ones! Test it seriously, whether
 I have crept into the heart of life itself, and into the roots of its
 heart!
 
 Wherever I found a living thing, there found I Will to Power; and even
 in the will of the servant found I the will to be master.
 
 That to the stronger the weaker shall serve--thereto persuadeth he his
 will who would be master over a still weaker one. That delight alone he
 is unwilling to forego.
 
 And as the lesser surrendereth himself to the greater that he may have
 delight and power over the least of all, so doth even the greatest
 surrender himself, and staketh--life, for the sake of power.
 
 It is the surrender of the greatest to run risk and danger, and play
 dice for death.
 
 And where there is sacrifice and service and love-glances, there also
 is the will to be master. By by-ways doth the weaker then slink into
 the fortress, and into the heart of the mightier one--and there stealeth
 power.
 
 And this secret spake Life herself unto me. "Behold," said she, "I am
 that WHICH MUST EVER SURPASS ITSELF.
 
 To be sure, ye call it will to procreation, or impulse towards a goal,
 towards the higher, remoter, more manifold: but all that is one and the
 same secret.
 
 Rather would I succumb than disown this one thing; and verily, where
 there is succumbing and leaf-falling, lo, there doth Life sacrifice
 itself--for power!
 
 That I have to be struggle, and becoming, and purpose, and
 cross-purpose--ah, he who divineth my will, divineth well also on what
 CROOKED paths it hath to tread!
 
 Whatever I create, and however much I love it,--soon must I be adverse
 to it, and to my love: so willeth my will.
 
 And even thou, discerning one, art only a path and footstep of my will:
 verily, my Will to Power walketh even on the feet of thy Will to Truth!
 
 He certainly did not hit the truth who shot at it the formula: 'Will to
 existence': that will--doth not exist!
 
 For what is not, cannot will; that, however, which is in existence--how
 could it still strive for existence!
 
 Only where there is life, is there also will: not, however, Will to
 Life, but--so teach I thee--Will to Power!
 
 Much is reckoned higher than life itself by the living one; but out of
 the very reckoning speaketh--the Will to Power!"--
 
 Thus did Life once teach me: and thereby, ye wisest ones, do I solve you
 the riddle of your hearts.
 
 Verily, I say unto you: good and evil which would be everlasting--it
 doth not exist! Of its own accord must it ever surpass itself anew.
 
 With your values and formulae of good and evil, ye exercise power,
 ye valuing ones: and that is your secret love, and the sparkling,
 trembling, and overflowing of your souls.
 
 But a stronger power groweth out of your values, and a new surpassing:
 by it breaketh egg and egg-shell.
 
 And he who hath to be a creator in good and evil--verily, he hath first
 to be a destroyer, and break values in pieces.
 
 Thus doth the greatest evil pertain to the greatest good: that, however,
 is the creating good.--
 
 Let us SPEAK thereof, ye wisest ones, even though it be bad. To be
 silent is worse; all suppressed truths become poisonous.
 
 And let everything break up which--can break up by our truths! Many a
 house is still to be built!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXV. THE SUBLIME ONES.
 
 Calm is the bottom of my sea: who would guess that it hideth droll
 monsters!
 
 Unmoved is my depth: but it sparkleth with swimming enigmas and
 laughters.
 
 A sublime one saw I to-day, a solemn one, a penitent of the spirit: Oh,
 how my soul laughed at his ugliness!
 
 With upraised breast, and like those who draw in their breath: thus did
 he stand, the sublime one, and in silence:
 
 O'erhung with ugly truths, the spoil of his hunting, and rich in torn
 raiment; many thorns also hung on him--but I saw no rose.
 
 Not yet had he learned laughing and beauty. Gloomy did this hunter
 return from the forest of knowledge.
 
 From the fight with wild beasts returned he home: but even yet a wild
 beast gazeth out of his seriousness--an unconquered wild beast!
 
 As a tiger doth he ever stand, on the point of springing; but I do not
 like those strained souls; ungracious is my taste towards all those
 self-engrossed ones.
 
 And ye tell me, friends, that there is to be no dispute about taste and
 tasting? But all life is a dispute about taste and tasting!
 
 Taste: that is weight at the same time, and scales and weigher; and alas
 for every living thing that would live without dispute about weight and
 scales and weigher!
 
 Should he become weary of his sublimeness, this sublime one, then only
 will his beauty begin--and then only will I taste him and find him
 savoury.
 
 And only when he turneth away from himself will he o'erleap his own
 shadow--and verily! into HIS sun.
 
 Far too long did he sit in the shade; the cheeks of the penitent of the
 spirit became pale; he almost starved on his expectations.
 
 Contempt is still in his eye, and loathing hideth in his mouth. To be
 sure, he now resteth, but he hath not yet taken rest in the sunshine.
 
 As the ox ought he to do; and his happiness should smell of the earth,
 and not of contempt for the earth.
 
 As a white ox would I like to see him, which, snorting and lowing,
 walketh before the plough-share: and his lowing should also laud all
 that is earthly!
 
 Dark is still his countenance; the shadow of his hand danceth upon it.
 O'ershadowed is still the sense of his eye.
 
 His deed itself is still the shadow upon him: his doing obscureth the
 doer. Not yet hath he overcome his deed.
 
 To be sure, I love in him the shoulders of the ox: but now do I want to
 see also the eye of the angel.
 
 Also his hero-will hath he still to unlearn: an exalted one shall he
 be, and not only a sublime one:--the ether itself should raise him, the
 will-less one!
 
 He hath subdued monsters, he hath solved enigmas. But he should also
 redeem his monsters and enigmas; into heavenly children should he
 transform them.
 
 As yet hath his knowledge not learned to smile, and to be without
 jealousy; as yet hath his gushing passion not become calm in beauty.
 
 Verily, not in satiety shall his longing cease and disappear, but in
 beauty! Gracefulness belongeth to the munificence of the magnanimous.
 
 His arm across his head: thus should the hero repose; thus should he
 also surmount his repose.
 
 But precisely to the hero is BEAUTY the hardest thing of all.
 Unattainable is beauty by all ardent wills.
 
 A little more, a little less: precisely this is much here, it is the
 most here.
 
 To stand with relaxed muscles and with unharnessed will: that is the
 hardest for all of you, ye sublime ones!
 
 When power becometh gracious and descendeth into the visible--I call
 such condescension, beauty.
 
 And from no one do I want beauty so much as from thee, thou powerful
 one: let thy goodness be thy last self-conquest.
 
 All evil do I accredit to thee: therefore do I desire of thee the good.
 
 Verily, I have often laughed at the weaklings, who think themselves good
 because they have crippled paws!
 
 The virtue of the pillar shalt thou strive after: more beautiful doth
 it ever become, and more graceful--but internally harder and more
 sustaining--the higher it riseth.
 
 Yea, thou sublime one, one day shalt thou also be beautiful, and hold up
 the mirror to thine own beauty.
 
 Then will thy soul thrill with divine desires; and there will be
 adoration even in thy vanity!
 
 For this is the secret of the soul: when the hero hath abandoned it,
 then only approacheth it in dreams--the superhero.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVI. THE LAND OF CULTURE.
 
 Too far did I fly into the future: a horror seized upon me.
 
 And when I looked around me, lo! there time was my sole contemporary.
 
 Then did I fly backwards, homewards--and always faster. Thus did I come
 unto you, ye present-day men, and into the land of culture.
 
 For the first time brought I an eye to see you, and good desire: verily,
 with longing in my heart did I come.
 
 But how did it turn out with me? Although so alarmed--I had yet to
 laugh! Never did mine eye see anything so motley-coloured!
 
 I laughed and laughed, while my foot still trembled, and my heart as
 well. "Here forsooth, is the home of all the paintpots,"--said I.
 
 With fifty patches painted on faces and limbs--so sat ye there to mine
 astonishment, ye present-day men!
 
 And with fifty mirrors around you, which flattered your play of colours,
 and repeated it!
 
 Verily, ye could wear no better masks, ye present-day men, than your own
 faces! Who could--RECOGNISE you!
 
 Written all over with the characters of the past, and these characters
 also pencilled over with new characters--thus have ye concealed
 yourselves well from all decipherers!
 
 And though one be a trier of the reins, who still believeth that ye have
 reins! Out of colours ye seem to be baked, and out of glued scraps.
 
 All times and peoples gaze divers-coloured out of your veils; all
 customs and beliefs speak divers-coloured out of your gestures.
 
 He who would strip you of veils and wrappers, and paints and gestures,
 would just have enough left to scare the crows.
 
 Verily, I myself am the scared crow that once saw you naked, and without
 paint; and I flew away when the skeleton ogled at me.
 
 Rather would I be a day-labourer in the nether-world, and among the
 shades of the by-gone!--Fatter and fuller than ye, are forsooth the
 nether-worldlings!
 
 This, yea this, is bitterness to my bowels, that I can neither endure
 you naked nor clothed, ye present-day men!
 
 All that is unhomelike in the future, and whatever maketh strayed birds
 shiver, is verily more homelike and familiar than your "reality."
 
 For thus speak ye: "Real are we wholly, and without faith and
 superstition": thus do ye plume yourselves--alas! even without plumes!
 
 Indeed, how would ye be ABLE to believe, ye divers-coloured ones!--ye
 who are pictures of all that hath ever been believed!
 
 Perambulating refutations are ye, of belief itself, and a dislocation of
 all thought. UNTRUSTWORTHY ONES: thus do _I_ call you, ye real ones!
 
 All periods prate against one another in your spirits; and the dreams
 and pratings of all periods were even realer than your awakeness!
 
 Unfruitful are ye: THEREFORE do ye lack belief. But he who had to
 create, had always his presaging dreams and astral premonitions--and
 believed in believing!--
 
 Half-open doors are ye, at which grave-diggers wait. And this is YOUR
 reality: "Everything deserveth to perish."
 
 Alas, how ye stand there before me, ye unfruitful ones; how lean your
 ribs! And many of you surely have had knowledge thereof.
 
 Many a one hath said: "There hath surely a God filched something from
 me secretly whilst I slept? Verily, enough to make a girl for himself
 therefrom!
 
 "Amazing is the poverty of my ribs!" thus hath spoken many a present-day
 man.
 
 Yea, ye are laughable unto me, ye present-day men! And especially when
 ye marvel at yourselves!
 
 And woe unto me if I could not laugh at your marvelling, and had to
 swallow all that is repugnant in your platters!
 
 As it is, however, I will make lighter of you, since I have to carry
 what is heavy; and what matter if beetles and May-bugs also alight on my
 load!
 
 Verily, it shall not on that account become heavier to me! And not from
 you, ye present-day men, shall my great weariness arise.--
 
 Ah, whither shall I now ascend with my longing! From all mountains do I
 look out for fatherlands and motherlands.
 
 But a home have I found nowhere: unsettled am I in all cities, and
 decamping at all gates.
 
 Alien to me, and a mockery, are the present-day men, to whom of late my
 heart impelled me; and exiled am I from fatherlands and motherlands.
 
 Thus do I love only my CHILDREN'S LAND, the undiscovered in the remotest
 sea: for it do I bid my sails search and search.
 
 Unto my children will I make amends for being the child of my fathers:
 and unto all the future--for THIS present-day!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVII. IMMACULATE PERCEPTION.
 
 When yester-eve the moon arose, then did I fancy it about to bear a sun:
 so broad and teeming did it lie on the horizon.
 
 But it was a liar with its pregnancy; and sooner will I believe in the
 man in the moon than in the woman.
 
 To be sure, little of a man is he also, that timid night-reveller.
 Verily, with a bad conscience doth he stalk over the roofs.
 
 For he is covetous and jealous, the monk in the moon; covetous of the
 earth, and all the joys of lovers.
 
 Nay, I like him not, that tom-cat on the roofs! Hateful unto me are all
 that slink around half-closed windows!
 
 Piously and silently doth he stalk along on the star-carpets:--but I
 like no light-treading human feet, on which not even a spur jingleth.
 
 Every honest one's step speaketh; the cat however, stealeth along over
 the ground. Lo! cat-like doth the moon come along, and dishonestly.--
 
 This parable speak I unto you sentimental dissemblers, unto you, the
 "pure discerners!" You do _I_ call--covetous ones!
 
 Also ye love the earth, and the earthly: I have divined you well!--but
 shame is in your love, and a bad conscience--ye are like the moon!
 
 To despise the earthly hath your spirit been persuaded, but not your
 bowels: these, however, are the strongest in you!
 
 And now is your spirit ashamed to be at the service of your bowels, and
 goeth by-ways and lying ways to escape its own shame.
 
 "That would be the highest thing for me"--so saith your lying spirit
 unto itself--"to gaze upon life without desire, and not like the dog,
 with hanging-out tongue:
 
 To be happy in gazing: with dead will, free from the grip and greed
 of selfishness--cold and ashy-grey all over, but with intoxicated
 moon-eyes!
 
 That would be the dearest thing to me"--thus doth the seduced one seduce
 himself,--"to love the earth as the moon loveth it, and with the eye
 only to feel its beauty.
 
 And this do I call IMMACULATE perception of all things: to want nothing
 else from them, but to be allowed to lie before them as a mirror with a
 hundred facets."--
 
 Oh, ye sentimental dissemblers, ye covetous ones! Ye lack innocence in
 your desire: and now do ye defame desiring on that account!
 
 Verily, not as creators, as procreators, or as jubilators do ye love the
 earth!
 
 Where is innocence? Where there is will to procreation. And he who
 seeketh to create beyond himself, hath for me the purest will.
 
 Where is beauty? Where I MUST WILL with my whole Will; where I will love
 and perish, that an image may not remain merely an image.
 
 Loving and perishing: these have rhymed from eternity. Will to love:
 that is to be ready also for death. Thus do I speak unto you cowards!
 
 But now doth your emasculated ogling profess to be "contemplation!"
 And that which can be examined with cowardly eyes is to be christened
 "beautiful!" Oh, ye violators of noble names!
 
 But it shall be your curse, ye immaculate ones, ye pure discerners, that
 ye shall never bring forth, even though ye lie broad and teeming on the
 horizon!
 
 Verily, ye fill your mouth with noble words: and we are to believe that
 your heart overfloweth, ye cozeners?
 
 But MY words are poor, contemptible, stammering words: gladly do I pick
 up what falleth from the table at your repasts.
 
 Yet still can I say therewith the truth--to dissemblers! Yea, my
 fish-bones, shells, and prickly leaves shall--tickle the noses of
 dissemblers!
 
 Bad air is always about you and your repasts: your lascivious thoughts,
 your lies, and secrets are indeed in the air!
 
 Dare only to believe in yourselves--in yourselves and in your inward
 parts! He who doth not believe in himself always lieth.
 
 A God's mask have ye hung in front of you, ye "pure ones": into a God's
 mask hath your execrable coiling snake crawled.
 
 Verily ye deceive, ye "contemplative ones!" Even Zarathustra was once
 the dupe of your godlike exterior; he did not divine the serpent's coil
 with which it was stuffed.
 
 A God's soul, I once thought I saw playing in your games, ye pure
 discerners! No better arts did I once dream of than your arts!
 
 Serpents' filth and evil odour, the distance concealed from me: and that
 a lizard's craft prowled thereabouts lasciviously.
 
 But I came NIGH unto you: then came to me the day,--and now cometh it to
 you,--at an end is the moon's love affair!
 
 See there! Surprised and pale doth it stand--before the rosy dawn!
 
 For already she cometh, the glowing one,--HER love to the earth cometh!
 Innocence and creative desire, is all solar love!
 
 See there, how she cometh impatiently over the sea! Do ye not feel the
 thirst and the hot breath of her love?
 
 At the sea would she suck, and drink its depths to her height: now
 riseth the desire of the sea with its thousand breasts.
 
 Kissed and sucked WOULD it be by the thirst of the sun; vapour WOULD it
 become, and height, and path of light, and light itself!
 
 Verily, like the sun do I love life, and all deep seas.
 
 And this meaneth TO ME knowledge: all that is deep shall ascend--to my
 height!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVIII. SCHOLARS.
 
 When I lay asleep, then did a sheep eat at the ivy-wreath on my
 head,--it ate, and said thereby: "Zarathustra is no longer a scholar."
 
 It said this, and went away clumsily and proudly. A child told it to me.
 
 I like to lie here where the children play, beside the ruined wall,
 among thistles and red poppies.
 
 A scholar am I still to the children, and also to the thistles and red
 poppies. Innocent are they, even in their wickedness.
 
 But to the sheep I am no longer a scholar: so willeth my lot--blessings
 upon it!
 
 For this is the truth: I have departed from the house of the scholars,
 and the door have I also slammed behind me.
 
 Too long did my soul sit hungry at their table: not like them have I got
 the knack of investigating, as the knack of nut-cracking.
 
 Freedom do I love, and the air over fresh soil; rather would I sleep on
 ox-skins than on their honours and dignities.
 
 I am too hot and scorched with mine own thought: often is it ready to
 take away my breath. Then have I to go into the open air, and away from
 all dusty rooms.
 
 But they sit cool in the cool shade: they want in everything to be
 merely spectators, and they avoid sitting where the sun burneth on the
 steps.
 
 Like those who stand in the street and gape at the passers-by: thus do
 they also wait, and gape at the thoughts which others have thought.
 
 Should one lay hold of them, then do they raise a dust like flour-sacks,
 and involuntarily: but who would divine that their dust came from corn,
 and from the yellow delight of the summer fields?
 
 When they give themselves out as wise, then do their petty sayings and
 truths chill me: in their wisdom there is often an odour as if it came
 from the swamp; and verily, I have even heard the frog croak in it!
 
 Clever are they--they have dexterous fingers: what doth MY simplicity
 pretend to beside their multiplicity! All threading and knitting and
 weaving do their fingers understand: thus do they make the hose of the
 spirit!
 
 Good clockworks are they: only be careful to wind them up properly!
 Then do they indicate the hour without mistake, and make a modest noise
 thereby.
 
 Like millstones do they work, and like pestles: throw only seed-corn
 unto them!--they know well how to grind corn small, and make white dust
 out of it.
 
 They keep a sharp eye on one another, and do not trust each other the
 best. Ingenious in little artifices, they wait for those whose knowledge
 walketh on lame feet,--like spiders do they wait.
 
 I saw them always prepare their poison with precaution; and always did
 they put glass gloves on their fingers in doing so.
 
 They also know how to play with false dice; and so eagerly did I find
 them playing, that they perspired thereby.
 
 We are alien to each other, and their virtues are even more repugnant to
 my taste than their falsehoods and false dice.
 
 And when I lived with them, then did I live above them. Therefore did
 they take a dislike to me.
 
 They want to hear nothing of any one walking above their heads; and so
 they put wood and earth and rubbish betwixt me and their heads.
 
 Thus did they deafen the sound of my tread: and least have I hitherto
 been heard by the most learned.
 
 All mankind's faults and weaknesses did they put betwixt themselves and
 me:--they call it "false ceiling" in their houses.
 
 But nevertheless I walk with my thoughts ABOVE their heads; and even
 should I walk on mine own errors, still would I be above them and their
 heads.
 
 For men are NOT equal: so speaketh justice. And what I will, THEY may
 not will!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIX. POETS.
 
 "Since I have known the body better"--said Zarathustra to one of his
 disciples--"the spirit hath only been to me symbolically spirit; and all
 the 'imperishable'--that is also but a simile."
 
 "So have I heard thee say once before," answered the disciple, "and then
 thou addedst: 'But the poets lie too much.' Why didst thou say that the
 poets lie too much?"
 
 "Why?" said Zarathustra. "Thou askest why? I do not belong to those who
 may be asked after their Why.
 
 Is my experience but of yesterday? It is long ago that I experienced the
 reasons for mine opinions.
 
 Should I not have to be a cask of memory, if I also wanted to have my
 reasons with me?
 
 It is already too much for me even to retain mine opinions; and many a
 bird flieth away.
 
 And sometimes, also, do I find a fugitive creature in my dovecote, which
 is alien to me, and trembleth when I lay my hand upon it.
 
 But what did Zarathustra once say unto thee? That the poets lie too
 much?--But Zarathustra also is a poet.
 
 Believest thou that he there spake the truth? Why dost thou believe it?"
 
 The disciple answered: "I believe in Zarathustra." But Zarathustra shook
 his head and smiled.--
 
 Belief doth not sanctify me, said he, least of all the belief in myself.
 
 But granting that some one did say in all seriousness that the poets lie
 too much: he was right--WE do lie too much.
 
 We also know too little, and are bad learners: so we are obliged to lie.
 
 And which of us poets hath not adulterated his wine? Many a poisonous
 hotchpotch hath evolved in our cellars: many an indescribable thing hath
 there been done.
 
 And because we know little, therefore are we pleased from the heart with
 the poor in spirit, especially when they are young women!
 
 And even of those things are we desirous, which old women tell one
 another in the evening. This do we call the eternally feminine in us.
 
 And as if there were a special secret access to knowledge, which CHOKETH
 UP for those who learn anything, so do we believe in the people and in
 their "wisdom."
 
 This, however, do all poets believe: that whoever pricketh up his ears
 when lying in the grass or on lonely slopes, learneth something of the
 things that are betwixt heaven and earth.
 
 And if there come unto them tender emotions, then do the poets always
 think that nature herself is in love with them:
 
 And that she stealeth to their ear to whisper secrets into it, and
 amorous flatteries: of this do they plume and pride themselves, before
 all mortals!
 
 Ah, there are so many things betwixt heaven and earth of which only the
 poets have dreamed!
 
 And especially ABOVE the heavens: for all Gods are poet-symbolisations,
 poet-sophistications!
 
 Verily, ever are we drawn aloft--that is, to the realm of the clouds:
 on these do we set our gaudy puppets, and then call them Gods and
 Supermen:--
 
 Are not they light enough for those chairs!--all these Gods and
 Supermen?--
 
 Ah, how I am weary of all the inadequate that is insisted on as actual!
 Ah, how I am weary of the poets!
 
 When Zarathustra so spake, his disciple resented it, but was silent. And
 Zarathustra also was silent; and his eye directed itself inwardly, as if
 it gazed into the far distance. At last he sighed and drew breath.--
 
 I am of to-day and heretofore, said he thereupon; but something is in me
 that is of the morrow, and the day following, and the hereafter.
 
 I became weary of the poets, of the old and of the new: superficial are
 they all unto me, and shallow seas.
 
 They did not think sufficiently into the depth; therefore their feeling
 did not reach to the bottom.
 
 Some sensation of voluptuousness and some sensation of tedium: these
 have as yet been their best contemplation.
 
 Ghost-breathing and ghost-whisking, seemeth to me all the
 jingle-jangling of their harps; what have they known hitherto of the
 fervour of tones!--
 
 They are also not pure enough for me: they all muddle their water that
 it may seem deep.
 
 And fain would they thereby prove themselves reconcilers: but mediaries
 and mixers are they unto me, and half-and-half, and impure!--
 
 Ah, I cast indeed my net into their sea, and meant to catch good fish;
 but always did I draw up the head of some ancient God.
 
 Thus did the sea give a stone to the hungry one. And they themselves may
 well originate from the sea.
 
 Certainly, one findeth pearls in them: thereby they are the more like
 hard molluscs. And instead of a soul, I have often found in them salt
 slime.
 
 They have learned from the sea also its vanity: is not the sea the
 peacock of peacocks?
 
 Even before the ugliest of all buffaloes doth it spread out its tail;
 never doth it tire of its lace-fan of silver and silk.
 
 Disdainfully doth the buffalo glance thereat, nigh to the sand with its
 soul, nigher still to the thicket, nighest, however, to the swamp.
 
 What is beauty and sea and peacock-splendour to it! This parable I speak
 unto the poets.
 
 Verily, their spirit itself is the peacock of peacocks, and a sea of
 vanity!
 
 Spectators, seeketh the spirit of the poet--should they even be
 buffaloes!--
 
 But of this spirit became I weary; and I see the time coming when it
 will become weary of itself.
 
 Yea, changed have I seen the poets, and their glance turned towards
 themselves.
 
 Penitents of the spirit have I seen appearing; they grew out of the
 poets.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XL. GREAT EVENTS.
 
 There is an isle in the sea--not far from the Happy Isles of
 Zarathustra--on which a volcano ever smoketh; of which isle the people,
 and especially the old women amongst them, say that it is placed as a
 rock before the gate of the nether-world; but that through the volcano
 itself the narrow way leadeth downwards which conducteth to this gate.
 
 Now about the time that Zarathustra sojourned on the Happy Isles, it
 happened that a ship anchored at the isle on which standeth the smoking
 mountain, and the crew went ashore to shoot rabbits. About the noontide
 hour, however, when the captain and his men were together again, they
 saw suddenly a man coming towards them through the air, and a voice said
 distinctly: "It is time! It is the highest time!" But when the figure
 was nearest to them (it flew past quickly, however, like a shadow, in
 the direction of the volcano), then did they recognise with the greatest
 surprise that it was Zarathustra; for they had all seen him before
 except the captain himself, and they loved him as the people love: in
 such wise that love and awe were combined in equal degree.
 
 "Behold!" said the old helmsman, "there goeth Zarathustra to hell!"
 
 About the same time that these sailors landed on the fire-isle, there
 was a rumour that Zarathustra had disappeared; and when his friends were
 asked about it, they said that he had gone on board a ship by night,
 without saying whither he was going.
 
 Thus there arose some uneasiness. After three days, however, there came
 the story of the ship's crew in addition to this uneasiness--and
 then did all the people say that the devil had taken Zarathustra. His
 disciples laughed, sure enough, at this talk; and one of them said even:
 "Sooner would I believe that Zarathustra hath taken the devil." But at
 the bottom of their hearts they were all full of anxiety and longing: so
 their joy was great when on the fifth day Zarathustra appeared amongst
 them.
 
 And this is the account of Zarathustra's interview with the fire-dog:
 
 The earth, said he, hath a skin; and this skin hath diseases. One of
 these diseases, for example, is called "man."
 
 And another of these diseases is called "the fire-dog": concerning HIM
 men have greatly deceived themselves, and let themselves be deceived.
 
 To fathom this mystery did I go o'er the sea; and I have seen the truth
 naked, verily! barefooted up to the neck.
 
 Now do I know how it is concerning the fire-dog; and likewise concerning
 all the spouting and subversive devils, of which not only old women are
 afraid.
 
 "Up with thee, fire-dog, out of thy depth!" cried I, "and confess how
 deep that depth is! Whence cometh that which thou snortest up?
 
 Thou drinkest copiously at the sea: that doth thine embittered eloquence
 betray! In sooth, for a dog of the depth, thou takest thy nourishment
 too much from the surface!
 
 At the most, I regard thee as the ventriloquist of the earth: and ever,
 when I have heard subversive and spouting devils speak, I have found
 them like thee: embittered, mendacious, and shallow.
 
 Ye understand how to roar and obscure with ashes! Ye are the best
 braggarts, and have sufficiently learned the art of making dregs boil.
 
 Where ye are, there must always be dregs at hand, and much that is
 spongy, hollow, and compressed: it wanteth to have freedom.
 
 'Freedom' ye all roar most eagerly: but I have unlearned the belief in
 'great events,' when there is much roaring and smoke about them.
 
 And believe me, friend Hullabaloo! The greatest events--are not our
 noisiest, but our stillest hours.
 
 Not around the inventors of new noise, but around the inventors of new
 values, doth the world revolve; INAUDIBLY it revolveth.
 
 And just own to it! Little had ever taken place when thy noise and smoke
 passed away. What, if a city did become a mummy, and a statue lay in the
 mud!
 
 And this do I say also to the o'erthrowers of statues: It is certainly
 the greatest folly to throw salt into the sea, and statues into the mud.
 
 In the mud of your contempt lay the statue: but it is just its law, that
 out of contempt, its life and living beauty grow again!
 
 With diviner features doth it now arise, seducing by its suffering; and
 verily! it will yet thank you for o'erthrowing it, ye subverters!
 
 This counsel, however, do I counsel to kings and churches, and to all
 that is weak with age or virtue--let yourselves be o'erthrown! That ye
 may again come to life, and that virtue--may come to you!--"
 
 Thus spake I before the fire-dog: then did he interrupt me sullenly, and
 asked: "Church? What is that?"
 
 "Church?" answered I, "that is a kind of state, and indeed the most
 mendacious. But remain quiet, thou dissembling dog! Thou surely knowest
 thine own species best!
 
 Like thyself the state is a dissembling dog; like thee doth it like
 to speak with smoke and roaring--to make believe, like thee, that it
 speaketh out of the heart of things.
 
 For it seeketh by all means to be the most important creature on earth,
 the state; and people think it so."
 
 When I had said this, the fire-dog acted as if mad with envy. "What!"
 cried he, "the most important creature on earth? And people think it
 so?" And so much vapour and terrible voices came out of his throat, that
 I thought he would choke with vexation and envy.
 
 At last he became calmer and his panting subsided; as soon, however, as
 he was quiet, I said laughingly:
 
 "Thou art angry, fire-dog: so I am in the right about thee!
 
 And that I may also maintain the right, hear the story of another
 fire-dog; he speaketh actually out of the heart of the earth.
 
 Gold doth his breath exhale, and golden rain: so doth his heart desire.
 What are ashes and smoke and hot dregs to him!
 
 Laughter flitteth from him like a variegated cloud; adverse is he to thy
 gargling and spewing and grips in the bowels!
 
 The gold, however, and the laughter--these doth he take out of the heart
 of the earth: for, that thou mayst know it,--THE HEART OF THE EARTH IS
 OF GOLD."
 
 When the fire-dog heard this, he could no longer endure to listen to me.
 Abashed did he draw in his tail, said "bow-wow!" in a cowed voice, and
 crept down into his cave.--
 
 Thus told Zarathustra. His disciples, however, hardly listened to him:
 so great was their eagerness to tell him about the sailors, the rabbits,
 and the flying man.
 
 "What am I to think of it!" said Zarathustra. "Am I indeed a ghost?
 
 But it may have been my shadow. Ye have surely heard something of the
 Wanderer and his Shadow?
 
 One thing, however, is certain: I must keep a tighter hold of it;
 otherwise it will spoil my reputation."
 
 And once more Zarathustra shook his head and wondered. "What am I to
 think of it!" said he once more.
 
 "Why did the ghost cry: 'It is time! It is the highest time!'
 
 For WHAT is it then--the highest time?"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XLI. THE SOOTHSAYER.
 
 "-And I saw a great sadness come over mankind. The best turned weary of
 their works.
 
 A doctrine appeared, a faith ran beside it: 'All is empty, all is alike,
 all hath been!'
 
 And from all hills there re-echoed: 'All is empty, all is alike, all
 hath been!'
 
 To be sure we have harvested: but why have all our fruits become rotten
 and brown? What was it fell last night from the evil moon?
 
 In vain was all our labour, poison hath our wine become, the evil eye
 hath singed yellow our fields and hearts.
 
 Arid have we all become; and fire falling upon us, then do we turn dust
 like ashes:--yea, the fire itself have we made aweary.
 
 All our fountains have dried up, even the sea hath receded. All the
 ground trieth to gape, but the depth will not swallow!
 
 'Alas! where is there still a sea in which one could be drowned?' so
 soundeth our plaint--across shallow swamps.
 
 Verily, even for dying have we become too weary; now do we keep awake
 and live on--in sepulchres."
 
 Thus did Zarathustra hear a soothsayer speak; and the foreboding touched
 his heart and transformed him. Sorrowfully did he go about and wearily;
 and he became like unto those of whom the soothsayer had spoken.--
 
 Verily, said he unto his disciples, a little while, and there cometh the
 long twilight. Alas, how shall I preserve my light through it!
 
 That it may not smother in this sorrowfulness! To remoter worlds shall
 it be a light, and also to remotest nights!
 
 Thus did Zarathustra go about grieved in his heart, and for three days
 he did not take any meat or drink: he had no rest, and lost his speech.
 At last it came to pass that he fell into a deep sleep. His disciples,
 however, sat around him in long night-watches, and waited anxiously to
 see if he would awake, and speak again, and recover from his affliction.
 
 And this is the discourse that Zarathustra spake when he awoke; his
 voice, however, came unto his disciples as from afar:
 
 Hear, I pray you, the dream that I dreamed, my friends, and help me to
 divine its meaning!
 
 A riddle is it still unto me, this dream; the meaning is hidden in it
 and encaged, and doth not yet fly above it on free pinions.
 
 All life had I renounced, so I dreamed. Night-watchman and
 grave-guardian had I become, aloft, in the lone mountain-fortress of
 Death.
 
 There did I guard his coffins: full stood the musty vaults of those
 trophies of victory. Out of glass coffins did vanquished life gaze upon
 me.
 
 The odour of dust-covered eternities did I breathe: sultry and
 dust-covered lay my soul. And who could have aired his soul there!
 
 Brightness of midnight was ever around me; lonesomeness cowered beside
 her; and as a third, death-rattle stillness, the worst of my female
 friends.
 
 Keys did I carry, the rustiest of all keys; and I knew how to open with
 them the most creaking of all gates.
 
 Like a bitterly angry croaking ran the sound through the long corridors
 when the leaves of the gate opened: ungraciously did this bird cry,
 unwillingly was it awakened.
 
 But more frightful even, and more heart-strangling was it, when it again
 became silent and still all around, and I alone sat in that malignant
 silence.
 
 Thus did time pass with me, and slip by, if time there still was: what
 do I know thereof! But at last there happened that which awoke me.
 
 Thrice did there peal peals at the gate like thunders, thrice did the
 vaults resound and howl again: then did I go to the gate.
 
 Alpa! cried I, who carrieth his ashes unto the mountain? Alpa! Alpa! who
 carrieth his ashes unto the mountain?
 
 And I pressed the key, and pulled at the gate, and exerted myself. But
 not a finger's-breadth was it yet open:
 
 Then did a roaring wind tear the folds apart: whistling, whizzing, and
 piercing, it threw unto me a black coffin.
 
 And in the roaring, and whistling, and whizzing the coffin burst up, and
 spouted out a thousand peals of laughter.
 
 And a thousand caricatures of children, angels, owls, fools, and
 child-sized butterflies laughed and mocked, and roared at me.
 
 Fearfully was I terrified thereby: it prostrated me. And I cried with
 horror as I ne'er cried before.
 
 But mine own crying awoke me:--and I came to myself.--
 
 Thus did Zarathustra relate his dream, and then was silent: for as yet
 he knew not the interpretation thereof. But the disciple whom he loved
 most arose quickly, seized Zarathustra's hand, and said:
 
 "Thy life itself interpreteth unto us this dream, O Zarathustra!
 
 Art thou not thyself the wind with shrill whistling, which bursteth open
 the gates of the fortress of Death?
 
 Art thou not thyself the coffin full of many-hued malices and
 angel-caricatures of life?
 
 Verily, like a thousand peals of children's laughter cometh
 Zarathustra into all sepulchres, laughing at those night-watchmen and
 grave-guardians, and whoever else rattleth with sinister keys.
 
 With thy laughter wilt thou frighten and prostrate them: fainting and
 recovering will demonstrate thy power over them.
 
 And when the long twilight cometh and the mortal weariness, even then
 wilt thou not disappear from our firmament, thou advocate of life!
 
 New stars hast thou made us see, and new nocturnal glories: verily,
 laughter itself hast thou spread out over us like a many-hued canopy.
 
 Now will children's laughter ever from coffins flow; now will a strong
 wind ever come victoriously unto all mortal weariness: of this thou art
 thyself the pledge and the prophet!
 
 Verily, THEY THEMSELVES DIDST THOU DREAM, thine enemies: that was thy
 sorest dream.
 
 But as thou awokest from them and camest to thyself, so shall they
 awaken from themselves--and come unto thee!"
 
 Thus spake the disciple; and all the others then thronged around
 Zarathustra, grasped him by the hands, and tried to persuade him to
 leave his bed and his sadness, and return unto them. Zarathustra,
 however, sat upright on his couch, with an absent look. Like one
 returning from long foreign sojourn did he look on his disciples, and
 examined their features; but still he knew them not. When, however, they
 raised him, and set him upon his feet, behold, all on a sudden his eye
 changed; he understood everything that had happened, stroked his beard,
 and said with a strong voice:
 
 "Well! this hath just its time; but see to it, my disciples, that we
 have a good repast; and without delay! Thus do I mean to make amends for
 bad dreams!
 
 The soothsayer, however, shall eat and drink at my side: and verily, I
 will yet show him a sea in which he can drown himself!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra. Then did he gaze long into the face of the
 disciple who had been the dream-interpreter, and shook his head.--
 
 
 
 
 XLII. REDEMPTION.
 
 When Zarathustra went one day over the great bridge, then did the
 cripples and beggars surround him, and a hunchback spake thus unto him:
 
 "Behold, Zarathustra! Even the people learn from thee, and acquire faith
 in thy teaching: but for them to believe fully in thee, one thing is
 still needful--thou must first of all convince us cripples! Here hast
 thou now a fine selection, and verily, an opportunity with more than one
 forelock! The blind canst thou heal, and make the lame run; and from
 him who hath too much behind, couldst thou well, also, take away a
 little;--that, I think, would be the right method to make the cripples
 believe in Zarathustra!"
 
 Zarathustra, however, answered thus unto him who so spake: When one
 taketh his hump from the hunchback, then doth one take from him his
 spirit--so do the people teach. And when one giveth the blind man eyes,
 then doth he see too many bad things on the earth: so that he curseth
 him who healed him. He, however, who maketh the lame man run, inflicteth
 upon him the greatest injury; for hardly can he run, when his vices
 run away with him--so do the people teach concerning cripples. And why
 should not Zarathustra also learn from the people, when the people learn
 from Zarathustra?
 
 It is, however, the smallest thing unto me since I have been amongst
 men, to see one person lacking an eye, another an ear, and a third a
 leg, and that others have lost the tongue, or the nose, or the head.
 
 I see and have seen worse things, and divers things so hideous, that I
 should neither like to speak of all matters, nor even keep silent about
 some of them: namely, men who lack everything, except that they have
 too much of one thing--men who are nothing more than a big eye, or a big
 mouth, or a big belly, or something else big,--reversed cripples, I call
 such men.
 
 And when I came out of my solitude, and for the first time passed over
 this bridge, then I could not trust mine eyes, but looked again and
 again, and said at last: "That is an ear! An ear as big as a man!" I
 looked still more attentively--and actually there did move under the ear
 something that was pitiably small and poor and slim. And in truth this
 immense ear was perched on a small thin stalk--the stalk, however, was a
 man! A person putting a glass to his eyes, could even recognise further
 a small envious countenance, and also that a bloated soullet dangled at
 the stalk. The people told me, however, that the big ear was not only a
 man, but a great man, a genius. But I never believed in the people when
 they spake of great men--and I hold to my belief that it was a reversed
 cripple, who had too little of everything, and too much of one thing.
 
 When Zarathustra had spoken thus unto the hunchback, and unto those of
 whom the hunchback was the mouthpiece and advocate, then did he turn to
 his disciples in profound dejection, and said:
 
 Verily, my friends, I walk amongst men as amongst the fragments and
 limbs of human beings!
 
 This is the terrible thing to mine eye, that I find man broken up, and
 scattered about, as on a battle- and butcher-ground.
 
 And when mine eye fleeth from the present to the bygone, it findeth ever
 the same: fragments and limbs and fearful chances--but no men!
 
 The present and the bygone upon earth--ah! my friends--that is MY most
 unbearable trouble; and I should not know how to live, if I were not a
 seer of what is to come.
 
 A seer, a purposer, a creator, a future itself, and a bridge to the
 future--and alas! also as it were a cripple on this bridge: all that is
 Zarathustra.
 
 And ye also asked yourselves often: "Who is Zarathustra to us? What
 shall he be called by us?" And like me, did ye give yourselves questions
 for answers.
 
 Is he a promiser? Or a fulfiller? A conqueror? Or an inheritor? A
 harvest? Or a ploughshare? A physician? Or a healed one?
 
 Is he a poet? Or a genuine one? An emancipator? Or a subjugator? A good
 one? Or an evil one?
 
 I walk amongst men as the fragments of the future: that future which I
 contemplate.
 
 And it is all my poetisation and aspiration to compose and collect into
 unity what is fragment and riddle and fearful chance.
 
 And how could I endure to be a man, if man were not also the composer,
 and riddle-reader, and redeemer of chance!
 
 To redeem what is past, and to transform every "It was" into "Thus would
 I have it!"--that only do I call redemption!
 
 Will--so is the emancipator and joy-bringer called: thus have I taught
 you, my friends! But now learn this likewise: the Will itself is still a
 prisoner.
 
 Willing emancipateth: but what is that called which still putteth the
 emancipator in chains?
 
 "It was": thus is the Will's teeth-gnashing and lonesomest tribulation
 called. Impotent towards what hath been done--it is a malicious
 spectator of all that is past.
 
 Not backward can the Will will; that it cannot break time and time's
 desire--that is the Will's lonesomest tribulation.
 
 Willing emancipateth: what doth Willing itself devise in order to get
 free from its tribulation and mock at its prison?
 
 Ah, a fool becometh every prisoner! Foolishly delivereth itself also the
 imprisoned Will.
 
 That time doth not run backward--that is its animosity: "That which
 was": so is the stone which it cannot roll called.
 
 And thus doth it roll stones out of animosity and ill-humour, and taketh
 revenge on whatever doth not, like it, feel rage and ill-humour.
 
 Thus did the Will, the emancipator, become a torturer; and on all
 that is capable of suffering it taketh revenge, because it cannot go
 backward.
 
 This, yea, this alone is REVENGE itself: the Will's antipathy to time,
 and its "It was."
 
 Verily, a great folly dwelleth in our Will; and it became a curse unto
 all humanity, that this folly acquired spirit!
 
 THE SPIRIT OF REVENGE: my friends, that hath hitherto been man's best
 contemplation; and where there was suffering, it was claimed there was
 always penalty.
 
 "Penalty," so calleth itself revenge. With a lying word it feigneth a
 good conscience.
 
 And because in the willer himself there is suffering, because he cannot
 will backwards--thus was Willing itself, and all life, claimed--to be
 penalty!
 
 And then did cloud after cloud roll over the spirit, until at last
 madness preached: "Everything perisheth, therefore everything deserveth
 to perish!"
 
 "And this itself is justice, the law of time--that he must devour his
 children:" thus did madness preach.
 
 "Morally are things ordered according to justice and penalty. Oh, where
 is there deliverance from the flux of things and from the 'existence' of
 penalty?" Thus did madness preach.
 
 "Can there be deliverance when there is eternal justice? Alas,
 unrollable is the stone, 'It was': eternal must also be all penalties!"
 Thus did madness preach.
 
 "No deed can be annihilated: how could it be undone by the penalty!
 This, this is what is eternal in the 'existence' of penalty, that
 existence also must be eternally recurring deed and guilt!
 
 Unless the Will should at last deliver itself, and Willing become
 non-Willing--:" but ye know, my brethren, this fabulous song of madness!
 
 Away from those fabulous songs did I lead you when I taught you: "The
 Will is a creator."
 
 All "It was" is a fragment, a riddle, a fearful chance--until the
 creating Will saith thereto: "But thus would I have it."--
 
 Until the creating Will saith thereto: "But thus do I will it! Thus
 shall I will it!"
 
 But did it ever speak thus? And when doth this take place? Hath the Will
 been unharnessed from its own folly?
 
 Hath the Will become its own deliverer and joy-bringer? Hath it
 unlearned the spirit of revenge and all teeth-gnashing?
 
 And who hath taught it reconciliation with time, and something higher
 than all reconciliation?
 
 Something higher than all reconciliation must the Will will which is the
 Will to Power--: but how doth that take place? Who hath taught it also
 to will backwards?
 
 --But at this point in his discourse it chanced that Zarathustra
 suddenly paused, and looked like a person in the greatest alarm. With
 terror in his eyes did he gaze on his disciples; his glances pierced as
 with arrows their thoughts and arrear-thoughts. But after a brief space
 he again laughed, and said soothedly:
 
 "It is difficult to live amongst men, because silence is so difficult--
 especially for a babbler."--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra. The hunchback, however, had listened to the
 conversation and had covered his face during the time; but when he heard
 Zarathustra laugh, he looked up with curiosity, and said slowly:
 
 "But why doth Zarathustra speak otherwise unto us than unto his
 disciples?"
 
 Zarathustra answered: "What is there to be wondered at! With hunchbacks
 one may well speak in a hunchbacked way!"
 
 "Very good," said the hunchback; "and with pupils one may well tell
 tales out of school.
 
 But why doth Zarathustra speak otherwise unto his pupils--than unto
 himself?"--
 
 
 
 
 XLIII. MANLY PRUDENCE.
 
 Not the height, it is the declivity that is terrible!
 
 The declivity, where the gaze shooteth DOWNWARDS, and the hand graspeth
 UPWARDS. There doth the heart become giddy through its double will.
 
 Ah, friends, do ye divine also my heart's double will?
 
 This, this is MY declivity and my danger, that my gaze shooteth towards
 the summit, and my hand would fain clutch and lean--on the depth!
 
 To man clingeth my will; with chains do I bind myself to man, because
 I am pulled upwards to the Superman: for thither doth mine other will
 tend.
 
 And THEREFORE do I live blindly among men, as if I knew them not: that
 my hand may not entirely lose belief in firmness.
 
 I know not you men: this gloom and consolation is often spread around
 me.
 
 I sit at the gateway for every rogue, and ask: Who wisheth to deceive
 me?
 
 This is my first manly prudence, that I allow myself to be deceived, so
 as not to be on my guard against deceivers.
 
 Ah, if I were on my guard against man, how could man be an anchor to my
 ball! Too easily would I be pulled upwards and away!
 
 This providence is over my fate, that I have to be without foresight.
 
 And he who would not languish amongst men, must learn to drink out of
 all glasses; and he who would keep clean amongst men, must know how to
 wash himself even with dirty water.
 
 And thus spake I often to myself for consolation: "Courage! Cheer up!
 old heart! An unhappiness hath failed to befall thee: enjoy that as
 thy--happiness!"
 
 This, however, is mine other manly prudence: I am more forbearing to the
 VAIN than to the proud.
 
 Is not wounded vanity the mother of all tragedies? Where, however, pride
 is wounded, there there groweth up something better than pride.
 
 That life may be fair to behold, its game must be well played; for that
 purpose, however, it needeth good actors.
 
 Good actors have I found all the vain ones: they play, and wish people
 to be fond of beholding them--all their spirit is in this wish.
 
 They represent themselves, they invent themselves; in their
 neighbourhood I like to look upon life--it cureth of melancholy.
 
 Therefore am I forbearing to the vain, because they are the physicians
 of my melancholy, and keep me attached to man as to a drama.
 
 And further, who conceiveth the full depth of the modesty of the vain
 man! I am favourable to him, and sympathetic on account of his modesty.
 
 From you would he learn his belief in himself; he feedeth upon your
 glances, he eateth praise out of your hands.
 
 Your lies doth he even believe when you lie favourably about him: for in
 its depths sigheth his heart: "What am _I_?"
 
 And if that be the true virtue which is unconscious of itself--well, the
 vain man is unconscious of his modesty!--
 
 This is, however, my third manly prudence: I am not put out of conceit
 with the WICKED by your timorousness.
 
 I am happy to see the marvels the warm sun hatcheth: tigers and palms
 and rattle-snakes.
 
 Also amongst men there is a beautiful brood of the warm sun, and much
 that is marvellous in the wicked.
 
 In truth, as your wisest did not seem to me so very wise, so found I
 also human wickedness below the fame of it.
 
 And oft did I ask with a shake of the head: Why still rattle, ye
 rattle-snakes?
 
 Verily, there is still a future even for evil! And the warmest south is
 still undiscovered by man.
 
 How many things are now called the worst wickedness, which are only
 twelve feet broad and three months long! Some day, however, will greater
 dragons come into the world.
 
 For that the Superman may not lack his dragon, the superdragon that
 is worthy of him, there must still much warm sun glow on moist virgin
 forests!
 
 Out of your wild cats must tigers have evolved, and out of your
 poison-toads, crocodiles: for the good hunter shall have a good hunt!
 
 And verily, ye good and just! In you there is much to be laughed at, and
 especially your fear of what hath hitherto been called "the devil!"
 
 So alien are ye in your souls to what is great, that to you the Superman
 would be FRIGHTFUL in his goodness!
 
 And ye wise and knowing ones, ye would flee from the solar-glow of the
 wisdom in which the Superman joyfully batheth his nakedness!
 
 Ye highest men who have come within my ken! this is my doubt of you, and
 my secret laughter: I suspect ye would call my Superman--a devil!
 
 Ah, I became tired of those highest and best ones: from their "height"
 did I long to be up, out, and away to the Superman!
 
 A horror came over me when I saw those best ones naked: then there grew
 for me the pinions to soar away into distant futures.
 
 Into more distant futures, into more southern souths than ever artist
 dreamed of: thither, where Gods are ashamed of all clothes!
 
 But disguised do I want to see YOU, ye neighbours and fellowmen, and
 well-attired and vain and estimable, as "the good and just;"--
 
 And disguised will I myself sit amongst you--that I may MISTAKE you and
 myself: for that is my last manly prudence.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XLIV. THE STILLEST HOUR.
 
 What hath happened unto me, my friends? Ye see me troubled, driven
 forth, unwillingly obedient, ready to go--alas, to go away from YOU!
 
 Yea, once more must Zarathustra retire to his solitude: but unjoyously
 this time doth the bear go back to his cave!
 
 What hath happened unto me? Who ordereth this?--Ah, mine angry mistress
 wisheth it so; she spake unto me. Have I ever named her name to you?
 
 Yesterday towards evening there spake unto me MY STILLEST HOUR: that is
 the name of my terrible mistress.
 
 And thus did it happen--for everything must I tell you, that your heart
 may not harden against the suddenly departing one!
 
 Do ye know the terror of him who falleth asleep?--
 
 To the very toes he is terrified, because the ground giveth way under
 him, and the dream beginneth.
 
 This do I speak unto you in parable. Yesterday at the stillest hour did
 the ground give way under me: the dream began.
 
 The hour-hand moved on, the timepiece of my life drew breath--never did
 I hear such stillness around me, so that my heart was terrified.
 
 Then was there spoken unto me without voice: "THOU KNOWEST IT,
 ZARATHUSTRA?"--
 
 And I cried in terror at this whispering, and the blood left my face:
 but I was silent.
 
 Then was there once more spoken unto me without voice: "Thou knowest it,
 Zarathustra, but thou dost not speak it!"--
 
 And at last I answered, like one defiant: "Yea, I know it, but I will
 not speak it!"
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "Thou WILT not,
 Zarathustra? Is this true? Conceal thyself not behind thy defiance!"--
 
 And I wept and trembled like a child, and said: "Ah, I would indeed, but
 how can I do it! Exempt me only from this! It is beyond my power!"
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "What matter about
 thyself, Zarathustra! Speak thy word, and succumb!"
 
 And I answered: "Ah, is it MY word? Who am _I_? I await the worthier
 one; I am not worthy even to succumb by it."
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "What matter about
 thyself? Thou art not yet humble enough for me. Humility hath the
 hardest skin."--
 
 And I answered: "What hath not the skin of my humility endured! At the
 foot of my height do I dwell: how high are my summits, no one hath yet
 told me. But well do I know my valleys."
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "O Zarathustra, he
 who hath to remove mountains removeth also valleys and plains."--
 
 And I answered: "As yet hath my word not removed mountains, and what I
 have spoken hath not reached man. I went, indeed, unto men, but not yet
 have I attained unto them."
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "What knowest thou
 THEREOF! The dew falleth on the grass when the night is most silent."--
 
 And I answered: "They mocked me when I found and walked in mine own
 path; and certainly did my feet then tremble.
 
 And thus did they speak unto me: Thou forgottest the path before, now
 dost thou also forget how to walk!"
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "What matter about
 their mockery! Thou art one who hast unlearned to obey: now shalt thou
 command!
 
 Knowest thou not who is most needed by all? He who commandeth great
 things.
 
 To execute great things is difficult: but the more difficult task is to
 command great things.
 
 This is thy most unpardonable obstinacy: thou hast the power, and thou
 wilt not rule."--
 
 And I answered: "I lack the lion's voice for all commanding."
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me as a whispering: "It is the stillest
 words which bring the storm. Thoughts that come with doves' footsteps
 guide the world.
 
 O Zarathustra, thou shalt go as a shadow of that which is to come: thus
 wilt thou command, and in commanding go foremost."--
 
 And I answered: "I am ashamed."
 
 Then was there again spoken unto me without voice: "Thou must yet become
 a child, and be without shame.
 
 The pride of youth is still upon thee; late hast thou become young: but
 he who would become a child must surmount even his youth."--
 
 And I considered a long while, and trembled. At last, however, did I say
 what I had said at first. "I will not."
 
 Then did a laughing take place all around me. Alas, how that laughing
 lacerated my bowels and cut into my heart!
 
 And there was spoken unto me for the last time: "O Zarathustra, thy
 fruits are ripe, but thou art not ripe for thy fruits!
 
 So must thou go again into solitude: for thou shalt yet become
 mellow."--
 
 And again was there a laughing, and it fled: then did it become still
 around me, as with a double stillness. I lay, however, on the ground,
 and the sweat flowed from my limbs.
 
 --Now have ye heard all, and why I have to return into my solitude.
 Nothing have I kept hidden from you, my friends.
 
 But even this have ye heard from me, WHO is still the most reserved of
 men--and will be so!
 
 Ah, my friends! I should have something more to say unto you! I should
 have something more to give unto you! Why do I not give it? Am I then a
 niggard?--
 
 When, however, Zarathustra had spoken these words, the violence of his
 pain, and a sense of the nearness of his departure from his friends came
 over him, so that he wept aloud; and no one knew how to console him. In
 the night, however, he went away alone and left his friends.
 
 
 
 
 
 THIRD PART.
 
 "Ye look aloft when ye long for exaltation, and I look downward because
 I am exalted.
 
 "Who among you can at the same time laugh and be exalted?
 
 "He who climbeth on the highest mountains, laugheth at all tragic plays
 and tragic realities."--ZARATHUSTRA, I., "Reading and Writing."
 
 
 
 
 XLV. THE WANDERER.
 
 Then, when it was about midnight, Zarathustra went his way over the
 ridge of the isle, that he might arrive early in the morning at the
 other coast; because there he meant to embark. For there was a good
 roadstead there, in which foreign ships also liked to anchor: those
 ships took many people with them, who wished to cross over from the
 Happy Isles. So when Zarathustra thus ascended the mountain, he thought
 on the way of his many solitary wanderings from youth onwards, and how
 many mountains and ridges and summits he had already climbed.
 
 I am a wanderer and mountain-climber, said he to his heart, I love not
 the plains, and it seemeth I cannot long sit still.
 
 And whatever may still overtake me as fate and experience--a wandering
 will be therein, and a mountain-climbing: in the end one experienceth
 only oneself.
 
 The time is now past when accidents could befall me; and what COULD now
 fall to my lot which would not already be mine own!
 
 It returneth only, it cometh home to me at last--mine own Self, and
 such of it as hath been long abroad, and scattered among things and
 accidents.
 
 And one thing more do I know: I stand now before my last summit, and
 before that which hath been longest reserved for me. Ah, my hardest path
 must I ascend! Ah, I have begun my lonesomest wandering!
 
 He, however, who is of my nature doth not avoid such an hour: the hour
 that saith unto him: Now only dost thou go the way to thy greatness!
 Summit and abyss--these are now comprised together!
 
 Thou goest the way to thy greatness: now hath it become thy last refuge,
 what was hitherto thy last danger!
 
 Thou goest the way to thy greatness: it must now be thy best courage
 that there is no longer any path behind thee!
 
 Thou goest the way to thy greatness: here shall no one steal after thee!
 Thy foot itself hath effaced the path behind thee, and over it standeth
 written: Impossibility.
 
 And if all ladders henceforth fail thee, then must thou learn to mount
 upon thine own head: how couldst thou mount upward otherwise?
 
 Upon thine own head, and beyond thine own heart! Now must the gentlest
 in thee become the hardest.
 
 He who hath always much-indulged himself, sickeneth at last by his
 much-indulgence. Praises on what maketh hardy! I do not praise the land
 where butter and honey--flow!
 
 To learn TO LOOK AWAY FROM oneself, is necessary in order to see MANY
 THINGS:--this hardiness is needed by every mountain-climber.
 
 He, however, who is obtrusive with his eyes as a discerner, how can he
 ever see more of anything than its foreground!
 
 But thou, O Zarathustra, wouldst view the ground of everything, and its
 background: thus must thou mount even above thyself--up, upwards, until
 thou hast even thy stars UNDER thee!
 
 Yea! To look down upon myself, and even upon my stars: that only would I
 call my SUMMIT, that hath remained for me as my LAST summit!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra to himself while ascending, comforting his heart
 with harsh maxims: for he was sore at heart as he had never been before.
 And when he had reached the top of the mountain-ridge, behold, there
 lay the other sea spread out before him: and he stood still and was
 long silent. The night, however, was cold at this height, and clear and
 starry.
 
 I recognise my destiny, said he at last, sadly. Well! I am ready. Now
 hath my last lonesomeness begun.
 
 Ah, this sombre, sad sea, below me! Ah, this sombre nocturnal vexation!
 Ah, fate and sea! To you must I now GO DOWN!
 
 Before my highest mountain do I stand, and before my longest wandering:
 therefore must I first go deeper down than I ever ascended:
 
 --Deeper down into pain than I ever ascended, even into its darkest
 flood! So willeth my fate. Well! I am ready.
 
 Whence come the highest mountains? so did I once ask. Then did I learn
 that they come out of the sea.
 
 That testimony is inscribed on their stones, and on the walls of their
 summits. Out of the deepest must the highest come to its height.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra on the ridge of the mountain where it was cold:
 when, however, he came into the vicinity of the sea, and at last stood
 alone amongst the cliffs, then had he become weary on his way, and
 eagerer than ever before.
 
 Everything as yet sleepeth, said he; even the sea sleepeth. Drowsily and
 strangely doth its eye gaze upon me.
 
 But it breatheth warmly--I feel it. And I feel also that it dreameth. It
 tosseth about dreamily on hard pillows.
 
 Hark! Hark! How it groaneth with evil recollections! Or evil
 expectations?
 
 Ah, I am sad along with thee, thou dusky monster, and angry with myself
 even for thy sake.
 
 Ah, that my hand hath not strength enough! Gladly, indeed, would I free
 thee from evil dreams!--
 
 And while Zarathustra thus spake, he laughed at himself with melancholy
 and bitterness. What! Zarathustra, said he, wilt thou even sing
 consolation to the sea?
 
 Ah, thou amiable fool, Zarathustra, thou too-blindly confiding one! But
 thus hast thou ever been: ever hast thou approached confidently all that
 is terrible.
 
 Every monster wouldst thou caress. A whiff of warm breath, a little soft
 tuft on its paw--: and immediately wert thou ready to love and lure it.
 
 LOVE is the danger of the lonesomest one, love to anything, IF IT ONLY
 LIVE! Laughable, verily, is my folly and my modesty in love!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and laughed thereby a second time. Then,
 however, he thought of his abandoned friends--and as if he had done them
 a wrong with his thoughts, he upbraided himself because of his thoughts.
 And forthwith it came to pass that the laugher wept--with anger and
 longing wept Zarathustra bitterly.
 
 
 
 
 XLVI. THE VISION AND THE ENIGMA.
 
 1.
 
 When it got abroad among the sailors that Zarathustra was on board the
 ship--for a man who came from the Happy Isles had gone on board along
 with him,--there was great curiosity and expectation. But Zarathustra
 kept silent for two days, and was cold and deaf with sadness; so that he
 neither answered looks nor questions. On the evening of the second day,
 however, he again opened his ears, though he still kept silent: for
 there were many curious and dangerous things to be heard on board the
 ship, which came from afar, and was to go still further. Zarathustra,
 however, was fond of all those who make distant voyages, and dislike to
 live without danger. And behold! when listening, his own tongue was
 at last loosened, and the ice of his heart broke. Then did he begin to
 speak thus:
 
 To you, the daring venturers and adventurers, and whoever hath embarked
 with cunning sails upon frightful seas,--
 
 To you the enigma-intoxicated, the twilight-enjoyers, whose souls are
 allured by flutes to every treacherous gulf:
 
 --For ye dislike to grope at a thread with cowardly hand; and where ye
 can DIVINE, there do ye hate to CALCULATE--
 
 To you only do I tell the enigma that I SAW--the vision of the
 lonesomest one.--
 
 Gloomily walked I lately in corpse-coloured twilight--gloomily and
 sternly, with compressed lips. Not only one sun had set for me.
 
 A path which ascended daringly among boulders, an evil, lonesome path,
 which neither herb nor shrub any longer cheered, a mountain-path,
 crunched under the daring of my foot.
 
 Mutely marching over the scornful clinking of pebbles, trampling the
 stone that let it slip: thus did my foot force its way upwards.
 
 Upwards:--in spite of the spirit that drew it downwards, towards the
 abyss, the spirit of gravity, my devil and arch-enemy.
 
 Upwards:--although it sat upon me, half-dwarf, half-mole; paralysed,
 paralysing; dripping lead in mine ear, and thoughts like drops of lead
 into my brain.
 
 "O Zarathustra," it whispered scornfully, syllable by syllable, "thou
 stone of wisdom! Thou threwest thyself high, but every thrown stone
 must--fall!
 
 O Zarathustra, thou stone of wisdom, thou sling-stone, thou
 star-destroyer! Thyself threwest thou so high,--but every thrown
 stone--must fall!
 
 Condemned of thyself, and to thine own stoning: O Zarathustra, far
 indeed threwest thou thy stone--but upon THYSELF will it recoil!"
 
 Then was the dwarf silent; and it lasted long. The silence, however,
 oppressed me; and to be thus in pairs, one is verily lonesomer than when
 alone!
 
 I ascended, I ascended, I dreamt, I thought,--but everything oppressed
 me. A sick one did I resemble, whom bad torture wearieth, and a worse
 dream reawakeneth out of his first sleep.--
 
 But there is something in me which I call courage: it hath hitherto
 slain for me every dejection. This courage at last bade me stand still
 and say: "Dwarf! Thou! Or I!"--
 
 For courage is the best slayer,--courage which ATTACKETH: for in every
 attack there is sound of triumph.
 
 Man, however, is the most courageous animal: thereby hath he overcome
 every animal. With sound of triumph hath he overcome every pain; human
 pain, however, is the sorest pain.
 
 Courage slayeth also giddiness at abysses: and where doth man not stand
 at abysses! Is not seeing itself--seeing abysses?
 
 Courage is the best slayer: courage slayeth also fellow-suffering.
 Fellow-suffering, however, is the deepest abyss: as deeply as man
 looketh into life, so deeply also doth he look into suffering.
 
 Courage, however, is the best slayer, courage which attacketh: it
 slayeth even death itself; for it saith: "WAS THAT life? Well! Once
 more!"
 
 In such speech, however, there is much sound of triumph. He who hath
 ears to hear, let him hear.--
 
 2.
 
 "Halt, dwarf!" said I. "Either I--or thou! I, however, am the stronger
 of the two:--thou knowest not mine abysmal thought! IT--couldst thou not
 endure!"
 
 Then happened that which made me lighter: for the dwarf sprang from my
 shoulder, the prying sprite! And it squatted on a stone in front of me.
 There was however a gateway just where we halted.
 
 "Look at this gateway! Dwarf!" I continued, "it hath two faces. Two
 roads come together here: these hath no one yet gone to the end of.
 
 This long lane backwards: it continueth for an eternity. And that long
 lane forward--that is another eternity.
 
 They are antithetical to one another, these roads; they directly abut on
 one another:--and it is here, at this gateway, that they come together.
 The name of the gateway is inscribed above: 'This Moment.'
 
 But should one follow them further--and ever further and further
 on, thinkest thou, dwarf, that these roads would be eternally
 antithetical?"--
 
 "Everything straight lieth," murmured the dwarf, contemptuously. "All
 truth is crooked; time itself is a circle."
 
 "Thou spirit of gravity!" said I wrathfully, "do not take it too
 lightly! Or I shall let thee squat where thou squattest, Haltfoot,--and
 I carried thee HIGH!"
 
 "Observe," continued I, "This Moment! From the gateway, This Moment,
 there runneth a long eternal lane BACKWARDS: behind us lieth an
 eternity.
 
 Must not whatever CAN run its course of all things, have already run
 along that lane? Must not whatever CAN happen of all things have already
 happened, resulted, and gone by?
 
 And if everything have already existed, what thinkest thou, dwarf, of
 This Moment? Must not this gateway also--have already existed?
 
 And are not all things closely bound together in such wise that This
 Moment draweth all coming things after it? CONSEQUENTLY--itself also?
 
 For whatever CAN run its course of all things, also in this long lane
 OUTWARD--MUST it once more run!--
 
 And this slow spider which creepeth in the moonlight, and this moonlight
 itself, and thou and I in this gateway whispering together, whispering
 of eternal things--must we not all have already existed?
 
 --And must we not return and run in that other lane out before us, that
 long weird lane--must we not eternally return?"--
 
 Thus did I speak, and always more softly: for I was afraid of mine own
 thoughts, and arrear-thoughts. Then, suddenly did I hear a dog HOWL near
 me.
 
 Had I ever heard a dog howl thus? My thoughts ran back. Yes! When I was
 a child, in my most distant childhood:
 
 --Then did I hear a dog howl thus. And saw it also, with hair bristling,
 its head upwards, trembling in the stillest midnight, when even dogs
 believe in ghosts:
 
 --So that it excited my commiseration. For just then went the full moon,
 silent as death, over the house; just then did it stand still, a glowing
 globe--at rest on the flat roof, as if on some one's property:--
 
 Thereby had the dog been terrified: for dogs believe in thieves and
 ghosts. And when I again heard such howling, then did it excite my
 commiseration once more.
 
 Where was now the dwarf? And the gateway? And the spider? And all the
 whispering? Had I dreamt? Had I awakened? 'Twixt rugged rocks did I
 suddenly stand alone, dreary in the dreariest moonlight.
 
 BUT THERE LAY A MAN! And there! The dog leaping, bristling, whining--now
 did it see me coming--then did it howl again, then did it CRY:--had I
 ever heard a dog cry so for help?
 
 And verily, what I saw, the like had I never seen. A young shepherd did
 I see, writhing, choking, quivering, with distorted countenance, and
 with a heavy black serpent hanging out of his mouth.
 
 Had I ever seen so much loathing and pale horror on one countenance?
 He had perhaps gone to sleep? Then had the serpent crawled into his
 throat--there had it bitten itself fast.
 
 My hand pulled at the serpent, and pulled:--in vain! I failed to pull
 the serpent out of his throat. Then there cried out of me: "Bite! Bite!
 
 Its head off! Bite!"--so cried it out of me; my horror, my hatred, my
 loathing, my pity, all my good and my bad cried with one voice out of
 me.--
 
 Ye daring ones around me! Ye venturers and adventurers, and whoever
 of you have embarked with cunning sails on unexplored seas! Ye
 enigma-enjoyers!
 
 Solve unto me the enigma that I then beheld, interpret unto me the
 vision of the lonesomest one!
 
 For it was a vision and a foresight:--WHAT did I then behold in parable?
 And WHO is it that must come some day?
 
 WHO is the shepherd into whose throat the serpent thus crawled? WHO is
 the man into whose throat all the heaviest and blackest will thus crawl?
 
 --The shepherd however bit as my cry had admonished him; he bit with a
 strong bite! Far away did he spit the head of the serpent--: and sprang
 up.--
 
 No longer shepherd, no longer man--a transfigured being, a
 light-surrounded being, that LAUGHED! Never on earth laughed a man as HE
 laughed!
 
 O my brethren, I heard a laughter which was no human laughter,--and now
 gnaweth a thirst at me, a longing that is never allayed.
 
 My longing for that laughter gnaweth at me: oh, how can I still endure
 to live! And how could I endure to die at present!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XLVII. INVOLUNTARY BLISS.
 
 With such enigmas and bitterness in his heart did Zarathustra sail o'er
 the sea. When, however, he was four day-journeys from the Happy
 Isles and from his friends, then had he surmounted all his pain--:
 triumphantly and with firm foot did he again accept his fate. And then
 talked Zarathustra in this wise to his exulting conscience:
 
 Alone am I again, and like to be so, alone with the pure heaven, and the
 open sea; and again is the afternoon around me.
 
 On an afternoon did I find my friends for the first time; on an
 afternoon, also, did I find them a second time:--at the hour when all
 light becometh stiller.
 
 For whatever happiness is still on its way 'twixt heaven and earth, now
 seeketh for lodging a luminous soul: WITH HAPPINESS hath all light now
 become stiller.
 
 O afternoon of my life! Once did my happiness also descend to the valley
 that it might seek a lodging: then did it find those open hospitable
 souls.
 
 O afternoon of my life! What did I not surrender that I might have
 one thing: this living plantation of my thoughts, and this dawn of my
 highest hope!
 
 Companions did the creating one once seek, and children of HIS hope: and
 lo, it turned out that he could not find them, except he himself should
 first create them.
 
 Thus am I in the midst of my work, to my children going, and from
 them returning: for the sake of his children must Zarathustra perfect
 himself.
 
 For in one's heart one loveth only one's child and one's work; and where
 there is great love to oneself, then is it the sign of pregnancy: so
 have I found it.
 
 Still are my children verdant in their first spring, standing nigh one
 another, and shaken in common by the winds, the trees of my garden and
 of my best soil.
 
 And verily, where such trees stand beside one another, there ARE Happy
 Isles!
 
 But one day will I take them up, and put each by itself alone: that it
 may learn lonesomeness and defiance and prudence.
 
 Gnarled and crooked and with flexible hardness shall it then stand by
 the sea, a living lighthouse of unconquerable life.
 
 Yonder where the storms rush down into the sea, and the snout of the
 mountain drinketh water, shall each on a time have his day and night
 watches, for HIS testing and recognition.
 
 Recognised and tested shall each be, to see if he be of my type and
 lineage:--if he be master of a long will, silent even when he speaketh,
 and giving in such wise that he TAKETH in giving:--
 
 --So that he may one day become my companion, a fellow-creator and
 fellow-enjoyer with Zarathustra:--such a one as writeth my will on my
 tables, for the fuller perfection of all things.
 
 And for his sake and for those like him, must I perfect MYSELF:
 therefore do I now avoid my happiness, and present myself to every
 misfortune--for MY final testing and recognition.
 
 And verily, it were time that I went away; and the wanderer's shadow and
 the longest tedium and the stillest hour--have all said unto me: "It is
 the highest time!"
 
 The word blew to me through the keyhole and said "Come!" The door sprang
 subtlely open unto me, and said "Go!"
 
 But I lay enchained to my love for my children: desire spread this
 snare for me--the desire for love--that I should become the prey of my
 children, and lose myself in them.
 
 Desiring--that is now for me to have lost myself. I POSSESS YOU, MY
 CHILDREN! In this possessing shall everything be assurance and nothing
 desire.
 
 But brooding lay the sun of my love upon me, in his own juice stewed
 Zarathustra,--then did shadows and doubts fly past me.
 
 For frost and winter I now longed: "Oh, that frost and winter would
 again make me crack and crunch!" sighed I:--then arose icy mist out of
 me.
 
 My past burst its tomb, many pains buried alive woke up--: fully slept
 had they merely, concealed in corpse-clothes.
 
 So called everything unto me in signs: "It is time!" But I--heard not,
 until at last mine abyss moved, and my thought bit me.
 
 Ah, abysmal thought, which art MY thought! When shall I find strength to
 hear thee burrowing, and no longer tremble?
 
 To my very throat throbbeth my heart when I hear thee burrowing! Thy
 muteness even is like to strangle me, thou abysmal mute one!
 
 As yet have I never ventured to call thee UP; it hath been enough that
 I--have carried thee about with me! As yet have I not been strong
 enough for my final lion-wantonness and playfulness.
 
 Sufficiently formidable unto me hath thy weight ever been: but one day
 shall I yet find the strength and the lion's voice which will call thee
 up!
 
 When I shall have surmounted myself therein, then will I surmount myself
 also in that which is greater; and a VICTORY shall be the seal of my
 perfection!--
 
 Meanwhile do I sail along on uncertain seas; chance flattereth me,
 smooth-tongued chance; forward and backward do I gaze--, still see I no
 end.
 
 As yet hath the hour of my final struggle not come to me--or doth it
 come to me perhaps just now? Verily, with insidious beauty do sea and
 life gaze upon me round about:
 
 O afternoon of my life! O happiness before eventide! O haven upon high
 seas! O peace in uncertainty! How I distrust all of you!
 
 Verily, distrustful am I of your insidious beauty! Like the lover am I,
 who distrusteth too sleek smiling.
 
 As he pusheth the best-beloved before him--tender even in severity, the
 jealous one--, so do I push this blissful hour before me.
 
 Away with thee, thou blissful hour! With thee hath there come to me an
 involuntary bliss! Ready for my severest pain do I here stand:--at the
 wrong time hast thou come!
 
 Away with thee, thou blissful hour! Rather harbour there--with my
 children! Hasten! and bless them before eventide with MY happiness!
 
 There, already approacheth eventide: the sun sinketh. Away--my
 happiness!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra. And he waited for his misfortune the whole
 night; but he waited in vain. The night remained clear and calm, and
 happiness itself came nigher and nigher unto him. Towards morning,
 however, Zarathustra laughed to his heart, and said mockingly:
 "Happiness runneth after me. That is because I do not run after women.
 Happiness, however, is a woman."
 
 
 
 
 XLVIII. BEFORE SUNRISE.
 
 O heaven above me, thou pure, thou deep heaven! Thou abyss of light!
 Gazing on thee, I tremble with divine desires.
 
 Up to thy height to toss myself--that is MY depth! In thy purity to hide
 myself--that is MINE innocence!
 
 The God veileth his beauty: thus hidest thou thy stars. Thou speakest
 not: THUS proclaimest thou thy wisdom unto me.
 
 Mute o'er the raging sea hast thou risen for me to-day; thy love and thy
 modesty make a revelation unto my raging soul.
 
 In that thou camest unto me beautiful, veiled in thy beauty, in that
 thou spakest unto me mutely, obvious in thy wisdom:
 
 Oh, how could I fail to divine all the modesty of thy soul! BEFORE the
 sun didst thou come unto me--the lonesomest one.
 
 We have been friends from the beginning: to us are grief, gruesomeness,
 and ground common; even the sun is common to us.
 
 We do not speak to each other, because we know too much--: we keep
 silent to each other, we smile our knowledge to each other.
 
 Art thou not the light of my fire? Hast thou not the sister-soul of mine
 insight?
 
 Together did we learn everything; together did we learn to ascend beyond
 ourselves to ourselves, and to smile uncloudedly:--
 
 --Uncloudedly to smile down out of luminous eyes and out of miles of
 distance, when under us constraint and purpose and guilt steam like
 rain.
 
 And wandered I alone, for WHAT did my soul hunger by night and in
 labyrinthine paths? And climbed I mountains, WHOM did I ever seek, if
 not thee, upon mountains?
 
 And all my wandering and mountain-climbing: a necessity was it merely,
 and a makeshift of the unhandy one:--to FLY only, wanteth mine entire
 will, to fly into THEE!
 
 And what have I hated more than passing clouds, and whatever tainteth
 thee? And mine own hatred have I even hated, because it tainted thee!
 
 The passing clouds I detest--those stealthy cats of prey: they take
 from thee and me what is common to us--the vast unbounded Yea- and
 Amen-saying.
 
 These mediators and mixers we detest--the passing clouds: those
 half-and-half ones, that have neither learned to bless nor to curse from
 the heart.
 
 Rather will I sit in a tub under a closed heaven, rather will I sit in
 the abyss without heaven, than see thee, thou luminous heaven, tainted
 with passing clouds!
 
 And oft have I longed to pin them fast with the jagged gold-wires of
 lightning, that I might, like the thunder, beat the drum upon their
 kettle-bellies:--
 
 --An angry drummer, because they rob me of thy Yea and Amen!--thou
 heaven above me, thou pure, thou luminous heaven! Thou abyss of
 light!--because they rob thee of MY Yea and Amen.
 
 For rather will I have noise and thunders and tempest-blasts, than this
 discreet, doubting cat-repose; and also amongst men do I hate most
 of all the soft-treaders, and half-and-half ones, and the doubting,
 hesitating, passing clouds.
 
 And "he who cannot bless shall LEARN to curse!"--this clear teaching
 dropt unto me from the clear heaven; this star standeth in my heaven
 even in dark nights.
 
 I, however, am a blesser and a Yea-sayer, if thou be but around me, thou
 pure, thou luminous heaven! Thou abyss of light!--into all abysses do I
 then carry my beneficent Yea-saying.
 
 A blesser have I become and a Yea-sayer: and therefore strove I long and
 was a striver, that I might one day get my hands free for blessing.
 
 This, however, is my blessing: to stand above everything as its own
 heaven, its round roof, its azure bell and eternal security: and blessed
 is he who thus blesseth!
 
 For all things are baptized at the font of eternity, and beyond good and
 evil; good and evil themselves, however, are but fugitive shadows and
 damp afflictions and passing clouds.
 
 Verily, it is a blessing and not a blasphemy when I teach that "above
 all things there standeth the heaven of chance, the heaven of innocence,
 the heaven of hazard, the heaven of wantonness."
 
 "Of Hazard"--that is the oldest nobility in the world; that gave I back
 to all things; I emancipated them from bondage under purpose.
 
 This freedom and celestial serenity did I put like an azure bell above
 all things, when I taught that over them and through them, no "eternal
 Will"--willeth.
 
 This wantonness and folly did I put in place of that Will, when I taught
 that "In everything there is one thing impossible--rationality!"
 
 A LITTLE reason, to be sure, a germ of wisdom scattered from star to
 star--this leaven is mixed in all things: for the sake of folly, wisdom
 is mixed in all things!
 
 A little wisdom is indeed possible; but this blessed security have I
 found in all things, that they prefer--to DANCE on the feet of chance.
 
 O heaven above me! thou pure, thou lofty heaven! This is now thy purity
 unto me, that there is no eternal reason-spider and reason-cobweb:--
 
 --That thou art to me a dancing-floor for divine chances, that thou art
 to me a table of the Gods, for divine dice and dice-players!--
 
 But thou blushest? Have I spoken unspeakable things? Have I abused, when
 I meant to bless thee?
 
 Or is it the shame of being two of us that maketh thee blush!--Dost thou
 bid me go and be silent, because now--DAY cometh?
 
 The world is deep:--and deeper than e'er the day could read. Not
 everything may be uttered in presence of day. But day cometh: so let us
 part!
 
 O heaven above me, thou modest one! thou glowing one! O thou, my
 happiness before sunrise! The day cometh: so let us part!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 XLIX. THE BEDWARFING VIRTUE.
 
 1.
 
 When Zarathustra was again on the continent, he did not go straightway
 to his mountains and his cave, but made many wanderings and
 questionings, and ascertained this and that; so that he said of himself
 jestingly: "Lo, a river that floweth back unto its source in many
 windings!" For he wanted to learn what had taken place AMONG MEN during
 the interval: whether they had become greater or smaller. And once, when
 he saw a row of new houses, he marvelled, and said:
 
 "What do these houses mean? Verily, no great soul put them up as its
 simile!
 
 Did perhaps a silly child take them out of its toy-box? Would that
 another child put them again into the box!
 
 And these rooms and chambers--can MEN go out and in there? They seem to
 be made for silk dolls; or for dainty-eaters, who perhaps let others eat
 with them."
 
 And Zarathustra stood still and meditated. At last he said sorrowfully:
 "There hath EVERYTHING become smaller!
 
 Everywhere do I see lower doorways: he who is of MY type can still go
 therethrough, but--he must stoop!
 
 Oh, when shall I arrive again at my home, where I shall no longer have
 to stoop--shall no longer have to stoop BEFORE THE SMALL ONES!"--And
 Zarathustra sighed, and gazed into the distance.--
 
 The same day, however, he gave his discourse on the bedwarfing virtue.
 
 2.
 
 I pass through this people and keep mine eyes open: they do not forgive
 me for not envying their virtues.
 
 They bite at me, because I say unto them that for small people, small
 virtues are necessary--and because it is hard for me to understand that
 small people are NECESSARY!
 
 Here am I still like a cock in a strange farm-yard, at which even the
 hens peck: but on that account I am not unfriendly to the hens.
 
 I am courteous towards them, as towards all small annoyances; to be
 prickly towards what is small, seemeth to me wisdom for hedgehogs.
 
 They all speak of me when they sit around their fire in the
 evening--they speak of me, but no one thinketh--of me!
 
 This is the new stillness which I have experienced: their noise around
 me spreadeth a mantle over my thoughts.
 
 They shout to one another: "What is this gloomy cloud about to do to us?
 Let us see that it doth not bring a plague upon us!"
 
 And recently did a woman seize upon her child that was coming unto
 me: "Take the children away," cried she, "such eyes scorch children's
 souls."
 
 They cough when I speak: they think coughing an objection to strong
 winds--they divine nothing of the boisterousness of my happiness!
 
 "We have not yet time for Zarathustra"--so they object; but what matter
 about a time that "hath no time" for Zarathustra?
 
 And if they should altogether praise me, how could I go to sleep on
 THEIR praise? A girdle of spines is their praise unto me: it scratcheth
 me even when I take it off.
 
 And this also did I learn among them: the praiser doeth as if he gave
 back; in truth, however, he wanteth more to be given him!
 
 Ask my foot if their lauding and luring strains please it! Verily,
 to such measure and ticktack, it liketh neither to dance nor to stand
 still.
 
 To small virtues would they fain lure and laud me; to the ticktack of
 small happiness would they fain persuade my foot.
 
 I pass through this people and keep mine eyes open; they have become
 SMALLER, and ever become smaller:--THE REASON THEREOF IS THEIR DOCTRINE
 OF HAPPINESS AND VIRTUE.
 
 For they are moderate also in virtue,--because they want comfort. With
 comfort, however, moderate virtue only is compatible.
 
 To be sure, they also learn in their way to stride on and stride
 forward: that, I call their HOBBLING.--Thereby they become a hindrance
 to all who are in haste.
 
 And many of them go forward, and look backwards thereby, with stiffened
 necks: those do I like to run up against.
 
 Foot and eye shall not lie, nor give the lie to each other. But there is
 much lying among small people.
 
 Some of them WILL, but most of them are WILLED. Some of them are
 genuine, but most of them are bad actors.
 
 There are actors without knowing it amongst them, and actors without
 intending it--, the genuine ones are always rare, especially the genuine
 actors.
 
 Of man there is little here: therefore do their women masculinise
 themselves. For only he who is man enough, will--SAVE THE WOMAN in
 woman.
 
 And this hypocrisy found I worst amongst them, that even those who
 command feign the virtues of those who serve.
 
 "I serve, thou servest, we serve"--so chanteth here even the hypocrisy
 of the rulers--and alas! if the first lord be ONLY the first servant!
 
 Ah, even upon their hypocrisy did mine eyes' curiosity alight; and well
 did I divine all their fly-happiness, and their buzzing around sunny
 window-panes.
 
 So much kindness, so much weakness do I see. So much justice and pity,
 so much weakness.
 
 Round, fair, and considerate are they to one another, as grains of sand
 are round, fair, and considerate to grains of sand.
 
 Modestly to embrace a small happiness--that do they call "submission"!
 and at the same time they peer modestly after a new small happiness.
 
 In their hearts they want simply one thing most of all: that no one hurt
 them. Thus do they anticipate every one's wishes and do well unto every
 one.
 
 That, however, is COWARDICE, though it be called "virtue."--
 
 And when they chance to speak harshly, those small people, then do _I_
 hear therein only their hoarseness--every draught of air maketh them
 hoarse.
 
 Shrewd indeed are they, their virtues have shrewd fingers. But they lack
 fists: their fingers do not know how to creep behind fists.
 
 Virtue for them is what maketh modest and tame: therewith have they made
 the wolf a dog, and man himself man's best domestic animal.
 
 "We set our chair in the MIDST"--so saith their smirking unto me--"and
 as far from dying gladiators as from satisfied swine."
 
 That, however, is--MEDIOCRITY, though it be called moderation.--
 
 3.
 
 I pass through this people and let fall many words: but they know
 neither how to take nor how to retain them.
 
 They wonder why I came not to revile venery and vice; and verily, I came
 not to warn against pickpockets either!
 
 They wonder why I am not ready to abet and whet their wisdom: as if they
 had not yet enough of wiseacres, whose voices grate on mine ear like
 slate-pencils!
 
 And when I call out: "Curse all the cowardly devils in you, that
 would fain whimper and fold the hands and adore"--then do they shout:
 "Zarathustra is godless."
 
 And especially do their teachers of submission shout this;--but
 precisely in their ears do I love to cry: "Yea! I AM Zarathustra, the
 godless!"
 
 Those teachers of submission! Wherever there is aught puny, or sickly,
 or scabby, there do they creep like lice; and only my disgust preventeth
 me from cracking them.
 
 Well! This is my sermon for THEIR ears: I am Zarathustra the godless,
 who saith: "Who is more godless than I, that I may enjoy his teaching?"
 
 I am Zarathustra the godless: where do I find mine equal? And all
 those are mine equals who give unto themselves their Will, and divest
 themselves of all submission.
 
 I am Zarathustra the godless! I cook every chance in MY pot. And only
 when it hath been quite cooked do I welcome it as MY food.
 
 And verily, many a chance came imperiously unto me: but still more
 imperiously did my WILL speak unto it,--then did it lie imploringly upon
 its knees--
 
 --Imploring that it might find home and heart with me, and saying
 flatteringly: "See, O Zarathustra, how friend only cometh unto
 friend!"--
 
 But why talk I, when no one hath MINE ears! And so will I shout it out
 unto all the winds:
 
 Ye ever become smaller, ye small people! Ye crumble away, ye comfortable
 ones! Ye will yet perish--
 
 --By your many small virtues, by your many small omissions, and by your
 many small submissions!
 
 Too tender, too yielding: so is your soil! But for a tree to become
 GREAT, it seeketh to twine hard roots around hard rocks!
 
 Also what ye omit weaveth at the web of all the human future; even your
 naught is a cobweb, and a spider that liveth on the blood of the future.
 
 And when ye take, then is it like stealing, ye small virtuous ones;
 but even among knaves HONOUR saith that "one shall only steal when one
 cannot rob."
 
 "It giveth itself"--that is also a doctrine of submission. But I say
 unto you, ye comfortable ones, that IT TAKETH TO ITSELF, and will ever
 take more and more from you!
 
 Ah, that ye would renounce all HALF-willing, and would decide for
 idleness as ye decide for action!
 
 Ah, that ye understood my word: "Do ever what ye will--but first be such
 as CAN WILL.
 
 Love ever your neighbour as yourselves--but first be such as LOVE
 THEMSELVES--
 
 --Such as love with great love, such as love with great contempt!" Thus
 speaketh Zarathustra the godless.--
 
 But why talk I, when no one hath MINE ears! It is still an hour too
 early for me here.
 
 Mine own forerunner am I among this people, mine own cockcrow in dark
 lanes.
 
 But THEIR hour cometh! And there cometh also mine! Hourly do they become
 smaller, poorer, unfruitfuller,--poor herbs! poor earth!
 
 And SOON shall they stand before me like dry grass and prairie, and
 verily, weary of themselves--and panting for FIRE, more than for water!
 
 O blessed hour of the lightning! O mystery before noontide!--Running
 fires will I one day make of them, and heralds with flaming tongues:--
 
 --Herald shall they one day with flaming tongues: It cometh, it is nigh,
 THE GREAT NOONTIDE!
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 L. ON THE OLIVE-MOUNT.
 
 Winter, a bad guest, sitteth with me at home; blue are my hands with his
 friendly hand-shaking.
 
 I honour him, that bad guest, but gladly leave him alone. Gladly do I
 run away from him; and when one runneth WELL, then one escapeth him!
 
 With warm feet and warm thoughts do I run where the wind is calm--to the
 sunny corner of mine olive-mount.
 
 There do I laugh at my stern guest, and am still fond of him; because he
 cleareth my house of flies, and quieteth many little noises.
 
 For he suffereth it not if a gnat wanteth to buzz, or even two of them;
 also the lanes maketh he lonesome, so that the moonlight is afraid there
 at night.
 
 A hard guest is he,--but I honour him, and do not worship, like the
 tenderlings, the pot-bellied fire-idol.
 
 Better even a little teeth-chattering than idol-adoration!--so willeth
 my nature. And especially have I a grudge against all ardent, steaming,
 steamy fire-idols.
 
 Him whom I love, I love better in winter than in summer; better do I
 now mock at mine enemies, and more heartily, when winter sitteth in my
 house.
 
 Heartily, verily, even when I CREEP into bed--: there, still laugheth
 and wantoneth my hidden happiness; even my deceptive dream laugheth.
 
 I, a--creeper? Never in my life did I creep before the powerful; and if
 ever I lied, then did I lie out of love. Therefore am I glad even in my
 winter-bed.
 
 A poor bed warmeth me more than a rich one, for I am jealous of my
 poverty. And in winter she is most faithful unto me.
 
 With a wickedness do I begin every day: I mock at the winter with a cold
 bath: on that account grumbleth my stern house-mate.
 
 Also do I like to tickle him with a wax-taper, that he may finally let
 the heavens emerge from ashy-grey twilight.
 
 For especially wicked am I in the morning: at the early hour when the
 pail rattleth at the well, and horses neigh warmly in grey lanes:--
 
 Impatiently do I then wait, that the clear sky may finally dawn for me,
 the snow-bearded winter-sky, the hoary one, the white-head,--
 
 --The winter-sky, the silent winter-sky, which often stifleth even its
 sun!
 
 Did I perhaps learn from it the long clear silence? Or did it learn it
 from me? Or hath each of us devised it himself?
 
 Of all good things the origin is a thousandfold,--all good roguish
 things spring into existence for joy: how could they always do so--for
 once only!
 
 A good roguish thing is also the long silence, and to look, like the
 winter-sky, out of a clear, round-eyed countenance:--
 
 --Like it to stifle one's sun, and one's inflexible solar will: verily,
 this art and this winter-roguishness have I learnt WELL!
 
 My best-loved wickedness and art is it, that my silence hath learned not
 to betray itself by silence.
 
 Clattering with diction and dice, I outwit the solemn assistants: all
 those stern watchers, shall my will and purpose elude.
 
 That no one might see down into my depth and into mine ultimate
 will--for that purpose did I devise the long clear silence.
 
 Many a shrewd one did I find: he veiled his countenance and made his
 water muddy, that no one might see therethrough and thereunder.
 
 But precisely unto him came the shrewder distrusters and nut-crackers:
 precisely from him did they fish his best-concealed fish!
 
 But the clear, the honest, the transparent--these are for me the wisest
 silent ones: in them, so PROFOUND is the depth that even the clearest
 water doth not--betray it.--
 
 Thou snow-bearded, silent, winter-sky, thou round-eyed whitehead above
 me! Oh, thou heavenly simile of my soul and its wantonness!
 
 And MUST I not conceal myself like one who hath swallowed gold--lest my
 soul should be ripped up?
 
 MUST I not wear stilts, that they may OVERLOOK my long legs--all those
 enviers and injurers around me?
 
 Those dingy, fire-warmed, used-up, green-tinted, ill-natured souls--how
 COULD their envy endure my happiness!
 
 Thus do I show them only the ice and winter of my peaks--and NOT that my
 mountain windeth all the solar girdles around it!
 
 They hear only the whistling of my winter-storms: and know NOT that I
 also travel over warm seas, like longing, heavy, hot south-winds.
 
 They commiserate also my accidents and chances:--but MY word saith:
 "Suffer the chance to come unto me: innocent is it as a little child!"
 
 How COULD they endure my happiness, if I did not put around it
 accidents, and winter-privations, and bear-skin caps, and enmantling
 snowflakes!
 
 --If I did not myself commiserate their PITY, the pity of those enviers
 and injurers!
 
 --If I did not myself sigh before them, and chatter with cold, and
 patiently LET myself be swathed in their pity!
 
 This is the wise waggish-will and good-will of my soul, that it
 CONCEALETH NOT its winters and glacial storms; it concealeth not its
 chilblains either.
 
 To one man, lonesomeness is the flight of the sick one; to another, it
 is the flight FROM the sick ones.
 
 Let them HEAR me chattering and sighing with winter-cold, all those poor
 squinting knaves around me! With such sighing and chattering do I flee
 from their heated rooms.
 
 Let them sympathise with me and sigh with me on account of my
 chilblains: "At the ice of knowledge will he yet FREEZE TO DEATH!"--so
 they mourn.
 
 Meanwhile do I run with warm feet hither and thither on mine
 olive-mount: in the sunny corner of mine olive-mount do I sing, and mock
 at all pity.--
 
 Thus sang Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LI. ON PASSING-BY.
 
 Thus slowly wandering through many peoples and divers cities, did
 Zarathustra return by round-about roads to his mountains and his cave.
 And behold, thereby came he unawares also to the gate of the GREAT CITY.
 Here, however, a foaming fool, with extended hands, sprang forward to
 him and stood in his way. It was the same fool whom the people called
 "the ape of Zarathustra:" for he had learned from him something of the
 expression and modulation of language, and perhaps liked also to borrow
 from the store of his wisdom. And the fool talked thus to Zarathustra:
 
 O Zarathustra, here is the great city: here hast thou nothing to seek
 and everything to lose.
 
 Why wouldst thou wade through this mire? Have pity upon thy foot! Spit
 rather on the gate of the city, and--turn back!
 
 Here is the hell for anchorites' thoughts: here are great thoughts
 seethed alive and boiled small.
 
 Here do all great sentiments decay: here may only rattle-boned
 sensations rattle!
 
 Smellest thou not already the shambles and cookshops of the spirit?
 Steameth not this city with the fumes of slaughtered spirit?
 
 Seest thou not the souls hanging like limp dirty rags?--And they make
 newspapers also out of these rags!
 
 Hearest thou not how spirit hath here become a verbal game? Loathsome
 verbal swill doth it vomit forth!--And they make newspapers also out of
 this verbal swill.
 
 They hound one another, and know not whither! They inflame one another,
 and know not why! They tinkle with their pinchbeck, they jingle with
 their gold.
 
 They are cold, and seek warmth from distilled waters: they are inflamed,
 and seek coolness from frozen spirits; they are all sick and sore
 through public opinion.
 
 All lusts and vices are here at home; but here there are also the
 virtuous; there is much appointable appointed virtue:--
 
 Much appointable virtue with scribe-fingers, and hardy sitting-flesh and
 waiting-flesh, blessed with small breast-stars, and padded, haunchless
 daughters.
 
 There is here also much piety, and much faithful spittle-licking and
 spittle-backing, before the God of Hosts.
 
 "From on high," drippeth the star, and the gracious spittle; for the
 high, longeth every starless bosom.
 
 The moon hath its court, and the court hath its moon-calves: unto all,
 however, that cometh from the court do the mendicant people pray, and
 all appointable mendicant virtues.
 
 "I serve, thou servest, we serve"--so prayeth all appointable virtue
 to the prince: that the merited star may at last stick on the slender
 breast!
 
 But the moon still revolveth around all that is earthly: so revolveth
 also the prince around what is earthliest of all--that, however, is the
 gold of the shopman.
 
 The God of the Hosts of war is not the God of the golden bar; the prince
 proposeth, but the shopman--disposeth!
 
 By all that is luminous and strong and good in thee, O Zarathustra! Spit
 on this city of shopmen and return back!
 
 Here floweth all blood putridly and tepidly and frothily through all
 veins: spit on the great city, which is the great slum where all the
 scum frotheth together!
 
 Spit on the city of compressed souls and slender breasts, of pointed
 eyes and sticky fingers--
 
 --On the city of the obtrusive, the brazen-faced, the pen-demagogues and
 tongue-demagogues, the overheated ambitious:--
 
 Where everything maimed, ill-famed, lustful, untrustful, over-mellow,
 sickly-yellow and seditious, festereth pernicious:--
 
 --Spit on the great city and turn back!--
 
 Here, however, did Zarathustra interrupt the foaming fool, and shut his
 mouth.--
 
 Stop this at once! called out Zarathustra, long have thy speech and thy
 species disgusted me!
 
 Why didst thou live so long by the swamp, that thou thyself hadst to
 become a frog and a toad?
 
 Floweth there not a tainted, frothy, swamp-blood in thine own veins,
 when thou hast thus learned to croak and revile?
 
 Why wentest thou not into the forest? Or why didst thou not till the
 ground? Is the sea not full of green islands?
 
 I despise thy contempt; and when thou warnedst me--why didst thou not
 warn thyself?
 
 Out of love alone shall my contempt and my warning bird take wing; but
 not out of the swamp!--
 
 They call thee mine ape, thou foaming fool: but I call thee my
 grunting-pig,--by thy grunting, thou spoilest even my praise of folly.
 
 What was it that first made thee grunt? Because no one sufficiently
 FLATTERED thee:--therefore didst thou seat thyself beside this filth,
 that thou mightest have cause for much grunting,--
 
 --That thou mightest have cause for much VENGEANCE! For vengeance, thou
 vain fool, is all thy foaming; I have divined thee well!
 
 But thy fools'-word injureth ME, even when thou art right! And even if
 Zarathustra's word WERE a hundred times justified, thou wouldst ever--DO
 wrong with my word!
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra. Then did he look on the great city and sighed,
 and was long silent. At last he spake thus:
 
 I loathe also this great city, and not only this fool. Here and there--
 there is nothing to better, nothing to worsen.
 
 Woe to this great city!--And I would that I already saw the pillar of
 fire in which it will be consumed!
 
 For such pillars of fire must precede the great noontide. But this hath
 its time and its own fate.--
 
 This precept, however, give I unto thee, in parting, thou fool: Where
 one can no longer love, there should one--PASS BY!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and passed by the fool and the great city.
 
 
 
 
 LII. THE APOSTATES.
 
 1.
 
 Ah, lieth everything already withered and grey which but lately stood
 green and many-hued on this meadow! And how much honey of hope did I
 carry hence into my beehives!
 
 Those young hearts have already all become old--and not old even! only
 weary, ordinary, comfortable:--they declare it: "We have again become
 pious."
 
 Of late did I see them run forth at early morn with valorous steps: but
 the feet of their knowledge became weary, and now do they malign even
 their morning valour!
 
 Verily, many of them once lifted their legs like the dancer; to them
 winked the laughter of my wisdom:--then did they bethink themselves.
 Just now have I seen them bent down--to creep to the cross.
 
 Around light and liberty did they once flutter like gnats and young
 poets. A little older, a little colder: and already are they mystifiers,
 and mumblers and mollycoddles.
 
 Did perhaps their hearts despond, because lonesomeness had swallowed me
 like a whale? Did their ear perhaps hearken yearningly-long for me IN
 VAIN, and for my trumpet-notes and herald-calls?
 
 --Ah! Ever are there but few of those whose hearts have persistent
 courage and exuberance; and in such remaineth also the spirit patient.
 The rest, however, are COWARDLY.
 
 The rest: these are always the great majority, the common-place, the
 superfluous, the far-too many--those all are cowardly!--
 
 Him who is of my type, will also the experiences of my type meet on the
 way: so that his first companions must be corpses and buffoons.
 
 His second companions, however--they will call themselves his
 BELIEVERS,--will be a living host, with much love, much folly, much
 unbearded veneration.
 
 To those believers shall he who is of my type among men not bind his
 heart; in those spring-times and many-hued meadows shall he not believe,
 who knoweth the fickly faint-hearted human species!
 
 COULD they do otherwise, then would they also WILL otherwise. The
 half-and-half spoil every whole. That leaves become withered,--what is
 there to lament about that!
 
 Let them go and fall away, O Zarathustra, and do not lament! Better even
 to blow amongst them with rustling winds,--
 
 --Blow amongst those leaves, O Zarathustra, that everything WITHERED may
 run away from thee the faster!--
 
 2.
 
 "We have again become pious"--so do those apostates confess; and some of
 them are still too pusillanimous thus to confess.
 
 Unto them I look into the eye,--before them I say it unto their face and
 unto the blush on their cheeks: Ye are those who again PRAY!
 
 It is however a shame to pray! Not for all, but for thee, and me, and
 whoever hath his conscience in his head. For THEE it is a shame to pray!
 
 Thou knowest it well: the faint-hearted devil in thee, which would
 fain fold its arms, and place its hands in its bosom, and take it
 easier:--this faint-hearted devil persuadeth thee that "there IS a God!"
 
 THEREBY, however, dost thou belong to the light-dreading type, to whom
 light never permitteth repose: now must thou daily thrust thy head
 deeper into obscurity and vapour!
 
 And verily, thou choosest the hour well: for just now do the nocturnal
 birds again fly abroad. The hour hath come for all light-dreading
 people, the vesper hour and leisure hour, when they do not--"take
 leisure."
 
 I hear it and smell it: it hath come--their hour for hunt and
 procession, not indeed for a wild hunt, but for a tame, lame, snuffling,
 soft-treaders', soft-prayers' hunt,--
 
 --For a hunt after susceptible simpletons: all mouse-traps for the heart
 have again been set! And whenever I lift a curtain, a night-moth rusheth
 out of it.
 
 Did it perhaps squat there along with another night-moth? For everywhere
 do I smell small concealed communities; and wherever there are closets
 there are new devotees therein, and the atmosphere of devotees.
 
 They sit for long evenings beside one another, and say: "Let us again
 become like little children and say, 'good God!'"--ruined in mouths and
 stomachs by the pious confectioners.
 
 Or they look for long evenings at a crafty, lurking cross-spider, that
 preacheth prudence to the spiders themselves, and teacheth that "under
 crosses it is good for cobweb-spinning!"
 
 Or they sit all day at swamps with angle-rods, and on that account think
 themselves PROFOUND; but whoever fisheth where there are no fish, I do
 not even call him superficial!
 
 Or they learn in godly-gay style to play the harp with a hymn-poet,
 who would fain harp himself into the heart of young girls:--for he hath
 tired of old girls and their praises.
 
 Or they learn to shudder with a learned semi-madcap, who waiteth in
 darkened rooms for spirits to come to him--and the spirit runneth away
 entirely!
 
 Or they listen to an old roving howl-and growl-piper, who hath learnt
 from the sad winds the sadness of sounds; now pipeth he as the wind, and
 preacheth sadness in sad strains.
 
 And some of them have even become night-watchmen: they know now how to
 blow horns, and go about at night and awaken old things which have long
 fallen asleep.
 
 Five words about old things did I hear yester-night at the garden-wall:
 they came from such old, sorrowful, arid night-watchmen.
 
 "For a father he careth not sufficiently for his children: human fathers
 do this better!"--
 
 "He is too old! He now careth no more for his children,"--answered the
 other night-watchman.
 
 "HATH he then children? No one can prove it unless he himself prove it!
 I have long wished that he would for once prove it thoroughly."
 
 "Prove? As if HE had ever proved anything! Proving is difficult to him;
 he layeth great stress on one's BELIEVING him."
 
 "Ay! Ay! Belief saveth him; belief in him. That is the way with old
 people! So it is with us also!"--
 
 --Thus spake to each other the two old night-watchmen and light-scarers,
 and tooted thereupon sorrowfully on their horns: so did it happen
 yester-night at the garden-wall.
 
 To me, however, did the heart writhe with laughter, and was like to
 break; it knew not where to go, and sunk into the midriff.
 
 Verily, it will be my death yet--to choke with laughter when I see asses
 drunken, and hear night-watchmen thus doubt about God.
 
 Hath the time not LONG since passed for all such doubts? Who may
 nowadays awaken such old slumbering, light-shunning things!
 
 With the old Deities hath it long since come to an end:--and verily, a
 good joyful Deity-end had they!
 
 They did not "begloom" themselves to death--that do people fabricate! On
 the contrary, they--LAUGHED themselves to death once on a time!
 
 That took place when the unGodliest utterance came from a God
 himself--the utterance: "There is but one God! Thou shalt have no other
 Gods before me!"--
 
 --An old grim-beard of a God, a jealous one, forgot himself in such
 wise:--
 
 And all the Gods then laughed, and shook upon their thrones, and
 exclaimed: "Is it not just divinity that there are Gods, but no God?"
 
 He that hath an ear let him hear.--
 
 Thus talked Zarathustra in the city he loved, which is surnamed "The
 Pied Cow." For from here he had but two days to travel to reach once
 more his cave and his animals; his soul, however, rejoiced unceasingly
 on account of the nighness of his return home.
 
 
 
 
 LIII. THE RETURN HOME.
 
 O lonesomeness! My HOME, lonesomeness! Too long have I lived wildly in
 wild remoteness, to return to thee without tears!
 
 Now threaten me with the finger as mothers threaten; now smile upon me
 as mothers smile; now say just: "Who was it that like a whirlwind once
 rushed away from me?--
 
 --Who when departing called out: 'Too long have I sat with lonesomeness;
 there have I unlearned silence!' THAT hast thou learned now--surely?
 
 O Zarathustra, everything do I know; and that thou wert MORE FORSAKEN
 amongst the many, thou unique one, than thou ever wert with me!
 
 One thing is forsakenness, another matter is lonesomeness: THAT hast
 thou now learned! And that amongst men thou wilt ever be wild and
 strange:
 
 --Wild and strange even when they love thee: for above all they want to
 be TREATED INDULGENTLY!
 
 Here, however, art thou at home and house with thyself; here canst thou
 utter everything, and unbosom all motives; nothing is here ashamed of
 concealed, congealed feelings.
 
 Here do all things come caressingly to thy talk and flatter thee: for
 they want to ride upon thy back. On every simile dost thou here ride to
 every truth.
 
 Uprightly and openly mayest thou here talk to all things: and verily,
 it soundeth as praise in their ears, for one to talk to all
 things--directly!
 
 Another matter, however, is forsakenness. For, dost thou remember, O
 Zarathustra? When thy bird screamed overhead, when thou stoodest in the
 forest, irresolute, ignorant where to go, beside a corpse:--
 
 --When thou spakest: 'Let mine animals lead me! More dangerous have I
 found it among men than among animals:'--THAT was forsakenness!
 
 And dost thou remember, O Zarathustra? When thou sattest in thine isle,
 a well of wine giving and granting amongst empty buckets, bestowing and
 distributing amongst the thirsty:
 
 --Until at last thou alone sattest thirsty amongst the drunken ones, and
 wailedst nightly: 'Is taking not more blessed than giving? And stealing
 yet more blessed than taking?'--THAT was forsakenness!
 
 And dost thou remember, O Zarathustra? When thy stillest hour came and
 drove thee forth from thyself, when with wicked whispering it said:
 'Speak and succumb!'--
 
 --When it disgusted thee with all thy waiting and silence, and
 discouraged thy humble courage: THAT was forsakenness!"--
 
 O lonesomeness! My home, lonesomeness! How blessedly and tenderly
 speaketh thy voice unto me!
 
 We do not question each other, we do not complain to each other; we go
 together openly through open doors.
 
 For all is open with thee and clear; and even the hours run here on
 lighter feet. For in the dark, time weigheth heavier upon one than in
 the light.
 
 Here fly open unto me all being's words and word-cabinets: here all
 being wanteth to become words, here all becoming wanteth to learn of me
 how to talk.
 
 Down there, however--all talking is in vain! There, forgetting and
 passing-by are the best wisdom: THAT have I learned now!
 
 He who would understand everything in man must handle everything. But
 for that I have too clean hands.
 
 I do not like even to inhale their breath; alas! that I have lived so
 long among their noise and bad breaths!
 
 O blessed stillness around me! O pure odours around me! How from a deep
 breast this stillness fetcheth pure breath! How it hearkeneth, this
 blessed stillness!
 
 But down there--there speaketh everything, there is everything misheard.
 If one announce one's wisdom with bells, the shopmen in the market-place
 will out-jingle it with pennies!
 
 Everything among them talketh; no one knoweth any longer how to
 understand. Everything falleth into the water; nothing falleth any
 longer into deep wells.
 
 Everything among them talketh, nothing succeedeth any longer and
 accomplisheth itself. Everything cackleth, but who will still sit
 quietly on the nest and hatch eggs?
 
 Everything among them talketh, everything is out-talked. And that which
 yesterday was still too hard for time itself and its tooth, hangeth
 to-day, outchamped and outchewed, from the mouths of the men of to-day.
 
 Everything among them talketh, everything is betrayed. And what was once
 called the secret and secrecy of profound souls, belongeth to-day to the
 street-trumpeters and other butterflies.
 
 O human hubbub, thou wonderful thing! Thou noise in dark streets! Now
 art thou again behind me:--my greatest danger lieth behind me!
 
 In indulging and pitying lay ever my greatest danger; and all human
 hubbub wisheth to be indulged and tolerated.
 
 With suppressed truths, with fool's hand and befooled heart, and rich in
 petty lies of pity:--thus have I ever lived among men.
 
 Disguised did I sit amongst them, ready to misjudge MYSELF that I might
 endure THEM, and willingly saying to myself: "Thou fool, thou dost not
 know men!"
 
 One unlearneth men when one liveth amongst them: there is too much
 foreground in all men--what can far-seeing, far-longing eyes do THERE!
 
 And, fool that I was, when they misjudged me, I indulged them on that
 account more than myself, being habitually hard on myself, and often
 even taking revenge on myself for the indulgence.
 
 Stung all over by poisonous flies, and hollowed like the stone by
 many drops of wickedness: thus did I sit among them, and still said to
 myself: "Innocent is everything petty of its pettiness!"
 
 Especially did I find those who call themselves "the good," the most
 poisonous flies; they sting in all innocence, they lie in all innocence;
 how COULD they--be just towards me!
 
 He who liveth amongst the good--pity teacheth him to lie. Pity maketh
 stifling air for all free souls. For the stupidity of the good is
 unfathomable.
 
 To conceal myself and my riches--THAT did I learn down there: for every
 one did I still find poor in spirit. It was the lie of my pity, that I
 knew in every one,
 
 --That I saw and scented in every one, what was ENOUGH of spirit for
 him, and what was TOO MUCH!
 
 Their stiff wise men: I call them wise, not stiff--thus did I learn to
 slur over words.
 
 The grave-diggers dig for themselves diseases. Under old rubbish rest
 bad vapours. One should not stir up the marsh. One should live on
 mountains.
 
 With blessed nostrils do I again breathe mountain-freedom. Freed at last
 is my nose from the smell of all human hubbub!
 
 With sharp breezes tickled, as with sparkling wine, SNEEZETH my soul--
 sneezeth, and shouteth self-congratulatingly: "Health to thee!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LIV. THE THREE EVIL THINGS.
 
 1.
 
 In my dream, in my last morning-dream, I stood to-day on a promontory--
 beyond the world; I held a pair of scales, and WEIGHED the world.
 
 Alas, that the rosy dawn came too early to me: she glowed me awake, the
 jealous one! Jealous is she always of the glows of my morning-dream.
 
 Measurable by him who hath time, weighable by a good weigher, attainable
 by strong pinions, divinable by divine nut-crackers: thus did my dream
 find the world:--
 
 My dream, a bold sailor, half-ship, half-hurricane, silent as the
 butterfly, impatient as the falcon: how had it the patience and leisure
 to-day for world-weighing!
 
 Did my wisdom perhaps speak secretly to it, my laughing, wide-awake
 day-wisdom, which mocketh at all "infinite worlds"? For it saith: "Where
 force is, there becometh NUMBER the master: it hath more force."
 
 How confidently did my dream contemplate this finite world, not
 new-fangledly, not old-fangledly, not timidly, not entreatingly:--
 
 --As if a big round apple presented itself to my hand, a ripe golden
 apple, with a coolly-soft, velvety skin:--thus did the world present
 itself unto me:--
 
 --As if a tree nodded unto me, a broad-branched, strong-willed tree,
 curved as a recline and a foot-stool for weary travellers: thus did the
 world stand on my promontory:--
 
 --As if delicate hands carried a casket towards me--a casket open for
 the delectation of modest adoring eyes: thus did the world present
 itself before me to-day:--
 
 --Not riddle enough to scare human love from it, not solution enough
 to put to sleep human wisdom:--a humanly good thing was the world to me
 to-day, of which such bad things are said!
 
 How I thank my morning-dream that I thus at to-day's dawn, weighed
 the world! As a humanly good thing did it come unto me, this dream and
 heart-comforter!
 
 And that I may do the like by day, and imitate and copy its best, now
 will I put the three worst things on the scales, and weigh them humanly
 well.--
 
 He who taught to bless taught also to curse: what are the three best
 cursed things in the world? These will I put on the scales.
 
 VOLUPTUOUSNESS, PASSION FOR POWER, and SELFISHNESS: these three things
 have hitherto been best cursed, and have been in worst and falsest
 repute--these three things will I weigh humanly well.
 
 Well! Here is my promontory, and there is the sea--IT rolleth hither
 unto me, shaggily and fawningly, the old, faithful, hundred-headed
 dog-monster that I love!--
 
 Well! Here will I hold the scales over the weltering sea: and also a
 witness do I choose to look on--thee, the anchorite-tree, thee, the
 strong-odoured, broad-arched tree that I love!--
 
 On what bridge goeth the now to the hereafter? By what constraint doth
 the high stoop to the low? And what enjoineth even the highest still--to
 grow upwards?--
 
 Now stand the scales poised and at rest: three heavy questions have I
 thrown in; three heavy answers carrieth the other scale.
 
 2.
 
 Voluptuousness: unto all hair-shirted despisers of the body, a sting and
 stake; and, cursed as "the world," by all backworldsmen: for it mocketh
 and befooleth all erring, misinferring teachers.
 
 Voluptuousness: to the rabble, the slow fire at which it is burnt;
 to all wormy wood, to all stinking rags, the prepared heat and stew
 furnace.
 
 Voluptuousness: to free hearts, a thing innocent and free, the
 garden-happiness of the earth, all the future's thanks-overflow to the
 present.
 
 Voluptuousness: only to the withered a sweet poison; to the lion-willed,
 however, the great cordial, and the reverently saved wine of wines.
 
 Voluptuousness: the great symbolic happiness of a higher happiness
 and highest hope. For to many is marriage promised, and more than
 marriage,--
 
 --To many that are more unknown to each other than man and woman:--and
 who hath fully understood HOW UNKNOWN to each other are man and woman!
 
 Voluptuousness:--but I will have hedges around my thoughts, and
 even around my words, lest swine and libertine should break into my
 gardens!--
 
 Passion for power: the glowing scourge of the hardest of the heart-hard;
 the cruel torture reserved for the cruellest themselves; the gloomy
 flame of living pyres.
 
 Passion for power: the wicked gadfly which is mounted on the vainest
 peoples; the scorner of all uncertain virtue; which rideth on every
 horse and on every pride.
 
 Passion for power: the earthquake which breaketh and upbreaketh all
 that is rotten and hollow; the rolling, rumbling, punitive demolisher
 of whited sepulchres; the flashing interrogative-sign beside premature
 answers.
 
 Passion for power: before whose glance man creepeth and croucheth and
 drudgeth, and becometh lower than the serpent and the swine:--until at
 last great contempt crieth out of him--,
 
 Passion for power: the terrible teacher of great contempt, which
 preacheth to their face to cities and empires: "Away with thee!"--until
 a voice crieth out of themselves: "Away with ME!"
 
 Passion for power: which, however, mounteth alluringly even to the pure
 and lonesome, and up to self-satisfied elevations, glowing like a love
 that painteth purple felicities alluringly on earthly heavens.
 
 Passion for power: but who would call it PASSION, when the height
 longeth to stoop for power! Verily, nothing sick or diseased is there in
 such longing and descending!
 
 That the lonesome height may not for ever remain lonesome and
 self-sufficing; that the mountains may come to the valleys and the winds
 of the heights to the plains:--
 
 Oh, who could find the right prenomen and honouring name for such
 longing! "Bestowing virtue"--thus did Zarathustra once name the
 unnamable.
 
 And then it happened also,--and verily, it happened for the first
 time!--that his word blessed SELFISHNESS, the wholesome, healthy
 selfishness, that springeth from the powerful soul:--
 
 --From the powerful soul, to which the high body appertaineth, the
 handsome, triumphing, refreshing body, around which everything becometh
 a mirror:
 
 --The pliant, persuasive body, the dancer, whose symbol and epitome
 is the self-enjoying soul. Of such bodies and souls the self-enjoyment
 calleth itself "virtue."
 
 With its words of good and bad doth such self-enjoyment shelter itself
 as with sacred groves; with the names of its happiness doth it banish
 from itself everything contemptible.
 
 Away from itself doth it banish everything cowardly; it saith:
 "Bad--THAT IS cowardly!" Contemptible seem to it the ever-solicitous,
 the sighing, the complaining, and whoever pick up the most trifling
 advantage.
 
 It despiseth also all bitter-sweet wisdom: for verily, there is also
 wisdom that bloometh in the dark, a night-shade wisdom, which ever
 sigheth: "All is vain!"
 
 Shy distrust is regarded by it as base, and every one who wanteth oaths
 instead of looks and hands: also all over-distrustful wisdom,--for such
 is the mode of cowardly souls.
 
 Baser still it regardeth the obsequious, doggish one, who immediately
 lieth on his back, the submissive one; and there is also wisdom that is
 submissive, and doggish, and pious, and obsequious.
 
 Hateful to it altogether, and a loathing, is he who will never defend
 himself, he who swalloweth down poisonous spittle and bad looks, the
 all-too-patient one, the all-endurer, the all-satisfied one: for that is
 the mode of slaves.
 
 Whether they be servile before Gods and divine spurnings, or before men
 and stupid human opinions: at ALL kinds of slaves doth it spit, this
 blessed selfishness!
 
 Bad: thus doth it call all that is spirit-broken, and
 sordidly-servile--constrained, blinking eyes, depressed hearts, and the
 false submissive style, which kisseth with broad cowardly lips.
 
 And spurious wisdom: so doth it call all the wit that slaves, and
 hoary-headed and weary ones affect; and especially all the cunning,
 spurious-witted, curious-witted foolishness of priests!
 
 The spurious wise, however, all the priests, the world-weary, and those
 whose souls are of feminine and servile nature--oh, how hath their game
 all along abused selfishness!
 
 And precisely THAT was to be virtue and was to be called virtue--to
 abuse selfishness! And "selfless"--so did they wish themselves with good
 reason, all those world-weary cowards and cross-spiders!
 
 But to all those cometh now the day, the change, the sword of judgment,
 THE GREAT NOONTIDE: then shall many things be revealed!
 
 And he who proclaimeth the EGO wholesome and holy, and selfishness
 blessed, verily, he, the prognosticator, speaketh also what he knoweth:
 "BEHOLD, IT COMETH, IT IS NIGH, THE GREAT NOONTIDE!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LV. THE SPIRIT OF GRAVITY.
 
 1.
 
 My mouthpiece--is of the people: too coarsely and cordially do I
 talk for Angora rabbits. And still stranger soundeth my word unto all
 ink-fish and pen-foxes.
 
 My hand--is a fool's hand: woe unto all tables and walls, and whatever
 hath room for fool's sketching, fool's scrawling!
 
 My foot--is a horse-foot; therewith do I trample and trot over stick and
 stone, in the fields up and down, and am bedevilled with delight in all
 fast racing.
 
 My stomach--is surely an eagle's stomach? For it preferreth lamb's
 flesh. Certainly it is a bird's stomach.
 
 Nourished with innocent things, and with few, ready and impatient
 to fly, to fly away--that is now my nature: why should there not be
 something of bird-nature therein!
 
 And especially that I am hostile to the spirit of gravity, that is
 bird-nature:--verily, deadly hostile, supremely hostile, originally
 hostile! Oh, whither hath my hostility not flown and misflown!
 
 Thereof could I sing a song--and WILL sing it: though I be alone in an
 empty house, and must sing it to mine own ears.
 
 Other singers are there, to be sure, to whom only the full house
 maketh the voice soft, the hand eloquent, the eye expressive, the heart
 wakeful:--those do I not resemble.--
 
 2.
 
 He who one day teacheth men to fly will have shifted all landmarks; to
 him will all landmarks themselves fly into the air; the earth will he
 christen anew--as "the light body."
 
 The ostrich runneth faster than the fastest horse, but it also thrusteth
 its head heavily into the heavy earth: thus is it with the man who
 cannot yet fly.
 
 Heavy unto him are earth and life, and so WILLETH the spirit of gravity!
 But he who would become light, and be a bird, must love himself:--thus
 do _I_ teach.
 
 Not, to be sure, with the love of the sick and infected, for with them
 stinketh even self-love!
 
 One must learn to love oneself--thus do I teach--with a wholesome and
 healthy love: that one may endure to be with oneself, and not go roving
 about.
 
 Such roving about christeneth itself "brotherly love"; with these words
 hath there hitherto been the best lying and dissembling, and especially
 by those who have been burdensome to every one.
 
 And verily, it is no commandment for to-day and to-morrow to LEARN to
 love oneself. Rather is it of all arts the finest, subtlest, last and
 patientest.
 
 For to its possessor is all possession well concealed, and of all
 treasure-pits one's own is last excavated--so causeth the spirit of
 gravity.
 
 Almost in the cradle are we apportioned with heavy words and worths:
 "good" and "evil"--so calleth itself this dowry. For the sake of it we
 are forgiven for living.
 
 And therefore suffereth one little children to come unto one, to forbid
 them betimes to love themselves--so causeth the spirit of gravity.
 
 And we--we bear loyally what is apportioned unto us, on hard shoulders,
 over rugged mountains! And when we sweat, then do people say to us:
 "Yea, life is hard to bear!"
 
 But man himself only is hard to bear! The reason thereof is that he
 carrieth too many extraneous things on his shoulders. Like the camel
 kneeleth he down, and letteth himself be well laden.
 
 Especially the strong load-bearing man in whom reverence resideth. Too
 many EXTRANEOUS heavy words and worths loadeth he upon himself--then
 seemeth life to him a desert!
 
 And verily! Many a thing also that is OUR OWN is hard to bear! And many
 internal things in man are like the oyster--repulsive and slippery and
 hard to grasp;--
 
 So that an elegant shell, with elegant adornment, must plead for
 them. But this art also must one learn: to HAVE a shell, and a fine
 appearance, and sagacious blindness!
 
 Again, it deceiveth about many things in man, that many a shell is poor
 and pitiable, and too much of a shell. Much concealed goodness and power
 is never dreamt of; the choicest dainties find no tasters!
 
 Women know that, the choicest of them: a little fatter a little leaner--
 oh, how much fate is in so little!
 
 Man is difficult to discover, and unto himself most difficult of all;
 often lieth the spirit concerning the soul. So causeth the spirit of
 gravity.
 
 He, however, hath discovered himself who saith: This is MY good and
 evil: therewith hath he silenced the mole and the dwarf, who say: "Good
 for all, evil for all."
 
 Verily, neither do I like those who call everything good, and this world
 the best of all. Those do I call the all-satisfied.
 
 All-satisfiedness, which knoweth how to taste everything,--that is
 not the best taste! I honour the refractory, fastidious tongues and
 stomachs, which have learned to say "I" and "Yea" and "Nay."
 
 To chew and digest everything, however--that is the genuine
 swine-nature! Ever to say YE-A--that hath only the ass learnt, and those
 like it!--
 
 Deep yellow and hot red--so wanteth MY taste--it mixeth blood with all
 colours. He, however, who whitewasheth his house, betrayeth unto me a
 whitewashed soul.
 
 With mummies, some fall in love; others with phantoms: both alike
 hostile to all flesh and blood--oh, how repugnant are both to my taste!
 For I love blood.
 
 And there will I not reside and abide where every one spitteth and
 speweth: that is now MY taste,--rather would I live amongst thieves and
 perjurers. Nobody carrieth gold in his mouth.
 
 Still more repugnant unto me, however, are all lickspittles; and the
 most repugnant animal of man that I found, did I christen "parasite": it
 would not love, and would yet live by love.
 
 Unhappy do I call all those who have only one choice: either to become
 evil beasts, or evil beast-tamers. Amongst such would I not build my
 tabernacle.
 
 Unhappy do I also call those who have ever to WAIT,--they are repugnant
 to my taste--all the toll-gatherers and traders, and kings, and other
 landkeepers and shopkeepers.
 
 Verily, I learned waiting also, and thoroughly so,--but only waiting for
 MYSELF. And above all did I learn standing and walking and running and
 leaping and climbing and dancing.
 
 This however is my teaching: he who wisheth one day to fly, must first
 learn standing and walking and running and climbing and dancing:--one
 doth not fly into flying!
 
 With rope-ladders learned I to reach many a window, with nimble legs did
 I climb high masts: to sit on high masts of perception seemed to me no
 small bliss;--
 
 --To flicker like small flames on high masts: a small light, certainly,
 but a great comfort to cast-away sailors and ship-wrecked ones!
 
 By divers ways and wendings did I arrive at my truth; not by one ladder
 did I mount to the height where mine eye roveth into my remoteness.
 
 And unwillingly only did I ask my way--that was always counter to my
 taste! Rather did I question and test the ways themselves.
 
 A testing and a questioning hath been all my travelling:--and verily,
 one must also LEARN to answer such questioning! That, however,--is my
 taste:
 
 --Neither a good nor a bad taste, but MY taste, of which I have no
 longer either shame or secrecy.
 
 "This--is now MY way,--where is yours?" Thus did I answer those who
 asked me "the way." For THE way--it doth not exist!
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LVI. OLD AND NEW TABLES.
 
 1.
 
 Here do I sit and wait, old broken tables around me and also new
 half-written tables. When cometh mine hour?
 
 --The hour of my descent, of my down-going: for once more will I go unto
 men.
 
 For that hour do I now wait: for first must the signs come unto me that
 it is MINE hour--namely, the laughing lion with the flock of doves.
 
 Meanwhile do I talk to myself as one who hath time. No one telleth me
 anything new, so I tell myself mine own story.
 
 2.
 
 When I came unto men, then found I them resting on an old infatuation:
 all of them thought they had long known what was good and bad for men.
 
 An old wearisome business seemed to them all discourse about virtue; and
 he who wished to sleep well spake of "good" and "bad" ere retiring to
 rest.
 
 This somnolence did I disturb when I taught that NO ONE YET KNOWETH what
 is good and bad:--unless it be the creating one!
 
 --It is he, however, who createth man's goal, and giveth to the earth
 its meaning and its future: he only EFFECTETH it THAT aught is good or
 bad.
 
 And I bade them upset their old academic chairs, and wherever that old
 infatuation had sat; I bade them laugh at their great moralists, their
 saints, their poets, and their Saviours.
 
 At their gloomy sages did I bid them laugh, and whoever had sat
 admonishing as a black scarecrow on the tree of life.
 
 On their great grave-highway did I seat myself, and even beside the
 carrion and vultures--and I laughed at all their bygone and its mellow
 decaying glory.
 
 Verily, like penitential preachers and fools did I cry wrath and shame
 on all their greatness and smallness. Oh, that their best is so very
 small! Oh, that their worst is so very small! Thus did I laugh.
 
 Thus did my wise longing, born in the mountains, cry and laugh in me; a
 wild wisdom, verily!--my great pinion-rustling longing.
 
 And oft did it carry me off and up and away and in the midst of
 laughter; then flew I quivering like an arrow with sun-intoxicated
 rapture:
 
 --Out into distant futures, which no dream hath yet seen, into warmer
 souths than ever sculptor conceived,--where gods in their dancing are
 ashamed of all clothes:
 
 (That I may speak in parables and halt and stammer like the poets: and
 verily I am ashamed that I have still to be a poet!)
 
 Where all becoming seemed to me dancing of Gods, and wantoning of Gods,
 and the world unloosed and unbridled and fleeing back to itself:--
 
 --As an eternal self-fleeing and re-seeking of one another of many Gods,
 as the blessed self-contradicting, recommuning, and refraternising with
 one another of many Gods:--
 
 Where all time seemed to me a blessed mockery of moments, where
 necessity was freedom itself, which played happily with the goad of
 freedom:--
 
 Where I also found again mine old devil and arch-enemy, the spirit
 of gravity, and all that it created: constraint, law, necessity and
 consequence and purpose and will and good and evil:--
 
 For must there not be that which is danced OVER, danced beyond? Must
 there not, for the sake of the nimble, the nimblest,--be moles and
 clumsy dwarfs?--
 
 3.
 
 There was it also where I picked up from the path the word "Superman,"
 and that man is something that must be surpassed.
 
 --That man is a bridge and not a goal--rejoicing over his noontides and
 evenings, as advances to new rosy dawns:
 
 --The Zarathustra word of the great noontide, and whatever else I have
 hung up over men like purple evening-afterglows.
 
 Verily, also new stars did I make them see, along with new nights;
 and over cloud and day and night, did I spread out laughter like a
 gay-coloured canopy.
 
 I taught them all MY poetisation and aspiration: to compose and collect
 into unity what is fragment in man, and riddle and fearful chance;--
 
 --As composer, riddle-reader, and redeemer of chance, did I teach them
 to create the future, and all that HATH BEEN--to redeem by creating.
 
 The past of man to redeem, and every "It was" to transform, until the
 Will saith: "But so did I will it! So shall I will it--"
 
 --This did I call redemption; this alone taught I them to call
 redemption.--
 
 Now do I await MY redemption--that I may go unto them for the last time.
 
 For once more will I go unto men: AMONGST them will my sun set; in dying
 will I give them my choicest gift!
 
 From the sun did I learn this, when it goeth down, the exuberant one:
 gold doth it then pour into the sea, out of inexhaustible riches,--
 
 --So that the poorest fisherman roweth even with GOLDEN oars! For this
 did I once see, and did not tire of weeping in beholding it.--
 
 Like the sun will also Zarathustra go down: now sitteth he here
 and waiteth, old broken tables around him, and also new
 tables--half-written.
 
 4.
 
 Behold, here is a new table; but where are my brethren who will carry it
 with me to the valley and into hearts of flesh?--
 
 Thus demandeth my great love to the remotest ones: BE NOT CONSIDERATE OF
 THY NEIGHBOUR! Man is something that must be surpassed.
 
 There are many divers ways and modes of surpassing: see THOU thereto!
 But only a buffoon thinketh: "man can also be OVERLEAPT."
 
 Surpass thyself even in thy neighbour: and a right which thou canst
 seize upon, shalt thou not allow to be given thee!
 
 What thou doest can no one do to thee again. Lo, there is no requital.
 
 He who cannot command himself shall obey. And many a one CAN command
 himself, but still sorely lacketh self-obedience!
 
 5.
 
 Thus wisheth the type of noble souls: they desire to have nothing
 GRATUITOUSLY, least of all, life.
 
 He who is of the populace wisheth to live gratuitously; we others,
 however, to whom life hath given itself--we are ever considering WHAT we
 can best give IN RETURN!
 
 And verily, it is a noble dictum which saith: "What life promiseth US,
 that promise will WE keep--to life!"
 
 One should not wish to enjoy where one doth not contribute to the
 enjoyment. And one should not WISH to enjoy!
 
 For enjoyment and innocence are the most bashful things. Neither like
 to be sought for. One should HAVE them,--but one should rather SEEK for
 guilt and pain!--
 
 6.
 
 O my brethren, he who is a firstling is ever sacrificed. Now, however,
 are we firstlings!
 
 We all bleed on secret sacrificial altars, we all burn and broil in
 honour of ancient idols.
 
 Our best is still young: this exciteth old palates. Our flesh is tender,
 our skin is only lambs' skin:--how could we not excite old idol-priests!
 
 IN OURSELVES dwelleth he still, the old idol-priest, who broileth our
 best for his banquet. Ah, my brethren, how could firstlings fail to be
 sacrifices!
 
 But so wisheth our type; and I love those who do not wish to preserve
 themselves, the down-going ones do I love with mine entire love: for
 they go beyond.--
 
 7.
 
 To be true--that CAN few be! And he who can, will not! Least of all,
 however, can the good be true.
 
 Oh, those good ones! GOOD MEN NEVER SPEAK THE TRUTH. For the spirit,
 thus to be good, is a malady.
 
 They yield, those good ones, they submit themselves; their heart
 repeateth, their soul obeyeth: HE, however, who obeyeth, DOTH NOT LISTEN
 TO HIMSELF!
 
 All that is called evil by the good, must come together in order that
 one truth may be born. O my brethren, are ye also evil enough for THIS
 truth?
 
 The daring venture, the prolonged distrust, the cruel Nay, the tedium,
 the cutting-into-the-quick--how seldom do THESE come together! Out of
 such seed, however--is truth produced!
 
 BESIDE the bad conscience hath hitherto grown all KNOWLEDGE! Break up,
 break up, ye discerning ones, the old tables!
 
 8.
 
 When the water hath planks, when gangways and railings o'erspan the
 stream, verily, he is not believed who then saith: "All is in flux."
 
 But even the simpletons contradict him. "What?" say the simpletons, "all
 in flux? Planks and railings are still OVER the stream!
 
 "OVER the stream all is stable, all the values of things, the bridges
 and bearings, all 'good' and 'evil': these are all STABLE!"--
 
 Cometh, however, the hard winter, the stream-tamer, then learn even the
 wittiest distrust, and verily, not only the simpletons then say: "Should
 not everything--STAND STILL?"
 
 "Fundamentally standeth everything still"--that is an appropriate winter
 doctrine, good cheer for an unproductive period, a great comfort for
 winter-sleepers and fireside-loungers.
 
 "Fundamentally standeth everything still"--: but CONTRARY thereto,
 preacheth the thawing wind!
 
 The thawing wind, a bullock, which is no ploughing bullock--a furious
 bullock, a destroyer, which with angry horns breaketh the ice! The ice
 however--BREAKETH GANGWAYS!
 
 O my brethren, is not everything AT PRESENT IN FLUX? Have not all
 railings and gangways fallen into the water? Who would still HOLD ON to
 "good" and "evil"?
 
 "Woe to us! Hail to us! The thawing wind bloweth!"--Thus preach, my
 brethren, through all the streets!
 
 9.
 
 There is an old illusion--it is called good and evil. Around soothsayers
 and astrologers hath hitherto revolved the orbit of this illusion.
 
 Once did one BELIEVE in soothsayers and astrologers; and THEREFORE did
 one believe, "Everything is fate: thou shalt, for thou must!"
 
 Then again did one distrust all soothsayers and astrologers; and
 THEREFORE did one believe, "Everything is freedom: thou canst, for thou
 willest!"
 
 O my brethren, concerning the stars and the future there hath hitherto
 been only illusion, and not knowledge; and THEREFORE concerning good and
 evil there hath hitherto been only illusion and not knowledge!
 
 10.
 
 "Thou shalt not rob! Thou shalt not slay!"--such precepts were once
 called holy; before them did one bow the knee and the head, and take off
 one's shoes.
 
 But I ask you: Where have there ever been better robbers and slayers in
 the world than such holy precepts?
 
 Is there not even in all life--robbing and slaying? And for such
 precepts to be called holy, was not TRUTH itself thereby--slain?
 
 --Or was it a sermon of death that called holy what contradicted and
 dissuaded from life?--O my brethren, break up, break up for me the old
 tables!
 
 11.
 
 It is my sympathy with all the past that I see it is abandoned,--
 
 --Abandoned to the favour, the spirit and the madness of every
 generation that cometh, and reinterpreteth all that hath been as its
 bridge!
 
 A great potentate might arise, an artful prodigy, who with approval and
 disapproval could strain and constrain all the past, until it became for
 him a bridge, a harbinger, a herald, and a cock-crowing.
 
 This however is the other danger, and mine other sympathy:--he who is
 of the populace, his thoughts go back to his grandfather,--with his
 grandfather, however, doth time cease.
 
 Thus is all the past abandoned: for it might some day happen for the
 populace to become master, and drown all time in shallow waters.
 
 Therefore, O my brethren, a NEW NOBILITY is needed, which shall be the
 adversary of all populace and potentate rule, and shall inscribe anew
 the word "noble" on new tables.
 
 For many noble ones are needed, and many kinds of noble ones, FOR A NEW
 NOBILITY! Or, as I once said in parable: "That is just divinity, that
 there are Gods, but no God!"
 
 12.
 
 O my brethren, I consecrate you and point you to a new nobility: ye
 shall become procreators and cultivators and sowers of the future;--
 
 --Verily, not to a nobility which ye could purchase like traders with
 traders' gold; for little worth is all that hath its price.
 
 Let it not be your honour henceforth whence ye come, but whither ye go!
 Your Will and your feet which seek to surpass you--let these be your new
 honour!
 
 Verily, not that ye have served a prince--of what account are princes
 now!--nor that ye have become a bulwark to that which standeth, that it
 may stand more firmly.
 
 Not that your family have become courtly at courts, and that ye have
 learned--gay-coloured, like the flamingo--to stand long hours in shallow
 pools:
 
 (For ABILITY-to-stand is a merit in courtiers; and all courtiers believe
 that unto blessedness after death pertaineth--PERMISSION-to-sit!)
 
 Nor even that a Spirit called Holy, led your forefathers into promised
 lands, which I do not praise: for where the worst of all trees grew--the
 cross,--in that land there is nothing to praise!--
 
 --And verily, wherever this "Holy Spirit" led its knights, always in
 such campaigns did--goats and geese, and wryheads and guyheads run
 FOREMOST!--
 
 O my brethren, not backward shall your nobility gaze, but OUTWARD!
 Exiles shall ye be from all fatherlands and forefather-lands!
 
 Your CHILDREN'S LAND shall ye love: let this love be your new
 nobility,--the undiscovered in the remotest seas! For it do I bid your
 sails search and search!
 
 Unto your children shall ye MAKE AMENDS for being the children of your
 fathers: all the past shall ye THUS redeem! This new table do I place
 over you!
 
 13.
 
 "Why should one live? All is vain! To live--that is to thrash straw; to
 live--that is to burn oneself and yet not get warm."--
 
 Such ancient babbling still passeth for "wisdom"; because it is old,
 however, and smelleth mustily, THEREFORE is it the more honoured. Even
 mould ennobleth.--
 
 Children might thus speak: they SHUN the fire because it hath burnt
 them! There is much childishness in the old books of wisdom.
 
 And he who ever "thrasheth straw," why should he be allowed to rail at
 thrashing! Such a fool one would have to muzzle!
 
 Such persons sit down to the table and bring nothing with them, not even
 good hunger:--and then do they rail: "All is vain!"
 
 But to eat and drink well, my brethren, is verily no vain art! Break up,
 break up for me the tables of the never-joyous ones!
 
 14.
 
 "To the clean are all things clean"--thus say the people. I, however,
 say unto you: To the swine all things become swinish!
 
 Therefore preach the visionaries and bowed-heads (whose hearts are also
 bowed down): "The world itself is a filthy monster."
 
 For these are all unclean spirits; especially those, however, who have
 no peace or rest, unless they see the world FROM THE BACKSIDE--the
 backworldsmen!
 
 TO THOSE do I say it to the face, although it sound unpleasantly: the
 world resembleth man, in that it hath a backside,--SO MUCH is true!
 
 There is in the world much filth: SO MUCH is true! But the world itself
 is not therefore a filthy monster!
 
 There is wisdom in the fact that much in the world smelleth badly:
 loathing itself createth wings, and fountain-divining powers!
 
 In the best there is still something to loathe; and the best is still
 something that must be surpassed!--
 
 O my brethren, there is much wisdom in the fact that much filth is in
 the world!--
 
 15.
 
 Such sayings did I hear pious backworldsmen speak to their consciences,
 and verily without wickedness or guile,--although there is nothing more
 guileful in the world, or more wicked.
 
 "Let the world be as it is! Raise not a finger against it!"
 
 "Let whoever will choke and stab and skin and scrape the people: raise
 not a finger against it! Thereby will they learn to renounce the world."
 
 "And thine own reason--this shalt thou thyself stifle and choke; for it
 is a reason of this world,--thereby wilt thou learn thyself to renounce
 the world."--
 
 --Shatter, shatter, O my brethren, those old tables of the pious! Tatter
 the maxims of the world-maligners!--
 
 16.
 
 "He who learneth much unlearneth all violent cravings"--that do people
 now whisper to one another in all the dark lanes.
 
 "Wisdom wearieth, nothing is worth while; thou shalt not crave!"--this
 new table found I hanging even in the public markets.
 
 Break up for me, O my brethren, break up also that NEW table! The
 weary-o'-the-world put it up, and the preachers of death and the jailer:
 for lo, it is also a sermon for slavery:--
 
 Because they learned badly and not the best, and everything too early
 and everything too fast; because they ATE badly: from thence hath
 resulted their ruined stomach;--
 
 --For a ruined stomach, is their spirit: IT persuadeth to death! For
 verily, my brethren, the spirit IS a stomach!
 
 Life is a well of delight, but to him in whom the ruined stomach
 speaketh, the father of affliction, all fountains are poisoned.
 
 To discern: that is DELIGHT to the lion-willed! But he who hath become
 weary, is himself merely "willed"; with him play all the waves.
 
 And such is always the nature of weak men: they lose themselves on their
 way. And at last asketh their weariness: "Why did we ever go on the way?
 All is indifferent!"
 
 TO THEM soundeth it pleasant to have preached in their ears: "Nothing is
 worth while! Ye shall not will!" That, however, is a sermon for slavery.
 
 O my brethren, a fresh blustering wind cometh Zarathustra unto all
 way-weary ones; many noses will he yet make sneeze!
 
 Even through walls bloweth my free breath, and in into prisons and
 imprisoned spirits!
 
 Willing emancipateth: for willing is creating: so do I teach. And ONLY
 for creating shall ye learn!
 
 And also the learning shall ye LEARN only from me, the learning
 well!--He who hath ears let him hear!
 
 17.
 
 There standeth the boat--thither goeth it over, perhaps into vast
 nothingness--but who willeth to enter into this "Perhaps"?
 
 None of you want to enter into the death-boat! How should ye then be
 WORLD-WEARY ones!
 
 World-weary ones! And have not even withdrawn from the earth! Eager
 did I ever find you for the earth, amorous still of your own
 earth-weariness!
 
 Not in vain doth your lip hang down:--a small worldly wish still sitteth
 thereon! And in your eye--floateth there not a cloudlet of unforgotten
 earthly bliss?
 
 There are on the earth many good inventions, some useful, some pleasant:
 for their sake is the earth to be loved.
 
 And many such good inventions are there, that they are like woman's
 breasts: useful at the same time, and pleasant.
 
 Ye world-weary ones, however! Ye earth-idlers! You, shall one beat with
 stripes! With stripes shall one again make you sprightly limbs.
 
 For if ye be not invalids, or decrepit creatures, of whom the earth is
 weary, then are ye sly sloths, or dainty, sneaking pleasure-cats. And if
 ye will not again RUN gaily, then shall ye--pass away!
 
 To the incurable shall one not seek to be a physician: thus teacheth
 Zarathustra:--so shall ye pass away!
 
 But more COURAGE is needed to make an end than to make a new verse: that
 do all physicians and poets know well.--
 
 18.
 
 O my brethren, there are tables which weariness framed, and tables
 which slothfulness framed, corrupt slothfulness: although they speak
 similarly, they want to be heard differently.--
 
 See this languishing one! Only a span-breadth is he from his goal; but
 from weariness hath he lain down obstinately in the dust, this brave
 one!
 
 From weariness yawneth he at the path, at the earth, at the goal, and at
 himself: not a step further will he go,--this brave one!
 
 Now gloweth the sun upon him, and the dogs lick at his sweat: but he
 lieth there in his obstinacy and preferreth to languish:--
 
 --A span-breadth from his goal, to languish! Verily, ye will have to
 drag him into his heaven by the hair of his head--this hero!
 
 Better still that ye let him lie where he hath lain down, that sleep may
 come unto him, the comforter, with cooling patter-rain.
 
 Let him lie, until of his own accord he awakeneth,--until of his own
 accord he repudiateth all weariness, and what weariness hath taught
 through him!
 
 Only, my brethren, see that ye scare the dogs away from him, the idle
 skulkers, and all the swarming vermin:--
 
 --All the swarming vermin of the "cultured," that--feast on the sweat of
 every hero!--
 
 19.
 
 I form circles around me and holy boundaries; ever fewer ascend with
 me ever higher mountains: I build a mountain-range out of ever holier
 mountains.--
 
 But wherever ye would ascend with me, O my brethren, take care lest a
 PARASITE ascend with you!
 
 A parasite: that is a reptile, a creeping, cringing reptile, that trieth
 to fatten on your infirm and sore places.
 
 And THIS is its art: it divineth where ascending souls are weary, in
 your trouble and dejection, in your sensitive modesty, doth it build its
 loathsome nest.
 
 Where the strong are weak, where the noble are all-too-gentle--there
 buildeth it its loathsome nest; the parasite liveth where the great have
 small sore-places.
 
 What is the highest of all species of being, and what is the lowest?
 The parasite is the lowest species; he, however, who is of the highest
 species feedeth most parasites.
 
 For the soul which hath the longest ladder, and can go deepest down: how
 could there fail to be most parasites upon it?--
 
 --The most comprehensive soul, which can run and stray and rove furthest
 in itself; the most necessary soul, which out of joy flingeth itself
 into chance:--
 
 --The soul in Being, which plungeth into Becoming; the possessing soul,
 which SEEKETH to attain desire and longing:--
 
 --The soul fleeing from itself, which overtaketh itself in the widest
 circuit; the wisest soul, unto which folly speaketh most sweetly:--
 
 --The soul most self-loving, in which all things have their current and
 counter-current, their ebb and their flow:--oh, how could THE LOFTIEST
 SOUL fail to have the worst parasites?
 
 20.
 
 O my brethren, am I then cruel? But I say: What falleth, that shall one
 also push!
 
 Everything of to-day--it falleth, it decayeth; who would preserve it!
 But I--I wish also to push it!
 
 Know ye the delight which rolleth stones into precipitous depths?--Those
 men of to-day, see just how they roll into my depths!
 
 A prelude am I to better players, O my brethren! An example! DO
 according to mine example!
 
 And him whom ye do not teach to fly, teach I pray you--TO FALL FASTER!--
 
 21.
 
 I love the brave: but it is not enough to be a swordsman,--one must also
 know WHEREON to use swordsmanship!
 
 And often is it greater bravery to keep quiet and pass by, that THEREBY
 one may reserve oneself for a worthier foe!
 
 Ye shall only have foes to be hated; but not foes to be despised: ye
 must be proud of your foes. Thus have I already taught.
 
 For the worthier foe, O my brethren, shall ye reserve yourselves:
 therefore must ye pass by many a one,--
 
 --Especially many of the rabble, who din your ears with noise about
 people and peoples.
 
 Keep your eye clear of their For and Against! There is there much right,
 much wrong: he who looketh on becometh wroth.
 
 Therein viewing, therein hewing--they are the same thing: therefore
 depart into the forests and lay your sword to sleep!
 
 Go YOUR ways! and let the people and peoples go theirs!--gloomy ways,
 verily, on which not a single hope glinteth any more!
 
 Let there the trader rule, where all that still glittereth is--traders'
 gold. It is the time of kings no longer: that which now calleth itself
 the people is unworthy of kings.
 
 See how these peoples themselves now do just like the traders: they pick
 up the smallest advantage out of all kinds of rubbish!
 
 They lay lures for one another, they lure things out of one
 another,--that they call "good neighbourliness." O blessed remote period
 when a people said to itself: "I will be--MASTER over peoples!"
 
 For, my brethren, the best shall rule, the best also WILLETH to rule!
 And where the teaching is different, there--the best is LACKING.
 
 22.
 
 If THEY had--bread for nothing, alas! for what would THEY cry! Their
 maintainment--that is their true entertainment; and they shall have it
 hard!
 
 Beasts of prey, are they: in their "working"--there is even plundering,
 in their "earning"--there is even overreaching! Therefore shall they
 have it hard!
 
 Better beasts of prey shall they thus become, subtler, cleverer, MORE
 MAN-LIKE: for man is the best beast of prey.
 
 All the animals hath man already robbed of their virtues: that is why of
 all animals it hath been hardest for man.
 
 Only the birds are still beyond him. And if man should yet learn to fly,
 alas! TO WHAT HEIGHT--would his rapacity fly!
 
 23.
 
 Thus would I have man and woman: fit for war, the one; fit for
 maternity, the other; both, however, fit for dancing with head and legs.
 
 And lost be the day to us in which a measure hath not been danced. And
 false be every truth which hath not had laughter along with it!
 
 24.
 
 Your marriage-arranging: see that it be not a bad ARRANGING! Ye have
 arranged too hastily: so there FOLLOWETH therefrom--marriage-breaking!
 
 And better marriage-breaking than marriage-bending,
 marriage-lying!--Thus spake a woman unto me: "Indeed, I broke the
 marriage, but first did the marriage break--me!
 
 The badly paired found I ever the most revengeful: they make every one
 suffer for it that they no longer run singly.
 
 On that account want I the honest ones to say to one another: "We love
 each other: let us SEE TO IT that we maintain our love! Or shall our
 pledging be blundering?"
 
 --"Give us a set term and a small marriage, that we may see if we are
 fit for the great marriage! It is a great matter always to be twain."
 
 Thus do I counsel all honest ones; and what would be my love to the
 Superman, and to all that is to come, if I should counsel and speak
 otherwise!
 
 Not only to propagate yourselves onwards but UPWARDS--thereto, O my
 brethren, may the garden of marriage help you!
 
 25.
 
 He who hath grown wise concerning old origins, lo, he will at last seek
 after the fountains of the future and new origins.--
 
 O my brethren, not long will it be until NEW PEOPLES shall arise and new
 fountains shall rush down into new depths.
 
 For the earthquake--it choketh up many wells, it causeth much
 languishing: but it bringeth also to light inner powers and secrets.
 
 The earthquake discloseth new fountains. In the earthquake of old
 peoples new fountains burst forth.
 
 And whoever calleth out: "Lo, here is a well for many thirsty ones, one
 heart for many longing ones, one will for many instruments":--around him
 collecteth a PEOPLE, that is to say, many attempting ones.
 
 Who can command, who must obey--THAT IS THERE ATTEMPTED! Ah, with what
 long seeking and solving and failing and learning and re-attempting!
 
 Human society: it is an attempt--so I teach--a long seeking: it seeketh
 however the ruler!--
 
 --An attempt, my brethren! And NO "contract"! Destroy, I pray you,
 destroy that word of the soft-hearted and half-and-half!
 
 26.
 
 O my brethren! With whom lieth the greatest danger to the whole human
 future? Is it not with the good and just?--
 
 --As those who say and feel in their hearts: "We already know what
 is good and just, we possess it also; woe to those who still seek
 thereafter!
 
 And whatever harm the wicked may do, the harm of the good is the
 harmfulest harm!
 
 And whatever harm the world-maligners may do, the harm of the good is
 the harmfulest harm!
 
 O my brethren, into the hearts of the good and just looked some one
 once on a time, who said: "They are the Pharisees." But people did not
 understand him.
 
 The good and just themselves were not free to understand him; their
 spirit was imprisoned in their good conscience. The stupidity of the
 good is unfathomably wise.
 
 It is the truth, however, that the good MUST be Pharisees--they have no
 choice!
 
 The good MUST crucify him who deviseth his own virtue! That IS the
 truth!
 
 The second one, however, who discovered their country--the country,
 heart and soil of the good and just,--it was he who asked: "Whom do they
 hate most?"
 
 The CREATOR, hate they most, him who breaketh the tables and old values,
 the breaker,--him they call the law-breaker.
 
 For the good--they CANNOT create; they are always the beginning of the
 end:--
 
 --They crucify him who writeth new values on new tables, they sacrifice
 UNTO THEMSELVES the future--they crucify the whole human future!
 
 The good--they have always been the beginning of the end.--
 
 27.
 
 O my brethren, have ye also understood this word? And what I once said
 of the "last man"?--
 
 With whom lieth the greatest danger to the whole human future? Is it not
 with the good and just?
 
 BREAK UP, BREAK UP, I PRAY YOU, THE GOOD AND JUST!--O my brethren, have
 ye understood also this word?
 
 28.
 
 Ye flee from me? Ye are frightened? Ye tremble at this word?
 
 O my brethren, when I enjoined you to break up the good, and the tables
 of the good, then only did I embark man on his high seas.
 
 And now only cometh unto him the great terror, the great outlook, the
 great sickness, the great nausea, the great sea-sickness.
 
 False shores and false securities did the good teach you; in the lies of
 the good were ye born and bred. Everything hath been radically contorted
 and distorted by the good.
 
 But he who discovered the country of "man," discovered also the country
 of "man's future." Now shall ye be sailors for me, brave, patient!
 
 Keep yourselves up betimes, my brethren, learn to keep yourselves up!
 The sea stormeth: many seek to raise themselves again by you.
 
 The sea stormeth: all is in the sea. Well! Cheer up! Ye old
 seaman-hearts!
 
 What of fatherland! THITHER striveth our helm where our CHILDREN'S LAND
 is! Thitherwards, stormier than the sea, stormeth our great longing!--
 
 29.
 
 "Why so hard!"--said to the diamond one day the charcoal; "are we then
 not near relatives?"--
 
 Why so soft? O my brethren; thus do _I_ ask you: are ye then not--my
 brethren?
 
 Why so soft, so submissive and yielding? Why is there so much negation
 and abnegation in your hearts? Why is there so little fate in your
 looks?
 
 And if ye will not be fates and inexorable ones, how can ye one day--
 conquer with me?
 
 And if your hardness will not glance and cut and chip to pieces, how can
 ye one day--create with me?
 
 For the creators are hard. And blessedness must it seem to you to press
 your hand upon millenniums as upon wax,--
 
 --Blessedness to write upon the will of millenniums as upon
 brass,--harder than brass, nobler than brass. Entirely hard is only the
 noblest.
 
 This new table, O my brethren, put I up over you: BECOME HARD!--
 
 30.
 
 O thou, my Will! Thou change of every need, MY needfulness! Preserve me
 from all small victories!
 
 Thou fatedness of my soul, which I call fate! Thou In-me! Over-me!
 Preserve and spare me for one great fate!
 
 And thy last greatness, my Will, spare it for thy last--that thou mayest
 be inexorable IN thy victory! Ah, who hath not succumbed to his victory!
 
 Ah, whose eye hath not bedimmed in this intoxicated twilight! Ah, whose
 foot hath not faltered and forgotten in victory--how to stand!--
 
 --That I may one day be ready and ripe in the great noontide: ready and
 ripe like the glowing ore, the lightning-bearing cloud, and the swelling
 milk-udder:--
 
 --Ready for myself and for my most hidden Will: a bow eager for its
 arrow, an arrow eager for its star:--
 
 --A star, ready and ripe in its noontide, glowing, pierced, blessed, by
 annihilating sun-arrows:--
 
 --A sun itself, and an inexorable sun-will, ready for annihilation in
 victory!
 
 O Will, thou change of every need, MY needfulness! Spare me for one
 great victory!---
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LVII. THE CONVALESCENT.
 
 1.
 
 One morning, not long after his return to his cave, Zarathustra sprang
 up from his couch like a madman, crying with a frightful voice, and
 acting as if some one still lay on the couch who did not wish to rise.
 Zarathustra's voice also resounded in such a manner that his animals
 came to him frightened, and out of all the neighbouring caves and
 lurking-places all the creatures slipped away--flying, fluttering,
 creeping or leaping, according to their variety of foot or wing.
 Zarathustra, however, spake these words:
 
 Up, abysmal thought out of my depth! I am thy cock and morning dawn,
 thou overslept reptile: Up! Up! My voice shall soon crow thee awake!
 
 Unbind the fetters of thine ears: listen! For I wish to hear thee! Up!
 Up! There is thunder enough to make the very graves listen!
 
 And rub the sleep and all the dimness and blindness out of thine eyes!
 Hear me also with thine eyes: my voice is a medicine even for those born
 blind.
 
 And once thou art awake, then shalt thou ever remain awake. It is not
 MY custom to awake great-grandmothers out of their sleep that I may bid
 them--sleep on!
 
 Thou stirrest, stretchest thyself, wheezest? Up! Up! Not wheeze, shalt
 thou,--but speak unto me! Zarathustra calleth thee, Zarathustra the
 godless!
 
 I, Zarathustra, the advocate of living, the advocate of suffering, the
 advocate of the circuit--thee do I call, my most abysmal thought!
 
 Joy to me! Thou comest,--I hear thee! Mine abyss SPEAKETH, my lowest
 depth have I turned over into the light!
 
 Joy to me! Come hither! Give me thy hand--ha! let be! aha!--Disgust,
 disgust, disgust--alas to me!
 
 2.
 
 Hardly, however, had Zarathustra spoken these words, when he fell down
 as one dead, and remained long as one dead. When however he again came
 to himself, then was he pale and trembling, and remained lying; and for
 long he would neither eat nor drink. This condition continued for seven
 days; his animals, however, did not leave him day nor night, except that
 the eagle flew forth to fetch food. And what it fetched and foraged,
 it laid on Zarathustra's couch: so that Zarathustra at last lay among
 yellow and red berries, grapes, rosy apples, sweet-smelling herbage, and
 pine-cones. At his feet, however, two lambs were stretched, which the
 eagle had with difficulty carried off from their shepherds.
 
 At last, after seven days, Zarathustra raised himself upon his couch,
 took a rosy apple in his hand, smelt it and found its smell pleasant.
 Then did his animals think the time had come to speak unto him.
 
 "O Zarathustra," said they, "now hast thou lain thus for seven days with
 heavy eyes: wilt thou not set thyself again upon thy feet?
 
 Step out of thy cave: the world waiteth for thee as a garden. The wind
 playeth with heavy fragrance which seeketh for thee; and all brooks
 would like to run after thee.
 
 All things long for thee, since thou hast remained alone for seven
 days--step forth out of thy cave! All things want to be thy physicians!
 
 Did perhaps a new knowledge come to thee, a bitter, grievous knowledge?
 Like leavened dough layest thou, thy soul arose and swelled beyond all
 its bounds.--"
 
 --O mine animals, answered Zarathustra, talk on thus and let me listen!
 It refresheth me so to hear your talk: where there is talk, there is the
 world as a garden unto me.
 
 How charming it is that there are words and tones; are not words and
 tones rainbows and seeming bridges 'twixt the eternally separated?
 
 To each soul belongeth another world; to each soul is every other soul a
 back-world.
 
 Among the most alike doth semblance deceive most delightfully: for the
 smallest gap is most difficult to bridge over.
 
 For me--how could there be an outside-of-me? There is no outside! But
 this we forget on hearing tones; how delightful it is that we forget!
 
 Have not names and tones been given unto things that man may refresh
 himself with them? It is a beautiful folly, speaking; therewith danceth
 man over everything.
 
 How lovely is all speech and all falsehoods of tones! With tones danceth
 our love on variegated rainbows.--
 
 --"O Zarathustra," said then his animals, "to those who think like us,
 things all dance themselves: they come and hold out the hand and laugh
 and flee--and return.
 
 Everything goeth, everything returneth; eternally rolleth the wheel
 of existence. Everything dieth, everything blossometh forth again;
 eternally runneth on the year of existence.
 
 Everything breaketh, everything is integrated anew; eternally buildeth
 itself the same house of existence. All things separate, all things
 again greet one another; eternally true to itself remaineth the ring of
 existence.
 
 Every moment beginneth existence, around every 'Here' rolleth the ball
 'There.' The middle is everywhere. Crooked is the path of eternity."--
 
 --O ye wags and barrel-organs! answered Zarathustra, and smiled once
 more, how well do ye know what had to be fulfilled in seven days:--
 
 --And how that monster crept into my throat and choked me! But I bit off
 its head and spat it away from me.
 
 And ye--ye have made a lyre-lay out of it? Now, however, do I lie here,
 still exhausted with that biting and spitting-away, still sick with mine
 own salvation.
 
 AND YE LOOKED ON AT IT ALL? O mine animals, are ye also cruel? Did
 ye like to look at my great pain as men do? For man is the cruellest
 animal.
 
 At tragedies, bull-fights, and crucifixions hath he hitherto been
 happiest on earth; and when he invented his hell, behold, that was his
 heaven on earth.
 
 When the great man crieth--: immediately runneth the little man thither,
 and his tongue hangeth out of his mouth for very lusting. He, however,
 calleth it his "pity."
 
 The little man, especially the poet--how passionately doth he accuse
 life in words! Hearken to him, but do not fail to hear the delight which
 is in all accusation!
 
 Such accusers of life--them life overcometh with a glance of the eye.
 "Thou lovest me?" saith the insolent one; "wait a little, as yet have I
 no time for thee."
 
 Towards himself man is the cruellest animal; and in all who call
 themselves "sinners" and "bearers of the cross" and "penitents," do not
 overlook the voluptuousness in their plaints and accusations!
 
 And I myself--do I thereby want to be man's accuser? Ah, mine animals,
 this only have I learned hitherto, that for man his baddest is necessary
 for his best,--
 
 --That all that is baddest is the best POWER, and the hardest stone for
 the highest creator; and that man must become better AND badder:--
 
 Not to THIS torture-stake was I tied, that I know man is bad,--but I
 cried, as no one hath yet cried:
 
 "Ah, that his baddest is so very small! Ah, that his best is so very
 small!"
 
 The great disgust at man--IT strangled me and had crept into my throat:
 and what the soothsayer had presaged: "All is alike, nothing is worth
 while, knowledge strangleth."
 
 A long twilight limped on before me, a fatally weary, fatally
 intoxicated sadness, which spake with yawning mouth.
 
 "Eternally he returneth, the man of whom thou art weary, the small
 man"--so yawned my sadness, and dragged its foot and could not go to
 sleep.
 
 A cavern, became the human earth to me; its breast caved in; everything
 living became to me human dust and bones and mouldering past.
 
 My sighing sat on all human graves, and could no longer arise: my
 sighing and questioning croaked and choked, and gnawed and nagged day
 and night:
 
 --"Ah, man returneth eternally! The small man returneth eternally!"
 
 Naked had I once seen both of them, the greatest man and the smallest
 man: all too like one another--all too human, even the greatest man!
 
 All too small, even the greatest man!--that was my disgust at man! And
 the eternal return also of the smallest man!--that was my disgust at all
 existence!
 
 Ah, Disgust! Disgust! Disgust!--Thus spake Zarathustra, and sighed and
 shuddered; for he remembered his sickness. Then did his animals prevent
 him from speaking further.
 
 "Do not speak further, thou convalescent!"--so answered his animals,
 "but go out where the world waiteth for thee like a garden.
 
 Go out unto the roses, the bees, and the flocks of doves! Especially,
 however, unto the singing-birds, to learn SINGING from them!
 
 For singing is for the convalescent; the sound ones may talk. And
 when the sound also want songs, then want they other songs than the
 convalescent."
 
 --"O ye wags and barrel-organs, do be silent!" answered Zarathustra, and
 smiled at his animals. "How well ye know what consolation I devised for
 myself in seven days!
 
 That I have to sing once more--THAT consolation did I devise for myself,
 and THIS convalescence: would ye also make another lyre-lay thereof?"
 
 --"Do not talk further," answered his animals once more; "rather, thou
 convalescent, prepare for thyself first a lyre, a new lyre!
 
 For behold, O Zarathustra! For thy new lays there are needed new lyres.
 
 Sing and bubble over, O Zarathustra, heal thy soul with new lays: that
 thou mayest bear thy great fate, which hath not yet been any one's fate!
 
 For thine animals know it well, O Zarathustra, who thou art and must
 become: behold, THOU ART THE TEACHER OF THE ETERNAL RETURN,--that is now
 THY fate!
 
 That thou must be the first to teach this teaching--how could this great
 fate not be thy greatest danger and infirmity!
 
 Behold, we know what thou teachest: that all things eternally return,
 and ourselves with them, and that we have already existed times without
 number, and all things with us.
 
 Thou teachest that there is a great year of Becoming, a prodigy of a
 great year; it must, like a sand-glass, ever turn up anew, that it may
 anew run down and run out:--
 
 --So that all those years are like one another in the greatest and also
 in the smallest, so that we ourselves, in every great year, are like
 ourselves in the greatest and also in the smallest.
 
 And if thou wouldst now die, O Zarathustra, behold, we know also how
 thou wouldst then speak to thyself:--but thine animals beseech thee not
 to die yet!
 
 Thou wouldst speak, and without trembling, buoyant rather with bliss,
 for a great weight and worry would be taken from thee, thou patientest
 one!--
 
 'Now do I die and disappear,' wouldst thou say, 'and in a moment I am
 nothing. Souls are as mortal as bodies.
 
 But the plexus of causes returneth in which I am intertwined,--it will
 again create me! I myself pertain to the causes of the eternal return.
 
 I come again with this sun, with this earth, with this eagle, with this
 serpent--NOT to a new life, or a better life, or a similar life:
 
 --I come again eternally to this identical and selfsame life, in its
 greatest and its smallest, to teach again the eternal return of all
 things,--
 
 --To speak again the word of the great noontide of earth and man, to
 announce again to man the Superman.
 
 I have spoken my word. I break down by my word: so willeth mine eternal
 fate--as announcer do I succumb!
 
 The hour hath now come for the down-goer to bless himself. Thus--ENDETH
 Zarathustra's down-going.'"--
 
 When the animals had spoken these words they were silent and waited, so
 that Zarathustra might say something to them: but Zarathustra did not
 hear that they were silent. On the contrary, he lay quietly with closed
 eyes like a person sleeping, although he did not sleep; for he communed
 just then with his soul. The serpent, however, and the eagle, when they
 found him silent in such wise, respected the great stillness around him,
 and prudently retired.
 
 
 
 
 LVIII. THE GREAT LONGING.
 
 O my soul, I have taught thee to say "to-day" as "once on a time" and
 "formerly," and to dance thy measure over every Here and There and
 Yonder.
 
 O my soul, I delivered thee from all by-places, I brushed down from thee
 dust and spiders and twilight.
 
 O my soul, I washed the petty shame and the by-place virtue from thee,
 and persuaded thee to stand naked before the eyes of the sun.
 
 With the storm that is called "spirit" did I blow over thy surging
 sea; all clouds did I blow away from it; I strangled even the strangler
 called "sin."
 
 O my soul, I gave thee the right to say Nay like the storm, and to say
 Yea as the open heaven saith Yea: calm as the light remainest thou, and
 now walkest through denying storms.
 
 O my soul, I restored to thee liberty over the created and the
 uncreated; and who knoweth, as thou knowest, the voluptuousness of the
 future?
 
 O my soul, I taught thee the contempt which doth not come like
 worm-eating, the great, the loving contempt, which loveth most where it
 contemneth most.
 
 O my soul, I taught thee so to persuade that thou persuadest even the
 grounds themselves to thee: like the sun, which persuadeth even the sea
 to its height.
 
 O my soul, I have taken from thee all obeying and knee-bending and
 homage-paying; I have myself given thee the names, "Change of need" and
 "Fate."
 
 O my soul, I have given thee new names and gay-coloured playthings,
 I have called thee "Fate" and "the Circuit of circuits" and "the
 Navel-string of time" and "the Azure bell."
 
 O my soul, to thy domain gave I all wisdom to drink, all new wines, and
 also all immemorially old strong wines of wisdom.
 
 O my soul, every sun shed I upon thee, and every night and every silence
 and every longing:--then grewest thou up for me as a vine.
 
 O my soul, exuberant and heavy dost thou now stand forth, a vine with
 swelling udders and full clusters of brown golden grapes:--
 
 --Filled and weighted by thy happiness, waiting from superabundance, and
 yet ashamed of thy waiting.
 
 O my soul, there is nowhere a soul which could be more loving and more
 comprehensive and more extensive! Where could future and past be closer
 together than with thee?
 
 O my soul, I have given thee everything, and all my hands have become
 empty by thee:--and now! Now sayest thou to me, smiling and full of
 melancholy: "Which of us oweth thanks?--
 
 --Doth the giver not owe thanks because the receiver received? Is
 bestowing not a necessity? Is receiving not--pitying?"--
 
 O my soul, I understand the smiling of thy melancholy: thine
 over-abundance itself now stretcheth out longing hands!
 
 Thy fulness looketh forth over raging seas, and seeketh and waiteth: the
 longing of over-fulness looketh forth from the smiling heaven of thine
 eyes!
 
 And verily, O my soul! Who could see thy smiling and not melt
 into tears? The angels themselves melt into tears through the
 over-graciousness of thy smiling.
 
 Thy graciousness and over-graciousness, is it which will not complain
 and weep: and yet, O my soul, longeth thy smiling for tears, and thy
 trembling mouth for sobs.
 
 "Is not all weeping complaining? And all complaining, accusing?" Thus
 speakest thou to thyself; and therefore, O my soul, wilt thou rather
 smile than pour forth thy grief--
 
 --Than in gushing tears pour forth all thy grief concerning thy
 fulness, and concerning the craving of the vine for the vintager and
 vintage-knife!
 
 But wilt thou not weep, wilt thou not weep forth thy purple melancholy,
 then wilt thou have to SING, O my soul!--Behold, I smile myself, who
 foretell thee this:
 
 --Thou wilt have to sing with passionate song, until all seas turn calm
 to hearken unto thy longing,--
 
 --Until over calm longing seas the bark glideth, the golden marvel,
 around the gold of which all good, bad, and marvellous things frisk:--
 
 --Also many large and small animals, and everything that hath light
 marvellous feet, so that it can run on violet-blue paths,--
 
 --Towards the golden marvel, the spontaneous bark, and its master: he,
 however, is the vintager who waiteth with the diamond vintage-knife,--
 
 --Thy great deliverer, O my soul, the nameless one--for whom future
 songs only will find names! And verily, already hath thy breath the
 fragrance of future songs,--
 
 --Already glowest thou and dreamest, already drinkest thou thirstily at
 all deep echoing wells of consolation, already reposeth thy melancholy
 in the bliss of future songs!--
 
 O my soul, now have I given thee all, and even my last possession, and
 all my hands have become empty by thee:--THAT I BADE THEE SING, behold,
 that was my last thing to give!
 
 That I bade thee sing,--say now, say: WHICH of us now--oweth thanks?--
 Better still, however: sing unto me, sing, O my soul! And let me thank
 thee!--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LIX. THE SECOND DANCE-SONG.
 
 1.
 
 "Into thine eyes gazed I lately, O Life: gold saw I gleam in thy
 night-eyes,--my heart stood still with delight:
 
 --A golden bark saw I gleam on darkened waters, a sinking, drinking,
 reblinking, golden swing-bark!
 
 At my dance-frantic foot, dost thou cast a glance, a laughing,
 questioning, melting, thrown glance:
 
 Twice only movedst thou thy rattle with thy little hands--then did my
 feet swing with dance-fury.--
 
 My heels reared aloft, my toes they hearkened,--thee they would know:
 hath not the dancer his ear--in his toe!
 
 Unto thee did I spring: then fledst thou back from my bound; and towards
 me waved thy fleeing, flying tresses round!
 
 Away from thee did I spring, and from thy snaky tresses: then stoodst
 thou there half-turned, and in thine eye caresses.
 
 With crooked glances--dost thou teach me crooked courses; on crooked
 courses learn my feet--crafty fancies!
 
 I fear thee near, I love thee far; thy flight allureth me, thy seeking
 secureth me:--I suffer, but for thee, what would I not gladly bear!
 
 For thee, whose coldness inflameth, whose hatred misleadeth, whose
 flight enchaineth, whose mockery--pleadeth:
 
 --Who would not hate thee, thou great bindress, inwindress, temptress,
 seekress, findress! Who would not love thee, thou innocent, impatient,
 wind-swift, child-eyed sinner!
 
 Whither pullest thou me now, thou paragon and tomboy? And now foolest
 thou me fleeing; thou sweet romp dost annoy!
 
 I dance after thee, I follow even faint traces lonely. Where art thou?
 Give me thy hand! Or thy finger only!
 
 Here are caves and thickets: we shall go astray!--Halt! Stand still!
 Seest thou not owls and bats in fluttering fray?
 
 Thou bat! Thou owl! Thou wouldst play me foul? Where are we? From the
 dogs hast thou learned thus to bark and howl.
 
 Thou gnashest on me sweetly with little white teeth; thine evil eyes
 shoot out upon me, thy curly little mane from underneath!
 
 This is a dance over stock and stone: I am the hunter,--wilt thou be my
 hound, or my chamois anon?
 
 Now beside me! And quickly, wickedly springing! Now up! And over!--Alas!
 I have fallen myself overswinging!
 
 Oh, see me lying, thou arrogant one, and imploring grace! Gladly would I
 walk with thee--in some lovelier place!
 
 --In the paths of love, through bushes variegated, quiet, trim! Or there
 along the lake, where gold-fishes dance and swim!
 
 Thou art now a-weary? There above are sheep and sun-set stripes: is it
 not sweet to sleep--the shepherd pipes?
 
 Thou art so very weary? I carry thee thither; let just thine arm sink!
 And art thou thirsty--I should have something; but thy mouth would not
 like it to drink!--
 
 --Oh, that cursed, nimble, supple serpent and lurking-witch! Where art
 thou gone? But in my face do I feel through thy hand, two spots and red
 blotches itch!
 
 I am verily weary of it, ever thy sheepish shepherd to be. Thou witch,
 if I have hitherto sung unto thee, now shalt THOU--cry unto me!
 
 To the rhythm of my whip shalt thou dance and cry! I forget not my
 whip?--Not I!"--
 
 2.
 
 Then did Life answer me thus, and kept thereby her fine ears closed:
 
 "O Zarathustra! Crack not so terribly with thy whip! Thou knowest surely
 that noise killeth thought,--and just now there came to me such delicate
 thoughts.
 
 We are both of us genuine ne'er-do-wells and ne'er-do-ills. Beyond
 good and evil found we our island and our green meadow--we two alone!
 Therefore must we be friendly to each other!
 
 And even should we not love each other from the bottom of our
 hearts,--must we then have a grudge against each other if we do not love
 each other perfectly?
 
 And that I am friendly to thee, and often too friendly, that knowest
 thou: and the reason is that I am envious of thy Wisdom. Ah, this mad
 old fool, Wisdom!
 
 If thy Wisdom should one day run away from thee, ah! then would also my
 love run away from thee quickly."--
 
 Thereupon did Life look thoughtfully behind and around, and said softly:
 "O Zarathustra, thou art not faithful enough to me!
 
 Thou lovest me not nearly so much as thou sayest; I know thou thinkest
 of soon leaving me.
 
 There is an old heavy, heavy, booming-clock: it boometh by night up to
 thy cave:--
 
 --When thou hearest this clock strike the hours at midnight, then
 thinkest thou between one and twelve thereon--
 
 --Thou thinkest thereon, O Zarathustra, I know it--of soon leaving
 me!"--
 
 "Yea," answered I, hesitatingly, "but thou knowest it also"--And I
 said something into her ear, in amongst her confused, yellow, foolish
 tresses.
 
 "Thou KNOWEST that, O Zarathustra? That knoweth no one--"
 
 And we gazed at each other, and looked at the green meadow o'er which
 the cool evening was just passing, and we wept together.--Then, however,
 was Life dearer unto me than all my Wisdom had ever been.--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 3.
 
 One!
 
 O man! Take heed!
 
 Two!
 
 What saith deep midnight's voice indeed?
 
 Three!
 
 "I slept my sleep--
 
 Four!
 
 "From deepest dream I've woke and plead:--
 
 Five!
 
 "The world is deep,
 
 Six!
 
 "And deeper than the day could read.
 
 Seven!
 
 "Deep is its woe--
 
 Eight!
 
 "Joy--deeper still than grief can be:
 
 Nine!
 
 "Woe saith: Hence! Go!
 
 Ten!
 
 "But joys all want eternity--
 
 Eleven!
 
 "Want deep profound eternity!"
 
 Twelve!
 
 
 
 
 LX. THE SEVEN SEALS.
 
 (OR THE YEA AND AMEN LAY.)
 
 1.
 
 If I be a diviner and full of the divining spirit which wandereth on
 high mountain-ridges, 'twixt two seas,--
 
 Wandereth 'twixt the past and the future as a heavy cloud--hostile to
 sultry plains, and to all that is weary and can neither die nor live:
 
 Ready for lightning in its dark bosom, and for the redeeming flash of
 light, charged with lightnings which say Yea! which laugh Yea! ready for
 divining flashes of lightning:--
 
 --Blessed, however, is he who is thus charged! And verily, long must he
 hang like a heavy tempest on the mountain, who shall one day kindle the
 light of the future!--
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 2.
 
 If ever my wrath hath burst graves, shifted landmarks, or rolled old
 shattered tables into precipitous depths:
 
 If ever my scorn hath scattered mouldered words to the winds, and if I
 have come like a besom to cross-spiders, and as a cleansing wind to old
 charnel-houses:
 
 If ever I have sat rejoicing where old Gods lie buried, world-blessing,
 world-loving, beside the monuments of old world-maligners:--
 
 --For even churches and Gods'-graves do I love, if only heaven looketh
 through their ruined roofs with pure eyes; gladly do I sit like grass
 and red poppies on ruined churches--
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity, and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 3.
 
 If ever a breath hath come to me of the creative breath, and of the
 heavenly necessity which compelleth even chances to dance star-dances:
 
 If ever I have laughed with the laughter of the creative lightning,
 to which the long thunder of the deed followeth, grumblingly, but
 obediently:
 
 If ever I have played dice with the Gods at the divine table of
 the earth, so that the earth quaked and ruptured, and snorted forth
 fire-streams:--
 
 --For a divine table is the earth, and trembling with new creative
 dictums and dice-casts of the Gods:
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity, and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 4.
 
 If ever I have drunk a full draught of the foaming spice- and
 confection-bowl in which all things are well mixed:
 
 If ever my hand hath mingled the furthest with the nearest, fire with
 spirit, joy with sorrow, and the harshest with the kindest:
 
 If I myself am a grain of the saving salt which maketh everything in the
 confection-bowl mix well:--
 
 --For there is a salt which uniteth good with evil; and even the evilest
 is worthy, as spicing and as final over-foaming:--
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity, and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 5.
 
 If I be fond of the sea, and all that is sealike, and fondest of it when
 it angrily contradicteth me:
 
 If the exploring delight be in me, which impelleth sails to the
 undiscovered, if the seafarer's delight be in my delight:
 
 If ever my rejoicing hath called out: "The shore hath vanished,--now
 hath fallen from me the last chain--
 
 The boundless roareth around me, far away sparkle for me space and
 time,--well! cheer up! old heart!"--
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity, and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 6.
 
 If my virtue be a dancer's virtue, and if I have often sprung with both
 feet into golden-emerald rapture:
 
 If my wickedness be a laughing wickedness, at home among rose-banks and
 hedges of lilies:
 
 --For in laughter is all evil present, but it is sanctified and absolved
 by its own bliss:--
 
 And if it be my Alpha and Omega that everything heavy shall become
 light, every body a dancer, and every spirit a bird: and verily, that is
 my Alpha and Omega!--
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity, and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 7.
 
 If ever I have spread out a tranquil heaven above me, and have flown
 into mine own heaven with mine own pinions:
 
 If I have swum playfully in profound luminous distances, and if my
 freedom's avian wisdom hath come to me:--
 
 --Thus however speaketh avian wisdom:--"Lo, there is no above and no
 below! Throw thyself about,--outward, backward, thou light one! Sing!
 speak no more!
 
 --Are not all words made for the heavy? Do not all words lie to the
 light ones? Sing! speak no more!"--
 
 Oh, how could I not be ardent for Eternity, and for the marriage-ring of
 rings--the ring of the return?
 
 Never yet have I found the woman by whom I should like to have children,
 unless it be this woman whom I love: for I love thee, O Eternity!
 
 FOR I LOVE THEE, O ETERNITY!
 
 
 
 
 FOURTH AND LAST PART.
 
 Ah, where in the world have there been greater follies than with the
 pitiful? And what in the world hath caused more suffering than the
 follies of the pitiful?
 
 Woe unto all loving ones who have not an elevation which is above their
 pity!
 
 Thus spake the devil unto me, once on a time: "Even God hath his hell:
 it is his love for man."
 
 And lately did I hear him say these words: "God is dead: of his pity for
 man hath God died."--ZARATHUSTRA, II., "The Pitiful."
 
 
 
 
 LXI. THE HONEY SACRIFICE.
 
 --And again passed moons and years over Zarathustra's soul, and he
 heeded it not; his hair, however, became white. One day when he sat on
 a stone in front of his cave, and gazed calmly into the distance--one
 there gazeth out on the sea, and away beyond sinuous abysses,--then went
 his animals thoughtfully round about him, and at last set themselves in
 front of him.
 
 "O Zarathustra," said they, "gazest thou out perhaps for thy
 happiness?"--"Of what account is my happiness!" answered he, "I have
 long ceased to strive any more for happiness, I strive for my work."--"O
 Zarathustra," said the animals once more, "that sayest thou as one
 who hath overmuch of good things. Liest thou not in a sky-blue lake of
 happiness?"--"Ye wags," answered Zarathustra, and smiled, "how well did
 ye choose the simile! But ye know also that my happiness is heavy, and
 not like a fluid wave of water: it presseth me and will not leave me,
 and is like molten pitch."--
 
 Then went his animals again thoughtfully around him, and placed
 themselves once more in front of him. "O Zarathustra," said they, "it is
 consequently FOR THAT REASON that thou thyself always becometh yellower
 and darker, although thy hair looketh white and flaxen? Lo, thou sittest
 in thy pitch!"--"What do ye say, mine animals?" said Zarathustra,
 laughing; "verily I reviled when I spake of pitch. As it happeneth with
 me, so is it with all fruits that turn ripe. It is the HONEY in my veins
 that maketh my blood thicker, and also my soul stiller."--"So will it
 be, O Zarathustra," answered his animals, and pressed up to him; "but
 wilt thou not to-day ascend a high mountain? The air is pure, and to-day
 one seeth more of the world than ever."--"Yea, mine animals," answered
 he, "ye counsel admirably and according to my heart: I will to-day
 ascend a high mountain! But see that honey is there ready to hand,
 yellow, white, good, ice-cool, golden-comb-honey. For know that when
 aloft I will make the honey-sacrifice."--
 
 When Zarathustra, however, was aloft on the summit, he sent his animals
 home that had accompanied him, and found that he was now alone:--then he
 laughed from the bottom of his heart, looked around him, and spake thus:
 
 That I spake of sacrifices and honey-sacrifices, it was merely a ruse
 in talking and verily, a useful folly! Here aloft can I now speak freer
 than in front of mountain-caves and anchorites' domestic animals.
 
 What to sacrifice! I squander what is given me, a squanderer with a
 thousand hands: how could I call that--sacrificing?
 
 And when I desired honey I only desired bait, and sweet mucus and
 mucilage, for which even the mouths of growling bears, and strange,
 sulky, evil birds, water:
 
 --The best bait, as huntsmen and fishermen require it. For if the world
 be as a gloomy forest of animals, and a pleasure-ground for all wild
 huntsmen, it seemeth to me rather--and preferably--a fathomless, rich
 sea;
 
 --A sea full of many-hued fishes and crabs, for which even the Gods
 might long, and might be tempted to become fishers in it, and casters of
 nets,--so rich is the world in wonderful things, great and small!
 
 Especially the human world, the human sea:--towards IT do I now throw
 out my golden angle-rod and say: Open up, thou human abyss!
 
 Open up, and throw unto me thy fish and shining crabs! With my best bait
 shall I allure to myself to-day the strangest human fish!
 
 --My happiness itself do I throw out into all places far and wide 'twixt
 orient, noontide, and occident, to see if many human fish will not learn
 to hug and tug at my happiness;--
 
 Until, biting at my sharp hidden hooks, they have to come up unto MY
 height, the motleyest abyss-groundlings, to the wickedest of all fishers
 of men.
 
 For THIS am I from the heart and from the beginning--drawing,
 hither-drawing, upward-drawing, upbringing; a drawer, a trainer, a
 training-master, who not in vain counselled himself once on a time:
 "Become what thou art!"
 
 Thus may men now come UP to me; for as yet do I await the signs that it
 is time for my down-going; as yet do I not myself go down, as I must do,
 amongst men.
 
 Therefore do I here wait, crafty and scornful upon high mountains,
 no impatient one, no patient one; rather one who hath even unlearnt
 patience,--because he no longer "suffereth."
 
 For my fate giveth me time: it hath forgotten me perhaps? Or doth it sit
 behind a big stone and catch flies?
 
 And verily, I am well-disposed to mine eternal fate, because it doth not
 hound and hurry me, but leaveth me time for merriment and mischief; so
 that I have to-day ascended this high mountain to catch fish.
 
 Did ever any one catch fish upon high mountains? And though it be a
 folly what I here seek and do, it is better so than that down below I
 should become solemn with waiting, and green and yellow--
 
 --A posturing wrath-snorter with waiting, a holy howl-storm from
 the mountains, an impatient one that shouteth down into the valleys:
 "Hearken, else I will scourge you with the scourge of God!"
 
 Not that I would have a grudge against such wrathful ones on that
 account: they are well enough for laughter to me! Impatient must they
 now be, those big alarm-drums, which find a voice now or never!
 
 Myself, however, and my fate--we do not talk to the Present, neither
 do we talk to the Never: for talking we have patience and time and more
 than time. For one day must it yet come, and may not pass by.
 
 What must one day come and may not pass by? Our great Hazar, that is
 to say, our great, remote human-kingdom, the Zarathustra-kingdom of a
 thousand years--
 
 How remote may such "remoteness" be? What doth it concern me? But on
 that account it is none the less sure unto me--, with both feet stand I
 secure on this ground;
 
 --On an eternal ground, on hard primary rock, on this highest, hardest,
 primary mountain-ridge, unto which all winds come, as unto the
 storm-parting, asking Where? and Whence? and Whither?
 
 Here laugh, laugh, my hearty, healthy wickedness! From high mountains
 cast down thy glittering scorn-laughter! Allure for me with thy
 glittering the finest human fish!
 
 And whatever belongeth unto ME in all seas, my in-and-for-me in all
 things--fish THAT out for me, bring THAT up to me: for that do I wait,
 the wickedest of all fish-catchers.
 
 Out! out! my fishing-hook! In and down, thou bait of my happiness! Drip
 thy sweetest dew, thou honey of my heart! Bite, my fishing-hook, into
 the belly of all black affliction!
 
 Look out, look out, mine eye! Oh, how many seas round about me, what
 dawning human futures! And above me--what rosy red stillness! What
 unclouded silence!
 
 
 
 
 LXII. THE CRY OF DISTRESS.
 
 The next day sat Zarathustra again on the stone in front of his cave,
 whilst his animals roved about in the world outside to bring home new
 food,--also new honey: for Zarathustra had spent and wasted the old
 honey to the very last particle. When he thus sat, however, with a
 stick in his hand, tracing the shadow of his figure on the earth, and
 reflecting--verily! not upon himself and his shadow,--all at once he
 startled and shrank back: for he saw another shadow beside his own.
 And when he hastily looked around and stood up, behold, there stood the
 soothsayer beside him, the same whom he had once given to eat and drink
 at his table, the proclaimer of the great weariness, who taught: "All is
 alike, nothing is worth while, the world is without meaning, knowledge
 strangleth." But his face had changed since then; and when Zarathustra
 looked into his eyes, his heart was startled once more: so much evil
 announcement and ashy-grey lightnings passed over that countenance.
 
 The soothsayer, who had perceived what went on in Zarathustra's soul,
 wiped his face with his hand, as if he would wipe out the impression;
 the same did also Zarathustra. And when both of them had thus silently
 composed and strengthened themselves, they gave each other the hand, as
 a token that they wanted once more to recognise each other.
 
 "Welcome hither," said Zarathustra, "thou soothsayer of the great
 weariness, not in vain shalt thou once have been my messmate and guest.
 Eat and drink also with me to-day, and forgive it that a cheerful old
 man sitteth with thee at table!"--"A cheerful old man?" answered the
 soothsayer, shaking his head, "but whoever thou art, or wouldst be, O
 Zarathustra, thou hast been here aloft the longest time,--in a little
 while thy bark shall no longer rest on dry land!"--"Do I then rest
 on dry land?"--asked Zarathustra, laughing.--"The waves around thy
 mountain," answered the soothsayer, "rise and rise, the waves of great
 distress and affliction: they will soon raise thy bark also and carry
 thee away."--Thereupon was Zarathustra silent and wondered.--"Dost thou
 still hear nothing?" continued the soothsayer: "doth it not rush and
 roar out of the depth?"--Zarathustra was silent once more and listened:
 then heard he a long, long cry, which the abysses threw to one another
 and passed on; for none of them wished to retain it: so evil did it
 sound.
 
 "Thou ill announcer," said Zarathustra at last, "that is a cry of
 distress, and the cry of a man; it may come perhaps out of a black sea.
 But what doth human distress matter to me! My last sin which hath been
 reserved for me,--knowest thou what it is called?"
 
 --"PITY!" answered the soothsayer from an overflowing heart, and raised
 both his hands aloft--"O Zarathustra, I have come that I may seduce thee
 to thy last sin!"--
 
 And hardly had those words been uttered when there sounded the cry
 once more, and longer and more alarming than before--also much nearer.
 "Hearest thou? Hearest thou, O Zarathustra?" called out the soothsayer,
 "the cry concerneth thee, it calleth thee: Come, come, come; it is time,
 it is the highest time!"--
 
 Zarathustra was silent thereupon, confused and staggered; at last he
 asked, like one who hesitateth in himself: "And who is it that there
 calleth me?"
 
 "But thou knowest it, certainly," answered the soothsayer warmly, "why
 dost thou conceal thyself? It is THE HIGHER MAN that crieth for thee!"
 
 "The higher man?" cried Zarathustra, horror-stricken: "what wanteth HE?
 What wanteth HE? The higher man! What wanteth he here?"--and his skin
 covered with perspiration.
 
 The soothsayer, however, did not heed Zarathustra's alarm, but listened
 and listened in the downward direction. When, however, it had been still
 there for a long while, he looked behind, and saw Zarathustra standing
 trembling.
 
 "O Zarathustra," he began, with sorrowful voice, "thou dost not stand
 there like one whose happiness maketh him giddy: thou wilt have to dance
 lest thou tumble down!
 
 But although thou shouldst dance before me, and leap all thy side-leaps,
 no one may say unto me: 'Behold, here danceth the last joyous man!'
 
 In vain would any one come to this height who sought HIM here: caves
 would he find, indeed, and back-caves, hiding-places for hidden ones;
 but not lucky mines, nor treasure-chambers, nor new gold-veins of
 happiness.
 
 Happiness--how indeed could one find happiness among such buried-alive
 and solitary ones! Must I yet seek the last happiness on the Happy
 Isles, and far away among forgotten seas?
 
 But all is alike, nothing is worth while, no seeking is of service,
 there are no longer any Happy Isles!"--
 
 Thus sighed the soothsayer; with his last sigh, however, Zarathustra
 again became serene and assured, like one who hath come out of a deep
 chasm into the light. "Nay! Nay! Three times Nay!" exclaimed he with a
 strong voice, and stroked his beard--"THAT do I know better! There are
 still Happy Isles! Silence THEREON, thou sighing sorrow-sack!
 
 Cease to splash THEREON, thou rain-cloud of the forenoon! Do I not
 already stand here wet with thy misery, and drenched like a dog?
 
 Now do I shake myself and run away from thee, that I may again become
 dry: thereat mayest thou not wonder! Do I seem to thee discourteous?
 Here however is MY court.
 
 But as regards the higher man: well! I shall seek him at once in those
 forests: FROM THENCE came his cry. Perhaps he is there hard beset by an
 evil beast.
 
 He is in MY domain: therein shall he receive no scath! And verily, there
 are many evil beasts about me."--
 
 With those words Zarathustra turned around to depart. Then said the
 soothsayer: "O Zarathustra, thou art a rogue!
 
 I know it well: thou wouldst fain be rid of me! Rather wouldst thou run
 into the forest and lay snares for evil beasts!
 
 But what good will it do thee? In the evening wilt thou have me again:
 in thine own cave will I sit, patient and heavy like a block--and wait
 for thee!"
 
 "So be it!" shouted back Zarathustra, as he went away: "and what is mine
 in my cave belongeth also unto thee, my guest!
 
 Shouldst thou however find honey therein, well! just lick it up, thou
 growling bear, and sweeten thy soul! For in the evening we want both to
 be in good spirits;
 
 --In good spirits and joyful, because this day hath come to an end! And
 thou thyself shalt dance to my lays, as my dancing-bear.
 
 Thou dost not believe this? Thou shakest thy head? Well! Cheer up, old
 bear! But I also--am a soothsayer."
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LXIII. TALK WITH THE KINGS.
 
 1.
 
 Ere Zarathustra had been an hour on his way in the mountains and
 forests, he saw all at once a strange procession. Right on the path
 which he was about to descend came two kings walking, bedecked with
 crowns and purple girdles, and variegated like flamingoes: they drove
 before them a laden ass. "What do these kings want in my domain?" said
 Zarathustra in astonishment to his heart, and hid himself hastily behind
 a thicket. When however the kings approached to him, he said half-aloud,
 like one speaking only to himself: "Strange! Strange! How doth this
 harmonise? Two kings do I see--and only one ass!"
 
 Thereupon the two kings made a halt; they smiled and looked towards the
 spot whence the voice proceeded, and afterwards looked into each other's
 faces. "Such things do we also think among ourselves," said the king on
 the right, "but we do not utter them."
 
 The king on the left, however, shrugged his shoulders and answered:
 "That may perhaps be a goat-herd. Or an anchorite who hath lived too
 long among rocks and trees. For no society at all spoileth also good
 manners."
 
 "Good manners?" replied angrily and bitterly the other king: "what
 then do we run out of the way of? Is it not 'good manners'? Our 'good
 society'?
 
 Better, verily, to live among anchorites and goat-herds, than with
 our gilded, false, over-rouged populace--though it call itself 'good
 society.'
 
 --Though it call itself 'nobility.' But there all is false and foul,
 above all the blood--thanks to old evil diseases and worse curers.
 
 The best and dearest to me at present is still a sound peasant, coarse,
 artful, obstinate and enduring: that is at present the noblest type.
 
 The peasant is at present the best; and the peasant type should be
 master! But it is the kingdom of the populace--I no longer allow
 anything to be imposed upon me. The populace, however--that meaneth,
 hodgepodge.
 
 Populace-hodgepodge: therein is everything mixed with everything, saint
 and swindler, gentleman and Jew, and every beast out of Noah's ark.
 
 Good manners! Everything is false and foul with us. No one knoweth any
 longer how to reverence: it is THAT precisely that we run away from.
 They are fulsome obtrusive dogs; they gild palm-leaves.
 
 This loathing choketh me, that we kings ourselves have become false,
 draped and disguised with the old faded pomp of our ancestors,
 show-pieces for the stupidest, the craftiest, and whosoever at present
 trafficketh for power.
 
 We ARE NOT the first men--and have nevertheless to STAND FOR them: of
 this imposture have we at last become weary and disgusted.
 
 From the rabble have we gone out of the way, from all those bawlers and
 scribe-blowflies, from the trader-stench, the ambition-fidgeting, the
 bad breath--: fie, to live among the rabble;
 
 --Fie, to stand for the first men among the rabble! Ah, loathing!
 Loathing! Loathing! What doth it now matter about us kings!"--
 
 "Thine old sickness seizeth thee," said here the king on the left, "thy
 loathing seizeth thee, my poor brother. Thou knowest, however, that some
 one heareth us."
 
 Immediately thereupon, Zarathustra, who had opened ears and eyes to this
 talk, rose from his hiding-place, advanced towards the kings, and thus
 began:
 
 "He who hearkeneth unto you, he who gladly hearkeneth unto you, is
 called Zarathustra.
 
 I am Zarathustra who once said: 'What doth it now matter about kings!'
 Forgive me; I rejoiced when ye said to each other: 'What doth it matter
 about us kings!'
 
 Here, however, is MY domain and jurisdiction: what may ye be seeking in
 my domain? Perhaps, however, ye have FOUND on your way what _I_ seek:
 namely, the higher man."
 
 When the kings heard this, they beat upon their breasts and said with
 one voice: "We are recognised!
 
 With the sword of thine utterance severest thou the thickest darkness of
 our hearts. Thou hast discovered our distress; for lo! we are on our way
 to find the higher man--
 
 --The man that is higher than we, although we are kings. To him do we
 convey this ass. For the highest man shall also be the highest lord on
 earth.
 
 There is no sorer misfortune in all human destiny, than when the mighty
 of the earth are not also the first men. Then everything becometh false
 and distorted and monstrous.
 
 And when they are even the last men, and more beast than man, then
 riseth and riseth the populace in honour, and at last saith even the
 populace-virtue: 'Lo, I alone am virtue!'"--
 
 What have I just heard? answered Zarathustra. What wisdom in kings! I
 am enchanted, and verily, I have already promptings to make a rhyme
 thereon:--
 
 --Even if it should happen to be a rhyme not suited for every one's
 ears. I unlearned long ago to have consideration for long ears. Well
 then! Well now!
 
 (Here, however, it happened that the ass also found utterance: it said
 distinctly and with malevolence, Y-E-A.)
 
 'Twas once--methinks year one of our blessed Lord,--Drunk without wine,
 the Sybil thus deplored:--"How ill things go! Decline! Decline! Ne'er
 sank the world so low! Rome now hath turned harlot and harlot-stew,
 Rome's Caesar a beast, and God--hath turned Jew!
 
 2.
 
 With those rhymes of Zarathustra the kings were delighted; the king on
 the right, however, said: "O Zarathustra, how well it was that we set
 out to see thee!
 
 For thine enemies showed us thy likeness in their mirror: there lookedst
 thou with the grimace of a devil, and sneeringly: so that we were afraid
 of thee.
 
 But what good did it do! Always didst thou prick us anew in heart and
 ear with thy sayings. Then did we say at last: What doth it matter how
 he look!
 
 We must HEAR him; him who teacheth: 'Ye shall love peace as a means to
 new wars, and the short peace more than the long!'
 
 No one ever spake such warlike words: 'What is good? To be brave is
 good. It is the good war that halloweth every cause.'
 
 O Zarathustra, our fathers' blood stirred in our veins at such words: it
 was like the voice of spring to old wine-casks.
 
 When the swords ran among one another like red-spotted serpents, then
 did our fathers become fond of life; the sun of every peace seemed to
 them languid and lukewarm, the long peace, however, made them ashamed.
 
 How they sighed, our fathers, when they saw on the wall brightly
 furbished, dried-up swords! Like those they thirsted for war. For a
 sword thirsteth to drink blood, and sparkleth with desire."--
 
 --When the kings thus discoursed and talked eagerly of the happiness of
 their fathers, there came upon Zarathustra no little desire to mock at
 their eagerness: for evidently they were very peaceable kings whom he
 saw before him, kings with old and refined features. But he restrained
 himself. "Well!" said he, "thither leadeth the way, there lieth the
 cave of Zarathustra; and this day is to have a long evening! At present,
 however, a cry of distress calleth me hastily away from you.
 
 It will honour my cave if kings want to sit and wait in it: but, to be
 sure, ye will have to wait long!
 
 Well! What of that! Where doth one at present learn better to wait
 than at courts? And the whole virtue of kings that hath remained unto
 them--is it not called to-day: ABILITY to wait?"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LXIV. THE LEECH.
 
 And Zarathustra went thoughtfully on, further and lower down, through
 forests and past moory bottoms; as it happeneth, however, to every one
 who meditateth upon hard matters, he trod thereby unawares upon a man.
 And lo, there spurted into his face all at once a cry of pain, and two
 curses and twenty bad invectives, so that in his fright he raised his
 stick and also struck the trodden one. Immediately afterwards, however,
 he regained his composure, and his heart laughed at the folly he had
 just committed.
 
 "Pardon me," said he to the trodden one, who had got up enraged, and had
 seated himself, "pardon me, and hear first of all a parable.
 
 As a wanderer who dreameth of remote things on a lonesome highway,
 runneth unawares against a sleeping dog, a dog which lieth in the sun:
 
 --As both of them then start up and snap at each other, like deadly
 enemies, those two beings mortally frightened--so did it happen unto us.
 
 And yet! And yet--how little was lacking for them to caress each other,
 that dog and that lonesome one! Are they not both--lonesome ones!"
 
 --"Whoever thou art," said the trodden one, still enraged, "thou
 treadest also too nigh me with thy parable, and not only with thy foot!
 
 Lo! am I then a dog?"--And thereupon the sitting one got up, and pulled
 his naked arm out of the swamp. For at first he had lain outstretched
 on the ground, hidden and indiscernible, like those who lie in wait for
 swamp-game.
 
 "But whatever art thou about!" called out Zarathustra in alarm, for he
 saw a deal of blood streaming over the naked arm,--"what hath hurt thee?
 Hath an evil beast bit thee, thou unfortunate one?"
 
 The bleeding one laughed, still angry, "What matter is it to thee!" said
 he, and was about to go on. "Here am I at home and in my province.
 Let him question me whoever will: to a dolt, however, I shall hardly
 answer."
 
 "Thou art mistaken," said Zarathustra sympathetically, and held him
 fast; "thou art mistaken. Here thou art not at home, but in my domain,
 and therein shall no one receive any hurt.
 
 Call me however what thou wilt--I am who I must be. I call myself
 Zarathustra.
 
 Well! Up thither is the way to Zarathustra's cave: it is not far,--wilt
 thou not attend to thy wounds at my home?
 
 It hath gone badly with thee, thou unfortunate one, in this life: first
 a beast bit thee, and then--a man trod upon thee!"--
 
 When however the trodden one had heard the name of Zarathustra he was
 transformed. "What happeneth unto me!" he exclaimed, "WHO preoccupieth
 me so much in this life as this one man, namely Zarathustra, and that
 one animal that liveth on blood, the leech?
 
 For the sake of the leech did I lie here by this swamp, like a fisher,
 and already had mine outstretched arm been bitten ten times, when there
 biteth a still finer leech at my blood, Zarathustra himself!
 
 O happiness! O miracle! Praised be this day which enticed me into the
 swamp! Praised be the best, the livest cupping-glass, that at present
 liveth; praised be the great conscience-leech Zarathustra!"--
 
 Thus spake the trodden one, and Zarathustra rejoiced at his words and
 their refined reverential style. "Who art thou?" asked he, and gave
 him his hand, "there is much to clear up and elucidate between us, but
 already methinketh pure clear day is dawning."
 
 "I am THE SPIRITUALLY CONSCIENTIOUS ONE," answered he who was asked,
 "and in matters of the spirit it is difficult for any one to take it
 more rigorously, more restrictedly, and more severely than I, except him
 from whom I learnt it, Zarathustra himself.
 
 Better know nothing than half-know many things! Better be a fool on
 one's own account, than a sage on other people's approbation! I--go to
 the basis:
 
 --What matter if it be great or small? If it be called swamp or sky?
 A handbreadth of basis is enough for me, if it be actually basis and
 ground!
 
 --A handbreadth of basis: thereon can one stand. In the true
 knowing-knowledge there is nothing great and nothing small."
 
 "Then thou art perhaps an expert on the leech?" asked Zarathustra; "and
 thou investigatest the leech to its ultimate basis, thou conscientious
 one?"
 
 "O Zarathustra," answered the trodden one, "that would be something
 immense; how could I presume to do so!
 
 That, however, of which I am master and knower, is the BRAIN of the
 leech:--that is MY world!
 
 And it is also a world! Forgive it, however, that my pride here findeth
 expression, for here I have not mine equal. Therefore said I: 'here am I
 at home.'
 
 How long have I investigated this one thing, the brain of the leech, so
 that here the slippery truth might no longer slip from me! Here is MY
 domain!
 
 --For the sake of this did I cast everything else aside, for the sake of
 this did everything else become indifferent to me; and close beside my
 knowledge lieth my black ignorance.
 
 My spiritual conscience requireth from me that it should be so--that I
 should know one thing, and not know all else: they are a loathing unto
 me, all the semi-spiritual, all the hazy, hovering, and visionary.
 
 Where mine honesty ceaseth, there am I blind, and want also to be blind.
 Where I want to know, however, there want I also to be honest--namely,
 severe, rigorous, restricted, cruel and inexorable.
 
 Because THOU once saidest, O Zarathustra: 'Spirit is life which itself
 cutteth into life';--that led and allured me to thy doctrine. And
 verily, with mine own blood have I increased mine own knowledge!"
 
 --"As the evidence indicateth," broke in Zarathustra; for still was the
 blood flowing down on the naked arm of the conscientious one. For there
 had ten leeches bitten into it.
 
 "O thou strange fellow, how much doth this very evidence teach
 me--namely, thou thyself! And not all, perhaps, might I pour into thy
 rigorous ear!
 
 Well then! We part here! But I would fain find thee again. Up thither is
 the way to my cave: to-night shalt thou there be my welcome guest!
 
 Fain would I also make amends to thy body for Zarathustra treading upon
 thee with his feet: I think about that. Just now, however, a cry of
 distress calleth me hastily away from thee."
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LXV. THE MAGICIAN.
 
 1.
 
 When however Zarathustra had gone round a rock, then saw he on the same
 path, not far below him, a man who threw his limbs about like a maniac,
 and at last tumbled to the ground on his belly. "Halt!" said then
 Zarathustra to his heart, "he there must surely be the higher man, from
 him came that dreadful cry of distress,--I will see if I can help him."
 When, however, he ran to the spot where the man lay on the ground,
 he found a trembling old man, with fixed eyes; and in spite of all
 Zarathustra's efforts to lift him and set him again on his feet, it was
 all in vain. The unfortunate one, also, did not seem to notice that some
 one was beside him; on the contrary, he continually looked around with
 moving gestures, like one forsaken and isolated from all the world.
 At last, however, after much trembling, and convulsion, and
 curling-himself-up, he began to lament thus:
 
      Who warm'th me, who lov'th me still?
      Give ardent fingers!
      Give heartening charcoal-warmers!
      Prone, outstretched, trembling,
      Like him, half dead and cold, whose feet one warm'th--
      And shaken, ah! by unfamiliar fevers,
      Shivering with sharpened, icy-cold frost-arrows,
      By thee pursued, my fancy!
      Ineffable!  Recondite!  Sore-frightening!
      Thou huntsman 'hind the cloud-banks!
      Now lightning-struck by thee,
      Thou mocking eye that me in darkness watcheth:
      --Thus do I lie,
      Bend myself, twist myself, convulsed
      With all eternal torture,
      And smitten
      By thee, cruellest huntsman,
      Thou unfamiliar--GOD...
 
      Smite deeper!
      Smite yet once more!
      Pierce through and rend my heart!
      What mean'th this torture
      With dull, indented arrows?
      Why look'st thou hither,
      Of human pain not weary,
      With mischief-loving, godly flash-glances?
      Not murder wilt thou,
      But torture, torture?
      For why--ME torture,
      Thou mischief-loving, unfamiliar God?--
 
      Ha!  Ha!
      Thou stealest nigh
      In midnight's gloomy hour?...
      What wilt thou?
      Speak!
      Thou crowdst me, pressest--
      Ha! now far too closely!
      Thou hearst me breathing,
      Thou o'erhearst my heart,
      Thou ever jealous one!
      --Of what, pray, ever jealous?
      Off!  Off!
      For why the ladder?
      Wouldst thou GET IN?
      To heart in-clamber?
      To mine own secretest
      Conceptions in-clamber?
      Shameless one!  Thou unknown one!--Thief!
      What seekst thou by thy stealing?
      What seekst thou by thy hearkening?
      What seekst thou by thy torturing?
      Thou torturer!
      Thou--hangman-God!
      Or shall I, as the mastiffs do,
      Roll me before thee?
      And cringing, enraptured, frantical,
      My tail friendly--waggle!
 
      In vain!
      Goad further!
      Cruellest goader!
      No dog--thy game just am I,
      Cruellest huntsman!
      Thy proudest of captives,
      Thou robber 'hind the cloud-banks...
      Speak finally!
      Thou lightning-veiled one!  Thou unknown one!  Speak!
      What wilt thou, highway-ambusher, from--ME?
      What WILT thou, unfamiliar--God?
      What?
      Ransom-gold?
      How much of ransom-gold?
      Solicit much--that bid'th my pride!
      And be concise--that bid'th mine other pride!
 
      Ha!  Ha!
      ME--wantst thou?  me?
      --Entire?...
 
      Ha!  Ha!
      And torturest me, fool that thou art,
      Dead-torturest quite my pride?
      Give LOVE to me--who warm'th me still?
      Who lov'th me still?--
      Give ardent fingers
      Give heartening charcoal-warmers,
      Give me, the lonesomest,
      The ice (ah! seven-fold frozen ice
      For very enemies,
      For foes, doth make one thirst).
      Give, yield to me,
      Cruellest foe,
      --THYSELF!--
 
      Away!
      There fled he surely,
      My final, only comrade,
      My greatest foe,
      Mine unfamiliar--
      My hangman-God!...
 
      --Nay!
      Come thou back!
      WITH all of thy great tortures!
      To me the last of lonesome ones,
      Oh, come thou back!
      All my hot tears in streamlets trickle
      Their course to thee!
      And all my final hearty fervour--
      Up-glow'th to THEE!
      Oh, come thou back,
      Mine unfamiliar God! my PAIN!
      My final bliss!
 
 2.
 
 --Here, however, Zarathustra could no longer restrain himself; he took
 his staff and struck the wailer with all his might. "Stop this," cried
 he to him with wrathful laughter, "stop this, thou stage-player! Thou
 false coiner! Thou liar from the very heart! I know thee well!
 
 I will soon make warm legs to thee, thou evil magician: I know well
 how--to make it hot for such as thou!"
 
 --"Leave off," said the old man, and sprang up from the ground, "strike
 me no more, O Zarathustra! I did it only for amusement!
 
 That kind of thing belongeth to mine art. Thee thyself, I wanted to put
 to the proof when I gave this performance. And verily, thou hast well
 detected me!
 
 But thou thyself--hast given me no small proof of thyself: thou art
 HARD, thou wise Zarathustra! Hard strikest thou with thy 'truths,' thy
 cudgel forceth from me--THIS truth!"
 
 --"Flatter not," answered Zarathustra, still excited and frowning,
 "thou stage-player from the heart! Thou art false: why speakest thou--of
 truth!
 
 Thou peacock of peacocks, thou sea of vanity; WHAT didst thou represent
 before me, thou evil magician; WHOM was I meant to believe in when thou
 wailedst in such wise?"
 
 "THE PENITENT IN SPIRIT," said the old man, "it was him--I represented;
 thou thyself once devisedst this expression--
 
 --The poet and magician who at last turneth his spirit against himself,
 the transformed one who freezeth to death by his bad science and
 conscience.
 
 And just acknowledge it: it was long, O Zarathustra, before thou
 discoveredst my trick and lie! Thou BELIEVEDST in my distress when thou
 heldest my head with both thy hands,--
 
 --I heard thee lament 'we have loved him too little, loved him too
 little!' Because I so far deceived thee, my wickedness rejoiced in me."
 
 "Thou mayest have deceived subtler ones than I," said Zarathustra
 sternly. "I am not on my guard against deceivers; I HAVE TO BE without
 precaution: so willeth my lot.
 
 Thou, however,--MUST deceive: so far do I know thee! Thou must ever be
 equivocal, trivocal, quadrivocal, and quinquivocal! Even what thou hast
 now confessed, is not nearly true enough nor false enough for me!
 
 Thou bad false coiner, how couldst thou do otherwise! Thy very malady
 wouldst thou whitewash if thou showed thyself naked to thy physician.
 
 Thus didst thou whitewash thy lie before me when thou saidst: 'I did
 so ONLY for amusement!' There was also SERIOUSNESS therein, thou ART
 something of a penitent-in-spirit!
 
 I divine thee well: thou hast become the enchanter of all the world; but
 for thyself thou hast no lie or artifice left,--thou art disenchanted to
 thyself!
 
 Thou hast reaped disgust as thy one truth. No word in thee is any longer
 genuine, but thy mouth is so: that is to say, the disgust that cleaveth
 unto thy mouth."--
 
 --"Who art thou at all!" cried here the old magician with defiant voice,
 "who dareth to speak thus unto ME, the greatest man now living?"--and a
 green flash shot from his eye at Zarathustra. But immediately after he
 changed, and said sadly:
 
 "O Zarathustra, I am weary of it, I am disgusted with mine arts, I am
 not GREAT, why do I dissemble! But thou knowest it well--I sought for
 greatness!
 
 A great man I wanted to appear, and persuaded many; but the lie hath
 been beyond my power. On it do I collapse.
 
 O Zarathustra, everything is a lie in me; but that I collapse--this my
 collapsing is GENUINE!"--
 
 "It honoureth thee," said Zarathustra gloomily, looking down with
 sidelong glance, "it honoureth thee that thou soughtest for greatness,
 but it betrayeth thee also. Thou art not great.
 
 Thou bad old magician, THAT is the best and the honestest thing I honour
 in thee, that thou hast become weary of thyself, and hast expressed it:
 'I am not great.'
 
 THEREIN do I honour thee as a penitent-in-spirit, and although only for
 the twinkling of an eye, in that one moment wast thou--genuine.
 
 But tell me, what seekest thou here in MY forests and rocks? And if thou
 hast put thyself in MY way, what proof of me wouldst thou have?--
 
 --Wherein didst thou put ME to the test?"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and his eyes sparkled. But the old magician kept
 silence for a while; then said he: "Did I put thee to the test? I--seek
 only.
 
 O Zarathustra, I seek a genuine one, a right one, a simple one, an
 unequivocal one, a man of perfect honesty, a vessel of wisdom, a saint
 of knowledge, a great man!
 
 Knowest thou it not, O Zarathustra? I SEEK ZARATHUSTRA."
 
 --And here there arose a long silence between them: Zarathustra,
 however, became profoundly absorbed in thought, so that he shut his
 eyes. But afterwards coming back to the situation, he grasped the hand
 of the magician, and said, full of politeness and policy:
 
 "Well! Up thither leadeth the way, there is the cave of Zarathustra. In
 it mayest thou seek him whom thou wouldst fain find.
 
 And ask counsel of mine animals, mine eagle and my serpent: they shall
 help thee to seek. My cave however is large.
 
 I myself, to be sure--I have as yet seen no great man. That which is
 great, the acutest eye is at present insensible to it. It is the kingdom
 of the populace.
 
 Many a one have I found who stretched and inflated himself, and the
 people cried: 'Behold; a great man!' But what good do all bellows do!
 The wind cometh out at last.
 
 At last bursteth the frog which hath inflated itself too long: then
 cometh out the wind. To prick a swollen one in the belly, I call good
 pastime. Hear that, ye boys!
 
 Our to-day is of the populace: who still KNOWETH what is great and what
 is small! Who could there seek successfully for greatness! A fool only:
 it succeedeth with fools.
 
 Thou seekest for great men, thou strange fool? Who TAUGHT that to thee?
 Is to-day the time for it? Oh, thou bad seeker, why dost thou--tempt
 me?"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, comforted in his heart, and went laughing on his
 way.
 
 
 
 
 LXVI. OUT OF SERVICE.
 
 Not long, however, after Zarathustra had freed himself from the
 magician, he again saw a person sitting beside the path which he
 followed, namely a tall, black man, with a haggard, pale countenance:
 THIS MAN grieved him exceedingly. "Alas," said he to his heart, "there
 sitteth disguised affliction; methinketh he is of the type of the
 priests: what do THEY want in my domain?
 
 What! Hardly have I escaped from that magician, and must another
 necromancer again run across my path,--
 
 --Some sorcerer with laying-on-of-hands, some sombre wonder-worker by
 the grace of God, some anointed world-maligner, whom, may the devil
 take!
 
 But the devil is never at the place which would be his right place: he
 always cometh too late, that cursed dwarf and club-foot!"--
 
 Thus cursed Zarathustra impatiently in his heart, and considered how
 with averted look he might slip past the black man. But behold, it came
 about otherwise. For at the same moment had the sitting one already
 perceived him; and not unlike one whom an unexpected happiness
 overtaketh, he sprang to his feet, and went straight towards
 Zarathustra.
 
 "Whoever thou art, thou traveller," said he, "help a strayed one, a
 seeker, an old man, who may here easily come to grief!
 
 The world here is strange to me, and remote; wild beasts also did I hear
 howling; and he who could have given me protection--he is himself no
 more.
 
 I was seeking the pious man, a saint and an anchorite, who, alone in his
 forest, had not yet heard of what all the world knoweth at present."
 
 "WHAT doth all the world know at present?" asked Zarathustra. "Perhaps
 that the old God no longer liveth, in whom all the world once believed?"
 
 "Thou sayest it," answered the old man sorrowfully. "And I served that
 old God until his last hour.
 
 Now, however, am I out of service, without master, and yet not free;
 likewise am I no longer merry even for an hour, except it be in
 recollections.
 
 Therefore did I ascend into these mountains, that I might finally have
 a festival for myself once more, as becometh an old pope and
 church-father: for know it, that I am the last pope!--a festival of
 pious recollections and divine services.
 
 Now, however, is he himself dead, the most pious of men, the saint in
 the forest, who praised his God constantly with singing and mumbling.
 
 He himself found I no longer when I found his cot--but two wolves found
 I therein, which howled on account of his death,--for all animals loved
 him. Then did I haste away.
 
 Had I thus come in vain into these forests and mountains? Then did my
 heart determine that I should seek another, the most pious of all
 those who believe not in God--, my heart determined that I should seek
 Zarathustra!"
 
 Thus spake the hoary man, and gazed with keen eyes at him who stood
 before him. Zarathustra however seized the hand of the old pope and
 regarded it a long while with admiration.
 
 "Lo! thou venerable one," said he then, "what a fine and long hand! That
 is the hand of one who hath ever dispensed blessings. Now, however, doth
 it hold fast him whom thou seekest, me, Zarathustra.
 
 It is I, the ungodly Zarathustra, who saith: 'Who is ungodlier than I,
 that I may enjoy his teaching?'"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and penetrated with his glances the thoughts and
 arrear-thoughts of the old pope. At last the latter began:
 
 "He who most loved and possessed him hath now also lost him most--:
 
 --Lo, I myself am surely the most godless of us at present? But who
 could rejoice at that!"--
 
 --"Thou servedst him to the last?" asked Zarathustra thoughtfully, after
 a deep silence, "thou knowest HOW he died? Is it true what they say,
 that sympathy choked him;
 
 --That he saw how MAN hung on the cross, and could not endure it;--that
 his love to man became his hell, and at last his death?"--
 
 The old pope however did not answer, but looked aside timidly, with a
 painful and gloomy expression.
 
 "Let him go," said Zarathustra, after prolonged meditation, still
 looking the old man straight in the eye.
 
 "Let him go, he is gone. And though it honoureth thee that thou speakest
 only in praise of this dead one, yet thou knowest as well as I WHO he
 was, and that he went curious ways."
 
 "To speak before three eyes," said the old pope cheerfully (he was blind
 of one eye), "in divine matters I am more enlightened than Zarathustra
 himself--and may well be so.
 
 My love served him long years, my will followed all his will. A good
 servant, however, knoweth everything, and many a thing even which a
 master hideth from himself.
 
 He was a hidden God, full of secrecy. Verily, he did not come by his
 son otherwise than by secret ways. At the door of his faith standeth
 adultery.
 
 Whoever extolleth him as a God of love, doth not think highly enough of
 love itself. Did not that God want also to be judge? But the loving one
 loveth irrespective of reward and requital.
 
 When he was young, that God out of the Orient, then was he harsh and
 revengeful, and built himself a hell for the delight of his favourites.
 
 At last, however, he became old and soft and mellow and pitiful,
 more like a grandfather than a father, but most like a tottering old
 grandmother.
 
 There did he sit shrivelled in his chimney-corner, fretting on account
 of his weak legs, world-weary, will-weary, and one day he suffocated of
 his all-too-great pity."--
 
 "Thou old pope," said here Zarathustra interposing, "hast thou seen THAT
 with thine eyes? It could well have happened in that way: in that way,
 AND also otherwise. When Gods die they always die many kinds of death.
 
 Well! At all events, one way or other--he is gone! He was counter to the
 taste of mine ears and eyes; worse than that I should not like to say
 against him.
 
 I love everything that looketh bright and speaketh honestly. But
 he--thou knowest it, forsooth, thou old priest, there was something of
 thy type in him, the priest-type--he was equivocal.
 
 He was also indistinct. How he raged at us, this wrath-snorter, because
 we understood him badly! But why did he not speak more clearly?
 
 And if the fault lay in our ears, why did he give us ears that heard him
 badly? If there was dirt in our ears, well! who put it in them?
 
 Too much miscarried with him, this potter who had not learned
 thoroughly! That he took revenge on his pots and creations, however,
 because they turned out badly--that was a sin against GOOD TASTE.
 
 There is also good taste in piety: THIS at last said: 'Away with SUCH
 a God! Better to have no God, better to set up destiny on one's own
 account, better to be a fool, better to be God oneself!'"
 
 --"What do I hear!" said then the old pope, with intent ears; "O
 Zarathustra, thou art more pious than thou believest, with such an
 unbelief! Some God in thee hath converted thee to thine ungodliness.
 
 Is it not thy piety itself which no longer letteth thee believe in a
 God? And thine over-great honesty will yet lead thee even beyond good
 and evil!
 
 Behold, what hath been reserved for thee? Thou hast eyes and hands and
 mouth, which have been predestined for blessing from eternity. One doth
 not bless with the hand alone.
 
 Nigh unto thee, though thou professest to be the ungodliest one, I feel
 a hale and holy odour of long benedictions: I feel glad and grieved
 thereby.
 
 Let me be thy guest, O Zarathustra, for a single night! Nowhere on earth
 shall I now feel better than with thee!"--
 
 "Amen! So shall it be!" said Zarathustra, with great astonishment; "up
 thither leadeth the way, there lieth the cave of Zarathustra.
 
 Gladly, forsooth, would I conduct thee thither myself, thou venerable
 one; for I love all pious men. But now a cry of distress calleth me
 hastily away from thee.
 
 In my domain shall no one come to grief; my cave is a good haven. And
 best of all would I like to put every sorrowful one again on firm land
 and firm legs.
 
 Who, however, could take THY melancholy off thy shoulders? For that I am
 too weak. Long, verily, should we have to wait until some one re-awoke
 thy God for thee.
 
 For that old God liveth no more: he is indeed dead."--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LXVII. THE UGLIEST MAN.
 
 --And again did Zarathustra's feet run through mountains and forests,
 and his eyes sought and sought, but nowhere was he to be seen whom they
 wanted to see--the sorely distressed sufferer and crier. On the whole
 way, however, he rejoiced in his heart and was full of gratitude. "What
 good things," said he, "hath this day given me, as amends for its bad
 beginning! What strange interlocutors have I found!
 
 At their words will I now chew a long while as at good corn; small
 shall my teeth grind and crush them, until they flow like milk into my
 soul!"--
 
 When, however, the path again curved round a rock, all at once the
 landscape changed, and Zarathustra entered into a realm of death. Here
 bristled aloft black and red cliffs, without any grass, tree, or bird's
 voice. For it was a valley which all animals avoided, even the beasts of
 prey, except that a species of ugly, thick, green serpent came here to
 die when they became old. Therefore the shepherds called this valley:
 "Serpent-death."
 
 Zarathustra, however, became absorbed in dark recollections, for it
 seemed to him as if he had once before stood in this valley. And much
 heaviness settled on his mind, so that he walked slowly and always more
 slowly, and at last stood still. Then, however, when he opened his eyes,
 he saw something sitting by the wayside shaped like a man, and hardly
 like a man, something nondescript. And all at once there came over
 Zarathustra a great shame, because he had gazed on such a thing.
 Blushing up to the very roots of his white hair, he turned aside his
 glance, and raised his foot that he might leave this ill-starred place.
 Then, however, became the dead wilderness vocal: for from the ground a
 noise welled up, gurgling and rattling, as water gurgleth and rattleth
 at night through stopped-up water-pipes; and at last it turned into
 human voice and human speech:--it sounded thus:
 
 "Zarathustra! Zarathustra! Read my riddle! Say, say! WHAT IS THE REVENGE
 ON THE WITNESS?
 
 I entice thee back; here is smooth ice! See to it, see to it, that thy
 pride doth not here break its legs!
 
 Thou thinkest thyself wise, thou proud Zarathustra! Read then the
 riddle, thou hard nut-cracker,--the riddle that I am! Say then: who am
 _I_!"
 
 --When however Zarathustra had heard these words,--what think ye then
 took place in his soul? PITY OVERCAME HIM; and he sank down all at
 once, like an oak that hath long withstood many tree-fellers,--heavily,
 suddenly, to the terror even of those who meant to fell it. But
 immediately he got up again from the ground, and his countenance became
 stern.
 
 "I know thee well," said he, with a brazen voice, "THOU ART THE MURDERER
 OF GOD! Let me go.
 
 Thou couldst not ENDURE him who beheld THEE,--who ever beheld thee
 through and through, thou ugliest man. Thou tookest revenge on this
 witness!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra and was about to go; but the nondescript grasped
 at a corner of his garment and began anew to gurgle and seek for words.
 "Stay," said he at last--
 
 --"Stay! Do not pass by! I have divined what axe it was that struck thee
 to the ground: hail to thee, O Zarathustra, that thou art again upon thy
 feet!
 
 Thou hast divined, I know it well, how the man feeleth who killed
 him,--the murderer of God. Stay! Sit down here beside me; it is not to
 no purpose.
 
 To whom would I go but unto thee? Stay, sit down! Do not however look at
 me! Honour thus--mine ugliness!
 
 They persecute me: now art THOU my last refuge. NOT with their hatred,
 NOT with their bailiffs;--Oh, such persecution would I mock at, and be
 proud and cheerful!
 
 Hath not all success hitherto been with the well-persecuted ones? And
 he who persecuteth well learneth readily to be OBSEQUENT--when once he
 is--put behind! But it is their PITY--
 
 --Their pity is it from which I flee away and flee to thee. O
 Zarathustra, protect me, thou, my last refuge, thou sole one who
 divinedst me:
 
 --Thou hast divined how the man feeleth who killed HIM. Stay! And if
 thou wilt go, thou impatient one, go not the way that I came. THAT way
 is bad.
 
 Art thou angry with me because I have already racked language too long?
 Because I have already counselled thee? But know that it is I, the
 ugliest man,
 
 --Who have also the largest, heaviest feet. Where _I_ have gone, the way
 is bad. I tread all paths to death and destruction.
 
 But that thou passedst me by in silence, that thou blushedst--I saw it
 well: thereby did I know thee as Zarathustra.
 
 Every one else would have thrown to me his alms, his pity, in look and
 speech. But for that--I am not beggar enough: that didst thou divine.
 
 For that I am too RICH, rich in what is great, frightful, ugliest, most
 unutterable! Thy shame, O Zarathustra, HONOURED me!
 
 With difficulty did I get out of the crowd of the pitiful,--that I might
 find the only one who at present teacheth that 'pity is obtrusive'--
 thyself, O Zarathustra!
 
 --Whether it be the pity of a God, or whether it be human pity, it is
 offensive to modesty. And unwillingness to help may be nobler than the
 virtue that rusheth to do so.
 
 THAT however--namely, pity--is called virtue itself at present by
 all petty people:--they have no reverence for great misfortune, great
 ugliness, great failure.
 
 Beyond all these do I look, as a dog looketh over the backs of thronging
 flocks of sheep. They are petty, good-wooled, good-willed, grey people.
 
 As the heron looketh contemptuously at shallow pools, with backward-bent
 head, so do I look at the throng of grey little waves and wills and
 souls.
 
 Too long have we acknowledged them to be right, those petty people: SO
 we have at last given them power as well;--and now do they teach that
 'good is only what petty people call good.'
 
 And 'truth' is at present what the preacher spake who himself sprang
 from them, that singular saint and advocate of the petty people, who
 testified of himself: 'I--am the truth.'
 
 That immodest one hath long made the petty people greatly puffed up,--he
 who taught no small error when he taught: 'I--am the truth.'
 
 Hath an immodest one ever been answered more courteously?--Thou,
 however, O Zarathustra, passedst him by, and saidst: 'Nay! Nay! Three
 times Nay!'
 
 Thou warnedst against his error; thou warnedst--the first to do
 so--against pity:--not every one, not none, but thyself and thy type.
 
 Thou art ashamed of the shame of the great sufferer; and verily when
 thou sayest: 'From pity there cometh a heavy cloud; take heed, ye men!'
 
 --When thou teachest: 'All creators are hard, all great love is beyond
 their pity:' O Zarathustra, how well versed dost thou seem to me in
 weather-signs!
 
 Thou thyself, however,--warn thyself also against THY pity! For many are
 on their way to thee, many suffering, doubting, despairing, drowning,
 freezing ones--
 
 I warn thee also against myself. Thou hast read my best, my worst
 riddle, myself, and what I have done. I know the axe that felleth thee.
 
 But he--HAD TO die: he looked with eyes which beheld EVERYTHING,--he
 beheld men's depths and dregs, all his hidden ignominy and ugliness.
 
 His pity knew no modesty: he crept into my dirtiest corners. This most
 prying, over-intrusive, over-pitiful one had to die.
 
 He ever beheld ME: on such a witness I would have revenge--or not live
 myself.
 
 The God who beheld everything, AND ALSO MAN: that God had to die! Man
 cannot ENDURE it that such a witness should live."
 
 Thus spake the ugliest man. Zarathustra however got up, and prepared to
 go on: for he felt frozen to the very bowels.
 
 "Thou nondescript," said he, "thou warnedst me against thy path. As
 thanks for it I praise mine to thee. Behold, up thither is the cave of
 Zarathustra.
 
 My cave is large and deep and hath many corners; there findeth he
 that is most hidden his hiding-place. And close beside it, there are
 a hundred lurking-places and by-places for creeping, fluttering, and
 hopping creatures.
 
 Thou outcast, who hast cast thyself out, thou wilt not live amongst men
 and men's pity? Well then, do like me! Thus wilt thou learn also from
 me; only the doer learneth.
 
 And talk first and foremost to mine animals! The proudest animal and the
 wisest animal--they might well be the right counsellors for us both!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra and went his way, more thoughtfully and slowly
 even than before: for he asked himself many things, and hardly knew what
 to answer.
 
 "How poor indeed is man," thought he in his heart, "how ugly, how
 wheezy, how full of hidden shame!
 
 They tell me that man loveth himself. Ah, how great must that self-love
 be! How much contempt is opposed to it!
 
 Even this man hath loved himself, as he hath despised himself,--a great
 lover methinketh he is, and a great despiser.
 
 No one have I yet found who more thoroughly despised himself: even THAT
 is elevation. Alas, was THIS perhaps the higher man whose cry I heard?
 
 I love the great despisers. Man is something that hath to be
 surpassed."--
 
 
 
 
 LXVIII. THE VOLUNTARY BEGGAR.
 
 When Zarathustra had left the ugliest man, he was chilled and felt
 lonesome: for much coldness and lonesomeness came over his spirit, so
 that even his limbs became colder thereby. When, however, he wandered
 on and on, uphill and down, at times past green meadows, though also
 sometimes over wild stony couches where formerly perhaps an impatient
 brook had made its bed, then he turned all at once warmer and heartier
 again.
 
 "What hath happened unto me?" he asked himself, "something warm and
 living quickeneth me; it must be in the neighbourhood.
 
 Already am I less alone; unconscious companions and brethren rove around
 me; their warm breath toucheth my soul."
 
 When, however, he spied about and sought for the comforters of his
 lonesomeness, behold, there were kine there standing together on an
 eminence, whose proximity and smell had warmed his heart. The kine,
 however, seemed to listen eagerly to a speaker, and took no heed of him
 who approached. When, however, Zarathustra was quite nigh unto them,
 then did he hear plainly that a human voice spake in the midst of the
 kine, and apparently all of them had turned their heads towards the
 speaker.
 
 Then ran Zarathustra up speedily and drove the animals aside; for he
 feared that some one had here met with harm, which the pity of the
 kine would hardly be able to relieve. But in this he was deceived; for
 behold, there sat a man on the ground who seemed to be persuading
 the animals to have no fear of him, a peaceable man and
 Preacher-on-the-Mount, out of whose eyes kindness itself preached. "What
 dost thou seek here?" called out Zarathustra in astonishment.
 
 "What do I here seek?" answered he: "the same that thou seekest, thou
 mischief-maker; that is to say, happiness upon earth.
 
 To that end, however, I would fain learn of these kine. For I tell thee
 that I have already talked half a morning unto them, and just now were
 they about to give me their answer. Why dost thou disturb them?
 
 Except we be converted and become as kine, we shall in no wise enter
 into the kingdom of heaven. For we ought to learn from them one thing:
 ruminating.
 
 And verily, although a man should gain the whole world, and yet not
 learn one thing, ruminating, what would it profit him! He would not be
 rid of his affliction,
 
 --His great affliction: that, however, is at present called DISGUST. Who
 hath not at present his heart, his mouth and his eyes full of disgust?
 Thou also! Thou also! But behold these kine!"--
 
 Thus spake the Preacher-on-the-Mount, and turned then his own look
 towards Zarathustra--for hitherto it had rested lovingly on the kine--:
 then, however, he put on a different expression. "Who is this with whom
 I talk?" he exclaimed frightened, and sprang up from the ground.
 
 "This is the man without disgust, this is Zarathustra himself, the
 surmounter of the great disgust, this is the eye, this is the mouth,
 this is the heart of Zarathustra himself."
 
 And whilst he thus spake he kissed with o'erflowing eyes the hands
 of him with whom he spake, and behaved altogether like one to whom a
 precious gift and jewel hath fallen unawares from heaven. The kine,
 however, gazed at it all and wondered.
 
 "Speak not of me, thou strange one; thou amiable one!" said Zarathustra,
 and restrained his affection, "speak to me firstly of thyself! Art thou
 not the voluntary beggar who once cast away great riches,--
 
 --Who was ashamed of his riches and of the rich, and fled to the poorest
 to bestow upon them his abundance and his heart? But they received him
 not."
 
 "But they received me not," said the voluntary beggar, "thou knowest it,
 forsooth. So I went at last to the animals and to those kine."
 
 "Then learnedst thou," interrupted Zarathustra, "how much harder it is
 to give properly than to take properly, and that bestowing well is an
 ART--the last, subtlest master-art of kindness."
 
 "Especially nowadays," answered the voluntary beggar: "at present, that
 is to say, when everything low hath become rebellious and exclusive and
 haughty in its manner--in the manner of the populace.
 
 For the hour hath come, thou knowest it forsooth, for the great, evil,
 long, slow mob-and-slave-insurrection: it extendeth and extendeth!
 
 Now doth it provoke the lower classes, all benevolence and petty giving;
 and the overrich may be on their guard!
 
 Whoever at present drip, like bulgy bottles out of all-too-small
 necks:--of such bottles at present one willingly breaketh the necks.
 
 Wanton avidity, bilious envy, careworn revenge, populace-pride: all
 these struck mine eye. It is no longer true that the poor are blessed.
 The kingdom of heaven, however, is with the kine."
 
 "And why is it not with the rich?" asked Zarathustra temptingly, while
 he kept back the kine which sniffed familiarly at the peaceful one.
 
 "Why dost thou tempt me?" answered the other. "Thou knowest it thyself
 better even than I. What was it drove me to the poorest, O Zarathustra?
 Was it not my disgust at the richest?
 
 --At the culprits of riches, with cold eyes and rank thoughts, who pick
 up profit out of all kinds of rubbish--at this rabble that stinketh to
 heaven,
 
 --At this gilded, falsified populace, whose fathers were pickpockets,
 or carrion-crows, or rag-pickers, with wives compliant, lewd and
 forgetful:--for they are all of them not far different from harlots--
 
 Populace above, populace below! What are 'poor' and 'rich' at present!
 That distinction did I unlearn,--then did I flee away further and ever
 further, until I came to those kine."
 
 Thus spake the peaceful one, and puffed himself and perspired with
 his words: so that the kine wondered anew. Zarathustra, however, kept
 looking into his face with a smile, all the time the man talked so
 severely--and shook silently his head.
 
 "Thou doest violence to thyself, thou Preacher-on-the-Mount, when thou
 usest such severe words. For such severity neither thy mouth nor thine
 eye have been given thee.
 
 Nor, methinketh, hath thy stomach either: unto IT all such rage and
 hatred and foaming-over is repugnant. Thy stomach wanteth softer things:
 thou art not a butcher.
 
 Rather seemest thou to me a plant-eater and a root-man. Perhaps thou
 grindest corn. Certainly, however, thou art averse to fleshly joys, and
 thou lovest honey."
 
 "Thou hast divined me well," answered the voluntary beggar, with
 lightened heart. "I love honey, I also grind corn; for I have sought out
 what tasteth sweetly and maketh pure breath:
 
 --Also what requireth a long time, a day's-work and a mouth's-work for
 gentle idlers and sluggards.
 
 Furthest, to be sure, have those kine carried it: they have devised
 ruminating and lying in the sun. They also abstain from all heavy
 thoughts which inflate the heart."
 
 --"Well!" said Zarathustra, "thou shouldst also see MINE animals, mine
 eagle and my serpent,--their like do not at present exist on earth.
 
 Behold, thither leadeth the way to my cave: be to-night its guest. And
 talk to mine animals of the happiness of animals,--
 
 --Until I myself come home. For now a cry of distress calleth me hastily
 away from thee. Also, shouldst thou find new honey with me, ice-cold,
 golden-comb-honey, eat it!
 
 Now, however, take leave at once of thy kine, thou strange one! thou
 amiable one! though it be hard for thee. For they are thy warmest
 friends and preceptors!"--
 
 --"One excepted, whom I hold still dearer," answered the voluntary
 beggar. "Thou thyself art good, O Zarathustra, and better even than a
 cow!"
 
 "Away, away with thee! thou evil flatterer!" cried Zarathustra
 mischievously, "why dost thou spoil me with such praise and
 flattery-honey?
 
 "Away, away from me!" cried he once more, and heaved his stick at the
 fond beggar, who, however, ran nimbly away.
 
 
 
 
 LXIX. THE SHADOW.
 
 Scarcely however was the voluntary beggar gone in haste, and Zarathustra
 again alone, when he heard behind him a new voice which called out:
 "Stay! Zarathustra! Do wait! It is myself, forsooth, O Zarathustra,
 myself, thy shadow!" But Zarathustra did not wait; for a sudden
 irritation came over him on account of the crowd and the crowding in his
 mountains. "Whither hath my lonesomeness gone?" spake he.
 
 "It is verily becoming too much for me; these mountains swarm; my
 kingdom is no longer of THIS world; I require new mountains.
 
 My shadow calleth me? What matter about my shadow! Let it run after me!
 I--run away from it."
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra to his heart and ran away. But the one behind
 followed after him, so that immediately there were three runners,
 one after the other--namely, foremost the voluntary beggar, then
 Zarathustra, and thirdly, and hindmost, his shadow. But not long had
 they run thus when Zarathustra became conscious of his folly, and shook
 off with one jerk all his irritation and detestation.
 
 "What!" said he, "have not the most ludicrous things always happened to
 us old anchorites and saints?
 
 Verily, my folly hath grown big in the mountains! Now do I hear six old
 fools' legs rattling behind one another!
 
 But doth Zarathustra need to be frightened by his shadow? Also,
 methinketh that after all it hath longer legs than mine."
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and, laughing with eyes and entrails, he stood
 still and turned round quickly--and behold, he almost thereby threw his
 shadow and follower to the ground, so closely had the latter followed at
 his heels, and so weak was he. For when Zarathustra scrutinised him
 with his glance he was frightened as by a sudden apparition, so slender,
 swarthy, hollow and worn-out did this follower appear.
 
 "Who art thou?" asked Zarathustra vehemently, "what doest thou here? And
 why callest thou thyself my shadow? Thou art not pleasing unto me."
 
 "Forgive me," answered the shadow, "that it is I; and if I please thee
 not--well, O Zarathustra! therein do I admire thee and thy good taste.
 
 A wanderer am I, who have walked long at thy heels; always on the way,
 but without a goal, also without a home: so that verily, I lack little
 of being the eternally Wandering Jew, except that I am not eternal and
 not a Jew.
 
 What? Must I ever be on the way? Whirled by every wind, unsettled,
 driven about? O earth, thou hast become too round for me!
 
 On every surface have I already sat, like tired dust have I fallen
 asleep on mirrors and window-panes: everything taketh from me, nothing
 giveth; I become thin--I am almost equal to a shadow.
 
 After thee, however, O Zarathustra, did I fly and hie longest; and
 though I hid myself from thee, I was nevertheless thy best shadow:
 wherever thou hast sat, there sat I also.
 
 With thee have I wandered about in the remotest, coldest worlds, like a
 phantom that voluntarily haunteth winter roofs and snows.
 
 With thee have I pushed into all the forbidden, all the worst and the
 furthest: and if there be anything of virtue in me, it is that I have
 had no fear of any prohibition.
 
 With thee have I broken up whatever my heart revered; all
 boundary-stones and statues have I o'erthrown; the most dangerous wishes
 did I pursue,--verily, beyond every crime did I once go.
 
 With thee did I unlearn the belief in words and worths and in great
 names. When the devil casteth his skin, doth not his name also fall
 away? It is also skin. The devil himself is perhaps--skin.
 
 'Nothing is true, all is permitted': so said I to myself. Into the
 coldest water did I plunge with head and heart. Ah, how oft did I stand
 there naked on that account, like a red crab!
 
 Ah, where have gone all my goodness and all my shame and all my belief
 in the good! Ah, where is the lying innocence which I once possessed,
 the innocence of the good and of their noble lies!
 
 Too oft, verily, did I follow close to the heels of truth: then did it
 kick me on the face. Sometimes I meant to lie, and behold! then only did
 I hit--the truth.
 
 Too much hath become clear unto me: now it doth not concern me any more.
 Nothing liveth any longer that I love,--how should I still love myself?
 
 'To live as I incline, or not to live at all': so do I wish; so wisheth
 also the holiest. But alas! how have _I_ still--inclination?
 
 Have _I_--still a goal? A haven towards which MY sail is set?
 
 A good wind? Ah, he only who knoweth WHITHER he saileth, knoweth what
 wind is good, and a fair wind for him.
 
 What still remaineth to me? A heart weary and flippant; an unstable
 will; fluttering wings; a broken backbone.
 
 This seeking for MY home: O Zarathustra, dost thou know that this
 seeking hath been MY home-sickening; it eateth me up.
 
 'WHERE is--MY home?' For it do I ask and seek, and have sought, but
 have not found it. O eternal everywhere, O eternal nowhere, O
 eternal--in-vain!"
 
 Thus spake the shadow, and Zarathustra's countenance lengthened at his
 words. "Thou art my shadow!" said he at last sadly.
 
 "Thy danger is not small, thou free spirit and wanderer! Thou hast had a
 bad day: see that a still worse evening doth not overtake thee!
 
 To such unsettled ones as thou, seemeth at last even a prisoner blessed.
 Didst thou ever see how captured criminals sleep? They sleep quietly,
 they enjoy their new security.
 
 Beware lest in the end a narrow faith capture thee, a hard, rigorous
 delusion! For now everything that is narrow and fixed seduceth and
 tempteth thee.
 
 Thou hast lost thy goal. Alas, how wilt thou forego and forget that
 loss? Thereby--hast thou also lost thy way!
 
 Thou poor rover and rambler, thou tired butterfly! wilt thou have a rest
 and a home this evening? Then go up to my cave!
 
 Thither leadeth the way to my cave. And now will I run quickly away from
 thee again. Already lieth as it were a shadow upon me.
 
 I will run alone, so that it may again become bright around me.
 Therefore must I still be a long time merrily upon my legs. In the
 evening, however, there will be--dancing with me!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LXX. NOONTIDE.
 
 --And Zarathustra ran and ran, but he found no one else, and was alone
 and ever found himself again; he enjoyed and quaffed his solitude, and
 thought of good things--for hours. About the hour of noontide, however,
 when the sun stood exactly over Zarathustra's head, he passed an old,
 bent and gnarled tree, which was encircled round by the ardent love of
 a vine, and hidden from itself; from this there hung yellow grapes in
 abundance, confronting the wanderer. Then he felt inclined to quench a
 little thirst, and to break off for himself a cluster of grapes. When,
 however, he had already his arm out-stretched for that purpose, he felt
 still more inclined for something else--namely, to lie down beside the
 tree at the hour of perfect noontide and sleep.
 
 This Zarathustra did; and no sooner had he laid himself on the ground in
 the stillness and secrecy of the variegated grass, than he had forgotten
 his little thirst, and fell asleep. For as the proverb of Zarathustra
 saith: "One thing is more necessary than the other." Only that his eyes
 remained open:--for they never grew weary of viewing and admiring the
 tree and the love of the vine. In falling asleep, however, Zarathustra
 spake thus to his heart:
 
 "Hush! Hush! Hath not the world now become perfect? What hath happened
 unto me?
 
 As a delicate wind danceth invisibly upon parqueted seas, light,
 feather-light, so--danceth sleep upon me.
 
 No eye doth it close to me, it leaveth my soul awake. Light is it,
 verily, feather-light.
 
 It persuadeth me, I know not how, it toucheth me inwardly with a
 caressing hand, it constraineth me. Yea, it constraineth me, so that my
 soul stretcheth itself out:--
 
 --How long and weary it becometh, my strange soul! Hath a seventh-day
 evening come to it precisely at noontide? Hath it already wandered too
 long, blissfully, among good and ripe things?
 
 It stretcheth itself out, long--longer! it lieth still, my strange
 soul. Too many good things hath it already tasted; this golden sadness
 oppresseth it, it distorteth its mouth.
 
 --As a ship that putteth into the calmest cove:--it now draweth up to
 the land, weary of long voyages and uncertain seas. Is not the land more
 faithful?
 
 As such a ship huggeth the shore, tuggeth the shore:--then it sufficeth
 for a spider to spin its thread from the ship to the land. No stronger
 ropes are required there.
 
 As such a weary ship in the calmest cove, so do I also now repose, nigh
 to the earth, faithful, trusting, waiting, bound to it with the lightest
 threads.
 
 O happiness! O happiness! Wilt thou perhaps sing, O my soul? Thou liest
 in the grass. But this is the secret, solemn hour, when no shepherd
 playeth his pipe.
 
 Take care! Hot noontide sleepeth on the fields. Do not sing! Hush! The
 world is perfect.
 
 Do not sing, thou prairie-bird, my soul! Do not even whisper! Lo--hush!
 The old noontide sleepeth, it moveth its mouth: doth it not just now
 drink a drop of happiness--
 
 --An old brown drop of golden happiness, golden wine? Something whisketh
 over it, its happiness laugheth. Thus--laugheth a God. Hush!--
 
 --'For happiness, how little sufficeth for happiness!' Thus spake I
 once and thought myself wise. But it was a blasphemy: THAT have I now
 learned. Wise fools speak better.
 
 The least thing precisely, the gentlest thing, the lightest thing, a
 lizard's rustling, a breath, a whisk, an eye-glance--LITTLE maketh up
 the BEST happiness. Hush!
 
 --What hath befallen me: Hark! Hath time flown away? Do I not fall? Have
 I not fallen--hark! into the well of eternity?
 
 --What happeneth to me? Hush! It stingeth me--alas--to the heart? To
 the heart! Oh, break up, break up, my heart, after such happiness, after
 such a sting!
 
 --What? Hath not the world just now become perfect? Round and ripe? Oh,
 for the golden round ring--whither doth it fly? Let me run after it!
 Quick!
 
 Hush--" (and here Zarathustra stretched himself, and felt that he was
 asleep.)
 
 "Up!" said he to himself, "thou sleeper! Thou noontide sleeper! Well
 then, up, ye old legs! It is time and more than time; many a good
 stretch of road is still awaiting you--
 
 Now have ye slept your fill; for how long a time? A half-eternity! Well
 then, up now, mine old heart! For how long after such a sleep mayest
 thou--remain awake?"
 
 (But then did he fall asleep anew, and his soul spake against him and
 defended itself, and lay down again)--"Leave me alone! Hush! Hath not
 the world just now become perfect? Oh, for the golden round ball!--
 
 "Get up," said Zarathustra, "thou little thief, thou sluggard! What!
 Still stretching thyself, yawning, sighing, falling into deep wells?
 
 Who art thou then, O my soul!" (and here he became frightened, for a
 sunbeam shot down from heaven upon his face.)
 
 "O heaven above me," said he sighing, and sat upright, "thou gazest at
 me? Thou hearkenest unto my strange soul?
 
 When wilt thou drink this drop of dew that fell down upon all earthly
 things,--when wilt thou drink this strange soul--
 
 --When, thou well of eternity! thou joyous, awful, noontide abyss! when
 wilt thou drink my soul back into thee?"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and rose from his couch beside the tree, as if
 awakening from a strange drunkenness: and behold! there stood the
 sun still exactly above his head. One might, however, rightly infer
 therefrom that Zarathustra had not then slept long.
 
 
 
 
 LXXI. THE GREETING.
 
 It was late in the afternoon only when Zarathustra, after long useless
 searching and strolling about, again came home to his cave. When,
 however, he stood over against it, not more than twenty paces therefrom,
 the thing happened which he now least of all expected: he heard anew the
 great CRY OF DISTRESS. And extraordinary! this time the cry came out
 of his own cave. It was a long, manifold, peculiar cry, and Zarathustra
 plainly distinguished that it was composed of many voices: although
 heard at a distance it might sound like the cry out of a single mouth.
 
 Thereupon Zarathustra rushed forward to his cave, and behold! what a
 spectacle awaited him after that concert! For there did they all sit
 together whom he had passed during the day: the king on the right and
 the king on the left, the old magician, the pope, the voluntary
 beggar, the shadow, the intellectually conscientious one, the sorrowful
 soothsayer, and the ass; the ugliest man, however, had set a crown on
 his head, and had put round him two purple girdles,--for he liked, like
 all ugly ones, to disguise himself and play the handsome person. In the
 midst, however, of that sorrowful company stood Zarathustra's eagle,
 ruffled and disquieted, for it had been called upon to answer too much
 for which its pride had not any answer; the wise serpent however hung
 round its neck.
 
 All this did Zarathustra behold with great astonishment; then however he
 scrutinised each individual guest with courteous curiosity, read their
 souls and wondered anew. In the meantime the assembled ones had risen
 from their seats, and waited with reverence for Zarathustra to speak.
 Zarathustra however spake thus:
 
 "Ye despairing ones! Ye strange ones! So it was YOUR cry of distress
 that I heard? And now do I know also where he is to be sought, whom I
 have sought for in vain to-day: THE HIGHER MAN--:
 
 --In mine own cave sitteth he, the higher man! But why do I wonder! Have
 not I myself allured him to me by honey-offerings and artful lure-calls
 of my happiness?
 
 But it seemeth to me that ye are badly adapted for company: ye make
 one another's hearts fretful, ye that cry for help, when ye sit here
 together? There is one that must first come,
 
 --One who will make you laugh once more, a good jovial buffoon, a
 dancer, a wind, a wild romp, some old fool:--what think ye?
 
 Forgive me, however, ye despairing ones, for speaking such trivial words
 before you, unworthy, verily, of such guests! But ye do not divine WHAT
 maketh my heart wanton:--
 
 --Ye yourselves do it, and your aspect, forgive it me! For every one
 becometh courageous who beholdeth a despairing one. To encourage a
 despairing one--every one thinketh himself strong enough to do so.
 
 To myself have ye given this power,--a good gift, mine honourable
 guests! An excellent guest's-present! Well, do not then upbraid when I
 also offer you something of mine.
 
 This is mine empire and my dominion: that which is mine, however, shall
 this evening and tonight be yours. Mine animals shall serve you: let my
 cave be your resting-place!
 
 At house and home with me shall no one despair: in my purlieus do I
 protect every one from his wild beasts. And that is the first thing
 which I offer you: security!
 
 The second thing, however, is my little finger. And when ye have THAT,
 then take the whole hand also, yea, and the heart with it! Welcome here,
 welcome to you, my guests!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and laughed with love and mischief. After this
 greeting his guests bowed once more and were reverentially silent; the
 king on the right, however, answered him in their name.
 
 "O Zarathustra, by the way in which thou hast given us thy hand and thy
 greeting, we recognise thee as Zarathustra. Thou hast humbled thyself
 before us; almost hast thou hurt our reverence--:
 
 --Who however could have humbled himself as thou hast done, with such
 pride? THAT uplifteth us ourselves; a refreshment is it, to our eyes and
 hearts.
 
 To behold this, merely, gladly would we ascend higher mountains than
 this. For as eager beholders have we come; we wanted to see what
 brighteneth dim eyes.
 
 And lo! now is it all over with our cries of distress. Now are our minds
 and hearts open and enraptured. Little is lacking for our spirits to
 become wanton.
 
 There is nothing, O Zarathustra, that groweth more pleasingly on earth
 than a lofty, strong will: it is the finest growth. An entire landscape
 refresheth itself at one such tree.
 
 To the pine do I compare him, O Zarathustra, which groweth up like
 thee--tall, silent, hardy, solitary, of the best, supplest wood,
 stately,--
 
 --In the end, however, grasping out for ITS dominion with strong, green
 branches, asking weighty questions of the wind, the storm, and whatever
 is at home on high places;
 
 --Answering more weightily, a commander, a victor! Oh! who should not
 ascend high mountains to behold such growths?
 
 At thy tree, O Zarathustra, the gloomy and ill-constituted also refresh
 themselves; at thy look even the wavering become steady and heal their
 hearts.
 
 And verily, towards thy mountain and thy tree do many eyes turn to-day;
 a great longing hath arisen, and many have learned to ask: 'Who is
 Zarathustra?'
 
 And those into whose ears thou hast at any time dripped thy song and thy
 honey: all the hidden ones, the lone-dwellers and the twain-dwellers,
 have simultaneously said to their hearts:
 
 'Doth Zarathustra still live? It is no longer worth while to live,
 everything is indifferent, everything is useless: or else--we must live
 with Zarathustra!'
 
 'Why doth he not come who hath so long announced himself?' thus do many
 people ask; 'hath solitude swallowed him up? Or should we perhaps go to
 him?'
 
 Now doth it come to pass that solitude itself becometh fragile and
 breaketh open, like a grave that breaketh open and can no longer hold
 its dead. Everywhere one seeth resurrected ones.
 
 Now do the waves rise and rise around thy mountain, O Zarathustra. And
 however high be thy height, many of them must rise up to thee: thy boat
 shall not rest much longer on dry ground.
 
 And that we despairing ones have now come into thy cave, and already no
 longer despair:--it is but a prognostic and a presage that better ones
 are on the way to thee,--
 
 --For they themselves are on the way to thee, the last remnant of
 God among men--that is to say, all the men of great longing, of great
 loathing, of great satiety,
 
 --All who do not want to live unless they learn again to HOPE--unless
 they learn from thee, O Zarathustra, the GREAT hope!"
 
 Thus spake the king on the right, and seized the hand of Zarathustra in
 order to kiss it; but Zarathustra checked his veneration, and stepped
 back frightened, fleeing as it were, silently and suddenly into the far
 distance. After a little while, however, he was again at home with his
 guests, looked at them with clear scrutinising eyes, and said:
 
 "My guests, ye higher men, I will speak plain language and plainly with
 you. It is not for YOU that I have waited here in these mountains."
 
 ("'Plain language and plainly?' Good God!" said here the king on the
 left to himself; "one seeth he doth not know the good Occidentals, this
 sage out of the Orient!
 
 But he meaneth 'blunt language and bluntly'--well! That is not the worst
 taste in these days!")
 
 "Ye may, verily, all of you be higher men," continued Zarathustra; "but
 for me--ye are neither high enough, nor strong enough.
 
 For me, that is to say, for the inexorable which is now silent in me,
 but will not always be silent. And if ye appertain to me, still it is
 not as my right arm.
 
 For he who himself standeth, like you, on sickly and tender legs,
 wisheth above all to be TREATED INDULGENTLY, whether he be conscious of
 it or hide it from himself.
 
 My arms and my legs, however, I do not treat indulgently, I DO NOT TREAT
 MY WARRIORS INDULGENTLY: how then could ye be fit for MY warfare?
 
 With you I should spoil all my victories. And many of you would tumble
 over if ye but heard the loud beating of my drums.
 
 Moreover, ye are not sufficiently beautiful and well-born for me. I
 require pure, smooth mirrors for my doctrines; on your surface even mine
 own likeness is distorted.
 
 On your shoulders presseth many a burden, many a recollection; many a
 mischievous dwarf squatteth in your corners. There is concealed populace
 also in you.
 
 And though ye be high and of a higher type, much in you is crooked and
 misshapen. There is no smith in the world that could hammer you right
 and straight for me.
 
 Ye are only bridges: may higher ones pass over upon you! Ye signify
 steps: so do not upbraid him who ascendeth beyond you into HIS height!
 
 Out of your seed there may one day arise for me a genuine son and
 perfect heir: but that time is distant. Ye yourselves are not those unto
 whom my heritage and name belong.
 
 Not for you do I wait here in these mountains; not with you may I
 descend for the last time. Ye have come unto me only as a presage that
 higher ones are on the way to me,--
 
 --NOT the men of great longing, of great loathing, of great satiety, and
 that which ye call the remnant of God;
 
 --Nay! Nay! Three times Nay! For OTHERS do I wait here in these
 mountains, and will not lift my foot from thence without them;
 
 --For higher ones, stronger ones, triumphanter ones, merrier ones, for
 such as are built squarely in body and soul: LAUGHING LIONS must come!
 
 O my guests, ye strange ones--have ye yet heard nothing of my children?
 And that they are on the way to me?
 
 Do speak unto me of my gardens, of my Happy Isles, of my new beautiful
 race--why do ye not speak unto me thereof?
 
 This guests'-present do I solicit of your love, that ye speak unto me of
 my children. For them am I rich, for them I became poor: what have I not
 surrendered,
 
 --What would I not surrender that I might have one thing: THESE
 children, THIS living plantation, THESE life-trees of my will and of my
 highest hope!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra, and stopped suddenly in his discourse: for his
 longing came over him, and he closed his eyes and his mouth, because
 of the agitation of his heart. And all his guests also were silent, and
 stood still and confounded: except only that the old soothsayer made
 signs with his hands and his gestures.
 
 
 
 
 LXXII. THE SUPPER.
 
 For at this point the soothsayer interrupted the greeting of Zarathustra
 and his guests: he pressed forward as one who had no time to lose,
 seized Zarathustra's hand and exclaimed: "But Zarathustra!
 
 One thing is more necessary than the other, so sayest thou thyself:
 well, one thing is now more necessary UNTO ME than all others.
 
 A word at the right time: didst thou not invite me to TABLE? And here
 are many who have made long journeys. Thou dost not mean to feed us
 merely with discourses?
 
 Besides, all of you have thought too much about freezing, drowning,
 suffocating, and other bodily dangers: none of you, however, have
 thought of MY danger, namely, perishing of hunger-"
 
 (Thus spake the soothsayer. When Zarathustra's animals, however, heard
 these words, they ran away in terror. For they saw that all they
 had brought home during the day would not be enough to fill the one
 soothsayer.)
 
 "Likewise perishing of thirst," continued the soothsayer. "And although
 I hear water splashing here like words of wisdom--that is to say,
 plenteously and unweariedly, I--want WINE!
 
 Not every one is a born water-drinker like Zarathustra. Neither doth
 water suit weary and withered ones: WE deserve wine--IT alone giveth
 immediate vigour and improvised health!"
 
 On this occasion, when the soothsayer was longing for wine, it happened
 that the king on the left, the silent one, also found expression for
 once. "WE took care," said he, "about wine, I, along with my brother the
 king on the right: we have enough of wine,--a whole ass-load of it. So
 there is nothing lacking but bread."
 
 "Bread," replied Zarathustra, laughing when he spake, "it is precisely
 bread that anchorites have not. But man doth not live by bread alone,
 but also by the flesh of good lambs, of which I have two:
 
 --THESE shall we slaughter quickly, and cook spicily with sage: it is
 so that I like them. And there is also no lack of roots and fruits,
 good enough even for the fastidious and dainty,--nor of nuts and other
 riddles for cracking.
 
 Thus will we have a good repast in a little while. But whoever wish to
 eat with us must also give a hand to the work, even the kings. For with
 Zarathustra even a king may be a cook."
 
 This proposal appealed to the hearts of all of them, save that the
 voluntary beggar objected to the flesh and wine and spices.
 
 "Just hear this glutton Zarathustra!" said he jokingly: "doth one go
 into caves and high mountains to make such repasts?
 
 Now indeed do I understand what he once taught us: Blessed be moderate
 poverty!' And why he wisheth to do away with beggars."
 
 "Be of good cheer," replied Zarathustra, "as I am. Abide by thy
 customs, thou excellent one: grind thy corn, drink thy water, praise thy
 cooking,--if only it make thee glad!
 
 I am a law only for mine own; I am not a law for all. He, however, who
 belongeth unto me must be strong of bone and light of foot,--
 
 --Joyous in fight and feast, no sulker, no John o' Dreams, ready for the
 hardest task as for the feast, healthy and hale.
 
 The best belongeth unto mine and me; and if it be not given us, then do
 we take it:--the best food, the purest sky, the strongest thoughts, the
 fairest women!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra; the king on the right however answered and said:
 "Strange! Did one ever hear such sensible things out of the mouth of a
 wise man?
 
 And verily, it is the strangest thing in a wise man, if over and above,
 he be still sensible, and not an ass."
 
 Thus spake the king on the right and wondered; the ass however, with
 ill-will, said YE-A to his remark. This however was the beginning of
 that long repast which is called "The Supper" in the history-books. At
 this there was nothing else spoken of but THE HIGHER MAN.
 
 
 
 
 LXXIII. THE HIGHER MAN.
 
 1.
 
 When I came unto men for the first time, then did I commit the anchorite
 folly, the great folly: I appeared on the market-place.
 
 And when I spake unto all, I spake unto none. In the evening, however,
 rope-dancers were my companions, and corpses; and I myself almost a
 corpse.
 
 With the new morning, however, there came unto me a new truth: then did
 I learn to say: "Of what account to me are market-place and populace and
 populace-noise and long populace-ears!"
 
 Ye higher men, learn THIS from me: On the market-place no one believeth
 in higher men. But if ye will speak there, very well! The populace,
 however, blinketh: "We are all equal."
 
 "Ye higher men,"--so blinketh the populace--"there are no higher men, we
 are all equal; man is man, before God--we are all equal!"
 
 Before God!--Now, however, this God hath died. Before the populace,
 however, we will not be equal. Ye higher men, away from the
 market-place!
 
 2.
 
 Before God!--Now however this God hath died! Ye higher men, this God was
 your greatest danger.
 
 Only since he lay in the grave have ye again arisen. Now only cometh the
 great noontide, now only doth the higher man become--master!
 
 Have ye understood this word, O my brethren? Ye are frightened: do your
 hearts turn giddy? Doth the abyss here yawn for you? Doth the hell-hound
 here yelp at you?
 
 Well! Take heart! ye higher men! Now only travaileth the mountain of the
 human future. God hath died: now do WE desire--the Superman to live.
 
 3.
 
 The most careful ask to-day: "How is man to be maintained?" Zarathustra
 however asketh, as the first and only one: "How is man to be SURPASSED?"
 
 The Superman, I have at heart; THAT is the first and only thing to
 me--and NOT man: not the neighbour, not the poorest, not the sorriest,
 not the best.--
 
 O my brethren, what I can love in man is that he is an over-going and a
 down-going. And also in you there is much that maketh me love and hope.
 
 In that ye have despised, ye higher men, that maketh me hope. For the
 great despisers are the great reverers.
 
 In that ye have despaired, there is much to honour. For ye have not
 learned to submit yourselves, ye have not learned petty policy.
 
 For to-day have the petty people become master: they all preach
 submission and humility and policy and diligence and consideration and
 the long et cetera of petty virtues.
 
 Whatever is of the effeminate type, whatever originateth from the
 servile type, and especially the populace-mishmash:--THAT wisheth now to
 be master of all human destiny--O disgust! Disgust! Disgust!
 
 THAT asketh and asketh and never tireth: "How is man to maintain himself
 best, longest, most pleasantly?" Thereby--are they the masters of
 to-day.
 
 These masters of to-day--surpass them, O my brethren--these petty
 people: THEY are the Superman's greatest danger!
 
 Surpass, ye higher men, the petty virtues, the petty policy, the
 sand-grain considerateness, the ant-hill trumpery, the pitiable
 comfortableness, the "happiness of the greatest number"--!
 
 And rather despair than submit yourselves. And verily, I love you,
 because ye know not to-day how to live, ye higher men! For thus do YE
 live--best!
 
 4.
 
 Have ye courage, O my brethren? Are ye stout-hearted? NOT the courage
 before witnesses, but anchorite and eagle courage, which not even a God
 any longer beholdeth?
 
 Cold souls, mules, the blind and the drunken, I do not call
 stout-hearted. He hath heart who knoweth fear, but VANQUISHETH it; who
 seeth the abyss, but with PRIDE.
 
 He who seeth the abyss, but with eagle's eyes,--he who with eagle's
 talons GRASPETH the abyss: he hath courage.--
 
 5.
 
 "Man is evil"--so said to me for consolation, all the wisest ones. Ah,
 if only it be still true to-day! For the evil is man's best force.
 
 "Man must become better and eviler"--so do _I_ teach. The evilest is
 necessary for the Superman's best.
 
 It may have been well for the preacher of the petty people to suffer and
 be burdened by men's sin. I, however, rejoice in great sin as my great
 CONSOLATION.--
 
 Such things, however, are not said for long ears. Every word, also,
 is not suited for every mouth. These are fine far-away things: at them
 sheep's claws shall not grasp!
 
 6.
 
 Ye higher men, think ye that I am here to put right what ye have put
 wrong?
 
 Or that I wished henceforth to make snugger couches for you sufferers?
 Or show you restless, miswandering, misclimbing ones, new and easier
 footpaths?
 
 Nay! Nay! Three times Nay! Always more, always better ones of your
 type shall succumb,--for ye shall always have it worse and harder. Thus
 only--
 
 --Thus only groweth man aloft to the height where the lightning striketh
 and shattereth him: high enough for the lightning!
 
 Towards the few, the long, the remote go forth my soul and my seeking:
 of what account to me are your many little, short miseries!
 
 Ye do not yet suffer enough for me! For ye suffer from yourselves, ye
 have not yet suffered FROM MAN. Ye would lie if ye spake otherwise! None
 of you suffereth from what _I_ have suffered.--
 
 7.
 
 It is not enough for me that the lightning no longer doeth harm. I do
 not wish to conduct it away: it shall learn--to work for ME.--
 
 My wisdom hath accumulated long like a cloud, it becometh stiller and
 darker. So doeth all wisdom which shall one day bear LIGHTNINGS.--
 
 Unto these men of to-day will I not be LIGHT, nor be called light.
 THEM--will I blind: lightning of my wisdom! put out their eyes!
 
 8.
 
 Do not will anything beyond your power: there is a bad falseness in
 those who will beyond their power.
 
 Especially when they will great things! For they awaken distrust in
 great things, these subtle false-coiners and stage-players:--
 
 --Until at last they are false towards themselves, squint-eyed, whited
 cankers, glossed over with strong words, parade virtues and brilliant
 false deeds.
 
 Take good care there, ye higher men! For nothing is more precious to me,
 and rarer, than honesty.
 
 Is this to-day not that of the populace? The populace however knoweth
 not what is great and what is small, what is straight and what is
 honest: it is innocently crooked, it ever lieth.
 
 9.
 
 Have a good distrust to-day ye, higher men, ye enheartened ones! Ye
 open-hearted ones! And keep your reasons secret! For this to-day is that
 of the populace.
 
 What the populace once learned to believe without reasons, who could--
 refute it to them by means of reasons?
 
 And on the market-place one convinceth with gestures. But reasons make
 the populace distrustful.
 
 And when truth hath once triumphed there, then ask yourselves with good
 distrust: "What strong error hath fought for it?"
 
 Be on your guard also against the learned! They hate you, because they
 are unproductive! They have cold, withered eyes before which every bird
 is unplumed.
 
 Such persons vaunt about not lying: but inability to lie is still far
 from being love to truth. Be on your guard!
 
 Freedom from fever is still far from being knowledge! Refrigerated
 spirits I do not believe in. He who cannot lie, doth not know what truth
 is.
 
 10.
 
 If ye would go up high, then use your own legs! Do not get yourselves
 CARRIED aloft; do not seat yourselves on other people's backs and heads!
 
 Thou hast mounted, however, on horseback? Thou now ridest briskly up
 to thy goal? Well, my friend! But thy lame foot is also with thee on
 horseback!
 
 When thou reachest thy goal, when thou alightest from thy horse:
 precisely on thy HEIGHT, thou higher man,--then wilt thou stumble!
 
 11.
 
 Ye creating ones, ye higher men! One is only pregnant with one's own
 child.
 
 Do not let yourselves be imposed upon or put upon! Who then is YOUR
 neighbour? Even if ye act "for your neighbour"--ye still do not create
 for him!
 
 Unlearn, I pray you, this "for," ye creating ones: your very virtue
 wisheth you to have naught to do with "for" and "on account of" and
 "because." Against these false little words shall ye stop your ears.
 
 "For one's neighbour," is the virtue only of the petty people: there it
 is said "like and like," and "hand washeth hand":--they have neither the
 right nor the power for YOUR self-seeking!
 
 In your self-seeking, ye creating ones, there is the foresight and
 foreseeing of the pregnant! What no one's eye hath yet seen, namely, the
 fruit--this, sheltereth and saveth and nourisheth your entire love.
 
 Where your entire love is, namely, with your child, there is also your
 entire virtue! Your work, your will is YOUR "neighbour": let no false
 values impose upon you!
 
 12.
 
 Ye creating ones, ye higher men! Whoever hath to give birth is sick;
 whoever hath given birth, however, is unclean.
 
 Ask women: one giveth birth, not because it giveth pleasure. The pain
 maketh hens and poets cackle.
 
 Ye creating ones, in you there is much uncleanliness. That is because ye
 have had to be mothers.
 
 A new child: oh, how much new filth hath also come into the world! Go
 apart! He who hath given birth shall wash his soul!
 
 13.
 
 Be not virtuous beyond your powers! And seek nothing from yourselves
 opposed to probability!
 
 Walk in the footsteps in which your fathers' virtue hath already walked!
 How would ye rise high, if your fathers' will should not rise with you?
 
 He, however, who would be a firstling, let him take care lest he also
 become a lastling! And where the vices of your fathers are, there should
 ye not set up as saints!
 
 He whose fathers were inclined for women, and for strong wine and flesh
 of wildboar swine; what would it be if he demanded chastity of himself?
 
 A folly would it be! Much, verily, doth it seem to me for such a one, if
 he should be the husband of one or of two or of three women.
 
 And if he founded monasteries, and inscribed over their portals: "The
 way to holiness,"--I should still say: What good is it! it is a new
 folly!
 
 He hath founded for himself a penance-house and refuge-house: much good
 may it do! But I do not believe in it.
 
 In solitude there groweth what any one bringeth into it--also the brute
 in one's nature. Thus is solitude inadvisable unto many.
 
 Hath there ever been anything filthier on earth than the saints of
 the wilderness? AROUND THEM was not only the devil loose--but also the
 swine.
 
 14.
 
 Shy, ashamed, awkward, like the tiger whose spring hath failed--thus, ye
 higher men, have I often seen you slink aside. A CAST which ye made had
 failed.
 
 But what doth it matter, ye dice-players! Ye had not learned to play and
 mock, as one must play and mock! Do we not ever sit at a great table of
 mocking and playing?
 
 And if great things have been a failure with you, have ye yourselves
 therefore--been a failure? And if ye yourselves have been a failure,
 hath man therefore--been a failure? If man, however, hath been a
 failure: well then! never mind!
 
 15.
 
 The higher its type, always the seldomer doth a thing succeed. Ye higher
 men here, have ye not all--been failures?
 
 Be of good cheer; what doth it matter? How much is still possible! Learn
 to laugh at yourselves, as ye ought to laugh!
 
 What wonder even that ye have failed and only half-succeeded, ye
 half-shattered ones! Doth not--man's FUTURE strive and struggle in you?
 
 Man's furthest, profoundest, star-highest issues, his prodigious
 powers--do not all these foam through one another in your vessel?
 
 What wonder that many a vessel shattereth! Learn to laugh at yourselves,
 as ye ought to laugh! Ye higher men, O, how much is still possible!
 
 And verily, how much hath already succeeded! How rich is this earth in
 small, good, perfect things, in well-constituted things!
 
 Set around you small, good, perfect things, ye higher men. Their golden
 maturity healeth the heart. The perfect teacheth one to hope.
 
 16.
 
 What hath hitherto been the greatest sin here on earth? Was it not the
 word of him who said: "Woe unto them that laugh now!"
 
 Did he himself find no cause for laughter on the earth? Then he sought
 badly. A child even findeth cause for it.
 
 He--did not love sufficiently: otherwise would he also have loved
 us, the laughing ones! But he hated and hooted us; wailing and
 teeth-gnashing did he promise us.
 
 Must one then curse immediately, when one doth not love? That--seemeth
 to me bad taste. Thus did he, however, this absolute one. He sprang from
 the populace.
 
 And he himself just did not love sufficiently; otherwise would he have
 raged less because people did not love him. All great love doth not SEEK
 love:--it seeketh more.
 
 Go out of the way of all such absolute ones! They are a poor sickly
 type, a populace-type: they look at this life with ill-will, they have
 an evil eye for this earth.
 
 Go out of the way of all such absolute ones! They have heavy feet and
 sultry hearts:--they do not know how to dance. How could the earth be
 light to such ones!
 
 17.
 
 Tortuously do all good things come nigh to their goal. Like cats
 they curve their backs, they purr inwardly with their approaching
 happiness,--all good things laugh.
 
 His step betrayeth whether a person already walketh on HIS OWN path:
 just see me walk! He, however, who cometh nigh to his goal, danceth.
 
 And verily, a statue have I not become, not yet do I stand there stiff,
 stupid and stony, like a pillar; I love fast racing.
 
 And though there be on earth fens and dense afflictions, he who hath
 light feet runneth even across the mud, and danceth, as upon well-swept
 ice.
 
 Lift up your hearts, my brethren, high, higher! And do not forget your
 legs! Lift up also your legs, ye good dancers, and better still, if ye
 stand upon your heads!
 
 18.
 
 This crown of the laughter, this rose-garland crown: I myself have put
 on this crown, I myself have consecrated my laughter. No one else have I
 found to-day potent enough for this.
 
 Zarathustra the dancer, Zarathustra the light one, who beckoneth with
 his pinions, one ready for flight, beckoning unto all birds, ready and
 prepared, a blissfully light-spirited one:--
 
 Zarathustra the soothsayer, Zarathustra the sooth-laugher, no impatient
 one, no absolute one, one who loveth leaps and side-leaps; I myself have
 put on this crown!
 
 19.
 
 Lift up your hearts, my brethren, high, higher! And do not forget your
 legs! Lift up also your legs, ye good dancers, and better still if ye
 stand upon your heads!
 
 There are also heavy animals in a state of happiness, there are
 club-footed ones from the beginning. Curiously do they exert themselves,
 like an elephant which endeavoureth to stand upon its head.
 
 Better, however, to be foolish with happiness than foolish with
 misfortune, better to dance awkwardly than walk lamely. So learn, I
 pray you, my wisdom, ye higher men: even the worst thing hath two good
 reverse sides,--
 
 --Even the worst thing hath good dancing-legs: so learn, I pray you, ye
 higher men, to put yourselves on your proper legs!
 
 So unlearn, I pray you, the sorrow-sighing, and all the
 populace-sadness! Oh, how sad the buffoons of the populace seem to me
 to-day! This to-day, however, is that of the populace.
 
 20.
 
 Do like unto the wind when it rusheth forth from its mountain-caves:
 unto its own piping will it dance; the seas tremble and leap under its
 footsteps.
 
 That which giveth wings to asses, that which milketh the lionesses:--
 praised be that good, unruly spirit, which cometh like a hurricane unto
 all the present and unto all the populace,--
 
 --Which is hostile to thistle-heads and puzzle-heads, and to all
 withered leaves and weeds:--praised be this wild, good, free spirit of
 the storm, which danceth upon fens and afflictions, as upon meadows!
 
 Which hateth the consumptive populace-dogs, and all the ill-constituted,
 sullen brood:--praised be this spirit of all free spirits, the laughing
 storm, which bloweth dust into the eyes of all the melanopic and
 melancholic!
 
 Ye higher men, the worst thing in you is that ye have none of you
 learned to dance as ye ought to dance--to dance beyond yourselves! What
 doth it matter that ye have failed!
 
 How many things are still possible! So LEARN to laugh beyond yourselves!
 Lift up your hearts, ye good dancers, high! higher! And do not forget
 the good laughter!
 
 This crown of the laughter, this rose-garland crown: to you my brethren
 do I cast this crown! Laughing have I consecrated; ye higher men, LEARN,
 I pray you--to laugh!
 
 
 
 
 LXXIV. THE SONG OF MELANCHOLY.
 
 1.
 
 When Zarathustra spake these sayings, he stood nigh to the entrance of
 his cave; with the last words, however, he slipped away from his guests,
 and fled for a little while into the open air.
 
 "O pure odours around me," cried he, "O blessed stillness around me! But
 where are mine animals? Hither, hither, mine eagle and my serpent!
 
 Tell me, mine animals: these higher men, all of them--do they perhaps
 not SMELL well? O pure odours around me! Now only do I know and feel how
 I love you, mine animals."
 
 --And Zarathustra said once more: "I love you, mine animals!" The eagle,
 however, and the serpent pressed close to him when he spake these
 words, and looked up to him. In this attitude were they all three silent
 together, and sniffed and sipped the good air with one another. For the
 air here outside was better than with the higher men.
 
 2.
 
 Hardly, however, had Zarathustra left the cave when the old magician got
 up, looked cunningly about him, and said: "He is gone!
 
 And already, ye higher men--let me tickle you with this complimentary
 and flattering name, as he himself doeth--already doth mine evil spirit
 of deceit and magic attack me, my melancholy devil,
 
 --Which is an adversary to this Zarathustra from the very heart: forgive
 it for this! Now doth it wish to conjure before you, it hath just ITS
 hour; in vain do I struggle with this evil spirit.
 
 Unto all of you, whatever honours ye like to assume in your names,
 whether ye call yourselves 'the free spirits' or 'the conscientious,'
 or 'the penitents of the spirit,' or 'the unfettered,' or 'the great
 longers,'--
 
 --Unto all of you, who like me suffer FROM THE GREAT LOATHING, to
 whom the old God hath died, and as yet no new God lieth in cradles and
 swaddling clothes--unto all of you is mine evil spirit and magic-devil
 favourable.
 
 I know you, ye higher men, I know him,--I know also this fiend whom I
 love in spite of me, this Zarathustra: he himself often seemeth to me
 like the beautiful mask of a saint,
 
 --Like a new strange mummery in which mine evil spirit, the melancholy
 devil, delighteth:--I love Zarathustra, so doth it often seem to me, for
 the sake of mine evil spirit.--
 
 But already doth IT attack me and constrain me, this spirit of
 melancholy, this evening-twilight devil: and verily, ye higher men, it
 hath a longing--
 
 --Open your eyes!--it hath a longing to come NAKED, whether male or
 female, I do not yet know: but it cometh, it constraineth me, alas! open
 your wits!
 
 The day dieth out, unto all things cometh now the evening, also unto
 the best things; hear now, and see, ye higher men, what devil--man or
 woman--this spirit of evening-melancholy is!"
 
 Thus spake the old magician, looked cunningly about him, and then seized
 his harp.
 
 3.
 
      In evening's limpid air,
      What time the dew's soothings
      Unto the earth downpour,
      Invisibly and unheard--
      For tender shoe-gear wear
      The soothing dews, like all that's kind-gentle--:
      Bethinkst thou then, bethinkst thou, burning heart,
      How once thou thirstedest
      For heaven's kindly teardrops and dew's down-droppings,
      All singed and weary thirstedest,
      What time on yellow grass-pathways
      Wicked, occidental sunny glances
      Through sombre trees about thee sported,
      Blindingly sunny glow-glances, gladly-hurting?
 
      "Of TRUTH the wooer?  Thou?"--so taunted they--
      "Nay!  Merely poet!
      A brute insidious, plundering, grovelling,
      That aye must lie,
      That wittingly, wilfully, aye must lie:
      For booty lusting,
      Motley masked,
      Self-hidden, shrouded,
      Himself his booty--
      HE--of truth the wooer?
      Nay!  Mere fool!  Mere poet!
      Just motley speaking,
      From mask of fool confusedly shouting,
      Circumambling on fabricated word-bridges,
      On motley rainbow-arches,
      'Twixt the spurious heavenly,
      And spurious earthly,
      Round us roving, round us soaring,--
      MERE FOOL!  MERE POET!
 
      HE--of truth the wooer?
      Not still, stiff, smooth and cold,
      Become an image,
      A godlike statue,
      Set up in front of temples,
      As a God's own door-guard:
      Nay! hostile to all such truthfulness-statues,
      In every desert homelier than at temples,
      With cattish wantonness,
      Through every window leaping
      Quickly into chances,
      Every wild forest a-sniffing,
      Greedily-longingly, sniffing,
      That thou, in wild forests,
      'Mong the motley-speckled fierce creatures,
      Shouldest rove, sinful-sound and fine-coloured,
      With longing lips smacking,
      Blessedly mocking, blessedly hellish, blessedly bloodthirsty,
      Robbing, skulking, lying--roving:--
 
      Or unto eagles like which fixedly,
      Long adown the precipice look,
      Adown THEIR precipice:--
      Oh, how they whirl down now,
      Thereunder, therein,
      To ever deeper profoundness whirling!--
      Then,
      Sudden,
      With aim aright,
      With quivering flight,
      On LAMBKINS pouncing,
      Headlong down, sore-hungry,
      For lambkins longing,
      Fierce 'gainst all lamb-spirits,
      Furious-fierce all that look
      Sheeplike, or lambeyed, or crisp-woolly,
      --Grey, with lambsheep kindliness!
 
      Even thus,
      Eaglelike, pantherlike,
      Are the poet's desires,
      Are THINE OWN desires 'neath a thousand guises,
      Thou fool!  Thou poet!
      Thou who all mankind viewedst--
      So God, as sheep--:
      The God TO REND within mankind,
      As the sheep in mankind,
      And in rending LAUGHING--
 
      THAT, THAT is thine own blessedness!
      Of a panther and eagle--blessedness!
      Of a poet and fool--the blessedness!--
 
      In evening's limpid air,
      What time the moon's sickle,
      Green, 'twixt the purple-glowings,
      And jealous, steal'th forth:
      --Of day the foe,
      With every step in secret,
      The rosy garland-hammocks
      Downsickling, till they've sunken
      Down nightwards, faded, downsunken:--
 
      Thus had I sunken one day
      From mine own truth-insanity,
      From mine own fervid day-longings,
      Of day aweary, sick of sunshine,
      --Sunk downwards, evenwards, shadowwards:
      By one sole trueness
      All scorched and thirsty:
      --Bethinkst thou still, bethinkst thou, burning heart,
      How then thou thirstedest?--
      THAT I SHOULD BANNED BE
      FROM ALL THE TRUENESS!
      MERE FOOL!  MERE POET!
 
 
 
 
 LXXV. SCIENCE.
 
 Thus sang the magician; and all who were present went like birds
 unawares into the net of his artful and melancholy voluptuousness.
 Only the spiritually conscientious one had not been caught: he at once
 snatched the harp from the magician and called out: "Air! Let in good
 air! Let in Zarathustra! Thou makest this cave sultry and poisonous,
 thou bad old magician!
 
 Thou seducest, thou false one, thou subtle one, to unknown desires and
 deserts. And alas, that such as thou should talk and make ado about the
 TRUTH!
 
 Alas, to all free spirits who are not on their guard against SUCH
 magicians! It is all over with their freedom: thou teachest and temptest
 back into prisons,--
 
 --Thou old melancholy devil, out of thy lament soundeth a lurement: thou
 resemblest those who with their praise of chastity secretly invite to
 voluptuousness!"
 
 Thus spake the conscientious one; the old magician, however, looked
 about him, enjoying his triumph, and on that account put up with the
 annoyance which the conscientious one caused him. "Be still!" said he
 with modest voice, "good songs want to re-echo well; after good songs
 one should be long silent.
 
 Thus do all those present, the higher men. Thou, however, hast perhaps
 understood but little of my song? In thee there is little of the magic
 spirit.
 
 "Thou praisest me," replied the conscientious one, "in that thou
 separatest me from thyself; very well! But, ye others, what do I see? Ye
 still sit there, all of you, with lusting eyes--:
 
 Ye free spirits, whither hath your freedom gone! Ye almost seem to me
 to resemble those who have long looked at bad girls dancing naked: your
 souls themselves dance!
 
 In you, ye higher men, there must be more of that which the magician
 calleth his evil spirit of magic and deceit:--we must indeed be
 different.
 
 And verily, we spake and thought long enough together ere Zarathustra
 came home to his cave, for me not to be unaware that we ARE different.
 
 We SEEK different things even here aloft, ye and I. For I seek more
 SECURITY; on that account have I come to Zarathustra. For he is still
 the most steadfast tower and will--
 
 --To-day, when everything tottereth, when all the earth quaketh. Ye,
 however, when I see what eyes ye make, it almost seemeth to me that ye
 seek MORE INSECURITY,
 
 --More horror, more danger, more earthquake. Ye long (it almost seemeth
 so to me--forgive my presumption, ye higher men)--
 
 --Ye long for the worst and dangerousest life, which frighteneth ME
 most,--for the life of wild beasts, for forests, caves, steep mountains
 and labyrinthine gorges.
 
 And it is not those who lead OUT OF danger that please you best, but
 those who lead you away from all paths, the misleaders. But if
 such longing in you be ACTUAL, it seemeth to me nevertheless to be
 IMPOSSIBLE.
 
 For fear--that is man's original and fundamental feeling; through fear
 everything is explained, original sin and original virtue. Through fear
 there grew also MY virtue, that is to say: Science.
 
 For fear of wild animals--that hath been longest fostered in
 man, inclusive of the animal which he concealeth and feareth in
 himself:--Zarathustra calleth it 'the beast inside.'
 
 Such prolonged ancient fear, at last become subtle, spiritual and
 intellectual--at present, me thinketh, it is called SCIENCE."--
 
 Thus spake the conscientious one; but Zarathustra, who had just come
 back into his cave and had heard and divined the last discourse, threw a
 handful of roses to the conscientious one, and laughed on account of
 his "truths." "Why!" he exclaimed, "what did I hear just now? Verily, it
 seemeth to me, thou art a fool, or else I myself am one: and quietly and
 quickly will I put thy 'truth' upside down.
 
 For FEAR--is an exception with us. Courage, however, and adventure, and
 delight in the uncertain, in the unattempted--COURAGE seemeth to me the
 entire primitive history of man.
 
 The wildest and most courageous animals hath he envied and robbed of all
 their virtues: thus only did he become--man.
 
 THIS courage, at last become subtle, spiritual and intellectual, this
 human courage, with eagle's pinions and serpent's wisdom: THIS, it
 seemeth to me, is called at present--"
 
 "ZARATHUSTRA!" cried all of them there assembled, as if with one voice,
 and burst out at the same time into a great laughter; there arose,
 however, from them as it were a heavy cloud. Even the magician laughed,
 and said wisely: "Well! It is gone, mine evil spirit!
 
 And did I not myself warn you against it when I said that it was a
 deceiver, a lying and deceiving spirit?
 
 Especially when it showeth itself naked. But what can _I_ do with regard
 to its tricks! Have _I_ created it and the world?
 
 Well! Let us be good again, and of good cheer! And although Zarathustra
 looketh with evil eye--just see him! he disliketh me--:
 
 --Ere night cometh will he again learn to love and laud me; he cannot
 live long without committing such follies.
 
 HE--loveth his enemies: this art knoweth he better than any one I have
 seen. But he taketh revenge for it--on his friends!"
 
 Thus spake the old magician, and the higher men applauded him; so that
 Zarathustra went round, and mischievously and lovingly shook hands with
 his friends,--like one who hath to make amends and apologise to every
 one for something. When however he had thereby come to the door of his
 cave, lo, then had he again a longing for the good air outside, and for
 his animals,--and wished to steal out.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVI. AMONG DAUGHTERS OF THE DESERT.
 
 1.
 
 "Go not away!" said then the wanderer who called himself Zarathustra's
 shadow, "abide with us--otherwise the old gloomy affliction might again
 fall upon us.
 
 Now hath that old magician given us of his worst for our good, and
 lo! the good, pious pope there hath tears in his eyes, and hath quite
 embarked again upon the sea of melancholy.
 
 Those kings may well put on a good air before us still: for that have
 THEY learned best of us all at present! Had they however no one to see
 them, I wager that with them also the bad game would again commence,--
 
 --The bad game of drifting clouds, of damp melancholy, of curtained
 heavens, of stolen suns, of howling autumn-winds,
 
 --The bad game of our howling and crying for help! Abide with us, O
 Zarathustra! Here there is much concealed misery that wisheth to speak,
 much evening, much cloud, much damp air!
 
 Thou hast nourished us with strong food for men, and powerful proverbs:
 do not let the weakly, womanly spirits attack us anew at dessert!
 
 Thou alone makest the air around thee strong and clear! Did I ever find
 anywhere on earth such good air as with thee in thy cave?
 
 Many lands have I seen, my nose hath learned to test and estimate many
 kinds of air: but with thee do my nostrils taste their greatest delight!
 
 Unless it be,--unless it be--, do forgive an old recollection! Forgive
 me an old after-dinner song, which I once composed amongst daughters of
 the desert:--
 
 For with them was there equally good, clear, Oriental air; there was I
 furthest from cloudy, damp, melancholy Old-Europe!
 
 Then did I love such Oriental maidens and other blue kingdoms of heaven,
 over which hang no clouds and no thoughts.
 
 Ye would not believe how charmingly they sat there, when they did
 not dance, profound, but without thoughts, like little secrets, like
 beribboned riddles, like dessert-nuts--
 
 Many-hued and foreign, forsooth! but without clouds: riddles which
 can be guessed: to please such maidens I then composed an after-dinner
 psalm."
 
 Thus spake the wanderer who called himself Zarathustra's shadow; and
 before any one answered him, he had seized the harp of the old magician,
 crossed his legs, and looked calmly and sagely around him:--with his
 nostrils, however, he inhaled the air slowly and questioningly, like one
 who in new countries tasteth new foreign air. Afterward he began to sing
 with a kind of roaring.
 
 2.
 
 THE DESERTS GROW: WOE HIM WHO DOTH THEM HIDE!
 
      --Ha!
      Solemnly!
      In effect solemnly!
      A worthy beginning!
      Afric manner, solemnly!
      Of a lion worthy,
      Or perhaps of a virtuous howl-monkey--
      --But it's naught to you,
      Ye friendly damsels dearly loved,
      At whose own feet to me,
      The first occasion,
      To a European under palm-trees,
      A seat is now granted.  Selah.
 
      Wonderful, truly!
      Here do I sit now,
      The desert nigh, and yet I am
      So far still from the desert,
      Even in naught yet deserted:
      That is, I'm swallowed down
      By this the smallest oasis--:
      --It opened up just yawning,
      Its loveliest mouth agape,
      Most sweet-odoured of all mouthlets:
      Then fell I right in,
      Right down, right through--in 'mong you,
      Ye friendly damsels dearly loved!  Selah.
 
      Hail! hail! to that whale, fishlike,
      If it thus for its guest's convenience
      Made things nice!--(ye well know,
      Surely, my learned allusion?)
      Hail to its belly,
      If it had e'er
      A such loveliest oasis-belly
      As this is:  though however I doubt about it,
      --With this come I out of Old-Europe,
      That doubt'th more eagerly than doth any
      Elderly married woman.
      May the Lord improve it!
      Amen!
 
      Here do I sit now,
      In this the smallest oasis,
      Like a date indeed,
      Brown, quite sweet, gold-suppurating,
      For rounded mouth of maiden longing,
      But yet still more for youthful, maidlike,
      Ice-cold and snow-white and incisory
      Front teeth:  and for such assuredly,
      Pine the hearts all of ardent date-fruits.  Selah.
 
      To the there-named south-fruits now,
      Similar, all-too-similar,
      Do I lie here; by little
      Flying insects
      Round-sniffled and round-played,
      And also by yet littler,
      Foolisher, and peccabler
      Wishes and phantasies,--
      Environed by you,
      Ye silent, presentientest
      Maiden-kittens,
      Dudu and Suleika,
      --ROUNDSPHINXED, that into one word
      I may crowd much feeling:
      (Forgive me, O God,
      All such speech-sinning!)
      --Sit I here the best of air sniffling,
      Paradisal air, truly,
      Bright and buoyant air, golden-mottled,
      As goodly air as ever
      From lunar orb downfell--
      Be it by hazard,
      Or supervened it by arrogancy?
      As the ancient poets relate it.
      But doubter, I'm now calling it
      In question:  with this do I come indeed
      Out of Europe,
      That doubt'th more eagerly than doth any
      Elderly married woman.
      May the Lord improve it!
      Amen.
 
      This the finest air drinking,
      With nostrils out-swelled like goblets,
      Lacking future, lacking remembrances
      Thus do I sit here, ye
      Friendly damsels dearly loved,
      And look at the palm-tree there,
      How it, to a dance-girl, like,
      Doth bow and bend and on its haunches bob,
      --One doth it too, when one view'th it long!--
      To a dance-girl like, who as it seem'th to me,
      Too long, and dangerously persistent,
      Always, always, just on SINGLE leg hath stood?
      --Then forgot she thereby, as it seem'th to me,
      The OTHER leg?
      For vainly I, at least,
      Did search for the amissing
      Fellow-jewel
      --Namely, the other leg--
      In the sanctified precincts,
      Nigh her very dearest, very tenderest,
      Flapping and fluttering and flickering skirting.
      Yea, if ye should, ye beauteous friendly ones,
      Quite take my word:
      She hath, alas! LOST it!
      Hu!  Hu!  Hu!  Hu!  Hu!
      It is away!
      For ever away!
      The other leg!
      Oh, pity for that loveliest other leg!
      Where may it now tarry, all-forsaken weeping?
      The lonesomest leg?
      In fear perhaps before a
      Furious, yellow, blond and curled
      Leonine monster?  Or perhaps even
      Gnawed away, nibbled badly--
      Most wretched, woeful! woeful! nibbled badly!  Selah.
 
      Oh, weep ye not,
      Gentle spirits!
      Weep ye not, ye
      Date-fruit spirits!  Milk-bosoms!
      Ye sweetwood-heart
      Purselets!
      Weep ye no more,
      Pallid Dudu!
      Be a man, Suleika!  Bold!  Bold!
      --Or else should there perhaps
      Something strengthening, heart-strengthening,
      Here most proper be?
      Some inspiring text?
      Some solemn exhortation?--
      Ha!  Up now! honour!
      Moral honour!  European honour!
      Blow again, continue,
      Bellows-box of virtue!
      Ha!
      Once more thy roaring,
      Thy moral roaring!
      As a virtuous lion
      Nigh the daughters of deserts roaring!
      --For virtue's out-howl,
      Ye very dearest maidens,
      Is more than every
      European fervour, European hot-hunger!
      And now do I stand here,
      As European,
      I can't be different, God's help to me!
      Amen!
 
 THE DESERTS GROW: WOE HIM WHO DOTH THEM HIDE!
 
 
 
 
 LXXVII. THE AWAKENING.
 
 1.
 
 After the song of the wanderer and shadow, the cave became all at once
 full of noise and laughter: and since the assembled guests all spake
 simultaneously, and even the ass, encouraged thereby, no longer
 remained silent, a little aversion and scorn for his visitors came over
 Zarathustra, although he rejoiced at their gladness. For it seemed to
 him a sign of convalescence. So he slipped out into the open air and
 spake to his animals.
 
 "Whither hath their distress now gone?" said he, and already did he
 himself feel relieved of his petty disgust--"with me, it seemeth that
 they have unlearned their cries of distress!
 
 --Though, alas! not yet their crying." And Zarathustra stopped his
 ears, for just then did the YE-A of the ass mix strangely with the noisy
 jubilation of those higher men.
 
 "They are merry," he began again, "and who knoweth? perhaps at their
 host's expense; and if they have learned of me to laugh, still it is not
 MY laughter they have learned.
 
 But what matter about that! They are old people: they recover in their
 own way, they laugh in their own way; mine ears have already endured
 worse and have not become peevish.
 
 This day is a victory: he already yieldeth, he fleeth, THE SPIRIT OF
 GRAVITY, mine old arch-enemy! How well this day is about to end, which
 began so badly and gloomily!
 
 And it is ABOUT TO end. Already cometh the evening: over the sea
 rideth it hither, the good rider! How it bobbeth, the blessed one, the
 home-returning one, in its purple saddles!
 
 The sky gazeth brightly thereon, the world lieth deep. Oh, all ye
 strange ones who have come to me, it is already worth while to have
 lived with me!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra. And again came the cries and laughter of the
 higher men out of the cave: then began he anew:
 
 "They bite at it, my bait taketh, there departeth also from them their
 enemy, the spirit of gravity. Now do they learn to laugh at themselves:
 do I hear rightly?
 
 My virile food taketh effect, my strong and savoury sayings: and verily,
 I did not nourish them with flatulent vegetables! But with warrior-food,
 with conqueror-food: new desires did I awaken.
 
 New hopes are in their arms and legs, their hearts expand. They find new
 words, soon will their spirits breathe wantonness.
 
 Such food may sure enough not be proper for children, nor even for
 longing girls old and young. One persuadeth their bowels otherwise; I am
 not their physician and teacher.
 
 The DISGUST departeth from these higher men; well! that is my victory.
 In my domain they become assured; all stupid shame fleeth away; they
 empty themselves.
 
 They empty their hearts, good times return unto them, they keep holiday
 and ruminate,--they become THANKFUL.
 
 THAT do I take as the best sign: they become thankful. Not long will it
 be ere they devise festivals, and put up memorials to their old joys.
 
 They are CONVALESCENTS!" Thus spake Zarathustra joyfully to his heart
 and gazed outward; his animals, however, pressed up to him, and honoured
 his happiness and his silence.
 
 2.
 
 All on a sudden however, Zarathustra's ear was frightened: for the cave
 which had hitherto been full of noise and laughter, became all at once
 still as death;--his nose, however, smelt a sweet-scented vapour and
 incense-odour, as if from burning pine-cones.
 
 "What happeneth? What are they about?" he asked himself, and stole up
 to the entrance, that he might be able unobserved to see his guests.
 But wonder upon wonder! what was he then obliged to behold with his own
 eyes!
 
 "They have all of them become PIOUS again, they PRAY, they are
 mad!"--said he, and was astonished beyond measure. And forsooth! all
 these higher men, the two kings, the pope out of service, the evil
 magician, the voluntary beggar, the wanderer and shadow, the old
 soothsayer, the spiritually conscientious one, and the ugliest man--they
 all lay on their knees like children and credulous old women, and
 worshipped the ass. And just then began the ugliest man to gurgle and
 snort, as if something unutterable in him tried to find expression;
 when, however, he had actually found words, behold! it was a pious,
 strange litany in praise of the adored and censed ass. And the litany
 sounded thus:
 
 Amen! And glory and honour and wisdom and thanks and praise and strength
 be to our God, from everlasting to everlasting!
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 He carrieth our burdens, he hath taken upon him the form of a servant,
 he is patient of heart and never saith Nay; and he who loveth his God
 chastiseth him.
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 He speaketh not: except that he ever saith Yea to the world which
 he created: thus doth he extol his world. It is his artfulness that
 speaketh not: thus is he rarely found wrong.
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 Uncomely goeth he through the world. Grey is the favourite colour in
 which he wrappeth his virtue. Hath he spirit, then doth he conceal it;
 every one, however, believeth in his long ears.
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 What hidden wisdom it is to wear long ears, and only to say Yea and
 never Nay! Hath he not created the world in his own image, namely, as
 stupid as possible?
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 Thou goest straight and crooked ways; it concerneth thee little what
 seemeth straight or crooked unto us men. Beyond good and evil is thy
 domain. It is thine innocence not to know what innocence is.
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 Lo! how thou spurnest none from thee, neither beggars nor kings. Thou
 sufferest little children to come unto thee, and when the bad boys decoy
 thee, then sayest thou simply, YE-A.
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 Thou lovest she-asses and fresh figs, thou art no food-despiser. A
 thistle tickleth thy heart when thou chancest to be hungry. There is the
 wisdom of a God therein.
 
 --The ass, however, here brayed YE-A.
 
 
 
 
 LXXVIII. THE ASS-FESTIVAL.
 
 1.
 
 At this place in the litany, however, Zarathustra could no longer
 control himself; he himself cried out YE-A, louder even than the ass,
 and sprang into the midst of his maddened guests. "Whatever are you
 about, ye grown-up children?" he exclaimed, pulling up the praying ones
 from the ground. "Alas, if any one else, except Zarathustra, had seen
 you:
 
 Every one would think you the worst blasphemers, or the very foolishest
 old women, with your new belief!
 
 And thou thyself, thou old pope, how is it in accordance with thee, to
 adore an ass in such a manner as God?"--
 
 "O Zarathustra," answered the pope, "forgive me, but in divine matters
 I am more enlightened even than thou. And it is right that it should be
 so.
 
 Better to adore God so, in this form, than in no form at all! Think over
 this saying, mine exalted friend: thou wilt readily divine that in such
 a saying there is wisdom.
 
 He who said 'God is a Spirit'--made the greatest stride and slide
 hitherto made on earth towards unbelief: such a dictum is not easily
 amended again on earth!
 
 Mine old heart leapeth and boundeth because there is still something
 to adore on earth. Forgive it, O Zarathustra, to an old, pious
 pontiff-heart!--"
 
 --"And thou," said Zarathustra to the wanderer and shadow, "thou callest
 and thinkest thyself a free spirit? And thou here practisest such
 idolatry and hierolatry?
 
 Worse verily, doest thou here than with thy bad brown girls, thou bad,
 new believer!"
 
 "It is sad enough," answered the wanderer and shadow, "thou art right:
 but how can I help it! The old God liveth again, O Zarathustra, thou
 mayst say what thou wilt.
 
 The ugliest man is to blame for it all: he hath reawakened him. And
 if he say that he once killed him, with Gods DEATH is always just a
 prejudice."
 
 --"And thou," said Zarathustra, "thou bad old magician, what didst thou
 do! Who ought to believe any longer in thee in this free age, when THOU
 believest in such divine donkeyism?
 
 It was a stupid thing that thou didst; how couldst thou, a shrewd man,
 do such a stupid thing!"
 
 "O Zarathustra," answered the shrewd magician, "thou art right, it was a
 stupid thing,--it was also repugnant to me."
 
 --"And thou even," said Zarathustra to the spiritually conscientious
 one, "consider, and put thy finger to thy nose! Doth nothing go against
 thy conscience here? Is thy spirit not too cleanly for this praying and
 the fumes of those devotees?"
 
 "There is something therein," said the spiritually conscientious one,
 and put his finger to his nose, "there is something in this spectacle
 which even doeth good to my conscience.
 
 Perhaps I dare not believe in God: certain it is however, that God
 seemeth to me most worthy of belief in this form.
 
 God is said to be eternal, according to the testimony of the most pious:
 he who hath so much time taketh his time. As slow and as stupid as
 possible: THEREBY can such a one nevertheless go very far.
 
 And he who hath too much spirit might well become infatuated with
 stupidity and folly. Think of thyself, O Zarathustra!
 
 Thou thyself--verily! even thou couldst well become an ass through
 superabundance of wisdom.
 
 Doth not the true sage willingly walk on the crookedest paths? The
 evidence teacheth it, O Zarathustra,--THINE OWN evidence!"
 
 --"And thou thyself, finally," said Zarathustra, and turned towards the
 ugliest man, who still lay on the ground stretching up his arm to the
 ass (for he gave it wine to drink). "Say, thou nondescript, what hast
 thou been about!
 
 Thou seemest to me transformed, thine eyes glow, the mantle of the
 sublime covereth thine ugliness: WHAT didst thou do?
 
 Is it then true what they say, that thou hast again awakened him? And
 why? Was he not for good reasons killed and made away with?
 
 Thou thyself seemest to me awakened: what didst thou do? why didst THOU
 turn round? Why didst THOU get converted? Speak, thou nondescript!"
 
 "O Zarathustra," answered the ugliest man, "thou art a rogue!
 
 Whether HE yet liveth, or again liveth, or is thoroughly dead--which of
 us both knoweth that best? I ask thee.
 
 One thing however do I know,--from thyself did I learn it once, O
 Zarathustra: he who wanteth to kill most thoroughly, LAUGHETH.
 
 'Not by wrath but by laughter doth one kill'--thus spakest thou once,
 O Zarathustra, thou hidden one, thou destroyer without wrath, thou
 dangerous saint,--thou art a rogue!"
 
 2.
 
 Then, however, did it come to pass that Zarathustra, astonished at such
 merely roguish answers, jumped back to the door of his cave, and turning
 towards all his guests, cried out with a strong voice:
 
 "O ye wags, all of you, ye buffoons! Why do ye dissemble and disguise
 yourselves before me!
 
 How the hearts of all of you convulsed with delight and wickedness,
 because ye had at last become again like little children--namely,
 pious,--
 
 --Because ye at last did again as children do--namely, prayed, folded
 your hands and said 'good God'!
 
 But now leave, I pray you, THIS nursery, mine own cave, where to-day
 all childishness is carried on. Cool down, here outside, your hot
 child-wantonness and heart-tumult!
 
 To be sure: except ye become as little children ye shall not enter into
 THAT kingdom of heaven." (And Zarathustra pointed aloft with his hands.)
 
 "But we do not at all want to enter into the kingdom of heaven: we have
 become men,--SO WE WANT THE KINGDOM OF EARTH."
 
 3.
 
 And once more began Zarathustra to speak. "O my new friends," said he,--
 "ye strange ones, ye higher men, how well do ye now please me,--
 
 --Since ye have again become joyful! Ye have, verily, all blossomed
 forth: it seemeth to me that for such flowers as you, NEW FESTIVALS are
 required.
 
 --A little valiant nonsense, some divine service and ass-festival, some
 old joyful Zarathustra fool, some blusterer to blow your souls bright.
 
 Forget not this night and this ass-festival, ye higher men! THAT did ye
 devise when with me, that do I take as a good omen,--such things only
 the convalescents devise!
 
 And should ye celebrate it again, this ass-festival, do it from love to
 yourselves, do it also from love to me! And in remembrance of me!"
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra.
 
 
 
 
 LXXIX. THE DRUNKEN SONG.
 
 1.
 
 Meanwhile one after another had gone out into the open air, and into the
 cool, thoughtful night; Zarathustra himself, however, led the ugliest
 man by the hand, that he might show him his night-world, and the great
 round moon, and the silvery water-falls near his cave. There they at
 last stood still beside one another; all of them old people, but with
 comforted, brave hearts, and astonished in themselves that it was so
 well with them on earth; the mystery of the night, however, came nigher
 and nigher to their hearts. And anew Zarathustra thought to himself:
 "Oh, how well do they now please me, these higher men!"--but he did not
 say it aloud, for he respected their happiness and their silence.--
 
 Then, however, there happened that which in this astonishing long day
 was most astonishing: the ugliest man began once more and for the last
 time to gurgle and snort, and when he had at length found expression,
 behold! there sprang a question plump and plain out of his mouth, a
 good, deep, clear question, which moved the hearts of all who listened
 to him.
 
 "My friends, all of you," said the ugliest man, "what think ye? For the
 sake of this day--_I_ am for the first time content to have lived mine
 entire life.
 
 And that I testify so much is still not enough for me. It is worth while
 living on the earth: one day, one festival with Zarathustra, hath taught
 me to love the earth.
 
 'Was THAT--life?' will I say unto death. 'Well! Once more!'
 
 My friends, what think ye? Will ye not, like me, say unto death: 'Was
 THAT--life? For the sake of Zarathustra, well! Once more!'"--
 
 Thus spake the ugliest man; it was not, however, far from midnight.
 And what took place then, think ye? As soon as the higher men heard his
 question, they became all at once conscious of their transformation and
 convalescence, and of him who was the cause thereof: then did they rush
 up to Zarathustra, thanking, honouring, caressing him, and kissing his
 hands, each in his own peculiar way; so that some laughed and some wept.
 The old soothsayer, however, danced with delight; and though he was
 then, as some narrators suppose, full of sweet wine, he was certainly
 still fuller of sweet life, and had renounced all weariness. There are
 even those who narrate that the ass then danced: for not in vain had the
 ugliest man previously given it wine to drink. That may be the case, or
 it may be otherwise; and if in truth the ass did not dance that evening,
 there nevertheless happened then greater and rarer wonders than
 the dancing of an ass would have been. In short, as the proverb of
 Zarathustra saith: "What doth it matter!"
 
 2.
 
 When, however, this took place with the ugliest man, Zarathustra stood
 there like one drunken: his glance dulled, his tongue faltered and his
 feet staggered. And who could divine what thoughts then passed through
 Zarathustra's soul? Apparently, however, his spirit retreated and fled
 in advance and was in remote distances, and as it were "wandering on
 high mountain-ridges," as it standeth written, "'twixt two seas,
 
 --Wandering 'twixt the past and the future as a heavy cloud." Gradually,
 however, while the higher men held him in their arms, he came back to
 himself a little, and resisted with his hands the crowd of the honouring
 and caring ones; but he did not speak. All at once, however, he turned
 his head quickly, for he seemed to hear something: then laid he his
 finger on his mouth and said: "COME!"
 
 And immediately it became still and mysterious round about; from
 the depth however there came up slowly the sound of a clock-bell.
 Zarathustra listened thereto, like the higher men; then, however, laid
 he his finger on his mouth the second time, and said again: "COME! COME!
 IT IS GETTING ON TO MIDNIGHT!"--and his voice had changed. But still
 he had not moved from the spot. Then it became yet stiller and more
 mysterious, and everything hearkened, even the ass, and Zarathustra's
 noble animals, the eagle and the serpent,--likewise the cave of
 Zarathustra and the big cool moon, and the night itself. Zarathustra,
 however, laid his hand upon his mouth for the third time, and said:
 
 COME! COME! COME! LET US NOW WANDER! IT IS THE HOUR: LET US WANDER INTO
 THE NIGHT!
 
 3.
 
 Ye higher men, it is getting on to midnight: then will I say something
 into your ears, as that old clock-bell saith it into mine ear,--
 
 --As mysteriously, as frightfully, and as cordially as that midnight
 clock-bell speaketh it to me, which hath experienced more than one man:
 
 --Which hath already counted the smarting throbbings of your fathers'
 hearts--ah! ah! how it sigheth! how it laugheth in its dream! the old,
 deep, deep midnight!
 
 Hush! Hush! Then is there many a thing heard which may not be heard
 by day; now however, in the cool air, when even all the tumult of your
 hearts hath become still,--
 
 --Now doth it speak, now is it heard, now doth it steal into
 overwakeful, nocturnal souls: ah! ah! how the midnight sigheth! how it
 laugheth in its dream!
 
 --Hearest thou not how it mysteriously, frightfully, and cordially
 speaketh unto THEE, the old deep, deep midnight?
 
 O MAN, TAKE HEED!
 
 4.
 
 Woe to me! Whither hath time gone? Have I not sunk into deep wells? The
 world sleepeth--
 
 Ah! Ah! The dog howleth, the moon shineth. Rather will I die, rather
 will I die, than say unto you what my midnight-heart now thinketh.
 
 Already have I died. It is all over. Spider, why spinnest thou around
 me? Wilt thou have blood? Ah! Ah! The dew falleth, the hour cometh--
 
 --The hour in which I frost and freeze, which asketh and asketh and
 asketh: "Who hath sufficient courage for it?
 
 --Who is to be master of the world? Who is going to say: THUS shall ye
 flow, ye great and small streams!"
 
 --The hour approacheth: O man, thou higher man, take heed! this talk is
 for fine ears, for thine ears--WHAT SAITH DEEP MIDNIGHT'S VOICE INDEED?
 
 5.
 
 It carrieth me away, my soul danceth. Day's-work! Day's-work! Who is to
 be master of the world?
 
 The moon is cool, the wind is still. Ah! Ah! Have ye already flown high
 enough? Ye have danced: a leg, nevertheless, is not a wing.
 
 Ye good dancers, now is all delight over: wine hath become lees, every
 cup hath become brittle, the sepulchres mutter.
 
 Ye have not flown high enough: now do the sepulchres mutter: "Free the
 dead! Why is it so long night? Doth not the moon make us drunken?"
 
 Ye higher men, free the sepulchres, awaken the corpses! Ah, why doth the
 worm still burrow? There approacheth, there approacheth, the hour,--
 
 --There boometh the clock-bell, there thrilleth still the heart, there
 burroweth still the wood-worm, the heart-worm. Ah! Ah! THE WORLD IS
 DEEP!
 
 6.
 
 Sweet lyre! Sweet lyre! I love thy tone, thy drunken, ranunculine
 tone!--how long, how far hath come unto me thy tone, from the distance,
 from the ponds of love!
 
 Thou old clock-bell, thou sweet lyre! Every pain hath torn thy heart,
 father-pain, fathers'-pain, forefathers'-pain; thy speech hath become
 ripe,--
 
 --Ripe like the golden autumn and the afternoon, like mine anchorite
 heart--now sayest thou: The world itself hath become ripe, the grape
 turneth brown,
 
 --Now doth it wish to die, to die of happiness. Ye higher men, do ye not
 feel it? There welleth up mysteriously an odour,
 
 --A perfume and odour of eternity, a rosy-blessed, brown,
 gold-wine-odour of old happiness,
 
 --Of drunken midnight-death happiness, which singeth: the world is deep,
 AND DEEPER THAN THE DAY COULD READ!
 
 7.
 
 Leave me alone! Leave me alone! I am too pure for thee. Touch me not!
 Hath not my world just now become perfect?
 
 My skin is too pure for thy hands. Leave me alone, thou dull, doltish,
 stupid day! Is not the midnight brighter?
 
 The purest are to be masters of the world, the least known, the
 strongest, the midnight-souls, who are brighter and deeper than any day.
 
 O day, thou gropest for me? Thou feelest for my happiness? For thee am I
 rich, lonesome, a treasure-pit, a gold chamber?
 
 O world, thou wantest ME? Am I worldly for thee? Am I spiritual for
 thee? Am I divine for thee? But day and world, ye are too coarse,--
 
 --Have cleverer hands, grasp after deeper happiness, after deeper
 unhappiness, grasp after some God; grasp not after me:
 
 --Mine unhappiness, my happiness is deep, thou strange day, but yet am I
 no God, no God's-hell: DEEP IS ITS WOE.
 
 8.
 
 God's woe is deeper, thou strange world! Grasp at God's woe, not at me!
 What am I! A drunken sweet lyre,--
 
 --A midnight-lyre, a bell-frog, which no one understandeth, but which
 MUST speak before deaf ones, ye higher men! For ye do not understand me!
 
 Gone! Gone! O youth! O noontide! O afternoon! Now have come evening and
 night and midnight,--the dog howleth, the wind:
 
 --Is the wind not a dog? It whineth, it barketh, it howleth. Ah! Ah!
 how she sigheth! how she laugheth, how she wheezeth and panteth, the
 midnight!
 
 How she just now speaketh soberly, this drunken poetess! hath she
 perhaps overdrunk her drunkenness? hath she become overawake? doth she
 ruminate?
 
 --Her woe doth she ruminate over, in a dream, the old, deep
 midnight--and still more her joy. For joy, although woe be deep, JOY IS
 DEEPER STILL THAN GRIEF CAN BE.
 
 9.
 
 Thou grape-vine! Why dost thou praise me? Have I not cut thee! I am
 cruel, thou bleedest--: what meaneth thy praise of my drunken cruelty?
 
 "Whatever hath become perfect, everything mature--wanteth to die!" so
 sayest thou. Blessed, blessed be the vintner's knife! But everything
 immature wanteth to live: alas!
 
 Woe saith: "Hence! Go! Away, thou woe!" But everything that suffereth
 wanteth to live, that it may become mature and lively and longing,
 
 --Longing for the further, the higher, the brighter. "I want heirs,"
 so saith everything that suffereth, "I want children, I do not want
 MYSELF,"--
 
 Joy, however, doth not want heirs, it doth not want children,--joy
 wanteth itself, it wanteth eternity, it wanteth recurrence, it wanteth
 everything eternally-like-itself.
 
 Woe saith: "Break, bleed, thou heart! Wander, thou leg! Thou wing, fly!
 Onward! upward! thou pain!" Well! Cheer up! O mine old heart: WOE SAITH:
 "HENCE! GO!"
 
 10.
 
 Ye higher men, what think ye? Am I a soothsayer? Or a dreamer? Or a
 drunkard? Or a dream-reader? Or a midnight-bell?
 
 Or a drop of dew? Or a fume and fragrance of eternity? Hear ye it not?
 Smell ye it not? Just now hath my world become perfect, midnight is also
 mid-day,--
 
 Pain is also a joy, curse is also a blessing, night is also a sun,--go
 away! or ye will learn that a sage is also a fool.
 
 Said ye ever Yea to one joy? O my friends, then said ye Yea also unto
 ALL woe. All things are enlinked, enlaced and enamoured,--
 
 --Wanted ye ever once to come twice; said ye ever: "Thou pleasest me,
 happiness! Instant! Moment!" then wanted ye ALL to come back again!
 
 --All anew, all eternal, all enlinked, enlaced and enamoured, Oh, then
 did ye LOVE the world,--
 
 --Ye eternal ones, ye love it eternally and for all time: and also unto
 woe do ye say: Hence! Go! but come back! FOR JOYS ALL WANT--ETERNITY!
 
 11.
 
 All joy wanteth the eternity of all things, it wanteth honey, it
 wanteth lees, it wanteth drunken midnight, it wanteth graves, it wanteth
 grave-tears' consolation, it wanteth gilded evening-red--
 
 --WHAT doth not joy want! it is thirstier, heartier, hungrier, more
 frightful, more mysterious, than all woe: it wanteth ITSELF, it biteth
 into ITSELF, the ring's will writheth in it,--
 
 --It wanteth love, it wanteth hate, it is over-rich, it bestoweth, it
 throweth away, it beggeth for some one to take from it, it thanketh the
 taker, it would fain be hated,--
 
 --So rich is joy that it thirsteth for woe, for hell, for hate, for
 shame, for the lame, for the WORLD,--for this world, Oh, ye know it
 indeed!
 
 Ye higher men, for you doth it long, this joy, this irrepressible,
 blessed joy--for your woe, ye failures! For failures, longeth all
 eternal joy.
 
 For joys all want themselves, therefore do they also want grief! O
 happiness, O pain! Oh break, thou heart! Ye higher men, do learn it,
 that joys want eternity.
 
 --Joys want the eternity of ALL things, they WANT DEEP, PROFOUND
 ETERNITY!
 
 12.
 
 Have ye now learned my song? Have ye divined what it would say? Well!
 Cheer up! Ye higher men, sing now my roundelay!
 
 Sing now yourselves the song, the name of which is "Once more," the
 signification of which is "Unto all eternity!"--sing, ye higher men,
 Zarathustra's roundelay!
 
      O man!  Take heed!
      What saith deep midnight's voice indeed?
      "I slept my sleep--,
      "From deepest dream I've woke, and plead:--
      "The world is deep,
      "And deeper than the day could read.
      "Deep is its woe--,
      "Joy--deeper still than grief can be:
      "Woe saith:  Hence!  Go!
      "But joys all want eternity-,
      "-Want deep, profound eternity!"
 
 
 
 
 LXXX. THE SIGN.
 
 In the morning, however, after this night, Zarathustra jumped up from
 his couch, and, having girded his loins, he came out of his cave glowing
 and strong, like a morning sun coming out of gloomy mountains.
 
 "Thou great star," spake he, as he had spoken once before, "thou deep
 eye of happiness, what would be all thy happiness if thou hadst not
 THOSE for whom thou shinest!
 
 And if they remained in their chambers whilst thou art already awake,
 and comest and bestowest and distributest, how would thy proud modesty
 upbraid for it!
 
 Well! they still sleep, these higher men, whilst _I_ am awake: THEY are
 not my proper companions! Not for them do I wait here in my mountains.
 
 At my work I want to be, at my day: but they understand not what are the
 signs of my morning, my step--is not for them the awakening-call.
 
 They still sleep in my cave; their dream still drinketh at my drunken
 songs. The audient ear for ME--the OBEDIENT ear, is yet lacking in their
 limbs."
 
 --This had Zarathustra spoken to his heart when the sun arose: then
 looked he inquiringly aloft, for he heard above him the sharp call of
 his eagle. "Well!" called he upwards, "thus is it pleasing and proper to
 me. Mine animals are awake, for I am awake.
 
 Mine eagle is awake, and like me honoureth the sun. With eagle-talons
 doth it grasp at the new light. Ye are my proper animals; I love you.
 
 But still do I lack my proper men!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra; then, however, it happened that all on a sudden
 he became aware that he was flocked around and fluttered around, as if
 by innumerable birds,--the whizzing of so many wings, however, and the
 crowding around his head was so great that he shut his eyes. And verily,
 there came down upon him as it were a cloud, like a cloud of arrows
 which poureth upon a new enemy. But behold, here it was a cloud of love,
 and showered upon a new friend.
 
 "What happeneth unto me?" thought Zarathustra in his astonished heart,
 and slowly seated himself on the big stone which lay close to the exit
 from his cave. But while he grasped about with his hands, around him,
 above him and below him, and repelled the tender birds, behold, there
 then happened to him something still stranger: for he grasped thereby
 unawares into a mass of thick, warm, shaggy hair; at the same time,
 however, there sounded before him a roar,--a long, soft lion-roar.
 
 "THE SIGN COMETH," said Zarathustra, and a change came over his heart.
 And in truth, when it turned clear before him, there lay a yellow,
 powerful animal at his feet, resting its head on his knee,--unwilling to
 leave him out of love, and doing like a dog which again findeth its old
 master. The doves, however, were no less eager with their love than the
 lion; and whenever a dove whisked over its nose, the lion shook its head
 and wondered and laughed.
 
 When all this went on Zarathustra spake only a word: "MY CHILDREN ARE
 NIGH, MY CHILDREN"--, then he became quite mute. His heart, however,
 was loosed, and from his eyes there dropped down tears and fell upon
 his hands. And he took no further notice of anything, but sat there
 motionless, without repelling the animals further. Then flew the doves
 to and fro, and perched on his shoulder, and caressed his white hair,
 and did not tire of their tenderness and joyousness. The strong lion,
 however, licked always the tears that fell on Zarathustra's hands, and
 roared and growled shyly. Thus did these animals do.--
 
 All this went on for a long time, or a short time: for properly
 speaking, there is NO time on earth for such things--. Meanwhile,
 however, the higher men had awakened in Zarathustra's cave, and
 marshalled themselves for a procession to go to meet Zarathustra, and
 give him their morning greeting: for they had found when they awakened
 that he no longer tarried with them. When, however, they reached the
 door of the cave and the noise of their steps had preceded them, the
 lion started violently; it turned away all at once from Zarathustra, and
 roaring wildly, sprang towards the cave. The higher men, however, when
 they heard the lion roaring, cried all aloud as with one voice, fled
 back and vanished in an instant.
 
 Zarathustra himself, however, stunned and strange, rose from his seat,
 looked around him, stood there astonished, inquired of his heart,
 bethought himself, and remained alone. "What did I hear?" said he at
 last, slowly, "what happened unto me just now?"
 
 But soon there came to him his recollection, and he took in at a glance
 all that had taken place between yesterday and to-day. "Here is indeed
 the stone," said he, and stroked his beard, "on IT sat I yester-morn;
 and here came the soothsayer unto me, and here heard I first the cry
 which I heard just now, the great cry of distress.
 
 O ye higher men, YOUR distress was it that the old soothsayer foretold
 to me yester-morn,--
 
 --Unto your distress did he want to seduce and tempt me: 'O
 Zarathustra,' said he to me, 'I come to seduce thee to thy last sin.'
 
 To my last sin?" cried Zarathustra, and laughed angrily at his own
 words: "WHAT hath been reserved for me as my last sin?"
 
 --And once more Zarathustra became absorbed in himself, and sat down
 again on the big stone and meditated. Suddenly he sprang up,--
 
 "FELLOW-SUFFERING! FELLOW-SUFFERING WITH THE HIGHER MEN!" he cried out,
 and his countenance changed into brass. "Well! THAT--hath had its time!
 
 My suffering and my fellow-suffering--what matter about them! Do I then
 strive after HAPPINESS? I strive after my WORK!
 
 Well! The lion hath come, my children are nigh, Zarathustra hath grown
 ripe, mine hour hath come:--
 
 This is MY morning, MY day beginneth: ARISE NOW, ARISE, THOU GREAT
 NOONTIDE!"--
 
 Thus spake Zarathustra and left his cave, glowing and strong, like a
 morning sun coming out of gloomy mountains.
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX.
 
 NOTES ON "THUS SPAKE ZARATHUSTRA" BY ANTHONY M. LUDOVICI.
 
 I have had some opportunities of studying the conditions under which
 Nietzsche is read in Germany, France, and England, and I have found
 that, in each of these countries, students of his philosophy, as if
 actuated by precisely similar motives and desires, and misled by the
 same mistaken tactics on the part of most publishers, all proceed in the
 same happy-go-lucky style when "taking him up." They have had it said to
 them that he wrote without any system, and they very naturally conclude
 that it does not matter in the least whether they begin with his first,
 third, or last book, provided they can obtain a few vague ideas as to
 what his leading and most sensational principles were.
 
 Now, it is clear that the book with the most mysterious, startling, or
 suggestive title, will always stand the best chance of being purchased
 by those who have no other criteria to guide them in their choice
 than the aspect of a title-page; and this explains why "Thus Spake
 Zarathustra" is almost always the first and often the only one of
 Nietzsche's books that falls into the hands of the uninitiated.
 
 The title suggests all kinds of mysteries; a glance at the
 chapter-headings quickly confirms the suspicions already aroused,
 and the sub-title: "A Book for All and None", generally succeeds in
 dissipating the last doubts the prospective purchaser may entertain
 concerning his fitness for the book or its fitness for him. And what
 happens?
 
 "Thus Spake Zarathustra" is taken home; the reader, who perchance may
 know no more concerning Nietzsche than a magazine article has told him,
 tries to read it and, understanding less than half he reads, probably
 never gets further than the second or third part,--and then only to feel
 convinced that Nietzsche himself was "rather hazy" as to what he was
 talking about. Such chapters as "The Child with the Mirror", "In the
 Happy Isles", "The Grave-Song," "Immaculate Perception," "The Stillest
 Hour", "The Seven Seals", and many others, are almost utterly devoid of
 meaning to all those who do not know something of Nietzsche's life, his
 aims and his friendships.
 
 As a matter of fact, "Thus Spake Zarathustra", though it is
 unquestionably Nietzsche's opus magnum, is by no means the first of
 Nietzsche's works that the beginner ought to undertake to read. The
 author himself refers to it as the deepest work ever offered to the
 German public, and elsewhere speaks of his other writings as being
 necessary for the understanding of it. But when it is remembered that
 in Zarathustra we not only have the history of his most intimate
 experiences, friendships, feuds, disappointments, triumphs and the like,
 but that the very form in which they are narrated is one which tends
 rather to obscure than to throw light upon them, the difficulties which
 meet the reader who starts quite unprepared will be seen to be really
 formidable.
 
 Zarathustra, then,--this shadowy, allegorical personality, speaking in
 allegories and parables, and at times not even refraining from relating
 his own dreams--is a figure we can understand but very imperfectly if we
 have no knowledge of his creator and counterpart, Friedrich Nietzsche;
 and it were therefore well, previous to our study of the more abstruse
 parts of this book, if we were to turn to some authoritative book on
 Nietzsche's life and works and to read all that is there said on the
 subject. Those who can read German will find an excellent guide, in this
 respect, in Frau Foerster-Nietzsche's exhaustive and highly interesting
 biography of her brother: "Das Leben Friedrich Nietzsche's" (published
 by Naumann); while the works of Deussen, Raoul Richter, and Baroness
 Isabelle von Unger-Sternberg, will be found to throw useful and
 necessary light upon many questions which it would be difficult for a
 sister to touch upon.
 
 In regard to the actual philosophical views expounded in this work,
 there is an excellent way of clearing up any difficulties they may
 present, and that is by an appeal to Nietzsche's other works. Again and
 again, of course, he will be found to express himself so clearly that
 all reference to his other writings may be dispensed with; but where
 this is not the case, the advice he himself gives is after all the best
 to be followed here, viz.:--to regard such works as: "Joyful Science",
 "Beyond Good and Evil", "The Genealogy of Morals", "The Twilight of
 the Idols", "The Antichrist", "The Will to Power", etc., etc., as the
 necessary preparation for "Thus Spake Zarathustra".
 
 These directions, though they are by no means simple to carry out, seem
 at least to possess the quality of definiteness and straightforwardness.
 "Follow them and all will be clear," I seem to imply. But I regret to
 say that this is not really the case. For my experience tells me that
 even after the above directions have been followed with the greatest
 possible zeal, the student will still halt in perplexity before certain
 passages in the book before us, and wonder what they mean. Now, it is
 with the view of giving a little additional help to all those who find
 themselves in this position that I proceed to put forth my own personal
 interpretation of the more abstruse passages in this work.
 
 In offering this little commentary to the Nietzsche student, I should
 like it to be understood that I make no claim as to its infallibility or
 indispensability. It represents but an attempt on my part--a very feeble
 one perhaps--to give the reader what little help I can in surmounting
 difficulties which a long study of Nietzsche's life and works has
 enabled me, partially I hope, to overcome.
 
 ...
 
 Perhaps it would be as well to start out with a broad and rapid sketch
 of Nietzsche as a writer on Morals, Evolution, and Sociology, so that
 the reader may be prepared to pick out for himself, so to speak, all
 passages in this work bearing in any way upon Nietzsche's views in those
 three important branches of knowledge.
 
 (A.) Nietzsche and Morality.
 
 In morality, Nietzsche starts out by adopting the position of the
 relativist. He says there are no absolute values "good" and "evil";
 these are mere means adopted by all in order to acquire power to
 maintain their place in the world, or to become supreme. It is the
 lion's good to devour an antelope. It is the dead-leaf butterfly's
 good to tell a foe a falsehood. For when the dead-leaf butterfly is in
 danger, it clings to the side of a twig, and what it says to its foe is
 practically this: "I am not a butterfly, I am a dead leaf, and can be
 of no use to thee." This is a lie which is good to the butterfly, for
 it preserves it. In nature every species of organic being instinctively
 adopts and practises those acts which most conduce to the prevalence
 or supremacy of its kind. Once the most favourable order of conduct is
 found, proved efficient and established, it becomes the ruling morality
 of the species that adopts it and bears them along to victory. All
 species must not and cannot value alike, for what is the lion's good is
 the antelope's evil and vice versa.
 
 Concepts of good and evil are therefore, in their origin, merely a means
 to an end, they are expedients for acquiring power.
 
 Applying this principle to mankind, Nietzsche attacked Christian
 moral values. He declared them to be, like all other morals, merely
 an expedient for protecting a certain type of man. In the case of
 Christianity this type was, according to Nietzsche, a low one.
 
 Conflicting moral codes have been no more than the conflicting weapons
 of different classes of men; for in mankind there is a continual war
 between the powerful, the noble, the strong, and the well-constituted
 on the one side, and the impotent, the mean, the weak, and the
 ill-constituted on the other. The war is a war of moral principles.
 The morality of the powerful class, Nietzsche calls NOBLE- or
 MASTER-MORALITY; that of the weak and subordinate class he calls
 SLAVE-MORALITY. In the first morality it is the eagle which, looking
 down upon a browsing lamb, contends that "eating lamb is good." In the
 second, the slave-morality, it is the lamb which, looking up from the
 sward, bleats dissentingly: "Eating lamb is evil."
 
 (B.) The Master- and Slave-Morality Compared.
 
 The first morality is active, creative, Dionysian. The second is
 passive, defensive,--to it belongs the "struggle for existence."
 
 Where attempts have not been made to reconcile the two moralities, they
 may be described as follows:--All is GOOD in the noble morality which
 proceeds from strength, power, health, well-constitutedness, happiness,
 and awfulness; for, the motive force behind the people practising it is
 "the struggle for power." The antithesis "good and bad" to this
 first class means the same as "noble" and "despicable." "Bad" in the
 master-morality must be applied to the coward, to all acts that spring
 from weakness, to the man with "an eye to the main chance," who would
 forsake everything in order to live.
 
 With the second, the slave-morality, the case is different. There,
 inasmuch as the community is an oppressed, suffering, unemancipated, and
 weary one, all THAT will be held to be good which alleviates the
 state of suffering. Pity, the obliging hand, the warm heart, patience,
 industry, and humility--these are unquestionably the qualities we shall
 here find flooded with the light of approval and admiration; because
 they are the most USEFUL qualities--; they make life endurable, they are
 of assistance in the "struggle for existence" which is the motive force
 behind the people practising this morality. To this class, all that is
 AWFUL is bad, in fact it is THE evil par excellence. Strength, health,
 superabundance of animal spirits and power, are regarded with hate,
 suspicion, and fear by the subordinate class.
 
 Now Nietzsche believed that the first or the noble-morality conduced to
 an ascent in the line of life; because it was creative and active. On
 the other hand, he believed that the second or slave-morality, where
 it became paramount, led to degeneration, because it was passive and
 defensive, wanting merely to keep those who practised it alive. Hence
 his earnest advocacy of noble-morality.
 
 (C.) Nietzsche and Evolution.
 
 Nietzsche as an evolutionist I shall have occasion to define and discuss
 in the course of these notes (see Notes on Chapter LVI., par.10, and on
 Chapter LVII.). For the present let it suffice for us to know that he
 accepted the "Development Hypothesis" as an explanation of the origin of
 species: but he did not halt where most naturalists have halted. He
 by no means regarded man as the highest possible being which evolution
 could arrive at; for though his physical development may have reached
 its limit, this is not the case with his mental or spiritual attributes.
 If the process be a fact; if things have BECOME what they are, then, he
 contends, we may describe no limit to man's aspirations. If he struggled
 up from barbarism, and still more remotely from the lower Primates,
 his ideal should be to surpass man himself and reach Superman (see
 especially the Prologue).
 
 (D.) Nietzsche and Sociology.
 
 Nietzsche as a sociologist aims at an aristocratic arrangement of
 society. He would have us rear an ideal race. Honest and truthful in
 intellectual matters, he could not even think that men are equal. "With
 these preachers of equality will I not be mixed up and confounded. For
 thus speaketh justice unto ME: 'Men are not equal.'" He sees precisely
 in this inequality a purpose to be served, a condition to be exploited.
 "Every elevation of the type 'man,'" he writes in "Beyond Good and
 Evil", "has hitherto been the work of an aristocratic society--and so
 will it always be--a society believing in a long scale of gradations of
 rank and differences of worth among human beings."
 
 Those who are sufficiently interested to desire to read his own detailed
 account of the society he would fain establish, will find an excellent
 passage in Aphorism 57 of "The Antichrist".
 
 ...
 
 PART I. THE PROLOGUE.
 
 In Part I. including the Prologue, no very great difficulties will
 appear. Zarathustra's habit of designating a whole class of men or a
 whole school of thought by a single fitting nickname may perhaps lead to
 a little confusion at first; but, as a rule, when the general drift
 of his arguments is grasped, it requires but a slight effort of the
 imagination to discover whom he is referring to. In the ninth paragraph
 of the Prologue, for instance, it is quite obvious that "Herdsmen" in
 the verse "Herdsmen, I say, etc., etc.," stands for all those to-day
 who are the advocates of gregariousness--of the ant-hill. And when our
 author says: "A robber shall Zarathustra be called by the herdsmen," it
 is clear that these words may be taken almost literally from one whose
 ideal was the rearing of a higher aristocracy. Again, "the good and
 just," throughout the book, is the expression used in referring to the
 self-righteous of modern times,--those who are quite sure that they
 know all that is to be known concerning good and evil, and are satisfied
 that the values their little world of tradition has handed down to them,
 are destined to rule mankind as long as it lasts.
 
 In the last paragraph of the Prologue, verse 7, Zarathustra gives us a
 foretaste of his teaching concerning the big and the little sagacities,
 expounded subsequently. He says he would he were as wise as his serpent;
 this desire will be found explained in the discourse entitled "The
 Despisers of the Body", which I shall have occasion to refer to later.
 
 ...
 
 THE DISCOURSES.
 
 Chapter I. The Three Metamorphoses.
 
 This opening discourse is a parable in which Zarathustra discloses the
 mental development of all creators of new values. It is the story of
 a life which reaches its consummation in attaining to a second
 ingenuousness or in returning to childhood. Nietzsche, the supposed
 anarchist, here plainly disclaims all relationship whatever to anarchy,
 for he shows us that only by bearing the burdens of the existing law and
 submitting to it patiently, as the camel submits to being laden, does
 the free spirit acquire that ascendancy over tradition which enables him
 to meet and master the dragon "Thou shalt,"--the dragon with the values
 of a thousand years glittering on its scales. There are two lessons in
 this discourse: first, that in order to create one must be as a little
 child; secondly, that it is only through existing law and order that
 one attains to that height from which new law and new order may be
 promulgated.
 
 Chapter II. The Academic Chairs of Virtue.
 
 Almost the whole of this is quite comprehensible. It is a discourse
 against all those who confound virtue with tameness and smug ease, and
 who regard as virtuous only that which promotes security and tends to
 deepen sleep.
 
 Chapter IV. The Despisers of the Body.
 
 Here Zarathustra gives names to the intellect and the instincts; he
 calls the one "the little sagacity" and the latter "the big sagacity."
 Schopenhauer's teaching concerning the intellect is fully endorsed here.
 "An instrument of thy body is also thy little sagacity, my brother,
 which thou callest 'spirit,'" says Zarathustra. From beginning to end it
 is a warning to those who would think too lightly of the instincts
 and unduly exalt the intellect and its derivatives: Reason and
 Understanding.
 
 Chapter IX. The Preachers of Death.
 
 This is an analysis of the psychology of all those who have the "evil
 eye" and are pessimists by virtue of their constitutions.
 
 Chapter XV. The Thousand and One Goals.
 
 In this discourse Zarathustra opens his exposition of the doctrine of
 relativity in morality, and declares all morality to be a mere means
 to power. Needless to say that verses 9, 10, 11, and 12 refer to the
 Greeks, the Persians, the Jews, and the Germans respectively. In the
 penultimate verse he makes known his discovery concerning the root of
 modern Nihilism and indifference,--i.e., that modern man has no goal, no
 aim, no ideals (see Note A).
 
 Chapter XVIII. Old and Young Women.
 
 Nietzsche's views on women have either to be loved at first sight
 or they become perhaps the greatest obstacle in the way of those who
 otherwise would be inclined to accept his philosophy. Women especially,
 of course, have been taught to dislike them, because it has been
 rumoured that his views are unfriendly to themselves. Now, to my mind,
 all this is pure misunderstanding and error.
 
 German philosophers, thanks to Schopenhauer, have earned rather a bad
 name for their views on women. It is almost impossible for one of them
 to write a line on the subject, however kindly he may do so, without
 being suspected of wishing to open a crusade against the fair sex.
 Despite the fact, therefore, that all Nietzsche's views in this respect
 were dictated to him by the profoundest love; despite Zarathustra's
 reservation in this discourse, that "with women nothing (that can be
 said) is impossible," and in the face of other overwhelming evidence
 to the contrary, Nietzsche is universally reported to have mis son
 pied dans le plat, where the female sex is concerned. And what is the
 fundamental doctrine which has given rise to so much bitterness and
 aversion?--Merely this: that the sexes are at bottom ANTAGONISTIC--that
 is to say, as different as blue is from yellow, and that the best
 possible means of rearing anything approaching a desirable race is to
 preserve and to foster this profound hostility. What Nietzsche strives
 to combat and to overthrow is the modern democratic tendency which is
 slowly labouring to level all things--even the sexes. His quarrel is not
 with women--what indeed could be more undignified?--it is with those who
 would destroy the natural relationship between the sexes, by modifying
 either the one or the other with a view to making them more alike. The
 human world is just as dependent upon women's powers as upon men's. It
 is women's strongest and most valuable instincts which help to determine
 who are to be the fathers of the next generation. By destroying these
 particular instincts, that is to say by attempting to masculinise woman,
 and to feminise men, we jeopardise the future of our people. The general
 democratic movement of modern times, in its frantic struggle to mitigate
 all differences, is now invading even the world of sex. It is against
 this movement that Nietzsche raises his voice; he would have woman
 become ever more woman and man become ever more man. Only thus, and
 he is undoubtedly right, can their combined instincts lead to the
 excellence of humanity. Regarded in this light, all his views on woman
 appear not only necessary but just (see Note on Chapter LVI., par. 21.)
 
 It is interesting to observe that the last line of the discourse, which
 has so frequently been used by women as a weapon against Nietzsche's
 views concerning them, was suggested to Nietzsche by a woman (see "Das
 Leben F. Nietzsche's").
 
 Chapter XXI. Voluntary Death.
 
 In regard to this discourse, I should only like to point out that
 Nietzsche had a particular aversion to the word "suicide"--self-murder.
 He disliked the evil it suggested, and in rechristening the act
 Voluntary Death, i.e., the death that comes from no other hand than
 one's own, he was desirous of elevating it to the position it held in
 classical antiquity (see Aphorism 36 in "The Twilight of the Idols").
 
 Chapter XXII. The Bestowing Virtue.
 
 An important aspect of Nietzsche's philosophy is brought to light in
 this discourse. His teaching, as is well known, places the Aristotelian
 man of spirit, above all others in the natural divisions of man. The
 man with overflowing strength, both of mind and body, who must discharge
 this strength or perish, is the Nietzschean ideal. To such a man, giving
 from his overflow becomes a necessity; bestowing develops into a means
 of existence, and this is the only giving, the only charity, that
 Nietzsche recognises. In paragraph 3 of the discourse, we read
 Zarathustra's healthy exhortation to his disciples to become independent
 thinkers and to find themselves before they learn any more from him (see
 Notes on Chapters LVI., par. 5, and LXXIII., pars. 10, 11).
 
 ...
 
 PART II.
 
 Chapter XXIII. The Child with the Mirror.
 
 Nietzsche tells us here, in a poetical form, how deeply grieved he was
 by the manifold misinterpretations and misunderstandings which were
 becoming rife concerning his publications. He does not recognise
 himself in the mirror of public opinion, and recoils terrified from the
 distorted reflection of his features. In verse 20 he gives us a
 hint which it were well not to pass over too lightly; for, in the
 introduction to "The Genealogy of Morals" (written in 1887) he finds it
 necessary to refer to the matter again and with greater precision. The
 point is this, that a creator of new values meets with his surest and
 strongest obstacles in the very spirit of the language which is at his
 disposal. Words, like all other manifestations of an evolving race, are
 stamped with the values that have long been paramount in that race.
 Now, the original thinker who finds himself compelled to use the current
 speech of his country in order to impart new and hitherto untried views
 to his fellows, imposes a task upon the natural means of communication
 which it is totally unfitted to perform,--hence the obscurities and
 prolixities which are so frequently met with in the writings of original
 thinkers. In the "Dawn of Day", Nietzsche actually cautions young
 writers against THE DANGER OF ALLOWING THEIR THOUGHTS TO BE MOULDED BY
 THE WORDS AT THEIR DISPOSAL.
 
 Chapter XXIV. In the Happy Isles.
 
 While writing this, Nietzsche is supposed to have been thinking of the
 island of Ischia which was ultimately destroyed by an earthquake. His
 teaching here is quite clear. He was among the first thinkers of Europe
 to overcome the pessimism which godlessness generally brings in its
 wake. He points to creating as the surest salvation from the suffering
 which is a concomitant of all higher life. "What would there be to
 create," he asks, "if there were--Gods?" His ideal, the Superman, lends
 him the cheerfulness necessary to the overcoming of that despair usually
 attendant upon godlessness and upon the apparent aimlessness of a world
 without a god.
 
 Chapter XXIX. The Tarantulas.
 
 The tarantulas are the Socialists and Democrats. This discourse offers
 us an analysis of their mental attitude. Nietzsche refuses to be
 confounded with those resentful and revengeful ones who condemn society
 FROM BELOW, and whose criticism is only suppressed envy. "There are
 those who preach my doctrine of life," he says of the Nietzschean
 Socialists, "and are at the same time preachers of equality and
 tarantulas" (see Notes on Chapter XL. and Chapter LI.).
 
 Chapter XXX. The Famous Wise Ones.
 
 This refers to all those philosophers hitherto, who have run in the
 harness of established values and have not risked their reputation with
 the people in pursuit of truth. The philosopher, however, as Nietzsche
 understood him, is a man who creates new values, and thus leads mankind
 in a new direction.
 
 Chapter XXXIII. The Grave-Song.
 
 Here Zarathustra sings about the ideals and friendships of his youth.
 Verses 27 to 31 undoubtedly refer to Richard Wagner (see Note on Chapter
 LXV.).
 
 Chapter XXXIV. Self-Surpassing.
 
 In this discourse we get the best exposition in the whole book of
 Nietzsche's doctrine of the Will to Power. I go into this question
 thoroughly in the Note on Chapter LVII.
 
 Nietzsche was not an iconoclast from choice. Those who hastily class him
 with the anarchists (or the Progressivists of the last century) fail
 to understand the high esteem in which he always held both law and
 discipline. In verse 41 of this most decisive discourse he truly
 explains his position when he says: "...he who hath to be a creator in
 good and evil--verily he hath first to be a destroyer, and break values
 in pieces." This teaching in regard to self-control is evidence enough
 of his reverence for law.
 
 Chapter XXXV. The Sublime Ones.
 
 These belong to a type which Nietzsche did not altogether dislike, but
 which he would fain have rendered more subtle and plastic. It is the
 type that takes life and itself too seriously, that never surmounts the
 camel-stage mentioned in the first discourse, and that is obdurately
 sublime and earnest. To be able to smile while speaking of lofty things
 and NOT TO BE OPPRESSED by them, is the secret of real greatness. He
 whose hand trembles when it lays hold of a beautiful thing, has the
 quality of reverence, without the artist's unembarrassed friendship
 with the beautiful. Hence the mistakes which have arisen in regard to
 confounding Nietzsche with his extreme opposites the anarchists and
 agitators. For what they dare to touch and break with the impudence
 and irreverence of the unappreciative, he seems likewise to touch and
 break,--but with other fingers--with the fingers of the loving and
 unembarrassed artist who is on good terms with the beautiful and who
 feels able to create it and to enhance it with his touch. The question
 of taste plays an important part in Nietzsche's philosophy, and verses
 9, 10 of this discourse exactly state Nietzsche's ultimate views on the
 subject. In the "Spirit of Gravity", he actually cries:--"Neither a good
 nor a bad taste, but MY taste, of which I have no longer either shame or
 secrecy."
 
 Chapter XXXVI. The Land of Culture.
 
 This is a poetical epitome of some of the scathing criticism of
 scholars which appears in the first of the "Thoughts out of Season"--the
 polemical pamphlet (written in 1873) against David Strauss and his
 school. He reproaches his former colleagues with being sterile and
 shows them that their sterility is the result of their not believing
 in anything. "He who had to create, had always his presaging dreams and
 astral premonitions--and believed in believing!" (See Note on Chapter
 LXXVII.) In the last two verses he reveals the nature of his altruism.
 How far it differs from that of Christianity we have already read in the
 discourse "Neighbour-Love", but here he tells us definitely the nature
 of his love to mankind; he explains why he was compelled to assail the
 Christian values of pity and excessive love of the neighbour, not only
 because they are slave-values and therefore tend to promote degeneration
 (see Note B.), but because he could only love his children's land, the
 undiscovered land in a remote sea; because he would fain retrieve the
 errors of his fathers in his children.
 
 Chapter XXXVII. Immaculate Perception.
 
 An important feature of Nietzsche's interpretation of Life is disclosed
 in this discourse. As Buckle suggests in his "Influence of Women on the
 Progress of Knowledge", the scientific spirit of the investigator is
 both helped and supplemented by the latter's emotions and personality,
 and the divorce of all emotionalism and individual temperament from
 science is a fatal step towards sterility. Zarathustra abjures all those
 who would fain turn an IMPERSONAL eye upon nature and contemplate her
 phenomena with that pure objectivity to which the scientific idealists
 of to-day would so much like to attain. He accuses such idealists of
 hypocrisy and guile; he says they lack innocence in their desires and
 therefore slander all desiring.
 
 Chapter XXXVIII. Scholars.
 
 This is a record of Nietzsche's final breach with his former
 colleagues--the scholars of Germany. Already after the publication of
 the "Birth of Tragedy", numbers of German philologists and professional
 philosophers had denounced him as one who had strayed too far from
 their flock, and his lectures at the University of Bale were deserted
 in consequence; but it was not until 1879, when he finally severed all
 connection with University work, that he may be said to have attained to
 the freedom and independence which stamp this discourse.
 
 Chapter XXXIX. Poets.
 
 People have sometimes said that Nietzsche had no sense of humour. I
 have no intention of defending him here against such foolish critics; I
 should only like to point out to the reader that we have him here at
 his best, poking fun at himself, and at his fellow-poets (see Note on
 Chapter LXIII., pars. 16, 17, 18, 19, 20).
 
 Chapter XL. Great Events.
 
 Here we seem to have a puzzle. Zarathustra himself, while relating
 his experience with the fire-dog to his disciples, fails to get them
 interested in his narrative, and we also may be only too ready to turn
 over these pages under the impression that they are little more than
 a mere phantasy or poetical flight. Zarathustra's interview with the
 fire-dog is, however, of great importance. In it we find Nietzsche
 face to face with the creature he most sincerely loathes--the spirit
 of revolution, and we obtain fresh hints concerning his hatred of the
 anarchist and rebel. "'Freedom' ye all roar most eagerly," he says to
 the fire-dog, "but I have unlearned the belief in 'Great Events' when
 there is much roaring and smoke about them. Not around the inventors
 of new noise, but around the inventors of new values, doth the world
 revolve; INAUDIBLY it revolveth."
 
 Chapter XLI. The Soothsayer.
 
 This refers, of course, to Schopenhauer. Nietzsche, as is well known,
 was at one time an ardent follower of Schopenhauer. He overcame
 Pessimism by discovering an object in existence; he saw the possibility
 of raising society to a higher level and preached the profoundest
 Optimism in consequence.
 
 Chapter XLII. Redemption.
 
 Zarathustra here addresses cripples. He tells them of other
 cripples--the GREAT MEN in this world who have one organ or faculty
 inordinately developed at the cost of their other faculties. This is
 doubtless a reference to a fact which is too often noticeable in the
 case of so many of the world's giants in art, science, or religion. In
 verse 19 we are told what Nietzsche called Redemption--that is to say,
 the ability to say of all that is past: "Thus would I have it." The
 in ability to say this, and the resentment which results therefrom,
 he regards as the source of all our feelings of revenge, and all our
 desires to punish--punishment meaning to him merely a euphemism for the
 word revenge, invented in order to still our consciences. He who can be
 proud of his enemies, who can be grateful to them for the obstacles they
 have put in his way; he who can regard his worst calamity as but the
 extra strain on the bow of his life, which is to send the arrow of
 his longing even further than he could have hoped;--this man knows no
 revenge, neither does he know despair, he truly has found redemption and
 can turn on the worst in his life and even in himself, and call it his
 best (see Notes on Chapter LVII.).
 
 Chapter XLIII. Manly Prudence.
 
 This discourse is very important. In "Beyond Good and Evil" we hear
 often enough that the select and superior man must wear a mask, and
 here we find this injunction explained. "And he who would not languish
 amongst men, must learn to drink out of all glasses: and he who would
 keep clean amongst men, must know how to wash himself even with dirty
 water." This, I venture to suggest, requires some explanation. At a time
 when individuality is supposed to be shown most tellingly by putting
 boots on one's hands and gloves on one's feet, it is somewhat refreshing
 to come across a true individualist who feels the chasm between himself
 and others so deeply, that he must perforce adapt himself to them
 outwardly, at least, in all respects, so that the inner difference
 should be overlooked. Nietzsche practically tells us here that it is not
 he who intentionally wears eccentric clothes or does eccentric things
 who is truly the individualist. The profound man, who is by nature
 differentiated from his fellows, feels this difference too keenly to
 call attention to it by any outward show. He is shamefast and bashful
 with those who surround him and wishes not to be discovered by them,
 just as one instinctively avoids all lavish display of comfort or wealth
 in the presence of a poor friend.
 
 Chapter XLIV. The Stillest Hour.
 
 This seems to me to give an account of the great struggle which must
 have taken place in Nietzsche's soul before he finally resolved to make
 known the more esoteric portions of his teaching. Our deepest feelings
 crave silence. There is a certain self-respect in the serious man which
 makes him hold his profoundest feelings sacred. Before they are uttered
 they are full of the modesty of a virgin, and often the oldest sage will
 blush like a girl when this virginity is violated by an indiscretion
 which forces him to reveal his deepest thoughts.
 
 ...
 
 PART III.
 
 This is perhaps the most important of all the four parts. If it
 contained only "The Vision and the Enigma" and "The Old and New Tables"
 I should still be of this opinion; for in the former of these discourses
 we meet with what Nietzsche regarded as the crowning doctrine of his
 philosophy and in "The Old and New Tables" we have a valuable epitome of
 practically all his leading principles.
 
 Chapter XLVI. The Vision and the Enigma.
 
 "The Vision and the Enigma" is perhaps an example of Nietzsche in his
 most obscure vein. We must know how persistently he inveighed against
 the oppressing and depressing influence of man's sense of guilt and
 consciousness of sin in order fully to grasp the significance of this
 discourse. Slowly but surely, he thought the values of Christianity and
 Judaic traditions had done their work in the minds of men. What were
 once but expedients devised for the discipline of a certain portion of
 humanity, had now passed into man's blood and had become instincts. This
 oppressive and paralysing sense of guilt and of sin is what Nietzsche
 refers to when he speaks of "the spirit of gravity." This creature
 half-dwarf, half-mole, whom he bears with him a certain distance on his
 climb and finally defies, and whom he calls his devil and arch-enemy, is
 nothing more than the heavy millstone "guilty conscience," together with
 the concept of sin which at present hangs round the neck of men. To rise
 above it--to soar--is the most difficult of all things to-day. Nietzsche
 is able to think cheerfully and optimistically of the possibility of
 life in this world recurring again and again, when he has once cast the
 dwarf from his shoulders, and he announces his doctrine of the Eternal
 Recurrence of all things great and small to his arch-enemy and in
 defiance of him.
 
 That there is much to be said for Nietzsche's hypothesis of the Eternal
 Recurrence of all things great and small, nobody who has read the
 literature on the subject will doubt for an instant; but it remains a
 very daring conjecture notwithstanding and even in its ultimate effect,
 as a dogma, on the minds of men, I venture to doubt whether Nietzsche
 ever properly estimated its worth (see Note on Chapter LVII.).
 
 What follows is clear enough. Zarathustra sees a young shepherd
 struggling on the ground with a snake holding fast to the back of his
 throat. The sage, assuming that the snake must have crawled into the
 young man's mouth while he lay sleeping, runs to his help and pulls
 at the loathsome reptile with all his might, but in vain. At last, in
 despair, Zarathustra appeals to the young man's will. Knowing full well
 what a ghastly operation he is recommending, he nevertheless cries,
 "Bite! Bite! Its head off! Bite!" as the only possible solution of the
 difficulty. The young shepherd bites, and far away he spits the
 snake's head, whereupon he rises, "No longer shepherd, no longer man--a
 transfigured being, a light-surrounded being, that LAUGHED! Never on
 earth laughed a man as he laughed!"
 
 In this parable the young shepherd is obviously the man of to-day; the
 snake that chokes him represents the stultifying and paralysing social
 values that threaten to shatter humanity, and the advice "Bite! Bite!"
 is but Nietzsche's exasperated cry to mankind to alter their values
 before it is too late.
 
 Chapter XLVII. Involuntary Bliss.
 
 This, like "The Wanderer", is one of the many introspective passages
 in the work, and is full of innuendos and hints as to the Nietzschean
 outlook on life.
 
 Chapter XLVIII. Before Sunrise.
 
 Here we have a record of Zarathustra's avowal of optimism, as also the
 important statement concerning "Chance" or "Accident" (verse 27). Those
 who are familiar with Nietzsche's philosophy will not require to be told
 what an important role his doctrine of chance plays in his teaching.
 The Giant Chance has hitherto played with the puppet "man,"--this is
 the fact he cannot contemplate with equanimity. Man shall now exploit
 chance, he says again and again, and make it fall on its knees before
 him! (See verse 33 in "On the Olive Mount", and verses 9-10 in "The
 Bedwarfing Virtue").
 
 Chapter XLIX. The Bedwarfing Virtue.
 
 This requires scarcely any comment. It is a satire on modern man and
 his belittling virtues. In verses 23 and 24 of the second part of the
 discourse we are reminded of Nietzsche's powerful indictment of the
 great of to-day, in the Antichrist (Aphorism 43):--"At present
 nobody has any longer the courage for separate rights, for rights of
 domination, for a feeling of reverence for himself and his equals,--FOR
 PATHOS OF DISTANCE...Our politics are MORBID from this want of
 courage!--The aristocracy of character has been undermined most craftily
 by the lie of the equality of souls; and if the belief in the 'privilege
 of the many,' makes revolutions and WILL CONTINUE TO MAKE them, it is
 Christianity, let us not doubt it, it is CHRISTIAN valuations, which
 translate every revolution merely into blood and crime!" (see also
 "Beyond Good and Evil", pages 120, 121). Nietzsche thought it was a
 bad sign of the times that even rulers have lost the courage of
 their positions, and that a man of Frederick the Great's power and
 distinguished gifts should have been able to say: "Ich bin der erste
 Diener des Staates" (I am the first servant of the State.) To this
 utterance of the great sovereign, verse 24 undoubtedly refers.
 "Cowardice" and "Mediocrity," are the names with which he labels modern
 notions of virtue and moderation.
 
 In Part III., we get the sentiments of the discourse "In the Happy
 Isles", but perhaps in stronger terms. Once again we find Nietzsche
 thoroughly at ease, if not cheerful, as an atheist, and speaking with
 vertiginous daring of making chance go on its knees to him. In verse
 20, Zarathustra makes yet another attempt at defining his entirely
 anti-anarchical attitude, and unless such passages have been completely
 overlooked or deliberately ignored hitherto by those who will persist in
 laying anarchy at his door, it is impossible to understand how he ever
 became associated with that foul political party.
 
 The last verse introduces the expression, "THE GREAT NOONTIDE!" In the
 poem to be found at the end of "Beyond Good and Evil", we meet with
 the expression again, and we shall find it occurring time and again in
 Nietzsche's works. It will be found fully elucidated in the fifth part
 of "The Twilight of the Idols"; but for those who cannot refer to
 this book, it were well to point out that Nietzsche called the present
 period--our period--the noon of man's history. Dawn is behind us. The
 childhood of mankind is over. Now we KNOW; there is now no longer any
 excuse for mistakes which will tend to botch and disfigure the type man.
 "With respect to what is past," he says, "I have, like all discerning
 ones, great toleration, that is to say, GENEROUS self-control...But my
 feeling changes suddenly, and breaks out as soon as I enter the modern
 period, OUR period. Our age KNOWS..." (See Note on Chapter LXX.).
 
 Chapter LI. On Passing-by.
 
 Here we find Nietzsche confronted with his extreme opposite, with
 him therefore for whom he is most frequently mistaken by the unwary.
 "Zarathustra's ape" he is called in the discourse. He is one of those
 at whose hands Nietzsche had to suffer most during his life-time, and
 at whose hands his philosophy has suffered most since his death. In this
 respect it may seem a little trivial to speak of extremes meeting; but
 it is wonderfully apt. Many have adopted Nietzsche's mannerisms and
 word-coinages, who had nothing in common with him beyond the ideas and
 "business" they plagiarised; but the superficial observer and a large
 portion of the public, not knowing of these things,--not knowing perhaps
 that there are iconoclasts who destroy out of love and are therefore
 creators, and that there are others who destroy out of resentment and
 revengefulness and who are therefore revolutionists and anarchists,--are
 prone to confound the two, to the detriment of the nobler type.
 
 If we now read what the fool says to Zarathustra, and note the tricks of
 speech he has borrowed from him: if we carefully follow the attitude
 he assumes, we shall understand why Zarathustra finally interrupts him.
 "Stop this at once," Zarathustra cries, "long have thy speech and
 thy species disgusted me...Out of love alone shall my contempt and my
 warning bird take wing; BUT NOT OUT OF THE SWAMP!" It were well if
 this discourse were taken to heart by all those who are too ready to
 associate Nietzsche with lesser and noiser men,--with mountebanks and
 mummers.
 
 Chapter LII. The Apostates.
 
 It is clear that this applies to all those breathless and hasty "tasters
 of everything," who plunge too rashly into the sea of independent
 thought and "heresy," and who, having miscalculated their strength, find
 it impossible to keep their head above water. "A little older, a little
 colder," says Nietzsche. They soon clamber back to the conventions of
 the age they intended reforming. The French then say "le diable se fait
 hermite," but these men, as a rule, have never been devils, neither
 do they become angels; for, in order to be really good or evil, some
 strength and deep breathing is required. Those who are more interested
 in supporting orthodoxy than in being over nice concerning the kind of
 support they give it, often refer to these people as evidence in favour
 of the true faith.
 
 Chapter LIII. The Return Home.
 
 This is an example of a class of writing which may be passed over too
 lightly by those whom poetasters have made distrustful of poetry. From
 first to last it is extremely valuable as an autobiographical note. The
 inevitable superficiality of the rabble is contrasted with the peaceful
 and profound depths of the anchorite. Here we first get a direct hint
 concerning Nietzsche's fundamental passion--the main force behind all
 his new values and scathing criticism of existing values. In verse 30
 we are told that pity was his greatest danger. The broad altruism of the
 law-giver, thinking over vast eras of time, was continually being pitted
 by Nietzsche, in himself, against that transient and meaner sympathy for
 the neighbour which he more perhaps than any of his contemporaries had
 suffered from, but which he was certain involved enormous dangers not
 only for himself but also to the next and subsequent generations (see
 Note B., where "pity" is mentioned among the degenerate virtues). Later
 in the book we shall see how his profound compassion leads him into
 temptation, and how frantically he struggles against it. In verses 31
 and 32, he tells us to what extent he had to modify himself in order
 to be endured by his fellows whom he loved (see also verse 12 in "Manly
 Prudence"). Nietzsche's great love for his fellows, which he confesses
 in the Prologue, and which is at the root of all his teaching, seems
 rather to elude the discerning powers of the average philanthropist and
 modern man. He cannot see the wood for the trees. A philanthropy that
 sacrifices the minority of the present-day for the majority constituting
 posterity, completely evades his mental grasp, and Nietzsche's
 philosophy, because it declares Christian values to be a danger to the
 future of our kind, is therefore shelved as brutal, cold, and hard (see
 Note on Chapter XXXVI.). Nietzsche tried to be all things to all men;
 he was sufficiently fond of his fellows for that: in the Return Home he
 describes how he ultimately returns to loneliness in order to recover
 from the effects of his experiment.
 
 Chapter LIV. The Three Evil Things.
 
 Nietzsche is here completely in his element. Three things hitherto
 best-cursed and most calumniated on earth, are brought forward to be
 weighed. Voluptuousness, thirst of power, and selfishness,--the three
 forces in humanity which Christianity has done most to garble and
 besmirch,--Nietzsche endeavours to reinstate in their former places of
 honour. Voluptuousness, or sensual pleasure, is a dangerous thing to
 discuss nowadays. If we mention it with favour we may be regarded,
 however unjustly, as the advocate of savages, satyrs, and pure
 sensuality. If we condemn it, we either go over to the Puritans or we
 join those who are wont to come to table with no edge to their appetites
 and who therefore grumble at all good fare. There can be no doubt that
 the value of healthy innocent voluptuousness, like the value of health
 itself, must have been greatly discounted by all those who, resenting
 their inability to partake of this world's goods, cried like St Paul:
 "I would that all men were even as I myself." Now Nietzsche's philosophy
 might be called an attempt at giving back to healthy and normal men
 innocence and a clean conscience in their desires--NOT to applaud the
 vulgar sensualists who respond to every stimulus and whose passions are
 out of hand; not to tell the mean, selfish individual, whose selfishness
 is a pollution (see Aphorism 33, "Twilight of the Idols"), that he is
 right, nor to assure the weak, the sick, and the crippled, that the
 thirst of power, which they gratify by exploiting the happier and
 healthier individuals, is justified;--but to save the clean healthy man
 from the values of those around him, who look at everything through the
 mud that is in their own bodies,--to give him, and him alone, a clean
 conscience in his manhood and the desires of his manhood. "Do I counsel
 you to slay your instincts? I counsel to innocence in your instincts."
 In verse 7 of the second paragraph (as in verse I of paragraph 19 in
 "The Old and New Tables") Nietzsche gives us a reason for his occasional
 obscurity (see also verses 3 to 7 of "Poets"). As I have already pointed
 out, his philosophy is quite esoteric. It can serve no purpose with the
 ordinary, mediocre type of man. I, personally, can no longer have any
 doubt that Nietzsche's only object, in that part of his philosophy where
 he bids his friends stand "Beyond Good and Evil" with him, was to save
 higher men, whose growth and scope might be limited by the too
 strict observance of modern values from foundering on the rocks of a
 "Compromise" between their own genius and traditional conventions. The
 only possible way in which the great man can achieve greatness is
 by means of exceptional freedom--the freedom which assists him in
 experiencing HIMSELF. Verses 20 to 30 afford an excellent supplement to
 Nietzsche's description of the attitude of the noble type towards the
 slaves in Aphorism 260 of the work "Beyond Good and Evil" (see also Note
 B.)
 
 Chapter LV. The Spirit of Gravity.
 
 (See Note on Chapter XLVI.) In Part II. of this discourse we meet with
 a doctrine not touched upon hitherto, save indirectly;--I refer to the
 doctrine of self-love. We should try to understand this perfectly before
 proceeding; for it is precisely views of this sort which, after having
 been cut out of the original context, are repeated far and wide as
 internal evidence proving the general unsoundness of Nietzsche's
 philosophy. Already in the last of the "Thoughts out of Season"
 Nietzsche speaks as follows about modern men: "...these modern creatures
 wish rather to be hunted down, wounded and torn to shreds, than to
 live alone with themselves in solitary calm. Alone with oneself!--this
 thought terrifies the modern soul; it is his one anxiety, his one
 ghastly fear" (English Edition, page 141). In his feverish scurry to
 find entertainment and diversion, whether in a novel, a newspaper, or a
 play, the modern man condemns his own age utterly; for he shows that in
 his heart of hearts he despises himself. One cannot change a condition
 of this sort in a day; to become endurable to oneself an inner
 transformation is necessary. Too long have we lost ourselves in our
 friends and entertainments to be able to find ourselves so soon at
 another's bidding. "And verily, it is no commandment for to-day and
 to-morrow to LEARN to love oneself. Rather is it of all arts the finest,
 subtlest, last, and patientest."
 
 In the last verse Nietzsche challenges us to show that our way is
 the right way. In his teaching he does not coerce us, nor does he
 overpersuade; he simply says: "I am a law only for mine own, I am not a
 law for all. This--is now MY way,--where is yours?"
 
 Chapter LVI. Old and New Tables. Par. 2.
 
 Nietzsche himself declares this to be the most decisive portion of
 the whole of "Thus Spake Zarathustra". It is a sort of epitome of his
 leading doctrines. In verse 12 of the second paragraph, we learn how he
 himself would fain have abandoned the poetical method of expression had
 he not known only too well that the only chance a new doctrine has of
 surviving, nowadays, depends upon its being given to the world in some
 kind of art-form. Just as prophets, centuries ago, often had to have
 recourse to the mask of madness in order to mitigate the hatred of those
 who did not and could not see as they did; so, to-day, the struggle for
 existence among opinions and values is so great, that an art-form
 is practically the only garb in which a new philosophy can dare to
 introduce itself to us.
 
 Pars. 3 and 4.
 
 Many of the paragraphs will be found to be merely reminiscent of former
 discourses. For instance, par. 3 recalls "Redemption". The last verse
 of par. 4 is important. Freedom which, as I have pointed out before,
 Nietzsche considered a dangerous acquisition in inexperienced or
 unworthy hands, here receives its death-blow as a general desideratum.
 In the first Part we read under "The Way of the Creating One", that
 freedom as an end in itself does not concern Zarathustra at all. He says
 there: "Free from what? What doth that matter to Zarathustra? Clearly,
 however, shall thine eye answer me: free FOR WHAT?" And in "The
 Bedwarfing Virtue": "Ah that ye understood my word: 'Do ever what ye
 will--but first be such as CAN WILL.'"
 
 Par. 5.
 
 Here we have a description of the kind of altruism Nietzsche exacted
 from higher men. It is really a comment upon "The Bestowing Virtue" (see
 Note on Chapter XXII.).
 
 Par. 6.
 
 This refers, of course, to the reception pioneers of Nietzsche's stamp
 meet with at the hands of their contemporaries.
 
 Par. 8.
 
 Nietzsche teaches that nothing is stable,--not even values,--not
 even the concepts good and evil. He likens life unto a stream. But
 foot-bridges and railings span the stream, and they seem to stand
 firm. Many will be reminded of good and evil when they look upon these
 structures; for thus these same values stand over the stream of life,
 and life flows on beneath them and leaves them standing. When, however,
 winter comes and the stream gets frozen, many inquire: "Should not
 everything--STAND STILL? Fundamentally everything standeth still." But
 soon the spring cometh and with it the thaw-wind. It breaks the ice, and
 the ice breaks down the foot-bridges and railings, whereupon everything
 is swept away. This state of affairs, according to Nietzsche, has now
 been reached. "Oh, my brethren, is not everything AT PRESENT IN FLUX?
 Have not all railings and foot-bridges fallen into the water? Who would
 still HOLD ON to 'good' and 'evil'?"
 
 Par. 9.
 
 This is complementary to the first three verses of par. 2.
 
 Par. 10.
 
 So far, this is perhaps the most important paragraph. It is a protest
 against reading a moral order of things in life. "Life is something
 essentially immoral!" Nietzsche tells us in the introduction to the
 "Birth of Tragedy". Even to call life "activity," or to define it
 further as "the continuous adjustment of internal relations to external
 relations," as Spencer has it, Nietzsche characterises as a "democratic
 idiosyncracy." He says to define it in this way, "is to mistake the
 true nature and function of life, which is Will to Power...Life is
 ESSENTIALLY appropriation, injury, conquest of the strange and weak,
 suppression, severity, obtrusion of its own forms, incorporation and
 at least, putting it mildest, exploitation." Adaptation is merely a
 secondary activity, a mere re-activity (see Note on Chapter LVII.).
 
 Pars. 11, 12.
 
 These deal with Nietzsche's principle of the desirability of rearing a
 select race. The biological and historical grounds for his insistence
 upon this principle are, of course, manifold. Gobineau in his great
 work, "L'Inegalite des Races Humaines", lays strong emphasis upon the
 evils which arise from promiscuous and inter-social marriages. He alone
 would suffice to carry Nietzsche's point against all those who are
 opposed to the other conditions, to the conditions which would have
 saved Rome, which have maintained the strength of the Jewish race, and
 which are strictly maintained by every breeder of animals throughout the
 world. Darwin in his remarks relative to the degeneration of CULTIVATED
 types of animals through the action of promiscuous breeding, brings
 Gobineau support from the realm of biology.
 
 The last two verses of par. 12 were discussed in the Notes on Chapters
 XXXVI. and LIII.
 
 Par. 13.
 
 This, like the first part of "The Soothsayer", is obviously a reference
 to the Schopenhauerian Pessimism.
 
 Pars. 14, 15, 16, 17.
 
 These are supplementary to the discourse "Backworld's-men".
 
 Par. 18.
 
 We must be careful to separate this paragraph, in sense, from the
 previous four paragraphs. Nietzsche is still dealing with Pessimism
 here; but it is the pessimism of the hero--the man most susceptible of
 all to desperate views of life, owing to the obstacles that are arrayed
 against him in a world where men of his kind are very rare and are
 continually being sacrificed. It was to save this man that Nietzsche
 wrote. Heroism foiled, thwarted, and wrecked, hoping and fighting until
 the last, is at length overtaken by despair, and renounces all struggle
 for sleep. This is not the natural or constitutional pessimism which
 proceeds from an unhealthy body--the dyspeptic's lack of appetite; it
 is rather the desperation of the netted lion that ultimately stops all
 movement, because the more it moves the more involved it becomes.
 
 Par. 20.
 
 "All that increases power is good, all that springs from weakness is
 bad. The weak and ill-constituted shall perish: first principle of our
 charity. And one shall also help them thereto." Nietzsche partly divined
 the kind of reception moral values of this stamp would meet with at
 the hands of the effeminate manhood of Europe. Here we see that he had
 anticipated the most likely form their criticism would take (see also
 the last two verses of par. 17).
 
 Par. 21.
 
 The first ten verses, here, are reminiscent of "War and Warriors" and
 of "The Flies in the Market-place." Verses 11 and 12, however, are
 particularly important. There is a strong argument in favour of the
 sharp differentiation of castes and of races (and even of sexes; see
 Note on Chapter XVIII.) running all through Nietzsche's writings.
 But sharp differentiation also implies antagonism in some form or
 other--hence Nietzsche's fears for modern men. What modern men desire
 above all, is peace and the cessation of pain. But neither great races
 nor great castes have ever been built up in this way. "Who still wanteth
 to rule?" Zarathustra asks in the "Prologue". "Who still wanteth to
 obey? Both are too burdensome." This is rapidly becoming everybody's
 attitude to-day. The tame moral reading of the face of nature, together
 with such democratic interpretations of life as those suggested by
 Herbert Spencer, are signs of a physiological condition which is the
 reverse of that bounding and irresponsible healthiness in which harder
 and more tragic values rule.
 
 Par. 24.
 
 This should be read in conjunction with "Child and Marriage". In the
 fifth verse we shall recognise our old friend "Marriage on the ten-years
 system," which George Meredith suggested some years ago. This, however,
 must not be taken too literally. I do not think Nietzsche's profoundest
 views on marriage were ever intended to be given over to the public at
 all, at least not for the present. They appear in the biography by his
 sister, and although their wisdom is unquestionable, the nature of the
 reforms he suggests render it impossible for them to become popular just
 now.
 
 Pars. 26, 27.
 
 See Note on "The Prologue".
 
 Par. 28.
 
 Nietzsche was not an iconoclast from predilection. No bitterness or
 empty hate dictated his vituperations against existing values and
 against the dogmas of his parents and forefathers. He knew too well what
 these things meant to the millions who profess them, to approach the
 task of uprooting them with levity or even with haste. He saw what
 modern anarchists and revolutionists do NOT see--namely, that man is in
 danger of actual destruction when his customs and values are broken.
 I need hardly point out, therefore, how deeply he was conscious of
 the responsibility he threw upon our shoulders when he invited us to
 reconsider our position. The lines in this paragraph are evidence enough
 of his earnestness.
 
 Chapter LVII. The Convalescent.
 
 We meet with several puzzles here. Zarathustra calls himself the
 advocate of the circle (the Eternal Recurrence of all things), and he
 calls this doctrine his abysmal thought. In the last verse of the
 first paragraph, however, after hailing his deepest thought, he cries:
 "Disgust, disgust, disgust!" We know Nietzsche's ideal man was that
 "world-approving, exuberant, and vivacious creature, who has not only
 learnt to compromise and arrange with that which was and is, but wishes
 to have it again, AS IT WAS AND IS, for all eternity insatiably calling
 out da capo, not only to himself, but to the whole piece and play" (see
 Note on Chapter XLII.). But if one ask oneself what the conditions to
 such an attitude are, one will realise immediately how utterly different
 Nietzsche was from his ideal. The man who insatiably cries da capo to
 himself and to the whole of his mise-en-scene, must be in a position to
 desire every incident in his life to be repeated, not once, but
 again and again eternally. Now, Nietzsche's life had been too full of
 disappointments, illness, unsuccessful struggles, and snubs, to allow of
 his thinking of the Eternal Recurrence without loathing--hence probably
 the words of the last verse.
 
 In verses 15 and 16, we have Nietzsche declaring himself an evolutionist
 in the broadest sense--that is to say, that he believes in the
 Development Hypothesis as the description of the process by which
 species have originated. Now, to understand his position correctly
 we must show his relationship to the two greatest of modern
 evolutionists--Darwin and Spencer. As a philosopher, however, Nietzsche
 does not stand or fall by his objections to the Darwinian or Spencerian
 cosmogony. He never laid claim to a very profound knowledge of biology,
 and his criticism is far more valuable as the attitude of a fresh mind
 than as that of a specialist towards the question. Moreover, in his
 objections many difficulties are raised which are not settled by an
 appeal to either of the men above mentioned. We have given Nietzsche's
 definition of life in the Note on Chapter LVI., par. 10. Still, there
 remains a hope that Darwin and Nietzsche may some day become reconciled
 by a new description of the processes by which varieties occur. The
 appearance of varieties among animals and of "sporting plants" in
 the vegetable kingdom, is still shrouded in mystery, and the question
 whether this is not precisely the ground on which Darwin and Nietzsche
 will meet, is an interesting one. The former says in his "Origin of
 Species", concerning the causes of variability: "...there are two
 factors, namely, the nature of the organism, and the nature of the
 conditions. THE FORMER SEEMS TO BE MUCH THE MORE IMPORTANT (The italics
 are mine.), for nearly similar variations sometimes arise under, as
 far as we can judge, dissimilar conditions; and on the other hand,
 dissimilar variations arise under conditions which appear to be
 nearly uniform." Nietzsche, recognising this same truth, would ascribe
 practically all the importance to the "highest functionaries in the
 organism, in which the life-will appears as an active and formative
 principle," and except in certain cases (where passive organisms alone
 are concerned) would not give such a prominent place to the influence
 of environment. Adaptation, according to him, is merely a secondary
 activity, a mere re-activity, and he is therefore quite opposed to
 Spencer's definition: "Life is the continuous adjustment of internal
 relations to external relations." Again in the motive force behind
 animal and plant life, Nietzsche disagrees with Darwin. He
 transforms the "Struggle for Existence"--the passive and involuntary
 condition--into the "Struggle for Power," which is active and creative,
 and much more in harmony with Darwin's own view, given above, concerning
 the importance of the organism itself. The change is one of such
 far-reaching importance that we cannot dispose of it in a breath, as a
 mere play upon words. "Much is reckoned higher than life itself by the
 living one." Nietzsche says that to speak of the activity of life as a
 "struggle for existence," is to state the case inadequately. He warns us
 not to confound Malthus with nature. There is something more than
 this struggle between the organic beings on this earth; want, which is
 supposed to bring this struggle about, is not so common as is supposed;
 some other force must be operative. The Will to Power is this force,
 "the instinct of self-preservation is only one of the indirect and most
 frequent results thereof." A certain lack of acumen in psychological
 questions and the condition of affairs in England at the time Darwin
 wrote, may both, according to Nietzsche, have induced the renowned
 naturalist to describe the forces of nature as he did in his "Origin of
 Species".
 
 In verses 28, 29, and 30 of the second portion of this discourse we meet
 with a doctrine which, at first sight, seems to be merely "le manoir
 a l'envers," indeed one English critic has actually said of Nietzsche,
 that "Thus Spake Zarathustra" is no more than a compendium of modern
 views and maxims turned upside down. Examining these heterodox
 pronouncements a little more closely, however, we may possibly perceive
 their truth. Regarding good and evil as purely relative values, it
 stands to reason that what may be bad or evil in a given man, relative
 to a certain environment, may actually be good if not highly virtuous
 in him relative to a certain other environment. If this hypothetical man
 represent the ascending line of life--that is to say, if he promise all
 that which is highest in a Graeco-Roman sense, then it is likely that
 he will be condemned as wicked if introduced into the society of men
 representing the opposite and descending line of life.
 
 By depriving a man of his wickedness--more particularly nowadays--
 therefore, one may unwittingly be doing violence to the greatest in him.
 It may be an outrage against his wholeness, just as the lopping-off of a
 leg would be. Fortunately, the natural so-called "wickedness" of higher
 men has in a certain measure been able to resist this lopping process
 which successive slave-moralities have practised; but signs are not
 wanting which show that the noblest wickedness is fast vanishing from
 society--the wickedness of courage and determination--and that Nietzsche
 had good reasons for crying: "Ah, that (man's) baddest is so very small!
 Ah, that his best is so very small. What is good? To be brave is good!
 It is the good war which halloweth every cause!" (see also par. 5,
 "Higher Man").
 
 Chapter LX. The Seven Seals.
 
 This is a final paean which Zarathustra sings to Eternity and the
 marriage-ring of rings, the ring of the Eternal Recurrence.
 
 ...
 
 PART IV.
 
 In my opinion this part is Nietzsche's open avowal that all his
 philosophy, together with all his hopes, enthusiastic outbursts,
 blasphemies, prolixities, and obscurities, were merely so many gifts
 laid at the feet of higher men. He had no desire to save the world. What
 he wished to determine was: Who is to be master of the world? This is
 a very different thing. He came to save higher men;--to give them that
 freedom by which, alone, they can develop and reach their zenith (see
 Note on Chapter LIV., end). It has been argued, and with considerable
 force, that no such philosophy is required by higher men, that, as a
 matter of fact, higher men, by virtue of their constitutions always, do
 stand Beyond Good and Evil, and never allow anything to stand in the
 way of their complete growth. Nietzsche, however, was evidently not so
 confident about this. He would probably have argued that we only see the
 successful cases. Being a great man himself, he was well aware of the
 dangers threatening greatness in our age. In "Beyond Good and Evil" he
 writes: "There are few pains so grievous as to have seen, divined,
 or experienced how an exceptional man has missed his way and
 deteriorated..." He knew "from his painfullest recollections on what
 wretched obstacles promising developments of the highest rank have
 hitherto usually gone to pieces, broken down, sunk, and become
 contemptible." Now in Part IV. we shall find that his strongest
 temptation to descend to the feeling of "pity" for his contemporaries,
 is the "cry for help" which he hears from the lips of the higher men
 exposed to the dreadful danger of their modern environment.
 
 Chapter LXI. The Honey Sacrifice.
 
 In the fourteenth verse of this discourse Nietzsche defines the solemn
 duty he imposed upon himself: "Become what thou art." Surely the
 criticism which has been directed against this maxim must all fall to
 the ground when it is remembered, once and for all, that Nietzsche's
 teaching was never intended to be other than an esoteric one. "I am a
 law only for mine own," he says emphatically, "I am not a law for
 all." It is of the greatest importance to humanity that its highest
 individuals should be allowed to attain to their full development; for,
 only by means of its heroes can the human race be led forward step by
 step to higher and yet higher levels. "Become what thou art" applied
 to all, of course, becomes a vicious maxim; it is to be hoped, however,
 that we may learn in time that the same action performed by a given
 number of men, loses its identity precisely that same number of
 times.--"Quod licet Jovi, non licet bovi."
 
 At the last eight verses many readers may be tempted to laugh. In
 England we almost always laugh when a man takes himself seriously at
 anything save sport. And there is of course no reason why the reader
 should not be hilarious.--A certain greatness is requisite, both in
 order to be sublime and to have reverence for the sublime. Nietzsche
 earnestly believed that the Zarathustra-kingdom--his dynasty of a
 thousand years--would one day come; if he had not believed it so
 earnestly, if every artist in fact had not believed so earnestly in
 his Hazar, whether of ten, fifteen, a hundred, or a thousand years, we
 should have lost all our higher men; they would have become pessimists,
 suicides, or merchants. If the minor poet and philosopher has made us
 shy of the prophetic seriousness which characterized an Isaiah or a
 Jeremiah, it is surely our loss and the minor poet's gain.
 
 Chapter LXII. The Cry of Distress.
 
 We now meet with Zarathustra in extraordinary circumstances. He is
 confronted with Schopenhauer and tempted by the old Soothsayer to commit
 the sin of pity. "I have come that I may seduce thee to thy last sin!"
 says the Soothsayer to Zarathustra. It will be remembered that in
 Schopenhauer's ethics, pity is elevated to the highest place among the
 virtues, and very consistently too, seeing that the Weltanschauung is
 a pessimistic one. Schopenhauer appeals to Nietzsche's deepest and
 strongest sentiment--his sympathy for higher men. "Why dost thou conceal
 thyself?" he cries. "It is THE HIGHER MAN that calleth for thee!"
 Zarathustra is almost overcome by the Soothsayer's pleading, as he
 had been once already in the past, but he resists him step by step. At
 length he can withstand him no longer, and, on the plea that the higher
 man is on his ground and therefore under his protection, Zarathustra
 departs in search of him, leaving Schopenhauer--a higher man in
 Nietzsche's opinion--in the cave as a guest.
 
 Chapter LXIII. Talk with the Kings.
 
 On his way Zarathustra meets two more higher men of his time; two
 kings cross his path. They are above the average modern type; for their
 instincts tell them what real ruling is, and they despise the mockery
 which they have been taught to call "Reigning." "We ARE NOT the first
 men," they say, "and have nevertheless to STAND FOR them: of this
 imposture have we at last become weary and disgusted." It is the kings
 who tell Zarathustra: "There is no sorer misfortune in all human destiny
 than when the mighty of the earth are not also the first men. There
 everything becometh false and distorted and monstrous." The kings are
 also asked by Zarathustra to accept the shelter of his cave, whereupon
 he proceeds on his way.
 
 Chapter LXIV. The Leech.
 
 Among the higher men whom Zarathustra wishes to save, is also the
 scientific specialist--the man who honestly and scrupulously pursues his
 investigations, as Darwin did, in one department of knowledge. "I love
 him who liveth in order to know, and seeketh to know in order that the
 Superman may hereafter live. Thus seeketh he his own down-going."
 "The spiritually conscientious one," he is called in this discourse.
 Zarathustra steps on him unawares, and the slave of science, bleeding
 from the violence he has done to himself by his self-imposed task,
 speaks proudly of his little sphere of knowledge--his little hand's
 breadth of ground on Zarathustra's territory, philosophy. "Where mine
 honesty ceaseth," says the true scientific specialist, "there am I blind
 and want also to be blind. Where I want to know, however, there want
 I also to be honest--namely, severe, rigorous, restricted, cruel, and
 inexorable." Zarathustra greatly respecting this man, invites him too to
 the cave, and then vanishes in answer to another cry for help.
 
 Chapter LXV. The Magician.
 
 The Magician is of course an artist, and Nietzsche's intimate knowledge
 of perhaps the greatest artist of his age rendered the selection of
 Wagner, as the type in this discourse, almost inevitable. Most readers
 will be acquainted with the facts relating to Nietzsche's and Wagner's
 friendship and ultimate separation. As a boy and a youth Nietzsche had
 shown such a remarkable gift for music that it had been a question at
 one time whether he should not perhaps give up everything else in order
 to develop this gift, but he became a scholar notwithstanding, although
 he never entirely gave up composing, and playing the piano. While
 still in his teens, he became acquainted with Wagner's music and
 grew passionately fond of it. Long before he met Wagner he must have
 idealised him in his mind to an extent which only a profoundly artistic
 nature could have been capable of. Nietzsche always had high ideals for
 humanity. If one were asked whether, throughout his many changes, there
 was yet one aim, one direction, and one hope to which he held fast,
 one would be forced to reply in the affirmative and declare that aim,
 direction, and hope to have been "the elevation of the type man."
 Now, when Nietzsche met Wagner he was actually casting about for an
 incarnation of his dreams for the German people, and we have only to
 remember his youth (he was twenty-one when he was introduced to Wagner),
 his love of Wagner's music, and the undoubted power of the great
 musician's personality, in order to realise how very uncritical his
 attitude must have been in the first flood of his enthusiasm. Again,
 when the friendship ripened, we cannot well imagine Nietzsche, the
 younger man, being anything less than intoxicated by his senior's
 attention and love, and we are therefore not surprised to find him
 pressing Wagner forward as the great Reformer and Saviour of mankind.
 "Wagner in Bayreuth" (English Edition, 1909) gives us the best proof
 of Nietzsche's infatuation, and although signs are not wanting in this
 essay which show how clearly and even cruelly he was sub-consciously
 "taking stock" of his friend--even then, the work is a record of what
 great love and admiration can do in the way of endowing the object
 of one's affection with all the qualities and ideals that a fertile
 imagination can conceive.
 
 When the blow came it was therefore all the more severe. Nietzsche
 at length realised that the friend of his fancy and the real Richard
 Wagner--the composer of Parsifal--were not one; the fact dawned
 upon him slowly; disappointment upon disappointment, revelation after
 revelation, ultimately brought it home to him, and though his best
 instincts were naturally opposed to it at first, the revulsion of
 feeling at last became too strong to be ignored, and Nietzsche was
 plunged into the blackest despair. Years after his break with Wagner,
 he wrote "The Case of Wagner", and "Nietzsche contra Wagner", and these
 works are with us to prove the sincerity and depth of his views on the
 man who was the greatest event of his life.
 
 The poem in this discourse is, of course, reminiscent of Wagner's own
 poetical manner, and it must be remembered that the whole was written
 subsequent to Nietzsche's final break with his friend. The dialogue
 between Zarathustra and the Magician reveals pretty fully what it
 was that Nietzsche grew to loathe so intensely in Wagner,--viz., his
 pronounced histrionic tendencies, his dissembling powers, his inordinate
 vanity, his equivocalness, his falseness. "It honoureth thee," says
 Zarathustra, "that thou soughtest for greatness, but it betrayeth thee
 also. Thou art not great." The Magician is nevertheless sent as a guest
 to Zarathustra's cave; for, in his heart, Zarathustra believed until the
 end that the Magician was a higher man broken by modern values.
 
 Chapter LXVI. Out of Service.
 
 Zarathustra now meets the last pope, and, in a poetical form, we get
 Nietzsche's description of the course Judaism and Christianity pursued
 before they reached their final break-up in Atheism, Agnosticism, and
 the like. The God of a strong, warlike race--the God of Israel--is a
 jealous, revengeful God. He is a power that can be pictured and endured
 only by a hardy and courageous race, a race rich enough to sacrifice and
 to lose in sacrifice. The image of this God degenerates with the people
 that appropriate it, and gradually He becomes a God of love--"soft and
 mellow," a lower middle-class deity, who is "pitiful." He can no longer
 be a God who requires sacrifice, for we ourselves are no longer rich
 enough for that. The tables are therefore turned upon Him; HE must
 sacrifice to us. His pity becomes so great that he actually does
 sacrifice something to us--His only begotten Son. Such a process
 carried to its logical conclusions must ultimately end in His own
 destruction, and thus we find the pope declaring that God was one day
 suffocated by His all-too-great pity. What follows is clear enough.
 Zarathustra recognises another higher man in the ex-pope and sends him
 too as a guest to the cave.
 
 Chapter LXVII. The Ugliest Man.
 
 This discourse contains perhaps the boldest of Nietzsche's suggestions
 concerning Atheism, as well as some extremely penetrating remarks upon
 the sentiment of pity. Zarathustra comes across the repulsive creature
 sitting on the wayside, and what does he do? He manifests the only
 correct feelings that can be manifested in the presence of any great
 misery--that is to say, shame, reverence, embarrassment. Nietzsche
 detested the obtrusive and gushing pity that goes up to misery without
 a blush either on its cheek or in its heart--the pity which is only
 another form of self-glorification. "Thank God that I am not like
 thee!"--only this self-glorifying sentiment can lend a well-constituted
 man the impudence to SHOW his pity for the cripple and the
 ill-constituted. In the presence of the ugliest man Nietzsche
 blushes,--he blushes for his race; his own particular kind of
 altruism--the altruism that might have prevented the existence of this
 man--strikes him with all its force. He will have the world otherwise.
 He will have a world where one need not blush for one's fellows--hence
 his appeal to us to love only our children's land, the land undiscovered
 in the remotest sea.
 
 Zarathustra calls the ugliest man the murderer of God! Certainly, this
 is one aspect of a certain kind of Atheism--the Atheism of the man who
 reveres beauty to such an extent that his own ugliness, which outrages
 him, must be concealed from every eye lest it should not be respected as
 Zarathustra respected it. If there be a God, He too must be evaded. His
 pity must be foiled. But God is ubiquitous and omniscient. Therefore,
 for the really GREAT ugly man, He must not exist. "Their pity IS it from
 which I flee away," he says--that is to say: "It is from their want of
 reverence and lack of shame in presence of my great misery!" The ugliest
 man despises himself; but Zarathustra said in his Prologue: "I love
 the great despisers because they are the great adorers, and arrows of
 longing for the other shore." He therefore honours the ugliest man: sees
 height in his self-contempt, and invites him to join the other higher
 men in the cave.
 
 Chapter LXVIII. The Voluntary Beggar.
 
 In this discourse, we undoubtedly have the ideal Buddhist, if not
 Gautama Buddha himself. Nietzsche had the greatest respect for Buddhism,
 and almost wherever he refers to it in his works, it is in terms of
 praise. He recognised that though Buddhism is undoubtedly a religion for
 decadents, its decadent values emanate from the higher and not, as in
 Christianity, from the lower grades of society. In Aphorism 20 of "The
 Antichrist", he compares it exhaustively with Christianity, and
 the result of his investigation is very much in favour of the older
 religion. Still, he recognised a most decided Buddhistic influence
 in Christ's teaching, and the words in verses 29, 30, and 31 are very
 reminiscent of his views in regard to the Christian Savior.
 
 The figure of Christ has been introduced often enough into fiction, and
 many scholars have undertaken to write His life according to their own
 lights, but few perhaps have ever attempted to present Him to us bereft
 of all those characteristics which a lack of the sense of harmony has
 attached to His person through the ages in which His doctrines have been
 taught. Now Nietzsche disagreed entirely with Renan's view, that Christ
 was "le grand maitre en ironie"; in Aphorism 31 of "The Antichrist",
 he says that he (Nietzsche) always purged his picture of the Humble
 Nazarene of all those bitter and spiteful outbursts which, in view of
 the struggle the first Christians went through, may very well have been
 added to the original character by Apologists and Sectarians who, at
 that time, could ill afford to consider nice psychological points,
 seeing that what they needed, above all, was a wrangling and abusive
 deity. These two conflicting halves in the character of the Christ of
 the Gospels, which no sound psychology can ever reconcile, Nietzsche
 always kept distinct in his own mind; he could not credit the same man
 with sentiments sometimes so noble and at other times so vulgar, and
 in presenting us with this new portrait of the Saviour, purged of all
 impurities, Nietzsche rendered military honours to a foe, which far
 exceed in worth all that His most ardent disciples have ever claimed for
 Him. In verse 26 we are vividly reminded of Herbert Spencer's words "'Le
 mariage de convenance' is legalised prostitution."
 
 Chapter LXIX. The Shadow.
 
 Here we have a description of that courageous and wayward spirit that
 literally haunts the footsteps of every great thinker and every great
 leader; sometimes with the result that it loses all aims, all hopes,
 and all trust in a definite goal. It is the case of the bravest and
 most broad-minded men of to-day. These literally shadow the most daring
 movements in the science and art of their generation; they completely
 lose their bearings and actually find themselves, in the end, without a
 way, a goal, or a home. "On every surface have I already sat!...I become
 thin, I am almost equal to a shadow!" At last, in despair, such men
 do indeed cry out: "Nothing is true; all is permitted," and then they
 become mere wreckage. "Too much hath become clear unto me: now nothing
 mattereth to me any more. Nothing liveth any longer that I love,--how
 should I still love myself! Have I still a goal? Where is MY home?"
 Zarathustra realises the danger threatening such a man. "Thy danger is
 not small, thou free spirit and wanderer," he says. "Thou hast had a bad
 day. See that a still worse evening doth not overtake thee!" The danger
 Zarathustra refers to is precisely this, that even a prison may seem a
 blessing to such a man. At least the bars keep him in a place of rest;
 a place of confinement, at its worst, is real. "Beware lest in the end
 a narrow faith capture thee," says Zarathustra, "for now everything that
 is narrow and fixed seduceth and tempteth thee."
 
 Chapter LXX. Noontide.
 
 At the noon of life Nietzsche said he entered the world; with him
 man came of age. We are now held responsible for our actions; our old
 guardians, the gods and demi-gods of our youth, the superstitions and
 fears of our childhood, withdraw; the field lies open before us; we
 lived through our morning with but one master--chance--; let us see to
 it that we MAKE our afternoon our own (see Note XLIX., Part III.).
 
 Chapter LXXI. The Greeting.
 
 Here I think I may claim that my contention in regard to the purpose and
 aim of the whole of Nietzsche's philosophy (as stated at the beginning
 of my Notes on Part IV.) is completely upheld. He fought for "all who
 do not want to live, unless they learn again to HOPE--unless THEY learn
 (from him) the GREAT hope!" Zarathustra's address to his guests shows
 clearly enough how he wished to help them: "I DO NOT TREAT MY WARRIORS
 INDULGENTLY," he says: "how then could ye be fit for MY warfare?" He
 rebukes and spurns them, no word of love comes from his lips. Elsewhere
 he says a man should be a hard bed to his friend, thus alone can he be
 of use to him. Nietzsche would be a hard bed to higher men. He would
 make them harder; for, in order to be a law unto himself, man must
 possess the requisite hardness. "I wait for higher ones, stronger ones,
 more triumphant ones, merrier ones, for such as are built squarely in
 body and soul." He says in par. 6 of "Higher Man":--
 
 "Ye higher men, think ye that I am here to put right what ye have put
 wrong? Or that I wished henceforth to make snugger couches for you
 sufferers? Or show you restless, miswandering, misclimbing ones new and
 easier footpaths?"
 
 "Nay! Nay! Three times nay! Always more, always better ones of your type
 shall succumb--for ye shall always have it worse and harder."
 
 Chapter LXXII. The Supper.
 
 In the first seven verses of this discourse, I cannot help seeing
 a gentle allusion to Schopenhauer's habits as a bon-vivant. For a
 pessimist, be it remembered, Schopenhauer led quite an extraordinary
 life. He ate well, loved well, played the flute well, and I believe he
 smoked the best cigars. What follows is clear enough.
 
 Chapter LXXIII. The Higher Man. Par. 1.
 
 Nietzsche admits, here, that at one time he had thought of appealing to
 the people, to the crowd in the market-place, but that he had ultimately
 to abandon the task. He bids higher men depart from the market-place.
 
 Par. 3.
 
 Here we are told quite plainly what class of men actually owe all their
 impulses and desires to the instinct of self-preservation. The struggle
 for existence is indeed the only spur in the case of such people.
 To them it matters not in what shape or condition man be preserved,
 provided only he survive. The transcendental maxim that "Life per se is
 precious" is the ruling maxim here.
 
 Par. 4.
 
 In the Note on Chapter LVII. (end) I speak of Nietzsche's elevation of
 the virtue, Courage, to the highest place among the virtues. Here he
 tells higher men the class of courage he expects from them.
 
 Pars. 5, 6.
 
 These have already been referred to in the Notes on Chapters LVII. (end)
 and LXXI.
 
 Par. 7.
 
 I suggest that the last verse in this paragraph strongly confirms the
 view that Nietzsche's teaching was always meant by him to be esoteric
 and for higher man alone.
 
 Par. 9.
 
 In the last verse, here, another shaft of light is thrown upon the
 Immaculate Perception or so-called "pure objectivity" of the scientific
 mind. "Freedom from fever is still far from being knowledge." Where a
 man's emotions cease to accompany him in his investigations, he is
 not necessarily nearer the truth. Says Spencer, in the Preface to his
 Autobiography:--"In the genesis of a system of thought, the emotional
 nature is a large factor: perhaps as large a factor as the intellectual
 nature" (see pages 134, 141 of Vol. I., "Thoughts out of Season").
 
 Pars. 10, 11.
 
 When we approach Nietzsche's philosophy we must be prepared to be
 independent thinkers; in fact, the greatest virtue of his works is
 perhaps the subtlety with which they impose the obligation upon one
 of thinking alone, of scoring off one's own bat, and of shifting
 intellectually for oneself.
 
 Par. 13.
 
 "I am a railing alongside the torrent; whoever is able to grasp me, may
 grasp me! Your crutch, however, I am not." These two paragraphs are an
 exhortation to higher men to become independent.
 
 Par. 15.
 
 Here Nietzsche perhaps exaggerates the importance of heredity. As,
 however, the question is by no means one on which we are all agreed,
 what he says is not without value.
 
 A very important principle in Nietzsche's philosophy is enunciated in
 the first verse of this paragraph. "The higher its type, always the
 seldomer doth a thing succeed" (see page 82 of "Beyond Good and Evil").
 Those who, like some political economists, talk in a business-like way
 about the terrific waste of human life and energy, deliberately overlook
 the fact that the waste most to be deplored usually occurs among
 higher individuals. Economy was never precisely one of nature's leading
 principles. All this sentimental wailing over the larger proportion
 of failures than successes in human life, does not seem to take into
 account the fact that it is the rarest thing on earth for a highly
 organised being to attain to the fullest development and activity of all
 its functions, simply because it is so highly organised. The blind Will
 to Power in nature therefore stands in urgent need of direction by man.
 
 Pars. 16, 17, 18, 19, 20.
 
 These paragraphs deal with Nietzsche's protest against the democratic
 seriousness (Pobelernst) of modern times. "All good things laugh," he
 says, and his final command to the higher men is, "LEARN, I pray you--to
 laugh." All that is GOOD, in Nietzsche's sense, is cheerful. To be able
 to crack a joke about one's deepest feelings is the greatest test of
 their value. The man who does not laugh, like the man who does not make
 faces, is already a buffoon at heart.
 
 "What hath hitherto been the greatest sin here on earth? Was it not the
 word of him who said: 'Woe unto them that laugh now!' Did he himself
 find no cause for laughter on the earth? Then he sought badly. A child
 even findeth cause for it."
 
 Chapter LXXIV. The Song of Melancholy.
 
 After his address to the higher men, Zarathustra goes out into the
 open to recover himself. Meanwhile the magician (Wagner), seizing the
 opportunity in order to draw them all into his net once more, sings the
 Song of Melancholy.
 
 Chapter LXXV. Science.
 
 The only one to resist the "melancholy voluptuousness" of his art, is
 the spiritually conscientious one--the scientific specialist of whom we
 read in the discourse entitled "The Leech". He takes the harp from the
 magician and cries for air, while reproving the musician in the style
 of "The Case of Wagner". When the magician retaliates by saying that the
 spiritually conscientious one could have understood little of his song,
 the latter replies: "Thou praisest me in that thou separatest me from
 thyself." The speech of the scientific man to his fellow higher men is
 well worth studying. By means of it, Nietzsche pays a high tribute to
 the honesty of the true specialist, while, in representing him as the
 only one who can resist the demoniacal influence of the magician's
 music, he elevates him at a stroke, above all those present. Zarathustra
 and the spiritually conscientious one join issue at the end on the
 question of the proper place of "fear" in man's history, and Nietzsche
 avails himself of the opportunity in order to restate his views
 concerning the relation of courage to humanity. It is precisely because
 courage has played the most important part in our development that
 he would not see it vanish from among our virtues to-day. "...courage
 seemeth to me the entire primitive history of man."
 
 Chapter LXXVI. Among the Daughters of the Desert.
 
 This tells its own tale.
 
 Chapter LXXVII. The Awakening.
 
 In this discourse, Nietzsche wishes to give his followers a warning.
 He thinks he has so far helped them that they have become convalescent,
 that new desires are awakened in them and that new hopes are in their
 arms and legs. But he mistakes the nature of the change. True, he has
 helped them, he has given them back what they most need, i.e., belief in
 believing--the confidence in having confidence in something, but how
 do they use it? This belief in faith, if one can so express it without
 seeming tautological, has certainly been restored to them, and in
 the first flood of their enthusiasm they use it by bowing down and
 worshipping an ass! When writing this passage, Nietzsche was obviously
 thinking of the accusations which were levelled at the early Christians
 by their pagan contemporaries. It is well known that they were supposed
 not only to be eaters of human flesh but also ass-worshippers, and among
 the Roman graffiti, the most famous is the one found on the Palatino,
 showing a man worshipping a cross on which is suspended a figure
 with the head of an ass (see Minucius Felix, "Octavius" IX.; Tacitus,
 "Historiae" v. 3; Tertullian, "Apologia", etc.). Nietzsche's obvious
 moral, however, is that great scientists and thinkers, once they have
 reached the wall encircling scepticism and have thereby learned to
 recover their confidence in the act of believing, as such, usually
 manifest the change in their outlook by falling victims to the narrowest
 and most superstitious of creeds. So much for the introduction of the
 ass as an object of worship.
 
 Now, with regard to the actual service and Ass-Festival, no reader who
 happens to be acquainted with the religious history of the Middle Ages
 will fail to see the allusion here to the asinaria festa which were by
 no means uncommon in France, Germany, and elsewhere in Europe during the
 thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth centuries.
 
 Chapter LXXVIII. The Ass-Festival.
 
 At length, in the middle of their feast, Zarathustra bursts in upon
 them and rebukes them soundly. But he does not do so long; in the
 Ass-Festival, it suddenly occurs to him, that he is concerned with a
 ceremony that may not be without its purpose, as something foolish but
 necessary--a recreation for wise men. He is therefore highly pleased
 that the higher men have all blossomed forth; they therefore require
 new festivals,--"A little valiant nonsense, some divine service and
 ass-festival, some old joyful Zarathustra fool, some blusterer to blow
 their souls bright."
 
 He tells them not to forget that night and the ass-festival, for "such
 things only the convalescent devise! And should ye celebrate it again,"
 he concludes, "do it from love to yourselves, do it also from love to
 me! And in remembrance of ME!"
 
 Chapter LXXIX. The Drunken Song.
 
 It were the height of presumption to attempt to fix any particular
 interpretation of my own to the words of this song. With what has gone
 before, the reader, while reading it as poetry, should be able to seek
 and find his own meaning in it. The doctrine of the Eternal Recurrence
 appears for the last time here, in an art-form. Nietzsche lays stress
 upon the fact that all happiness, all delight, longs for repetitions,
 and just as a child cries "Again! Again!" to the adult who happens to
 be amusing him; so the man who sees a meaning, and a joyful meaning, in
 existence must also cry "Again!" and yet "Again!" to all his life.
 
 Chapter LXXX. The Sign.
 
 In this discourse, Nietzsche disassociates himself finally from the
 higher men, and by the symbol of the lion, wishes to convey to us that
 he has won over and mastered the best and the most terrible in nature.
 That great power and tenderness are kin, was already his belief in
 1875--eight years before he wrote this speech, and when the birds and
 the lion come to him, it is because he is the embodiment of the two
 qualities. All that is terrible and great in nature, the higher men are
 not yet prepared for; for they retreat horror-stricken into the cave
 when the lion springs at them; but Zarathustra makes not a move towards
 them. He was tempted to them on the previous day, he says, but "That
 hath had its time! My suffering and my fellow suffering,--what matter
 about them! Do I then strive after HAPPINESS? I strive after my work!
 Well! the lion hath come, my children are nigh. Zarathustra hath grown
 ripe. MY day beginneth: ARISE NOW, ARISE, THOU GREAT NOONDAY!"
 
 ...
 
 The above I know to be open to much criticism. I shall be grateful to
 all those who will be kind enough to show me where and how I have gone
 wrong; but I should like to point out that, as they stand, I have not
 given to these Notes by any means their final form.
 
 ANTHONY M. LUDOVICI.
 
 London, February 1909.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Thanks to Jeannie Howse, Thierry Alberto and
 the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
 http://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from images
 generously made available by The Internet Archive)
 
 
 
 
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
     | Transcriber's Note:                                       |
     |                                                           |
     | Inconsistent hyphenation in the original document has     |
     | been preserved.                                           |
     |                                                           |
     | Obvious typographical errors have been corrected. For     |
     | a complete list, please see the end of this document.     |
     |                                                           |
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
   THE COMPLETE WORKS
 
   OF
 
   FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
   _The First Complete and Authorised English Translation_
 
   EDITED BY
 
   Dr. OSCAR LEVY
 
   [Illustration]
 
   VOLUME THREE
 
   ON THE FUTURE OF OUR
   EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
   _FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE_
 
   ON THE FUTURE OF OUR
   EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS
 
 
   TRANSLATED, WITH INTRODUCTION, BY
 
   J.M. KENNEDY
 
   T.N. FOULIS
   13 & 15 FREDERICK STREET
   EDINBURGH: and LONDON
   1910
 
 
 
 
   ALL RIGHTS RESERVED
 
   _Printed by_ MORRISON & GIBB LIMITED, _Edinburgh_.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 (_To be read before the lectures, although it in no way relates to
 them._)
 
 
 The reader from whom I expect something must possess three qualities:
 he must be calm and must read without haste; he must not be ever
 interposing his own personality and his own special "culture"; and he
 must not expect as the ultimate results of his study of these pages
 that he will be presented with a set of new formul. I do not propose
 to furnish formul or new plans of study for _Gymnasia_ or other
 schools; and I am much more inclined to admire the extraordinary power
 of those who are able to cover the whole distance between the depths
 of empiricism and the heights of special culture-problems, and who
 again descend to the level of the driest rules and the most neatly
 expressed formul. I shall be content if only I can ascend a tolerably
 lofty mountain, from the summit of which, after having recovered my
 breath, I may obtain a general survey of the ground; for I shall never
 be able, in this book, to satisfy the votaries of tabulated rules.
 Indeed, I see a time coming when serious men, working together in the
 service of a completely rejuvenated and purified culture, may again
 become the directors of a system of everyday instruction, calculated
 to promote that culture; and they will probably be compelled once more
 to draw up sets of rules: but how remote this time now seems! And what
 may not happen meanwhile! It is just possible that between now and
 then all _Gymnasia_--yea, and perhaps all universities, may be
 destroyed, or have become so utterly transformed that their very
 regulations may, in the eyes of future generations, seem to be but the
 relics of the cave-dwellers' age.
 
 This book is intended for calm readers,--for men who have not yet been
 drawn into the mad headlong rush of our hurry-skurrying age, and who
 do not experience any idolatrous delight in throwing themselves
 beneath its chariot-wheels. It is for men, therefore, who are not
 accustomed to estimate the value of everything according to the amount
 of time it either saves or wastes. In short, it is for the few. These,
 we believe, "still have time." Without any qualms of conscience they
 may improve the most fruitful and vigorous hours of their day in
 meditating on the future of our education; they may even believe when
 the evening has come that they have used their day in the most
 dignified and useful way, namely, in the _meditatio generis futuri_.
 No one among them has yet forgotten to think while reading a book; he
 still understands the secret of reading between the lines, and is
 indeed so generous in what he himself brings to his study, that he
 continues to reflect upon what he has read, perhaps long after he has
 laid the book aside. And he does this, not because he wishes to write
 a criticism about it or even another book; but simply because
 reflection is a pleasant pastime to him. Frivolous spendthrift! Thou
 art a reader after my own heart; for thou wilt be patient enough to
 accompany an author any distance, even though he himself cannot yet
 see the goal at which he is aiming,--even though he himself feels only
 that he must at all events honestly believe in a goal, in order that a
 future and possibly very remote generation may come face to face with
 that towards which we are now blindly and instinctively groping.
 Should any reader demur and suggest that all that is required is
 prompt and bold reform; should he imagine that a new "organisation"
 introduced by the State, were all that is necessary, then we fear he
 would have misunderstood not only the author but the very nature of
 the problem under consideration.
 
 The third and most important stipulation is, that he should in no case
 be constantly bringing himself and his own "culture" forward, after
 the style of most modern men, as the correct standard and measure of
 all things. We would have him so highly educated that he could even
 think meanly of his education or despise it altogether. Only thus
 would he be able to trust entirely to the author's guidance; for it is
 only by virtue of ignorance and his consciousness of ignorance, that
 the latter can dare to make himself heard. Finally, the author would
 wish his reader to be fully alive to the specific character of our
 present barbarism and of that which distinguishes us, as the
 barbarians of the nineteenth century, from other barbarians.
 
 Now, with this book in his hand, the writer seeks all those who may
 happen to be wandering, hither and thither, impelled by feelings
 similar to his own. Allow yourselves to be discovered--ye lonely ones
 in whose existence I believe! Ye unselfish ones, suffering in
 yourselves from the corruption of the German spirit! Ye contemplative
 ones who cannot, with hasty glances, turn your eyes swiftly from one
 surface to another! Ye lofty thinkers, of whom Aristotle said that ye
 wander through life vacillating and inactive so long as no great
 honour or glorious Cause calleth you to deeds! It is you I summon!
 Refrain this once from seeking refuge in your lairs of solitude and
 dark misgivings. Bethink you that this book was framed to be your
 herald. When ye shall go forth to battle in your full panoply, who
 among you will not rejoice in looking back upon the herald who rallied
 you?
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 The title I gave to these lectures ought, like all titles, to have
 been as definite, as plain, and as significant as possible; now,
 however, I observe that owing to a certain excess of precision, in its
 present form it is too short and consequently misleading. My first
 duty therefore will be to explain the title, together with the object
 of these lectures, to you, and to apologise for being obliged to do
 this. When I promised to speak to you concerning the future of our
 educational institutions, I was not thinking especially of the
 evolution of our particular institutions in Ble. However frequently
 my general observations may seem to bear particular application to our
 own conditions here, I personally have no desire to draw these
 inferences, and do not wish to be held responsible if they should be
 drawn, for the simple reason that I consider myself still far too much
 an inexperienced stranger among you, and much too superficially
 acquainted with your methods, to pretend to pass judgment upon any
 such special order of scholastic establishments, or to predict the
 probable course their development will follow. On the other hand, I
 know full well under what distinguished auspices I have to deliver
 these lectures--namely, in a city which is striving to educate and
 enlighten its inhabitants on a scale so magnificently out of
 proportion to its size, that it must put all larger cities to shame.
 This being so, I presume I am justified in assuming that in a quarter
 where so much is _done_ for the things of which I wish to speak,
 people must also _think_ a good deal about them. My desire--yea, my
 very first condition, therefore, would be to become united in spirit
 with those who have not only thought very deeply upon educational
 problems, but have also the will to promote what they think to be
 right by all the means in their power. And, in view of the
 difficulties of my task and the limited time at my disposal, to such
 listeners, alone, in my audience, shall I be able to make myself
 understood--and even then, it will be on condition that they shall
 guess what I can do no more than suggest, that they shall supply what
 I am compelled to omit; in brief, that they shall need but to be
 reminded and not to be taught. Thus, while I disclaim all desire of
 being taken for an uninvited adviser on questions relating to the
 schools and the University of Ble, I repudiate even more emphatically
 still the rle of a prophet standing on the horizon of civilisation
 and pretending to predict the future of education and of scholastic
 organisation. I can no more project my vision through such vast
 periods of time than I can rely upon its accuracy when it is brought
 too close to an object under examination. With my title: _Our_
 Educational Institutions, I wish to refer neither to the
 establishments in Ble nor to the incalculably vast number of other
 scholastic institutions which exist throughout the nations of the
 world to-day; but I wish to refer to _German institutions_ of the kind
 which we rejoice in here. It is their future that will now engage our
 attention, _i.e._ the future of German elementary, secondary, and
 public schools (Gymnasien) and universities. While pursuing our
 discussion, however, we shall for once avoid all comparisons and
 valuations, and guard more especially against that flattering illusion
 that our conditions should be regarded as the standard for all others
 and as surpassing them. Let it suffice that they are our institutions,
 that they have not become a part of ourselves by mere accident, and
 were not laid upon us like a garment; but that they are living
 monuments of important steps in the progress of civilisation, in some
 respects even the furniture of a bygone age, and as such link us with
 the past of our people, and are such a sacred and venerable legacy
 that I can only undertake to speak of the future of our educational
 institutions in the sense of their being a most probable approximation
 to the ideal spirit which gave them birth. I am, moreover, convinced
 that the numerous alterations which have been introduced into these
 institutions within recent years, with the view of bringing them
 up-to-date, are for the most part but distortions and aberrations of
 the originally sublime tendencies given to them at their foundation.
 And what we dare to hope from the future, in this behalf, partakes so
 much of the nature of a rejuvenation, a reviviscence, and a refining
 of the spirit of Germany that, as a result of this very process, our
 educational institutions may also be indirectly remoulded and born
 again, so as to appear at once old and new, whereas now they only
 profess to be "modern" or "up-to-date."
 
 Now it is only in the spirit of the hope above mentioned that I wish
 to speak of the future of our educational institutions: and this is
 the second point in regard to which I must tender an apology from the
 outset. The "prophet" pose is such a presumptuous one that it seems
 almost ridiculous to deny that I have the intention of adopting it.
 No one should attempt to describe the future of our education, and
 the means and methods of instruction relating thereto, in a prophetic
 spirit, unless he can prove that the picture he draws already exists
 in germ to-day, and that all that is required is the extension and
 development of this embryo if the necessary modifications are to be
 produced in schools and other educational institutions. All I ask,
 is, like a Roman haruspex, to be allowed to steal glimpses of the
 future out of the very entrails of existing conditions, which, in
 this case, means no more than to hand the laurels of victory to any
 one of the many forces tending to make itself felt in our present
 educational system, despite the fact that the force in question may
 be neither a favourite, an esteemed, nor a very extensive one. I
 confidently assert that it will be victorious, however, because it
 has the strongest and mightiest of all allies in nature herself; and
 in this respect it were well did we not forget that scores of the
 very first principles of our modern educational methods are
 thoroughly artificial, and that the most fatal weaknesses of the
 present day are to be ascribed to this artificiality. He who feels in
 complete harmony with the present state of affairs and who acquiesces
 in it _as something_ "_selbstverstndliches_,"[1] excites our envy
 neither in regard to his faith nor in regard to that egregious word
 "_selbstverstndlich_," so frequently heard in fashionable circles.
 
 He, however, who holds the opposite view and is therefore in despair,
 does not need to fight any longer: all he requires is to give himself
 up to solitude in order soon to be alone. Albeit, between those who
 take everything for granted and these anchorites, there stand the
 _fighters_--that is to say, those who still have hope, and as the
 noblest and sublimest example of this class, we recognise Schiller as
 he is described by Goethe in his "Epilogue to the Bell."
 
     "Brighter now glow'd his cheek, and still more bright
     With that unchanging, ever youthful glow:--
     That courage which o'ercomes, in hard-fought fight,
     Sooner or later ev'ry earthly foe,--
     That faith which soaring to the realms of light,
     Now boldly presseth on, now bendeth low,
     So that the good may work, wax, thrive amain,
     So that the day the noble may attain."[2]
 
 I should like you to regard all I have just said as a kind of preface,
 the object of which is to illustrate the title of my lectures and to
 guard me against any possible misunderstanding and unjustified
 criticisms. And now, in order to give you a rough outline of the range
 of ideas from which I shall attempt to form a judgment concerning our
 educational institutions, before proceeding to disclose my views and
 turning from the title to the main theme, I shall lay a scheme before
 you which, like a coat of arms, will serve to warn all strangers who
 come to my door, as to the nature of the house they are about to
 enter, in case they may feel inclined, after having examined the
 device, to turn their backs on the premises that bear it. My scheme is
 as follows:--
 
 Two seemingly antagonistic forces, equally deleterious in their
 actions and ultimately combining to produce their results, are at
 present ruling over our educational institutions, although these were
 based originally upon very different principles. These forces are: a
 striving to achieve the greatest possible _extension of education_ on
 the one hand, and a tendency _to minimise and to weaken it_ on the
 other. The first-named would fain spread learning among the greatest
 possible number of people, the second would compel education to
 renounce its highest and most independent claims in order to
 subordinate itself to the service of the State. In the face of these
 two antagonistic tendencies, we could but give ourselves up to
 despair, did we not see the possibility of promoting the cause of two
 other contending factors which are fortunately as completely German as
 they are rich in promises for the future; I refer to the present
 movement towards _limiting and concentrating_ education as the
 antithesis of the first of the forces above mentioned, and that other
 movement towards the _strengthening and the independence_ of education
 as the antithesis of the second force. If we should seek a warrant for
 our belief in the ultimate victory of the two last-named movements, we
 could find it in the fact that both of the forces which we hold to be
 deleterious are so opposed to the eternal purpose of nature as the
 concentration of education for the few is in harmony with it, and is
 true, whereas the first two forces could succeed only in founding a
 culture false to the root.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] Selbstverstndlich = "granted or self-understood."
 
 [2] _The Poems of Goethe._ Edgar Alfred Bowring's Translation. (Ed.
 1853.)
 
 
 
 
 THE FUTURE OF OUR EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS.
 
 
 
 
 FIRST LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 16th of January 1872._)
 
 
 Ladies and Gentlemen,--The subject I now propose to consider with you
 is such a serious and important one, and is in a sense so disquieting,
 that, like you, I would gladly turn to any one who could proffer some
 information concerning it,--were he ever so young, were his ideas ever
 so improbable--provided that he were able, by the exercise of his own
 faculties, to furnish some satisfactory and sufficient explanation. It
 is just possible that he may have had the opportunity of _hearing_
 sound views expressed in reference to the vexed question of the future
 of our educational institutions, and that he may wish to repeat them
 to you; he may even have had distinguished teachers, fully qualified
 to foretell what is to come, and, like the _haruspices_ of Rome, able
 to do so after an inspection of the entrails of the Present.
 
 Indeed, you yourselves may expect something of this kind from me. I
 happened once, in strange but perfectly harmless circumstances, to
 overhear a conversation on this subject between two remarkable men,
 and the more striking points of the discussion, together with their
 manner of handling the theme, are so indelibly imprinted on my memory
 that, whenever I reflect on these matters, I invariably find myself
 falling into their grooves of thought. I cannot, however, profess to
 have the same courageous confidence which they displayed, both in
 their daring utterance of forbidden truths, and in the still more
 daring conception of the hopes with which they astonished me. It
 therefore seemed to me to be in the highest degree important that a
 record of this conversation should be made, so that others might be
 incited to form a judgment concerning the striking views and
 conclusions it contains: and, to this end, I had special grounds for
 believing that I should do well to avail myself of the opportunity
 afforded by this course of lectures.
 
 I am well aware of the nature of the community to whose serious
 consideration I now wish to commend that conversation--I know it to be
 a community which is striving to educate and enlighten its members on
 a scale so magnificently out of proportion to its size that it must
 put all larger cities to shame. This being so, I presume I may take it
 for granted that in a quarter where so much is _done_ for the things
 of which I wish to speak, people must also _think_ a good deal about
 them. In my account of the conversation already mentioned, I shall be
 able to make myself completely understood only to those among my
 audience who will be able to guess what I can do no more than suggest,
 who will supply what I am compelled to omit, and who, above all, need
 but to be reminded and not taught.
 
 Listen, therefore, ladies and gentlemen, while I recount my harmless
 experience and the less harmless conversation between the two
 gentlemen whom, so far, I have not named.
 
 Let us now imagine ourselves in the position of a young student--that
 is to say, in a position which, in our present age of bewildering
 movement and feverish excitability, has become an almost impossible
 one. It is necessary to have lived through it in order to believe that
 such careless self-lulling and comfortable indifference to the moment,
 or to time in general, are possible. In this condition I, and a friend
 about my own age, spent a year at the University of Bonn on the
 Rhine,--it was a year which, in its complete lack of plans and
 projects for the future, seems almost like a dream to me now--a dream
 framed, as it were, by two periods of growth. We two remained quiet
 and peaceful, although we were surrounded by fellows who in the main
 were very differently disposed, and from time to time we experienced
 considerable difficulty in meeting and resisting the somewhat too
 pressing advances of the young men of our own age. Now, however, that
 I can look upon the stand we had to take against these opposing
 forces, I cannot help associating them in my mind with those checks we
 are wont to receive in our dreams, as, for instance, when we imagine
 we are able to fly and yet feel ourselves held back by some
 incomprehensible power.
 
 I and my friend had many reminiscences in common, and these dated from
 the period of our boyhood upwards. One of these I must relate to you,
 since it forms a sort of prelude to the harmless experience already
 mentioned. On the occasion of a certain journey up the Rhine, which we
 had made together one summer, it happened that he and I independently
 conceived the very same plan at the same hour and on the same spot,
 and we were so struck by this unwonted coincidence that we determined
 to carry the plan out forthwith. We resolved to found a kind of small
 club which would consist of ourselves and a few friends, and the
 object of which would be to provide us with a stable and binding
 organisation directing and adding interest to our creative impulses in
 art and literature; or, to put it more plainly: each of us would be
 pledged to present an original piece of work to the club once a
 month,--either a poem, a treatise, an architectural design, or a
 musical composition, upon which each of the others, in a friendly
 spirit, would have to pass free and unrestrained criticism.
 
 We thus hoped, by means of mutual correction, to be able both to
 stimulate and to chasten our creative impulses and, as a matter of
 fact, the success of the scheme was such that we have both always felt
 a sort of respectful attachment for the hour and the place at which it
 first took shape in our minds.
 
 This attachment was very soon transformed into a rite; for we all
 agreed to go, whenever it was possible to do so, once a year to that
 lonely spot near Rolandseck, where on that summer's day, while sitting
 together, lost in meditation, we were suddenly inspired by the same
 thought. Frankly speaking, the rules which were drawn up on the
 formation of the club were never very strictly observed; but owing to
 the very fact that we had many sins of omission on our conscience
 during our student-year in Bonn, when we were once more on the banks
 of the Rhine, we firmly resolved not only to observe our rule, but
 also to gratify our feelings and our sense of gratitude by reverently
 visiting that spot near Rolandseck on the day appointed.
 
 It was, however, with some difficulty that we were able to carry our
 plans into execution; for, on the very day we had selected for our
 excursion, the large and lively students' association, which always
 hindered us in our flights, did their utmost to put obstacles in our
 way and to hold us back. Our association had organised a general
 holiday excursion to Rolandseck on the very day my friend and I had
 fixed upon, the object of the outing being to assemble all its members
 for the last time at the close of the half-year and to send them home
 with pleasant recollections of their last hours together.
 
 The day was a glorious one; the weather was of the kind which, in our
 climate at least, only falls to our lot in late summer: heaven and
 earth merged harmoniously with one another, and, glowing wondrously in
 the sunshine, autumn freshness blended with the blue expanse above.
 Arrayed in the bright fantastic garb in which, amid the gloomy
 fashions now reigning, students alone may indulge, we boarded a
 steamer which was gaily decorated in our honour, and hoisted our flag
 on its mast. From both banks of the river there came at intervals the
 sound of signal-guns, fired according to our orders, with the view of
 acquainting both our host in Rolandseck and the inhabitants in the
 neighbourhood with our approach. I shall not speak of the noisy
 journey from the landing-stage, through the excited and expectant
 little place, nor shall I refer to the esoteric jokes exchanged
 between ourselves; I also make no mention of a feast which became both
 wild and noisy, or of an extraordinary musical production in the
 execution of which, whether as soloists or as chorus, we all
 ultimately had to share, and which I, as musical adviser of our club,
 had not only had to rehearse, but was then forced to conduct. Towards
 the end of this piece, which grew ever wilder and which was sung to
 ever quicker time, I made a sign to my friend, and just as the last
 chord rang like a yell through the building, he and I vanished,
 leaving behind us a raging pandemonium.
 
 In a moment we were in the refreshing and breathless stillness of
 nature. The shadows were already lengthening, the sun still shone
 steadily, though it had sunk a good deal in the heavens, and from the
 green and glittering waves of the Rhine a cool breeze was wafted over
 our hot faces. Our solemn rite bound us only in so far as the latest
 hours of the day were concerned, and we therefore determined to employ
 the last moments of clear daylight by giving ourselves up to one of
 our many hobbies.
 
 At that time we were passionately fond of pistol-shooting, and both of
 us in later years found the skill we had acquired as amateurs of great
 use in our military career. Our club servant happened to know the
 somewhat distant and elevated spot which we used as a range, and had
 carried our pistols there in advance. The spot lay near the upper
 border of the wood which covered the lesser heights behind Rolandseck:
 it was a small uneven plateau, close to the place we had consecrated
 in memory of its associations. On a wooded slope alongside of our
 shooting-range there was a small piece of ground which had been
 cleared of wood, and which made an ideal halting-place; from it one
 could get a view of the Rhine over the tops of the trees and the
 brushwood, so that the beautiful, undulating lines of the Seven
 Mountains and above all of the Drachenfels bounded the horizon against
 the group of trees, while in the centre of the bow formed by the
 glistening Rhine itself the island of Nonnenwrth stood out as if
 suspended in the river's arms. This was the place which had become
 sacred to us through the dreams and plans we had had in common, and to
 which we intended to withdraw, later in the evening,--nay, to which we
 should be obliged to withdraw, if we wished to close the day in
 accordance with the law we had imposed on ourselves.
 
 At one end of the little uneven plateau, and not very far away, there
 stood the mighty trunk of an oak-tree, prominently visible against a
 background quite bare of trees and consisting merely of low undulating
 hills in the distance. Working together, we had once carved a
 pentagram in the side of this tree-trunk. Years of exposure to rain
 and storm had slightly deepened the channels we had cut, and the
 figure seemed a welcome target for our pistol-practice. It was already
 late in the afternoon when we reached our improvised range, and our
 oak-stump cast a long and attenuated shadow across the barren heath.
 All was still: thanks to the lofty trees at our feet, we were unable
 to catch a glimpse of the valley of the Rhine below. The peacefulness
 of the spot seemed only to intensify the loudness of our
 pistol-shots--and I had scarcely fired my second barrel at the
 pentagram when I felt some one lay hold of my arm and noticed that my
 friend had also some one beside him who had interrupted his loading.
 
 Turning sharply on my heels I found myself face to face with an
 astonished old gentleman, and felt what must have been a very powerful
 dog make a lunge at my back. My friend had been approached by a
 somewhat younger man than I had; but before we could give expression
 to our surprise the older of the two interlopers burst forth in the
 following threatening and heated strain: "No! no!" he called to us,
 "no duels must be fought here, but least of all must you young
 students fight one. Away with these pistols and compose yourselves. Be
 reconciled, shake hands! What?--and are you the salt of the earth,
 the intelligence of the future, the seed of our hopes--and are you
 not even able to emancipate yourselves from the insane code of honour
 and its violent regulations? I will not cast any aspersions on your
 hearts, but your heads certainly do you no credit. You, whose youth is
 watched over by the wisdom of Greece and Rome, and whose youthful
 spirits, at the cost of enormous pains, have been flooded with the
 light of the sages and heroes of antiquity,--can you not refrain from
 making the code of knightly honour--that is to say, the code of folly
 and brutality--the guiding principle of your conduct?--Examine it
 rationally once and for all, and reduce it to plain terms; lay its
 pitiable narrowness bare, and let it be the touchstone, not of your
 hearts but of your minds. If you do not regret it then, it will merely
 show that your head is not fitted for work in a sphere where great
 gifts of discrimination are needful in order to burst the bonds of
 prejudice, and where a well-balanced understanding is necessary for
 the purpose of distinguishing right from wrong, even when the
 difference between them lies deeply hidden and is not, as in this
 case, so ridiculously obvious. In that case, therefore, my lads, try
 to go through life in some other honourable manner; join the army or
 learn a handicraft that pays its way."
 
 To this rough, though admittedly just, flood of eloquence, we replied
 with some irritation, interrupting each other continually in so doing:
 "In the first place, you are mistaken concerning the main point; for
 we are not here to fight a duel at all; but rather to practise
 pistol-shooting. Secondly, you do not appear to know how a real duel
 is conducted;--do you suppose that we should have faced each other in
 this lonely spot, like two highwaymen, without seconds or doctors,
 etc. etc.? Thirdly, with regard to the question of duelling, we each
 have our own opinions, and do not require to be waylaid and surprised
 by the sort of instruction you may feel disposed to give us."
 
 This reply, which was certainly not polite, made a bad impression upon
 the old man. At first, when he heard that we were not about to fight a
 duel, he surveyed us more kindly: but when we reached the last passage
 of our speech, he seemed so vexed that he growled. When, however, we
 began to speak of our point of view, he quickly caught hold of his
 companion, turned sharply round, and cried to us in bitter tones:
 "People should not have points of view, but thoughts!" And then his
 companion added: "Be respectful when a man such as this even makes
 mistakes!"
 
 Meanwhile, my friend, who had reloaded, fired a shot at the pentagram,
 after having cried: "Look out!" This sudden report behind his back
 made the old man savage; once more he turned round and looked sourly
 at my friend, after which he said to his companion in a feeble voice:
 "What shall we do? These young men will be the death of me with their
 firing."--"You should know," said the younger man, turning to us,
 "that your noisy pastimes amount, as it happens on this occasion, to
 an attempt upon the life of philosophy. You observe this venerable
 man,--he is in a position to beg you to desist from firing here. And
 when such a man begs----" "Well, his request is generally granted,"
 the old man interjected, surveying us sternly.
 
 As a matter of fact, we did not know what to make of the whole matter;
 we could not understand what our noisy pastimes could have in common
 with philosophy; nor could we see why, out of regard for polite
 scruples, we should abandon our shooting-range, and at this moment we
 may have appeared somewhat undecided and perturbed. The companion
 noticing our momentary discomfiture, proceeded to explain the matter
 to us.
 
 "We are compelled," he said, "to linger in this immediate
 neighbourhood for an hour or so; we have a rendezvous here. An eminent
 friend of this eminent man is to meet us here this evening; and we had
 actually selected this peaceful spot, with its few benches in the
 midst of the wood, for the meeting. It would really be most unpleasant
 if, owing to your continual pistol-practice, we were to be subjected
 to an unending series of shocks; surely your own feelings will tell
 you that it is impossible for you to continue your firing when you
 hear that he who has selected this quiet and isolated place for a
 meeting with a friend is one of our most eminent philosophers."
 
 This explanation only succeeded in perturbing us the more; for we saw
 a danger threatening us which was even greater than the loss of our
 shooting-range, and we asked eagerly, "Where is this quiet spot?
 Surely not to the left here, in the wood?"
 
 "That is the very place."
 
 "But this evening that place belongs to us," my friend interposed. "We
 must have it," we cried together.
 
 Our long-projected celebration seemed at that moment more important
 than all the philosophies of the world, and we gave such vehement and
 animated utterance to our sentiments that in view of the
 incomprehensible nature of our claims we must have cut a somewhat
 ridiculous figure. At any rate, our philosophical interlopers regarded
 us with expressions of amused inquiry, as if they expected us to
 proffer some sort of apology. But we were silent, for we wished above
 all to keep our secret.
 
 Thus we stood facing one another in silence, while the sunset dyed the
 tree-tops a ruddy gold. The philosopher contemplated the sun, his
 companion contemplated him, and we turned our eyes towards our nook in
 the woods which to-day we seemed in such great danger of losing. A
 feeling of sullen anger took possession of us. What is philosophy, we
 asked ourselves, if it prevents a man from being by himself or from
 enjoying the select company of a friend,--in sooth, if it prevents him
 from becoming a philosopher? For we regarded the celebration of our
 rite as a thoroughly philosophical performance. In celebrating it we
 wished to form plans and resolutions for the future, by means of quiet
 reflections we hoped to light upon an idea which would once again help
 us to form and gratify our spirit in the future, just as that former
 idea had done during our boyhood. The solemn act derived its very
 significance from this resolution, that nothing definite was to be
 done, we were only to be alone, and to sit still and meditate, as we
 had done five years before when we had each been inspired with the
 same thought. It was to be a silent solemnisation, all reminiscence
 and all future; the present was to be as a hyphen between the two. And
 fate, now unfriendly, had just stepped into our magic circle--and we
 knew not how to dismiss her;--the very unusual character of the
 circumstances filled us with mysterious excitement.
 
 Whilst we stood thus in silence for some time, divided into two
 hostile groups, the clouds above waxed ever redder and the evening
 seemed to grow more peaceful and mild; we could almost fancy we heard
 the regular breathing of nature as she put the final touches to her
 work of art--the glorious day we had just enjoyed; when, suddenly, the
 calm evening air was rent by a confused and boisterous cry of joy
 which seemed to come from the Rhine. A number of voices could be heard
 in the distance--they were those of our fellow-students who by that
 time must have taken to the Rhine in small boats. It occurred to us
 that we should be missed and that we should also miss something:
 almost simultaneously my friend and I raised our pistols: our shots
 were echoed back to us, and with their echo there came from the valley
 the sound of a well-known cry intended as a signal of identification.
 For our passion for shooting had brought us both repute and ill-repute
 in our club. At the same time we were conscious that our behaviour
 towards the silent philosophical couple had been exceptionally
 ungentlemanly; they had been quietly contemplating us for some time,
 and when we fired the shock made them draw close up to each other. We
 hurried up to them, and each in our turn cried out: "Forgive us. That
 was our last shot, and it was intended for our friends on the Rhine.
 They have understood us, do you hear? If you insist upon having that
 place among the trees, grant us at least the permission to recline
 there also. You will find a number of benches on the spot: we shall
 not disturb you; we shall sit quite still and shall not utter a word:
 but it is now past seven o'clock and we _must_ go there at once.
 
 "That sounds more mysterious than it is," I added after a pause; "we
 have made a solemn vow to spend this coming hour on that ground, and
 there were reasons for the vow. The spot is sacred to us, owing to
 some pleasant associations, it must also inaugurate a good future for
 us. We shall therefore endeavour to leave you with no disagreeable
 recollections of our meeting--even though we have done much to perturb
 and frighten you."
 
 The philosopher was silent; his companion, however, said: "Our
 promises and plans unfortunately compel us not only to remain, but
 also to spend the same hour on the spot you have selected. It is left
 for us to decide whether fate or perhaps a spirit has been responsible
 for this extraordinary coincidence."
 
 "Besides, my friend," said the philosopher, "I am not half so
 displeased with these warlike youngsters as I was. Did you observe
 how quiet they were a moment ago, when we were contemplating the sun?
 They neither spoke nor smoked, they stood stone still, I even believe
 they meditated."
 
 Turning suddenly in our direction, he said: "_Were_ you meditating?
 Just tell me about it as we proceed in the direction of our common
 trysting-place." We took a few steps together and went down the slope
 into the warm balmy air of the woods where it was already much darker.
 On the way my friend openly revealed his thoughts to the philosopher,
 he confessed how much he had feared that perhaps to-day for the first
 time a philosopher was about to stand in the way of his
 philosophising.
 
 The sage laughed. "What? You were afraid a philosopher would prevent
 your philosophising? This might easily happen: and you have not yet
 experienced such a thing? Has your university life been free from
 experience? You surely attend lectures on philosophy?"
 
 This question discomfited us; for, as a matter of fact, there had been
 no element of philosophy in our education up to that time. In those
 days, moreover, we fondly imagined that everybody who held the post
 and possessed the dignity of a philosopher must perforce be one: we
 were inexperienced and badly informed. We frankly admitted that we had
 not yet belonged to any philosophical college, but that we would
 certainly make up for lost time.
 
 "Then what," he asked, "did you mean when you spoke of
 philosophising?" Said I, "We are at a loss for a definition. But to
 all intents and purposes we meant this, that we wished to make earnest
 endeavours to consider the best possible means of becoming men of
 culture." "That is a good deal and at the same time very little,"
 growled the philosopher; "just you think the matter over. Here are our
 benches, let us discuss the question exhaustively: I shall not disturb
 your meditations with regard to how you are to become men of culture.
 I wish you success and--points of view, as in your duelling questions;
 brand-new, original, and enlightened points of view. The philosopher
 does not wish to prevent your philosophising: but refrain at least
 from disconcerting him with your pistol-shots. Try to imitate the
 Pythagoreans to-day: they, as servants of a true philosophy, had to
 remain silent for five years--possibly you may also be able to remain
 silent for five times fifteen minutes, as servants of your own future
 culture, about which you seem so concerned."
 
 We had reached our destination: the solemnisation of our rite began.
 As on the previous occasion, five years ago, the Rhine was once more
 flowing beneath a light mist, the sky seemed bright and the woods
 exhaled the same fragrance. We took our places on the farthest corner
 of the most distant bench; sitting there we were almost concealed, and
 neither the philosopher nor his companion could see our faces. We were
 alone: when the sound of the philosopher's voice reached us, it had
 become so blended with the rustling leaves and with the buzzing
 murmur of the myriads of living things inhabiting the wooded height,
 that it almost seemed like the music of nature; as a sound it
 resembled nothing more than a distant monotonous plaint. We were
 indeed undisturbed.
 
 Some time elapsed in this way, and while the glow of sunset grew
 steadily paler the recollection of our youthful undertaking in the
 cause of culture waxed ever more vivid. It seemed to us as if we owed
 the greatest debt of gratitude to that little society we had founded;
 for it had done more than merely supplement our public school
 training; it had actually been the only fruitful society we had had,
 and within its frame we even placed our public school life, as a
 purely isolated factor helping us in our general efforts to attain to
 culture.
 
 We knew this, that, thanks to our little society, no thought of
 embracing any particular career had ever entered our minds in those
 days. The all too frequent exploitation of youth by the State, for its
 own purposes--that is to say, so that it may rear useful officials as
 quickly as possible and guarantee their unconditional obedience to it
 by means of excessively severe examinations--had remained quite
 foreign to our education. And to show how little we had been actuated
 by thoughts of utility or by the prospect of speedy advancement and
 rapid success, on that day we were struck by the comforting
 consideration that, even then, we had not yet decided what we should
 be--we had not even troubled ourselves at all on this head. Our little
 society had sown the seeds of this happy indifference in our souls and
 for it alone we were prepared to celebrate the anniversary of its
 foundation with hearty gratitude. I have already pointed out, I think,
 that in the eyes of the present age, which is so intolerant of
 anything that is not useful, such purposeless enjoyment of the moment,
 such a lulling of one's self in the cradle of the present, must seem
 almost incredible and at all events blameworthy. How useless we were!
 And how proud we were of being useless! We used even to quarrel with
 each other as to which of us should have the glory of being the more
 useless. We wished to attach no importance to anything, to have strong
 views about nothing, to aim at nothing; we wanted to take no thought
 for the morrow, and desired no more than to recline comfortably like
 good-for-nothings on the threshold of the present; and we did--bless
 us!
 
 --That, ladies and gentlemen, was our standpoint then!--
 
 Absorbed in these reflections, I was just about to give an answer to
 the question of the future of _our_ Educational Institutions in the
 same self-sufficient way, when it gradually dawned upon me that the
 "natural music," coming from the philosopher's bench had lost its
 original character and travelled to us in much more piercing and
 distinct tones than before. Suddenly I became aware that I was
 listening, that I was eavesdropping, and was passionately interested,
 with both ears keenly alive to every sound. I nudged my friend who was
 evidently somewhat tired, and I whispered: "Don't fall asleep! There
 is something for us to learn over there. It applies to us, even
 though it be not meant for us."
 
 For instance, I heard the younger of the two men defending himself
 with great animation while the philosopher rebuked him with ever
 increasing vehemence. "You are unchanged," he cried to him,
 "unfortunately unchanged. It is quite incomprehensible to me how you
 can still be the same as you were seven years ago, when I saw you for
 the last time and left you with so much misgiving. I fear I must once
 again divest you, however reluctantly, of the skin of modern culture
 which you have donned meanwhile;--and what do I find beneath it? The
 same immutable 'intelligible' character forsooth, according to Kant;
 but unfortunately the same unchanged 'intellectual' character,
 too--which may also be a necessity, though not a comforting one. I ask
 myself to what purpose have I lived as a philosopher, if, possessed as
 you are of no mean intelligence and a genuine thirst for knowledge,
 all the years you have spent in my company have left no deeper
 impression upon you. At present you are behaving as if you had not
 even heard the cardinal principle of all culture, which I went to such
 pains to inculcate upon you during our former intimacy. Tell me,--what
 was that principle?"
 
 "I remember," replied the scolded pupil, "you used to say no one would
 strive to attain to culture if he knew how incredibly small the number
 of really cultured people actually is, and can ever be. And even this
 number of really cultured people would not be possible if a prodigious
 multitude, from reasons opposed to their nature and only led on by an
 alluring delusion, did not devote themselves to education. It were
 therefore a mistake publicly to reveal the ridiculous disproportion
 between the number of really cultured people and the enormous
 magnitude of the educational apparatus. Here lies the whole secret of
 culture--namely, that an innumerable host of men struggle to achieve
 it and work hard to that end, ostensibly in their own interests,
 whereas at bottom it is only in order that it may be possible for the
 few to attain to it."
 
 "That is the principle," said the philosopher,--"and yet you could so
 far forget yourself as to believe that you are one of the few? This
 thought has occurred to you--I can see. That, however, is the result
 of the worthless character of modern education. The rights of genius
 are being democratised in order that people may be relieved of the
 labour of acquiring culture, and their need of it. Every one wants if
 possible to recline in the shade of the tree planted by genius, and to
 escape the dreadful necessity of working for him, so that his
 procreation may be made possible. What? Are you too proud to be a
 teacher? Do you despise the thronging multitude of learners? Do you
 speak contemptuously of the teacher's calling? And, aping my mode of
 life, would you fain live in solitary seclusion, hostilely isolated
 from that multitude? Do you suppose that you can reach at one bound
 what I ultimately had to win for myself only after long and determined
 struggles, in order even to be able to live like a philosopher? And do
 you not fear that solitude will wreak its vengeance upon you? Just
 try living the life of a hermit of culture. One must be blessed with
 overflowing wealth in order to live for the good of all on one's own
 resources! Extraordinary youngsters! They felt it incumbent upon them
 to imitate what is precisely most difficult and most high,--what is
 possible only to the master, when they, above all, should know how
 difficult and dangerous this is, and how many excellent gifts may be
 ruined by attempting it!"
 
 "I will conceal nothing from you, sir," the companion replied. "I have
 heard too much from your lips at odd times and have been too long in
 your company to be able to surrender myself entirely to our present
 system of education and instruction. I am too painfully conscious of
 the disastrous errors and abuses to which you used to call my
 attention--though I very well know that I am not strong enough to hope
 for any success were I to struggle ever so valiantly against them. I
 was overcome by a feeling of general discouragement; my recourse to
 solitude was the result neither of pride nor arrogance. I would fain
 describe to you what I take to be the nature of the educational
 questions now attracting such enormous and pressing attention. It
 seemed to me that I must recognise two main directions in the forces
 at work--two seemingly antagonistic tendencies, equally deleterious in
 their action, and ultimately combining to produce their results: a
 striving to achieve the greatest possible _expansion_ of education on
 the one hand, and a tendency to _minimise and weaken_ it on the
 other. The first-named would, for various reasons, spread learning
 among the greatest number of people; the second would compel education
 to renounce its highest, noblest and sublimest claims in order to
 subordinate itself to some other department of life--such as the
 service of the State.
 
 "I believe I have already hinted at the quarter in which the cry for
 the greatest possible expansion of education is most loudly raised.
 This expansion belongs to the most beloved of the dogmas of modern
 political economy. As much knowledge and education as possible;
 therefore the greatest possible supply and demand--hence as much
 happiness as possible:--that is the formula. In this case utility is
 made the object and goal of education,--utility in the sense of
 gain--the greatest possible pecuniary gain. In the quarter now under
 consideration culture would be defined as that point of vantage which
 enables one to 'keep in the van of one's age,' from which one can see
 all the easiest and best roads to wealth, and with which one controls
 all the means of communication between men and nations. The purpose of
 education, according to this scheme, would be to rear the most
 'current' men possible,--'current' being used here in the sense in
 which it is applied to the coins of the realm. The greater the number
 of such men, the happier a nation will be; and this precisely is the
 purpose of our modern educational institutions: to help every one, as
 far as his nature will allow, to become 'current'; to develop him so
 that his particular degree of knowledge and science may yield him the
 greatest possible amount of happiness and pecuniary gain. Every one
 must be able to form some sort of estimate of himself; he must know
 how much he may reasonably expect from life. The 'bond between
 intelligence and property' which this point of view postulates has
 almost the force of a moral principle. In this quarter all culture is
 loathed which isolates, which sets goals beyond gold and gain, and
 which requires time: it is customary to dispose of such eccentric
 tendencies in education as systems of 'Higher Egotism,' or of 'Immoral
 Culture--Epicureanism.' According to the morality reigning here, the
 demands are quite different; what is required above all is 'rapid
 education,' so that a money-earning creature may be produced with all
 speed; there is even a desire to make this education so thorough that
 a creature may be reared that will be able to earn a _great deal_ of
 money. Men are allowed only the precise amount of culture which is
 compatible with the interests of gain; but that amount, at least, is
 expected from them. In short: mankind has a necessary right to
 happiness on earth--that is why culture is necessary--but on that
 account alone!"
 
 "I must just say something here," said the philosopher. "In the case
 of the view you have described so clearly, there arises the great and
 awful danger that at some time or other the great masses may overleap
 the middle classes and spring headlong into this earthly bliss. That
 is what is now called 'the social question.' It might seem to these
 masses that education for the greatest number of men was only a means
 to the earthly bliss of the few: the 'greatest possible expansion of
 education' so enfeebles education that it can no longer confer
 privileges or inspire respect. The most general form of culture is
 simply barbarism. But I do not wish to interrupt your discussion."
 
 The companion continued: "There are yet other reasons, besides this
 beloved economical dogma, for the expansion of education that is being
 striven after so valiantly everywhere. In some countries the fear of
 religious oppression is so general, and the dread of its results so
 marked, that people in all classes of society long for culture and
 eagerly absorb those elements of it which are supposed to scatter the
 religious instincts. Elsewhere the State, in its turn, strives here
 and there for its own preservation, after the greatest possible
 expansion of education, because it always feels strong enough to bring
 the most determined emancipation, resulting from culture, under its
 yoke, and readily approves of everything which tends to extend
 culture, provided that it be of service to its officials or soldiers,
 but in the main to itself, in its competition with other nations. In
 this case, the foundations of a State must be sufficiently broad and
 firm to constitute a fitting counterpart to the complicated arches of
 culture which it supports, just as in the first case the traces of
 some former religious tyranny must still be felt for a people to be
 driven to such desperate remedies. Thus, wherever I hear the masses
 raise the cry for an expansion of education, I am wont to ask myself
 whether it is stimulated by a greedy lust of gain and property, by
 the memory of a former religious persecution, or by the prudent
 egotism of the State itself.
 
 "On the other hand, it seemed to me that there was yet another
 tendency, not so clamorous, perhaps, but quite as forcible, which,
 hailing from various quarters, was animated by a different
 desire,--the desire to minimise and weaken education.
 
 "In all cultivated circles people are in the habit of whispering to
 one another words something after this style: that it is a general
 fact that, owing to the present frantic exploitation of the scholar in
 the service of his science, his _education_ becomes every day more
 accidental and more uncertain. For the study of science has been
 extended to such interminable lengths that he who, though not
 exceptionally gifted, yet possesses fair abilities, will need to
 devote himself exclusively to one branch and ignore all others if he
 ever wish to achieve anything in his work. Should he then elevate
 himself above the herd by means of his speciality, he still remains
 one of them in regard to all else,--that is to say, in regard to all
 the most important things in life. Thus, a specialist in science gets
 to resemble nothing so much as a factory workman who spends his whole
 life in turning one particular screw or handle on a certain instrument
 or machine, at which occupation he acquires the most consummate skill.
 In Germany, where we know how to drape such painful facts with the
 glorious garments of fancy, this narrow specialisation on the part of
 our learned men is even admired, and their ever greater deviation
 from the path of true culture is regarded as a moral phenomenon.
 'Fidelity in small things,' 'dogged faithfulness,' become expressions
 of highest eulogy, and the lack of culture outside the speciality is
 flaunted abroad as a sign of noble sufficiency.
 
 "For centuries it has been an understood thing that one alluded to
 scholars alone when one spoke of cultured men; but experience tells us
 that it would be difficult to find any necessary relation between the
 two classes to-day. For at present the exploitation of a man for the
 purpose of science is accepted everywhere without the slightest
 scruple. Who still ventures to ask, What may be the value of a science
 which consumes its minions in this vampire fashion? The division of
 labour in science is practically struggling towards the same goal
 which religions in certain parts of the world are consciously striving
 after,--that is to say, towards the decrease and even the destruction
 of learning. That, however, which, in the case of certain religions,
 is a perfectly justifiable aim, both in regard to their origin and
 their history, can only amount to self-immolation when transferred to
 the realm of science. In all matters of a general and serious nature,
 and above all, in regard to the highest philosophical problems, we
 have now already reached a point at which the scientific man, as such,
 is no longer allowed to speak. On the other hand, that adhesive and
 tenacious stratum which has now filled up the interstices between the
 sciences--Journalism--believes it has a mission to fulfil here, and
 this it does, according to its own particular lights--that is to say,
 as its name implies, after the fashion of a day-labourer.
 
 "It is precisely in journalism that the two tendencies combine and
 become one. The expansion and the diminution of education here join
 hands. The newspaper actually steps into the place of culture, and he
 who, even as a scholar, wishes to voice any claim for education, must
 avail himself of this viscous stratum of communication which cements
 the seams between all forms of life, all classes, all arts, and all
 sciences, and which is as firm and reliable as news paper is, as a
 rule. In the newspaper the peculiar educational aims of the present
 culminate, just as the journalist, the servant of the moment, has
 stepped into the place of the genius, of the leader for all time, of
 the deliverer from the tyranny of the moment. Now, tell me,
 distinguished master, what hopes could I still have in a struggle
 against the general topsy-turvification of all genuine aims for
 education; with what courage can I, a single teacher, step forward,
 when I know that the moment any seeds of real culture are sown, they
 will be mercilessly crushed by the roller of this pseudo-culture?
 Imagine how useless the most energetic work on the part of the
 individual teacher must be, who would fain lead a pupil back into the
 distant and evasive Hellenic world and to the real home of culture,
 when in less than an hour, that same pupil will have recourse to a
 newspaper, the latest novel, or one of those learned books, the very
 style of which already bears the revolting impress of modern barbaric
 culture----"
 
 "Now, silence a minute!" interjected the philosopher in a strong and
 sympathetic voice. "I understand you now, and ought never to have
 spoken so crossly to you. You are altogether right, save in your
 despair. I shall now proceed to say a few words of consolation."
 
 
 
 
 SECOND LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 6th of February 1872._)
 
 
 LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,--Those among you whom I now have the pleasure of
 addressing for the first time and whose only knowledge of my first
 lecture has been derived from reports will, I hope, not mind being
 introduced here into the middle of a dialogue which I had begun to
 recount on the last occasion, and the last points of which I must now
 recall. The philosopher's young companion was just pleading openly and
 confidentially with his distinguished tutor, and apologising for
 having so far renounced his calling as a teacher in order to spend his
 days in comfortless solitude. No suspicion of superciliousness or
 arrogance had induced him to form this resolve.
 
 "I have heard too much from your lips at various times," the
 straightforward pupil said, "and have been too long in your company,
 to surrender myself blindly to our present systems of education and
 instruction. I am too painfully conscious of the disastrous errors and
 abuses to which you were wont to call my attention; and yet I know
 that I am far from possessing the requisite strength to meet with
 success, however valiantly I might struggle to shatter the bulwarks
 of this would-be culture. I was overcome by a general feeling of
 depression: my recourse to solitude was not arrogance or
 superciliousness." Whereupon, to account for his behaviour, he
 described the general character of modern educational methods so
 vividly that the philosopher could not help interrupting him in a
 voice full of sympathy, and crying words of comfort to him.
 
 "Now, silence for a minute, my poor friend," he cried; "I can more
 easily understand you now, and should not have lost my patience with
 you. You are altogether right, save in your despair. I shall now
 proceed to say a few words of comfort to you. How long do you suppose
 the state of education in the schools of our time, which seems to
 weigh so heavily upon you, will last? I shall not conceal my views on
 this point from you: its time is over; its days are counted. The first
 who will dare to be quite straightforward in this respect will hear
 his honesty re-echoed back to him by thousands of courageous souls.
 For, at bottom, there is a tacit understanding between the more nobly
 gifted and more warmly disposed men of the present day. Every one of
 them knows what he has had to suffer from the condition of culture in
 schools; every one of them would fain protect his offspring from the
 need of enduring similar drawbacks, even though he himself was
 compelled to submit to them. If these feelings are never quite
 honestly expressed, however, it is owing to a sad want of spirit among
 modern pedagogues. These lack real initiative; there are too few
 practical men among them--that is to say, too few who happen to have
 good and new ideas, and who know that real genius and the real
 practical mind must necessarily come together in the same individuals,
 whilst the sober practical men have no ideas and therefore fall short
 in practice.
 
 "Let any one examine the pedagogic literature of the present; he who
 is not shocked at its utter poverty of spirit and its ridiculously
 awkward antics is beyond being spoiled. Here our philosophy must not
 begin with wonder but with dread; he who feels no dread at this point
 must be asked not to meddle with pedagogic questions. The reverse, of
 course, has been the rule up to the present; those who were terrified
 ran away filled with embarrassment as you did, my poor friend, while
 the sober and fearless ones spread their heavy hands over the most
 delicate technique that has ever existed in art--over the technique of
 education. This, however, will not be possible much longer; at some
 time or other the upright man will appear, who will not only have the
 good ideas I speak of, but who in order to work at their realisation,
 will dare to break with all that exists at present: he may by means of
 a wonderful example achieve what the broad hands, hitherto active,
 could not even imitate--then people will everywhere begin to draw
 comparisons; then men will at least be able to perceive a contrast and
 will be in a position to reflect upon its causes, whereas, at present,
 so many still believe, in perfect good faith, that heavy hands are a
 necessary factor in pedagogic work."
 
 "My dear master," said the younger man, "I wish you could point to
 one single example which would assist me in seeing the soundness of
 the hopes which you so heartily raise in me. We are both acquainted
 with public schools; do you think, for instance, that in respect of
 these institutions anything may be done by means of honesty and good
 and new ideas to abolish the tenacious and antiquated customs now
 extant? In this quarter, it seems to me, the battering-rams of an
 attacking party will have to meet with no solid wall, but with the
 most fatal of stolid and slippery principles. The leader of the
 assault has no visible and tangible opponent to crush, but rather a
 creature in disguise that can transform itself into a hundred
 different shapes and, in each of these, slip out of his grasp, only in
 order to reappear and to confound its enemy by cowardly surrenders and
 feigned retreats. It was precisely the public schools which drove me
 into despair and solitude, simply because I feel that if the struggle
 here leads to victory all other educational institutions must give in;
 but that, if the reformer be forced to abandon his cause here, he may
 as well give up all hope in regard to every other scholastic question.
 Therefore, dear master, enlighten me concerning the public schools;
 what can we hope for in the way of their abolition or reform?"
 
 "I also hold the question of public schools to be as important as you
 do," the philosopher replied. "All other educational institutions must
 fix their aims in accordance with those of the public school system;
 whatever errors of judgment it may suffer from, they suffer from also,
 and if it were ever purified and rejuvenated, they would be purified
 and rejuvenated too. The universities can no longer lay claim to this
 importance as centres of influence, seeing that, as they now stand,
 they are at least, in one important aspect, only a kind of annex to
 the public school system, as I shall shortly point out to you. For the
 moment, let us consider, together, what to my mind constitutes the
 very hopeful struggle of the two possibilities: _either_ that the
 motley and evasive spirit of public schools which has hitherto been
 fostered, will completely vanish, or that it will have to be
 completely purified and rejuvenated. And in order that I may not shock
 you with general propositions, let us first try to recall one of those
 public school experiences which we have all had, and from which we
 have all suffered. Under severe examination what, as a matter of fact,
 is the present _system of teaching German_ in public schools?
 
 "I shall first of all tell you what it should be. Everybody speaks and
 writes German as thoroughly badly as it is just possible to do so in
 an age of newspaper German: that is why the growing youth who happens
 to be both noble and gifted has to be taken by force and put under the
 glass shade of good taste and of severe linguistic discipline. If this
 is not possible, I would prefer in future that Latin be spoken; for I
 am ashamed of a language so bungled and vitiated.
 
 "What would be the duty of a higher educational institution, in this
 respect, if not this--namely, with authority and dignified severity to
 put youths, neglected, as far as their own language is concerned, on
 the right path, and to cry to them: 'Take your own language seriously!
 He who does not regard this matter as a sacred duty does not possess
 even the germ of a higher culture. From your attitude in this matter,
 from your treatment of your mother-tongue, we can judge how highly or
 how lowly you esteem art, and to what extent you are related to it. If
 you notice no physical loathing in yourselves when you meet with
 certain words and tricks of speech in our journalistic jargon, cease
 from striving after culture; for here in your immediate vicinity, at
 every moment of your life, while you are either speaking or writing,
 you have a touchstone for testing how difficult, how stupendous, the
 task of the cultured man is, and how very improbable it must be that
 many of you will ever attain to culture.'
 
 "In accordance with the spirit of this address, the teacher of German
 at a public school would be forced to call his pupil's attention to
 thousands of details, and with the absolute certainty of good taste,
 to forbid their using such words and expressions, for instance, as:
 '_beanspruchen_,' '_vereinnahmen_,' '_einer Sache Rechnung tragen_,'
 '_die Initiative ergreifen_,' '_selbstverstndlich_,'[3] etc., _cum
 tdio in infinitum_. The same teacher would also have to take our
 classical authors and show, line for line, how carefully and with what
 precision every expression has to be chosen when a writer has the
 correct feeling in his heart and has before his eyes a perfect
 conception of all he is writing. He would necessarily urge his pupils,
 time and again, to express the same thought ever more happily; nor
 would he have to abate in rigour until the less gifted in his class
 had contracted an unholy fear of their language, and the others had
 developed great enthusiasm for it.
 
 "Here then is a task for so-called 'formal' education[4] [the
 education tending to develop the mental faculties, as opposed to
 'material' education,[5] which is intended to deal only with the
 acquisition of facts, _e.g._ history, mathematics, etc.], and one of
 the utmost value: but what do we find in the public school--that is to
 say, in the head-quarters of formal education? He who understands how
 to apply what he has heard here will also know what to think of the
 modern public school as a so-called educational institution. He will
 discover, for instance, that the public school, according to its
 fundamental principles, does not educate for the purposes of culture,
 but for the purposes of scholarship; and, further, that of late it
 seems to have adopted a course which indicates rather that it has even
 discarded scholarship in favour of journalism as the object of its
 exertions. This can be clearly seen from the way in which German is
 taught.
 
 "Instead of that purely practical method of instruction by which the
 teacher accustoms his pupils to severe self-discipline in their own
 language, we find everywhere the rudiments of a historico-scholastic
 method of teaching the mother-tongue: that is to say, people deal with
 it as if it were a dead language and as if the present and future were
 under no obligations to it whatsoever. The historical method has
 become so universal in our time, that even the living body of the
 language is sacrificed for the sake of anatomical study. But this is
 precisely where culture begins--namely, in understanding how to treat
 the quick as something vital, and it is here too that the mission of
 the cultured teacher begins: in suppressing the urgent claims of
 'historical interests' wherever it is above all necessary to _do_
 properly and not merely to _know_ properly. Our mother-tongue,
 however, is a domain in which the pupil must learn how to _do_
 properly, and to this practical end, alone, the teaching of German is
 essential in our scholastic establishments. The historical method may
 certainly be a considerably easier and more comfortable one for the
 teacher; it also seems to be compatible with a much lower grade of
 ability and, in general, with a smaller display of energy and will on
 his part. But we shall find that this observation holds good in every
 department of pedagogic life: the simpler and more comfortable method
 always masquerades in the disguise of grand pretensions and stately
 titles; the really practical side, the _doing_, which should belong to
 culture and which, at bottom, is the more difficult side, meets only
 with disfavour and contempt. That is why the honest man must make
 himself and others quite clear concerning this _quid pro quo_.
 
 "Now, apart from these learned incentives to a study of the language,
 what is there besides which the German teacher is wont to offer? How
 does he reconcile the spirit of his school with the spirit of the
 _few_ that Germany can claim who are really cultured,--_i.e._ with the
 spirit of its classical poets and artists? This is a dark and thorny
 sphere, into which one cannot even bear a light without dread; but
 even here we shall conceal nothing from ourselves; for sooner or later
 the whole of it will have to be reformed. In the public school, the
 repulsive impress of our sthetic journalism is stamped upon the still
 unformed minds of youths. Here, too, the teacher sows the seeds of
 that crude and wilful misinterpretation of the classics, which later
 on disports itself as art-criticism, and which is nothing but
 bumptious barbarity. Here the pupils learn to speak of our unique
 _Schiller_ with the superciliousness of prigs; here they are taught to
 smile at the noblest and most German of his works--at the Marquis of
 Posa, at Max and Thekla--at these smiles German genius becomes
 incensed and a worthier posterity will blush.
 
 "The last department in which the German teacher in a public school is
 at all active, which is often regarded as his sphere of highest
 activity, and is here and there even considered the pinnacle of public
 school education, is the so-called _German composition_. Owing to the
 very fact that in this department it is almost always the most gifted
 pupils who display the greatest eagerness, it ought to have been made
 clear how dangerously stimulating, precisely here, the task of the
 teacher must be. _German composition_ makes an appeal to the
 individual, and the more strongly a pupil is conscious of his various
 qualities, the more personally will he do his _German composition_.
 This 'personal doing' is urged on with yet an additional fillip in
 some public schools by the choice of the subject, the strongest proof
 of which is, in my opinion, that even in the lower classes the
 non-pedagogic subject is set, by means of which the pupil is led to
 give a description of his life and of his development. Now, one has
 only to read the titles of the compositions set in a large number of
 public schools to be convinced that probably the large majority of
 pupils have to suffer their whole lives, through no fault of their
 own, owing to this premature demand for personal work--for the unripe
 procreation of thoughts. And how often are not all a man's subsequent
 literary performances but a sad result of this pedagogic original sin
 against the intellect!
 
 "Let us only think of what takes place at such an age in the
 production of such work. It is the first individual creation; the
 still undeveloped powers tend for the first time to crystallise; the
 staggering sensation produced by the demand for self-reliance imparts
 a seductive charm to these early performances, which is not only quite
 new, but which never returns. All the daring of nature is hauled out
 of its depths; all vanities--no longer constrained by mighty
 barriers--are allowed for the first time to assume a literary form:
 the young man, from that time forward, feels as if he had reached his
 consummation as a being not only able, but actually invited, to speak
 and to converse. The subject he selects obliges him either to express
 his judgment upon certain poetical works, to class historical persons
 together in a description of character, to discuss serious ethical
 problems quite independently, or even to turn the searchlight inwards,
 to throw its rays upon his own development and to make a critical
 report of himself: in short, a whole world of reflection is spread out
 before the astonished young man who, until then, had been almost
 unconscious, and is delivered up to him to be judged.
 
 "Now let us try to picture the teacher's usual attitude towards these
 first highly influential examples of original composition. What does
 he hold to be most reprehensible in this class of work? What does he
 call his pupil's attention to?--To all excess in form or thought--that
 is to say, to all that which, at their age, is essentially
 characteristic and individual. Their really independent traits which,
 in response to this very premature excitation, can manifest themselves
 only in awkwardness, crudeness, and grotesque features,--in short,
 their individuality is reproved and rejected by the teacher in favour
 of an unoriginal decent average. On the other hand, uniform mediocrity
 gets peevish praise; for, as a rule, it is just the class of work
 likely to bore the teacher thoroughly.
 
 "There may still be men who recognise a most absurd and most dangerous
 element of the public school curriculum in the whole farce of this
 German composition. Originality is demanded here: but the only shape
 in which it can manifest itself is rejected, and the 'formal'
 education that the system takes for granted is attained to only by a
 very limited number of men who complete it at a ripe age. Here
 everybody without exception is regarded as gifted for literature and
 considered as capable of holding opinions concerning the most
 important questions and people, whereas the one aim which proper
 education should most zealously strive to achieve would be the
 suppression of all ridiculous claims to independent judgment, and the
 inculcation upon young men of obedience to the sceptre of genius. Here
 a pompous form of diction is taught in an age when every spoken or
 written word is a piece of barbarism. Now let us consider, besides,
 the danger of arousing the self-complacency which is so easily
 awakened in youths; let us think how their vanity must be flattered
 when they see their literary reflection for the first time in the
 mirror. Who, having seen all these effects at _one_ glance, could any
 longer doubt whether all the faults of our public, literary, and
 artistic life were not stamped upon every fresh generation by the
 system we are examining: hasty and vain production, the disgraceful
 manufacture of books; complete want of style; the crude,
 characterless, or sadly swaggering method of expression; the loss of
 every sthetic canon; the voluptuousness of anarchy and chaos--in
 short, the literary peculiarities of both our journalism and our
 scholarship.
 
 "None but the very fewest are aware that, among many thousands,
 perhaps only _one_ is justified in describing himself as literary, and
 that all others who at their own risk try to be so deserve to be met
 with Homeric laughter by all competent men as a reward for every
 sentence they have ever had printed;--for it is truly a spectacle meet
 for the gods to see a literary Hephaistos limping forward who would
 pretend to help us to something. To educate men to earnest and
 inexorable habits and views, in this respect, should be the highest
 aim of all mental training, whereas the general _laisser aller_ of the
 'fine personality' can be nothing else than the hall-mark of
 barbarism. From what I have said, however, it must be clear that, at
 least in the teaching of German, no thought is given to culture;
 something quite different is in view,--namely, the production of the
 afore-mentioned 'free personality.' And so long as German public
 schools prepare the road for outrageous and irresponsible scribbling,
 so long as they do not regard the immediate and practical discipline
 of speaking and writing as their most holy duty, so long as they treat
 the mother-tongue as if it were only a necessary evil or a dead body,
 I shall not regard these institutions as belonging to real culture.
 
 "In regard to the language, what is surely least noticeable is any
 trace of the influence of _classical examples_: that is why, on the
 strength of this consideration alone, the so-called 'classical
 education' which is supposed to be provided by our public school,
 strikes me as something exceedingly doubtful and confused. For how
 could anybody, after having cast one glance at those examples, fail to
 see the great earnestness with which the Greek and the Roman regarded
 and treated his language, from his youth onwards--how is it possible
 to mistake one's example on a point like this one?--provided, of
 course, that the classical Hellenic and Roman world really did hover
 before the educational plan of our public schools as the highest and
 most instructive of all morals--a fact I feel very much inclined to
 doubt. The claim put forward by public schools concerning the
 'classical education' they provide seems to be more an awkward evasion
 than anything else; it is used whenever there is any question raised
 as to the competency of the public schools to impart culture and to
 educate. Classical education, indeed! It sounds so dignified! It
 confounds the aggressor and staves off the assault--for who could see
 to the bottom of this bewildering formula all at once? And this has
 long been the customary strategy of the public school: from whichever
 side the war-cry may come, it writes upon its shield--not overloaded
 with honours--one of those confusing catchwords, such as: 'classical
 education,' 'formal education,' 'scientific education':--three
 glorious things which are, however, unhappily at loggerheads, not only
 with themselves but among themselves, and are such that, if they were
 compulsorily brought together, would perforce bring forth a
 culture-monster. For a 'classical education' is something so unheard
 of, difficult and rare, and exacts such complicated talent, that only
 ingenuousness or impudence could put it forward as an attainable goal
 in our public schools. The words: 'formal education' belong to that
 crude kind of unphilosophical phraseology which one should do one's
 utmost to get rid of; for there is no such thing as 'the opposite of
 formal education.' And he who regards 'scientific education' as the
 object of a public school thereby sacrifices 'classical education' and
 the so-called 'formal education,' at one stroke, as the scientific man
 and the cultured man belong to two different spheres which, though
 coming together at times in the same individual, are never reconciled.
 
 "If we compare all three of these would-be aims of the public school
 with the actual facts to be observed in the present method of teaching
 German, we see immediately what they really amount to in
 practice,--that is to say, only to subterfuges for use in the fight
 and struggle for existence and, often enough, mere means wherewith to
 bewilder an opponent. For we are unable to detect any single feature
 in this teaching of German which in any way recalls the example of
 classical antiquity and its glorious methods of training in languages.
 'Formal education,' however, which is supposed to be achieved by this
 method of teaching German, has been shown to be wholly at the pleasure
 of the 'free personality,' which is as good as saying that it is
 barbarism and anarchy. And as for the preparation in science, which is
 one of the consequences of this teaching, our Germanists will have to
 determine, in all justice, how little these learned beginnings in
 public schools have contributed to the splendour of their sciences,
 and how much the personality of individual university professors has
 done so.--Put briefly: the public school has hitherto neglected its
 most important and most urgent duty towards the very beginning of all
 real culture, which is the mother-tongue; but in so doing it has
 lacked the natural, fertile soil for all further efforts at culture.
 For only by means of stern, artistic, and careful discipline and
 habit, in a language, can the correct feeling for the greatness of our
 classical writers be strengthened. Up to the present their recognition
 by the public schools has been owing almost solely to the doubtful
 sthetic hobbies of a few teachers or to the massive effects of
 certain of their tragedies and novels. But everybody should, himself,
 be aware of the difficulties of the language: he should have learnt
 them from experience: after long seeking and struggling he must reach
 the path our great poets trod in order to be able to realise how
 lightly and beautifully they trod it, and how stiffly and swaggeringly
 the others follow at their heels.
 
 "Only by means of such discipline can the young man acquire that
 physical loathing for the beloved and much-admired 'elegance' of style
 of our newspaper manufacturers and novelists, and for the 'ornate
 style' of our literary men; by it alone is he irrevocably elevated at
 a stroke above a whole host of absurd questions and scruples, such,
 for instance, as whether Auerbach and Gutzkow are really poets, for
 his disgust at both will be so great that he will be unable to read
 them any longer, and thus the problem will be solved for him. Let no
 one imagine that it is an easy matter to develop this feeling to the
 extent necessary in order to have this physical loathing; but let no
 one hope to reach sound sthetic judgments along any other road than
 the thorny one of language, and by this I do not mean philological
 research, but self-discipline in one's mother-tongue.
 
 "Everybody who is in earnest in this matter will have the same sort of
 experience as the recruit in the army who is compelled to learn
 walking after having walked almost all his life as a dilettante or
 empiricist. It is a hard time: one almost fears that the tendons are
 going to snap and one ceases to hope that the artificial and
 consciously acquired movements and positions of the feet will ever be
 carried out with ease and comfort. It is painful to see how awkwardly
 and heavily one foot is set before the other, and one dreads that one
 may not only be unable to learn the new way of walking, but that one
 will forget how to walk at all. Then it suddenly become noticeable
 that a new habit and a second nature have been born of the practised
 movements, and that the assurance and strength of the old manner of
 walking returns with a little more grace: at this point one begins to
 realise how difficult walking is, and one feels in a position to laugh
 at the untrained empiricist or the elegant dilettante. Our 'elegant'
 writers, as their style shows, have never learnt 'walking' in this
 sense, and in our public schools, as our other writers show, no one
 learns walking either. Culture begins, however, with the correct
 movement of the language: and once it has properly begun, it begets
 that physical sensation in the presence of 'elegant' writers which is
 known by the name of 'loathing.'
 
 "We recognise the fatal consequences of our present public schools, in
 that they are unable to inculcate severe and genuine culture, which
 should consist above all in obedience and habituation; and that, at
 their best, they much more often achieve a result by stimulating and
 kindling scientific tendencies, is shown by the hand which is so
 frequently seen uniting scholarship and barbarous taste, science and
 journalism. In a very large majority of cases to-day we can observe
 how sadly our scholars fall short of the standard of culture which the
 efforts of Goethe, Schiller, Lessing, and Winckelmann established; and
 this falling short shows itself precisely in the egregious errors
 which the men we speak of are exposed to, equally among literary
 historians--whether Gervinus or Julian Schmidt--as in any other
 company; everywhere, indeed, where men and women converse. It shows
 itself most frequently and painfully, however, in pedagogic spheres,
 in the literature of public schools. It can be proved that the only
 value that these men have in a real educational establishment has not
 been mentioned, much less generally recognised for half a century:
 their value as preparatory leaders and mystogogues of classical
 culture, guided by whose hands alone can the correct road leading to
 antiquity be found.
 
 "Every so-called classical education can have but one natural
 starting-point--an artistic, earnest, and exact familiarity with the
 use of the mother-tongue: this, together with the secret of form,
 however, one can seldom attain to of one's own accord, almost
 everybody requires those great leaders and tutors and must place
 himself in their hands. There is, however, no such thing as a
 classical education that could grow without this inferred love of
 form. Here, where the power of discerning form and barbarity gradually
 awakens, there appear the pinions which bear one to the only real home
 of culture--ancient Greece. If with the solitary help of those pinions
 we sought to reach those far-distant and diamond-studded walls
 encircling the stronghold of Hellenism, we should certainly not get
 very far; once more, therefore, we need the same leaders and tutors,
 our German classical writers, that we may be borne up, too, by the
 wing-strokes of their past endeavours--to the land of yearning, to
 Greece.
 
 "Not a suspicion of this possible relationship between our classics
 and classical education seems to have pierced the antique walls of
 public schools. Philologists seem much more eagerly engaged in
 introducing Homer and Sophocles to the young souls of their pupils, in
 their own style, calling the result simply by the unchallenged
 euphemism: 'classical education.' Let every one's own experience tell
 him what he had of Homer and Sophocles at the hands of such eager
 teachers. It is in this department that the greatest number of deepest
 deceptions occur, and whence misunderstandings are inadvertently
 spread. In German public schools I have never yet found a trace of
 what might really be called 'classical education,' and there is
 nothing surprising in this when one thinks of the way in which these
 institutions have emancipated themselves from German classical writers
 and the discipline of the German language. Nobody reaches antiquity by
 means of a leap into the dark, and yet the whole method of treating
 ancient writers in schools, the plain commentating and paraphrasing of
 our philological teachers, amounts to nothing more than a leap into
 the dark.
 
 "The feeling for classical Hellenism is, as a matter of fact, such an
 exceptional outcome of the most energetic fight for culture and
 artistic talent that the public school could only have professed to
 awaken this feeling owing to a very crude misunderstanding. In what
 age? In an age which is led about blindly by the most sensational
 desires of the day, and which is not aware of the fact that, once that
 feeling for Hellenism is roused, it immediately becomes aggressive and
 must express itself by indulging in an incessant war with the
 so-called culture of the present. For the public school boy of to-day,
 the Hellenes as Hellenes are dead: yes, he gets some enjoyment out of
 Homer, but a novel by Spielhagen interests him much more: yes, he
 swallows Greek tragedy and comedy with a certain relish, but a
 thoroughly modern drama, like Freitag's 'Journalists,' moves him in
 quite another fashion. In regard to all ancient authors he is rather
 inclined to speak after the manner of the sthete, Hermann Grimm, who,
 on one occasion, at the end of a tortuous essay on the Venus of Milo,
 asks himself: 'What does this goddess's form mean to me? Of what use
 are the thoughts she suggests to me? Orestes and dipus, Iphigenia
 and Antigone, what have they in common with my heart?'--No, my dear
 public school boy, the Venus of Milo does not concern you in any way,
 and concerns your teacher just as little--and that is the misfortune,
 that is the secret of the modern public school. Who will conduct you
 to the land of culture, if your leaders are blind and assume the
 position of seers notwithstanding? Which of you will ever attain to a
 true feeling for the sacred seriousness of art, if you are
 systematically spoiled, and taught to stutter independently instead of
 being taught to speak; to stheticise on your own account, when you
 ought to be taught to approach works of art almost piously; to
 philosophise without assistance, while you ought to be compelled to
 _listen_ to great thinkers. All this with the result that you remain
 eternally at a distance from antiquity and become the servants of the
 day.
 
 "At all events, the most wholesome feature of our modern institutions
 is to be found in the earnestness with which the Latin and Greek
 languages are studied over a long course of years. In this way boys
 learn to respect a grammar, lexicons, and a language that conforms to
 fixed rules; in this department of public school work there is an
 exact knowledge of what constitutes a fault, and no one is troubled
 with any thought of justifying himself every minute by appealing (as
 in the case of modern German) to various grammatical and
 orthographical vagaries and vicious forms. If only this respect for
 language did not hang in the air so, like a theoretical burden which
 one is pleased to throw off the moment one turns to one's
 mother-tongue! More often than not, the classical master makes pretty
 short work of the mother-tongue; from the outset he treats it as a
 department of knowledge in which one is allowed that indolent ease
 with which the German treats everything that belongs to his native
 soil. The splendid practice afforded by translating from one language
 into another, which so improves and fertilises one's artistic feeling
 for one's own tongue, is, in the case of German, never conducted with
 that fitting categorical strictness and dignity which would be above
 all necessary in dealing with an undisciplined language. Of late,
 exercises of this kind have tended to decrease ever more and more:
 people are satisfied to _know_ the foreign classical tongues, they
 would scorn being able to _apply_ them.
 
 "Here one gets another glimpse of the scholarly tendency of public
 schools: a phenomenon which throws much light upon the object which
 once animated them,--that is to say, the serious desire to cultivate
 the pupil. This belonged to the time of our great poets, those few
 really cultured Germans,--the time when the magnificent Friedrich
 August Wolf directed the new stream of classical thought, introduced
 from Greece and Rome by those men, into the heart of the public
 schools. Thanks to his bold start, a new order of public schools was
 established, which thenceforward was not to be merely a nursery for
 science, but, above all, the actual consecrated home of all higher and
 nobler culture.
 
 "Of the many necessary measures which this change called into being,
 some of the most important have been transferred with lasting success
 to the modern regulations of public schools: the most important of
 all, however, did not succeed--the one demanding that the teacher,
 also, should be consecrated to the new spirit, so that the aim of the
 public school has meanwhile considerably departed from the original
 plan laid down by Wolf, which was the cultivation of the pupil. The
 old estimate of scholarship and scholarly culture, as an absolute,
 which Wolf overcame, seems after a slow and spiritless struggle rather
 to have taken the place of the culture-principle of more recent
 introduction, and now claims its former exclusive rights, though not
 with the same frankness, but disguised and with features veiled. And
 the reason why it was impossible to make public schools fall in with
 the magnificent plan of classical culture lay in the un-German, almost
 foreign or cosmopolitan nature of these efforts in the cause of
 education: in the belief that it was possible to remove the native
 soil from under a man's feet and that he should still remain standing;
 in the illusion that people can spring direct, without bridges, into
 the strange Hellenic world, by abjuring German and the German mind in
 general.
 
 "Of course one must know how to trace this Germanic spirit to its lair
 beneath its many modern dressings, or even beneath heaps of ruins; one
 must love it so that one is not ashamed of it in its stunted form, and
 one must above all be on one's guard against confounding it with what
 now disports itself proudly as 'Up-to-date German culture.' The German
 spirit is very far from being on friendly times with this up-to-date
 culture: and precisely in those spheres where the latter complains of
 a lack of culture the real German spirit has survived, though perhaps
 not always with a graceful, but more often an ungraceful, exterior. On
 the other hand, that which now grandiloquently assumes the title of
 'German culture' is a sort of cosmopolitan aggregate, which bears the
 same relation to the German spirit as Journalism does to Schiller or
 Meyerbeer to Beethoven: here the strongest influence at work is the
 fundamentally and thoroughly un-German civilisation of France, which
 is aped neither with talent nor with taste, and the imitation of which
 gives the society, the press, the art, and the literary style of
 Germany their pharisaical character. Naturally the copy nowhere
 produces the really artistic effect which the original, grown out of
 the heart of Roman civilisation, is able to produce almost to this day
 in France. Let any one who wishes to see the full force of this
 contrast compare our most noted novelists with the less noted ones of
 France or Italy: he will recognise in both the same doubtful
 tendencies and aims, as also the same still more doubtful means, but
 in France he will find them coupled with artistic earnestness, at
 least with grammatical purity, and often with beauty, while in their
 every feature he will recognise the echo of a corresponding social
 culture. In Germany, on the other hand, they will strike him as
 unoriginal, flabby, filled with dressing-gown thoughts and
 expressions, unpleasantly spread out, and therewithal possessing no
 background of social form. At the most, owing to their scholarly
 mannerisms and display of knowledge, he will be reminded of the fact
 that in Latin countries it is the artistically-trained man, and that
 in Germany it is the abortive scholar, who becomes a journalist. With
 this would-be German and thoroughly unoriginal culture, the German can
 nowhere reckon upon victory: the Frenchman and the Italian will always
 get the better of him in this respect, while, in regard to the clever
 imitation of a foreign culture, the Russian, above all, will always be
 his superior.
 
 "We are therefore all the more anxious to hold fast to that German
 spirit which revealed itself in the German Reformation, and in German
 music, and which has shown its enduring and genuine strength in the
 enormous courage and severity of German philosophy and in the loyalty
 of the German soldier, which has been tested quite recently. From it
 we expect a victory over that 'up-to-date' pseudo-culture which is now
 the fashion. What we should hope for the future is that schools may
 draw the real school of culture into this struggle, and kindle the
 flame of enthusiasm in the younger generation, more particularly in
 public schools, for that which is truly German; and in this way
 so-called classical education will resume its natural place and
 recover its one possible starting-point.
 
 "A thorough reformation and purification of the public school can only
 be the outcome of a profound and powerful reformation and purification
 of the German spirit. It is a very complex and difficult task to find
 the border-line which joins the heart of the Germanic spirit with the
 genius of Greece. Not, however, before the noblest needs of genuine
 German genius snatch at the hand of this genius of Greece as at a firm
 post in the torrent of barbarity, not before a devouring yearning for
 this genius of Greece takes possession of German genius, and not
 before that view of the Greek home, on which Schiller and Goethe,
 after enormous exertions, were able to feast their eyes, has become
 the Mecca of the best and most gifted men, will the aim of classical
 education in public schools acquire any definition; and they at least
 will not be to blame who teach ever so little science and learning in
 public schools, in order to keep a definite and at the same time ideal
 aim in their eyes, and to rescue their pupils from that glistening
 phantom which now allows itself to be called 'culture' and
 'education.' This is the sad plight of the public school of to-day:
 the narrowest views remain in a certain measure right, because no one
 seems able to reach or, at least, to indicate the spot where all these
 views culminate in error."
 
 "No one?" the philosopher's pupil inquired with a slight quaver in his
 voice; and both men were silent.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [3] It is not practicable to translate these German solecisms by similar
 instances of English solecisms. The reader who is interested in the
 subject will find plenty of material in a book like the Oxford _King's
 English_.
 
 [4] German: _Formelle Bildung._
 
 [5] German: _Materielle Bildung._
 
 
 
 
 THIRD LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 27th of February 1872._)
 
 
 Ladies and Gentlemen,--At the close of my last lecture, the
 conversation to which I was a listener, and the outlines of which, as
 I clearly recollect them, I am now trying to lay before you, was
 interrupted by a long and solemn pause. Both the philosopher and his
 companion sat silent, sunk in deep dejection: the peculiarly critical
 state of that important educational institution, the German public
 school, lay upon their souls like a heavy burden, which one single,
 well-meaning individual is not strong enough to remove, and the
 multitude, though strong, not well meaning enough.
 
 Our solitary thinkers were perturbed by two facts: by clearly
 perceiving on the one hand that what might rightly be called
 "classical education" was now only a far-off ideal, a castle in the
 air, which could not possibly be built as a reality on the foundations
 of our present educational system, and that, on the other hand, what
 was now, with customary and unopposed euphemism, pointed to as
 "classical education" could only claim the value of a pretentious
 illusion, the best effect of which was that the expression "classical
 education" still lived on and had not yet lost its pathetic sound.
 These two worthy men saw clearly, by the system of instruction in
 vogue, that the time was not yet ripe for a higher culture, a culture
 founded upon that of the ancients: the neglected state of linguistic
 instruction; the forcing of students into learned historical paths,
 instead of giving them a practical training; the connection of certain
 practices, encouraged in the public schools, with the objectionable
 spirit of our journalistic publicity--all these easily perceptible
 phenomena of the teaching of German led to the painful certainty that
 the most beneficial of those forces which have come down to us from
 classical antiquity are not yet known in our public schools: forces
 which would train students for the struggle against the barbarism of
 the present age, and which will perhaps once more transform the public
 schools into the arsenals and workshops of this struggle.
 
 On the other hand, it would seem in the meantime as if the spirit of
 antiquity, in its fundamental principles, had already been driven away
 from the portals of the public schools, and as if here also the gates
 were thrown open as widely as possible to the be-flattered and
 pampered type of our present self-styled "German culture." And if the
 solitary talkers caught a glimpse of a single ray of hope, it was that
 things would have to become still worse, that what was as yet divined
 only by the few would soon be clearly perceived by the many, and that
 then the time for honest and resolute men for the earnest
 consideration of the scope of the education of the masses would not be
 far distant.
 
 After a few minutes' silent reflection, the philosopher's companion
 turned to him and said: "You used to hold out hopes to me, but now you
 have done more: you have widened my intelligence, and with it my
 strength and courage: now indeed can I look on the field of battle
 with more hardihood, now indeed do I repent of my too hasty flight. We
 want nothing for ourselves, and it should be nothing to us how many
 individuals may fall in this battle, or whether we ourselves may be
 among the first. Just because we take this matter so seriously, we
 should not take our own poor selves so seriously: at the very moment
 we are falling some one else will grasp the banner of our faith. I
 will not even consider whether I am strong enough for such a fight,
 whether I can offer sufficient resistance; it may even be an
 honourable death to fall to the accompaniment of the mocking laughter
 of such enemies, whose seriousness has frequently seemed to us to be
 something ridiculous. When I think how my contemporaries prepared
 themselves for the highest posts in the scholastic profession, as I
 myself have done, then I know how we often laughed at the exact
 contrary, and grew serious over something quite different----"
 
 "Now, my friend," interrupted the philosopher, laughingly, "you speak
 as one who would fain dive into the water without being able to swim,
 and who fears something even more than the mere drowning; _not_ being
 drowned, but laughed at. But being laughed at should be the very last
 thing for us to dread; for we are in a sphere where there are too many
 truths to tell, too many formidable, painful, unpardonable truths, for
 us to escape hatred, and only fury here and there will give rise to
 some sort of embarrassed laughter. Just think of the innumerable crowd
 of teachers, who, in all good faith, have assimilated the system of
 education which has prevailed up to the present, that they may
 cheerfully and without over-much deliberation carry it further on.
 What do you think it will seem like to these men when they hear of
 projects from which they are excluded _beneficio natur_; of commands
 which their mediocre abilities are totally unable to carry out; of
 hopes which find no echo in them; of battles the war-cries of which
 they do not understand, and in the fighting of which they can take
 part only as dull and obtuse rank and file? But, without exaggeration,
 that must necessarily be the position of practically all the teachers
 in our higher educational establishments: and indeed we cannot wonder
 at this when we consider how such a teacher originates, how he
 _becomes_ a teacher of such high status. Such a large number of higher
 educational establishments are now to be found everywhere that far
 more teachers will continue to be required for them than the nature of
 even a highly-gifted people can produce; and thus an inordinate stream
 of undesirables flows into these institutions, who, however, by their
 preponderating numbers and their instinct of 'similis simile gaudet'
 gradually come to determine the nature of these institutions. There
 may be a few people, hopelessly unfamiliar with pedagogical matters,
 who believe that our present profusion of public schools and teachers,
 which is manifestly out of all proportion, can be changed into a real
 profusion, an _ubertas ingenii_, merely by a few rules and
 regulations, and without any reduction in the number of these
 institutions. But we may surely be unanimous in recognising that by
 the very nature of things only an exceedingly small number of people
 are destined for a true course of education, and that a much smaller
 number of higher educational establishments would suffice for their
 further development, but that, in view of the present large numbers of
 educational institutions, those for whom in general such institutions
 ought only to be established must feel themselves to be the least
 facilitated in their progress.
 
 "The same holds good in regard to teachers. It is precisely the best
 teachers--those who, generally speaking, judged by a high standard,
 are worthy of this honourable name--who are now perhaps the least
 fitted, in view of the present standing of our public schools, for the
 education of these unselected youths, huddled together in a confused
 heap; but who must rather, to a certain extent, keep hidden from them
 the best they could give: and, on the other hand, by far the larger
 number of these teachers feel themselves quite at home in these
 institutions, as their moderate abilities stand in a kind of
 harmonious relationship to the dullness of their pupils. It is from
 this majority that we hear the ever-resounding call for the
 establishment of new public schools and higher educational
 institutions: we are living in an age which, by ringing the changes on
 its deafening and continual cry, would certainly give one the
 impression that there was an unprecedented thirst for culture which
 eagerly sought to be quenched. But it is just at this point that one
 should learn to hear aright: it is here, without being disconcerted by
 the thundering noise of the education-mongers, that we must confront
 those who talk so tirelessly about the educational necessities of
 their time. Then we should meet with a strange disillusionment, one
 which we, my good friend, have often met with: those blatant heralds
 of educational needs, when examined at close quarters, are suddenly
 seen to be transformed into zealous, yea, fanatical opponents of true
 culture, _i.e._ all those who hold fast to the aristocratic nature of
 the mind; for, at bottom, they regard as their goal the emancipation
 of the masses from the mastery of the great few; they seek to
 overthrow the most sacred hierarchy in the kingdom of the
 intellect--the servitude of the masses, their submissive obedience,
 their instinct of loyalty to the rule of genius.
 
 "I have long accustomed myself to look with caution upon those who are
 ardent in the cause of the so-called 'education of the people' in the
 common meaning of the phrase; since for the most part they desire for
 themselves, consciously or unconsciously, absolutely unlimited
 freedom, which must inevitably degenerate into something resembling
 the saturnalia of barbaric times, and which the sacred hierarchy of
 nature will never grant them. They were born to serve and to obey; and
 every moment in which their limping or crawling or broken-winded
 thoughts are at work shows us clearly out of which clay nature moulded
 them, and what trade mark she branded thereon. The education of the
 masses cannot, therefore, be our aim; but rather the education of a
 few picked men for great and lasting works. We well know that a just
 posterity judges the collective intellectual state of a time only by
 those few great and lonely figures of the period, and gives its
 decision in accordance with the manner in which they are recognised,
 encouraged, and honoured, or, on the other hand, in which they are
 snubbed, elbowed aside, and kept down. What is called the 'education
 of the masses' cannot be accomplished except with difficulty; and even
 if a system of universal compulsory education be applied, they can
 only be reached outwardly: those individual lower levels where,
 generally speaking, the masses come into contact with culture, where
 the people nourishes its religious instinct, where it poetises its
 mythological images, where it keeps up its faith in its customs,
 privileges, native soil, and language--all these levels can scarcely
 be reached by direct means, and in any case only by violent
 demolition. And, in serious matters of this kind, to hasten forward
 the progress of the education of the people means simply the
 postponement of this violent demolition, and the maintenance of that
 wholesome unconsciousness, that sound sleep, of the people, without
 which counter-action and remedy no culture, with the exhausting strain
 and excitement of its own actions, can make any headway.
 
 "We know, however, what the aspiration is of those who would disturb
 the healthy slumber of the people, and continually call out to them:
 'Keep your eyes open! Be sensible! Be wise!' we know the aim of those
 who profess to satisfy excessive educational requirements by means of
 an extraordinary increase in the number of educational institutions
 and the conceited tribe of teachers originated thereby. These very
 people, using these very means, are fighting against the natural
 hierarchy in the realm of the intellect, and destroying the roots of
 all those noble and sublime plastic forces which have their material
 origin in the unconsciousness of the people, and which fittingly
 terminate in the procreation of genius and its due guidance and proper
 training. It is only in the simile of the mother that we can grasp the
 meaning and the responsibility of the true education of the people in
 respect to genius: its real origin is not to be found in such
 education; it has, so to speak, only a metaphysical source, a
 metaphysical home. But for the genius to make his appearance; for him
 to emerge from among the people; to portray the reflected picture, as
 it were, the dazzling brilliancy of the peculiar colours of this
 people; to depict the noble destiny of a people in the similitude of
 an individual in a work which will last for all time, thereby making
 his nation itself eternal, and redeeming it from the ever-shifting
 element of transient things: all this is possible for the genius only
 when he has been brought up and come to maturity in the tender care of
 the culture of a people; whilst, on the other hand, without this
 sheltering home, the genius will not, generally speaking, be able to
 rise to the height of his eternal flight, but will at an early moment,
 like a stranger weather-driven upon a bleak, snow-covered desert,
 slink away from the inhospitable land."
 
 "You astonish me with such a metaphysics of genius," said the
 teacher's companion, "and I have only a hazy conception of the
 accuracy of your similitude. On the other hand, I fully understand
 what you have said about the surplus of public schools and the
 corresponding surplus of higher grade teachers; and in this regard I
 myself have collected some information which assures me that the
 educational tendency of the public school _must_ right itself by this
 very surplus of teachers who have really nothing at all to do with
 education, and who are called into existence and pursue this path
 solely because there is a demand for them. Every man who, in an
 unexpected moment of enlightenment, has convinced himself of the
 singularity and inaccessibility of Hellenic antiquity, and has warded
 off this conviction after an exhausting struggle--every such man knows
 that the door leading to this enlightenment will never remain open to
 all comers; and he deems it absurd, yea disgraceful, to use the Greeks
 as he would any other tool he employs when following his profession or
 earning his living, shamelessly fumbling with coarse hands amidst the
 relics of these holy men. This brazen and vulgar feeling is, however,
 most common in the profession from which the largest numbers of
 teachers for the public schools are drawn, the philological
 profession, wherefore the reproduction and continuation of such a
 feeling in the public school will not surprise us.
 
 "Just look at the younger generation of philologists: how seldom we
 see in them that humble feeling that we, when compared with such a
 world as it was, have no right to exist at all: how coolly and
 fearlessly, as compared with us, did that young brood build its
 miserable nests in the midst of the magnificent temples! A powerful
 voice from every nook and cranny should ring in the ears of those who,
 from the day they begin their connection with the university, roam at
 will with such self-complacency and shamelessness among the
 awe-inspiring relics of that noble civilisation: 'Hence, ye
 uninitiated, who will never be initiated; fly away in silence and
 shame from these sacred chambers!' But this voice speaks in vain; for
 one must to some extent be a Greek to understand a Greek curse of
 excommunication. But these people I am speaking of are so barbaric
 that they dispose of these relics to suit themselves: all their modern
 conveniences and fancies are brought with them and concealed among
 those ancient pillars and tombstones, and it gives rise to great
 rejoicing when somebody finds, among the dust and cobwebs of
 antiquity, something that he himself had slyly hidden there not so
 very long before. One of them makes verses and takes care to consult
 Hesychius' Lexicon. Something there immediately assures him that he is
 destined to be an imitator of schylus, and leads him to believe,
 indeed, that he 'has something in common with' schylus: the miserable
 poetaster! Yet another peers with the suspicious eye of a policeman
 into every contradiction, even into the shadow of every
 contradiction, of which Homer was guilty: he fritters away his life in
 tearing Homeric rags to tatters and sewing them together again, rags
 that he himself was the first to filch from the poet's kingly robe. A
 third feels ill at ease when examining all the mysterious and
 orgiastic sides of antiquity: he makes up his mind once and for all to
 let the enlightened Apollo alone pass without dispute, and to see in
 the Athenian a gay and intelligent but nevertheless somewhat immoral
 Apollonian. What a deep breath he draws when he succeeds in raising
 yet another dark corner of antiquity to the level of his own
 intelligence!--when, for example, he discovers in Pythagoras a
 colleague who is as enthusiastic as himself in arguing about politics.
 Another racks his brains as to why dipus was condemned by fate to
 perform such abominable deeds--killing his father, marrying his
 mother. Where lies the blame! Where the poetic justice! Suddenly it
 occurs to him: dipus was a passionate fellow, lacking all Christian
 gentleness--he even fell into an unbecoming rage when Tiresias called
 him a monster and the curse of the whole country. Be humble and meek!
 was what Sophocles tried to teach, otherwise you will have to marry
 your mothers and kill your fathers! Others, again, pass their lives in
 counting the number of verses written by Greek and Roman poets, and
 are delighted with the proportions 7:13 = 14:26. Finally, one of them
 brings forward his solution of a question, such as the Homeric poems
 considered from the standpoint of prepositions, and thinks he has
 drawn the truth from the bottom of the well with  and .
 All of them, however, with the most widely separated aims in view, dig
 and burrow in Greek soil with a restlessness and a blundering awkwardness
 that must surely be painful to a true friend of antiquity: and thus it
 comes to pass that I should like to take by the hand every talented or
 talentless man who feels a certain professional inclination urging him
 on to the study of antiquity, and harangue him as follows: 'Young sir,
 do you know what perils threaten you, with your little stock of school
 learning, before you become a man in the full sense of the word? Have
 you heard that, according to Aristotle, it is by no means a tragic
 death to be slain by a statue? Does that surprise you? Know, then,
 that for centuries philologists have been trying, with ever-failing
 strength, to re-erect the fallen statue of Greek antiquity, but
 without success; for it is a colossus around which single individual
 men crawl like pygmies. The leverage of the united representatives of
 modern culture is utilised for the purpose; but it invariably happens
 that the huge column is scarcely more than lifted from the ground when
 it falls down again, crushing beneath its weight the luckless wights
 under it. That, however, may be tolerated, for every being must perish
 by some means or other; but who is there to guarantee that during all
 these attempts the statue itself will not break in pieces! The
 philologists are being crushed by the Greeks--perhaps we can put up
 with this--but antiquity itself threatens to be crushed by these
 philologists! Think that over, you easy-going young man; and turn
 back, lest you too should not be an iconoclast!'"
 
 "Indeed," said the philosopher, laughing, "there are many philologists
 who have turned back as you so much desire, and I notice a great
 contrast with my own youthful experience. Consciously or
 unconsciously, large numbers of them have concluded that it is
 hopeless and useless for them to come into direct contact with
 classical antiquity, hence they are inclined to look upon this study
 as barren, superseded, out-of-date. This herd has turned with much
 greater zest to the science of language: here in this wide expanse of
 virgin soil, where even the most mediocre gifts can be turned to
 account, and where a kind of insipidity and dullness is even looked
 upon as decided talent, with the novelty and uncertainty of methods
 and the constant danger of making fantastic mistakes--here, where dull
 regimental routine and discipline are desiderata--here the newcomer is
 no longer frightened by the majestic and warning voice that rises from
 the ruins of antiquity: here every one is welcomed with open arms,
 including even him who never arrived at any uncommon impression or
 noteworthy thought after a perusal of Sophocles and Aristophanes, with
 the result that they end in an etymological tangle, or are seduced
 into collecting the fragments of out-of-the-way dialects--and their
 time is spent in associating and dissociating, collecting and
 scattering, and running hither and thither consulting books. And such
 a usefully employed philologist would now fain be a teacher! He now
 undertakes to teach the youth of the public schools something about
 the ancient writers, although he himself has read them without any
 particular impression, much less with insight! What a dilemma!
 Antiquity has said nothing to him, consequently he has nothing to say
 about antiquity. A sudden thought strikes him: why is he a skilled
 philologist at all! Why did these authors write Latin and Greek! And
 with a light heart he immediately begins to etymologise with Homer,
 calling Lithuanian or Ecclesiastical Slavonic, or, above all, the
 sacred Sanskrit, to his assistance: as if Greek lessons were merely
 the excuse for a general introduction to the study of languages, and
 as if Homer were lacking in only one respect, namely, not being
 written in pre-Indogermanic. Whoever is acquainted with our present
 public schools well knows what a wide gulf separates their teachers
 from classicism, and how, from a feeling of this want, comparative
 philology and allied professions have increased their numbers to such
 an unheard-of degree."
 
 "What I mean is," said the other, "it would depend upon whether a
 teacher of classical culture did _not_ confuse his Greeks and Romans
 with the other peoples, the barbarians, whether he could _never_ put
 Greek and Latin _on a level with_ other languages: so far as his
 classicalism is concerned, it is a matter of indifference whether the
 framework of these languages concurs with or is in any way related to
 the other languages: such a concurrence does not interest him at all;
 his real concern is with _what is not common to both_, with what shows
 him that those two peoples were not barbarians as compared with the
 others--in so far, of course, as he is a true teacher of culture and
 models himself after the majestic patterns of the classics."
 
 "I may be wrong," said the philosopher, "but I suspect that, owing to
 the way in which Latin and Greek are now taught in schools, the
 accurate grasp of these languages, the ability to speak and write them
 with ease, is lost, and that is something in which my own generation
 distinguished itself--a generation, indeed, whose few survivers have
 by this time grown old; whilst, on the other hand, the present
 teachers seem to impress their pupils with the genetic and historical
 importance of the subject to such an extent that, at best, their
 scholars ultimately turn into little Sanskritists, etymological
 spitfires, or reckless conjecturers; but not one of them can read his
 Plato or Tacitus with pleasure, as we old folk can. The public schools
 may still be seats of learning: not, however of _the_ learning which,
 as it were, is only the natural and involuntary auxiliary of a culture
 that is directed towards the noblest ends; but rather of that culture
 which might be compared to the hypertrophical swelling of an unhealthy
 body. The public schools are certainly the seats of this obesity, if,
 indeed, they have not degenerated into the abodes of that elegant
 barbarism which is boasted of as being 'German culture of the
 present!'"
 
 "But," asked the other, "what is to become of that large body of
 teachers who have not been endowed with a true gift for culture, and
 who set up as teachers merely to gain a livelihood from the
 profession, because there is a demand for them, because a superfluity
 of schools brings with it a superfluity of teachers? Where shall they
 go when antiquity peremptorily orders them to withdraw? Must they not
 be sacrificed to those powers of the present who, day after day, call
 out to them from the never-ending columns of the press 'We are
 culture! We are education! We are at the zenith! We are the apexes of
 the pyramids! We are the aims of universal history!'--when they hear
 the seductive promises, when the shameful signs of non-culture, the
 plebeian publicity of the so-called 'interests of culture' are
 extolled for their benefit in magazines and newspapers as an entirely
 new and the best possible, full-grown form of culture! Whither shall
 the poor fellows fly when they feel the presentiment that these
 promises are not true--where but to the most obtuse, sterile
 scientificality, that here the shriek of culture may no longer be
 audible to them? Pursued in this way, must they not end, like the
 ostrich, by burying their heads in the sand? Is it not a real
 happiness for them, buried as they are among dialects, etymologies,
 and conjectures, to lead a life like that of the ants, even though
 they are miles removed from true culture, if only they can close their
 ears tightly and be deaf to the voice of the 'elegant' culture of the
 time."
 
 "You are right, my friend," said the philosopher, "but whence comes the
 urgent necessity for a surplus of schools for culture, which further
 gives rise to the necessity for a surplus of teachers?--when we so
 clearly see that the demand for a surplus springs from a sphere which is
 hostile to culture, and that the consequences of this surplus only lead
 to non-culture. Indeed, we can discuss this dire necessity only in so
 far as the modern State is willing to discuss these things with us, and
 is prepared to follow up its demands by force: which phenomenon
 certainly makes the same impression upon most people as if they were
 addressed by the eternal law of things. For the rest, a 'Culture-State,'
 to use the current expression, which makes such demands, is rather a
 novelty, and has only come to a 'self-understanding' within the last
 half century, _i.e._ in a period when (to use the favourite popular
 word) so many 'self-understood' things came into being, but which are in
 themselves not 'self-understood' at all. This right to higher education
 has been taken so seriously by the most powerful of modern
 States--Prussia--that the objectionable principle it has adopted, taken
 in connection with the well-known daring and hardihood of this State, is
 seen to have a menacing and dangerous consequence for the true German
 spirit; for we see endeavours being made in this quarter to raise the
 public school, formally systematised, up to the so-called 'level of the
 time.' Here is to be found all that mechanism by means of which as many
 scholars as possible are urged on to take up courses of public school
 training: here, indeed, the State has its most powerful inducement--the
 concession of certain privileges respecting military service, with the
 natural consequence that, according to the unprejudiced evidence of
 statistical officials, by this, and by this only, can we explain the
 universal congestion of all Prussian public schools, and the urgent and
 continual need for new ones. What more can the State do for a surplus of
 educational institutions than bring all the higher and the majority of
 the lower civil service appointments, the right of entry to the
 universities, and even the most influential military posts into close
 connection with the public school: and all this in a country where both
 universal military service and the highest offices of the State
 unconsciously attract all gifted natures to them. The public school is
 here looked upon as an honourable aim, and every one who feels himself
 urged on to the sphere of government will be found on his way to it.
 This is a new and quite original occurrence: the State assumes the
 attitude of a mystogogue of culture, and, whilst it promotes its own
 ends, it obliges every one of its servants not to appear in its presence
 without the torch of universal State education in their hands, by the
 flickering light of which they may again recognise the State as the
 highest goal, as the reward of all their strivings after education.
 
 "Now this last phenomenon should indeed surprise them; it should
 remind them of that allied, slowly understood tendency of a philosophy
 which was formerly promoted for reasons of State, namely, the
 tendency of the Hegelian philosophy: yea, it would perhaps be no
 exaggeration to say that, in the subordination of all strivings after
 education to reasons of State, Prussia has appropriated, with success,
 the principle and the useful heirloom of the Hegelian philosophy,
 whose apotheosis of the State in _this_ subordination certainly
 reaches its height."
 
 "But," said the philosopher's companion, "what purposes can the State
 have in view with such a strange aim? For that it has some State
 objects in view is seen in the manner in which the conditions of
 Prussian schools are admired by, meditated upon, and occasionally
 imitated by other States. These other States obviously presuppose
 something here that, if adopted, would tend towards the maintenance
 and power of the State, like our well-known and popular conscription.
 Where everyone proudly wears his soldier's uniform at regular
 intervals, where almost every one has absorbed a uniform type of
 national culture through the public schools, enthusiastic hyperboles
 may well be uttered concerning the systems employed in former times,
 and a form of State omnipotence which was attained only in antiquity,
 and which almost every young man, by both instinct and training,
 thinks it is the crowning glory and highest aim of human beings to
 reach."
 
 "Such a comparison," said the philosopher, "would be quite
 hyperbolical, and would not hobble along on one leg only. For, indeed,
 the ancient State emphatically did not share the utilitarian point of
 view of recognising as culture only what was directly useful to the
 State itself, and was far from wishing to destroy those impulses which
 did not seem to be immediately applicable. For this very reason the
 profound Greek had for the State that strong feeling of admiration and
 thankfulness which is so distasteful to modern men; because he clearly
 recognised not only that without such State protection the germs of
 his culture could not develop, but also that all his inimitable and
 perennial culture had flourished so luxuriantly under the wise and
 careful guardianship of the protection afforded by the State. The
 State was for his culture not a supervisor, regulator, and watchman,
 but a vigorous and muscular companion and friend, ready for war, who
 accompanied his noble, admired, and, as it were, ethereal friend
 through disagreeable reality, earning his thanks therefor. This,
 however, does not happen when a modern State lays claim to such hearty
 gratitude because it renders such chivalrous service to German culture
 and art: for in this regard its past is as ignominious as its present,
 as a proof of which we have but to think of the manner in which the
 memory of our great poets and artists is celebrated in German cities,
 and how the highest objects of these German masters are supported on
 the part of the State.
 
 "There must therefore be peculiar circumstances surrounding both this
 purpose towards which the State is tending, and which always promotes
 what is here called 'education'; and surrounding likewise the culture
 thus promoted, which subordinates itself to this purpose of the State.
 With the real German spirit and the education derived therefrom, such
 as I have slowly outlined for you, this purpose of the State is at
 war, hiddenly or openly: _the_ spirit of education, which is welcomed
 and encouraged with such interest by the State, and owing to which the
 schools of this country are so much admired abroad, must accordingly
 originate in a sphere that never comes into contact with this true
 German spirit: with that spirit which speaks to us so wondrously from
 the inner heart of the German Reformation, German music, and German
 philosophy, and which, like a noble exile, is regarded with such
 indifference and scorn by the luxurious education afforded by the
 State. This spirit is a stranger: it passes by in solitary sadness,
 and far away from it the censer of pseudo-culture is swung backwards
 and forwards, which, amidst the acclamations of 'educated' teachers
 and journalists, arrogates to itself its name and privileges, and
 metes out insulting treatment to the word 'German.' Why does the State
 require that surplus of educational institutions, of teachers? Why
 this education of the masses on such an extended scale? Because the
 true German spirit is hated, because the aristocratic nature of true
 culture is feared, because the people endeavour in this way to drive
 single great individuals into self-exile, so that the claims of the
 masses to education may be, so to speak, planted down and carefully
 tended, in order that the many may in this way endeavour to escape the
 rigid and strict discipline of the few great leaders, so that the
 masses may be persuaded that they can easily find the path for
 themselves--following the guiding star of the State!
 
 "A new phenomenon! The State as the guiding star of culture! In the
 meantime one thing consoles me: this German spirit, which people are
 combating so much, and for which they have substituted a gaudily
 attired _locum tenens_, this spirit is brave: it will fight and redeem
 itself into a purer age; noble, as it is now, and victorious, as it
 one day will be, it will always preserve in its mind a certain pitiful
 toleration of the State, if the latter, hard-pressed in the hour of
 extremity, secures such a pseudo-culture as its associate. For what,
 after all, do we know about the difficult task of governing men,
 _i.e._ to keep law, order, quietness, and peace among millions of
 boundlessly egoistical, unjust, unreasonable, dishonourable, envious,
 malignant, and hence very narrow-minded and perverse human beings; and
 thus to protect the few things that the State has conquered for itself
 against covetous neighbours and jealous robbers? Such a hard-pressed
 State holds out its arms to any associate, grasps at any straw; and
 when such an associate does introduce himself with flowery eloquence,
 when he adjudges the State, as Hegel did, to be an 'absolutely
 complete ethical organism,' the be-all and end-all of every one's
 education, and goes on to indicate how he himself can best promote the
 interests of the State--who will be surprised if, without further
 parley, the State falls upon his neck and cries aloud in a barbaric
 voice of full conviction: 'Yes! Thou art education! Thou art indeed
 culture!'"
 
 
 
 
 FOURTH LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 5th of March 1872._)
 
 
 LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,--Now that you have followed my tale up to this
 point, and that we have made ourselves joint masters of the solitary,
 remote, and at times abusive duologue of the philosopher and his
 companion, I sincerely hope that you, like strong swimmers, are ready
 to proceed on the second half of our journey, especially as I can
 promise you that a few other marionettes will appear in the
 puppet-play of my adventure, and that if up to the present you have
 only been able to do little more than endure what I have been telling
 you, the waves of my story will now bear you more quickly and easily
 towards the end. In other words we have now come to a turning, and it
 would be advisable for us to take a short glance backwards to see what
 we think we have gained from such a varied conversation.
 
 "Remain in your present position," the philosopher seemed to say to
 his companion, "for you may cherish hopes. It is more and more clearly
 evident that we have no educational institutions at all; but that we
 ought to have them. Our public schools--established, it would seem,
 for this high object--have either become the nurseries of a
 reprehensible culture which repels the true culture with profound
 hatred--_i.e._ a true, aristocratic culture, founded upon a few
 carefully chosen minds; or they foster a micrological and sterile
 learning which, while it is far removed from culture, has at least
 this merit, that it avoids that reprehensible culture as well as the
 true culture." The philosopher had particularly drawn his companion's
 attention to the strange corruption which must have entered into the
 heart of culture when the State thought itself capable of tyrannising
 over it and of attaining its ends through it; and further when the
 State, in conjunction with this culture, struggled against other
 hostile forces as well as against _the_ spirit which the philosopher
 ventured to call the "true German spirit." This spirit, linked to the
 Greeks by the noblest ties, and shown by its past history to have been
 steadfast and courageous, pure and lofty in its aims, its faculties
 qualifying it for the high task of freeing modern man from the curse
 of modernity--this spirit is condemned to live apart, banished from
 its inheritance. But when its slow, painful tones of woe resound
 through the desert of the present, then the overladen and gaily-decked
 caravan of culture is pulled up short, horror-stricken. We must not
 only astonish, but terrify--such was the philosopher's opinion: not to
 fly shamefully away, but to take the offensive, was his advice; but he
 especially counselled his companion not to ponder too anxiously over
 the individual from whom, through a higher instinct, this aversion for
 the present barbarism proceeded, "Let it perish: the Pythian god had
 no difficulty in finding a new tripod, a second Pythia, so long, at
 least, as the mystic cold vapours rose from the earth."
 
 The philosopher once more began to speak: "Be careful to remember, my
 friend," said he, "there are two things you must not confuse. A man
 must learn a great deal that he may live and take part in the struggle
 for existence; but everything that he as an individual learns and does
 with this end in view has nothing whatever to do with culture. This
 latter only takes its beginning in a sphere that lies far above the
 world of necessity, indigence, and struggle for existence. The
 question now is to what extent a man values his ego in comparison with
 other egos, how much of his strength he uses up in the endeavour to
 earn his living. Many a one, by stoically confining his needs within a
 narrow compass, will shortly and easily reach the sphere in which he
 may forget, and, as it were, shake off his ego, so that he can enjoy
 perpetual youth in a solar system of timeless and impersonal things.
 Another widens the scope and needs of his ego as much as possible, and
 builds the mausoleum of this ego in vast proportions, as if he were
 prepared to fight and conquer that terrible adversary, Time. In this
 instinct also we may see a longing for immortality: wealth and power,
 wisdom, presence of mind, eloquence, a flourishing outward aspect, a
 renowned name--all these are merely turned into the means by which an
 insatiable, personal will to live craves for new life, with which,
 again, it hankers after an eternity that is at last seen to be
 illusory.
 
 "But even in this highest form of the ego, in the enhanced needs of
 such a distended and, as it were, collective individual, true culture
 is never touched upon; and if, for example, art is sought after, only
 its disseminating and stimulating actions come into prominence, _i.e._
 those which least give rise to pure and noble art, and most of all to
 low and degraded forms of it. For in all his efforts, however great
 and exceptional they seem to the onlooker, he never succeeds in
 freeing himself from his own hankering and restless personality: that
 illuminated, ethereal sphere where one may contemplate without the
 obstruction of one's own personality continually recedes from him--and
 thus, let him learn, travel, and collect as he may, he must always
 live an exiled life at a remote distance from a higher life and from
 true culture. For true culture would scorn to contaminate itself with
 the needy and covetous individual; it well knows how to give the slip
 to the man who would fain employ it as a means of attaining to
 egoistic ends; and if any one cherishes the belief that he has firmly
 secured it as a means of livelihood, and that he can procure the
 necessities of life by its sedulous cultivation, then it suddenly
 steals away with noiseless steps and an air of derisive mockery.[6]
 
 "I will thus ask you, my friend, not to confound this culture, this
 sensitive, fastidious, ethereal goddess, with that useful
 maid-of-all-work which is also called 'culture,' but which is only
 the intellectual servant and counsellor of one's practical
 necessities, wants, and means of livelihood Every kind of training,
 however, which holds out the prospect of bread-winning as its end and
 aim, is not a training for culture as we understand the word; but
 merely a collection of precepts and directions to show how, in the
 struggle for existence, a man may preserve and protect his own person.
 It may be freely admitted that for the great majority of men such a
 course of instruction is of the highest importance; and the more
 arduous the struggle is the more intensely must the young man strain
 every nerve to utilise his strength to the best advantage.
 
 "But--let no one think for a moment that the schools which urge him on
 to this struggle and prepare him for it are in any way seriously to be
 considered as establishments of culture. They are institutions which
 teach one how to take part in the battle of life; whether they promise
 to turn out civil servants, or merchants, or officers, or wholesale
 dealers, or farmers, or physicians, or men with a technical training.
 The regulations and standards prevailing at such institutions differ
 from those in a true educational institution; and what in the latter
 is permitted, and even freely held out as often as possible, ought to
 be considered as a criminal offence in the former.
 
 "Let me give you an example. If you wish to guide a young man on the
 path of true culture, beware of interrupting his naive, confident,
 and, as it were, immediate and personal relationship with nature. The
 woods, the rocks, the winds, the vulture, the flowers, the butterfly,
 the meads, the mountain slopes, must all speak to him in their own
 language; in them he must, as it were, come to know himself again in
 countless reflections and images, in a variegated round of changing
 visions; and in this way he will unconsciously and gradually feel the
 metaphysical unity of all things in the great image of nature, and at
 the same time tranquillise his soul in the contemplation of her
 eternal endurance and necessity. But how many young men should be
 permitted to grow up in such close and almost personal proximity to
 nature! The others must learn another truth betimes: how to subdue
 nature to themselves. Here is an end of this naive metaphysics; and
 the physiology of plants and animals, geology, inorganic chemistry,
 force their devotees to view nature from an altogether different
 standpoint. What is lost by this new point of view is not only a
 poetical phantasmagoria, but the instinctive, true, and unique point
 of view, instead of which we have shrewd and clever calculations, and,
 so to speak, overreachings of nature. Thus to the truly cultured man
 is vouchsafed the inestimable benefit of being able to remain
 faithful, without a break, to the contemplative instincts of his
 childhood, and so to attain to a calmness, unity, consistency, and
 harmony which can never be even thought of by a man who is compelled
 to fight in the struggle for existence.
 
 "You must not think, however, that I wish to withhold all praise from
 our primary and secondary schools: I honour the seminaries where boys
 learn arithmetic and master modern languages, and study geography and
 the marvellous discoveries made in natural science. I am quite
 prepared to say further that those youths who pass through the better
 class of secondary schools are well entitled to make the claims put
 forward by the fully-fledged public school boy; and the time is
 certainly not far distant when such pupils will be everywhere freely
 admitted to the universities and positions under the government, which
 has hitherto been the case only with scholars from the public
 schools--of our present public schools, be it noted![7] I cannot,
 however, refrain from adding the melancholy reflection: if it be true
 that secondary and public schools are, on the whole, working so
 heartily in common towards the same ends, and differ from each other
 only in such a slight degree, that they may take equal rank before the
 tribunal of the State, then we completely lack another kind of
 educational institutions: those for the development of culture! To say
 the least, the secondary schools cannot be reproached with this; for
 they have up to the present propitiously and honourably followed up
 tendencies of a lower order, but one nevertheless highly necessary. In
 the public schools, however, there is very much less honesty and very
 much less ability too; for in them we find an instinctive feeling of
 shame, the unconscious perception of the fact that the whole
 institution has been ignominiously degraded, and that the sonorous
 words of wise and apathetic teachers are contradictory to the dreary,
 barbaric, and sterile reality. So there are no true cultural
 institutions! And in those very places where a pretence to culture is
 still kept up, we find the people more hopeless, atrophied, and
 discontented than in the secondary schools, where the so-called
 'realistic' subjects are taught! Besides this, only think how immature
 and uninformed one must be in the company of such teachers when one
 actually misunderstands the rigorously defined philosophical
 expressions 'real' and 'realism' to such a degree as to think them the
 contraries of mind and matter, and to interpret 'realism' as 'the road
 to knowledge, formation, and mastery of reality.'
 
 "I for my own part know of only two exact contraries: _institutions
 for teaching culture and institutions for teaching how to succeed in
 life_. All our present institutions belong to the second class; but I
 am speaking only of the first."
 
 About two hours went by while the philosophically-minded couple
 chatted about such startling questions. Night slowly fell in the
 meantime; and when in the twilight the philosopher's voice had sounded
 like natural music through the woods, it now rang out in the profound
 darkness of the night when he was speaking with excitement or even
 passionately; his tones hissing and thundering far down the valley,
 and reverberating among the trees and rocks. Suddenly he was silent:
 he had just repeated, almost pathetically, the words, "we have no true
 educational institutions; we have no true educational institutions!"
 when something fell down just in front of him--it might have been a
 fir-cone--and his dog barked and ran towards it. Thus interrupted, the
 philosopher raised his head, and suddenly became aware of the
 darkness, the cool air, and the lonely situation of himself and his
 companion. "Well! What are we about!" he ejaculated, "it's dark. You
 know whom we were expecting here; but he hasn't come. We have waited
 in vain; let us go."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I must now, ladies and gentlemen, convey to you the impressions
 experienced by my friend and myself as we eagerly listened to this
 conversation, which we heard distinctly in our hiding-place. I have
 already told you that at that place and at that hour we had intended
 to hold a festival in commemoration of something: and this something
 had to do with nothing else than matters concerning educational
 training, of which we, in our own youthful opinions, had garnered a
 plentiful harvest during our past life. We were thus disposed to
 remember with gratitude the institution which we had at one time
 thought out for ourselves at that very spot in order, as I have
 already mentioned, that we might reciprocally encourage and watch over
 one another's educational impulses. But a sudden and unexpected light
 was thrown on all that past life as we silently gave ourselves up to
 the vehement words of the philosopher. As when a traveller, walking
 heedlessly across unknown ground, suddenly puts his foot over the edge
 of a cliff, so it now seemed to us that we had hastened to meet the
 great danger rather than run away from it. Here at this spot, so
 memorable to us, we heard the warning: "Back! Not another step! Know
 you not whither your footsteps tend, whither this deceitful path is
 luring you?"
 
 It seemed to us that we now knew, and our feeling of overflowing
 thankfulness impelled us so irresistibly towards our earnest
 counsellor and trusty Eckart, that both of us sprang up at the same
 moment and rushed towards the philosopher to embrace him. He was just
 about to move off, and had already turned sideways when we rushed up
 to him. The dog turned sharply round and barked, thinking doubtless,
 like the philosopher's companion, of an attempt at robbery rather than
 an enraptured embrace. It was plain that he had forgotten us. In a
 word, he ran away. Our embrace was a miserable failure when we did
 overtake him; for my friend gave a loud yell as the dog bit him, and
 the philosopher himself sprang away from me with such force that we
 both fell. What with the dog and the men there was a scramble that
 lasted a few minutes, until my friend began to call out loudly,
 parodying the philosopher's own words: "In the name of all culture and
 pseudo-culture, what does the silly dog want with us? Hence, you
 confounded dog; you uninitiated, never to be initiated; hasten away
 from us, silent and ashamed!" After this outburst matters were cleared
 up to some extent, at any rate so far as they could be cleared up in
 the darkness of the wood. "Oh, it's you!" ejaculated the philosopher,
 "our duellists! How you startled us! What on earth drives you to jump
 out upon us like this at such a time of the night?"
 
 "Joy, thankfulness, and reverence," said we, shaking the old man by
 the hand, whilst the dog barked as if he understood, "we can't let you
 go without telling you this. And if you are to understand everything
 you must not go away just yet; we want to ask you about so many things
 that lie heavily on our hearts. Stay yet awhile; we know every foot of
 the way and can accompany you afterwards. The gentleman you expect may
 yet turn up. Look over yonder on the Rhine: what is that we see so
 clearly floating on the surface of the water as if surrounded by the
 light of many torches? It is there that we may look for your friend, I
 would even venture to say that it is he who is coming towards you with
 all those lights."
 
 And so much did we assail the surprised old man with our entreaties,
 promises, and fantastic delusions, that we persuaded the philosopher
 to walk to and fro with us on the little plateau, "by learned lumber
 undisturbed," as my friend added.
 
 "Shame on you!" said the philosopher, "if you really want to quote
 something, why choose Faust? However, I will give in to you, quotation
 or no quotation, if only our young companions will keep still and not
 run away as suddenly as they made their appearance, for they are like
 will-o'-the-wisps; we are amazed when they are there and again when
 they are not there."
 
 My friend immediately recited--
 
     Respect, I hope, will teach us how we may
     Our lighter disposition keep at bay.
     Our course is only zig-zag as a rule.
 
 The philosopher was surprised, and stood still. "You astonish me, you
 will-o'-the-wisps," he said; "this is no quagmire we are on now. Of
 what use is this ground to you? What does the proximity of a
 philosopher mean to you? For around him the air is sharp and clear,
 the ground dry and hard. You must find out a more fantastic region for
 your zig-zagging inclinations."
 
 "I think," interrupted the philosopher's companion at this point, "the
 gentlemen have already told us that they promised to meet some one
 here at this hour; but it seems to me that they listened to our comedy
 of education like a chorus, and truly 'idealistic spectators'--for
 they did not disturb us; we thought we were alone with each other."
 
 "Yes, that is true," said the philosopher, "that praise must not be
 withheld from them, but it seems to me that they deserve still higher
 praise----"
 
 Here I seized the philosopher's hand and said: "That man must be as
 obtuse as a reptile, with his stomach on the ground and his head
 buried in mud, who can listen to such a discourse as yours without
 becoming earnest and thoughtful, or even excited and indignant.
 Self-accusation and annoyance might perhaps cause a few to get angry;
 but our impression was quite different: the only thing I do not know
 is how exactly to describe it. This hour was so well-timed for us, and
 our minds were so well prepared, that we sat there like empty vessels,
 and now it seems as if we were filled to overflowing with this new
 wisdom: for I no longer know how to help myself, and if some one asked
 me what I am thinking of doing to-morrow, or what I have made up my
 mind to do with myself from now on, I should not know what to answer.
 For it is easy to see that we have up to the present been living and
 educating ourselves in the wrong way--but what can we do to cross over
 the chasm between to-day and to-morrow?"
 
 "Yes," acknowledged my friend, "I have a similar feeling, and I ask
 the same question: but besides that I feel as if I were frightened
 away from German culture by entertaining such high and ideal views of
 its task; yea, as if I were unworthy to co-operate with it in carrying
 out its aims. I only see a resplendent file of the highest natures
 moving towards this goal; I can imagine over what abysses and through
 what temptations this procession travels. Who would dare to be so bold
 as to join in it?"
 
 At this point the philosopher's companion again turned to him and
 said: "Don't be angry with me when I tell you that I too have a
 somewhat similar feeling, which I have not mentioned to you before.
 When talking to you I often felt drawn out of myself, as it were, and
 inspired with your ardour and hopes till I almost forgot myself. Then
 a calmer moment arrives; a piercing wind of reality brings me back to
 earth--and then I see the wide gulf between us, over which you
 yourself, as in a dream, draw me back again. Then what you call
 'culture' merely totters meaninglessly around me or lies heavily on my
 breast: it is like a shirt of mail that weighs me down, or a sword
 that I cannot wield."
 
 Our minds, as we thus argued with the philosopher, were unanimous,
 and, mutually encouraging and stimulating one another, we slowly
 walked with him backwards and forwards along the unencumbered space
 which had earlier in the day served us as a shooting range. And then,
 in the still night, under the peaceful light of hundreds of stars, we
 all broke out into a tirade which ran somewhat as follows:--
 
 "You have told us so much about the genius," we began, "about his
 lonely and wearisome journey through the world, as if nature never
 exhibited anything but the most diametrical contraries: in one place
 the stupid, dull masses, acting by instinct, and then, on a far higher
 and more remote plane, the great contemplating few, destined for the
 production of immortal works. But now you call these the apexes of the
 intellectual pyramid: it would, however, seem that between the broad,
 heavily burdened foundation up to the highest of the free and
 unencumbered peaks there must be countless intermediate degrees, and
 that here we must apply the saying _natura non facit saltus_. Where
 then are we to look for the beginning of what you call culture; where
 is the line of demarcation to be drawn between the spheres which are
 ruled from below upwards and those which are ruled from above
 downwards? And if it be only in connection with these exalted beings
 that true culture may be spoken of, how are institutions to be founded
 for the uncertain existence of such natures, how can we devise
 educational establishments which shall be of benefit only to these
 select few? It rather seems to us that such persons know how to find
 their own way, and that their full strength is shown in their being
 able to walk without the educational crutches necessary for other
 people, and thus undisturbed to make their way through the storm and
 stress of this rough world just like a phantom."
 
 We kept on arguing in this fashion, speaking without any great ability
 and not putting our thoughts in any special form: but the
 philosopher's companion went even further, and said to him: "Just
 think of all these great geniuses of whom we are wont to be so proud,
 looking upon them as tried and true leaders and guides of this real
 German spirit, whose names we commemorate by statues and festivals,
 and whose works we hold up with feelings of pride for the admiration
 of foreign lands--how did they obtain the education you demand for
 them, to what degree do they show that they have been nourished and
 matured by basking in the sun of national education? And yet they are
 seen to be possible, they have nevertheless become men whom we must
 honour: yea, their works themselves justify the form of the
 development of these noble spirits; they justify even a certain want
 of education for which we must make allowance owing to their country
 and the age in which they lived. How could Lessing and Winckelmann
 benefit by the German culture of their time? Even less than, or at all
 events just as little as Beethoven, Schiller, Goethe, or every one of
 our great poets and artists. It may perhaps be a law of nature that
 only the later generations are destined to know by what divine gifts
 an earlier generation was favoured."
 
 At this point the old philosopher could not control his anger, and
 shouted to his companion: "Oh, you innocent lamb of knowledge! You
 gentle sucking doves, all of you! And would you give the name of
 arguments to those distorted, clumsy, narrow-minded, ungainly,
 crippled things? Yes, I have just now been listening to the fruits of
 some of this present-day culture, and my ears are still ringing with
 the sound of historical 'self-understood' things, of over-wise and
 pitiless historical reasonings! Mark this, thou unprofaned Nature:
 thou hast grown old, and for thousands of years this starry sky has
 spanned the space above thee--but thou hast never yet heard such
 conceited and, at bottom, mischievous chatter as the talk of the
 present day! So you are proud of your poets and artists, my good
 Teutons? You point to them and brag about them to foreign countries,
 do you? And because it has given you no trouble to have them amongst
 you, you have formed the pleasant theory that you need not concern
 yourselves further with them? Isn't that so, my inexperienced
 children: they come of their own free will, the stork brings them to
 you! Who would dare to mention a midwife! You deserve an earnest
 teaching, eh? You should be proud of the fact that all the noble and
 brilliant men we have mentioned were prematurely suffocated, worn out,
 and crushed through you, through your barbarism? You think without
 shame of Lessing, who, on account of your stupidity, perished in
 battle against your ludicrous gods and idols, the evils of your
 theatres, your learned men, and your theologians, without once daring
 to lift himself to the height of that immortal flight for which he
 was brought into the world. And what are your impressions when you
 think of Winckelmann, who, that he might rid his eyes of your
 grotesque fatuousness, went to beg help from the Jesuits, and whose
 disgraceful religious conversion recoils upon you and will always
 remain an ineffaceable blemish upon you? You can even name Schiller
 without blushing! Just look at his picture! The fiery, sparkling eyes,
 looking at you with disdain, those flushed, death-like cheeks: can you
 learn nothing from all that? In him you had a beautiful and divine
 plaything, and through it was destroyed. And if it had been possible
 for you to take Goethe's friendship away from this melancholy, hasty
 life, hunted to premature death, then you would have crushed him even
 sooner than you did. You have not rendered assistance to a single one
 of our great geniuses--and now upon that fact you wish to build up the
 theory that none of them shall ever be helped in future? For each of
 them, however, up to this very moment, you have always been the
 'resistance of the stupid world' that Goethe speaks of in his
 "Epilogue to the Bell"; towards each of them you acted the part of
 apathetic dullards or jealous narrow-hearts or malignant egotists. In
 spite of you they created their immortal works, against you they
 directed their attacks, and thanks to you they died so prematurely,
 their tasks only half accomplished, blunted and dulled and shattered
 in the battle. Who can tell to what these heroic men were destined to
 attain if only that true German spirit had gathered them together
 within the protecting walls of a powerful institution?--that spirit
 which, without the help of some such institution, drags out an
 isolated, debased, and degraded existence. All those great men were
 utterly ruined; and it is only an insane belief in the Hegelian
 'reasonableness of all happenings' which would absolve you of any
 responsibility in the matter. And not those men alone! Indictments are
 pouring forth against you from every intellectual province: whether I
 look at the talents of our poets, philosophers, painters, or
 sculptors--and not only in the case of gifts of the highest order--I
 everywhere see immaturity, overstrained nerves, or prematurely
 exhausted energies, abilities wasted and nipped in the bud; I
 everywhere feel that 'resistance of the stupid world,' in other words,
 _your_ guiltiness. That is what I am talking about when I speak of
 lacking educational establishments, and why I think those which at
 present claim the name in such a pitiful condition. Whoever is pleased
 to call this an 'ideal desire,' and refers to it as 'ideal' as if he
 were trying to get rid of it by praising me, deserves the answer that
 the present system is a scandal and a disgrace, and that the man who
 asks for warmth in the midst of ice and snow must indeed get angry if
 he hears this referred to as an 'ideal desire.' The matter we are now
 discussing is concerned with clear, urgent, and palpably evident
 realities: a man who knows anything of the question feels that there
 is a need which must be seen to, just like cold and hunger. But the
 man who is not affected at all by this matter most certainly has a
 standard by which to measure the extent of his own culture, and thus
 to know what I call 'culture,' and where the line should be drawn
 between that which is ruled from below upwards and that which is ruled
 from above downwards."
 
 The philosopher seemed to be speaking very heatedly. We begged him to
 walk round with us again, since he had uttered the latter part of his
 discourse standing near the tree-stump which had served us as a
 target. For a few minutes not a word more was spoken. Slowly and
 thoughtfully we walked to and fro. We did not so much feel ashamed of
 having brought forward such foolish arguments as we felt a kind of
 restitution of our personality. After the heated and, so far as we
 were concerned, very unflattering utterance of the philosopher, we
 seemed to feel ourselves nearer to him--that we even stood in a
 personal relationship to him. For so wretched is man that he never
 feels himself brought into such close contact with a stranger as when
 the latter shows some sign of weakness, some defect. That our
 philosopher had lost his temper and made use of abusive language
 helped to bridge over the gulf created between us by our timid respect
 for him: and for the sake of the reader who feels his indignation
 rising at this suggestion let it be added that this bridge often leads
 from distant hero-worship to personal love and pity. And, after the
 feeling that our personality had been restored to us, this pity
 gradually became stronger and stronger. Why were we making this old
 man walk up and down with us between the rocks and trees at that time
 of the night? And, since he had yielded to our entreaties, why could
 we not have thought of a more modest and unassuming manner of having
 ourselves instructed, why should the three of us have contradicted him
 in such clumsy terms?
 
 For now we saw how thoughtless, unprepared, and baseless were all the
 objections we had made, and how greatly the echo of _the_ present was
 heard in them, the voice of which, in the province of culture, the old
 man would fain not have heard. Our objections, however, were not
 purely intellectual ones: our reasons for protesting against the
 philosopher's statements seemed to lie elsewhere. They arose perhaps
 from the instinctive anxiety to know whether, if the philosopher's
 views were carried into effect, our own personalities would find a
 place in the higher or lower division; and this made it necessary for
 us to find some arguments against the mode of thinking which robbed us
 of our self-styled claims to culture. People, however, should not
 argue with companions who feel the weight of an argument so
 personally; or, as the moral in our case would have been: such
 companions should not argue, should not contradict at all.
 
 So we walked on beside the philosopher, ashamed, compassionate,
 dissatisfied with ourselves, and more than ever convinced that the old
 man was right and that we had done him wrong. How remote now seemed
 the youthful dream of our educational institution; how clearly we saw
 the danger which we had hitherto escaped merely by good luck, namely,
 giving ourselves up body and soul to the educational system which
 forced itself upon our notice so enticingly, from the time when we
 entered the public schools up to that moment. How then had it come
 about that we had not taken our places in the chorus of its admirers?
 Perhaps merely because we were real students, and could still draw
 back from the rough-and-tumble, the pushing and struggling, the
 restless, ever-breaking waves of publicity, to seek refuge in our own
 little educational establishment; which, however, time would have soon
 swallowed up also.
 
 Overcome by such reflections, we were about to address the philosopher
 again, when he suddenly turned towards us, and said in a softer tone--
 
 "I cannot be surprised if you young men behave rashly and
 thoughtlessly; for it is hardly likely that you have ever seriously
 considered what I have just said to you. Don't be in a hurry; carry
 this question about with you, but do at any rate consider it day and
 night. For you are now at the parting of the ways, and now you know
 where each path leads. If you take the one, your age will receive you
 with open arms, you will not find it wanting in honours and
 decorations: you will form units of an enormous rank and file; and
 there will be as many people like-minded standing behind you as in
 front of you. And when the leader gives the word it will be re-echoed
 from rank to rank. For here your first duty is this: to fight in rank
 and file; and your second: to annihilate all those who refuse to form
 part of the rank and file. On the other path you will have but few
 fellow-travellers: it is more arduous, winding and precipitous; and
 those who take the first path will mock you, for your progress is more
 wearisome, and they will try to lure you over into their own ranks.
 When the two paths happen to cross, however, you will be roughly
 handled and thrust aside, or else shunned and isolated.
 
 "Now, take these two parties, so different from each other in every
 respect, and tell me what meaning an educational establishment would
 have for them. That enormous horde, crowding onwards on the first path
 towards its goal, would take the term to mean an institution by which
 each of its members would become duly qualified to take his place in
 the rank and file, and would be purged of everything which might tend
 to make him strive after higher and more remote aims. I don't deny, of
 course, that they can find pompous words with which to describe their
 aims: for example, they speak of the 'universal development of free
 personality upon a firm social, national, and human basis,' or they
 announce as their goal: 'The founding of the peaceful sovereignty of
 the people upon reason, education, and justice.'
 
 "An educational establishment for the other and smaller company,
 however, would be something vastly different. They would employ it to
 prevent themselves from being separated from one another and
 overwhelmed by the first huge crowd, to prevent their few select
 spirits from losing sight of their splendid and noble task through
 premature weariness, or from being turned aside from the true path,
 corrupted, or subverted. These select spirits must complete their
 work: that is the _raison d'tre_ of their common institution--a work,
 indeed, which, as it were, must be free from subjective traces, and
 must further rise above the transient events of future times as the
 pure reflection of the eternal and immutable essence of things. And
 all those who occupy places in that institution must co-operate in the
 endeavour to engender men of genius by this purification from
 subjectiveness and the creation of the works of genius. Not a few,
 even of those whose talents may be of the second or third order, are
 suited to such co-operation, and only when serving in such an
 educational establishment as this do they feel that they are truly
 carrying out their life's task. But now it is just these talents I
 speak of which are drawn away from the true path, and their instincts
 estranged, by the continual seductions of that modern 'culture.'
 
 "The egotistic emotions, weaknesses, and vanities of these few select
 minds are continually assailed by the temptations unceasingly murmured
 into their ears by the spirit of the age: 'Come with me! There you are
 servants, retainers, tools, eclipsed by higher natures; your own
 peculiar characteristics never have free play; you are tied down,
 chained down, like slaves; yea, like automata: here, with me, you will
 enjoy the freedom of your own personalities, as masters should, your
 talents will cast their lustre on yourselves alone, with their aid you
 may come to the very front rank; an innumerable train of followers
 will accompany you, and the applause of public opinion will yield you
 more pleasure than a nobly-bestowed commendation from the height of
 genius.' Even the very best of men now yield to these temptations: and
 it cannot be said that the deciding factor here is the degree of
 talent, or whether a man is accessible to these voices or not; but
 rather the degree and the height of a certain moral sublimity, the
 instinct towards heroism, towards sacrifice--and finally a positive,
 habitual need of culture, prepared by a proper kind of education,
 which education, as I have previously said, is first and foremost
 obedience and submission to the discipline of genius. Of this
 discipline and submission, however, the present institutions called by
 courtesy 'educational establishments' know nothing whatever, although
 I have no doubt that the public school was originally intended to be
 an institution for sowing the seeds of true culture, or at least as a
 preparation for it. I have no doubt, either, that they took the first
 bold steps in the wonderful and stirring times of the Reformation, and
 that afterwards, in the era which gave birth to Schiller and Goethe,
 there was again a growing demand for culture, like the first
 protuberance of that wing spoken of by Plato in the _Phaedrus_, which,
 at every contact with the beautiful, bears the soul aloft into the
 upper regions, the habitations of the gods."
 
 "Ah," began the philosopher's companion, "when you quote the divine
 Plato and the world of ideas, I do not think you are angry with me,
 however much my previous utterance may have merited your disapproval
 and wrath. As soon as you speak of it, I feel that Platonic wing
 rising within me; and it is only at intervals, when I act as the
 charioteer of my soul, that I have any difficulty with the resisting
 and unwilling horse that Plato has also described to us, the
 'crooked, lumbering animal, put together anyhow, with a short, thick
 neck; flat-faced, and of a dark colour, with grey eyes and blood-red
 complexion; the mate of insolence and pride, shag-eared and deaf,
 hardly yielding to whip or spur.'[8] Just think how long I have lived
 at a distance from you, and how all those temptations you speak of
 have endeavoured to lure me away, not perhaps without some success,
 even though I myself may not have observed it. I now see more clearly
 than ever the necessity for an institution which will enable us to
 live and mix freely with the few men of true culture, so that we may
 have them as our leaders and guiding stars. How greatly I feel the
 danger of travelling alone! And when it occurred to me that I could
 save myself by flight from all contact with the spirit of the time, I
 found that this flight itself was a mere delusion. Continuously, with
 every breath we take, some amount of that atmosphere circulates
 through every vein and artery, and no solitude is lonesome or distant
 enough for us to be out of reach of its fogs and clouds. Whether in
 the guise of hope, doubt, profit, or virtue, the shades of that
 culture hover about us; and we have been deceived by that jugglery
 even here in the presence of a true hermit of culture. How steadfastly
 and faithfully must the few followers of that culture--which might
 almost be called sectarian--be ever on the alert! How they must
 strengthen and uphold one another! How adversely would any errors be
 criticised here, and how sympathetically excused! And thus, teacher, I
 ask you to pardon me, after you have laboured so earnestly to set me
 in the right path!"
 
 "You use a language which I do not care for, my friend," said the
 philosopher, "and one which reminds me of a diocesan conference. With
 that I have nothing to do. But your Platonic horse pleases me, and on
 its account you shall be forgiven. I am willing to exchange my own
 animal for yours. But it is getting chilly, and I don't feel inclined
 to walk about any more just now. The friend I was waiting for is
 indeed foolish enough to come up here even at midnight if he promised
 to do so. But I have waited in vain for the signal agreed upon; and I
 cannot guess what has delayed him. For as a rule he is punctual, as we
 old men are wont, to be, something that you young men nowadays look
 upon as old-fashioned. But he has left me in the lurch for once: how
 annoying it is! Come away with me! It's time to go!"
 
 At this moment something happened.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [6] It will be apparent from these words that Nietzsche is still under
 the influence of Schopenhauer.--TR.
 
 [7] This prophecy has come true.--TR.
 
 [8] _Phaedrus_; Jowett's translation.
 
 
 
 
 FIFTH LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 23rd of March 1872._)
 
 
 LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,--If you have lent a sympathetic ear to what I
 have told you about the heated argument of our philosopher in the
 stillness of that memorable night, you must have felt as disappointed
 as we did when he announced his peevish intention. You will remember
 that he had suddenly told us he wished to go; for, having been left in
 the lurch by his friend in the first place, and, in the second, having
 been bored rather than animated by the remarks addressed to him by his
 companion and ourselves when walking backwards and forwards on the
 hillside, he now apparently wanted to put an end to what appeared to
 him to be a useless discussion. It must have seemed to him that his
 day had been lost, and he would have liked to blot it out of his
 memory, together with the recollection of ever having made our
 acquaintance. And we were thus rather unwillingly preparing to depart
 when something else suddenly brought him to a standstill, and the foot
 he had just raised sank hesitatingly to the ground again.
 
 A coloured flame, making a crackling noise for a few seconds,
 attracted our attention from the direction of the Rhine; and
 immediately following upon this we heard a slow, harmonious call,
 quite in tune, although plainly the cry of numerous youthful voices.
 "That's his signal," exclaimed the philosopher, "so my friend is
 really coming, and I haven't waited for nothing, after all. It will be
 a midnight meeting indeed--but how am I to let him know that I am
 still here? Come! Your pistols; let us see your talent once again! Did
 you hear the severe rhythm of that melody saluting us? Mark it well,
 and answer it in the same rhythm by a series of shots."
 
 This was a task well suited to our tastes and abilities; so we loaded
 up as quickly as we could and pointed our weapons at the brilliant
 stars in the heavens, whilst the echo of that piercing cry died away
 in the distance. The reports of the first, second, and third shots
 sounded sharply in the stillness; and then the philosopher cried
 "False time!" as our rhythm was suddenly interrupted: for, like a
 lightning flash, a shooting star tore its way across the clouds after
 the third report, and almost involuntarily our fourth and fifth shots
 were sent after it in the direction it had taken.
 
 "False time!" said the philosopher again, "who told you to shoot
 stars! They can fall well enough without you! People should know what
 they want before they begin to handle weapons."
 
 And then we once more heard that loud melody from the waters of the
 Rhine, intoned by numerous and strong voices. "They understand us,"
 said the philosopher, laughing, "and who indeed could resist when
 such a dazzling phantom comes within range?" "Hush!" interrupted his
 friend, "what sort of a company can it be that returns the signal to
 us in such a way? I should say they were between twenty and forty
 strong, manly voices in that crowd--and where would such a number come
 from to greet us? They don't appear to have left the opposite bank of
 the Rhine yet; but at any rate we must have a look at them from our
 own side of the river. Come along, quickly!"
 
 We were then standing near the top of the hill, you may remember, and
 our view of the river was interrupted by a dark, thick wood. On the
 other hand, as I have told you, from the quiet little spot which we
 had left we could have a better view than from the little plateau on
 the hillside; and the Rhine, with the island of Nonnenwrth in the
 middle, was just visible to the beholder who peered over the
 tree-tops. We therefore set off hastily towards this little spot,
 taking care, however, not to go too quickly for the philosopher's
 comfort. The night was pitch dark, and we seemed to find our way by
 instinct rather than by clearly distinguishing the path, as we walked
 down with the philosopher in the middle.
 
 We had scarcely reached our side of the river when a broad and fiery,
 yet dull and uncertain light shot up, which plainly came from the
 opposite side of the Rhine. "Those are torches," I cried, "there is
 nothing surer than that my comrades from Bonn are over yonder, and
 that your friend must be with them. It is they who sang that peculiar
 song, and they have doubtless accompanied your friend here. See!
 Listen! They are putting off in little boats. The whole torchlight
 procession will have arrived here in less than half an hour."
 
 The philosopher jumped back. "What do you say?" he ejaculated, "your
 comrades from Bonn--students--can my friend have come here with
 _students_?"
 
 This question, uttered almost wrathfully, provoked us. "What's your
 objection to students?" we demanded; but there was no answer. It was
 only after a pause that the philosopher slowly began to speak, not
 addressing us directly, as it were, but rather some one in the
 distance: "So, my friend, even at midnight, even on the top of a
 lonely mountain, we shall not be alone; and you yourself are bringing
 a pack of mischief-making students along with you, although you well
 know that I am only too glad to get out of the way of _hoc genus
 omne_. I don't quite understand you, my friend: it must mean something
 when we arrange to meet after a long separation at such an
 out-of-the-way place and at such an unusual hour. Why should we want a
 crowd of witnesses--and such witnesses! What calls us together to-day
 is least of all a sentimental, soft-hearted necessity; for both of us
 learnt early in life to live alone in dignified isolation. It was not
 for our own sakes, not to show our tender feelings towards each other,
 or to perform an unrehearsed act of friendship, that we decided to
 meet here; but that here, where I once came suddenly upon you as you
 sat in majestic solitude, we might earnestly deliberate with each
 other like knights of a new order. Let them listen to us who can
 understand us; but why should you bring with you a throng of people
 who don't understand us! I don't know what you mean by such a thing,
 my friend!"
 
 We did not think it proper to interrupt the dissatisfied old grumbler;
 and as he came to a melancholy close we did not dare to tell him how
 greatly this distrustful repudiation of students vexed us.
 
 At last the philosopher's companion turned to him and said: "I am
 reminded of the fact that even you at one time, before I made your
 acquaintance, occupied posts in several universities, and that reports
 concerning your intercourse with the students and your methods of
 instruction at the time are still in circulation. From the tone of
 resignation in which you have just referred to students many would be
 inclined to think that you had some peculiar experiences which were
 not at all to your liking; but personally I rather believe that you
 saw and experienced in such places just what every one else saw and
 experienced in them, but that you judged what you saw and felt more
 justly and severely than any one else. For, during the time I have
 known you, I have learnt that the most noteworthy, instructive, and
 decisive experiences and events in one's life are those which are of
 daily occurrence; that the greatest riddle, displayed in full view of
 all, is seen by the fewest to be the greatest riddle, and that these
 problems are spread about in every direction, under the very feet of
 the passers-by, for the few real philosophers to lift up carefully,
 thenceforth to shine as diamonds of wisdom. Perhaps, in the short time
 now left us before the arrival of your friend, you will be good enough
 to tell us something of your experiences of university life, so as to
 close the circle of observations, to which we were involuntarily
 urged, respecting our educational institutions. We may also be allowed
 to remind you that you, at an earlier stage of your remarks, gave me
 the promise that you would do so. Starting with the public school, you
 claimed for it an extraordinary importance: all other institutions
 must be judged by its standard, according as its aim has been
 proposed; and, if its aim happens to be wrong, all the others have to
 suffer. Such an importance cannot now be adopted by the universities
 as a standard; for, by their present system of grouping, they would be
 nothing more than institutions where public school students might go
 through finishing courses. You promised me that you would explain this
 in greater detail later on: perhaps our student friends can bear
 witness to that, if they chanced to overhear that part of our
 conversation."
 
 "We can testify to that," I put in. The philosopher then turned to us
 and said: "Well, if you really did listen attentively, perhaps you can
 now tell me what you understand by the expression 'the present aim of
 our public schools.' Besides, you are still near enough to this sphere
 to judge my opinions by the standard of your own impressions and
 experiences."
 
 My friend instantly answered, quickly and smartly, as was his habit,
 in the following words: "Until now we had always thought that the sole
 object of the public school was to prepare students for the
 universities. This preparation, however, should tend to make us
 independent enough for the extraordinarily free position of a
 university student;[9] for it seems to me that a student, to a greater
 extent than any other individual, has more to decide and settle for
 himself. He must guide himself on a wide, utterly unknown path for
 many years, so the public school must do its best to render him
 independent."
 
 I continued the argument where my friend left off. "It even seems to
 me," I said, "that everything for which you have justly blamed the
 public school is only a necessary means employed to imbue the youthful
 student with some kind of independence, or at all events with the
 belief that there is such a thing. The teaching of German composition
 must be at the service of this independence: the individual must enjoy
 his opinions and carry out his designs early, so that he may be able
 to travel alone and without crutches. In this way he will soon be
 encouraged to produce original work, and still sooner to take up
 criticism and analysis. If Latin and Greek studies prove insufficient
 to make a student an enthusiastic admirer of antiquity, the methods
 with which such studies are pursued are at all events sufficient to
 awaken the scientific sense, the desire for a more strict causality of
 knowledge, the passion for finding out and inventing. Only think how
 many young men may be lured away for ever to the attractions of
 science by a new reading of some sort which they have snatched up with
 youthful hands at the public school! The public school boy must learn
 and collect a great deal of varied information: hence an impulse will
 gradually be created, accompanied with which he will continue to learn
 and collect independently at the university. We believe, in short,
 that the aim of the public school is to prepare and accustom the
 student always to live and learn independently afterwards, just as
 beforehand he must live and learn dependently at the public school."
 
 The philosopher laughed, not altogether good-naturedly, and said: "You
 have just given me a fine example of that independence. And it is this
 very independence that shocks me so much, and makes any place in the
 neighbourhood of present-day students so disagreeable to me. Yes, my
 good friends, you are perfect, you are mature; nature has cast you and
 broken up the moulds, and your teachers must surely gloat over you.
 What liberty, certitude, and independence of judgment; what novelty
 and freshness of insight! You sit in judgment--and the cultures of all
 ages run away. The scientific sense is kindled, and rises out of you
 like a flame--let people be careful, lest you set them alight! If I go
 further into the question and look at your professors, I again find
 the same independence in a greater and even more charming degree:
 never was there a time so full of the most sublime independent folk,
 never was slavery more detested, the slavery of education and culture
 included.
 
 "Permit me, however, to measure this independence of yours by the
 standard of this culture, and to consider your university as an
 educational institution and nothing else. If a foreigner desires to
 know something of the methods of our universities, he asks first of
 all with emphasis: 'How is the student connected with the university?'
 We answer: 'By the ear, as a hearer.' The foreigner is astonished.
 'Only by the ear?' he repeats. 'Only by the ear,' we again reply. The
 student hears. When he speaks, when he sees, when he is in the company
 of his companions when he takes up some branch of art: in short, when
 he _lives_ he is independent, _i.e._ not dependent upon the
 educational institution. The student very often writes down something
 while he hears; and it is only at these rare moments that he hangs to
 the umbilical cord of his alma mater. He himself may choose what he is
 to listen to; he is not bound to believe what is said; he may close
 his ears if he does not care to hear. This is the 'acroamatic' method
 of teaching.
 
 "The teacher, however, speaks to these listening students. Whatever
 else he may think and do is cut off from the student's perception by
 an immense gap. The professor often reads when he is speaking. As a
 rule he wishes to have as many hearers as possible; he is not content
 to have a few, and he is never satisfied with one only. One speaking
 mouth, with many ears, and half as many writing hands--there you have
 to all appearances, the external academical apparatus; the university
 engine of culture set in motion. Moreover, the proprietor of this one
 mouth is severed from and independent of the owners of the many ears;
 and this double independence is enthusiastically designated as
 'academical freedom.' And again, that this freedom may be broadened
 still more, the one may speak what he likes and the other may hear
 what he likes; except that, behind both of them, at a modest distance,
 stands the State, with all the intentness of a supervisor, to remind
 the professors and students from time to time that _it_ is the aim,
 the goal, the be-all and end-all, of this curious speaking and hearing
 procedure.
 
 "We, who must be permitted to regard this phenomenon merely as an
 educational institution, will then inform the inquiring foreigner that
 what is called 'culture' in our universities merely proceeds from the
 mouth to the ear, and that every kind of training for culture is, as I
 said before, merely 'acroamatic.' Since, however, not only the
 hearing, but also the choice of what to hear is left to the
 independent decision of the liberal-minded and unprejudiced student,
 and since, again, he can withhold all belief and authority from what
 he hears, all training for culture, in the true sense of the term,
 reverts to himself; and the independence it was thought desirable to
 aim at in the public school now presents itself with the highest
 possible pride as 'academical self-training for culture,' and struts
 about in its brilliant plumage.
 
 "Happy times, when youths are clever and cultured enough to teach
 themselves how to walk! Unsurpassable public schools, which succeed in
 implanting independence in the place of the dependence, discipline,
 subordination, and obedience implanted by former generations that
 thought it their duty to drive away all the bumptiousness of
 independence! Do you clearly see, my good friends, why I, from the
 standpoint of culture, regard the present type of university as a mere
 appendage to the public school? The culture instilled by the public
 school passes through the gates of the university as something ready
 and entire, and with its own particular claims: _it_ demands, it gives
 laws, it sits in judgment. Do not, then, let yourselves be deceived in
 regard to the cultured student; for he, in so far as he thinks he has
 absorbed the blessings of education, is merely the public school boy
 as moulded by the hands of his teacher: one who, since his academical
 isolation, and after he has left the public school, has therefore been
 deprived of all further guidance to culture, that from now on he may
 begin to live by himself and be free.
 
 "Free! Examine this freedom, ye observers of human nature! Erected
 upon the sandy, crumbling foundation of our present public school
 culture, its building slants to one side, trembling before the
 whirlwind's blast. Look at the free student, the herald of
 self-culture: guess what his instincts are; explain him from his
 needs! How does his culture appear to you when you measure it by three
 graduated scales: first, by his need for philosophy; second, by his
 instinct for art; and third, by Greek and Roman antiquity as the
 incarnate categorical imperative of all culture?
 
 "Man is so much encompassed about by the most serious and difficult
 problems that, when they are brought to his attention in the right
 way, he is impelled betimes towards a lasting kind of philosophical
 wonder, from which alone, as a fruitful soil, a deep and noble culture
 can grow forth. His own experiences lead him most frequently to the
 consideration of these problems; and it is especially in the
 tempestuous period of youth that every personal event shines with a
 double gleam, both as the exemplification of a triviality and, at the
 same time, of an eternally surprising problem, deserving of
 explanation. At this age, which, as it were, sees his experiences
 encircled with metaphysical rainbows, man is, in the highest degree,
 in need of a guiding hand, because he has suddenly and almost
 instinctively convinced himself of the ambiguity of existence, and has
 lost the firm support of the beliefs he has hitherto held.
 
 "This natural state of great need must of course be looked upon as the
 worst enemy of that beloved independence for which the cultured youth
 of the present day should be trained. All these sons of the present,
 who have raised the banner of the 'self-understood,' are therefore
 straining every nerve to crush down these feelings of youth, to
 cripple them, to mislead them, or to stop their growth altogether;
 and the favourite means employed is to paralyse that natural
 philosophic impulse by the so-called "historical culture." A still
 recent system,[10] which has won for itself a world-wide scandalous
 reputation, has discovered the formula for this self-destruction of
 philosophy; and now, wherever the historical view of things is found,
 we can see such a naive recklessness in bringing the irrational to
 'rationality' and 'reason' and making black look like white, that one
 is even inclined to parody Hegel's phrase and ask: 'Is all this
 irrationality real?' Ah, it is only the irrational that now seems to
 be 'real,' _i.e._ really doing something; and to bring this kind of
 reality forward for the elucidation of history is reckoned as true
 'historical culture.' It is into this that the philosophical impulse
 of our time has pupated itself; and the peculiar philosophers of our
 universities seem to have conspired to fortify and confirm the young
 academicians in it.
 
 "It has thus come to pass that, in place of a profound interpretation
 of the eternally recurring problems, a historical--yea, even
 philological--balancing and questioning has entered into the
 educational arena: what this or that philosopher has or has not
 thought; whether this or that essay or dialogue is to be ascribed to
 him or not; or even whether this particular reading of a classical
 text is to be preferred to that. It is to neutral preoccupations with
 philosophy like these that our students in philosophical seminaries
 are stimulated; whence I have long accustomed myself to regard such
 science as a mere ramification of philology, and to value its
 representatives in proportion as they are good or bad philologists. So
 it has come about that _philosophy itself_ is banished from the
 universities: wherewith our first question as to the value of our
 universities from the standpoint of culture is answered.
 
 "In what relationship these universities stand to _art_ cannot be
 acknowledged without shame: in none at all. Of artistic thinking,
 learning, striving, and comparison, we do not find in them a single
 trace; and no one would seriously think that the voice of the
 universities would ever be raised to help the advancement of the
 higher national schemes of art. Whether an individual teacher feels
 himself to be personally qualified for art, or whether a professorial
 chair has been established for the training of stheticising literary
 historians, does not enter into the question at all: the fact remains
 that the university is not in a position to control the young
 academician by severe artistic discipline, and that it must let happen
 what happens, willy-nilly--and this is the cutting answer to the
 immodest pretensions of the universities to represent themselves as
 the highest educational institutions.
 
 "We find our academical 'independents' growing up without philosophy
 and without art; and how can they then have any need to 'go in for'
 the Greeks and Romans?--for we need now no longer pretend, like our
 forefathers, to have any great regard for Greece and Rome, which,
 besides, sit enthroned in almost inaccessible loneliness and majestic
 alienation. The universities of the present time consequently give no
 heed to almost extinct educational predilections like these, and found
 their philological chairs for the training of new and exclusive
 generations of philologists, who on their part give similar
 philological preparation in the public schools--a vicious circle which
 is useful neither to philologists nor to public schools, but which
 above all accuses the university for the third time of not being what
 it so pompously proclaims itself to be--a training ground for culture.
 Take away the Greeks, together with philosophy and art, and what
 ladder have you still remaining by which to ascend to culture? For, if
 you attempt to clamber up the ladder without these helps, you must
 permit me to inform you that all your learning will lie like a heavy
 burden on your shoulders rather than furnishing you with wings and
 bearing you aloft.
 
 "If you honest thinkers have honourably remained in these three stages
 of intelligence, and have perceived that, in comparison with the
 Greeks, the modern student is unsuited to and unprepared for
 philosophy, that he has no truly artistic instincts, and is merely a
 barbarian believing himself to be free, you will not on this account
 turn away from him in disgust, although you will, of course, avoid
 coming into too close proximity with him. For, as he now is, _he is
 not to blame_: as you have perceived him he is the dumb but terrible
 accuser of those who are to blame.
 
 "You should understand the secret language spoken by this guilty
 innocent, and then you, too, would learn to understand the inward
 state of that independence which is paraded outwardly with so much
 ostentation. Not one of these noble, well-qualified youths has
 remained a stranger to that restless, tiring, perplexing, and
 debilitating need of culture: during his university term, when he is
 apparently the only free man in a crowd of servants and officials, he
 atones for this huge illusion of freedom by ever-growing inner doubts
 and convictions. He feels that he can neither lead nor help himself;
 and then he plunges hopelessly into the workaday world and endeavours
 to ward off such feelings by study. The most trivial bustle fastens
 itself upon him; he sinks under his heavy burden. Then he suddenly
 pulls himself together; he still feels some of that power within him
 which would have enabled him to keep his head above water. Pride and
 noble resolutions assert themselves and grow in him. He is afraid of
 sinking at this early stage into the limits of a narrow profession;
 and now he grasps at pillars and railings alongside the stream that he
 may not be swept away by the current. In vain! for these supports give
 way, and he finds he has clutched at broken reeds. In low and
 despondent spirits he sees his plans vanish away in smoke. His
 condition is undignified, even dreadful: he keeps between the two
 extremes of work at high pressure and a state of melancholy
 enervation. Then he becomes tired, lazy, afraid of work, fearful of
 everything great; and hating himself. He looks into his own breast,
 analyses his faculties, and finds he is only peering into hollow and
 chaotic vacuity. And then he once more falls from the heights of his
 eagerly-desired self-knowledge into an ironical scepticism. He divests
 his struggles of their real importance, and feels himself ready to
 undertake any class of useful work, however degrading. He now seeks
 consolation in hasty and incessant action so as to hide himself from
 himself. And thus his helplessness and the want of a leader towards
 culture drive him from one form of life into another: but doubt,
 elevation, worry, hope, despair--everything flings him hither and
 thither as a proof that all the stars above him by which he could have
 guided his ship have set.
 
 "There you have the picture of this glorious independence of yours, of
 that academical freedom, reflected in the highest minds--those which
 are truly in need of culture, compared with whom that other crowd of
 indifferent natures does not count at all, natures that delight in
 their freedom in a purely barbaric sense. For these latter show by
 their base smugness and their narrow professional limitations that
 this is the right element for them: against which there is nothing to
 be said. Their comfort, however, does not counter-balance the
 suffering of one single young man who has an inclination for culture
 and feels the need of a guiding hand, and who at last, in a moment of
 discontent, throws down the reins and begins to despise himself. This
 is the guiltless innocent; for who has saddled him with the
 unbearable burden of standing alone? Who has urged him on to
 independence at an age when one of the most natural and peremptory
 needs of youth is, so to speak, a self-surrendering to great leaders
 and an enthusiastic following in the footsteps of the masters?
 
 "It is repulsive to consider the effects to which the violent
 suppression of such noble natures may lead. He who surveys the
 greatest supporters and friends of that pseudo-culture of the present
 time, which I so greatly detest, will only too frequently find among
 them such degenerate and shipwrecked men of culture, driven by inward
 despair to violent enmity against culture, when, in a moment of
 desperation, there was no one at hand to show them how to attain it.
 It is not the worst and most insignificant people whom we afterwards
 find acting as journalists and writers for the press in the
 metamorphosis of despair: the spirit of some well-known men of letters
 might even be described, and justly, as degenerate studentdom. How
 else, for example, can we reconcile that once well-known 'young
 Germany' with its present degenerate successors? Here we discover a
 need of culture which, so to speak, has grown mutinous, and which
 finally breaks out into the passionate cry: I am culture! There,
 before the gates of the public schools and universities, we can see
 the culture which has been driven like a fugitive away from these
 institutions. True, this culture is without the erudition of those
 establishments, but assumes nevertheless the mien of a sovereign; so
 that, for example, Gutzkow the novelist might be pointed to as the
 best example of a modern public school boy turned sthete. Such a
 degenerate man of culture is a serious matter, and it is a horrifying
 spectacle for us to see that all our scholarly and journalistic
 publicity bears the stigma of this degeneracy upon it. How else can we
 do justice to our learned men, who pay untiring attention to, and even
 co-operate in the journalistic corruption of the people, how else than
 by the acknowledgment that their learning must fill a want of their
 own similar to that filled by novel-writing in the case of others:
 _i.e._ a flight from one's self, an ascetic extirpation of their
 cultural impulses, a desperate attempt to annihilate their own
 individuality. From our degenerate literary art, as also from that
 itch for scribbling of our learned men which has now reached such
 alarming proportions, wells forth the same sigh: Oh that we could
 forget ourselves! The attempt fails: memory, not yet suffocated by the
 mountains of printed paper under which it is buried, keeps on
 repeating from time to time: 'A degenerate man of culture! Born for
 culture and brought up to non-culture! Helpless barbarian, slave of
 the day, chained to the present moment, and thirsting for
 something--ever thirsting!'
 
 "Oh, the miserable guilty innocents! For they lack something, a need
 that every one of them must have felt: a real educational institution,
 which could give them goals, masters, methods, companions; and from
 the midst of which the invigorating and uplifting breath of the true
 German spirit would inspire them. Thus they perish in the wilderness;
 thus they degenerate into enemies of that spirit which is at bottom
 closely allied to their own; thus they pile fault upon fault higher
 than any former generation ever did, soiling the clean, desecrating
 the holy, canonising the false and spurious. It is by them that you
 can judge the educational strength of our universities, asking
 yourselves, in all seriousness, the question: What cause did you
 promote through them? The German power of invention, the noble German
 desire for knowledge, the qualifying of the German for diligence and
 self-sacrifice--splendid and beautiful things, which other nations
 envy you; yea, the finest and most magnificent things in the world, if
 only that true German spirit overspread them like a dark thundercloud,
 pregnant with the blessing of forthcoming rain. But you are afraid of
 this spirit, and it has therefore come to pass that a cloud of another
 sort has thrown a heavy and oppressive atmosphere around your
 universities, in which your noble-minded scholars breathe wearily and
 with difficulty.
 
 "A tragic, earnest, and instructive attempt was made in the present
 century to destroy the cloud I have last referred to, and also to turn
 the people's looks in the direction of the high welkin of the German
 spirit. In all the annals of our universities we cannot find any trace
 of a second attempt, and he who would impressively demonstrate what is
 now necessary for us will never find a better example. I refer to the
 old, primitive _Burschenschaft_.[11]
 
 "When the war of liberation was over, the young student brought back
 home the unlooked-for and worthiest trophy of battle--the freedom of
 his fatherland. Crowned with this laurel he thought of something still
 nobler. On returning to the university, and finding that he was
 breathing heavily, he became conscious of that oppressive and
 contaminated air which overhung the culture of the university. He
 suddenly saw, with horror-struck, wide-open eyes, the non-German
 barbarism, hiding itself in the guise of all kinds of scholasticism;
 he suddenly discovered that his own leaderless comrades were abandoned
 to a repulsive kind of youthful intoxication. And he was exasperated.
 He rose with the same aspect of proud indignation as Schiller may have
 had when reciting the _Robbers_ to his companions: and if he had
 prefaced his drama with the picture of a lion, and the motto, 'in
 tyrannos,' his follower himself was that very lion preparing to
 spring; and every 'tyrant' began to tremble. Yes, if these indignant
 youths were looked at superficially and timorously, they would seem to
 be little else than Schiller's robbers: their talk sounded so wild to
 the anxious listener that Rome and Sparta seemed mere nunneries
 compared with these new spirits. The consternation raised by these
 young men was indeed far more general than had ever been caused by
 those other 'robbers' in court circles, of which a German prince,
 according to Goethe, is said to have expressed the opinion: 'If he had
 been God, and had foreseen the appearance of the _Robbers_, he would
 not have created the world.'
 
 "Whence came the incomprehensible intensity of this alarm? For those
 young men were the bravest, purest, and most talented of the band both
 in dress and habits: they were distinguished by a magnanimous
 recklessness and a noble simplicity. A divine command bound them
 together to seek harder and more pious superiority: what could be
 feared from them? To what extent this fear was merely deceptive or
 simulated or really true is something that will probably never be
 exactly known; but a strong instinct spoke out of this fear and out of
 its disgraceful and senseless persecution. This instinct hated the
 Burschenschaft with an intense hatred for two reasons: first of all on
 account of its organisation, as being the first attempt to construct a
 true educational institution, and, secondly, on account of the spirit
 of this institution, that earnest, manly, stern, and daring German
 spirit; that spirit of the miner's son, Luther, which has come down to
 us unbroken from the time of the Reformation.
 
 "Think of the _fate_ of the Burschenschaft when I ask you, Did the
 German university then understand that spirit, as even the German
 princes in their hatred appear to have understood it? Did the alma
 mater boldly and resolutely throw her protecting arms round her noble
 sons and say: 'You must kill me first, before you touch my children?'
 I hear your answer--by it you may judge whether the German university
 is an educational institution or not.
 
 "The student knew at that time at what depth a true educational
 institution must take root, namely, in an inward renovation and
 inspiration of the purest moral faculties. And this must always be
 repeated to the student's credit. He may have learnt on the field of
 battle what he could learn least of all in the sphere of 'academical
 freedom': that great leaders are necessary, and that all culture begins
 with obedience. And in the midst of victory, with his thoughts turned to
 his liberated fatherland, he made the vow that he would remain German.
 German! Now he learnt to understand his Tacitus; now he grasped the
 signification of Kant's categorical imperative; now he was enraptured by
 Weber's "Lyre and Sword" songs.[12] The gates of philosophy, of art,
 yea, even of antiquity, opened unto him; and in one of the most
 memorable of bloody acts, the murder of Kotzebue, he revenged--with
 penetrating insight and enthusiastic short-sightedness--his one and only
 Schiller, prematurely consumed by the opposition of the stupid world:
 Schiller, who could have been his leader, master, and organiser, and
 whose loss he now bewailed with such heartfelt resentment.
 
 "For that was the doom of those promising students: they did not find
 the leaders they wanted. They gradually became uncertain,
 discontented, and at variance among themselves; unlucky indiscretions
 showed only too soon that the one indispensability of powerful minds
 was lacking in the midst of them: and, while that mysterious murder
 gave evidence of astonishing strength, it gave no less evidence of the
 grave danger arising from the want of a leader. They were
 leaderless--therefore they perished.
 
 "For I repeat it, my friends! All culture begins with the very
 opposite of that which is now so highly esteemed as 'academical
 freedom': with obedience, with subordination, with discipline, with
 subjection. And as leaders must have followers so also must the
 followers have a leader--here a certain reciprocal predisposition
 prevails in the hierarchy of spirits: yea, a kind of pre-established
 harmony. This eternal hierarchy, towards which all things naturally
 tend, is always threatened by that pseudo-culture which now sits on
 the throne of the present. It endeavours either to bring the leaders
 down to the level of its own servitude or else to cast them out
 altogether. It seduces the followers when they are seeking their
 predestined leader, and overcomes them by the fumes of its narcotics.
 When, however, in spite of all this, leader and followers have at last
 met, wounded and sore, there is an impassioned feeling of rapture,
 like the echo of an ever-sounding lyre, a feeling which I can let you
 divine only by means of a simile.
 
 "Have you ever, at a musical rehearsal, looked at the strange,
 shrivelled-up, good-natured species of men who usually form the German
 orchestra? What changes and fluctuations we see in that capricious
 goddess 'form'! What noses and ears, what clumsy, _danse macabre_
 movements! Just imagine for a moment that you were deaf, and had never
 dreamed of the existence of sound or music, and that you were looking
 upon the orchestra as a company of actors, and trying to enjoy their
 performance as a drama and nothing more. Undisturbed by the idealising
 effect of the sound, you could never see enough of the stern,
 medieval, wood-cutting movement of this comical spectacle, this
 harmonious parody on the _homo sapiens_.
 
 "Now, on the other hand, assume that your musical sense has returned,
 and that your ears are opened. Look at the honest conductor at the
 head of the orchestra performing his duties in a dull, spiritless
 fashion: you no longer think of the comical aspect of the whole scene,
 you listen--but it seems to you that the spirit of tediousness spreads
 out from the honest conductor over all his companions. Now you see
 only torpidity and flabbiness, you hear only the trivial, the
 rhythmically inaccurate, and the melodiously trite. You see the
 orchestra only as an indifferent, ill-humoured, and even wearisome
 crowd of players.
 
 "But set a genius--a real genius--in the midst of this crowd; and you
 instantly perceive something almost incredible. It is as if this
 genius, in his lightning transmigration, had entered into these
 mechanical, lifeless bodies, and as if only one demoniacal eye gleamed
 forth out of them all. Now look and listen--you can never listen
 enough! When you again observe the orchestra, now loftily storming,
 now fervently wailing, when you notice the quick tightening of every
 muscle and the rhythmical necessity of every gesture, then you too
 will feel what a pre-established harmony there is between leader and
 followers, and how in the hierarchy of spirits everything impels us
 towards the establishment of a like organisation. You can divine from
 my simile what I would understand by a true educational institution,
 and why I am very far from recognising one in the present type of
 university."
 
      [From a few MS. notes written down by Nietzsche in the spring
      and autumn of 1872, and still preserved in the Nietzsche
      Archives at Weimar, it is evident that he at one time
      intended to add a sixth and seventh lecture to the five just
      given. These notes, although included in the latest edition
      of Nietzsche's works, are utterly lacking in interest and
      continuity, being merely headings and sub-headings of
      sections in the proposed lectures. They do not, indeed,
      occupy more than two printed pages, and were deemed too
      fragmentary for translation in this edition.]
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [9] The reader may be reminded that a German university student is
 subject to very few restrictions, and that much greater liberty is
 allowed him than is permitted to English students. Nietzsche did not
 approve of this extraordinary freedom, which, in his opinion, led to
 intellectual lawlessness.--TR.
 
 [10] Hegel's.--TR.
 
 [11] A German students' association, of liberal principles, founded for
 patriotic purposes at Jena in 1813.
 
 [12] Weber set one or two of Krner's "Lyre and Sword" songs to music.
 The reader will remember that these lectures were delivered when
 Nietzsche was only in his twenty-eighth year. Like Goethe, he afterwards
 freed himself from all patriotic trammels and prejudices, and aimed at a
 general European culture. Luther, Schiller, Kant, Krner, and Weber did
 not continue to be the objects of his veneration for long, indeed, they
 were afterwards violently attacked by him, and the superficial student
 who speaks of inconsistency may be reminded of Nietzsche's phrase in
 stanza 12 of the epilogue to _Beyond Good and Evil_: "Nur wer sich
 wandelt, bleibt mit mir verwandt"; _i.e._ only the changing ones have
 anything in common with me.--TR.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
     | Typographical errors corrected in text:                   |
     |                                                           |
     | Page 124: neigbourhood replaced with neighbourhood        |
     | Page 130: universites replaced by universities            |
     |                                                           |
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of On the Future of our Educational

 
 
 
 Produced by Thanks to Jeannie Howse, Thierry Alberto and
 the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
 http://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from images
 generously made available by The Internet Archive)
 
 
 
 
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
     | Transcriber's Note:                                       |
     |                                                           |
     | Inconsistent hyphenation in the original document has     |
     | been preserved.                                           |
     |                                                           |
     | Greek has been transliterated and marked +like so+.       |
     |                                                           |
     | Obvious typographical errors have been corrected. For     |
     | a complete list, please see the end of this document.     |
     |                                                           |
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
   THE COMPLETE WORKS
 
   OF
 
   FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
   _The First Complete and Authorised English Translation_
 
   EDITED BY
 
   Dr. OSCAR LEVY
 
   [Illustration]
 
   VOLUME THREE
 
   ON THE FUTURE OF OUR
   EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
   _FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE_
 
   ON THE FUTURE OF OUR
   EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS
 
 
 
   TRANSLATED, WITH INTRODUCTION, BY
   J.M. KENNEDY
 
 
 
 
   T.N. FOULIS
   13 & 15 FREDERICK STREET
   EDINBURGH: and LONDON
   1910
 
 
 
 
   ALL RIGHTS RESERVED
 
   _Printed by_ MORRISON & GIBB LIMITED, _Edinburgh_.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 (_To be read before the lectures, although it in no way relates to
 them._)
 
 
 The reader from whom I expect something must possess three qualities:
 he must be calm and must read without haste; he must not be ever
 interposing his own personality and his own special "culture"; and he
 must not expect as the ultimate results of his study of these pages
 that he will be presented with a set of new formulae. I do not propose
 to furnish formulae or new plans of study for _Gymnasia_ or other
 schools; and I am much more inclined to admire the extraordinary power
 of those who are able to cover the whole distance between the depths
 of empiricism and the heights of special culture-problems, and who
 again descend to the level of the driest rules and the most neatly
 expressed formulae. I shall be content if only I can ascend a tolerably
 lofty mountain, from the summit of which, after having recovered my
 breath, I may obtain a general survey of the ground; for I shall never
 be able, in this book, to satisfy the votaries of tabulated rules.
 Indeed, I see a time coming when serious men, working together in the
 service of a completely rejuvenated and purified culture, may again
 become the directors of a system of everyday instruction, calculated
 to promote that culture; and they will probably be compelled once more
 to draw up sets of rules: but how remote this time now seems! And what
 may not happen meanwhile! It is just possible that between now and
 then all _Gymnasia_--yea, and perhaps all universities, may be
 destroyed, or have become so utterly transformed that their very
 regulations may, in the eyes of future generations, seem to be but the
 relics of the cave-dwellers' age.
 
 This book is intended for calm readers,--for men who have not yet been
 drawn into the mad headlong rush of our hurry-skurrying age, and who
 do not experience any idolatrous delight in throwing themselves
 beneath its chariot-wheels. It is for men, therefore, who are not
 accustomed to estimate the value of everything according to the amount
 of time it either saves or wastes. In short, it is for the few. These,
 we believe, "still have time." Without any qualms of conscience they
 may improve the most fruitful and vigorous hours of their day in
 meditating on the future of our education; they may even believe when
 the evening has come that they have used their day in the most
 dignified and useful way, namely, in the _meditatio generis futuri_.
 No one among them has yet forgotten to think while reading a book; he
 still understands the secret of reading between the lines, and is
 indeed so generous in what he himself brings to his study, that he
 continues to reflect upon what he has read, perhaps long after he has
 laid the book aside. And he does this, not because he wishes to write
 a criticism about it or even another book; but simply because
 reflection is a pleasant pastime to him. Frivolous spendthrift! Thou
 art a reader after my own heart; for thou wilt be patient enough to
 accompany an author any distance, even though he himself cannot yet
 see the goal at which he is aiming,--even though he himself feels only
 that he must at all events honestly believe in a goal, in order that a
 future and possibly very remote generation may come face to face with
 that towards which we are now blindly and instinctively groping.
 Should any reader demur and suggest that all that is required is
 prompt and bold reform; should he imagine that a new "organisation"
 introduced by the State, were all that is necessary, then we fear he
 would have misunderstood not only the author but the very nature of
 the problem under consideration.
 
 The third and most important stipulation is, that he should in no case
 be constantly bringing himself and his own "culture" forward, after
 the style of most modern men, as the correct standard and measure of
 all things. We would have him so highly educated that he could even
 think meanly of his education or despise it altogether. Only thus
 would he be able to trust entirely to the author's guidance; for it is
 only by virtue of ignorance and his consciousness of ignorance, that
 the latter can dare to make himself heard. Finally, the author would
 wish his reader to be fully alive to the specific character of our
 present barbarism and of that which distinguishes us, as the
 barbarians of the nineteenth century, from other barbarians.
 
 Now, with this book in his hand, the writer seeks all those who may
 happen to be wandering, hither and thither, impelled by feelings
 similar to his own. Allow yourselves to be discovered--ye lonely ones
 in whose existence I believe! Ye unselfish ones, suffering in
 yourselves from the corruption of the German spirit! Ye contemplative
 ones who cannot, with hasty glances, turn your eyes swiftly from one
 surface to another! Ye lofty thinkers, of whom Aristotle said that ye
 wander through life vacillating and inactive so long as no great
 honour or glorious Cause calleth you to deeds! It is you I summon!
 Refrain this once from seeking refuge in your lairs of solitude and
 dark misgivings. Bethink you that this book was framed to be your
 herald. When ye shall go forth to battle in your full panoply, who
 among you will not rejoice in looking back upon the herald who rallied
 you?
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 The title I gave to these lectures ought, like all titles, to have
 been as definite, as plain, and as significant as possible; now,
 however, I observe that owing to a certain excess of precision, in its
 present form it is too short and consequently misleading. My first
 duty therefore will be to explain the title, together with the object
 of these lectures, to you, and to apologise for being obliged to do
 this. When I promised to speak to you concerning the future of our
 educational institutions, I was not thinking especially of the
 evolution of our particular institutions in Bale. However frequently
 my general observations may seem to bear particular application to our
 own conditions here, I personally have no desire to draw these
 inferences, and do not wish to be held responsible if they should be
 drawn, for the simple reason that I consider myself still far too much
 an inexperienced stranger among you, and much too superficially
 acquainted with your methods, to pretend to pass judgment upon any
 such special order of scholastic establishments, or to predict the
 probable course their development will follow. On the other hand, I
 know full well under what distinguished auspices I have to deliver
 these lectures--namely, in a city which is striving to educate and
 enlighten its inhabitants on a scale so magnificently out of
 proportion to its size, that it must put all larger cities to shame.
 This being so, I presume I am justified in assuming that in a quarter
 where so much is _done_ for the things of which I wish to speak,
 people must also _think_ a good deal about them. My desire--yea, my
 very first condition, therefore, would be to become united in spirit
 with those who have not only thought very deeply upon educational
 problems, but have also the will to promote what they think to be
 right by all the means in their power. And, in view of the
 difficulties of my task and the limited time at my disposal, to such
 listeners, alone, in my audience, shall I be able to make myself
 understood--and even then, it will be on condition that they shall
 guess what I can do no more than suggest, that they shall supply what
 I am compelled to omit; in brief, that they shall need but to be
 reminded and not to be taught. Thus, while I disclaim all desire of
 being taken for an uninvited adviser on questions relating to the
 schools and the University of Bale, I repudiate even more emphatically
 still the role of a prophet standing on the horizon of civilisation
 and pretending to predict the future of education and of scholastic
 organisation. I can no more project my vision through such vast
 periods of time than I can rely upon its accuracy when it is brought
 too close to an object under examination. With my title: _Our_
 Educational Institutions, I wish to refer neither to the
 establishments in Bale nor to the incalculably vast number of other
 scholastic institutions which exist throughout the nations of the
 world to-day; but I wish to refer to _German institutions_ of the kind
 which we rejoice in here. It is their future that will now engage our
 attention, _i.e._ the future of German elementary, secondary, and
 public schools (Gymnasien) and universities. While pursuing our
 discussion, however, we shall for once avoid all comparisons and
 valuations, and guard more especially against that flattering illusion
 that our conditions should be regarded as the standard for all others
 and as surpassing them. Let it suffice that they are our institutions,
 that they have not become a part of ourselves by mere accident, and
 were not laid upon us like a garment; but that they are living
 monuments of important steps in the progress of civilisation, in some
 respects even the furniture of a bygone age, and as such link us with
 the past of our people, and are such a sacred and venerable legacy
 that I can only undertake to speak of the future of our educational
 institutions in the sense of their being a most probable approximation
 to the ideal spirit which gave them birth. I am, moreover, convinced
 that the numerous alterations which have been introduced into these
 institutions within recent years, with the view of bringing them
 up-to-date, are for the most part but distortions and aberrations of
 the originally sublime tendencies given to them at their foundation.
 And what we dare to hope from the future, in this behalf, partakes so
 much of the nature of a rejuvenation, a reviviscence, and a refining
 of the spirit of Germany that, as a result of this very process, our
 educational institutions may also be indirectly remoulded and born
 again, so as to appear at once old and new, whereas now they only
 profess to be "modern" or "up-to-date."
 
 Now it is only in the spirit of the hope above mentioned that I wish
 to speak of the future of our educational institutions: and this is
 the second point in regard to which I must tender an apology from the
 outset. The "prophet" pose is such a presumptuous one that it seems
 almost ridiculous to deny that I have the intention of adopting it.
 No one should attempt to describe the future of our education, and
 the means and methods of instruction relating thereto, in a prophetic
 spirit, unless he can prove that the picture he draws already exists
 in germ to-day, and that all that is required is the extension and
 development of this embryo if the necessary modifications are to be
 produced in schools and other educational institutions. All I ask,
 is, like a Roman haruspex, to be allowed to steal glimpses of the
 future out of the very entrails of existing conditions, which, in
 this case, means no more than to hand the laurels of victory to any
 one of the many forces tending to make itself felt in our present
 educational system, despite the fact that the force in question may
 be neither a favourite, an esteemed, nor a very extensive one. I
 confidently assert that it will be victorious, however, because it
 has the strongest and mightiest of all allies in nature herself; and
 in this respect it were well did we not forget that scores of the
 very first principles of our modern educational methods are
 thoroughly artificial, and that the most fatal weaknesses of the
 present day are to be ascribed to this artificiality. He who feels in
 complete harmony with the present state of affairs and who acquiesces
 in it _as something_ "_selbstverstaendliches_,"[1] excites our envy
 neither in regard to his faith nor in regard to that egregious word
 "_selbstverstaendlich_," so frequently heard in fashionable circles.
 
 He, however, who holds the opposite view and is therefore in despair,
 does not need to fight any longer: all he requires is to give himself
 up to solitude in order soon to be alone. Albeit, between those who
 take everything for granted and these anchorites, there stand the
 _fighters_--that is to say, those who still have hope, and as the
 noblest and sublimest example of this class, we recognise Schiller as
 he is described by Goethe in his "Epilogue to the Bell."
 
     "Brighter now glow'd his cheek, and still more bright
     With that unchanging, ever youthful glow:--
     That courage which o'ercomes, in hard-fought fight,
     Sooner or later ev'ry earthly foe,--
     That faith which soaring to the realms of light,
     Now boldly presseth on, now bendeth low,
     So that the good may work, wax, thrive amain,
     So that the day the noble may attain."[2]
 
 I should like you to regard all I have just said as a kind of preface,
 the object of which is to illustrate the title of my lectures and to
 guard me against any possible misunderstanding and unjustified
 criticisms. And now, in order to give you a rough outline of the range
 of ideas from which I shall attempt to form a judgment concerning our
 educational institutions, before proceeding to disclose my views and
 turning from the title to the main theme, I shall lay a scheme before
 you which, like a coat of arms, will serve to warn all strangers who
 come to my door, as to the nature of the house they are about to
 enter, in case they may feel inclined, after having examined the
 device, to turn their backs on the premises that bear it. My scheme is
 as follows:--
 
 Two seemingly antagonistic forces, equally deleterious in their
 actions and ultimately combining to produce their results, are at
 present ruling over our educational institutions, although these were
 based originally upon very different principles. These forces are: a
 striving to achieve the greatest possible _extension of education_ on
 the one hand, and a tendency _to minimise and to weaken it_ on the
 other. The first-named would fain spread learning among the greatest
 possible number of people, the second would compel education to
 renounce its highest and most independent claims in order to
 subordinate itself to the service of the State. In the face of these
 two antagonistic tendencies, we could but give ourselves up to
 despair, did we not see the possibility of promoting the cause of two
 other contending factors which are fortunately as completely German as
 they are rich in promises for the future; I refer to the present
 movement towards _limiting and concentrating_ education as the
 antithesis of the first of the forces above mentioned, and that other
 movement towards the _strengthening and the independence_ of education
 as the antithesis of the second force. If we should seek a warrant for
 our belief in the ultimate victory of the two last-named movements, we
 could find it in the fact that both of the forces which we hold to be
 deleterious are so opposed to the eternal purpose of nature as the
 concentration of education for the few is in harmony with it, and is
 true, whereas the first two forces could succeed only in founding a
 culture false to the root.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] Selbstverstaendlich = "granted or self-understood."
 
 [2] _The Poems of Goethe._ Edgar Alfred Bowring's Translation. (Ed.
 1853.)
 
 
 
 
 THE FUTURE OF OUR EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS.
 
 
 
 
 FIRST LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 16th of January 1872._)
 
 
 Ladies and Gentlemen,--The subject I now propose to consider with you
 is such a serious and important one, and is in a sense so disquieting,
 that, like you, I would gladly turn to any one who could proffer some
 information concerning it,--were he ever so young, were his ideas ever
 so improbable--provided that he were able, by the exercise of his own
 faculties, to furnish some satisfactory and sufficient explanation. It
 is just possible that he may have had the opportunity of _hearing_
 sound views expressed in reference to the vexed question of the future
 of our educational institutions, and that he may wish to repeat them
 to you; he may even have had distinguished teachers, fully qualified
 to foretell what is to come, and, like the _haruspices_ of Rome, able
 to do so after an inspection of the entrails of the Present.
 
 Indeed, you yourselves may expect something of this kind from me. I
 happened once, in strange but perfectly harmless circumstances, to
 overhear a conversation on this subject between two remarkable men,
 and the more striking points of the discussion, together with their
 manner of handling the theme, are so indelibly imprinted on my memory
 that, whenever I reflect on these matters, I invariably find myself
 falling into their grooves of thought. I cannot, however, profess to
 have the same courageous confidence which they displayed, both in
 their daring utterance of forbidden truths, and in the still more
 daring conception of the hopes with which they astonished me. It
 therefore seemed to me to be in the highest degree important that a
 record of this conversation should be made, so that others might be
 incited to form a judgment concerning the striking views and
 conclusions it contains: and, to this end, I had special grounds for
 believing that I should do well to avail myself of the opportunity
 afforded by this course of lectures.
 
 I am well aware of the nature of the community to whose serious
 consideration I now wish to commend that conversation--I know it to be
 a community which is striving to educate and enlighten its members on
 a scale so magnificently out of proportion to its size that it must
 put all larger cities to shame. This being so, I presume I may take it
 for granted that in a quarter where so much is _done_ for the things
 of which I wish to speak, people must also _think_ a good deal about
 them. In my account of the conversation already mentioned, I shall be
 able to make myself completely understood only to those among my
 audience who will be able to guess what I can do no more than suggest,
 who will supply what I am compelled to omit, and who, above all, need
 but to be reminded and not taught.
 
 Listen, therefore, ladies and gentlemen, while I recount my harmless
 experience and the less harmless conversation between the two
 gentlemen whom, so far, I have not named.
 
 Let us now imagine ourselves in the position of a young student--that
 is to say, in a position which, in our present age of bewildering
 movement and feverish excitability, has become an almost impossible
 one. It is necessary to have lived through it in order to believe that
 such careless self-lulling and comfortable indifference to the moment,
 or to time in general, are possible. In this condition I, and a friend
 about my own age, spent a year at the University of Bonn on the
 Rhine,--it was a year which, in its complete lack of plans and
 projects for the future, seems almost like a dream to me now--a dream
 framed, as it were, by two periods of growth. We two remained quiet
 and peaceful, although we were surrounded by fellows who in the main
 were very differently disposed, and from time to time we experienced
 considerable difficulty in meeting and resisting the somewhat too
 pressing advances of the young men of our own age. Now, however, that
 I can look upon the stand we had to take against these opposing
 forces, I cannot help associating them in my mind with those checks we
 are wont to receive in our dreams, as, for instance, when we imagine
 we are able to fly and yet feel ourselves held back by some
 incomprehensible power.
 
 I and my friend had many reminiscences in common, and these dated from
 the period of our boyhood upwards. One of these I must relate to you,
 since it forms a sort of prelude to the harmless experience already
 mentioned. On the occasion of a certain journey up the Rhine, which we
 had made together one summer, it happened that he and I independently
 conceived the very same plan at the same hour and on the same spot,
 and we were so struck by this unwonted coincidence that we determined
 to carry the plan out forthwith. We resolved to found a kind of small
 club which would consist of ourselves and a few friends, and the
 object of which would be to provide us with a stable and binding
 organisation directing and adding interest to our creative impulses in
 art and literature; or, to put it more plainly: each of us would be
 pledged to present an original piece of work to the club once a
 month,--either a poem, a treatise, an architectural design, or a
 musical composition, upon which each of the others, in a friendly
 spirit, would have to pass free and unrestrained criticism.
 
 We thus hoped, by means of mutual correction, to be able both to
 stimulate and to chasten our creative impulses and, as a matter of
 fact, the success of the scheme was such that we have both always felt
 a sort of respectful attachment for the hour and the place at which it
 first took shape in our minds.
 
 This attachment was very soon transformed into a rite; for we all
 agreed to go, whenever it was possible to do so, once a year to that
 lonely spot near Rolandseck, where on that summer's day, while sitting
 together, lost in meditation, we were suddenly inspired by the same
 thought. Frankly speaking, the rules which were drawn up on the
 formation of the club were never very strictly observed; but owing to
 the very fact that we had many sins of omission on our conscience
 during our student-year in Bonn, when we were once more on the banks
 of the Rhine, we firmly resolved not only to observe our rule, but
 also to gratify our feelings and our sense of gratitude by reverently
 visiting that spot near Rolandseck on the day appointed.
 
 It was, however, with some difficulty that we were able to carry our
 plans into execution; for, on the very day we had selected for our
 excursion, the large and lively students' association, which always
 hindered us in our flights, did their utmost to put obstacles in our
 way and to hold us back. Our association had organised a general
 holiday excursion to Rolandseck on the very day my friend and I had
 fixed upon, the object of the outing being to assemble all its members
 for the last time at the close of the half-year and to send them home
 with pleasant recollections of their last hours together.
 
 The day was a glorious one; the weather was of the kind which, in our
 climate at least, only falls to our lot in late summer: heaven and
 earth merged harmoniously with one another, and, glowing wondrously in
 the sunshine, autumn freshness blended with the blue expanse above.
 Arrayed in the bright fantastic garb in which, amid the gloomy
 fashions now reigning, students alone may indulge, we boarded a
 steamer which was gaily decorated in our honour, and hoisted our flag
 on its mast. From both banks of the river there came at intervals the
 sound of signal-guns, fired according to our orders, with the view of
 acquainting both our host in Rolandseck and the inhabitants in the
 neighbourhood with our approach. I shall not speak of the noisy
 journey from the landing-stage, through the excited and expectant
 little place, nor shall I refer to the esoteric jokes exchanged
 between ourselves; I also make no mention of a feast which became both
 wild and noisy, or of an extraordinary musical production in the
 execution of which, whether as soloists or as chorus, we all
 ultimately had to share, and which I, as musical adviser of our club,
 had not only had to rehearse, but was then forced to conduct. Towards
 the end of this piece, which grew ever wilder and which was sung to
 ever quicker time, I made a sign to my friend, and just as the last
 chord rang like a yell through the building, he and I vanished,
 leaving behind us a raging pandemonium.
 
 In a moment we were in the refreshing and breathless stillness of
 nature. The shadows were already lengthening, the sun still shone
 steadily, though it had sunk a good deal in the heavens, and from the
 green and glittering waves of the Rhine a cool breeze was wafted over
 our hot faces. Our solemn rite bound us only in so far as the latest
 hours of the day were concerned, and we therefore determined to employ
 the last moments of clear daylight by giving ourselves up to one of
 our many hobbies.
 
 At that time we were passionately fond of pistol-shooting, and both of
 us in later years found the skill we had acquired as amateurs of great
 use in our military career. Our club servant happened to know the
 somewhat distant and elevated spot which we used as a range, and had
 carried our pistols there in advance. The spot lay near the upper
 border of the wood which covered the lesser heights behind Rolandseck:
 it was a small uneven plateau, close to the place we had consecrated
 in memory of its associations. On a wooded slope alongside of our
 shooting-range there was a small piece of ground which had been
 cleared of wood, and which made an ideal halting-place; from it one
 could get a view of the Rhine over the tops of the trees and the
 brushwood, so that the beautiful, undulating lines of the Seven
 Mountains and above all of the Drachenfels bounded the horizon against
 the group of trees, while in the centre of the bow formed by the
 glistening Rhine itself the island of Nonnenwoerth stood out as if
 suspended in the river's arms. This was the place which had become
 sacred to us through the dreams and plans we had had in common, and to
 which we intended to withdraw, later in the evening,--nay, to which we
 should be obliged to withdraw, if we wished to close the day in
 accordance with the law we had imposed on ourselves.
 
 At one end of the little uneven plateau, and not very far away, there
 stood the mighty trunk of an oak-tree, prominently visible against a
 background quite bare of trees and consisting merely of low undulating
 hills in the distance. Working together, we had once carved a
 pentagram in the side of this tree-trunk. Years of exposure to rain
 and storm had slightly deepened the channels we had cut, and the
 figure seemed a welcome target for our pistol-practice. It was already
 late in the afternoon when we reached our improvised range, and our
 oak-stump cast a long and attenuated shadow across the barren heath.
 All was still: thanks to the lofty trees at our feet, we were unable
 to catch a glimpse of the valley of the Rhine below. The peacefulness
 of the spot seemed only to intensify the loudness of our
 pistol-shots--and I had scarcely fired my second barrel at the
 pentagram when I felt some one lay hold of my arm and noticed that my
 friend had also some one beside him who had interrupted his loading.
 
 Turning sharply on my heels I found myself face to face with an
 astonished old gentleman, and felt what must have been a very powerful
 dog make a lunge at my back. My friend had been approached by a
 somewhat younger man than I had; but before we could give expression
 to our surprise the older of the two interlopers burst forth in the
 following threatening and heated strain: "No! no!" he called to us,
 "no duels must be fought here, but least of all must you young
 students fight one. Away with these pistols and compose yourselves. Be
 reconciled, shake hands! What?--and are you the salt of the earth,
 the intelligence of the future, the seed of our hopes--and are you
 not even able to emancipate yourselves from the insane code of honour
 and its violent regulations? I will not cast any aspersions on your
 hearts, but your heads certainly do you no credit. You, whose youth is
 watched over by the wisdom of Greece and Rome, and whose youthful
 spirits, at the cost of enormous pains, have been flooded with the
 light of the sages and heroes of antiquity,--can you not refrain from
 making the code of knightly honour--that is to say, the code of folly
 and brutality--the guiding principle of your conduct?--Examine it
 rationally once and for all, and reduce it to plain terms; lay its
 pitiable narrowness bare, and let it be the touchstone, not of your
 hearts but of your minds. If you do not regret it then, it will merely
 show that your head is not fitted for work in a sphere where great
 gifts of discrimination are needful in order to burst the bonds of
 prejudice, and where a well-balanced understanding is necessary for
 the purpose of distinguishing right from wrong, even when the
 difference between them lies deeply hidden and is not, as in this
 case, so ridiculously obvious. In that case, therefore, my lads, try
 to go through life in some other honourable manner; join the army or
 learn a handicraft that pays its way."
 
 To this rough, though admittedly just, flood of eloquence, we replied
 with some irritation, interrupting each other continually in so doing:
 "In the first place, you are mistaken concerning the main point; for
 we are not here to fight a duel at all; but rather to practise
 pistol-shooting. Secondly, you do not appear to know how a real duel
 is conducted;--do you suppose that we should have faced each other in
 this lonely spot, like two highwaymen, without seconds or doctors,
 etc. etc.? Thirdly, with regard to the question of duelling, we each
 have our own opinions, and do not require to be waylaid and surprised
 by the sort of instruction you may feel disposed to give us."
 
 This reply, which was certainly not polite, made a bad impression upon
 the old man. At first, when he heard that we were not about to fight a
 duel, he surveyed us more kindly: but when we reached the last passage
 of our speech, he seemed so vexed that he growled. When, however, we
 began to speak of our point of view, he quickly caught hold of his
 companion, turned sharply round, and cried to us in bitter tones:
 "People should not have points of view, but thoughts!" And then his
 companion added: "Be respectful when a man such as this even makes
 mistakes!"
 
 Meanwhile, my friend, who had reloaded, fired a shot at the pentagram,
 after having cried: "Look out!" This sudden report behind his back
 made the old man savage; once more he turned round and looked sourly
 at my friend, after which he said to his companion in a feeble voice:
 "What shall we do? These young men will be the death of me with their
 firing."--"You should know," said the younger man, turning to us,
 "that your noisy pastimes amount, as it happens on this occasion, to
 an attempt upon the life of philosophy. You observe this venerable
 man,--he is in a position to beg you to desist from firing here. And
 when such a man begs----" "Well, his request is generally granted,"
 the old man interjected, surveying us sternly.
 
 As a matter of fact, we did not know what to make of the whole matter;
 we could not understand what our noisy pastimes could have in common
 with philosophy; nor could we see why, out of regard for polite
 scruples, we should abandon our shooting-range, and at this moment we
 may have appeared somewhat undecided and perturbed. The companion
 noticing our momentary discomfiture, proceeded to explain the matter
 to us.
 
 "We are compelled," he said, "to linger in this immediate
 neighbourhood for an hour or so; we have a rendezvous here. An eminent
 friend of this eminent man is to meet us here this evening; and we had
 actually selected this peaceful spot, with its few benches in the
 midst of the wood, for the meeting. It would really be most unpleasant
 if, owing to your continual pistol-practice, we were to be subjected
 to an unending series of shocks; surely your own feelings will tell
 you that it is impossible for you to continue your firing when you
 hear that he who has selected this quiet and isolated place for a
 meeting with a friend is one of our most eminent philosophers."
 
 This explanation only succeeded in perturbing us the more; for we saw
 a danger threatening us which was even greater than the loss of our
 shooting-range, and we asked eagerly, "Where is this quiet spot?
 Surely not to the left here, in the wood?"
 
 "That is the very place."
 
 "But this evening that place belongs to us," my friend interposed. "We
 must have it," we cried together.
 
 Our long-projected celebration seemed at that moment more important
 than all the philosophies of the world, and we gave such vehement and
 animated utterance to our sentiments that in view of the
 incomprehensible nature of our claims we must have cut a somewhat
 ridiculous figure. At any rate, our philosophical interlopers regarded
 us with expressions of amused inquiry, as if they expected us to
 proffer some sort of apology. But we were silent, for we wished above
 all to keep our secret.
 
 Thus we stood facing one another in silence, while the sunset dyed the
 tree-tops a ruddy gold. The philosopher contemplated the sun, his
 companion contemplated him, and we turned our eyes towards our nook in
 the woods which to-day we seemed in such great danger of losing. A
 feeling of sullen anger took possession of us. What is philosophy, we
 asked ourselves, if it prevents a man from being by himself or from
 enjoying the select company of a friend,--in sooth, if it prevents him
 from becoming a philosopher? For we regarded the celebration of our
 rite as a thoroughly philosophical performance. In celebrating it we
 wished to form plans and resolutions for the future, by means of quiet
 reflections we hoped to light upon an idea which would once again help
 us to form and gratify our spirit in the future, just as that former
 idea had done during our boyhood. The solemn act derived its very
 significance from this resolution, that nothing definite was to be
 done, we were only to be alone, and to sit still and meditate, as we
 had done five years before when we had each been inspired with the
 same thought. It was to be a silent solemnisation, all reminiscence
 and all future; the present was to be as a hyphen between the two. And
 fate, now unfriendly, had just stepped into our magic circle--and we
 knew not how to dismiss her;--the very unusual character of the
 circumstances filled us with mysterious excitement.
 
 Whilst we stood thus in silence for some time, divided into two
 hostile groups, the clouds above waxed ever redder and the evening
 seemed to grow more peaceful and mild; we could almost fancy we heard
 the regular breathing of nature as she put the final touches to her
 work of art--the glorious day we had just enjoyed; when, suddenly, the
 calm evening air was rent by a confused and boisterous cry of joy
 which seemed to come from the Rhine. A number of voices could be heard
 in the distance--they were those of our fellow-students who by that
 time must have taken to the Rhine in small boats. It occurred to us
 that we should be missed and that we should also miss something:
 almost simultaneously my friend and I raised our pistols: our shots
 were echoed back to us, and with their echo there came from the valley
 the sound of a well-known cry intended as a signal of identification.
 For our passion for shooting had brought us both repute and ill-repute
 in our club. At the same time we were conscious that our behaviour
 towards the silent philosophical couple had been exceptionally
 ungentlemanly; they had been quietly contemplating us for some time,
 and when we fired the shock made them draw close up to each other. We
 hurried up to them, and each in our turn cried out: "Forgive us. That
 was our last shot, and it was intended for our friends on the Rhine.
 They have understood us, do you hear? If you insist upon having that
 place among the trees, grant us at least the permission to recline
 there also. You will find a number of benches on the spot: we shall
 not disturb you; we shall sit quite still and shall not utter a word:
 but it is now past seven o'clock and we _must_ go there at once.
 
 "That sounds more mysterious than it is," I added after a pause; "we
 have made a solemn vow to spend this coming hour on that ground, and
 there were reasons for the vow. The spot is sacred to us, owing to
 some pleasant associations, it must also inaugurate a good future for
 us. We shall therefore endeavour to leave you with no disagreeable
 recollections of our meeting--even though we have done much to perturb
 and frighten you."
 
 The philosopher was silent; his companion, however, said: "Our
 promises and plans unfortunately compel us not only to remain, but
 also to spend the same hour on the spot you have selected. It is left
 for us to decide whether fate or perhaps a spirit has been responsible
 for this extraordinary coincidence."
 
 "Besides, my friend," said the philosopher, "I am not half so
 displeased with these warlike youngsters as I was. Did you observe
 how quiet they were a moment ago, when we were contemplating the sun?
 They neither spoke nor smoked, they stood stone still, I even believe
 they meditated."
 
 Turning suddenly in our direction, he said: "_Were_ you meditating?
 Just tell me about it as we proceed in the direction of our common
 trysting-place." We took a few steps together and went down the slope
 into the warm balmy air of the woods where it was already much darker.
 On the way my friend openly revealed his thoughts to the philosopher,
 he confessed how much he had feared that perhaps to-day for the first
 time a philosopher was about to stand in the way of his
 philosophising.
 
 The sage laughed. "What? You were afraid a philosopher would prevent
 your philosophising? This might easily happen: and you have not yet
 experienced such a thing? Has your university life been free from
 experience? You surely attend lectures on philosophy?"
 
 This question discomfited us; for, as a matter of fact, there had been
 no element of philosophy in our education up to that time. In those
 days, moreover, we fondly imagined that everybody who held the post
 and possessed the dignity of a philosopher must perforce be one: we
 were inexperienced and badly informed. We frankly admitted that we had
 not yet belonged to any philosophical college, but that we would
 certainly make up for lost time.
 
 "Then what," he asked, "did you mean when you spoke of
 philosophising?" Said I, "We are at a loss for a definition. But to
 all intents and purposes we meant this, that we wished to make earnest
 endeavours to consider the best possible means of becoming men of
 culture." "That is a good deal and at the same time very little,"
 growled the philosopher; "just you think the matter over. Here are our
 benches, let us discuss the question exhaustively: I shall not disturb
 your meditations with regard to how you are to become men of culture.
 I wish you success and--points of view, as in your duelling questions;
 brand-new, original, and enlightened points of view. The philosopher
 does not wish to prevent your philosophising: but refrain at least
 from disconcerting him with your pistol-shots. Try to imitate the
 Pythagoreans to-day: they, as servants of a true philosophy, had to
 remain silent for five years--possibly you may also be able to remain
 silent for five times fifteen minutes, as servants of your own future
 culture, about which you seem so concerned."
 
 We had reached our destination: the solemnisation of our rite began.
 As on the previous occasion, five years ago, the Rhine was once more
 flowing beneath a light mist, the sky seemed bright and the woods
 exhaled the same fragrance. We took our places on the farthest corner
 of the most distant bench; sitting there we were almost concealed, and
 neither the philosopher nor his companion could see our faces. We were
 alone: when the sound of the philosopher's voice reached us, it had
 become so blended with the rustling leaves and with the buzzing
 murmur of the myriads of living things inhabiting the wooded height,
 that it almost seemed like the music of nature; as a sound it
 resembled nothing more than a distant monotonous plaint. We were
 indeed undisturbed.
 
 Some time elapsed in this way, and while the glow of sunset grew
 steadily paler the recollection of our youthful undertaking in the
 cause of culture waxed ever more vivid. It seemed to us as if we owed
 the greatest debt of gratitude to that little society we had founded;
 for it had done more than merely supplement our public school
 training; it had actually been the only fruitful society we had had,
 and within its frame we even placed our public school life, as a
 purely isolated factor helping us in our general efforts to attain to
 culture.
 
 We knew this, that, thanks to our little society, no thought of
 embracing any particular career had ever entered our minds in those
 days. The all too frequent exploitation of youth by the State, for its
 own purposes--that is to say, so that it may rear useful officials as
 quickly as possible and guarantee their unconditional obedience to it
 by means of excessively severe examinations--had remained quite
 foreign to our education. And to show how little we had been actuated
 by thoughts of utility or by the prospect of speedy advancement and
 rapid success, on that day we were struck by the comforting
 consideration that, even then, we had not yet decided what we should
 be--we had not even troubled ourselves at all on this head. Our little
 society had sown the seeds of this happy indifference in our souls and
 for it alone we were prepared to celebrate the anniversary of its
 foundation with hearty gratitude. I have already pointed out, I think,
 that in the eyes of the present age, which is so intolerant of
 anything that is not useful, such purposeless enjoyment of the moment,
 such a lulling of one's self in the cradle of the present, must seem
 almost incredible and at all events blameworthy. How useless we were!
 And how proud we were of being useless! We used even to quarrel with
 each other as to which of us should have the glory of being the more
 useless. We wished to attach no importance to anything, to have strong
 views about nothing, to aim at nothing; we wanted to take no thought
 for the morrow, and desired no more than to recline comfortably like
 good-for-nothings on the threshold of the present; and we did--bless
 us!
 
 --That, ladies and gentlemen, was our standpoint then!--
 
 Absorbed in these reflections, I was just about to give an answer to
 the question of the future of _our_ Educational Institutions in the
 same self-sufficient way, when it gradually dawned upon me that the
 "natural music," coming from the philosopher's bench had lost its
 original character and travelled to us in much more piercing and
 distinct tones than before. Suddenly I became aware that I was
 listening, that I was eavesdropping, and was passionately interested,
 with both ears keenly alive to every sound. I nudged my friend who was
 evidently somewhat tired, and I whispered: "Don't fall asleep! There
 is something for us to learn over there. It applies to us, even
 though it be not meant for us."
 
 For instance, I heard the younger of the two men defending himself
 with great animation while the philosopher rebuked him with ever
 increasing vehemence. "You are unchanged," he cried to him,
 "unfortunately unchanged. It is quite incomprehensible to me how you
 can still be the same as you were seven years ago, when I saw you for
 the last time and left you with so much misgiving. I fear I must once
 again divest you, however reluctantly, of the skin of modern culture
 which you have donned meanwhile;--and what do I find beneath it? The
 same immutable 'intelligible' character forsooth, according to Kant;
 but unfortunately the same unchanged 'intellectual' character,
 too--which may also be a necessity, though not a comforting one. I ask
 myself to what purpose have I lived as a philosopher, if, possessed as
 you are of no mean intelligence and a genuine thirst for knowledge,
 all the years you have spent in my company have left no deeper
 impression upon you. At present you are behaving as if you had not
 even heard the cardinal principle of all culture, which I went to such
 pains to inculcate upon you during our former intimacy. Tell me,--what
 was that principle?"
 
 "I remember," replied the scolded pupil, "you used to say no one would
 strive to attain to culture if he knew how incredibly small the number
 of really cultured people actually is, and can ever be. And even this
 number of really cultured people would not be possible if a prodigious
 multitude, from reasons opposed to their nature and only led on by an
 alluring delusion, did not devote themselves to education. It were
 therefore a mistake publicly to reveal the ridiculous disproportion
 between the number of really cultured people and the enormous
 magnitude of the educational apparatus. Here lies the whole secret of
 culture--namely, that an innumerable host of men struggle to achieve
 it and work hard to that end, ostensibly in their own interests,
 whereas at bottom it is only in order that it may be possible for the
 few to attain to it."
 
 "That is the principle," said the philosopher,--"and yet you could so
 far forget yourself as to believe that you are one of the few? This
 thought has occurred to you--I can see. That, however, is the result
 of the worthless character of modern education. The rights of genius
 are being democratised in order that people may be relieved of the
 labour of acquiring culture, and their need of it. Every one wants if
 possible to recline in the shade of the tree planted by genius, and to
 escape the dreadful necessity of working for him, so that his
 procreation may be made possible. What? Are you too proud to be a
 teacher? Do you despise the thronging multitude of learners? Do you
 speak contemptuously of the teacher's calling? And, aping my mode of
 life, would you fain live in solitary seclusion, hostilely isolated
 from that multitude? Do you suppose that you can reach at one bound
 what I ultimately had to win for myself only after long and determined
 struggles, in order even to be able to live like a philosopher? And do
 you not fear that solitude will wreak its vengeance upon you? Just
 try living the life of a hermit of culture. One must be blessed with
 overflowing wealth in order to live for the good of all on one's own
 resources! Extraordinary youngsters! They felt it incumbent upon them
 to imitate what is precisely most difficult and most high,--what is
 possible only to the master, when they, above all, should know how
 difficult and dangerous this is, and how many excellent gifts may be
 ruined by attempting it!"
 
 "I will conceal nothing from you, sir," the companion replied. "I have
 heard too much from your lips at odd times and have been too long in
 your company to be able to surrender myself entirely to our present
 system of education and instruction. I am too painfully conscious of
 the disastrous errors and abuses to which you used to call my
 attention--though I very well know that I am not strong enough to hope
 for any success were I to struggle ever so valiantly against them. I
 was overcome by a feeling of general discouragement; my recourse to
 solitude was the result neither of pride nor arrogance. I would fain
 describe to you what I take to be the nature of the educational
 questions now attracting such enormous and pressing attention. It
 seemed to me that I must recognise two main directions in the forces
 at work--two seemingly antagonistic tendencies, equally deleterious in
 their action, and ultimately combining to produce their results: a
 striving to achieve the greatest possible _expansion_ of education on
 the one hand, and a tendency to _minimise and weaken_ it on the
 other. The first-named would, for various reasons, spread learning
 among the greatest number of people; the second would compel education
 to renounce its highest, noblest and sublimest claims in order to
 subordinate itself to some other department of life--such as the
 service of the State.
 
 "I believe I have already hinted at the quarter in which the cry for
 the greatest possible expansion of education is most loudly raised.
 This expansion belongs to the most beloved of the dogmas of modern
 political economy. As much knowledge and education as possible;
 therefore the greatest possible supply and demand--hence as much
 happiness as possible:--that is the formula. In this case utility is
 made the object and goal of education,--utility in the sense of
 gain--the greatest possible pecuniary gain. In the quarter now under
 consideration culture would be defined as that point of vantage which
 enables one to 'keep in the van of one's age,' from which one can see
 all the easiest and best roads to wealth, and with which one controls
 all the means of communication between men and nations. The purpose of
 education, according to this scheme, would be to rear the most
 'current' men possible,--'current' being used here in the sense in
 which it is applied to the coins of the realm. The greater the number
 of such men, the happier a nation will be; and this precisely is the
 purpose of our modern educational institutions: to help every one, as
 far as his nature will allow, to become 'current'; to develop him so
 that his particular degree of knowledge and science may yield him the
 greatest possible amount of happiness and pecuniary gain. Every one
 must be able to form some sort of estimate of himself; he must know
 how much he may reasonably expect from life. The 'bond between
 intelligence and property' which this point of view postulates has
 almost the force of a moral principle. In this quarter all culture is
 loathed which isolates, which sets goals beyond gold and gain, and
 which requires time: it is customary to dispose of such eccentric
 tendencies in education as systems of 'Higher Egotism,' or of 'Immoral
 Culture--Epicureanism.' According to the morality reigning here, the
 demands are quite different; what is required above all is 'rapid
 education,' so that a money-earning creature may be produced with all
 speed; there is even a desire to make this education so thorough that
 a creature may be reared that will be able to earn a _great deal_ of
 money. Men are allowed only the precise amount of culture which is
 compatible with the interests of gain; but that amount, at least, is
 expected from them. In short: mankind has a necessary right to
 happiness on earth--that is why culture is necessary--but on that
 account alone!"
 
 "I must just say something here," said the philosopher. "In the case
 of the view you have described so clearly, there arises the great and
 awful danger that at some time or other the great masses may overleap
 the middle classes and spring headlong into this earthly bliss. That
 is what is now called 'the social question.' It might seem to these
 masses that education for the greatest number of men was only a means
 to the earthly bliss of the few: the 'greatest possible expansion of
 education' so enfeebles education that it can no longer confer
 privileges or inspire respect. The most general form of culture is
 simply barbarism. But I do not wish to interrupt your discussion."
 
 The companion continued: "There are yet other reasons, besides this
 beloved economical dogma, for the expansion of education that is being
 striven after so valiantly everywhere. In some countries the fear of
 religious oppression is so general, and the dread of its results so
 marked, that people in all classes of society long for culture and
 eagerly absorb those elements of it which are supposed to scatter the
 religious instincts. Elsewhere the State, in its turn, strives here
 and there for its own preservation, after the greatest possible
 expansion of education, because it always feels strong enough to bring
 the most determined emancipation, resulting from culture, under its
 yoke, and readily approves of everything which tends to extend
 culture, provided that it be of service to its officials or soldiers,
 but in the main to itself, in its competition with other nations. In
 this case, the foundations of a State must be sufficiently broad and
 firm to constitute a fitting counterpart to the complicated arches of
 culture which it supports, just as in the first case the traces of
 some former religious tyranny must still be felt for a people to be
 driven to such desperate remedies. Thus, wherever I hear the masses
 raise the cry for an expansion of education, I am wont to ask myself
 whether it is stimulated by a greedy lust of gain and property, by
 the memory of a former religious persecution, or by the prudent
 egotism of the State itself.
 
 "On the other hand, it seemed to me that there was yet another
 tendency, not so clamorous, perhaps, but quite as forcible, which,
 hailing from various quarters, was animated by a different
 desire,--the desire to minimise and weaken education.
 
 "In all cultivated circles people are in the habit of whispering to
 one another words something after this style: that it is a general
 fact that, owing to the present frantic exploitation of the scholar in
 the service of his science, his _education_ becomes every day more
 accidental and more uncertain. For the study of science has been
 extended to such interminable lengths that he who, though not
 exceptionally gifted, yet possesses fair abilities, will need to
 devote himself exclusively to one branch and ignore all others if he
 ever wish to achieve anything in his work. Should he then elevate
 himself above the herd by means of his speciality, he still remains
 one of them in regard to all else,--that is to say, in regard to all
 the most important things in life. Thus, a specialist in science gets
 to resemble nothing so much as a factory workman who spends his whole
 life in turning one particular screw or handle on a certain instrument
 or machine, at which occupation he acquires the most consummate skill.
 In Germany, where we know how to drape such painful facts with the
 glorious garments of fancy, this narrow specialisation on the part of
 our learned men is even admired, and their ever greater deviation
 from the path of true culture is regarded as a moral phenomenon.
 'Fidelity in small things,' 'dogged faithfulness,' become expressions
 of highest eulogy, and the lack of culture outside the speciality is
 flaunted abroad as a sign of noble sufficiency.
 
 "For centuries it has been an understood thing that one alluded to
 scholars alone when one spoke of cultured men; but experience tells us
 that it would be difficult to find any necessary relation between the
 two classes to-day. For at present the exploitation of a man for the
 purpose of science is accepted everywhere without the slightest
 scruple. Who still ventures to ask, What may be the value of a science
 which consumes its minions in this vampire fashion? The division of
 labour in science is practically struggling towards the same goal
 which religions in certain parts of the world are consciously striving
 after,--that is to say, towards the decrease and even the destruction
 of learning. That, however, which, in the case of certain religions,
 is a perfectly justifiable aim, both in regard to their origin and
 their history, can only amount to self-immolation when transferred to
 the realm of science. In all matters of a general and serious nature,
 and above all, in regard to the highest philosophical problems, we
 have now already reached a point at which the scientific man, as such,
 is no longer allowed to speak. On the other hand, that adhesive and
 tenacious stratum which has now filled up the interstices between the
 sciences--Journalism--believes it has a mission to fulfil here, and
 this it does, according to its own particular lights--that is to say,
 as its name implies, after the fashion of a day-labourer.
 
 "It is precisely in journalism that the two tendencies combine and
 become one. The expansion and the diminution of education here join
 hands. The newspaper actually steps into the place of culture, and he
 who, even as a scholar, wishes to voice any claim for education, must
 avail himself of this viscous stratum of communication which cements
 the seams between all forms of life, all classes, all arts, and all
 sciences, and which is as firm and reliable as news paper is, as a
 rule. In the newspaper the peculiar educational aims of the present
 culminate, just as the journalist, the servant of the moment, has
 stepped into the place of the genius, of the leader for all time, of
 the deliverer from the tyranny of the moment. Now, tell me,
 distinguished master, what hopes could I still have in a struggle
 against the general topsy-turvification of all genuine aims for
 education; with what courage can I, a single teacher, step forward,
 when I know that the moment any seeds of real culture are sown, they
 will be mercilessly crushed by the roller of this pseudo-culture?
 Imagine how useless the most energetic work on the part of the
 individual teacher must be, who would fain lead a pupil back into the
 distant and evasive Hellenic world and to the real home of culture,
 when in less than an hour, that same pupil will have recourse to a
 newspaper, the latest novel, or one of those learned books, the very
 style of which already bears the revolting impress of modern barbaric
 culture----"
 
 "Now, silence a minute!" interjected the philosopher in a strong and
 sympathetic voice. "I understand you now, and ought never to have
 spoken so crossly to you. You are altogether right, save in your
 despair. I shall now proceed to say a few words of consolation."
 
 
 
 
 SECOND LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 6th of February 1872._)
 
 
 LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,--Those among you whom I now have the pleasure of
 addressing for the first time and whose only knowledge of my first
 lecture has been derived from reports will, I hope, not mind being
 introduced here into the middle of a dialogue which I had begun to
 recount on the last occasion, and the last points of which I must now
 recall. The philosopher's young companion was just pleading openly and
 confidentially with his distinguished tutor, and apologising for
 having so far renounced his calling as a teacher in order to spend his
 days in comfortless solitude. No suspicion of superciliousness or
 arrogance had induced him to form this resolve.
 
 "I have heard too much from your lips at various times," the
 straightforward pupil said, "and have been too long in your company,
 to surrender myself blindly to our present systems of education and
 instruction. I am too painfully conscious of the disastrous errors and
 abuses to which you were wont to call my attention; and yet I know
 that I am far from possessing the requisite strength to meet with
 success, however valiantly I might struggle to shatter the bulwarks
 of this would-be culture. I was overcome by a general feeling of
 depression: my recourse to solitude was not arrogance or
 superciliousness." Whereupon, to account for his behaviour, he
 described the general character of modern educational methods so
 vividly that the philosopher could not help interrupting him in a
 voice full of sympathy, and crying words of comfort to him.
 
 "Now, silence for a minute, my poor friend," he cried; "I can more
 easily understand you now, and should not have lost my patience with
 you. You are altogether right, save in your despair. I shall now
 proceed to say a few words of comfort to you. How long do you suppose
 the state of education in the schools of our time, which seems to
 weigh so heavily upon you, will last? I shall not conceal my views on
 this point from you: its time is over; its days are counted. The first
 who will dare to be quite straightforward in this respect will hear
 his honesty re-echoed back to him by thousands of courageous souls.
 For, at bottom, there is a tacit understanding between the more nobly
 gifted and more warmly disposed men of the present day. Every one of
 them knows what he has had to suffer from the condition of culture in
 schools; every one of them would fain protect his offspring from the
 need of enduring similar drawbacks, even though he himself was
 compelled to submit to them. If these feelings are never quite
 honestly expressed, however, it is owing to a sad want of spirit among
 modern pedagogues. These lack real initiative; there are too few
 practical men among them--that is to say, too few who happen to have
 good and new ideas, and who know that real genius and the real
 practical mind must necessarily come together in the same individuals,
 whilst the sober practical men have no ideas and therefore fall short
 in practice.
 
 "Let any one examine the pedagogic literature of the present; he who
 is not shocked at its utter poverty of spirit and its ridiculously
 awkward antics is beyond being spoiled. Here our philosophy must not
 begin with wonder but with dread; he who feels no dread at this point
 must be asked not to meddle with pedagogic questions. The reverse, of
 course, has been the rule up to the present; those who were terrified
 ran away filled with embarrassment as you did, my poor friend, while
 the sober and fearless ones spread their heavy hands over the most
 delicate technique that has ever existed in art--over the technique of
 education. This, however, will not be possible much longer; at some
 time or other the upright man will appear, who will not only have the
 good ideas I speak of, but who in order to work at their realisation,
 will dare to break with all that exists at present: he may by means of
 a wonderful example achieve what the broad hands, hitherto active,
 could not even imitate--then people will everywhere begin to draw
 comparisons; then men will at least be able to perceive a contrast and
 will be in a position to reflect upon its causes, whereas, at present,
 so many still believe, in perfect good faith, that heavy hands are a
 necessary factor in pedagogic work."
 
 "My dear master," said the younger man, "I wish you could point to
 one single example which would assist me in seeing the soundness of
 the hopes which you so heartily raise in me. We are both acquainted
 with public schools; do you think, for instance, that in respect of
 these institutions anything may be done by means of honesty and good
 and new ideas to abolish the tenacious and antiquated customs now
 extant? In this quarter, it seems to me, the battering-rams of an
 attacking party will have to meet with no solid wall, but with the
 most fatal of stolid and slippery principles. The leader of the
 assault has no visible and tangible opponent to crush, but rather a
 creature in disguise that can transform itself into a hundred
 different shapes and, in each of these, slip out of his grasp, only in
 order to reappear and to confound its enemy by cowardly surrenders and
 feigned retreats. It was precisely the public schools which drove me
 into despair and solitude, simply because I feel that if the struggle
 here leads to victory all other educational institutions must give in;
 but that, if the reformer be forced to abandon his cause here, he may
 as well give up all hope in regard to every other scholastic question.
 Therefore, dear master, enlighten me concerning the public schools;
 what can we hope for in the way of their abolition or reform?"
 
 "I also hold the question of public schools to be as important as you
 do," the philosopher replied. "All other educational institutions must
 fix their aims in accordance with those of the public school system;
 whatever errors of judgment it may suffer from, they suffer from also,
 and if it were ever purified and rejuvenated, they would be purified
 and rejuvenated too. The universities can no longer lay claim to this
 importance as centres of influence, seeing that, as they now stand,
 they are at least, in one important aspect, only a kind of annex to
 the public school system, as I shall shortly point out to you. For the
 moment, let us consider, together, what to my mind constitutes the
 very hopeful struggle of the two possibilities: _either_ that the
 motley and evasive spirit of public schools which has hitherto been
 fostered, will completely vanish, or that it will have to be
 completely purified and rejuvenated. And in order that I may not shock
 you with general propositions, let us first try to recall one of those
 public school experiences which we have all had, and from which we
 have all suffered. Under severe examination what, as a matter of fact,
 is the present _system of teaching German_ in public schools?
 
 "I shall first of all tell you what it should be. Everybody speaks and
 writes German as thoroughly badly as it is just possible to do so in
 an age of newspaper German: that is why the growing youth who happens
 to be both noble and gifted has to be taken by force and put under the
 glass shade of good taste and of severe linguistic discipline. If this
 is not possible, I would prefer in future that Latin be spoken; for I
 am ashamed of a language so bungled and vitiated.
 
 "What would be the duty of a higher educational institution, in this
 respect, if not this--namely, with authority and dignified severity to
 put youths, neglected, as far as their own language is concerned, on
 the right path, and to cry to them: 'Take your own language seriously!
 He who does not regard this matter as a sacred duty does not possess
 even the germ of a higher culture. From your attitude in this matter,
 from your treatment of your mother-tongue, we can judge how highly or
 how lowly you esteem art, and to what extent you are related to it. If
 you notice no physical loathing in yourselves when you meet with
 certain words and tricks of speech in our journalistic jargon, cease
 from striving after culture; for here in your immediate vicinity, at
 every moment of your life, while you are either speaking or writing,
 you have a touchstone for testing how difficult, how stupendous, the
 task of the cultured man is, and how very improbable it must be that
 many of you will ever attain to culture.'
 
 "In accordance with the spirit of this address, the teacher of German
 at a public school would be forced to call his pupil's attention to
 thousands of details, and with the absolute certainty of good taste,
 to forbid their using such words and expressions, for instance, as:
 '_beanspruchen_,' '_vereinnahmen_,' '_einer Sache Rechnung tragen_,'
 '_die Initiative ergreifen_,' '_selbstverstaendlich_,'[3] etc., _cum
 taedio in infinitum_. The same teacher would also have to take our
 classical authors and show, line for line, how carefully and with what
 precision every expression has to be chosen when a writer has the
 correct feeling in his heart and has before his eyes a perfect
 conception of all he is writing. He would necessarily urge his pupils,
 time and again, to express the same thought ever more happily; nor
 would he have to abate in rigour until the less gifted in his class
 had contracted an unholy fear of their language, and the others had
 developed great enthusiasm for it.
 
 "Here then is a task for so-called 'formal' education[4] [the
 education tending to develop the mental faculties, as opposed to
 'material' education,[5] which is intended to deal only with the
 acquisition of facts, _e.g._ history, mathematics, etc.], and one of
 the utmost value: but what do we find in the public school--that is to
 say, in the head-quarters of formal education? He who understands how
 to apply what he has heard here will also know what to think of the
 modern public school as a so-called educational institution. He will
 discover, for instance, that the public school, according to its
 fundamental principles, does not educate for the purposes of culture,
 but for the purposes of scholarship; and, further, that of late it
 seems to have adopted a course which indicates rather that it has even
 discarded scholarship in favour of journalism as the object of its
 exertions. This can be clearly seen from the way in which German is
 taught.
 
 "Instead of that purely practical method of instruction by which the
 teacher accustoms his pupils to severe self-discipline in their own
 language, we find everywhere the rudiments of a historico-scholastic
 method of teaching the mother-tongue: that is to say, people deal with
 it as if it were a dead language and as if the present and future were
 under no obligations to it whatsoever. The historical method has
 become so universal in our time, that even the living body of the
 language is sacrificed for the sake of anatomical study. But this is
 precisely where culture begins--namely, in understanding how to treat
 the quick as something vital, and it is here too that the mission of
 the cultured teacher begins: in suppressing the urgent claims of
 'historical interests' wherever it is above all necessary to _do_
 properly and not merely to _know_ properly. Our mother-tongue,
 however, is a domain in which the pupil must learn how to _do_
 properly, and to this practical end, alone, the teaching of German is
 essential in our scholastic establishments. The historical method may
 certainly be a considerably easier and more comfortable one for the
 teacher; it also seems to be compatible with a much lower grade of
 ability and, in general, with a smaller display of energy and will on
 his part. But we shall find that this observation holds good in every
 department of pedagogic life: the simpler and more comfortable method
 always masquerades in the disguise of grand pretensions and stately
 titles; the really practical side, the _doing_, which should belong to
 culture and which, at bottom, is the more difficult side, meets only
 with disfavour and contempt. That is why the honest man must make
 himself and others quite clear concerning this _quid pro quo_.
 
 "Now, apart from these learned incentives to a study of the language,
 what is there besides which the German teacher is wont to offer? How
 does he reconcile the spirit of his school with the spirit of the
 _few_ that Germany can claim who are really cultured,--_i.e._ with the
 spirit of its classical poets and artists? This is a dark and thorny
 sphere, into which one cannot even bear a light without dread; but
 even here we shall conceal nothing from ourselves; for sooner or later
 the whole of it will have to be reformed. In the public school, the
 repulsive impress of our aesthetic journalism is stamped upon the still
 unformed minds of youths. Here, too, the teacher sows the seeds of
 that crude and wilful misinterpretation of the classics, which later
 on disports itself as art-criticism, and which is nothing but
 bumptious barbarity. Here the pupils learn to speak of our unique
 _Schiller_ with the superciliousness of prigs; here they are taught to
 smile at the noblest and most German of his works--at the Marquis of
 Posa, at Max and Thekla--at these smiles German genius becomes
 incensed and a worthier posterity will blush.
 
 "The last department in which the German teacher in a public school is
 at all active, which is often regarded as his sphere of highest
 activity, and is here and there even considered the pinnacle of public
 school education, is the so-called _German composition_. Owing to the
 very fact that in this department it is almost always the most gifted
 pupils who display the greatest eagerness, it ought to have been made
 clear how dangerously stimulating, precisely here, the task of the
 teacher must be. _German composition_ makes an appeal to the
 individual, and the more strongly a pupil is conscious of his various
 qualities, the more personally will he do his _German composition_.
 This 'personal doing' is urged on with yet an additional fillip in
 some public schools by the choice of the subject, the strongest proof
 of which is, in my opinion, that even in the lower classes the
 non-pedagogic subject is set, by means of which the pupil is led to
 give a description of his life and of his development. Now, one has
 only to read the titles of the compositions set in a large number of
 public schools to be convinced that probably the large majority of
 pupils have to suffer their whole lives, through no fault of their
 own, owing to this premature demand for personal work--for the unripe
 procreation of thoughts. And how often are not all a man's subsequent
 literary performances but a sad result of this pedagogic original sin
 against the intellect!
 
 "Let us only think of what takes place at such an age in the
 production of such work. It is the first individual creation; the
 still undeveloped powers tend for the first time to crystallise; the
 staggering sensation produced by the demand for self-reliance imparts
 a seductive charm to these early performances, which is not only quite
 new, but which never returns. All the daring of nature is hauled out
 of its depths; all vanities--no longer constrained by mighty
 barriers--are allowed for the first time to assume a literary form:
 the young man, from that time forward, feels as if he had reached his
 consummation as a being not only able, but actually invited, to speak
 and to converse. The subject he selects obliges him either to express
 his judgment upon certain poetical works, to class historical persons
 together in a description of character, to discuss serious ethical
 problems quite independently, or even to turn the searchlight inwards,
 to throw its rays upon his own development and to make a critical
 report of himself: in short, a whole world of reflection is spread out
 before the astonished young man who, until then, had been almost
 unconscious, and is delivered up to him to be judged.
 
 "Now let us try to picture the teacher's usual attitude towards these
 first highly influential examples of original composition. What does
 he hold to be most reprehensible in this class of work? What does he
 call his pupil's attention to?--To all excess in form or thought--that
 is to say, to all that which, at their age, is essentially
 characteristic and individual. Their really independent traits which,
 in response to this very premature excitation, can manifest themselves
 only in awkwardness, crudeness, and grotesque features,--in short,
 their individuality is reproved and rejected by the teacher in favour
 of an unoriginal decent average. On the other hand, uniform mediocrity
 gets peevish praise; for, as a rule, it is just the class of work
 likely to bore the teacher thoroughly.
 
 "There may still be men who recognise a most absurd and most dangerous
 element of the public school curriculum in the whole farce of this
 German composition. Originality is demanded here: but the only shape
 in which it can manifest itself is rejected, and the 'formal'
 education that the system takes for granted is attained to only by a
 very limited number of men who complete it at a ripe age. Here
 everybody without exception is regarded as gifted for literature and
 considered as capable of holding opinions concerning the most
 important questions and people, whereas the one aim which proper
 education should most zealously strive to achieve would be the
 suppression of all ridiculous claims to independent judgment, and the
 inculcation upon young men of obedience to the sceptre of genius. Here
 a pompous form of diction is taught in an age when every spoken or
 written word is a piece of barbarism. Now let us consider, besides,
 the danger of arousing the self-complacency which is so easily
 awakened in youths; let us think how their vanity must be flattered
 when they see their literary reflection for the first time in the
 mirror. Who, having seen all these effects at _one_ glance, could any
 longer doubt whether all the faults of our public, literary, and
 artistic life were not stamped upon every fresh generation by the
 system we are examining: hasty and vain production, the disgraceful
 manufacture of books; complete want of style; the crude,
 characterless, or sadly swaggering method of expression; the loss of
 every aesthetic canon; the voluptuousness of anarchy and chaos--in
 short, the literary peculiarities of both our journalism and our
 scholarship.
 
 "None but the very fewest are aware that, among many thousands,
 perhaps only _one_ is justified in describing himself as literary, and
 that all others who at their own risk try to be so deserve to be met
 with Homeric laughter by all competent men as a reward for every
 sentence they have ever had printed;--for it is truly a spectacle meet
 for the gods to see a literary Hephaistos limping forward who would
 pretend to help us to something. To educate men to earnest and
 inexorable habits and views, in this respect, should be the highest
 aim of all mental training, whereas the general _laisser aller_ of the
 'fine personality' can be nothing else than the hall-mark of
 barbarism. From what I have said, however, it must be clear that, at
 least in the teaching of German, no thought is given to culture;
 something quite different is in view,--namely, the production of the
 afore-mentioned 'free personality.' And so long as German public
 schools prepare the road for outrageous and irresponsible scribbling,
 so long as they do not regard the immediate and practical discipline
 of speaking and writing as their most holy duty, so long as they treat
 the mother-tongue as if it were only a necessary evil or a dead body,
 I shall not regard these institutions as belonging to real culture.
 
 "In regard to the language, what is surely least noticeable is any
 trace of the influence of _classical examples_: that is why, on the
 strength of this consideration alone, the so-called 'classical
 education' which is supposed to be provided by our public school,
 strikes me as something exceedingly doubtful and confused. For how
 could anybody, after having cast one glance at those examples, fail to
 see the great earnestness with which the Greek and the Roman regarded
 and treated his language, from his youth onwards--how is it possible
 to mistake one's example on a point like this one?--provided, of
 course, that the classical Hellenic and Roman world really did hover
 before the educational plan of our public schools as the highest and
 most instructive of all morals--a fact I feel very much inclined to
 doubt. The claim put forward by public schools concerning the
 'classical education' they provide seems to be more an awkward evasion
 than anything else; it is used whenever there is any question raised
 as to the competency of the public schools to impart culture and to
 educate. Classical education, indeed! It sounds so dignified! It
 confounds the aggressor and staves off the assault--for who could see
 to the bottom of this bewildering formula all at once? And this has
 long been the customary strategy of the public school: from whichever
 side the war-cry may come, it writes upon its shield--not overloaded
 with honours--one of those confusing catchwords, such as: 'classical
 education,' 'formal education,' 'scientific education':--three
 glorious things which are, however, unhappily at loggerheads, not only
 with themselves but among themselves, and are such that, if they were
 compulsorily brought together, would perforce bring forth a
 culture-monster. For a 'classical education' is something so unheard
 of, difficult and rare, and exacts such complicated talent, that only
 ingenuousness or impudence could put it forward as an attainable goal
 in our public schools. The words: 'formal education' belong to that
 crude kind of unphilosophical phraseology which one should do one's
 utmost to get rid of; for there is no such thing as 'the opposite of
 formal education.' And he who regards 'scientific education' as the
 object of a public school thereby sacrifices 'classical education' and
 the so-called 'formal education,' at one stroke, as the scientific man
 and the cultured man belong to two different spheres which, though
 coming together at times in the same individual, are never reconciled.
 
 "If we compare all three of these would-be aims of the public school
 with the actual facts to be observed in the present method of teaching
 German, we see immediately what they really amount to in
 practice,--that is to say, only to subterfuges for use in the fight
 and struggle for existence and, often enough, mere means wherewith to
 bewilder an opponent. For we are unable to detect any single feature
 in this teaching of German which in any way recalls the example of
 classical antiquity and its glorious methods of training in languages.
 'Formal education,' however, which is supposed to be achieved by this
 method of teaching German, has been shown to be wholly at the pleasure
 of the 'free personality,' which is as good as saying that it is
 barbarism and anarchy. And as for the preparation in science, which is
 one of the consequences of this teaching, our Germanists will have to
 determine, in all justice, how little these learned beginnings in
 public schools have contributed to the splendour of their sciences,
 and how much the personality of individual university professors has
 done so.--Put briefly: the public school has hitherto neglected its
 most important and most urgent duty towards the very beginning of all
 real culture, which is the mother-tongue; but in so doing it has
 lacked the natural, fertile soil for all further efforts at culture.
 For only by means of stern, artistic, and careful discipline and
 habit, in a language, can the correct feeling for the greatness of our
 classical writers be strengthened. Up to the present their recognition
 by the public schools has been owing almost solely to the doubtful
 aesthetic hobbies of a few teachers or to the massive effects of
 certain of their tragedies and novels. But everybody should, himself,
 be aware of the difficulties of the language: he should have learnt
 them from experience: after long seeking and struggling he must reach
 the path our great poets trod in order to be able to realise how
 lightly and beautifully they trod it, and how stiffly and swaggeringly
 the others follow at their heels.
 
 "Only by means of such discipline can the young man acquire that
 physical loathing for the beloved and much-admired 'elegance' of style
 of our newspaper manufacturers and novelists, and for the 'ornate
 style' of our literary men; by it alone is he irrevocably elevated at
 a stroke above a whole host of absurd questions and scruples, such,
 for instance, as whether Auerbach and Gutzkow are really poets, for
 his disgust at both will be so great that he will be unable to read
 them any longer, and thus the problem will be solved for him. Let no
 one imagine that it is an easy matter to develop this feeling to the
 extent necessary in order to have this physical loathing; but let no
 one hope to reach sound aesthetic judgments along any other road than
 the thorny one of language, and by this I do not mean philological
 research, but self-discipline in one's mother-tongue.
 
 "Everybody who is in earnest in this matter will have the same sort of
 experience as the recruit in the army who is compelled to learn
 walking after having walked almost all his life as a dilettante or
 empiricist. It is a hard time: one almost fears that the tendons are
 going to snap and one ceases to hope that the artificial and
 consciously acquired movements and positions of the feet will ever be
 carried out with ease and comfort. It is painful to see how awkwardly
 and heavily one foot is set before the other, and one dreads that one
 may not only be unable to learn the new way of walking, but that one
 will forget how to walk at all. Then it suddenly become noticeable
 that a new habit and a second nature have been born of the practised
 movements, and that the assurance and strength of the old manner of
 walking returns with a little more grace: at this point one begins to
 realise how difficult walking is, and one feels in a position to laugh
 at the untrained empiricist or the elegant dilettante. Our 'elegant'
 writers, as their style shows, have never learnt 'walking' in this
 sense, and in our public schools, as our other writers show, no one
 learns walking either. Culture begins, however, with the correct
 movement of the language: and once it has properly begun, it begets
 that physical sensation in the presence of 'elegant' writers which is
 known by the name of 'loathing.'
 
 "We recognise the fatal consequences of our present public schools, in
 that they are unable to inculcate severe and genuine culture, which
 should consist above all in obedience and habituation; and that, at
 their best, they much more often achieve a result by stimulating and
 kindling scientific tendencies, is shown by the hand which is so
 frequently seen uniting scholarship and barbarous taste, science and
 journalism. In a very large majority of cases to-day we can observe
 how sadly our scholars fall short of the standard of culture which the
 efforts of Goethe, Schiller, Lessing, and Winckelmann established; and
 this falling short shows itself precisely in the egregious errors
 which the men we speak of are exposed to, equally among literary
 historians--whether Gervinus or Julian Schmidt--as in any other
 company; everywhere, indeed, where men and women converse. It shows
 itself most frequently and painfully, however, in pedagogic spheres,
 in the literature of public schools. It can be proved that the only
 value that these men have in a real educational establishment has not
 been mentioned, much less generally recognised for half a century:
 their value as preparatory leaders and mystogogues of classical
 culture, guided by whose hands alone can the correct road leading to
 antiquity be found.
 
 "Every so-called classical education can have but one natural
 starting-point--an artistic, earnest, and exact familiarity with the
 use of the mother-tongue: this, together with the secret of form,
 however, one can seldom attain to of one's own accord, almost
 everybody requires those great leaders and tutors and must place
 himself in their hands. There is, however, no such thing as a
 classical education that could grow without this inferred love of
 form. Here, where the power of discerning form and barbarity gradually
 awakens, there appear the pinions which bear one to the only real home
 of culture--ancient Greece. If with the solitary help of those pinions
 we sought to reach those far-distant and diamond-studded walls
 encircling the stronghold of Hellenism, we should certainly not get
 very far; once more, therefore, we need the same leaders and tutors,
 our German classical writers, that we may be borne up, too, by the
 wing-strokes of their past endeavours--to the land of yearning, to
 Greece.
 
 "Not a suspicion of this possible relationship between our classics
 and classical education seems to have pierced the antique walls of
 public schools. Philologists seem much more eagerly engaged in
 introducing Homer and Sophocles to the young souls of their pupils, in
 their own style, calling the result simply by the unchallenged
 euphemism: 'classical education.' Let every one's own experience tell
 him what he had of Homer and Sophocles at the hands of such eager
 teachers. It is in this department that the greatest number of deepest
 deceptions occur, and whence misunderstandings are inadvertently
 spread. In German public schools I have never yet found a trace of
 what might really be called 'classical education,' and there is
 nothing surprising in this when one thinks of the way in which these
 institutions have emancipated themselves from German classical writers
 and the discipline of the German language. Nobody reaches antiquity by
 means of a leap into the dark, and yet the whole method of treating
 ancient writers in schools, the plain commentating and paraphrasing of
 our philological teachers, amounts to nothing more than a leap into
 the dark.
 
 "The feeling for classical Hellenism is, as a matter of fact, such an
 exceptional outcome of the most energetic fight for culture and
 artistic talent that the public school could only have professed to
 awaken this feeling owing to a very crude misunderstanding. In what
 age? In an age which is led about blindly by the most sensational
 desires of the day, and which is not aware of the fact that, once that
 feeling for Hellenism is roused, it immediately becomes aggressive and
 must express itself by indulging in an incessant war with the
 so-called culture of the present. For the public school boy of to-day,
 the Hellenes as Hellenes are dead: yes, he gets some enjoyment out of
 Homer, but a novel by Spielhagen interests him much more: yes, he
 swallows Greek tragedy and comedy with a certain relish, but a
 thoroughly modern drama, like Freitag's 'Journalists,' moves him in
 quite another fashion. In regard to all ancient authors he is rather
 inclined to speak after the manner of the aesthete, Hermann Grimm, who,
 on one occasion, at the end of a tortuous essay on the Venus of Milo,
 asks himself: 'What does this goddess's form mean to me? Of what use
 are the thoughts she suggests to me? Orestes and OEdipus, Iphigenia
 and Antigone, what have they in common with my heart?'--No, my dear
 public school boy, the Venus of Milo does not concern you in any way,
 and concerns your teacher just as little--and that is the misfortune,
 that is the secret of the modern public school. Who will conduct you
 to the land of culture, if your leaders are blind and assume the
 position of seers notwithstanding? Which of you will ever attain to a
 true feeling for the sacred seriousness of art, if you are
 systematically spoiled, and taught to stutter independently instead of
 being taught to speak; to aestheticise on your own account, when you
 ought to be taught to approach works of art almost piously; to
 philosophise without assistance, while you ought to be compelled to
 _listen_ to great thinkers. All this with the result that you remain
 eternally at a distance from antiquity and become the servants of the
 day.
 
 "At all events, the most wholesome feature of our modern institutions
 is to be found in the earnestness with which the Latin and Greek
 languages are studied over a long course of years. In this way boys
 learn to respect a grammar, lexicons, and a language that conforms to
 fixed rules; in this department of public school work there is an
 exact knowledge of what constitutes a fault, and no one is troubled
 with any thought of justifying himself every minute by appealing (as
 in the case of modern German) to various grammatical and
 orthographical vagaries and vicious forms. If only this respect for
 language did not hang in the air so, like a theoretical burden which
 one is pleased to throw off the moment one turns to one's
 mother-tongue! More often than not, the classical master makes pretty
 short work of the mother-tongue; from the outset he treats it as a
 department of knowledge in which one is allowed that indolent ease
 with which the German treats everything that belongs to his native
 soil. The splendid practice afforded by translating from one language
 into another, which so improves and fertilises one's artistic feeling
 for one's own tongue, is, in the case of German, never conducted with
 that fitting categorical strictness and dignity which would be above
 all necessary in dealing with an undisciplined language. Of late,
 exercises of this kind have tended to decrease ever more and more:
 people are satisfied to _know_ the foreign classical tongues, they
 would scorn being able to _apply_ them.
 
 "Here one gets another glimpse of the scholarly tendency of public
 schools: a phenomenon which throws much light upon the object which
 once animated them,--that is to say, the serious desire to cultivate
 the pupil. This belonged to the time of our great poets, those few
 really cultured Germans,--the time when the magnificent Friedrich
 August Wolf directed the new stream of classical thought, introduced
 from Greece and Rome by those men, into the heart of the public
 schools. Thanks to his bold start, a new order of public schools was
 established, which thenceforward was not to be merely a nursery for
 science, but, above all, the actual consecrated home of all higher and
 nobler culture.
 
 "Of the many necessary measures which this change called into being,
 some of the most important have been transferred with lasting success
 to the modern regulations of public schools: the most important of
 all, however, did not succeed--the one demanding that the teacher,
 also, should be consecrated to the new spirit, so that the aim of the
 public school has meanwhile considerably departed from the original
 plan laid down by Wolf, which was the cultivation of the pupil. The
 old estimate of scholarship and scholarly culture, as an absolute,
 which Wolf overcame, seems after a slow and spiritless struggle rather
 to have taken the place of the culture-principle of more recent
 introduction, and now claims its former exclusive rights, though not
 with the same frankness, but disguised and with features veiled. And
 the reason why it was impossible to make public schools fall in with
 the magnificent plan of classical culture lay in the un-German, almost
 foreign or cosmopolitan nature of these efforts in the cause of
 education: in the belief that it was possible to remove the native
 soil from under a man's feet and that he should still remain standing;
 in the illusion that people can spring direct, without bridges, into
 the strange Hellenic world, by abjuring German and the German mind in
 general.
 
 "Of course one must know how to trace this Germanic spirit to its lair
 beneath its many modern dressings, or even beneath heaps of ruins; one
 must love it so that one is not ashamed of it in its stunted form, and
 one must above all be on one's guard against confounding it with what
 now disports itself proudly as 'Up-to-date German culture.' The German
 spirit is very far from being on friendly times with this up-to-date
 culture: and precisely in those spheres where the latter complains of
 a lack of culture the real German spirit has survived, though perhaps
 not always with a graceful, but more often an ungraceful, exterior. On
 the other hand, that which now grandiloquently assumes the title of
 'German culture' is a sort of cosmopolitan aggregate, which bears the
 same relation to the German spirit as Journalism does to Schiller or
 Meyerbeer to Beethoven: here the strongest influence at work is the
 fundamentally and thoroughly un-German civilisation of France, which
 is aped neither with talent nor with taste, and the imitation of which
 gives the society, the press, the art, and the literary style of
 Germany their pharisaical character. Naturally the copy nowhere
 produces the really artistic effect which the original, grown out of
 the heart of Roman civilisation, is able to produce almost to this day
 in France. Let any one who wishes to see the full force of this
 contrast compare our most noted novelists with the less noted ones of
 France or Italy: he will recognise in both the same doubtful
 tendencies and aims, as also the same still more doubtful means, but
 in France he will find them coupled with artistic earnestness, at
 least with grammatical purity, and often with beauty, while in their
 every feature he will recognise the echo of a corresponding social
 culture. In Germany, on the other hand, they will strike him as
 unoriginal, flabby, filled with dressing-gown thoughts and
 expressions, unpleasantly spread out, and therewithal possessing no
 background of social form. At the most, owing to their scholarly
 mannerisms and display of knowledge, he will be reminded of the fact
 that in Latin countries it is the artistically-trained man, and that
 in Germany it is the abortive scholar, who becomes a journalist. With
 this would-be German and thoroughly unoriginal culture, the German can
 nowhere reckon upon victory: the Frenchman and the Italian will always
 get the better of him in this respect, while, in regard to the clever
 imitation of a foreign culture, the Russian, above all, will always be
 his superior.
 
 "We are therefore all the more anxious to hold fast to that German
 spirit which revealed itself in the German Reformation, and in German
 music, and which has shown its enduring and genuine strength in the
 enormous courage and severity of German philosophy and in the loyalty
 of the German soldier, which has been tested quite recently. From it
 we expect a victory over that 'up-to-date' pseudo-culture which is now
 the fashion. What we should hope for the future is that schools may
 draw the real school of culture into this struggle, and kindle the
 flame of enthusiasm in the younger generation, more particularly in
 public schools, for that which is truly German; and in this way
 so-called classical education will resume its natural place and
 recover its one possible starting-point.
 
 "A thorough reformation and purification of the public school can only
 be the outcome of a profound and powerful reformation and purification
 of the German spirit. It is a very complex and difficult task to find
 the border-line which joins the heart of the Germanic spirit with the
 genius of Greece. Not, however, before the noblest needs of genuine
 German genius snatch at the hand of this genius of Greece as at a firm
 post in the torrent of barbarity, not before a devouring yearning for
 this genius of Greece takes possession of German genius, and not
 before that view of the Greek home, on which Schiller and Goethe,
 after enormous exertions, were able to feast their eyes, has become
 the Mecca of the best and most gifted men, will the aim of classical
 education in public schools acquire any definition; and they at least
 will not be to blame who teach ever so little science and learning in
 public schools, in order to keep a definite and at the same time ideal
 aim in their eyes, and to rescue their pupils from that glistening
 phantom which now allows itself to be called 'culture' and
 'education.' This is the sad plight of the public school of to-day:
 the narrowest views remain in a certain measure right, because no one
 seems able to reach or, at least, to indicate the spot where all these
 views culminate in error."
 
 "No one?" the philosopher's pupil inquired with a slight quaver in his
 voice; and both men were silent.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [3] It is not practicable to translate these German solecisms by
 similar instances of English solecisms. The reader who is interested
 in the subject will find plenty of material in a book like the Oxford
 _King's English_.
 
 [4] German: _Formelle Bildung._
 
 [5] German: _Materielle Bildung._
 
 
 
 
 THIRD LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 27th of February 1872._)
 
 
 Ladies and Gentlemen,--At the close of my last lecture, the
 conversation to which I was a listener, and the outlines of which, as
 I clearly recollect them, I am now trying to lay before you, was
 interrupted by a long and solemn pause. Both the philosopher and his
 companion sat silent, sunk in deep dejection: the peculiarly critical
 state of that important educational institution, the German public
 school, lay upon their souls like a heavy burden, which one single,
 well-meaning individual is not strong enough to remove, and the
 multitude, though strong, not well meaning enough.
 
 Our solitary thinkers were perturbed by two facts: by clearly
 perceiving on the one hand that what might rightly be called
 "classical education" was now only a far-off ideal, a castle in the
 air, which could not possibly be built as a reality on the foundations
 of our present educational system, and that, on the other hand, what
 was now, with customary and unopposed euphemism, pointed to as
 "classical education" could only claim the value of a pretentious
 illusion, the best effect of which was that the expression "classical
 education" still lived on and had not yet lost its pathetic sound.
 These two worthy men saw clearly, by the system of instruction in
 vogue, that the time was not yet ripe for a higher culture, a culture
 founded upon that of the ancients: the neglected state of linguistic
 instruction; the forcing of students into learned historical paths,
 instead of giving them a practical training; the connection of certain
 practices, encouraged in the public schools, with the objectionable
 spirit of our journalistic publicity--all these easily perceptible
 phenomena of the teaching of German led to the painful certainty that
 the most beneficial of those forces which have come down to us from
 classical antiquity are not yet known in our public schools: forces
 which would train students for the struggle against the barbarism of
 the present age, and which will perhaps once more transform the public
 schools into the arsenals and workshops of this struggle.
 
 On the other hand, it would seem in the meantime as if the spirit of
 antiquity, in its fundamental principles, had already been driven away
 from the portals of the public schools, and as if here also the gates
 were thrown open as widely as possible to the be-flattered and
 pampered type of our present self-styled "German culture." And if the
 solitary talkers caught a glimpse of a single ray of hope, it was that
 things would have to become still worse, that what was as yet divined
 only by the few would soon be clearly perceived by the many, and that
 then the time for honest and resolute men for the earnest
 consideration of the scope of the education of the masses would not be
 far distant.
 
 After a few minutes' silent reflection, the philosopher's companion
 turned to him and said: "You used to hold out hopes to me, but now you
 have done more: you have widened my intelligence, and with it my
 strength and courage: now indeed can I look on the field of battle
 with more hardihood, now indeed do I repent of my too hasty flight. We
 want nothing for ourselves, and it should be nothing to us how many
 individuals may fall in this battle, or whether we ourselves may be
 among the first. Just because we take this matter so seriously, we
 should not take our own poor selves so seriously: at the very moment
 we are falling some one else will grasp the banner of our faith. I
 will not even consider whether I am strong enough for such a fight,
 whether I can offer sufficient resistance; it may even be an
 honourable death to fall to the accompaniment of the mocking laughter
 of such enemies, whose seriousness has frequently seemed to us to be
 something ridiculous. When I think how my contemporaries prepared
 themselves for the highest posts in the scholastic profession, as I
 myself have done, then I know how we often laughed at the exact
 contrary, and grew serious over something quite different----"
 
 "Now, my friend," interrupted the philosopher, laughingly, "you speak
 as one who would fain dive into the water without being able to swim,
 and who fears something even more than the mere drowning; _not_ being
 drowned, but laughed at. But being laughed at should be the very last
 thing for us to dread; for we are in a sphere where there are too many
 truths to tell, too many formidable, painful, unpardonable truths, for
 us to escape hatred, and only fury here and there will give rise to
 some sort of embarrassed laughter. Just think of the innumerable crowd
 of teachers, who, in all good faith, have assimilated the system of
 education which has prevailed up to the present, that they may
 cheerfully and without over-much deliberation carry it further on.
 What do you think it will seem like to these men when they hear of
 projects from which they are excluded _beneficio naturae_; of commands
 which their mediocre abilities are totally unable to carry out; of
 hopes which find no echo in them; of battles the war-cries of which
 they do not understand, and in the fighting of which they can take
 part only as dull and obtuse rank and file? But, without exaggeration,
 that must necessarily be the position of practically all the teachers
 in our higher educational establishments: and indeed we cannot wonder
 at this when we consider how such a teacher originates, how he
 _becomes_ a teacher of such high status. Such a large number of higher
 educational establishments are now to be found everywhere that far
 more teachers will continue to be required for them than the nature of
 even a highly-gifted people can produce; and thus an inordinate stream
 of undesirables flows into these institutions, who, however, by their
 preponderating numbers and their instinct of 'similis simile gaudet'
 gradually come to determine the nature of these institutions. There
 may be a few people, hopelessly unfamiliar with pedagogical matters,
 who believe that our present profusion of public schools and teachers,
 which is manifestly out of all proportion, can be changed into a real
 profusion, an _ubertas ingenii_, merely by a few rules and
 regulations, and without any reduction in the number of these
 institutions. But we may surely be unanimous in recognising that by
 the very nature of things only an exceedingly small number of people
 are destined for a true course of education, and that a much smaller
 number of higher educational establishments would suffice for their
 further development, but that, in view of the present large numbers of
 educational institutions, those for whom in general such institutions
 ought only to be established must feel themselves to be the least
 facilitated in their progress.
 
 "The same holds good in regard to teachers. It is precisely the best
 teachers--those who, generally speaking, judged by a high standard,
 are worthy of this honourable name--who are now perhaps the least
 fitted, in view of the present standing of our public schools, for the
 education of these unselected youths, huddled together in a confused
 heap; but who must rather, to a certain extent, keep hidden from them
 the best they could give: and, on the other hand, by far the larger
 number of these teachers feel themselves quite at home in these
 institutions, as their moderate abilities stand in a kind of
 harmonious relationship to the dullness of their pupils. It is from
 this majority that we hear the ever-resounding call for the
 establishment of new public schools and higher educational
 institutions: we are living in an age which, by ringing the changes on
 its deafening and continual cry, would certainly give one the
 impression that there was an unprecedented thirst for culture which
 eagerly sought to be quenched. But it is just at this point that one
 should learn to hear aright: it is here, without being disconcerted by
 the thundering noise of the education-mongers, that we must confront
 those who talk so tirelessly about the educational necessities of
 their time. Then we should meet with a strange disillusionment, one
 which we, my good friend, have often met with: those blatant heralds
 of educational needs, when examined at close quarters, are suddenly
 seen to be transformed into zealous, yea, fanatical opponents of true
 culture, _i.e._ all those who hold fast to the aristocratic nature of
 the mind; for, at bottom, they regard as their goal the emancipation
 of the masses from the mastery of the great few; they seek to
 overthrow the most sacred hierarchy in the kingdom of the
 intellect--the servitude of the masses, their submissive obedience,
 their instinct of loyalty to the rule of genius.
 
 "I have long accustomed myself to look with caution upon those who are
 ardent in the cause of the so-called 'education of the people' in the
 common meaning of the phrase; since for the most part they desire for
 themselves, consciously or unconsciously, absolutely unlimited
 freedom, which must inevitably degenerate into something resembling
 the saturnalia of barbaric times, and which the sacred hierarchy of
 nature will never grant them. They were born to serve and to obey; and
 every moment in which their limping or crawling or broken-winded
 thoughts are at work shows us clearly out of which clay nature moulded
 them, and what trade mark she branded thereon. The education of the
 masses cannot, therefore, be our aim; but rather the education of a
 few picked men for great and lasting works. We well know that a just
 posterity judges the collective intellectual state of a time only by
 those few great and lonely figures of the period, and gives its
 decision in accordance with the manner in which they are recognised,
 encouraged, and honoured, or, on the other hand, in which they are
 snubbed, elbowed aside, and kept down. What is called the 'education
 of the masses' cannot be accomplished except with difficulty; and even
 if a system of universal compulsory education be applied, they can
 only be reached outwardly: those individual lower levels where,
 generally speaking, the masses come into contact with culture, where
 the people nourishes its religious instinct, where it poetises its
 mythological images, where it keeps up its faith in its customs,
 privileges, native soil, and language--all these levels can scarcely
 be reached by direct means, and in any case only by violent
 demolition. And, in serious matters of this kind, to hasten forward
 the progress of the education of the people means simply the
 postponement of this violent demolition, and the maintenance of that
 wholesome unconsciousness, that sound sleep, of the people, without
 which counter-action and remedy no culture, with the exhausting strain
 and excitement of its own actions, can make any headway.
 
 "We know, however, what the aspiration is of those who would disturb
 the healthy slumber of the people, and continually call out to them:
 'Keep your eyes open! Be sensible! Be wise!' we know the aim of those
 who profess to satisfy excessive educational requirements by means of
 an extraordinary increase in the number of educational institutions
 and the conceited tribe of teachers originated thereby. These very
 people, using these very means, are fighting against the natural
 hierarchy in the realm of the intellect, and destroying the roots of
 all those noble and sublime plastic forces which have their material
 origin in the unconsciousness of the people, and which fittingly
 terminate in the procreation of genius and its due guidance and proper
 training. It is only in the simile of the mother that we can grasp the
 meaning and the responsibility of the true education of the people in
 respect to genius: its real origin is not to be found in such
 education; it has, so to speak, only a metaphysical source, a
 metaphysical home. But for the genius to make his appearance; for him
 to emerge from among the people; to portray the reflected picture, as
 it were, the dazzling brilliancy of the peculiar colours of this
 people; to depict the noble destiny of a people in the similitude of
 an individual in a work which will last for all time, thereby making
 his nation itself eternal, and redeeming it from the ever-shifting
 element of transient things: all this is possible for the genius only
 when he has been brought up and come to maturity in the tender care of
 the culture of a people; whilst, on the other hand, without this
 sheltering home, the genius will not, generally speaking, be able to
 rise to the height of his eternal flight, but will at an early moment,
 like a stranger weather-driven upon a bleak, snow-covered desert,
 slink away from the inhospitable land."
 
 "You astonish me with such a metaphysics of genius," said the
 teacher's companion, "and I have only a hazy conception of the
 accuracy of your similitude. On the other hand, I fully understand
 what you have said about the surplus of public schools and the
 corresponding surplus of higher grade teachers; and in this regard I
 myself have collected some information which assures me that the
 educational tendency of the public school _must_ right itself by this
 very surplus of teachers who have really nothing at all to do with
 education, and who are called into existence and pursue this path
 solely because there is a demand for them. Every man who, in an
 unexpected moment of enlightenment, has convinced himself of the
 singularity and inaccessibility of Hellenic antiquity, and has warded
 off this conviction after an exhausting struggle--every such man knows
 that the door leading to this enlightenment will never remain open to
 all comers; and he deems it absurd, yea disgraceful, to use the Greeks
 as he would any other tool he employs when following his profession or
 earning his living, shamelessly fumbling with coarse hands amidst the
 relics of these holy men. This brazen and vulgar feeling is, however,
 most common in the profession from which the largest numbers of
 teachers for the public schools are drawn, the philological
 profession, wherefore the reproduction and continuation of such a
 feeling in the public school will not surprise us.
 
 "Just look at the younger generation of philologists: how seldom we
 see in them that humble feeling that we, when compared with such a
 world as it was, have no right to exist at all: how coolly and
 fearlessly, as compared with us, did that young brood build its
 miserable nests in the midst of the magnificent temples! A powerful
 voice from every nook and cranny should ring in the ears of those who,
 from the day they begin their connection with the university, roam at
 will with such self-complacency and shamelessness among the
 awe-inspiring relics of that noble civilisation: 'Hence, ye
 uninitiated, who will never be initiated; fly away in silence and
 shame from these sacred chambers!' But this voice speaks in vain; for
 one must to some extent be a Greek to understand a Greek curse of
 excommunication. But these people I am speaking of are so barbaric
 that they dispose of these relics to suit themselves: all their modern
 conveniences and fancies are brought with them and concealed among
 those ancient pillars and tombstones, and it gives rise to great
 rejoicing when somebody finds, among the dust and cobwebs of
 antiquity, something that he himself had slyly hidden there not so
 very long before. One of them makes verses and takes care to consult
 Hesychius' Lexicon. Something there immediately assures him that he is
 destined to be an imitator of AEschylus, and leads him to believe,
 indeed, that he 'has something in common with' AEschylus: the miserable
 poetaster! Yet another peers with the suspicious eye of a policeman
 into every contradiction, even into the shadow of every
 contradiction, of which Homer was guilty: he fritters away his life in
 tearing Homeric rags to tatters and sewing them together again, rags
 that he himself was the first to filch from the poet's kingly robe. A
 third feels ill at ease when examining all the mysterious and
 orgiastic sides of antiquity: he makes up his mind once and for all to
 let the enlightened Apollo alone pass without dispute, and to see in
 the Athenian a gay and intelligent but nevertheless somewhat immoral
 Apollonian. What a deep breath he draws when he succeeds in raising
 yet another dark corner of antiquity to the level of his own
 intelligence!--when, for example, he discovers in Pythagoras a
 colleague who is as enthusiastic as himself in arguing about politics.
 Another racks his brains as to why OEdipus was condemned by fate to
 perform such abominable deeds--killing his father, marrying his
 mother. Where lies the blame! Where the poetic justice! Suddenly it
 occurs to him: OEdipus was a passionate fellow, lacking all Christian
 gentleness--he even fell into an unbecoming rage when Tiresias called
 him a monster and the curse of the whole country. Be humble and meek!
 was what Sophocles tried to teach, otherwise you will have to marry
 your mothers and kill your fathers! Others, again, pass their lives in
 counting the number of verses written by Greek and Roman poets, and
 are delighted with the proportions 7:13 = 14:26. Finally, one of them
 brings forward his solution of a question, such as the Homeric poems
 considered from the standpoint of prepositions, and thinks he has
 drawn the truth from the bottom of the well with +ana+ and +kata+. All
 of them, however, with the most widely separated aims in view, dig and
 burrow in Greek soil with a restlessness and a blundering awkwardness
 that must surely be painful to a true friend of antiquity: and thus it
 comes to pass that I should like to take by the hand every talented or
 talentless man who feels a certain professional inclination urging him
 on to the study of antiquity, and harangue him as follows: 'Young sir,
 do you know what perils threaten you, with your little stock of school
 learning, before you become a man in the full sense of the word? Have
 you heard that, according to Aristotle, it is by no means a tragic
 death to be slain by a statue? Does that surprise you? Know, then,
 that for centuries philologists have been trying, with ever-failing
 strength, to re-erect the fallen statue of Greek antiquity, but
 without success; for it is a colossus around which single individual
 men crawl like pygmies. The leverage of the united representatives of
 modern culture is utilised for the purpose; but it invariably happens
 that the huge column is scarcely more than lifted from the ground when
 it falls down again, crushing beneath its weight the luckless wights
 under it. That, however, may be tolerated, for every being must perish
 by some means or other; but who is there to guarantee that during all
 these attempts the statue itself will not break in pieces! The
 philologists are being crushed by the Greeks--perhaps we can put up
 with this--but antiquity itself threatens to be crushed by these
 philologists! Think that over, you easy-going young man; and turn
 back, lest you too should not be an iconoclast!'"
 
 "Indeed," said the philosopher, laughing, "there are many philologists
 who have turned back as you so much desire, and I notice a great
 contrast with my own youthful experience. Consciously or
 unconsciously, large numbers of them have concluded that it is
 hopeless and useless for them to come into direct contact with
 classical antiquity, hence they are inclined to look upon this study
 as barren, superseded, out-of-date. This herd has turned with much
 greater zest to the science of language: here in this wide expanse of
 virgin soil, where even the most mediocre gifts can be turned to
 account, and where a kind of insipidity and dullness is even looked
 upon as decided talent, with the novelty and uncertainty of methods
 and the constant danger of making fantastic mistakes--here, where dull
 regimental routine and discipline are desiderata--here the newcomer is
 no longer frightened by the majestic and warning voice that rises from
 the ruins of antiquity: here every one is welcomed with open arms,
 including even him who never arrived at any uncommon impression or
 noteworthy thought after a perusal of Sophocles and Aristophanes, with
 the result that they end in an etymological tangle, or are seduced
 into collecting the fragments of out-of-the-way dialects--and their
 time is spent in associating and dissociating, collecting and
 scattering, and running hither and thither consulting books. And such
 a usefully employed philologist would now fain be a teacher! He now
 undertakes to teach the youth of the public schools something about
 the ancient writers, although he himself has read them without any
 particular impression, much less with insight! What a dilemma!
 Antiquity has said nothing to him, consequently he has nothing to say
 about antiquity. A sudden thought strikes him: why is he a skilled
 philologist at all! Why did these authors write Latin and Greek! And
 with a light heart he immediately begins to etymologise with Homer,
 calling Lithuanian or Ecclesiastical Slavonic, or, above all, the
 sacred Sanskrit, to his assistance: as if Greek lessons were merely
 the excuse for a general introduction to the study of languages, and
 as if Homer were lacking in only one respect, namely, not being
 written in pre-Indogermanic. Whoever is acquainted with our present
 public schools well knows what a wide gulf separates their teachers
 from classicism, and how, from a feeling of this want, comparative
 philology and allied professions have increased their numbers to such
 an unheard-of degree."
 
 "What I mean is," said the other, "it would depend upon whether a
 teacher of classical culture did _not_ confuse his Greeks and Romans
 with the other peoples, the barbarians, whether he could _never_ put
 Greek and Latin _on a level with_ other languages: so far as his
 classicalism is concerned, it is a matter of indifference whether the
 framework of these languages concurs with or is in any way related to
 the other languages: such a concurrence does not interest him at all;
 his real concern is with _what is not common to both_, with what shows
 him that those two peoples were not barbarians as compared with the
 others--in so far, of course, as he is a true teacher of culture and
 models himself after the majestic patterns of the classics."
 
 "I may be wrong," said the philosopher, "but I suspect that, owing to
 the way in which Latin and Greek are now taught in schools, the
 accurate grasp of these languages, the ability to speak and write them
 with ease, is lost, and that is something in which my own generation
 distinguished itself--a generation, indeed, whose few survivers have
 by this time grown old; whilst, on the other hand, the present
 teachers seem to impress their pupils with the genetic and historical
 importance of the subject to such an extent that, at best, their
 scholars ultimately turn into little Sanskritists, etymological
 spitfires, or reckless conjecturers; but not one of them can read his
 Plato or Tacitus with pleasure, as we old folk can. The public schools
 may still be seats of learning: not, however of _the_ learning which,
 as it were, is only the natural and involuntary auxiliary of a culture
 that is directed towards the noblest ends; but rather of that culture
 which might be compared to the hypertrophical swelling of an unhealthy
 body. The public schools are certainly the seats of this obesity, if,
 indeed, they have not degenerated into the abodes of that elegant
 barbarism which is boasted of as being 'German culture of the
 present!'"
 
 "But," asked the other, "what is to become of that large body of
 teachers who have not been endowed with a true gift for culture, and
 who set up as teachers merely to gain a livelihood from the
 profession, because there is a demand for them, because a superfluity
 of schools brings with it a superfluity of teachers? Where shall they
 go when antiquity peremptorily orders them to withdraw? Must they not
 be sacrificed to those powers of the present who, day after day, call
 out to them from the never-ending columns of the press 'We are
 culture! We are education! We are at the zenith! We are the apexes of
 the pyramids! We are the aims of universal history!'--when they hear
 the seductive promises, when the shameful signs of non-culture, the
 plebeian publicity of the so-called 'interests of culture' are
 extolled for their benefit in magazines and newspapers as an entirely
 new and the best possible, full-grown form of culture! Whither shall
 the poor fellows fly when they feel the presentiment that these
 promises are not true--where but to the most obtuse, sterile
 scientificality, that here the shriek of culture may no longer be
 audible to them? Pursued in this way, must they not end, like the
 ostrich, by burying their heads in the sand? Is it not a real
 happiness for them, buried as they are among dialects, etymologies,
 and conjectures, to lead a life like that of the ants, even though
 they are miles removed from true culture, if only they can close their
 ears tightly and be deaf to the voice of the 'elegant' culture of the
 time."
 
 "You are right, my friend," said the philosopher, "but whence comes the
 urgent necessity for a surplus of schools for culture, which further
 gives rise to the necessity for a surplus of teachers?--when we so
 clearly see that the demand for a surplus springs from a sphere which is
 hostile to culture, and that the consequences of this surplus only lead
 to non-culture. Indeed, we can discuss this dire necessity only in so
 far as the modern State is willing to discuss these things with us, and
 is prepared to follow up its demands by force: which phenomenon
 certainly makes the same impression upon most people as if they were
 addressed by the eternal law of things. For the rest, a 'Culture-State,'
 to use the current expression, which makes such demands, is rather a
 novelty, and has only come to a 'self-understanding' within the last
 half century, _i.e._ in a period when (to use the favourite popular
 word) so many 'self-understood' things came into being, but which are in
 themselves not 'self-understood' at all. This right to higher education
 has been taken so seriously by the most powerful of modern
 States--Prussia--that the objectionable principle it has adopted, taken
 in connection with the well-known daring and hardihood of this State, is
 seen to have a menacing and dangerous consequence for the true German
 spirit; for we see endeavours being made in this quarter to raise the
 public school, formally systematised, up to the so-called 'level of the
 time.' Here is to be found all that mechanism by means of which as many
 scholars as possible are urged on to take up courses of public school
 training: here, indeed, the State has its most powerful inducement--the
 concession of certain privileges respecting military service, with the
 natural consequence that, according to the unprejudiced evidence of
 statistical officials, by this, and by this only, can we explain the
 universal congestion of all Prussian public schools, and the urgent and
 continual need for new ones. What more can the State do for a surplus of
 educational institutions than bring all the higher and the majority of
 the lower civil service appointments, the right of entry to the
 universities, and even the most influential military posts into close
 connection with the public school: and all this in a country where both
 universal military service and the highest offices of the State
 unconsciously attract all gifted natures to them. The public school is
 here looked upon as an honourable aim, and every one who feels himself
 urged on to the sphere of government will be found on his way to it.
 This is a new and quite original occurrence: the State assumes the
 attitude of a mystogogue of culture, and, whilst it promotes its own
 ends, it obliges every one of its servants not to appear in its presence
 without the torch of universal State education in their hands, by the
 flickering light of which they may again recognise the State as the
 highest goal, as the reward of all their strivings after education.
 
 "Now this last phenomenon should indeed surprise them; it should
 remind them of that allied, slowly understood tendency of a philosophy
 which was formerly promoted for reasons of State, namely, the
 tendency of the Hegelian philosophy: yea, it would perhaps be no
 exaggeration to say that, in the subordination of all strivings after
 education to reasons of State, Prussia has appropriated, with success,
 the principle and the useful heirloom of the Hegelian philosophy,
 whose apotheosis of the State in _this_ subordination certainly
 reaches its height."
 
 "But," said the philosopher's companion, "what purposes can the State
 have in view with such a strange aim? For that it has some State
 objects in view is seen in the manner in which the conditions of
 Prussian schools are admired by, meditated upon, and occasionally
 imitated by other States. These other States obviously presuppose
 something here that, if adopted, would tend towards the maintenance
 and power of the State, like our well-known and popular conscription.
 Where everyone proudly wears his soldier's uniform at regular
 intervals, where almost every one has absorbed a uniform type of
 national culture through the public schools, enthusiastic hyperboles
 may well be uttered concerning the systems employed in former times,
 and a form of State omnipotence which was attained only in antiquity,
 and which almost every young man, by both instinct and training,
 thinks it is the crowning glory and highest aim of human beings to
 reach."
 
 "Such a comparison," said the philosopher, "would be quite
 hyperbolical, and would not hobble along on one leg only. For, indeed,
 the ancient State emphatically did not share the utilitarian point of
 view of recognising as culture only what was directly useful to the
 State itself, and was far from wishing to destroy those impulses which
 did not seem to be immediately applicable. For this very reason the
 profound Greek had for the State that strong feeling of admiration and
 thankfulness which is so distasteful to modern men; because he clearly
 recognised not only that without such State protection the germs of
 his culture could not develop, but also that all his inimitable and
 perennial culture had flourished so luxuriantly under the wise and
 careful guardianship of the protection afforded by the State. The
 State was for his culture not a supervisor, regulator, and watchman,
 but a vigorous and muscular companion and friend, ready for war, who
 accompanied his noble, admired, and, as it were, ethereal friend
 through disagreeable reality, earning his thanks therefor. This,
 however, does not happen when a modern State lays claim to such hearty
 gratitude because it renders such chivalrous service to German culture
 and art: for in this regard its past is as ignominious as its present,
 as a proof of which we have but to think of the manner in which the
 memory of our great poets and artists is celebrated in German cities,
 and how the highest objects of these German masters are supported on
 the part of the State.
 
 "There must therefore be peculiar circumstances surrounding both this
 purpose towards which the State is tending, and which always promotes
 what is here called 'education'; and surrounding likewise the culture
 thus promoted, which subordinates itself to this purpose of the State.
 With the real German spirit and the education derived therefrom, such
 as I have slowly outlined for you, this purpose of the State is at
 war, hiddenly or openly: _the_ spirit of education, which is welcomed
 and encouraged with such interest by the State, and owing to which the
 schools of this country are so much admired abroad, must accordingly
 originate in a sphere that never comes into contact with this true
 German spirit: with that spirit which speaks to us so wondrously from
 the inner heart of the German Reformation, German music, and German
 philosophy, and which, like a noble exile, is regarded with such
 indifference and scorn by the luxurious education afforded by the
 State. This spirit is a stranger: it passes by in solitary sadness,
 and far away from it the censer of pseudo-culture is swung backwards
 and forwards, which, amidst the acclamations of 'educated' teachers
 and journalists, arrogates to itself its name and privileges, and
 metes out insulting treatment to the word 'German.' Why does the State
 require that surplus of educational institutions, of teachers? Why
 this education of the masses on such an extended scale? Because the
 true German spirit is hated, because the aristocratic nature of true
 culture is feared, because the people endeavour in this way to drive
 single great individuals into self-exile, so that the claims of the
 masses to education may be, so to speak, planted down and carefully
 tended, in order that the many may in this way endeavour to escape the
 rigid and strict discipline of the few great leaders, so that the
 masses may be persuaded that they can easily find the path for
 themselves--following the guiding star of the State!
 
 "A new phenomenon! The State as the guiding star of culture! In the
 meantime one thing consoles me: this German spirit, which people are
 combating so much, and for which they have substituted a gaudily
 attired _locum tenens_, this spirit is brave: it will fight and redeem
 itself into a purer age; noble, as it is now, and victorious, as it
 one day will be, it will always preserve in its mind a certain pitiful
 toleration of the State, if the latter, hard-pressed in the hour of
 extremity, secures such a pseudo-culture as its associate. For what,
 after all, do we know about the difficult task of governing men,
 _i.e._ to keep law, order, quietness, and peace among millions of
 boundlessly egoistical, unjust, unreasonable, dishonourable, envious,
 malignant, and hence very narrow-minded and perverse human beings; and
 thus to protect the few things that the State has conquered for itself
 against covetous neighbours and jealous robbers? Such a hard-pressed
 State holds out its arms to any associate, grasps at any straw; and
 when such an associate does introduce himself with flowery eloquence,
 when he adjudges the State, as Hegel did, to be an 'absolutely
 complete ethical organism,' the be-all and end-all of every one's
 education, and goes on to indicate how he himself can best promote the
 interests of the State--who will be surprised if, without further
 parley, the State falls upon his neck and cries aloud in a barbaric
 voice of full conviction: 'Yes! Thou art education! Thou art indeed
 culture!'"
 
 
 
 
 FOURTH LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 5th of March 1872._)
 
 
 LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,--Now that you have followed my tale up to this
 point, and that we have made ourselves joint masters of the solitary,
 remote, and at times abusive duologue of the philosopher and his
 companion, I sincerely hope that you, like strong swimmers, are ready
 to proceed on the second half of our journey, especially as I can
 promise you that a few other marionettes will appear in the
 puppet-play of my adventure, and that if up to the present you have
 only been able to do little more than endure what I have been telling
 you, the waves of my story will now bear you more quickly and easily
 towards the end. In other words we have now come to a turning, and it
 would be advisable for us to take a short glance backwards to see what
 we think we have gained from such a varied conversation.
 
 "Remain in your present position," the philosopher seemed to say to
 his companion, "for you may cherish hopes. It is more and more clearly
 evident that we have no educational institutions at all; but that we
 ought to have them. Our public schools--established, it would seem,
 for this high object--have either become the nurseries of a
 reprehensible culture which repels the true culture with profound
 hatred--_i.e._ a true, aristocratic culture, founded upon a few
 carefully chosen minds; or they foster a micrological and sterile
 learning which, while it is far removed from culture, has at least
 this merit, that it avoids that reprehensible culture as well as the
 true culture." The philosopher had particularly drawn his companion's
 attention to the strange corruption which must have entered into the
 heart of culture when the State thought itself capable of tyrannising
 over it and of attaining its ends through it; and further when the
 State, in conjunction with this culture, struggled against other
 hostile forces as well as against _the_ spirit which the philosopher
 ventured to call the "true German spirit." This spirit, linked to the
 Greeks by the noblest ties, and shown by its past history to have been
 steadfast and courageous, pure and lofty in its aims, its faculties
 qualifying it for the high task of freeing modern man from the curse
 of modernity--this spirit is condemned to live apart, banished from
 its inheritance. But when its slow, painful tones of woe resound
 through the desert of the present, then the overladen and gaily-decked
 caravan of culture is pulled up short, horror-stricken. We must not
 only astonish, but terrify--such was the philosopher's opinion: not to
 fly shamefully away, but to take the offensive, was his advice; but he
 especially counselled his companion not to ponder too anxiously over
 the individual from whom, through a higher instinct, this aversion for
 the present barbarism proceeded, "Let it perish: the Pythian god had
 no difficulty in finding a new tripod, a second Pythia, so long, at
 least, as the mystic cold vapours rose from the earth."
 
 The philosopher once more began to speak: "Be careful to remember, my
 friend," said he, "there are two things you must not confuse. A man
 must learn a great deal that he may live and take part in the struggle
 for existence; but everything that he as an individual learns and does
 with this end in view has nothing whatever to do with culture. This
 latter only takes its beginning in a sphere that lies far above the
 world of necessity, indigence, and struggle for existence. The
 question now is to what extent a man values his ego in comparison with
 other egos, how much of his strength he uses up in the endeavour to
 earn his living. Many a one, by stoically confining his needs within a
 narrow compass, will shortly and easily reach the sphere in which he
 may forget, and, as it were, shake off his ego, so that he can enjoy
 perpetual youth in a solar system of timeless and impersonal things.
 Another widens the scope and needs of his ego as much as possible, and
 builds the mausoleum of this ego in vast proportions, as if he were
 prepared to fight and conquer that terrible adversary, Time. In this
 instinct also we may see a longing for immortality: wealth and power,
 wisdom, presence of mind, eloquence, a flourishing outward aspect, a
 renowned name--all these are merely turned into the means by which an
 insatiable, personal will to live craves for new life, with which,
 again, it hankers after an eternity that is at last seen to be
 illusory.
 
 "But even in this highest form of the ego, in the enhanced needs of
 such a distended and, as it were, collective individual, true culture
 is never touched upon; and if, for example, art is sought after, only
 its disseminating and stimulating actions come into prominence, _i.e._
 those which least give rise to pure and noble art, and most of all to
 low and degraded forms of it. For in all his efforts, however great
 and exceptional they seem to the onlooker, he never succeeds in
 freeing himself from his own hankering and restless personality: that
 illuminated, ethereal sphere where one may contemplate without the
 obstruction of one's own personality continually recedes from him--and
 thus, let him learn, travel, and collect as he may, he must always
 live an exiled life at a remote distance from a higher life and from
 true culture. For true culture would scorn to contaminate itself with
 the needy and covetous individual; it well knows how to give the slip
 to the man who would fain employ it as a means of attaining to
 egoistic ends; and if any one cherishes the belief that he has firmly
 secured it as a means of livelihood, and that he can procure the
 necessities of life by its sedulous cultivation, then it suddenly
 steals away with noiseless steps and an air of derisive mockery.[6]
 
 "I will thus ask you, my friend, not to confound this culture, this
 sensitive, fastidious, ethereal goddess, with that useful
 maid-of-all-work which is also called 'culture,' but which is only
 the intellectual servant and counsellor of one's practical
 necessities, wants, and means of livelihood Every kind of training,
 however, which holds out the prospect of bread-winning as its end and
 aim, is not a training for culture as we understand the word; but
 merely a collection of precepts and directions to show how, in the
 struggle for existence, a man may preserve and protect his own person.
 It may be freely admitted that for the great majority of men such a
 course of instruction is of the highest importance; and the more
 arduous the struggle is the more intensely must the young man strain
 every nerve to utilise his strength to the best advantage.
 
 "But--let no one think for a moment that the schools which urge him on
 to this struggle and prepare him for it are in any way seriously to be
 considered as establishments of culture. They are institutions which
 teach one how to take part in the battle of life; whether they promise
 to turn out civil servants, or merchants, or officers, or wholesale
 dealers, or farmers, or physicians, or men with a technical training.
 The regulations and standards prevailing at such institutions differ
 from those in a true educational institution; and what in the latter
 is permitted, and even freely held out as often as possible, ought to
 be considered as a criminal offence in the former.
 
 "Let me give you an example. If you wish to guide a young man on the
 path of true culture, beware of interrupting his naive, confident,
 and, as it were, immediate and personal relationship with nature. The
 woods, the rocks, the winds, the vulture, the flowers, the butterfly,
 the meads, the mountain slopes, must all speak to him in their own
 language; in them he must, as it were, come to know himself again in
 countless reflections and images, in a variegated round of changing
 visions; and in this way he will unconsciously and gradually feel the
 metaphysical unity of all things in the great image of nature, and at
 the same time tranquillise his soul in the contemplation of her
 eternal endurance and necessity. But how many young men should be
 permitted to grow up in such close and almost personal proximity to
 nature! The others must learn another truth betimes: how to subdue
 nature to themselves. Here is an end of this naive metaphysics; and
 the physiology of plants and animals, geology, inorganic chemistry,
 force their devotees to view nature from an altogether different
 standpoint. What is lost by this new point of view is not only a
 poetical phantasmagoria, but the instinctive, true, and unique point
 of view, instead of which we have shrewd and clever calculations, and,
 so to speak, overreachings of nature. Thus to the truly cultured man
 is vouchsafed the inestimable benefit of being able to remain
 faithful, without a break, to the contemplative instincts of his
 childhood, and so to attain to a calmness, unity, consistency, and
 harmony which can never be even thought of by a man who is compelled
 to fight in the struggle for existence.
 
 "You must not think, however, that I wish to withhold all praise from
 our primary and secondary schools: I honour the seminaries where boys
 learn arithmetic and master modern languages, and study geography and
 the marvellous discoveries made in natural science. I am quite
 prepared to say further that those youths who pass through the better
 class of secondary schools are well entitled to make the claims put
 forward by the fully-fledged public school boy; and the time is
 certainly not far distant when such pupils will be everywhere freely
 admitted to the universities and positions under the government, which
 has hitherto been the case only with scholars from the public
 schools--of our present public schools, be it noted![7] I cannot,
 however, refrain from adding the melancholy reflection: if it be true
 that secondary and public schools are, on the whole, working so
 heartily in common towards the same ends, and differ from each other
 only in such a slight degree, that they may take equal rank before the
 tribunal of the State, then we completely lack another kind of
 educational institutions: those for the development of culture! To say
 the least, the secondary schools cannot be reproached with this; for
 they have up to the present propitiously and honourably followed up
 tendencies of a lower order, but one nevertheless highly necessary. In
 the public schools, however, there is very much less honesty and very
 much less ability too; for in them we find an instinctive feeling of
 shame, the unconscious perception of the fact that the whole
 institution has been ignominiously degraded, and that the sonorous
 words of wise and apathetic teachers are contradictory to the dreary,
 barbaric, and sterile reality. So there are no true cultural
 institutions! And in those very places where a pretence to culture is
 still kept up, we find the people more hopeless, atrophied, and
 discontented than in the secondary schools, where the so-called
 'realistic' subjects are taught! Besides this, only think how immature
 and uninformed one must be in the company of such teachers when one
 actually misunderstands the rigorously defined philosophical
 expressions 'real' and 'realism' to such a degree as to think them the
 contraries of mind and matter, and to interpret 'realism' as 'the road
 to knowledge, formation, and mastery of reality.'
 
 "I for my own part know of only two exact contraries: _institutions
 for teaching culture and institutions for teaching how to succeed in
 life_. All our present institutions belong to the second class; but I
 am speaking only of the first."
 
 About two hours went by while the philosophically-minded couple
 chatted about such startling questions. Night slowly fell in the
 meantime; and when in the twilight the philosopher's voice had sounded
 like natural music through the woods, it now rang out in the profound
 darkness of the night when he was speaking with excitement or even
 passionately; his tones hissing and thundering far down the valley,
 and reverberating among the trees and rocks. Suddenly he was silent:
 he had just repeated, almost pathetically, the words, "we have no true
 educational institutions; we have no true educational institutions!"
 when something fell down just in front of him--it might have been a
 fir-cone--and his dog barked and ran towards it. Thus interrupted, the
 philosopher raised his head, and suddenly became aware of the
 darkness, the cool air, and the lonely situation of himself and his
 companion. "Well! What are we about!" he ejaculated, "it's dark. You
 know whom we were expecting here; but he hasn't come. We have waited
 in vain; let us go."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I must now, ladies and gentlemen, convey to you the impressions
 experienced by my friend and myself as we eagerly listened to this
 conversation, which we heard distinctly in our hiding-place. I have
 already told you that at that place and at that hour we had intended
 to hold a festival in commemoration of something: and this something
 had to do with nothing else than matters concerning educational
 training, of which we, in our own youthful opinions, had garnered a
 plentiful harvest during our past life. We were thus disposed to
 remember with gratitude the institution which we had at one time
 thought out for ourselves at that very spot in order, as I have
 already mentioned, that we might reciprocally encourage and watch over
 one another's educational impulses. But a sudden and unexpected light
 was thrown on all that past life as we silently gave ourselves up to
 the vehement words of the philosopher. As when a traveller, walking
 heedlessly across unknown ground, suddenly puts his foot over the edge
 of a cliff, so it now seemed to us that we had hastened to meet the
 great danger rather than run away from it. Here at this spot, so
 memorable to us, we heard the warning: "Back! Not another step! Know
 you not whither your footsteps tend, whither this deceitful path is
 luring you?"
 
 It seemed to us that we now knew, and our feeling of overflowing
 thankfulness impelled us so irresistibly towards our earnest
 counsellor and trusty Eckart, that both of us sprang up at the same
 moment and rushed towards the philosopher to embrace him. He was just
 about to move off, and had already turned sideways when we rushed up
 to him. The dog turned sharply round and barked, thinking doubtless,
 like the philosopher's companion, of an attempt at robbery rather than
 an enraptured embrace. It was plain that he had forgotten us. In a
 word, he ran away. Our embrace was a miserable failure when we did
 overtake him; for my friend gave a loud yell as the dog bit him, and
 the philosopher himself sprang away from me with such force that we
 both fell. What with the dog and the men there was a scramble that
 lasted a few minutes, until my friend began to call out loudly,
 parodying the philosopher's own words: "In the name of all culture and
 pseudo-culture, what does the silly dog want with us? Hence, you
 confounded dog; you uninitiated, never to be initiated; hasten away
 from us, silent and ashamed!" After this outburst matters were cleared
 up to some extent, at any rate so far as they could be cleared up in
 the darkness of the wood. "Oh, it's you!" ejaculated the philosopher,
 "our duellists! How you startled us! What on earth drives you to jump
 out upon us like this at such a time of the night?"
 
 "Joy, thankfulness, and reverence," said we, shaking the old man by
 the hand, whilst the dog barked as if he understood, "we can't let you
 go without telling you this. And if you are to understand everything
 you must not go away just yet; we want to ask you about so many things
 that lie heavily on our hearts. Stay yet awhile; we know every foot of
 the way and can accompany you afterwards. The gentleman you expect may
 yet turn up. Look over yonder on the Rhine: what is that we see so
 clearly floating on the surface of the water as if surrounded by the
 light of many torches? It is there that we may look for your friend, I
 would even venture to say that it is he who is coming towards you with
 all those lights."
 
 And so much did we assail the surprised old man with our entreaties,
 promises, and fantastic delusions, that we persuaded the philosopher
 to walk to and fro with us on the little plateau, "by learned lumber
 undisturbed," as my friend added.
 
 "Shame on you!" said the philosopher, "if you really want to quote
 something, why choose Faust? However, I will give in to you, quotation
 or no quotation, if only our young companions will keep still and not
 run away as suddenly as they made their appearance, for they are like
 will-o'-the-wisps; we are amazed when they are there and again when
 they are not there."
 
 My friend immediately recited--
 
     Respect, I hope, will teach us how we may
     Our lighter disposition keep at bay.
     Our course is only zig-zag as a rule.
 
 The philosopher was surprised, and stood still. "You astonish me, you
 will-o'-the-wisps," he said; "this is no quagmire we are on now. Of
 what use is this ground to you? What does the proximity of a
 philosopher mean to you? For around him the air is sharp and clear,
 the ground dry and hard. You must find out a more fantastic region for
 your zig-zagging inclinations."
 
 "I think," interrupted the philosopher's companion at this point, "the
 gentlemen have already told us that they promised to meet some one
 here at this hour; but it seems to me that they listened to our comedy
 of education like a chorus, and truly 'idealistic spectators'--for
 they did not disturb us; we thought we were alone with each other."
 
 "Yes, that is true," said the philosopher, "that praise must not be
 withheld from them, but it seems to me that they deserve still higher
 praise----"
 
 Here I seized the philosopher's hand and said: "That man must be as
 obtuse as a reptile, with his stomach on the ground and his head
 buried in mud, who can listen to such a discourse as yours without
 becoming earnest and thoughtful, or even excited and indignant.
 Self-accusation and annoyance might perhaps cause a few to get angry;
 but our impression was quite different: the only thing I do not know
 is how exactly to describe it. This hour was so well-timed for us, and
 our minds were so well prepared, that we sat there like empty vessels,
 and now it seems as if we were filled to overflowing with this new
 wisdom: for I no longer know how to help myself, and if some one asked
 me what I am thinking of doing to-morrow, or what I have made up my
 mind to do with myself from now on, I should not know what to answer.
 For it is easy to see that we have up to the present been living and
 educating ourselves in the wrong way--but what can we do to cross over
 the chasm between to-day and to-morrow?"
 
 "Yes," acknowledged my friend, "I have a similar feeling, and I ask
 the same question: but besides that I feel as if I were frightened
 away from German culture by entertaining such high and ideal views of
 its task; yea, as if I were unworthy to co-operate with it in carrying
 out its aims. I only see a resplendent file of the highest natures
 moving towards this goal; I can imagine over what abysses and through
 what temptations this procession travels. Who would dare to be so bold
 as to join in it?"
 
 At this point the philosopher's companion again turned to him and
 said: "Don't be angry with me when I tell you that I too have a
 somewhat similar feeling, which I have not mentioned to you before.
 When talking to you I often felt drawn out of myself, as it were, and
 inspired with your ardour and hopes till I almost forgot myself. Then
 a calmer moment arrives; a piercing wind of reality brings me back to
 earth--and then I see the wide gulf between us, over which you
 yourself, as in a dream, draw me back again. Then what you call
 'culture' merely totters meaninglessly around me or lies heavily on my
 breast: it is like a shirt of mail that weighs me down, or a sword
 that I cannot wield."
 
 Our minds, as we thus argued with the philosopher, were unanimous,
 and, mutually encouraging and stimulating one another, we slowly
 walked with him backwards and forwards along the unencumbered space
 which had earlier in the day served us as a shooting range. And then,
 in the still night, under the peaceful light of hundreds of stars, we
 all broke out into a tirade which ran somewhat as follows:--
 
 "You have told us so much about the genius," we began, "about his
 lonely and wearisome journey through the world, as if nature never
 exhibited anything but the most diametrical contraries: in one place
 the stupid, dull masses, acting by instinct, and then, on a far higher
 and more remote plane, the great contemplating few, destined for the
 production of immortal works. But now you call these the apexes of the
 intellectual pyramid: it would, however, seem that between the broad,
 heavily burdened foundation up to the highest of the free and
 unencumbered peaks there must be countless intermediate degrees, and
 that here we must apply the saying _natura non facit saltus_. Where
 then are we to look for the beginning of what you call culture; where
 is the line of demarcation to be drawn between the spheres which are
 ruled from below upwards and those which are ruled from above
 downwards? And if it be only in connection with these exalted beings
 that true culture may be spoken of, how are institutions to be founded
 for the uncertain existence of such natures, how can we devise
 educational establishments which shall be of benefit only to these
 select few? It rather seems to us that such persons know how to find
 their own way, and that their full strength is shown in their being
 able to walk without the educational crutches necessary for other
 people, and thus undisturbed to make their way through the storm and
 stress of this rough world just like a phantom."
 
 We kept on arguing in this fashion, speaking without any great ability
 and not putting our thoughts in any special form: but the
 philosopher's companion went even further, and said to him: "Just
 think of all these great geniuses of whom we are wont to be so proud,
 looking upon them as tried and true leaders and guides of this real
 German spirit, whose names we commemorate by statues and festivals,
 and whose works we hold up with feelings of pride for the admiration
 of foreign lands--how did they obtain the education you demand for
 them, to what degree do they show that they have been nourished and
 matured by basking in the sun of national education? And yet they are
 seen to be possible, they have nevertheless become men whom we must
 honour: yea, their works themselves justify the form of the
 development of these noble spirits; they justify even a certain want
 of education for which we must make allowance owing to their country
 and the age in which they lived. How could Lessing and Winckelmann
 benefit by the German culture of their time? Even less than, or at all
 events just as little as Beethoven, Schiller, Goethe, or every one of
 our great poets and artists. It may perhaps be a law of nature that
 only the later generations are destined to know by what divine gifts
 an earlier generation was favoured."
 
 At this point the old philosopher could not control his anger, and
 shouted to his companion: "Oh, you innocent lamb of knowledge! You
 gentle sucking doves, all of you! And would you give the name of
 arguments to those distorted, clumsy, narrow-minded, ungainly,
 crippled things? Yes, I have just now been listening to the fruits of
 some of this present-day culture, and my ears are still ringing with
 the sound of historical 'self-understood' things, of over-wise and
 pitiless historical reasonings! Mark this, thou unprofaned Nature:
 thou hast grown old, and for thousands of years this starry sky has
 spanned the space above thee--but thou hast never yet heard such
 conceited and, at bottom, mischievous chatter as the talk of the
 present day! So you are proud of your poets and artists, my good
 Teutons? You point to them and brag about them to foreign countries,
 do you? And because it has given you no trouble to have them amongst
 you, you have formed the pleasant theory that you need not concern
 yourselves further with them? Isn't that so, my inexperienced
 children: they come of their own free will, the stork brings them to
 you! Who would dare to mention a midwife! You deserve an earnest
 teaching, eh? You should be proud of the fact that all the noble and
 brilliant men we have mentioned were prematurely suffocated, worn out,
 and crushed through you, through your barbarism? You think without
 shame of Lessing, who, on account of your stupidity, perished in
 battle against your ludicrous gods and idols, the evils of your
 theatres, your learned men, and your theologians, without once daring
 to lift himself to the height of that immortal flight for which he
 was brought into the world. And what are your impressions when you
 think of Winckelmann, who, that he might rid his eyes of your
 grotesque fatuousness, went to beg help from the Jesuits, and whose
 disgraceful religious conversion recoils upon you and will always
 remain an ineffaceable blemish upon you? You can even name Schiller
 without blushing! Just look at his picture! The fiery, sparkling eyes,
 looking at you with disdain, those flushed, death-like cheeks: can you
 learn nothing from all that? In him you had a beautiful and divine
 plaything, and through it was destroyed. And if it had been possible
 for you to take Goethe's friendship away from this melancholy, hasty
 life, hunted to premature death, then you would have crushed him even
 sooner than you did. You have not rendered assistance to a single one
 of our great geniuses--and now upon that fact you wish to build up the
 theory that none of them shall ever be helped in future? For each of
 them, however, up to this very moment, you have always been the
 'resistance of the stupid world' that Goethe speaks of in his
 "Epilogue to the Bell"; towards each of them you acted the part of
 apathetic dullards or jealous narrow-hearts or malignant egotists. In
 spite of you they created their immortal works, against you they
 directed their attacks, and thanks to you they died so prematurely,
 their tasks only half accomplished, blunted and dulled and shattered
 in the battle. Who can tell to what these heroic men were destined to
 attain if only that true German spirit had gathered them together
 within the protecting walls of a powerful institution?--that spirit
 which, without the help of some such institution, drags out an
 isolated, debased, and degraded existence. All those great men were
 utterly ruined; and it is only an insane belief in the Hegelian
 'reasonableness of all happenings' which would absolve you of any
 responsibility in the matter. And not those men alone! Indictments are
 pouring forth against you from every intellectual province: whether I
 look at the talents of our poets, philosophers, painters, or
 sculptors--and not only in the case of gifts of the highest order--I
 everywhere see immaturity, overstrained nerves, or prematurely
 exhausted energies, abilities wasted and nipped in the bud; I
 everywhere feel that 'resistance of the stupid world,' in other words,
 _your_ guiltiness. That is what I am talking about when I speak of
 lacking educational establishments, and why I think those which at
 present claim the name in such a pitiful condition. Whoever is pleased
 to call this an 'ideal desire,' and refers to it as 'ideal' as if he
 were trying to get rid of it by praising me, deserves the answer that
 the present system is a scandal and a disgrace, and that the man who
 asks for warmth in the midst of ice and snow must indeed get angry if
 he hears this referred to as an 'ideal desire.' The matter we are now
 discussing is concerned with clear, urgent, and palpably evident
 realities: a man who knows anything of the question feels that there
 is a need which must be seen to, just like cold and hunger. But the
 man who is not affected at all by this matter most certainly has a
 standard by which to measure the extent of his own culture, and thus
 to know what I call 'culture,' and where the line should be drawn
 between that which is ruled from below upwards and that which is ruled
 from above downwards."
 
 The philosopher seemed to be speaking very heatedly. We begged him to
 walk round with us again, since he had uttered the latter part of his
 discourse standing near the tree-stump which had served us as a
 target. For a few minutes not a word more was spoken. Slowly and
 thoughtfully we walked to and fro. We did not so much feel ashamed of
 having brought forward such foolish arguments as we felt a kind of
 restitution of our personality. After the heated and, so far as we
 were concerned, very unflattering utterance of the philosopher, we
 seemed to feel ourselves nearer to him--that we even stood in a
 personal relationship to him. For so wretched is man that he never
 feels himself brought into such close contact with a stranger as when
 the latter shows some sign of weakness, some defect. That our
 philosopher had lost his temper and made use of abusive language
 helped to bridge over the gulf created between us by our timid respect
 for him: and for the sake of the reader who feels his indignation
 rising at this suggestion let it be added that this bridge often leads
 from distant hero-worship to personal love and pity. And, after the
 feeling that our personality had been restored to us, this pity
 gradually became stronger and stronger. Why were we making this old
 man walk up and down with us between the rocks and trees at that time
 of the night? And, since he had yielded to our entreaties, why could
 we not have thought of a more modest and unassuming manner of having
 ourselves instructed, why should the three of us have contradicted him
 in such clumsy terms?
 
 For now we saw how thoughtless, unprepared, and baseless were all the
 objections we had made, and how greatly the echo of _the_ present was
 heard in them, the voice of which, in the province of culture, the old
 man would fain not have heard. Our objections, however, were not
 purely intellectual ones: our reasons for protesting against the
 philosopher's statements seemed to lie elsewhere. They arose perhaps
 from the instinctive anxiety to know whether, if the philosopher's
 views were carried into effect, our own personalities would find a
 place in the higher or lower division; and this made it necessary for
 us to find some arguments against the mode of thinking which robbed us
 of our self-styled claims to culture. People, however, should not
 argue with companions who feel the weight of an argument so
 personally; or, as the moral in our case would have been: such
 companions should not argue, should not contradict at all.
 
 So we walked on beside the philosopher, ashamed, compassionate,
 dissatisfied with ourselves, and more than ever convinced that the old
 man was right and that we had done him wrong. How remote now seemed
 the youthful dream of our educational institution; how clearly we saw
 the danger which we had hitherto escaped merely by good luck, namely,
 giving ourselves up body and soul to the educational system which
 forced itself upon our notice so enticingly, from the time when we
 entered the public schools up to that moment. How then had it come
 about that we had not taken our places in the chorus of its admirers?
 Perhaps merely because we were real students, and could still draw
 back from the rough-and-tumble, the pushing and struggling, the
 restless, ever-breaking waves of publicity, to seek refuge in our own
 little educational establishment; which, however, time would have soon
 swallowed up also.
 
 Overcome by such reflections, we were about to address the philosopher
 again, when he suddenly turned towards us, and said in a softer tone--
 
 "I cannot be surprised if you young men behave rashly and
 thoughtlessly; for it is hardly likely that you have ever seriously
 considered what I have just said to you. Don't be in a hurry; carry
 this question about with you, but do at any rate consider it day and
 night. For you are now at the parting of the ways, and now you know
 where each path leads. If you take the one, your age will receive you
 with open arms, you will not find it wanting in honours and
 decorations: you will form units of an enormous rank and file; and
 there will be as many people like-minded standing behind you as in
 front of you. And when the leader gives the word it will be re-echoed
 from rank to rank. For here your first duty is this: to fight in rank
 and file; and your second: to annihilate all those who refuse to form
 part of the rank and file. On the other path you will have but few
 fellow-travellers: it is more arduous, winding and precipitous; and
 those who take the first path will mock you, for your progress is more
 wearisome, and they will try to lure you over into their own ranks.
 When the two paths happen to cross, however, you will be roughly
 handled and thrust aside, or else shunned and isolated.
 
 "Now, take these two parties, so different from each other in every
 respect, and tell me what meaning an educational establishment would
 have for them. That enormous horde, crowding onwards on the first path
 towards its goal, would take the term to mean an institution by which
 each of its members would become duly qualified to take his place in
 the rank and file, and would be purged of everything which might tend
 to make him strive after higher and more remote aims. I don't deny, of
 course, that they can find pompous words with which to describe their
 aims: for example, they speak of the 'universal development of free
 personality upon a firm social, national, and human basis,' or they
 announce as their goal: 'The founding of the peaceful sovereignty of
 the people upon reason, education, and justice.'
 
 "An educational establishment for the other and smaller company,
 however, would be something vastly different. They would employ it to
 prevent themselves from being separated from one another and
 overwhelmed by the first huge crowd, to prevent their few select
 spirits from losing sight of their splendid and noble task through
 premature weariness, or from being turned aside from the true path,
 corrupted, or subverted. These select spirits must complete their
 work: that is the _raison d'etre_ of their common institution--a work,
 indeed, which, as it were, must be free from subjective traces, and
 must further rise above the transient events of future times as the
 pure reflection of the eternal and immutable essence of things. And
 all those who occupy places in that institution must co-operate in the
 endeavour to engender men of genius by this purification from
 subjectiveness and the creation of the works of genius. Not a few,
 even of those whose talents may be of the second or third order, are
 suited to such co-operation, and only when serving in such an
 educational establishment as this do they feel that they are truly
 carrying out their life's task. But now it is just these talents I
 speak of which are drawn away from the true path, and their instincts
 estranged, by the continual seductions of that modern 'culture.'
 
 "The egotistic emotions, weaknesses, and vanities of these few select
 minds are continually assailed by the temptations unceasingly murmured
 into their ears by the spirit of the age: 'Come with me! There you are
 servants, retainers, tools, eclipsed by higher natures; your own
 peculiar characteristics never have free play; you are tied down,
 chained down, like slaves; yea, like automata: here, with me, you will
 enjoy the freedom of your own personalities, as masters should, your
 talents will cast their lustre on yourselves alone, with their aid you
 may come to the very front rank; an innumerable train of followers
 will accompany you, and the applause of public opinion will yield you
 more pleasure than a nobly-bestowed commendation from the height of
 genius.' Even the very best of men now yield to these temptations: and
 it cannot be said that the deciding factor here is the degree of
 talent, or whether a man is accessible to these voices or not; but
 rather the degree and the height of a certain moral sublimity, the
 instinct towards heroism, towards sacrifice--and finally a positive,
 habitual need of culture, prepared by a proper kind of education,
 which education, as I have previously said, is first and foremost
 obedience and submission to the discipline of genius. Of this
 discipline and submission, however, the present institutions called by
 courtesy 'educational establishments' know nothing whatever, although
 I have no doubt that the public school was originally intended to be
 an institution for sowing the seeds of true culture, or at least as a
 preparation for it. I have no doubt, either, that they took the first
 bold steps in the wonderful and stirring times of the Reformation, and
 that afterwards, in the era which gave birth to Schiller and Goethe,
 there was again a growing demand for culture, like the first
 protuberance of that wing spoken of by Plato in the _Phaedrus_, which,
 at every contact with the beautiful, bears the soul aloft into the
 upper regions, the habitations of the gods."
 
 "Ah," began the philosopher's companion, "when you quote the divine
 Plato and the world of ideas, I do not think you are angry with me,
 however much my previous utterance may have merited your disapproval
 and wrath. As soon as you speak of it, I feel that Platonic wing
 rising within me; and it is only at intervals, when I act as the
 charioteer of my soul, that I have any difficulty with the resisting
 and unwilling horse that Plato has also described to us, the
 'crooked, lumbering animal, put together anyhow, with a short, thick
 neck; flat-faced, and of a dark colour, with grey eyes and blood-red
 complexion; the mate of insolence and pride, shag-eared and deaf,
 hardly yielding to whip or spur.'[8] Just think how long I have lived
 at a distance from you, and how all those temptations you speak of
 have endeavoured to lure me away, not perhaps without some success,
 even though I myself may not have observed it. I now see more clearly
 than ever the necessity for an institution which will enable us to
 live and mix freely with the few men of true culture, so that we may
 have them as our leaders and guiding stars. How greatly I feel the
 danger of travelling alone! And when it occurred to me that I could
 save myself by flight from all contact with the spirit of the time, I
 found that this flight itself was a mere delusion. Continuously, with
 every breath we take, some amount of that atmosphere circulates
 through every vein and artery, and no solitude is lonesome or distant
 enough for us to be out of reach of its fogs and clouds. Whether in
 the guise of hope, doubt, profit, or virtue, the shades of that
 culture hover about us; and we have been deceived by that jugglery
 even here in the presence of a true hermit of culture. How steadfastly
 and faithfully must the few followers of that culture--which might
 almost be called sectarian--be ever on the alert! How they must
 strengthen and uphold one another! How adversely would any errors be
 criticised here, and how sympathetically excused! And thus, teacher, I
 ask you to pardon me, after you have laboured so earnestly to set me
 in the right path!"
 
 "You use a language which I do not care for, my friend," said the
 philosopher, "and one which reminds me of a diocesan conference. With
 that I have nothing to do. But your Platonic horse pleases me, and on
 its account you shall be forgiven. I am willing to exchange my own
 animal for yours. But it is getting chilly, and I don't feel inclined
 to walk about any more just now. The friend I was waiting for is
 indeed foolish enough to come up here even at midnight if he promised
 to do so. But I have waited in vain for the signal agreed upon; and I
 cannot guess what has delayed him. For as a rule he is punctual, as we
 old men are wont, to be, something that you young men nowadays look
 upon as old-fashioned. But he has left me in the lurch for once: how
 annoying it is! Come away with me! It's time to go!"
 
 At this moment something happened.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [6] It will be apparent from these words that Nietzsche is still under
 the influence of Schopenhauer.--TR.
 
 [7] This prophecy has come true.--TR.
 
 [8] _Phaedrus_; Jowett's translation.
 
 
 
 
 FIFTH LECTURE.
 
 (_Delivered on the 23rd of March 1872._)
 
 
 LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,--If you have lent a sympathetic ear to what I
 have told you about the heated argument of our philosopher in the
 stillness of that memorable night, you must have felt as disappointed
 as we did when he announced his peevish intention. You will remember
 that he had suddenly told us he wished to go; for, having been left in
 the lurch by his friend in the first place, and, in the second, having
 been bored rather than animated by the remarks addressed to him by his
 companion and ourselves when walking backwards and forwards on the
 hillside, he now apparently wanted to put an end to what appeared to
 him to be a useless discussion. It must have seemed to him that his
 day had been lost, and he would have liked to blot it out of his
 memory, together with the recollection of ever having made our
 acquaintance. And we were thus rather unwillingly preparing to depart
 when something else suddenly brought him to a standstill, and the foot
 he had just raised sank hesitatingly to the ground again.
 
 A coloured flame, making a crackling noise for a few seconds,
 attracted our attention from the direction of the Rhine; and
 immediately following upon this we heard a slow, harmonious call,
 quite in tune, although plainly the cry of numerous youthful voices.
 "That's his signal," exclaimed the philosopher, "so my friend is
 really coming, and I haven't waited for nothing, after all. It will be
 a midnight meeting indeed--but how am I to let him know that I am
 still here? Come! Your pistols; let us see your talent once again! Did
 you hear the severe rhythm of that melody saluting us? Mark it well,
 and answer it in the same rhythm by a series of shots."
 
 This was a task well suited to our tastes and abilities; so we loaded
 up as quickly as we could and pointed our weapons at the brilliant
 stars in the heavens, whilst the echo of that piercing cry died away
 in the distance. The reports of the first, second, and third shots
 sounded sharply in the stillness; and then the philosopher cried
 "False time!" as our rhythm was suddenly interrupted: for, like a
 lightning flash, a shooting star tore its way across the clouds after
 the third report, and almost involuntarily our fourth and fifth shots
 were sent after it in the direction it had taken.
 
 "False time!" said the philosopher again, "who told you to shoot
 stars! They can fall well enough without you! People should know what
 they want before they begin to handle weapons."
 
 And then we once more heard that loud melody from the waters of the
 Rhine, intoned by numerous and strong voices. "They understand us,"
 said the philosopher, laughing, "and who indeed could resist when
 such a dazzling phantom comes within range?" "Hush!" interrupted his
 friend, "what sort of a company can it be that returns the signal to
 us in such a way? I should say they were between twenty and forty
 strong, manly voices in that crowd--and where would such a number come
 from to greet us? They don't appear to have left the opposite bank of
 the Rhine yet; but at any rate we must have a look at them from our
 own side of the river. Come along, quickly!"
 
 We were then standing near the top of the hill, you may remember, and
 our view of the river was interrupted by a dark, thick wood. On the
 other hand, as I have told you, from the quiet little spot which we
 had left we could have a better view than from the little plateau on
 the hillside; and the Rhine, with the island of Nonnenwoerth in the
 middle, was just visible to the beholder who peered over the
 tree-tops. We therefore set off hastily towards this little spot,
 taking care, however, not to go too quickly for the philosopher's
 comfort. The night was pitch dark, and we seemed to find our way by
 instinct rather than by clearly distinguishing the path, as we walked
 down with the philosopher in the middle.
 
 We had scarcely reached our side of the river when a broad and fiery,
 yet dull and uncertain light shot up, which plainly came from the
 opposite side of the Rhine. "Those are torches," I cried, "there is
 nothing surer than that my comrades from Bonn are over yonder, and
 that your friend must be with them. It is they who sang that peculiar
 song, and they have doubtless accompanied your friend here. See!
 Listen! They are putting off in little boats. The whole torchlight
 procession will have arrived here in less than half an hour."
 
 The philosopher jumped back. "What do you say?" he ejaculated, "your
 comrades from Bonn--students--can my friend have come here with
 _students_?"
 
 This question, uttered almost wrathfully, provoked us. "What's your
 objection to students?" we demanded; but there was no answer. It was
 only after a pause that the philosopher slowly began to speak, not
 addressing us directly, as it were, but rather some one in the
 distance: "So, my friend, even at midnight, even on the top of a
 lonely mountain, we shall not be alone; and you yourself are bringing
 a pack of mischief-making students along with you, although you well
 know that I am only too glad to get out of the way of _hoc genus
 omne_. I don't quite understand you, my friend: it must mean something
 when we arrange to meet after a long separation at such an
 out-of-the-way place and at such an unusual hour. Why should we want a
 crowd of witnesses--and such witnesses! What calls us together to-day
 is least of all a sentimental, soft-hearted necessity; for both of us
 learnt early in life to live alone in dignified isolation. It was not
 for our own sakes, not to show our tender feelings towards each other,
 or to perform an unrehearsed act of friendship, that we decided to
 meet here; but that here, where I once came suddenly upon you as you
 sat in majestic solitude, we might earnestly deliberate with each
 other like knights of a new order. Let them listen to us who can
 understand us; but why should you bring with you a throng of people
 who don't understand us! I don't know what you mean by such a thing,
 my friend!"
 
 We did not think it proper to interrupt the dissatisfied old grumbler;
 and as he came to a melancholy close we did not dare to tell him how
 greatly this distrustful repudiation of students vexed us.
 
 At last the philosopher's companion turned to him and said: "I am
 reminded of the fact that even you at one time, before I made your
 acquaintance, occupied posts in several universities, and that reports
 concerning your intercourse with the students and your methods of
 instruction at the time are still in circulation. From the tone of
 resignation in which you have just referred to students many would be
 inclined to think that you had some peculiar experiences which were
 not at all to your liking; but personally I rather believe that you
 saw and experienced in such places just what every one else saw and
 experienced in them, but that you judged what you saw and felt more
 justly and severely than any one else. For, during the time I have
 known you, I have learnt that the most noteworthy, instructive, and
 decisive experiences and events in one's life are those which are of
 daily occurrence; that the greatest riddle, displayed in full view of
 all, is seen by the fewest to be the greatest riddle, and that these
 problems are spread about in every direction, under the very feet of
 the passers-by, for the few real philosophers to lift up carefully,
 thenceforth to shine as diamonds of wisdom. Perhaps, in the short time
 now left us before the arrival of your friend, you will be good enough
 to tell us something of your experiences of university life, so as to
 close the circle of observations, to which we were involuntarily
 urged, respecting our educational institutions. We may also be allowed
 to remind you that you, at an earlier stage of your remarks, gave me
 the promise that you would do so. Starting with the public school, you
 claimed for it an extraordinary importance: all other institutions
 must be judged by its standard, according as its aim has been
 proposed; and, if its aim happens to be wrong, all the others have to
 suffer. Such an importance cannot now be adopted by the universities
 as a standard; for, by their present system of grouping, they would be
 nothing more than institutions where public school students might go
 through finishing courses. You promised me that you would explain this
 in greater detail later on: perhaps our student friends can bear
 witness to that, if they chanced to overhear that part of our
 conversation."
 
 "We can testify to that," I put in. The philosopher then turned to us
 and said: "Well, if you really did listen attentively, perhaps you can
 now tell me what you understand by the expression 'the present aim of
 our public schools.' Besides, you are still near enough to this sphere
 to judge my opinions by the standard of your own impressions and
 experiences."
 
 My friend instantly answered, quickly and smartly, as was his habit,
 in the following words: "Until now we had always thought that the sole
 object of the public school was to prepare students for the
 universities. This preparation, however, should tend to make us
 independent enough for the extraordinarily free position of a
 university student;[9] for it seems to me that a student, to a greater
 extent than any other individual, has more to decide and settle for
 himself. He must guide himself on a wide, utterly unknown path for
 many years, so the public school must do its best to render him
 independent."
 
 I continued the argument where my friend left off. "It even seems to
 me," I said, "that everything for which you have justly blamed the
 public school is only a necessary means employed to imbue the youthful
 student with some kind of independence, or at all events with the
 belief that there is such a thing. The teaching of German composition
 must be at the service of this independence: the individual must enjoy
 his opinions and carry out his designs early, so that he may be able
 to travel alone and without crutches. In this way he will soon be
 encouraged to produce original work, and still sooner to take up
 criticism and analysis. If Latin and Greek studies prove insufficient
 to make a student an enthusiastic admirer of antiquity, the methods
 with which such studies are pursued are at all events sufficient to
 awaken the scientific sense, the desire for a more strict causality of
 knowledge, the passion for finding out and inventing. Only think how
 many young men may be lured away for ever to the attractions of
 science by a new reading of some sort which they have snatched up with
 youthful hands at the public school! The public school boy must learn
 and collect a great deal of varied information: hence an impulse will
 gradually be created, accompanied with which he will continue to learn
 and collect independently at the university. We believe, in short,
 that the aim of the public school is to prepare and accustom the
 student always to live and learn independently afterwards, just as
 beforehand he must live and learn dependently at the public school."
 
 The philosopher laughed, not altogether good-naturedly, and said: "You
 have just given me a fine example of that independence. And it is this
 very independence that shocks me so much, and makes any place in the
 neighbourhood of present-day students so disagreeable to me. Yes, my
 good friends, you are perfect, you are mature; nature has cast you and
 broken up the moulds, and your teachers must surely gloat over you.
 What liberty, certitude, and independence of judgment; what novelty
 and freshness of insight! You sit in judgment--and the cultures of all
 ages run away. The scientific sense is kindled, and rises out of you
 like a flame--let people be careful, lest you set them alight! If I go
 further into the question and look at your professors, I again find
 the same independence in a greater and even more charming degree:
 never was there a time so full of the most sublime independent folk,
 never was slavery more detested, the slavery of education and culture
 included.
 
 "Permit me, however, to measure this independence of yours by the
 standard of this culture, and to consider your university as an
 educational institution and nothing else. If a foreigner desires to
 know something of the methods of our universities, he asks first of
 all with emphasis: 'How is the student connected with the university?'
 We answer: 'By the ear, as a hearer.' The foreigner is astonished.
 'Only by the ear?' he repeats. 'Only by the ear,' we again reply. The
 student hears. When he speaks, when he sees, when he is in the company
 of his companions when he takes up some branch of art: in short, when
 he _lives_ he is independent, _i.e._ not dependent upon the
 educational institution. The student very often writes down something
 while he hears; and it is only at these rare moments that he hangs to
 the umbilical cord of his alma mater. He himself may choose what he is
 to listen to; he is not bound to believe what is said; he may close
 his ears if he does not care to hear. This is the 'acroamatic' method
 of teaching.
 
 "The teacher, however, speaks to these listening students. Whatever
 else he may think and do is cut off from the student's perception by
 an immense gap. The professor often reads when he is speaking. As a
 rule he wishes to have as many hearers as possible; he is not content
 to have a few, and he is never satisfied with one only. One speaking
 mouth, with many ears, and half as many writing hands--there you have
 to all appearances, the external academical apparatus; the university
 engine of culture set in motion. Moreover, the proprietor of this one
 mouth is severed from and independent of the owners of the many ears;
 and this double independence is enthusiastically designated as
 'academical freedom.' And again, that this freedom may be broadened
 still more, the one may speak what he likes and the other may hear
 what he likes; except that, behind both of them, at a modest distance,
 stands the State, with all the intentness of a supervisor, to remind
 the professors and students from time to time that _it_ is the aim,
 the goal, the be-all and end-all, of this curious speaking and hearing
 procedure.
 
 "We, who must be permitted to regard this phenomenon merely as an
 educational institution, will then inform the inquiring foreigner that
 what is called 'culture' in our universities merely proceeds from the
 mouth to the ear, and that every kind of training for culture is, as I
 said before, merely 'acroamatic.' Since, however, not only the
 hearing, but also the choice of what to hear is left to the
 independent decision of the liberal-minded and unprejudiced student,
 and since, again, he can withhold all belief and authority from what
 he hears, all training for culture, in the true sense of the term,
 reverts to himself; and the independence it was thought desirable to
 aim at in the public school now presents itself with the highest
 possible pride as 'academical self-training for culture,' and struts
 about in its brilliant plumage.
 
 "Happy times, when youths are clever and cultured enough to teach
 themselves how to walk! Unsurpassable public schools, which succeed in
 implanting independence in the place of the dependence, discipline,
 subordination, and obedience implanted by former generations that
 thought it their duty to drive away all the bumptiousness of
 independence! Do you clearly see, my good friends, why I, from the
 standpoint of culture, regard the present type of university as a mere
 appendage to the public school? The culture instilled by the public
 school passes through the gates of the university as something ready
 and entire, and with its own particular claims: _it_ demands, it gives
 laws, it sits in judgment. Do not, then, let yourselves be deceived in
 regard to the cultured student; for he, in so far as he thinks he has
 absorbed the blessings of education, is merely the public school boy
 as moulded by the hands of his teacher: one who, since his academical
 isolation, and after he has left the public school, has therefore been
 deprived of all further guidance to culture, that from now on he may
 begin to live by himself and be free.
 
 "Free! Examine this freedom, ye observers of human nature! Erected
 upon the sandy, crumbling foundation of our present public school
 culture, its building slants to one side, trembling before the
 whirlwind's blast. Look at the free student, the herald of
 self-culture: guess what his instincts are; explain him from his
 needs! How does his culture appear to you when you measure it by three
 graduated scales: first, by his need for philosophy; second, by his
 instinct for art; and third, by Greek and Roman antiquity as the
 incarnate categorical imperative of all culture?
 
 "Man is so much encompassed about by the most serious and difficult
 problems that, when they are brought to his attention in the right
 way, he is impelled betimes towards a lasting kind of philosophical
 wonder, from which alone, as a fruitful soil, a deep and noble culture
 can grow forth. His own experiences lead him most frequently to the
 consideration of these problems; and it is especially in the
 tempestuous period of youth that every personal event shines with a
 double gleam, both as the exemplification of a triviality and, at the
 same time, of an eternally surprising problem, deserving of
 explanation. At this age, which, as it were, sees his experiences
 encircled with metaphysical rainbows, man is, in the highest degree,
 in need of a guiding hand, because he has suddenly and almost
 instinctively convinced himself of the ambiguity of existence, and has
 lost the firm support of the beliefs he has hitherto held.
 
 "This natural state of great need must of course be looked upon as the
 worst enemy of that beloved independence for which the cultured youth
 of the present day should be trained. All these sons of the present,
 who have raised the banner of the 'self-understood,' are therefore
 straining every nerve to crush down these feelings of youth, to
 cripple them, to mislead them, or to stop their growth altogether;
 and the favourite means employed is to paralyse that natural
 philosophic impulse by the so-called "historical culture." A still
 recent system,[10] which has won for itself a world-wide scandalous
 reputation, has discovered the formula for this self-destruction of
 philosophy; and now, wherever the historical view of things is found,
 we can see such a naive recklessness in bringing the irrational to
 'rationality' and 'reason' and making black look like white, that one
 is even inclined to parody Hegel's phrase and ask: 'Is all this
 irrationality real?' Ah, it is only the irrational that now seems to
 be 'real,' _i.e._ really doing something; and to bring this kind of
 reality forward for the elucidation of history is reckoned as true
 'historical culture.' It is into this that the philosophical impulse
 of our time has pupated itself; and the peculiar philosophers of our
 universities seem to have conspired to fortify and confirm the young
 academicians in it.
 
 "It has thus come to pass that, in place of a profound interpretation
 of the eternally recurring problems, a historical--yea, even
 philological--balancing and questioning has entered into the
 educational arena: what this or that philosopher has or has not
 thought; whether this or that essay or dialogue is to be ascribed to
 him or not; or even whether this particular reading of a classical
 text is to be preferred to that. It is to neutral preoccupations with
 philosophy like these that our students in philosophical seminaries
 are stimulated; whence I have long accustomed myself to regard such
 science as a mere ramification of philology, and to value its
 representatives in proportion as they are good or bad philologists. So
 it has come about that _philosophy itself_ is banished from the
 universities: wherewith our first question as to the value of our
 universities from the standpoint of culture is answered.
 
 "In what relationship these universities stand to _art_ cannot be
 acknowledged without shame: in none at all. Of artistic thinking,
 learning, striving, and comparison, we do not find in them a single
 trace; and no one would seriously think that the voice of the
 universities would ever be raised to help the advancement of the
 higher national schemes of art. Whether an individual teacher feels
 himself to be personally qualified for art, or whether a professorial
 chair has been established for the training of aestheticising literary
 historians, does not enter into the question at all: the fact remains
 that the university is not in a position to control the young
 academician by severe artistic discipline, and that it must let happen
 what happens, willy-nilly--and this is the cutting answer to the
 immodest pretensions of the universities to represent themselves as
 the highest educational institutions.
 
 "We find our academical 'independents' growing up without philosophy
 and without art; and how can they then have any need to 'go in for'
 the Greeks and Romans?--for we need now no longer pretend, like our
 forefathers, to have any great regard for Greece and Rome, which,
 besides, sit enthroned in almost inaccessible loneliness and majestic
 alienation. The universities of the present time consequently give no
 heed to almost extinct educational predilections like these, and found
 their philological chairs for the training of new and exclusive
 generations of philologists, who on their part give similar
 philological preparation in the public schools--a vicious circle which
 is useful neither to philologists nor to public schools, but which
 above all accuses the university for the third time of not being what
 it so pompously proclaims itself to be--a training ground for culture.
 Take away the Greeks, together with philosophy and art, and what
 ladder have you still remaining by which to ascend to culture? For, if
 you attempt to clamber up the ladder without these helps, you must
 permit me to inform you that all your learning will lie like a heavy
 burden on your shoulders rather than furnishing you with wings and
 bearing you aloft.
 
 "If you honest thinkers have honourably remained in these three stages
 of intelligence, and have perceived that, in comparison with the
 Greeks, the modern student is unsuited to and unprepared for
 philosophy, that he has no truly artistic instincts, and is merely a
 barbarian believing himself to be free, you will not on this account
 turn away from him in disgust, although you will, of course, avoid
 coming into too close proximity with him. For, as he now is, _he is
 not to blame_: as you have perceived him he is the dumb but terrible
 accuser of those who are to blame.
 
 "You should understand the secret language spoken by this guilty
 innocent, and then you, too, would learn to understand the inward
 state of that independence which is paraded outwardly with so much
 ostentation. Not one of these noble, well-qualified youths has
 remained a stranger to that restless, tiring, perplexing, and
 debilitating need of culture: during his university term, when he is
 apparently the only free man in a crowd of servants and officials, he
 atones for this huge illusion of freedom by ever-growing inner doubts
 and convictions. He feels that he can neither lead nor help himself;
 and then he plunges hopelessly into the workaday world and endeavours
 to ward off such feelings by study. The most trivial bustle fastens
 itself upon him; he sinks under his heavy burden. Then he suddenly
 pulls himself together; he still feels some of that power within him
 which would have enabled him to keep his head above water. Pride and
 noble resolutions assert themselves and grow in him. He is afraid of
 sinking at this early stage into the limits of a narrow profession;
 and now he grasps at pillars and railings alongside the stream that he
 may not be swept away by the current. In vain! for these supports give
 way, and he finds he has clutched at broken reeds. In low and
 despondent spirits he sees his plans vanish away in smoke. His
 condition is undignified, even dreadful: he keeps between the two
 extremes of work at high pressure and a state of melancholy
 enervation. Then he becomes tired, lazy, afraid of work, fearful of
 everything great; and hating himself. He looks into his own breast,
 analyses his faculties, and finds he is only peering into hollow and
 chaotic vacuity. And then he once more falls from the heights of his
 eagerly-desired self-knowledge into an ironical scepticism. He divests
 his struggles of their real importance, and feels himself ready to
 undertake any class of useful work, however degrading. He now seeks
 consolation in hasty and incessant action so as to hide himself from
 himself. And thus his helplessness and the want of a leader towards
 culture drive him from one form of life into another: but doubt,
 elevation, worry, hope, despair--everything flings him hither and
 thither as a proof that all the stars above him by which he could have
 guided his ship have set.
 
 "There you have the picture of this glorious independence of yours, of
 that academical freedom, reflected in the highest minds--those which
 are truly in need of culture, compared with whom that other crowd of
 indifferent natures does not count at all, natures that delight in
 their freedom in a purely barbaric sense. For these latter show by
 their base smugness and their narrow professional limitations that
 this is the right element for them: against which there is nothing to
 be said. Their comfort, however, does not counter-balance the
 suffering of one single young man who has an inclination for culture
 and feels the need of a guiding hand, and who at last, in a moment of
 discontent, throws down the reins and begins to despise himself. This
 is the guiltless innocent; for who has saddled him with the
 unbearable burden of standing alone? Who has urged him on to
 independence at an age when one of the most natural and peremptory
 needs of youth is, so to speak, a self-surrendering to great leaders
 and an enthusiastic following in the footsteps of the masters?
 
 "It is repulsive to consider the effects to which the violent
 suppression of such noble natures may lead. He who surveys the
 greatest supporters and friends of that pseudo-culture of the present
 time, which I so greatly detest, will only too frequently find among
 them such degenerate and shipwrecked men of culture, driven by inward
 despair to violent enmity against culture, when, in a moment of
 desperation, there was no one at hand to show them how to attain it.
 It is not the worst and most insignificant people whom we afterwards
 find acting as journalists and writers for the press in the
 metamorphosis of despair: the spirit of some well-known men of letters
 might even be described, and justly, as degenerate studentdom. How
 else, for example, can we reconcile that once well-known 'young
 Germany' with its present degenerate successors? Here we discover a
 need of culture which, so to speak, has grown mutinous, and which
 finally breaks out into the passionate cry: I am culture! There,
 before the gates of the public schools and universities, we can see
 the culture which has been driven like a fugitive away from these
 institutions. True, this culture is without the erudition of those
 establishments, but assumes nevertheless the mien of a sovereign; so
 that, for example, Gutzkow the novelist might be pointed to as the
 best example of a modern public school boy turned aesthete. Such a
 degenerate man of culture is a serious matter, and it is a horrifying
 spectacle for us to see that all our scholarly and journalistic
 publicity bears the stigma of this degeneracy upon it. How else can we
 do justice to our learned men, who pay untiring attention to, and even
 co-operate in the journalistic corruption of the people, how else than
 by the acknowledgment that their learning must fill a want of their
 own similar to that filled by novel-writing in the case of others:
 _i.e._ a flight from one's self, an ascetic extirpation of their
 cultural impulses, a desperate attempt to annihilate their own
 individuality. From our degenerate literary art, as also from that
 itch for scribbling of our learned men which has now reached such
 alarming proportions, wells forth the same sigh: Oh that we could
 forget ourselves! The attempt fails: memory, not yet suffocated by the
 mountains of printed paper under which it is buried, keeps on
 repeating from time to time: 'A degenerate man of culture! Born for
 culture and brought up to non-culture! Helpless barbarian, slave of
 the day, chained to the present moment, and thirsting for
 something--ever thirsting!'
 
 "Oh, the miserable guilty innocents! For they lack something, a need
 that every one of them must have felt: a real educational institution,
 which could give them goals, masters, methods, companions; and from
 the midst of which the invigorating and uplifting breath of the true
 German spirit would inspire them. Thus they perish in the wilderness;
 thus they degenerate into enemies of that spirit which is at bottom
 closely allied to their own; thus they pile fault upon fault higher
 than any former generation ever did, soiling the clean, desecrating
 the holy, canonising the false and spurious. It is by them that you
 can judge the educational strength of our universities, asking
 yourselves, in all seriousness, the question: What cause did you
 promote through them? The German power of invention, the noble German
 desire for knowledge, the qualifying of the German for diligence and
 self-sacrifice--splendid and beautiful things, which other nations
 envy you; yea, the finest and most magnificent things in the world, if
 only that true German spirit overspread them like a dark thundercloud,
 pregnant with the blessing of forthcoming rain. But you are afraid of
 this spirit, and it has therefore come to pass that a cloud of another
 sort has thrown a heavy and oppressive atmosphere around your
 universities, in which your noble-minded scholars breathe wearily and
 with difficulty.
 
 "A tragic, earnest, and instructive attempt was made in the present
 century to destroy the cloud I have last referred to, and also to turn
 the people's looks in the direction of the high welkin of the German
 spirit. In all the annals of our universities we cannot find any trace
 of a second attempt, and he who would impressively demonstrate what is
 now necessary for us will never find a better example. I refer to the
 old, primitive _Burschenschaft_.[11]
 
 "When the war of liberation was over, the young student brought back
 home the unlooked-for and worthiest trophy of battle--the freedom of
 his fatherland. Crowned with this laurel he thought of something still
 nobler. On returning to the university, and finding that he was
 breathing heavily, he became conscious of that oppressive and
 contaminated air which overhung the culture of the university. He
 suddenly saw, with horror-struck, wide-open eyes, the non-German
 barbarism, hiding itself in the guise of all kinds of scholasticism;
 he suddenly discovered that his own leaderless comrades were abandoned
 to a repulsive kind of youthful intoxication. And he was exasperated.
 He rose with the same aspect of proud indignation as Schiller may have
 had when reciting the _Robbers_ to his companions: and if he had
 prefaced his drama with the picture of a lion, and the motto, 'in
 tyrannos,' his follower himself was that very lion preparing to
 spring; and every 'tyrant' began to tremble. Yes, if these indignant
 youths were looked at superficially and timorously, they would seem to
 be little else than Schiller's robbers: their talk sounded so wild to
 the anxious listener that Rome and Sparta seemed mere nunneries
 compared with these new spirits. The consternation raised by these
 young men was indeed far more general than had ever been caused by
 those other 'robbers' in court circles, of which a German prince,
 according to Goethe, is said to have expressed the opinion: 'If he had
 been God, and had foreseen the appearance of the _Robbers_, he would
 not have created the world.'
 
 "Whence came the incomprehensible intensity of this alarm? For those
 young men were the bravest, purest, and most talented of the band both
 in dress and habits: they were distinguished by a magnanimous
 recklessness and a noble simplicity. A divine command bound them
 together to seek harder and more pious superiority: what could be
 feared from them? To what extent this fear was merely deceptive or
 simulated or really true is something that will probably never be
 exactly known; but a strong instinct spoke out of this fear and out of
 its disgraceful and senseless persecution. This instinct hated the
 Burschenschaft with an intense hatred for two reasons: first of all on
 account of its organisation, as being the first attempt to construct a
 true educational institution, and, secondly, on account of the spirit
 of this institution, that earnest, manly, stern, and daring German
 spirit; that spirit of the miner's son, Luther, which has come down to
 us unbroken from the time of the Reformation.
 
 "Think of the _fate_ of the Burschenschaft when I ask you, Did the
 German university then understand that spirit, as even the German
 princes in their hatred appear to have understood it? Did the alma
 mater boldly and resolutely throw her protecting arms round her noble
 sons and say: 'You must kill me first, before you touch my children?'
 I hear your answer--by it you may judge whether the German university
 is an educational institution or not.
 
 "The student knew at that time at what depth a true educational
 institution must take root, namely, in an inward renovation and
 inspiration of the purest moral faculties. And this must always be
 repeated to the student's credit. He may have learnt on the field of
 battle what he could learn least of all in the sphere of 'academical
 freedom': that great leaders are necessary, and that all culture begins
 with obedience. And in the midst of victory, with his thoughts turned to
 his liberated fatherland, he made the vow that he would remain German.
 German! Now he learnt to understand his Tacitus; now he grasped the
 signification of Kant's categorical imperative; now he was enraptured by
 Weber's "Lyre and Sword" songs.[12] The gates of philosophy, of art,
 yea, even of antiquity, opened unto him; and in one of the most
 memorable of bloody acts, the murder of Kotzebue, he revenged--with
 penetrating insight and enthusiastic short-sightedness--his one and only
 Schiller, prematurely consumed by the opposition of the stupid world:
 Schiller, who could have been his leader, master, and organiser, and
 whose loss he now bewailed with such heartfelt resentment.
 
 "For that was the doom of those promising students: they did not find
 the leaders they wanted. They gradually became uncertain,
 discontented, and at variance among themselves; unlucky indiscretions
 showed only too soon that the one indispensability of powerful minds
 was lacking in the midst of them: and, while that mysterious murder
 gave evidence of astonishing strength, it gave no less evidence of the
 grave danger arising from the want of a leader. They were
 leaderless--therefore they perished.
 
 "For I repeat it, my friends! All culture begins with the very
 opposite of that which is now so highly esteemed as 'academical
 freedom': with obedience, with subordination, with discipline, with
 subjection. And as leaders must have followers so also must the
 followers have a leader--here a certain reciprocal predisposition
 prevails in the hierarchy of spirits: yea, a kind of pre-established
 harmony. This eternal hierarchy, towards which all things naturally
 tend, is always threatened by that pseudo-culture which now sits on
 the throne of the present. It endeavours either to bring the leaders
 down to the level of its own servitude or else to cast them out
 altogether. It seduces the followers when they are seeking their
 predestined leader, and overcomes them by the fumes of its narcotics.
 When, however, in spite of all this, leader and followers have at last
 met, wounded and sore, there is an impassioned feeling of rapture,
 like the echo of an ever-sounding lyre, a feeling which I can let you
 divine only by means of a simile.
 
 "Have you ever, at a musical rehearsal, looked at the strange,
 shrivelled-up, good-natured species of men who usually form the German
 orchestra? What changes and fluctuations we see in that capricious
 goddess 'form'! What noses and ears, what clumsy, _danse macabre_
 movements! Just imagine for a moment that you were deaf, and had never
 dreamed of the existence of sound or music, and that you were looking
 upon the orchestra as a company of actors, and trying to enjoy their
 performance as a drama and nothing more. Undisturbed by the idealising
 effect of the sound, you could never see enough of the stern,
 medieval, wood-cutting movement of this comical spectacle, this
 harmonious parody on the _homo sapiens_.
 
 "Now, on the other hand, assume that your musical sense has returned,
 and that your ears are opened. Look at the honest conductor at the
 head of the orchestra performing his duties in a dull, spiritless
 fashion: you no longer think of the comical aspect of the whole scene,
 you listen--but it seems to you that the spirit of tediousness spreads
 out from the honest conductor over all his companions. Now you see
 only torpidity and flabbiness, you hear only the trivial, the
 rhythmically inaccurate, and the melodiously trite. You see the
 orchestra only as an indifferent, ill-humoured, and even wearisome
 crowd of players.
 
 "But set a genius--a real genius--in the midst of this crowd; and you
 instantly perceive something almost incredible. It is as if this
 genius, in his lightning transmigration, had entered into these
 mechanical, lifeless bodies, and as if only one demoniacal eye gleamed
 forth out of them all. Now look and listen--you can never listen
 enough! When you again observe the orchestra, now loftily storming,
 now fervently wailing, when you notice the quick tightening of every
 muscle and the rhythmical necessity of every gesture, then you too
 will feel what a pre-established harmony there is between leader and
 followers, and how in the hierarchy of spirits everything impels us
 towards the establishment of a like organisation. You can divine from
 my simile what I would understand by a true educational institution,
 and why I am very far from recognising one in the present type of
 university."
 
      [From a few MS. notes written down by Nietzsche in the spring
      and autumn of 1872, and still preserved in the Nietzsche
      Archives at Weimar, it is evident that he at one time
      intended to add a sixth and seventh lecture to the five just
      given. These notes, although included in the latest edition
      of Nietzsche's works, are utterly lacking in interest and
      continuity, being merely headings and sub-headings of
      sections in the proposed lectures. They do not, indeed,
      occupy more than two printed pages, and were deemed too
      fragmentary for translation in this edition.]
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [9] The reader may be reminded that a German university student is
 subject to very few restrictions, and that much greater liberty is
 allowed him than is permitted to English students. Nietzsche did not
 approve of this extraordinary freedom, which, in his opinion, led to
 intellectual lawlessness.--TR.
 
 [10] Hegel's.--TR.
 
 [11] A German students' association, of liberal principles, founded
 for patriotic purposes at Jena in 1813.
 
 [12] Weber set one or two of Koerner's "Lyre and Sword" songs to music.
 The reader will remember that these lectures were delivered when
 Nietzsche was only in his twenty-eighth year. Like Goethe, he
 afterwards freed himself from all patriotic trammels and prejudices,
 and aimed at a general European culture. Luther, Schiller, Kant,
 Koerner, and Weber did not continue to be the objects of his veneration
 for long, indeed, they were afterwards violently attacked by him, and
 the superficial student who speaks of inconsistency may be reminded of
 Nietzsche's phrase in stanza 12 of the epilogue to _Beyond Good and
 Evil_: "Nur wer sich wandelt, bleibt mit mir verwandt"; _i.e._ only
 the changing ones have anything in common with me.--TR.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
     | Typographical errors corrected in text:                   |
     |                                                           |
     | Page 124: neigbourhood replaced with neighbourhood        |
     | Page 130: universites replaced by universities            |
     |                                                           |
     +-----------------------------------------------------------+
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of On the Future of our Educational

 
 
 
 
                            Friedrich Nietzsche
 
                                   Human
 
                               All-Too-Human
 
                          A Book For Free Spirits
 
                                  Part II
 
                               Translated By
 
                             Paul V. Cohn, B.A.
 
                                  New York
 
                           The MacMillan Company
 
                                    1913
 
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 Translator's Introduction.
 Preface.
 Part I. Miscellaneous Maxims And Opinions.
 Part II. The Wanderer And His Shadow.
 Footnotes
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 The publication of _Human, all-too-Human_ extends over the period
 1878-1880. Of the two divisions which constitute the Second Part,
 "Miscellaneous Maxims and Opinions" appeared in 1879, and "The Wanderer
 and his Shadow" in 1880, Nietzsche being then in his thirty-sixth year.
 The Preface was added in 1886. The whole book forms Nietzsche's first
 lengthy contribution to literature. His previous works comprise only the
 philological treatises, _The Birth of Tragedy_, and the essays on Strauss,
 Schopenhauer, and Wagner in _Thoughts out of Season_.
 
 With the volumes of _Human, all-too-Human_ Nietzsche appears for the first
 time in his true colours as philosopher. His purely scholarly
 publications, his essays in literary and musical criticism--especially the
 essay on Richard Wagner at Bayreuth--had, of course, foreshadowed his work
 as a thinker.
 
 These efforts, however, had been mere fragments, from which hardly any one
 could observe that a new philosophical star had arisen on the horizon. But
 by 1878 the period of transition had definitely set in. Outwardly, the new
 departure is marked by Nietzsche's resignation in that year of his
 professorship at Bale--a resignation due partly to ill-health, and partly
 to his conviction that his was a voice that should speak not merely to
 students of philology, but to all mankind.
 
 Nietzsche himself characterises _Human, all-too-Human_ as "the monument of
 a crisis." He might as fitly have called it the first-fruits of a new
 harvest. Now, for the first time, he practises the form which he was to
 make so peculiarly his own. We are told--and we may well believe--that the
 book came as a surprise even to his most intimate friends. Wagner had
 already seen how matters stood at the publication of the first part, and
 the gulf between the two probably widened on the appearance of the Second
 Part.
 
 Several aphorisms are here, varying in length as in subject, and ranging
 over the whole human province--the emotions and aspirations, the religions
 and cultures and philosophies, the arts and literatures and politics of
 mankind. Equally varied is the range of style, the incisive epigram and
 the passage of pure poetry jostling each other on the same page. In this
 curious power of alternating between cynicism and lyricism, Nietzsche
 appears as the prose counterpart of Heine.
 
 One or two of the aphorisms are of peculiar interest to English readers.
 The essay (as it may almost be called) on Sterne (p. 60, No. 113) does
 ample justice, if not more than justice, to that wayward genius. The
 allusion to Milton (p. 77, No. 150) will come as somewhat of a shock to
 English readers, especially to those who hold that in Milton Art triumphed
 over Puritanism. It should be remembered, however, that Nietzsche's view
 coincides with Goethe's. The dictum that Shakespeare's gold is to be
 valued for its quantity rather than its quality (p. 81, No. 162) also
 betrays a certain exclusiveness--a legacy from that eighteenth-century
 France which appealed so strongly to Nietzsche on its intellectual side.
 To Nietzsche, as to Voltaire, Shakespeare is after all "the great
 barbarian."
 
 The title of the book may be explained from a phrase in _Thus Spake
 Zarathustra_: "Verily, even the greatest I found--all-too-human." The
 keynote of these volumes is indeed disillusion and destruction. Nor is
 this to be wondered at, for all men must sweep away the rubbish before
 they can build. Hence we find here little of the constructive philosophy
 of Nietzsche--so far as he had a constructive philosophy. The Superman
 appears but faintly, the doctrine of Eternal Recurrence not at all. For
 this very reason, _Human, all-too-Human_ is perhaps the best
 starting-point for the study of Nietzsche. The difficulties in style and
 thought of the later work--difficulties that at times become well-nigh
 insuperable in _Thus Spake Zarathustra_--are here practically absent. The
 book may, in fact, almost be described as "popular," bearing the same
 relation to Nietzsche's later productions as Wagner's _Tannhaeuser_ and
 _Lohengrin_ bear to the _Ring_.
 
 The translator's thanks are due to Mr. Thomas Common for his careful
 revision of the manuscript and many valuable suggestions.
 
 P. V. C.
 
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 One should only speak where one cannot remain silent, and only speak of
 what one has _conquered_--the rest is all chatter, "literature," bad
 breeding. My writings speak only of my conquests, "I" am in them, with all
 that is hostile to me, _ego ipsissimus_, or, if a more haughty expression
 be permitted, _ego ipsissimum_. It may be guessed that I have many below
 me.... But first I always needed time, convalescence, distance,
 separation, before I felt the stirrings of a desire to flay, despoil, lay
 bare, "represent" (or whatever one likes to call it) for the additional
 knowledge of the world, something that I had lived through and outlived,
 something done or suffered. Hence all my writings,--with one exception,
 important, it is true,--must be _ante-dated_--they always tell of a
 "behind-me." Some even, like the first three _Thoughts out of Season_,
 must be thrown back before the period of creation and experience of a
 previously published book (_The Birth of Tragedy_ in the case cited, as
 any one with subtle powers of observation and comparison could not fail to
 perceive). That wrathful outburst against the Germanism, smugness, and
 raggedness of speech of old David Strauss, the contents of the first
 _Thought out of Season_, gave a vent to feelings that had inspired me long
 before, as a student, in the midst of German culture and cultured
 Philistinism (I claim the paternity of the now much used and misused
 phrase "cultured Philistinism"). What I said against the "historical
 disease" I said as one who had slowly and laboriously recovered from that
 disease, and who was not at all disposed to renounce "history" in the
 future because he had suffered from her in the past. When in the third
 _Thought out of Season_ I gave expression to my reverence for my first and
 only teacher, the _great_ Arthur Schopenhauer--I should now give it a far
 more personal and emphatic voice--I was for my part already in the throes
 of moral scepticism and dissolution, that is, as much concerned with the
 criticism as with the study of all pessimism down to the present day. I
 already did not believe in "a blessed thing," as the people say, not even
 in Schopenhauer. It was at this very period that an unpublished essay of
 mine, "On Truth and Falsehood in an Extra-Moral Sense," came into being.
 Even my ceremonial oration in honour of Richard Wagner, on the occasion of
 his triumphal celebration at Bayreuth in 1876--Bayreuth signifies the
 greatest triumph that an artist has ever won--a work that bears the
 strongest stamp of "individuality," was in the background an act of homage
 and gratitude to a bit of the past in me, to the fairest but most perilous
 calm of my sea-voyage ... and as a matter of fact a severance and a
 farewell. (Was Richard Wagner mistaken on this point? I do not think so.
 So long as we still love, we do not paint such pictures, we do not yet
 "examine," we do not place ourselves so far away as is essential for one
 who "examines." "Examining needs at least a secret antagonism, that of an
 opposite point of view," it is said on page 46 of the above-named work
 itself, with an insidious, melancholy application that was perhaps
 understood by few.) The composure that gave me the _power_ to speak after
 many intervening years of solitude and abstinence, first came with the
 book, _Human, All-too Human_, to which this second preface and apologia(1)
 is dedicated. As a book for "free spirits" it shows some trace of that
 almost cheerful and inquisitive coldness of the psychologist, who has
 _behind_ him many painful things that he keeps _under_ him, and moreover
 establishes them for himself and fixes them firmly as with a needle-point.
 Is it to be wondered at that at such sharp, ticklish work blood flows now
 and again, that indeed the psychologist has blood on his fingers and not
 _only_ on his fingers?
 
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 The _Miscellaneous Maxims and Opinions_ were in the first place, like _The
 Wanderer and His Shadow_, published separately as continuations and
 appendices to the above-mentioned human, all-too human _Book for Free
 Spirits_: and at the same time, as a continuation and confirmation of an
 intellectual cure, consisting in a course of anti-romantic self-treatment,
 such as my instinct, which had always remained healthy, had itself
 discovered and prescribed against a temporary attack of the most dangerous
 form of romantics. After a convalescence of six years I may well be
 permitted to collect these same writings and publish them as a second
 volume of _Human, All-too Human_. Perhaps, if surveyed together, they will
 more clearly and effectively teach their lesson--a lesson of health that
 may be recommended as a _disciplina voluntatis_ to the more intellectual
 natures of the rising generation. Here speaks a pessimist who has often
 leaped out of his skin but has always returned into it, thus, a pessimist
 with goodwill towards pessimism--at all events a romanticist no longer. And
 has not a pessimist, who possesses this serpentine knack of changing his
 skin, the right to read a lecture to our pessimists of to-day, who are one
 and all still in the toils of romanticism? Or at least to show them how it
 is--done?
 
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 It was then, in fact, high time to bid farewell, and I soon received
 proof. Richard Wagner, who seemed all-conquering, but was in reality only
 a decayed and despairing romantic, suddenly collapsed, helpless and
 broken, before the Christian Cross.... Was there not a single German with
 eyes in his head and sympathy in his heart for this appalling spectacle?
 Was I the only one whom he caused--suffering? In any case, the unexpected
 event illumined for me in one lightning flash the place that I had
 abandoned, and also the horror that is felt by every one who is
 unconscious of a great danger until he has passed through it. As I went
 forward alone, I shuddered, and not long afterwards I was ill, or rather
 more than ill--weary: weary from my ceaseless disappointment about all that
 remained to make us modern men enthusiastic, at the thought of the power,
 work, hope, youth, love, flung to all the winds: weary from disgust at the
 effeminacy and undisciplined rhapsody of this romanticism, at the whole
 tissue of idealistic lies and softening of conscience, which here again
 had won the day over one of the bravest of men: last, and not least, weary
 from the bitterness of an inexorable suspicion--that after this
 disappointment I was doomed to mistrust more thoroughly, to despise more
 thoroughly, to be alone more thoroughly than ever before. My task--whither
 had it flown? Did it not look now as if my task were retreating from me
 and as if I should for a long future period have no more right to it? What
 was I to do to endure this most terrible privation?--I began by entirely
 forbidding myself all romantic music, that ambiguous, pompous, stifling
 art, which robs the mind of its sternness and its joyousness and provides
 a fertile soil for every kind of vague yearning and spongy sensuality.
 "Cave musicam" is even to-day my advice to all who are enough of men to
 cling to purity in matters of the intellect. Such music enervates,
 softens, feminises, its "eternal feminine" draws us--_down_!(2) My first
 suspicion, my most immediate precaution, was directed against romantic
 music. If I hoped for anything at all from music, it was in the
 expectation of the coming of a musician bold, subtle, malignant, southern,
 healthy enough to take an immortal revenge upon that other music.
 
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 Lonely now and miserably self-distrustful, I took sides, not without
 resentment, _against_ myself and _for_ everything that hurt me and was
 hard to me. Thus I once more found the way to that courageous pessimism
 that is the antithesis of all romantic fraud, and, as it seems to me
 to-day, the way to "myself," to my task. That hidden masterful Something,
 for which we long have no name until at last it shows itself as our
 task--that tyrant in us exacts a terrible price for every attempt that we
 make to escape him or give him the slip, for every premature act of
 self-constraint, for every reconciliation with those to whom we do not
 belong, for every activity, however reputable, which turns us aside from
 our main purpose, yes, even for every virtue that would fain protect us
 from the cruelty of our most individual responsibility. "Disease" is
 always the answer when we wish to have doubts of our rights to our own
 task, when we begin to make it easier for ourselves in any way. How
 strange and how terrible! It is our very alleviations for which we have to
 make the severest atonement! And if we want to return to health, we have
 no choice left--we must load ourselves _more heavily_ than we were ever
 laden before.
 
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 It was then that I learnt the hermitical habit of speech acquired only by
 the most silent and suffering. I spoke without witnesses, or rather
 indifferent to the presence of witnesses, so as not to suffer from
 silence, I spoke of various things that did not concern me in a style that
 gave the impression that they did. Then, too, I learnt the art of showing
 myself cheerful, objective, inquisitive in the presence of all that is
 healthy and evil--is this, in an invalid, as it seems to me, his "good
 taste"? Nevertheless, a more subtle eye and sympathy will not miss what
 perhaps gives a charm to these writings--the fact that here speaks one who
 has suffered and abstained in such a way as if he had never suffered or
 abstained. Here equipoise, composure, even gratitude towards life _shall_
 be maintained, here rules a stern, proud, ever vigilant, ever susceptible
 will, which has undertaken the task of defending life against pain and
 snapping off all conclusions that are wont to grow like poisonous fungi
 from pain, disappointment, satiety, isolation and other morasses. Perhaps
 this gives our pessimists a hint to self-examination? For it was then that
 I hit upon the aphorism, "a sufferer has as yet no right to pessimism,"
 and that I engaged in a tedious, patient campaign against the unscientific
 first principles of all romantic pessimism, which seeks to magnify and
 interpret individual, personal experiences into "general judgments,"
 universal condemnations--it was then, in short, that I sighted a new world.
 Optimism for the sake of restitution, in order at some time to have the
 right to become a pessimist--do you understand that? Just as a physician
 transfers his patient to totally strange surroundings, in order to
 displace him from his entire "past," his troubles, friends, letters,
 duties, stupid mistakes and painful memories, and teaches him to stretch
 out hands and senses towards new nourishment, a new sun, a new future: so
 I, as physician and invalid in one, forced myself into an utterly
 different and untried zone of the soul, and particularly into an absorbing
 journey to a strange land, a strange atmosphere, into a curiosity for all
 that was strange. A long process of roaming, seeking, changing followed, a
 distaste for fixity of any kind--a dislike for clumsy affirmation and
 negation: and at the same time a dietary and discipline which aimed at
 making it as easy as possible for the soul to fly high, and above all
 constantly to fly away. In fact a minimum of life, an unfettering from all
 coarser forms of sensuality, an independence in the midst of all marks of
 outward disfavour, together with the pride in being able to live in the
 midst of all this disfavour: a little cynicism perhaps, a little of the
 "tub of Diogenes," a good deal of whimsical happiness, whimsical gaiety,
 much calm, light, subtle folly, hidden enthusiasm--all this produced in the
 end a great spiritual strengthening, a growing joy and exuberance of
 health. Life itself rewards us for our tenacious will to life, for such a
 long war as I waged against the pessimistic weariness of life, even for
 every observant glance of our gratitude, glances that do not miss the
 smallest, most delicate, most fugitive gifts.... In the end we receive
 Life's great gifts, perhaps the greatest it can bestow--we regain _our_
 task.
 
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 Should my experience--the history of an illness and a convalescence, for it
 resulted in a convalescence--be only my personal experience? and merely
 just my "Human, All-too-human"? To-day I would fain believe the reverse,
 for I am becoming more and more confident that my books of travel were not
 penned for my sole benefit, as appeared for a time to be the case. May I,
 after six years of growing assurance, send them once more on a journey for
 an experiment?--May I commend them particularly to the ears and hearts of
 those who are afflicted with some sort of a "past," and have enough
 intellect left to suffer even intellectually from their past? But above
 all would I commend them to you whose burden is heaviest, you choice
 spirits, most encompassed with perils, most intellectual, most courageous,
 who must be the _conscience_ of the modern soul and as such be versed in
 its _science_:(3) in whom is concentrated all of disease, poison or danger
 that can exist to-day: whose lot decrees that you must be more sick than
 any individual because you are not "mere individuals": whose consolation
 it is to know and, ah! to walk the path to a new health, a health of
 to-morrow and the day after: you men of destiny, triumphant, conquerors of
 time, the healthiest and the strongest, you _good Europeans_!
 
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 To express finally in a single formula my opposition to the romantic
 pessimism of the abstinent, the unfortunate, the conquered: there is a
 will to the tragic and to pessimism, which is a sign as much of the
 severity as of the strength of the intellect (taste, emotion, conscience).
 With this will in our hearts we do not fear, but we investigate ourselves
 the terrible and the problematical elements characteristic of all
 existence. Behind such a will stand courage and pride and the desire for a
 really great enemy. That was _my_ pessimistic outlook from the first--a new
 outlook, methinks, an outlook that even at this day is new and strange? To
 this moment I hold to it firmly and (if it will be believed) not only
 _for_ myself but occasionally _against_ myself.... You would prefer to
 have that proved first? Well, what else does all this long preface--prove?
 
 SILS-MARIA, UPPER ENGADINE,
 _September, 1886_.
 
 
 
 
 
 PART I. MISCELLANEOUS MAXIMS AND OPINIONS.
 
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 TO THE DISILLUSIONED IN PHILOSOPHY.--If you hitherto believed in the
 highest value of life and now find yourselves disillusioned, must you
 immediately get rid of life at the lowest possible price?
 
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 OVERNICE.--One can even become overnice as regards the clearness of
 concepts. How disgusted one is then at having truck with the half-clear,
 the hazy, the aspiring, the doubting! How ridiculous and yet not
 mirth-provoking is their eternal fluttering and straining without ever
 being able to fly or to grasp!
 
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 THE WOOERS OF REALITY.--He who realises at last how long and how thoroughly
 he has been befooled, embraces out of spite even the ugliest reality. So
 that in the long run of the world's history the best men have always been
 wooers of reality, for the best have always been longest and most
 thoroughly deceived.
 
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 ADVANCE OF FREETHINKING.--The difference between past and present
 freethinking cannot better be characterised than by that aphorism for the
 recognition and expression of which all the fearlessness of the eighteenth
 century was needed, and which even then, if measured by our modern view,
 sinks into an unconscious naivete. I mean Voltaire's aphorism,
 "croyez-moi, mon ami, l'erreur aussi a son merite."
 
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 A HEREDITARY SIN OF PHILOSOPHERS.--Philosophers have at all times
 appropriated and _corrupted_ the maxims of censors of men (moralists), by
 taking them over without qualification and trying to prove as necessary
 what the moralists only meant as a rough indication or as a truth suited
 to their fellow-countrymen or fellow-townsmen for a single decade.
 Moreover, the philosophers thought that they were thereby raising
 themselves above the moralists! Thus it will be found that the celebrated
 teachings of Schopenhauer as to the supremacy of the will over the
 intellect, of the immutability of character, the negativity of
 pleasure--all errors, in the sense in which he understands them--rest upon
 principles of popular wisdom enunciated by the moralists. Take the very
 word "will," which Schopenhauer twisted so as to become a common
 denotation of several human conditions and with which he filled a gap in
 the language (to his own great advantage, in so far as he was a moralist,
 for he became free to speak of the will as Pascal had spoken of it). In
 the hands of its creator, Schopenhauer's "will," through the philosophic
 craze for generalisation, already turned out to be a bane to knowledge.
 For this will was made into a poetic metaphor, when it was held that all
 things in nature possess will. Finally, that it might be applied to all
 kinds of disordered mysticism, the word was misused by a fraudulent
 convention. So now all our fashionable philosophers repeat it and seem to
 be perfectly certain that all things have a will and are in fact One Will.
 According to the description generally given of this All-One-Will, this is
 much as if one should positively try to have the stupid Devil for one's
 God.
 
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 AGAINST VISIONARIES.--The visionary denies the truth to himself, the liar
 only to others.
 
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 ENMITY TO LIGHT.--If we make it clear to any one that, strictly, he can
 never speak of truth, but only of probability and of its degrees, we
 generally discover, from the undisguised joy of our pupil, how greatly men
 prefer the uncertainty of their intellectual horizon, and how in their
 heart of hearts they hate truth because of its definiteness.--Is this due
 to a secret fear felt by all that the light of truth may at some time be
 turned too brightly upon themselves? To their wish to be of some
 consequence, and accordingly their concealment from the world of what they
 are? Or is it to be traced to their horror of the all-too brilliant light,
 to which their crepuscular, easily dazzled, bat-like souls are not
 accustomed, so that hate it they must?
 
 
 
 
 8.
 
 
 CHRISTIAN SCEPTICISM.--Pilate, with his question, "What is Truth?" is now
 gleefully brought on the scene as an advocate of Christ, in order to cast
 suspicion on all that is known or knowable as being mere appearance, and
 to erect the Cross on the appalling background of the Impossibility of
 Knowledge.
 
 
 
 
 9.
 
 
 "NATURAL LAW," A PHRASE OF SUPERSTITION.--When you talk so delightedly of
 Nature acting according to law, you must either assume that all things in
 Nature follow their law from a voluntary obedience imposed by
 themselves--in which case you admire the morality of Nature: or you are
 enchanted with the idea of a creative mechanician, who has made a most
 cunning watch with human beings as accessory ornaments.--Necessity, through
 the expression, "conformity to law," then becomes more human and a coign
 of refuge in the last instance for mythological reveries.
 
 
 
 
 10.
 
 
 FALLEN FORFEIT TO HISTORY.--All misty philosophers and obscurers of the
 world, in other words all metaphysicians of coarse or refined texture are
 seized with eyeache, earache, and toothache when they begin to suspect
 that there is truth in the saying: "All philosophy has from now fallen
 forfeit to history." In view of their aches and pains we may pardon them
 for throwing stones and filth at him who talks like this, but this
 teaching may itself thereby become dirty and disreputable for a time and
 lose in effect.
 
 
 
 
 11.
 
 
 THE PESSIMIST OF THE INTELLECT.--He whose intellect is really free will
 think freely about the intellect itself, and will not shut his eyes to
 certain terrible aspects of its source and tendency. For this reason
 others will perhaps designate him the bitterest opponent of free thought
 and give him that dreadful, abusive name of "pessimist of the intellect":
 accustomed as they are to typify a man not by his strong point, his
 pre-eminent virtue, but by the quality that is most foreign to his nature.
 
 
 
 
 12.
 
 
 THE METAPHYSICIANS' KNAPSACK.--To all who talk so boastfully of the
 scientific basis of their metaphysics it is best to make no reply. It is
 enough to tug at the bundle that they rather shyly keep hidden behind
 their backs. If one succeeds in lifting it, the results of that
 "scientific basis" come to light, to their great confusion: a dear little
 "God," a genteel immortality, perhaps a little spiritualism, and in any
 case a complicated mass of poor-sinners'-misery and pharisee-arrogance.
 
 
 
 
 13.
 
 
 OCCASIONAL HARMFULNESS OF KNOWLEDGE.--The utility involved in the unchecked
 investigation of knowledge is so constantly proved in a hundred different
 ways that one must remember to include in the bargain the subtler and
 rarer damage which individuals must suffer on that account. The chemist
 cannot avoid occasionally being poisoned or burnt at his experiments. What
 applies to the chemist, is true of the whole of our culture. This, it may
 be added, clearly shows that knowledge should provide itself with healing
 balsam against burns and should always have antidotes ready against
 poisons.
 
 
 
 
 14.
 
 
 THE CRAVING OF THE PHILISTINE.--The Philistine thinks that his most urgent
 need is a purple patch or turban of metaphysics, nor will he let it slip.
 Yet he would look less ridiculous without this adornment.
 
 
 
 
 15.
 
 
 ENTHUSIASTS.--With all that enthusiasts say in favour of their gospel or
 their master they are defending themselves, however much they comport
 themselves as the judges and not the accused: because they are
 involuntarily reminded almost at every moment that they are exceptions and
 have to assert their legitimacy.
 
 
 
 
 16.
 
 
 THE GOOD SEDUCES TO LIFE.--All good things, even all good books that are
 written against life, are strong means of attraction to life.
 
 
 
 
 17.
 
 
 THE HAPPINESS OF THE HISTORIAN.--"When we hear the hair-splitting
 metaphysicians and prophets of the after-world speak, we others feel
 indeed that we are the 'poor in spirit,' but that ours is the heavenly
 kingdom of change, with spring and autumn, summer and winter, and theirs
 the after-world, with its grey, everlasting frosts and shadows." Thus
 soliloquised a man as he walked in the morning sunshine, a man who in his
 pursuit of history has constantly changed not only his mind but his heart.
 In contrast to the metaphysicians, he is happy to harbour in himself not
 an "immortal soul" but many _mortal_ souls.
 
 
 
 
 18.
 
 
 THREE VARIETIES OF THINKERS.--There are streaming, flowing, trickling
 mineral springs, and three corresponding varieties of thinkers. The layman
 values them by the volume of the water, the expert by the contents of the
 water--in other words, by the elements in them that are not water.
 
 
 
 
 19.
 
 
 THE PICTURE OF LIFE.--The task of painting the picture of life, often as it
 has been attempted by poets and philosophers, is nevertheless irrational.
 Even in the hands of the greatest artist-thinkers, pictures and miniatures
 of one life only--their own--have come into being, and indeed no other
 result is possible. While in the process of developing, a thing that
 develops, cannot mirror itself as fixed and permanent, as a _definite
 object_.
 
 
 
 
 20.
 
 
 TRUTH WILL HAVE NO GODS BEFORE IT.--The belief in truth begins with the
 doubt of all truths in which one has previously believed.
 
 
 
 
 21.
 
 
 WHERE SILENCE IS REQUIRED.--If we speak of freethinking as of a highly
 dangerous journey over glaciers and frozen seas, we find that those who do
 not care to travel on this track are offended, as if they had been
 reproached with cowardice and weak knees. The difficult, which we find to
 be beyond our powers, must not even be mentioned in our presence.
 
 
 
 
 22.
 
 
 _Historia in Nuce._--The most serious parody I ever heard was this: "In the
 beginning was the nonsense, and the nonsense was with God, and the
 nonsense was God."(4)
 
 
 
 
 23.
 
 
 INCURABLE.--The idealist is incorrigible: if he be thrown out of his
 Heaven, he makes himself a suitable ideal out of Hell. Disillusion him,
 and lo! he will embrace disillusionment with no less ardour than he
 recently embraced hope. In so far as his impulse belongs to the great
 incurable impulses of human nature, he can bring about tragic destinies
 and later become a subject for tragedy himself, for such tragedies as deal
 with the incurable, implacable, inevitable in the lot and character of
 man.
 
 
 
 
 24.
 
 
 APPLAUSE ITSELF AS THE CONTINUATION OF THE PLAY.--Sparkling eyes and an
 amiable smile are the tributes of applause paid to all the great comedy of
 world and existence--but this applause is a comedy within a comedy, meant
 to tempt the other spectators to a _plaudite amici_.
 
 
 
 
 25.
 
 
 COURAGE FOR TEDIUM.--He who has not the courage to allow himself and his
 work to be considered tedious, is certainly no intellect of the first
 rank, whether in the arts or in the sciences.--A scoffer, who happened for
 once in a way to be a thinker, might add, with a glance at the world and
 at history: "God did not possess this courage, for he wanted to make and
 he made all things so interesting."
 
 
 
 
 26.
 
 
 FROM THE MOST INTIMATE EXPERIENCE OF THE THINKER.--Nothing is harder for a
 man than to conceive of an object impersonally, I mean to see in it an
 object and not a person. One may even ask whether it is possible for him
 to dispense for a single moment with the machinery of his instinct to
 create and construct a personality. After all, he associates with his
 thoughts, however abstract they may be, as with individuals, against whom
 he must fight or to whom he must attach himself, whom he must protect,
 support and nourish. Let us watch or listen to ourselves at the moment
 when we hear or discover a new idea. Perhaps it displeases us because it
 is so defiant and so autocratic, and we unconsciously ask ourselves
 whether we cannot place a contradiction of it by its side as an enemy, or
 fasten on to it a "perhaps" or a "sometimes": the mere little word
 "probably" gives us a feeling of satisfaction, for it shatters the
 oppressive tyranny of the unconditional. If, on the other hand, the new
 idea enters in gentle shape, sweetly patient and humble, and falling at
 once into the arms of contradiction, we put our autocracy to the test in
 another way. Can we not come to the aid of this weak creature, stroke it
 and feed it, give it strength and fulness, and truth and even
 unconditionality? Is it possible for us to show ourselves parental or
 chivalrous or compassionate towards our idea?--Then again, we see here a
 judgment and there a judgment, sundered from each other, never looking at
 or making any movement towards each other. So we are tickled by the
 thought, whether it be not here feasible to make a match, to draw a
 _conclusion_, with the anticipation that if a consequence follows this
 conclusion it is not only the two judgments united in wedlock but the
 matchmakers that will gain honour. If, however, we cannot acquire a hold
 upon that thought either on the path of defiance and ill-will or on that
 of good-will (if we hold it to be true)--then we submit to it and do homage
 to it as a leader and a prince, give it a chair of honour, and speak not
 of it without a flourish of trumpets: for we are bright in its brightness.
 Woe to him who tries to dim this brightness! Perhaps we ourselves one day
 grow suspicious of our idea. Then we, the indefatigable "king-makers" of
 the history of the intellect, cast it down from its throne and immediately
 exalt its adversary. Surely if this be considered and thought out a little
 further, no one will speak of an "absolute impulse to knowledge"!
 
 Why, then, does man prefer the true to the untrue, in this secret combat
 with thought-personalities, in this generally clandestine match-making of
 thoughts, constitution-founding of thoughts, child-rearing of thoughts,
 nursing and almsgiving of thoughts? For the same reason that he practises
 honesty in intercourse with real persons: _now_ from habit, heredity, and
 training, _originally_ because the true, like the fair and the just, is
 more expedient and more reputable than the untrue. For in the realm of
 thought it is difficult to assume a power and glory that are built on
 error or on falsehood. The feeling that such an edifice might at some time
 collapse is humiliating to the self-esteem of the architect--he is ashamed
 of the fragility of the material, and, as he considers himself more
 important than the rest of the world, he would fain construct nothing that
 is less durable than the rest of the world. In his longing for truth he
 embraces the belief in a personal immortality, the most arrogant and
 defiant idea that exists, closely allied as it is to the underlying
 thought, _pereat mundus, dum ego salvus sim!_ His work has become his
 "ego," he transforms himself into the Imperishable with its universal
 challenge. It is his immeasurable pride that will only employ the best and
 hardest stones for the work--truths, or what he holds for such. Arrogance
 has always been justly called the "vice of the sage"; yet without this
 vice, fruitful in impulses, Truth and her status on earth would be in a
 parlous plight. In our propensity to fear our thoughts, concepts and
 words, and yet to honour ourselves in them, unconsciously to ascribe to
 them the power of rewarding, despising, praising, and blaming us, and so
 to associate with them as with free intellectual personalities, as with
 independent powers, as with our equals--herein lie the roots of the
 remarkable phenomenon which I have called "intellectual conscience." Thus
 something of the highest moral species has bloomed from a black root.
 
 
 
 
 27.
 
 
 THE OBSCURANTISTS.--The essential feature of the black art of obscurantism
 is not its intention of clouding the brain, but its attempt to darken the
 picture of the world and cloud our idea of existence. It often employs the
 method of thwarting all illumination of the intellect, but at times it
 uses the very opposite means, seeking by the highest refinement of the
 intellect to induce a satiety of the intellect's fruits. Hair-splitting
 metaphysicians, who pave the way for scepticism and by their excessive
 acumen provoke a distrust of acumen, are excellent instruments of the more
 subtle form of obscurantism.--Is it possible that even Kant may be applied
 to this purpose? Did he even _intend_ something of the sort, for a time at
 least, to judge from his own notorious exposition: "to clear the way for
 belief by setting limitations to knowledge"?--Certainly he did not succeed,
 nor did his followers, on the wolf and fox tracks of this highly refined
 and dangerous form of obscurantism--the most dangerous of all, for the
 black art here appears in the garb of light.
 
 
 
 
 28.
 
 
 BY WHAT KIND OF PHILOSOPHY ART IS CORRUPTED.--When the mists of a
 metaphysical-mystical philosophy succeed in making all aesthetic phenomena
 _opaque_, it follows that these phenomena cannot be comparatively valued,
 inasmuch as each becomes individually inexplicable. But when once they
 cannot be compared for the sake of valuation, there arises an entire
 absence-of-criticism, a blind indulgence. From this source springs a
 continual diminution of the enjoyment of art (which is only distinguished
 from the crude satisfaction of a need by the highest refinement of taste
 and appreciation). The more taste diminishes, the more does the desire for
 art change and revert to a vulgar hunger, which the artist henceforth
 seeks to appease by ever coarser fare.
 
 
 
 
 29.
 
 
 ON GETHSEMANE.--The most painful thing a thinker can say to artists is:
 "Could ye not _watch_ with me one hour?"
 
 
 
 
 30.
 
 
 AT THE LOOM.--There are many (artists and women, for instance) who work
 against the few that take a pleasure in untying the knot of things and
 unravelling their woof. The former always want to weave the woof together
 again and entangle it and so turn the conceived into the unconceived and
 if possible inconceivable. Whatever the result may be, the woof and knot
 always look rather untidy, because too many hands are working and tugging
 at them.
 
 
 
 
 31.
 
 
 IN THE DESERT OF SCIENCE.--As the man of science proceeds on his modest and
 toilsome wanderings, which must often enough be journeys in the desert, he
 is confronted with those brilliant mirages known as "philosophic systems."
 With magic powers of deception they show him that the solution of all
 riddles and the most refreshing draught of true water of life are close at
 hand. His weary heart rejoices, and he well-nigh touches with his lips the
 goal of all scientific endurance and hardship, so that almost
 unconsciously he presses forward. Other natures stand still, as if
 spellbound by the beautiful illusion: the desert swallows them up, they
 become lost to science. Other natures, again, that have often experienced
 these subjective consolations, become very disheartened and curse the
 salty taste which these mirages leave behind in the mouth and from which
 springs a raging thirst--without one's having come one step nearer to any
 sort of a spring.
 
 
 
 
 32.
 
 
 THE SO-CALLED "REAL REALITY."--When the poet depicts the various
 callings--such as those of the warrior, the silk-weaver, the sailor--he
 feigns to know all these things thoroughly, to be an expert. Even in the
 exposition of human actions and destinies he behaves as if he had been
 present at the spinning of the whole web of existence. In so far he is an
 impostor. He practises his frauds on pure ignoramuses, and that is why he
 succeeds. They praise him for his deep, genuine knowledge, and lead him
 finally into the delusion that he really knows as much as the individual
 experts and creators, yes, even as the great world-spinners themselves. In
 the end, the impostor becomes honest, and actually believes in his own
 sincerity. Emotional people say to his very face that he has the "higher"
 truth and sincerity--for they are weary of reality for the time being, and
 accept the poetic dream as a pleasant relaxation and a night's rest for
 head and heart. The visions of the dream now appear to them of more value,
 because, as has been said, they find them more beneficial, and mankind has
 always held that what is apparently of more value is more true, more real.
 All that is generally called reality, the poets, conscious of this power,
 proceed with intention to disparage and to distort into the uncertain, the
 illusory, the spurious, the impure, the sinful, sorrowful, and deceitful.
 They make use of all doubts about the limits of knowledge, of all
 sceptical excesses, in order to spread over everything the rumpled veil of
 uncertainty. For they desire that when this darkening process is complete
 their wizardry and soul-magic may be accepted without hesitation as the
 path to "true truth" and "real reality."
 
 
 
 
 33.
 
 
 THE WISH TO BE JUST AND THE WISH TO BE A JUDGE.--Schopenhauer, whose
 profound understanding of what is human and all-too-human and original
 sense for facts was not a little impaired by the bright leopard-skin of
 his metaphysic (the skin must first be pulled off him if one wants to find
 the real moralist genius beneath)--Schopenhauer makes this admirable
 distinction, wherein he comes far nearer the mark than he would himself
 dare to admit: "Insight into the stern necessity of human actions is the
 boundary line that divides philosophic from other brains." He worked
 against that wonderful insight of which he was sometimes capable by the
 prejudice that he had in common with the moral man (not the moralist), a
 prejudice that he expresses quite guilelessly and devoutly as follows:
 "The ultimate and true explanation of the inner being of the entirety of
 things must of necessity be closely connected with that about the ethical
 significance of human actions." This connection is not "necessary" at all:
 such a connection must rather be rejected by that principle of the stern
 necessity of human actions, that is, the unconditioned non-freedom and
 non-responsibility of the will. Philosophic brains will accordingly be
 distinguished from others by their disbelief in the metaphysical
 significance of morality. This must create between the two kinds of brain
 a gulf of a depth and unbridgeableness of which the much-deplored gulf
 between "cultured" and "uncultured" scarcely gives a conception. It is
 true that many back doors, which the "philosophic brains," like
 Schopenhauer's own, have left for themselves, must be recognised as
 useless. None leads into the open, into the fresh air of the free will,
 but every door through which people had slipped hitherto showed behind it
 once more the gleaming brass wall of fate. For we are in a prison, and can
 only dream of freedom, not make ourselves free. That the recognition of
 this fact cannot be resisted much longer is shown by the despairing and
 incredible postures and grimaces of those who still press against it and
 continue their wrestling-bout with it. Their attitude at present is
 something like this: "So no one is responsible for his actions? And all is
 full of guilt and the consciousness of guilt? But some one _must_ be the
 sinner. If it is no longer possible or permissible to accuse and sentence
 the individual, the one poor wave in the inevitable rough-and-tumble of
 the waves of development--well, then, let this stormy sea, this development
 itself, be the sinner. Here is free will: this totality can be accused and
 sentenced, can atone and expiate. _So let God be the sinner and man his
 redeemer._ Let the world's history be guilt, expiation, and self-murder.
 Let the evil-doer be his own judge, the judge his own hangman." This
 Christianity strained to its limits--for what else is it?--is the last
 thrust in the fencing-match between the teaching of unconditioned morality
 and the teaching of unconditioned non-freedom. It would be quite horrible
 if it were anything more than a logical pose, a hideous grimace of the
 underlying thought, perhaps the death-convulsion of the heart that seeks a
 remedy in its despair, the heart to which delirium whispers: "Behold, thou
 art the lamb which taketh away the sin of God." This error lies not only
 in the feeling, "I am responsible," but just as much in the contradiction,
 "I am not responsible, but some one must be." That is simply not true.
 Hence the philosopher must say, like Christ, "Judge not," and the final
 distinction between the philosophic brains and the others would be that
 the former wish to be just and the latter wish to be judges.
 
 
 
 
 34.
 
 
 _Sacrifice._--You hold that sacrifice is the hallmark of moral action?--Just
 consider whether in every action that is done with deliberation, in the
 best as in the worst, there be not a sacrifice.
 
 
 
 
 35.
 
 
 AGAINST THE "TRIERS OF THE REINS" OF MORALITY.--One must know the best and
 the worst that a man is capable of in theory and in practice before one
 can judge how strong his moral nature is and can be. But this is an
 experiment that one can never carry out.
 
 
 
 
 36.
 
 
 SERPENT'S TOOTH.--Whether we have a serpent's tooth or not we cannot know
 before some one has set his heel upon our necks. A wife or a mother could
 say: until some one has put his heel upon the neck of our darling, our
 child.--Our character is determined more by the absence of certain
 experiences than by the experiences we have undergone.
 
 
 
 
 37.
 
 
 DECEPTION IN LOVE.--We forget and purposely banish from our minds a good
 deal of our past. In other words, we wish our picture, that beams at us
 from the past, to belie us, to flatter our vanity--we are constantly
 engaged in this self-deception. And you who talk and boast so much of
 "self-oblivion in love," of the "absorption of the ego in the other
 person"--you hold that this is something different? So you break the
 mirror, throw yourselves into another personality that you admire, and
 enjoy the new portrait of your ego, though calling it by the other
 person's name--and this whole proceeding is not to be thought
 self-deception, self-seeking, you marvellous beings?--It seems to me that
 those who hide something of themselves from themselves, or hide their
 whole selves from themselves, are alike committing a theft from the
 treasury of knowledge. It is clear, then, against what transgression the
 maxim "Know thyself" is a warning.
 
 
 
 
 38.
 
 
 TO THE DENIER OF HIS VANITY.--He who denies his own vanity usually
 possesses it in so brutal a form that he instinctively shuts his eyes to
 avoid the necessity of despising himself.
 
 
 
 
 39.
 
 
 WHY THE STUPID SO OFTEN BECOME MALIGNANT.--To those arguments of our
 adversary against which our head feels too weak our heart replies by
 throwing suspicion on the motives of his arguments.
 
 
 
 
 40.
 
 
 THE ART OF MORAL EXCEPTIONS.--An art that points out and glorifies the
 exceptional cases of morality--where the good becomes bad and the unjust
 just--should rarely be given a hearing: just as now and again we buy
 something from gipsies, with the fear that they are diverting to their own
 pockets much more than their mere profit from the purchase.
 
 
 
 
 41.
 
 
 ENJOYMENT AND NON-ENJOYMENT OF POISONS.--The only decisive argument that
 has always deterred men from drinking a poison is not that it is deadly,
 but that it has an unpleasant taste.
 
 
 
 
 42.
 
 
 THE WORLD WITHOUT CONSCIOUSNESS OF SIN.--If men only committed such deeds
 as do not give rise to a bad conscience, the human world would still look
 bad and rascally enough, but not so sickly and pitiable as at
 present.--Enough wicked men without conscience have existed at all times,
 and many good honest folk lack the feeling of pleasure in a good
 conscience.
 
 
 
 
 43.
 
 
 THE CONSCIENTIOUS.--It is more convenient to follow one's conscience than
 one's intelligence, for at every failure conscience finds an excuse and an
 encouragement in itself. That is why there are so many conscientious and
 so few intelligent people.
 
 
 
 
 44.
 
 
 OPPOSITE MEANS OF AVOIDING BITTERNESS.--One temperament finds it useful to
 be able to give vent to its disgust in words, being made sweeter by
 speech. Another reaches its full bitterness only by speaking out: it is
 more advisable for it to have to gulp down something--the restraint that
 men of this stamp place upon themselves in the presence of enemies and
 superiors improves their character and prevents it from becoming too acrid
 and sour.
 
 
 
 
 45.
 
 
 NOT TO BE TOO DEJECTED.--To get bed-sores is unpleasant, but no proof
 against the merits of the cure that prescribes that you should take to
 your bed. Men who have long lived outside themselves, and have at last
 devoted themselves to the inward philosophic life, know that one can also
 get sores of character and intellect. This, again, is on the whole no
 argument against the chosen way of life, but necessitates a few small
 exceptions and apparent relapses.
 
 
 
 
 46.
 
 
 THE HUMAN "THING IN ITSELF."--The most vulnerable and yet most
 unconquerable of things is human vanity: nay, through being wounded its
 strength increases and can grow to giant proportions.
 
 
 
 
 47.
 
 
 THE FARCE OF MANY INDUSTRIOUS PERSONS.--By an excess of effort they win
 leisure for themselves, and then they can do nothing with it but count the
 hours until the tale is ended.
 
 
 
 
 48.
 
 
 THE POSSESSION OF JOY ABOUNDING.--He that has joy abounding must be a good
 man, but perhaps he is not the cleverest of men, although he has reached
 the very goal towards which the cleverest man is striving with all his
 cleverness.
 
 
 
 
 49.
 
 
 IN THE MIRROR OF NATURE.--Is not a man fairly well described, when we are
 told that he likes to walk between tall fields of golden corn: that he
 prefers the forest and flower colours of sere and chilly autumn to all
 others, because they point to something more beautiful than Nature has
 ever attained: that he feels as much at home under big broad-leaved walnut
 trees as among his nearest kinsfolk: that in the mountains his greatest
 joy is to come across those tiny distant lakes from which the very eyes of
 solitude seem to peer at him: that he loves that grey calm of the misty
 twilight that steals along the windows on autumn and early winter evenings
 and shuts out all soulless sounds as with velvet curtains: that in unhewn
 stones he recognises the last remaining traces of the primeval age, eager
 for speech, and honours them from childhood upwards: that, lastly, the sea
 with its shifting serpent skin and wild-beast beauty is, and remains to
 him, unfamiliar?--Yes, something of the man is described herewith, but the
 mirror of Nature does not say that the same man, with (and not even "in
 spite of") all his idyllic sensibilities, might be disagreeable, stingy,
 and conceited. Horace, who was a good judge of such matters, in his famous
 _beatus ille qui procul negotiis_ puts the tenderest feeling for country
 life into the mouth of a Roman money-lender.
 
 
 
 
 50.
 
 
 POWER WITHOUT VICTORY.--The strongest cognition (that of the complete
 non-freedom of the human will) is yet the poorest in results, for it has
 always had the mightiest of opponents--human vanity.
 
 
 
 
 51.
 
 
 PLEASURE AND ERROR.--A beneficial influence on friends is exerted by one
 man unconsciously, through his nature; by another consciously, through
 isolated actions. Although the former nature is held to be the higher, the
 latter alone is allied to good conscience and pleasure--the pleasure in
 justification by good works, which rests upon a belief in the volitional
 character of our good and evil doing--that is to say, upon a mistake.
 
 
 
 
 52.
 
 
 THE FOLLY OF COMMITTING INJUSTICE.--The injustice we have inflicted
 ourselves is far harder to bear than the injustice inflicted upon us by
 others (not always from moral grounds, be it observed). After all, the
 doer is always the sufferer--that is, if he be capable of feeling the sting
 of conscience or of perceiving that by his action he has armed society
 against himself and cut himself off. For this reason we should beware
 still more of doing than of suffering injustice, for the sake of our own
 inward happiness--so as not to lose our feeling of well-being--quite apart
 from any consideration of the precepts of religion and morality. For in
 suffering injustice we have the consolation of a good conscience, of hope
 and of revenge, together with the sympathy and applause of the just, nay
 of the whole of society, which is afraid of the evil-doer. Not a few are
 skilled in the impure self-deception that enables them to transform every
 injustice of their own into an injustice inflicted upon them from without,
 and to reserve for their own acts the exceptional right to the plea of
 self-defence. Their object, of course, is to make their own burden
 lighter.
 
 
 
 
 53.
 
 
 ENVY WITH OR WITHOUT A MOUTHPIECE.--Ordinary envy is wont to cackle when
 the envied hen has laid an egg, thereby relieving itself and becoming
 milder. But there is a yet deeper envy that in such a case becomes dead
 silent, desiring that every mouth should be sealed and always more and
 more angry because this desire is not gratified. Silent envy grows in
 silence.
 
 
 
 
 54.
 
 
 ANGER AS A SPY.--Anger exhausts the soul and brings its very dregs to
 light. Hence, if we know no other means of gaining certainty, we must
 understand how to arouse anger in our dependents and adversaries, in order
 to learn what is really done and thought to our detriment.
 
 
 
 
 55.
 
 
 DEFENCE MORALLY MORE DIFFICULT THAN ATTACK.--The true heroic deed and
 masterpiece of the good man does not lie in attacking opinions and
 continuing to love their propounders, but in the far harder task of
 defending his own position without causing or intending to cause bitter
 heartburns to his opponent. The sword of attack is honest and broad, the
 sword of defence usually runs out to a needle point.
 
 
 
 
 56.
 
 
 HONEST TOWARDS HONESTY.--One who is openly honest towards himself ends by
 being rather conceited about this honesty. He knows only too well why he
 is honest--for the same reason that another man prefers outward show and
 hypocrisy.
 
 
 
 
 57.
 
 
 COALS OF FIRE.--The heaping of coals of fire on another's head is generally
 misunderstood and falls flat, because the other knows himself to be just
 as much in the right, and on his side too has thought of collecting coals.
 
 
 
 
 58.
 
 
 DANGEROUS BOOKS.--A man says: "Judging from my own case, I find that this
 book is harmful." Let him but wait, and perhaps one day he will confess
 that the book did him a great service by thrusting forward and bringing to
 light the hidden disease of his soul.--Altered opinions alter not at all
 (or very little) the character of a man: but they illuminate individual
 facets of his personality, which hitherto, in another constellation of
 opinions, had remained dark and unrecognisable.
 
 
 
 
 59.
 
 
 SIMULATED PITY.--We simulate pity when we wish to show ourselves superior
 to the feeling of animosity, but generally in vain. This point is not
 noticed without a considerable enhancement of that feeling of animosity.
 
 
 
 
 60.
 
 
 OPEN CONTRADICTION OFTEN CONCILIATORY.--At the moment when a man openly
 makes known his difference of opinion from a well-known party leader, the
 whole world thinks that he must be angry with the latter. Sometimes,
 however, he is just on the point of ceasing to be angry with him. He
 ventures to put himself on the same plane as his opponent, and is free
 from the tortures of suppressed envy.
 
 
 
 
 61.
 
 
 SEEING OUR LIGHT SHINING.--In the darkest hour of depression, sickness, and
 guilt, we are still glad to see others taking a light from us and making
 use of us as of the disk of the moon. By this roundabout route we derive
 some light from our own illuminating faculty.
 
 
 
 
 62.
 
 
 FELLOWSHIP IN JOY.(5)--The snake that stings us means to hurt us and
 rejoices in so doing: the lowest animal can picture to itself the _pain_
 of others. But to picture to oneself the _joy_ of others and to rejoice
 thereat is the highest privilege of the highest animals, and again,
 amongst them, is the property only of the most select
 specimens--accordingly a rare "human thing." Hence there have been
 philosophers who denied fellowship in joy.
 
 
 
 
 63.
 
 
 _Supplementary Pregnancy._--Those who have arrived at works and deeds are
 in an obscure way, they know not how, all the more pregnant with them, as
 if to prove supplementarily that these are their children and not those of
 chance.
 
 
 
 
 64.
 
 
 HARD-HEARTED FROM VANITY.--Just as justice is so often a cloak for
 weakness, so men who are fairly intelligent, but weak, sometimes attempt
 dissimulation from ambitious motives and purposely show themselves unjust
 and hard, in order to leave behind them the impression of strength.
 
 
 
 
 65.
 
 
 HUMILIATION.--If in a large sack of profit we find a single grain of
 humiliation we still make a wry face even at our good luck.
 
 
 
 
 66.
 
 
 EXTREME HEROSTRATISM.(6)--There might be Herostratuses who set fire to
 their own temple, in which their images are honoured.
 
 
 
 
 67.
 
 
 A WORLD OF DIMINUTIVES.--The fact that all that is weak and in need of help
 appeals to the heart induces in us the habit of designating by diminutive
 and softening terms all that appeals to our hearts--and accordingly
 _making_ such things weak and clinging to our imaginations.
 
 
 
 
 68.
 
 
 THE BAD CHARACTERISTIC OF SYMPATHY.--Sympathy has a peculiar impudence for
 its companion. For, wishing to help at all costs, sympathy is in no
 perplexity either as to the means of assistance or as to the nature and
 cause of the disease, and goes on courageously administering all its quack
 medicines to restore the health and reputation of the patient.
 
 
 
 
 69.
 
 
 IMPORTUNACY.--There is even an importunacy in relation to works, and the
 act of associating oneself from early youth on an intimate footing with
 the illustrious works of all times evinces an entire absence of
 shame.--Others are only importunate from ignorance, not knowing with whom
 they have to do--for instance classical scholars young and old in relation
 to the works of the Greeks.
 
 
 
 
 70.
 
 
 THE WILL IS ASHAMED OF THE INTELLECT.--In all coolness we make reasonable
 plans against our passions. But we make the most serious mistake in this
 connection in being often ashamed, when the design has to be carried out,
 of the coolness and calculation with which we conceived it. So we do just
 the unreasonable thing, from that sort of defiant magnanimity that every
 passion involves.
 
 
 
 
 71.
 
 
 WHY THE SCEPTICS OFFEND MORALITY.--He who takes his morality solemnly and
 seriously is enraged against the sceptics in the domain of morals. For
 where he lavishes all his force, he wishes others to marvel but not to
 investigate and doubt. Then there are natures whose last shred of morality
 is just the belief in morals. They behave in the same way towards
 sceptics, if possible still more passionately.
 
 
 
 
 72.
 
 
 SHYNESS.--All moralists are shy, because they know they are confounded with
 spies and traitors, so soon as their penchant is noticed. Besides, they
 are generally conscious of being impotent in action, for in the midst of
 work the motives of their activity almost withdraw their attention from
 the work.
 
 
 
 
 73.
 
 
 A DANGER TO UNIVERSAL MORALITY.--People who are at the same time noble and
 honest come to deify every devilry that brings out their honesty, and to
 suspend for a time the balance of their moral judgment.
 
 
 
 
 74.
 
 
 THE SADDEST ERROR.--It is an unpardonable offence when one discovers that
 where one was convinced of being loved, one is only regarded as a
 household utensil and decoration, whereby the master of the house can find
 an outlet for his vanity before his guests.
 
 
 
 
 75.
 
 
 LOVE AND DUALITY.--What else is love but understanding and rejoicing that
 another lives, works, and feels in a different and opposite way to
 ourselves? That love may be able to bridge over the contrasts by joys, we
 must not remove or deny those contrasts. Even self-love presupposes an
 irreconcileable duality (or plurality) in one person.
 
 
 
 
 76.
 
 
 SIGNS FROM DREAMS.--What one sometimes does not know and feel accurately in
 waking hours--whether one has a good or a bad conscience as regards some
 person--is revealed completely and unambiguously by dreams.
 
 
 
 
 77.
 
 
 DEBAUCHERY.--Not joy but joylessness is the mother of debauchery.
 
 
 
 
 78.
 
 
 REWARD AND PUNISHMENT.--No one accuses without an underlying notion of
 punishment and revenge, even when he accuses his fate or himself. All
 complaint is accusation, all self-congratulation is praise. Whether we do
 one or the other, we always make some one responsible.
 
 
 
 
 79.
 
 
 DOUBLY UNJUST.--We sometimes advance truth by a twofold injustice: when we
 see and represent consecutively the two sides of a case which we are not
 in a position to see together, but in such a way that every time we
 mistake or deny the other side, fancying that what we see is the whole
 truth.
 
 
 
 
 80.
 
 
 MISTRUST.--Self-mistrust does not always proceed uncertainly and shyly, but
 sometimes in a furious rage, having worked itself into a frenzy in order
 not to tremble.
 
 
 
 
 81.
 
 
 PHILOSOPHY OF PARVENUS.--If you want to be a personality you must even hold
 your shadow in honour.
 
 
 
 
 82.
 
 
 KNOWING HOW TO WASH ONESELF CLEAN.--We must know how to emerge cleaner from
 unclean conditions, and, if necessary, how to wash ourselves even with
 dirty water.
 
 
 
 
 83.
 
 
 LETTING YOURSELF GO.--The more you let yourself go, the less others let you
 go.
 
 
 
 
 84.
 
 
 THE INNOCENT ROGUE.--There is a slow, gradual path to vice and rascality of
 every description. In the end, the traveller is quite abandoned by the
 insect-swarms of a bad conscience, and although a thorough scoundrel he
 walks in innocence.
 
 
 
 
 85.
 
 
 MAKING PLANS.--Making plans and conceiving projects involves many agreeable
 sentiments. He that had the strength to be nothing but a contriver of
 plans all his life would be a happy man. But one must occasionally have a
 rest from this activity by carrying a plan into execution, and then comes
 anger and sobriety.
 
 
 
 
 86.
 
 
 WHEREWITH WE SEE THE IDEAL.--Every efficient man is blocked by his
 efficiency and cannot look out freely from its prison. Had he not also a
 goodly share of imperfection, he could, by reason of his virtue, never
 arrive at an intellectual or moral freedom. Our shortcomings are the eyes
 with which we see the ideal.
 
 
 
 
 87.
 
 
 DISHONEST PRAISE.--Dishonest praise causes many more twinges of conscience
 than dishonest blame, probably only because we have exposed our capacity
 for judgment far more completely through excessive praise than through
 excessive and unjust blame.
 
 
 
 
 88.
 
 
 HOW ONE DIES IS INDIFFERENT.--The whole way in which a man thinks of death
 during the prime of his life and strength is very expressive and
 significant for what we call his character. But the hour of death itself,
 his behaviour on the death-bed, is almost indifferent. The exhaustion of
 waning life, especially when old people die, the irregular or insufficient
 nourishment of the brain during this last period, the occasionally violent
 pain, the novel and untried nature of the whole position, and only too
 often the ebb and flow of superstitious impressions and fears, as if dying
 were of much consequence and meant the crossing of bridges of the most
 terrible kind--all this forbids our using death as a testimony concerning
 the living. Nor is it true that the dying man is generally more honest
 than the living. On the contrary, through the solemn attitude of the
 bystanders, the repressed or flowing streams of tears and emotions, every
 one is inveigled into a comedy of vanity, now conscious, now unconscious.
 The serious way in which every dying man is treated must have been to many
 a poor despised devil the highest joy of his whole life and a sort of
 compensation and repayment for many privations.
 
 
 
 
 89.
 
 
 MORALITY AND ITS SACRIFICE.--The origin of morality may be traced to two
 ideas: "The community is of more value than the individual," and "The
 permanent interest is to be preferred to the temporary." The conclusion
 drawn is that the permanent interest of the community is unconditionally
 to be set above the temporary interest of the individual, especially his
 momentary well-being, but also his permanent interest and even the
 prolongation of his existence. Even if the individual suffers by an
 arrangement that suits the mass, even if he is depressed and ruined by it,
 morality must be maintained and the victim brought to the sacrifice. Such
 a trend of thought arises, however, only in those who are _not_ the
 victims--for in the victim's case it enforces the claim that the individual
 might be worth more than the many, and that the present enjoyment, the
 "moment in paradise,"(7) should perhaps be rated higher than a tame
 succession of untroubled or comfortable circumstances. But the philosophy
 of the sacrificial victim always finds voice too late, and so victory
 remains with morals and morality: which are really nothing more than the
 sentiment for the whole concept of morals under which one lives and has
 been reared--and reared not as an individual but as a member of the whole,
 as a cipher in a majority. Hence it constantly happens that the individual
 makes himself into a majority by means of his morality.
 
 
 
 
 90.
 
 
 THE GOOD AND THE GOOD CONSCIENCE.--You hold that all good things have at
 all times had a good conscience? Science, which is certainly a very good
 thing, has come into the world without such a conscience and quite free
 from all pathos, rather clandestinely, by roundabout ways, walking with
 shrouded or masked face like a sinner, and always with the feeling at
 least of being a smuggler. Good conscience has bad conscience for its
 stepping-stone, not for its opposite. For all that is good has at one time
 been new and consequently strange, against morals, immoral, and has gnawed
 like a worm at the heart of the fortunate discoverer.
 
 
 
 
 91.
 
 
 SUCCESS SANCTIFIES THE INTENTIONS.--We should not shrink from treading the
 road to a virtue, even when we see clearly that nothing but egotism, and
 accordingly utility, personal comfort, fear, considerations of health,
 reputation, or glory, are the impelling motives. These motives are styled
 ignoble and selfish. Very well, but if they stimulate us to some
 virtue--for example, self-denial, dutifulness, order, thrift, measure, and
 moderation--let us listen to them, whatever their epithets may be! For if
 we reach the goal to which they summon us, then the virtue we have
 attained, by means of the pure air it makes us breathe and the spiritual
 well-being it communicates, ennobles the remoter impulses of our action,
 and afterwards we no longer perform those actions from the same coarse
 motives that inspired us before.--Education should therefore force the
 virtues on the pupil, as far as possible, according to his disposition.
 Then virtue, the sunshine and summer atmosphere of the soul, can
 contribute her own share of work and add mellowness and sweetness.
 
 
 
 
 92.
 
 
 DABBLERS IN CHRISTIANITY, NOT CHRISTIANS.--So that is your Christianity!--To
 annoy humanity you praise "God and His Saints," and again when you want to
 praise humanity you go so far that God and His Saints must be annoyed.--I
 wish you would at least learn Christian manners, as you are so deficient
 in the civility of the Christian heart.
 
 
 
 
 93.
 
 
 THE RELIGIOUS AND IRRELIGIOUS IMPRESSION OF NATURE.--A true believer must
 be to us an object of veneration, but the same holds good of a true,
 sincere, convinced unbeliever. With men of the latter stamp we are near to
 the high mountains where mighty rivers have their source, and with
 believers we are under vigorous, shady, restful trees.
 
 
 
 
 94.
 
 
 JUDICIAL MURDER.--The two greatest judicial murders(8) in the world's
 history are, to speak without exaggeration, concealed and well-concealed
 suicide. In both cases a man _willed_ to die, and in both cases he let his
 breast be pierced by the sword in the hand of human injustice.
 
 
 
 
 95.
 
 
 "LOVE."--The finest artistic conception wherein Christianity had the
 advantage over other religious systems lay in one word--Love. Hence it
 became the _lyric_ religion (whereas in its two other creations Semitism
 bestowed heroico-epical religions upon the world). In the word "love"
 there is so much meaning, so much that stimulates and appeals to memory
 and hope, that even the meanest intelligence and the coldest heart feel
 some glimmering of its sense. The cleverest woman and the lowest man think
 of the comparatively unselfish moments of their whole life, even if with
 them Eros never soared high: and the vast number of beings who _miss_ love
 from their parents or children or sweethearts, especially those whose
 sexual instincts have been refined away, have found their heart's desire
 in Christianity.
 
 
 
 
 96.
 
 
 THE FULFILMENT OF CHRISTIANITY.--In Christianity there is also an Epicurean
 trend of thought, starting from the idea that God can only demand of man,
 his creation and his image, what it is possible for man to fulfil, and
 accordingly that Christian virtue and perfection are attainable and often
 attained. Now, for instance, the belief in loving one's enemies--even if it
 is only a belief or fancy, and by no means a psychological reality (a real
 love)--gives unalloyed happiness, so long as it is genuinely believed. (As
 to the reason of this, psychologist and Christian might well differ.)
 Hence earthly life, through the belief, I mean the fancy, that it
 satisfies not only the injunction to love our enemies, but all the other
 injunctions of Christianity, and that it has really assimilated and
 embodied in itself the Divine perfection according to the command, "Be
 perfect as your Father in heaven is perfect," might actually become a holy
 life. Thus error can make Christ's promise come true.
 
 
 
 
 97.
 
 
 OF THE FUTURE OF CHRISTIANITY.--We may be allowed to form a conjecture as
 to the disappearance of Christianity and as to the places where it will be
 the slowest to retreat, if we consider where and for what reasons
 Protestantism spread with such startling rapidity. As is well known,
 Protestantism promised to do far more cheaply all that the old Church did,
 without costly masses, pilgrimages, and priestly pomp and circumstance. It
 spread particularly among the Northern nations, which were not so deeply
 rooted as those of the South in the old Church's symbolism and love of
 ritual. In the South the more powerful pagan religion survived in
 Christianity, whereas in the North Christianity meant an opposition to and
 a break with the old-time creed, and hence was from the first more
 thoughtful and less sensual, but for that very reason, in times of peril,
 more fanatical and more obstinate. If from the standpoint of _thought_ we
 succeed in uprooting Christianity, we can at once know the point where it
 will begin to disappear--the very point at which it will be most stubborn
 in defence. In other places it will bend but not break, lose its leaves
 but burst into leaf afresh, because the senses, and not thought, have gone
 over to its side. But it is the senses that maintain the belief that with
 all its expensive outlay the Church is more cheaply and conveniently
 managed than under the stern conditions of work and wages. Yet what does
 one hold leisure (or semi-idleness) to be worth, when once one has become
 accustomed to it? The senses plead against a dechristianised world, saying
 that there would be too much work to do in it and an insufficient supply
 of leisure. They take the part of magic--that is, they let God work himself
 (_oremus nos, Deus laboret_).
 
 
 
 
 98.
 
 
 THEATRICALITY AND HONESTY OF UNBELIEVERS.--There is no book that contains
 in such abundance or expresses so faithfully all that man occasionally
 finds salutary--ecstatic inward happiness, ready for sacrifice or death in
 the belief in and contemplation of _his_ truth--as the book that tells of
 Christ. From that book a clever man may learn all the means whereby a book
 can be made into a world-book, a vade-mecum for all, and especially that
 master-means of representing everything as discovered, nothing as future
 and uncertain. All influential books try to leave the same impression, as
 if the widest intellectual horizon were circumscribed here and as if about
 the sun that shines here every constellation visible at present or in the
 future must revolve.--Must not then all purely scientific books be poor in
 influence on the same grounds as such books are rich in influence? Is not
 the book fated to live humble and among humble folk, in order to be
 crucified in the end and never resurrected? In relation to what the
 religious inform us of their "knowledge" and their "holy spirit," are not
 all upright men of science "poor in spirit"? Can any religion demand more
 self-denial and draw the selfish out of themselves more inexorably than
 science?--This and similar things we may say, in any case with a certain
 theatricality, when we have to defend ourselves against believers, for it
 is impossible to conduct a defence without a certain amount of
 theatricality. But between ourselves our language must be more honest, and
 we employ a freedom that those believers are not even allowed, in their
 own interests, to understand. Away, then, with the monastic cowl of
 self-denial, with the appearance of humility! Much more and much better--so
 rings our truth! If science were not linked with the pleasure of
 knowledge, the utility of the thing known, what should we care for
 science? If a little faith, love, and hope did not lead our souls to
 knowledge, what would attract us to science? And if in science the ego
 means nothing, still the inventive, happy ego, every upright and
 industrious ego, means a great deal in the republic of the men of science.
 The homage of those who pay homage, the joy of those whom we wish well or
 honour, in some cases glory and a fair share of immortality, is the
 personal reward for every suppression of personality: to say nothing here
 of meaner views and rewards, although it is just on this account that the
 majority have sworn and always continue to swear fidelity to the laws of
 the republic and of science. If we had not remained in some degree
 unscientific, what would science matter to us? Taking everything together
 and speaking in plain language: "To a purely knowing being knowledge would
 be indifferent."--Not the quality but the quantity of faith and devoutness
 distinguishes us from the pious, the believers. We are content with less.
 But should one of them cry out to us: "Be content and show yourselves
 contented!" we could easily answer: "As a matter of fact, we do not belong
 to the most discontented class. But you, if your faith makes you happy,
 show yourselves to be happy. Your faces have always done more harm to your
 faith than our reasons! If that glad message of your Bible were written in
 your faces, you would not need to demand belief in the authority of that
 book in such stiff-necked fashion. Your words, your actions should
 continually make the Bible superfluous--in fact, through you a new Bible
 should continually come into being. As it is, your apologia for
 Christianity is rooted in your unchristianity, and with your defence you
 write your own condemnation. If you, however, should wish to emerge from
 your dissatisfaction with Christianity, you should ponder over the
 experience of two thousand years, which, clothed in the modest form of a
 question, may be voiced as follows: 'If Christ really intended to redeem
 the world, may he not be said to have failed?' "
 
 
 
 
 99.
 
 
 THE POET AS GUIDE TO THE FUTURE.--All the surplus poetical force that still
 exists in modern humanity, but is not used under our conditions of life,
 should (without any deduction) be devoted to a definite goal--not to
 depicting the present nor to reviving and summarising the past, but to
 pointing the way to the future. Nor should this be so done as if the poet,
 like an imaginative political economist, had to anticipate a more
 favourable national and social state of things and picture their
 realisation. Rather will he, just as the earlier poets portrayed the
 images of the Gods, portray the fair images of men. He will divine those
 cases where, in the midst of our modern world and reality (which will not
 be shirked or repudiated in the usual poetic fashion), a great, noble soul
 is still possible, where it may be embodied in harmonious, equable
 conditions, where it may become permanent, visible, and representative of
 a type, and so, by the stimulus to imitation and envy, help to create the
 future. The poems of such a poet would be distinguished by appearing
 secluded and protected from the heated atmosphere of the passions. The
 irremediable failure, the shattering of all the strings of the human
 instrument, the scornful laughter and gnashing of teeth, and all tragedy
 and comedy in the usual old sense, would appear by the side of this new
 art as mere archaic lumber, a blurring of the outlines of the
 world-picture. Strength, kindness, gentleness, purity, and an unsought,
 innate moderation in the personalities and their action: a levelled soil,
 giving rest and pleasure to the foot: a shining heaven mirrored in faces
 and events: science and art welded into a new unity: the mind living
 together with her sister, the soul, without arrogance or jealousy, and
 enticing from contrasts the grace of seriousness, not the impatience of
 discord--all this would be the general environment, the background on which
 the delicate differences of the embodied ideals would make the real
 picture, that of ever-growing human majesty. Many roads to this poetry of
 the future start from Goethe, but the quest needs good pathfinders and
 above all a far greater strength than is possessed by modern poets, who
 unscrupulously represent the half-animal and the immaturity and
 intemperance that are mistaken by them for power and naturalness.
 
 
 
 
 100.
 
 
 THE MUSE AS PENTHESILEA.(9)--"Better to rot than to be a woman without
 charm." When once the Muse thinks thus, the end of her art is again at
 hand. But it can be a tragic and also a comic finale.
 
 
 
 
 101.
 
 
 THE CIRCUITOUS PATH TO THE BEAUTIFUL.--If the beautiful is to be identified
 with that which gives pleasure--and thus sang the Muses once--the useful is
 often the necessary circuitous path to the beautiful, and has a perfect
 right to spurn the short-sighted censure of men who live for the moment,
 who will not wait, and who think that they can reach all good things
 without ever taking a circuitous path.
 
 
 
 
 102.
 
 
 AN EXCUSE FOR MANY A TRANSGRESSION.--The ceaseless desire to create, the
 eternal looking outward of the artist, hinders him from becoming better
 and more beautiful as a personality: unless his craving for glory be great
 enough to compel him to exhibit in his relations with other men a growth
 corresponding to the growing beauty and greatness of his works. In any
 case he has but a limited measure of strength, and how could the
 proportion of strength that he spends on himself be of any benefit to his
 work--or _vice versa_?
 
 
 
 
 103.
 
 
 SATISFYING THE BEST PEOPLE.--If we have satisfied the best people of our
 time with our art, it is a sign that we shall not satisfy the best people
 of the succeeding period. We have indeed "lived for all time," and the
 applause of the best people ensures our fame.(10)
 
 
 
 
 104.
 
 
 OF ONE SUBSTANCE.--If we are of one substance with a book or a work of art,
 we think in our heart of hearts that it must be excellent, and are
 offended if others find it ugly, over-spiced, or pretentious.
 
 
 
 
 105.
 
 
 SPEECH AND EMOTION.--That speech is not given to us to communicate our
 emotions may be seen from the fact that all simple men are ashamed to seek
 for words to express their deeper feelings. These feelings are expressed
 only in actions, and even here such men blush if others seem to divine
 their motives. After all, among poets, to whom God generally denies this
 shame, the more noble are more monosyllabic in the language of emotion,
 and evince a certain constraint: whereas the real poets of emotion are for
 the most part shameless in practical life.
 
 
 
 
 106.
 
 
 A MISTAKE ABOUT A PRIVATION.--He that has not for a long time been
 completely weaned from an art, and is still always at home in it, has no
 idea how small a privation it is to live without that art.
 
 
 
 
 107.
 
 
 THREE-QUARTER STRENGTH.--A work that is meant to give an impression of
 health should be produced with three-quarters, at the most, of the
 strength of its creator. If he has gone to his farthest limit, the work
 excites the observer and disconcerts him by its tension. All good things
 have something lazy about them and lie like cows in the meadow.
 
 
 
 
 108.
 
 
 REFUSING TO HAVE HUNGER AS A GUEST.--As refined fare serves a hungry man as
 well as and no better than coarser food, the more pretentious artist will
 not dream of inviting the hungry man to his meal.
 
 
 
 
 109.
 
 
 LIVING WITHOUT ART AND WINE.--It is with works of art as with wine--it is
 better if one can do without both and keep to water, and if from the inner
 fire and inner sweetness of the soul the water spontaneously changes again
 into wine.
 
 
 
 
 110.
 
 
 THE PIRATE-GENIUS.--The pirate-genius in art, who even knows how to deceive
 subtle minds, arises when some one unscrupulously and from youth upwards
 regards all good things, that are not protected by law, as the property of
 a particular person, as his legitimate spoil. Now all the good things of
 past ages and masters lie free around us, hedged about and protected by
 the reverential awe of the few who know them. To these few our
 robber-genius, by the force of his impudence, bids defiance and
 accumulates for himself a wealth that once more calls forth homage and
 awe.
 
 
 
 
 111.
 
 
 TO THE POETS OF GREAT TOWNS.--In the gardens of modern poetry it will
 clearly be observed that the sewers of great towns are too near. With the
 fragrance of flowers is mingled something that betrays abomination and
 putrescence. With pain I ask: "Must you poets always request wit and dirt
 to stand godfather, when an innocent and beautiful sensation has to be
 christened by you? Are you obliged to dress your noble goddess in a hood
 of devilry and caricature? But whence this necessity, this obligation?"
 The reason is--because you live too near the sewers.
 
 
 
 
 112.
 
 
 OF THE SALT OF SPEECH.--No one has ever explained why the Greek writers,
 having at command such an unparalleled wealth and power of language, made
 so sparing a use of their resources that every post-classical Greek book
 appears by comparison crude, over-coloured, and extravagant. It is said
 that towards the North Polar ice and in the hottest countries salt is
 becoming less and less used, whereas on the other hand the dwellers on the
 plains and by the coast in the more temperate zones use salt in great
 abundance. Is it possible that the Greeks from a twofold reason--because
 their intellect was colder and clearer but their fundamental passionate
 nature far more tropical than ours--did not need salt and spice to the same
 extent that we do?
 
 
 
 
 113.
 
 
 THE FREEST WRITER.--In a book for free spirits one cannot avoid mention of
 Laurence Sterne, the man whom Goethe honoured as the freest spirit of his
 century. May he be satisfied with the honour of being called the freest
 writer of all times, in comparison with whom all others appear stiff,
 square-toed, intolerant, and downright boorish! In his case we should not
 speak of the clear and rounded but of "the endless melody"--if by this
 phrase we arrive at a name for an artistic style in which the definite
 form is continually broken, thrust aside and transferred to the realm of
 the indefinite, so that it signifies one and the other at the same time.
 Sterne is the great master of _double entendre_, this phrase being
 naturally used in a far wider sense than is commonly done when one applies
 it to sexual relations. We may give up for lost the reader who always
 wants to know exactly what Sterne thinks about a matter, and whether he be
 making a serious or a smiling face (for he can do both with one wrinkling
 of his features; he can be and even wishes to be right and wrong at the
 same moment, to interweave profundity and farce). His digressions are at
 once continuations and further developments of the story, his maxims
 contain a satire on all that is sententious, his dislike of seriousness is
 bound up with a disposition to take no matter merely externally and on the
 surface. So in the proper reader he arouses a feeling of uncertainty
 whether he be walking, lying, or standing, a feeling most closely akin to
 that of floating in the air. He, the most versatile of writers,
 communicates something of this versatility to his reader. Yes, Sterne
 unexpectedly changes the parts, and is often as much reader as author, his
 book being like a play within a play, a theatre audience before another
 theatre audience. We must surrender at discretion to the mood of Sterne,
 although we can always expect it to be gracious. It is strangely
 instructive to see how so great a writer as Diderot has affected this
 _double entendre_ of Sterne's--to be equally ambiguous throughout is just
 the Sternian super-humour. Did Diderot imitate, admire, ridicule, or
 parody Sterne in his _Jacques le Fataliste_? One cannot be exactly
 certain, and this uncertainty was perhaps intended by the author. This
 very doubt makes the French unjust to the work of one of their first
 masters, one who need not be ashamed of comparison with any of the
 ancients or moderns. For humour (and especially for this humorous attitude
 towards humour itself) the French are too serious. Is it necessary to add
 that of all great authors Sterne is the worst model, in fact the
 inimitable author, and that even Diderot had to pay for his daring? What
 the worthy Frenchmen and before them some Greeks and Romans aimed at and
 attained in prose is the very opposite of what Sterne aims at and attains.
 He raises himself as a masterly exception above all that artists in
 writing demand of themselves--propriety, reserve, character, steadfastness
 of purpose, comprehensiveness, perspicuity, good deportment in gait and
 feature. Unfortunately Sterne the man seems to have been only too closely
 related to Sterne the writer. His squirrel-soul sprang with insatiable
 unrest from branch to branch; he knew what lies between sublimity and
 rascality; he had sat on every seat, always with unabashed watery eyes and
 mobile play of feature. He was--if language does not revolt from such a
 combination--of a hard-hearted kindness, and in the midst of the joys of a
 grotesque and even corrupt imagination he showed the bashful grace of
 innocence. Such a carnal and spiritual hermaphroditism, such untrammelled
 wit penetrating into every vein and muscle, was perhaps never possessed by
 any other man.
 
 
 
 
 114.
 
 
 A CHOICE REALITY.--Just as the good prose writer only takes words that
 belong to the language of daily intercourse, though not by a long way all
 its words--whence arises a choice style--so the good poet of the future will
 only represent the real and turn his eyes away from all fantastic,
 superstitious, half-voiced, forgotten stories, to which earlier poets
 devoted their powers. Only reality, though by a long way not every
 reality--but a choice reality.
 
 
 
 
 115.
 
 
 DEGENERATE SPECIES OF ART.--Side by side with the genuine species of art,
 those of great repose and great movement, there are degenerate
 species--weary, blase art and excited art. Both would have their weakness
 taken for strength and wish to be confounded with the genuine species.
 
 
 
 
 116.
 
 
 A HERO IMPOSSIBLE FROM LACK OF COLOUR.--The typical poets and artists of
 our age like to compose their pictures upon a background of shimmering
 red, green, grey, and gold, on the background of nervous sensuality--a
 condition well understood by the children of this century. The drawback
 comes when we do _not_ look at these pictures with the eyes of our
 century. Then we see that the great figures painted by these artists have
 something flickering, tremulous, and dizzy about them, and accordingly we
 do not ascribe to them heroic deeds, but at best mock-heroic, swaggering
 _mis_deeds.
 
 
 
 
 117.
 
 
 OVERLADEN STYLE.--The overladen style is a consequence of the
 impoverishment of the organising force together with a lavish stock of
 expedients and intentions. At the beginnings of art the very reverse
 conditions sometimes appear.
 
 
 
 
 118.
 
 
 _PULCHRUM EST PAUCORUM HOMINUM._--History and experience tell us that the
 significant grotesqueness that mysteriously excites the imagination and
 carries one beyond everyday reality, is older and grows more luxuriantly
 than the beautiful and reverence for the beautiful in art: and that it
 begins to flourish exceedingly when the sense for beauty is on the wane.
 For the vast majority of mankind this grotesque seems to be a higher need
 than the beautiful, presumably because it contains a coarser narcotic.
 
 
 
 
 119.
 
 
 ORIGINS OF TASTE IN WORKS OF ART.--If we consider the primary germs of the
 artistic sense, and ask ourselves what are the various kinds of joy
 produced by the firstlings of art--as, for example, among savage tribes--we
 find first of all the joy of understanding what another means. Art in this
 case is a sort of conundrum, which causes its solver pleasure in his own
 quick and keen perceptions.--Then the roughest works of art remind us of
 the pleasant things we have actually experienced, and so give joy--as, for
 example, when the artist alludes to a chase, a victory, a wedding.--Again,
 the representation may cause us to feel excited, touched, inflamed, as for
 instance in the glorification of revenge and danger. Here the enjoyment
 lies in the excitement itself, in the victory over tedium.--The memory,
 too, of unpleasant things, so far as they have been overcome or make us
 appear interesting to the listener as subjects for art (as when the singer
 describes the mishaps of a daring seaman), can inspire great joy, the
 credit for which is given to art.--A more subtle variety is the joy that
 arises at the sight of all that is regular and symmetrical in lines,
 points, and rhythms. For by a certain analogy is awakened the feeling for
 all that is orderly and regular in life, which one has to thank alone for
 all well-being. So in the cult of symmetry we unconsciously do homage to
 rule and proportion as the source of our previous happiness, and the joy
 in this case is a kind of hymn of thanksgiving. Only when a certain
 satiety of the last-mentioned joy arises does a more subtle feeling step
 in, that enjoyment might even lie in a violation of the symmetrical and
 regular. This feeling, for example, impels us to seek reason in apparent
 unreason, and the sort of aesthetic riddle-guessing that results is in a
 way the higher species of the first-named artistic joy.--He who pursues
 this speculation still further will know what kind of hypotheses for the
 explanation of aesthetic phenomena are hereby fundamentally rejected.
 
 
 
 
 120.
 
 
 NOT TOO NEAR.--It is a disadvantage for good thoughts when they follow too
 closely on one another, for they hide the view from each other. That is
 why great artists and writers have made an abundant use of the mediocre.
 
 
 
 
 121.
 
 
 ROUGHNESS AND WEAKNESS.--Artists of all periods have made the discovery
 that in roughness lies a certain strength, and that not every one can be
 rough who wants to be: also that many varieties of weakness have a
 powerful effect on the emotions. From this source are derived many
 artistic substitutes, which not even the greatest and most conscientious
 artists can abstain from using.
 
 
 
 
 122.
 
 
 GOOD MEMORY.--Many a man fails to become a thinker for the sole reason that
 his memory is too good.
 
 
 
 
 123.
 
 
 AROUSING INSTEAD OF APPEASING HUNGER.--Great artists fancy that they have
 taken full possession of a soul. In reality, and often to their painful
 disappointment, that soul has only been made more capacious and
 insatiable, so that a dozen greater artists could plunge into its depths
 without filling it up.
 
 
 
 
 124.
 
 
 ARTISTS' ANXIETY.--The anxiety lest people may not believe that their
 figures are _alive_ can mislead many artists of declining taste to portray
 these figures so that they appear as if mad. From the same anxiety, on the
 other hand, Greek artists of the earliest ages gave even dead and sorely
 wounded men that smile which they knew as the most vivid sign of
 life--careless of the actual forms bestowed by nature on life at its last
 gasp.
 
 
 
 
 125.
 
 
 THE CIRCLE MUST BE COMPLETED.--He who follows a philosophy or a genre of
 art to the end of its career and beyond, understands from inner experience
 why the masters and disciples who come after have so often turned, with a
 depreciatory gesture, into a new groove. The circle must be described--but
 the individual, even the greatest, sits firm on his point of the
 circumference, with an inexorable look of obstinacy, as if the circle
 ought never to be completed.
 
 
 
 
 126.
 
 
 THE OLDER ART AND THE SOUL OF THE PRESENT.--Since every art becomes more
 and more adapted to the expression of spiritual states, of the more
 lively, delicate, energetic, and passionate states, the later masters,
 spoilt by these means of expression, do not feel at their ease in the
 presence of the old-time works of art. They feel as if the ancients had
 merely been lacking in the means of making their souls speak clearly, also
 perhaps in some necessary technical preliminaries. They think that they
 must render some assistance in this quarter, for they believe in the
 similarity or even unity of all souls. In truth, however, measure,
 symmetry, a contempt for graciousness and charm, an unconscious severity
 and morning chilliness, an evasion of passion, as if passion meant the
 death of art--such are the constituents of sentiment and morality in all
 old masters, who selected and arranged their means of expression not at
 random but in a necessary connection with their morality. Knowing this,
 are we to deny those that come after the right to animate the older works
 with their soul? No, for these works can only survive through our giving
 them our soul, and our blood alone enables them to speak to _us_. The real
 "historic" discourse would talk ghostly speech to ghosts. We honour the
 great artists less by that barren timidity that allows every word, every
 note to remain intact than by energetic endeavours to aid them continually
 to a new life.--True, if Beethoven were suddenly to come to life and hear
 one of his works performed with that modern animation and nervous
 refinement that bring glory to our masters of execution, he would probably
 be silent for a long while, uncertain whether he should raise his hand to
 curse or to bless, but perhaps say at last: "Well, well! That is neither I
 nor not-I, but a third thing--it seems to me, too, something right, if not
 just _the_ right thing. But you must know yourselves what to do, as in any
 case it is you who have to listen. As our Schiller says, 'the living man
 is right.' So have it your own way, and let me go down again."
 
 
 
 
 127.
 
 
 AGAINST THE DISPARAGERS OF BREVITY.--A brief dictum may be the fruit and
 harvest of long reflection. The reader, however, who is a novice in this
 field and has never considered the case in point, sees something embryonic
 in all brief dicta, not without a reproachful hint to the author,
 requesting him not to serve up such raw and ill-prepared food.
 
 
 
 
 128.
 
 
 AGAINST THE SHORT-SIGHTED.--Do you think it is piece-work because it is
 (and must be) offered you in pieces?
 
 
 
 
 129.
 
 
 READERS OF APHORISMS.--The worst readers of aphorisms are the friends of
 the author, if they make a point of referring the general to the
 particular instance to which the aphorism owes its origin. This
 namby-pamby attitude brings all the author's trouble to naught, and
 instead of a philosophic lesson and a philosophic frame of mind, they
 deservedly gain nothing but the satisfaction of a vulgar curiosity.
 
 
 
 
 130.
 
 
 READERS' INSULTS.--The reader offers a two-fold insult to the author by
 praising his second book at the expense of his first (or _vice versa_) and
 by expecting the author to be grateful to him on that account.
 
 
 
 
 131.
 
 
 THE EXCITING ELEMENT IN THE HISTORY OF ART.--We fall into a state of
 terrible tension when we follow the history of an art--as, for example,
 that of Greek oratory--and, passing from master to master, observe their
 increasing precautions to obey the old and the new laws and all these
 self-imposed limitations. We see that the bow _must_ snap, and that the
 so-called "loose" composition, with the wonderful means of expression
 smothered and concealed (in this particular case the florid style of
 Asianism), was once necessary and almost _beneficial_.
 
 
 
 
 132.
 
 
 TO THE GREAT IN ART.--That enthusiasm for some object which you, O great
 man, introduce into this world causes the intelligence of the many to be
 stunted. The knowledge of this fact spells humiliation. But the enthusiast
 wears his hump with pride and pleasure, and you have the consolation of
 feeling that you have increased the world's happiness.
 
 
 
 
 133.
 
 
 CONSCIENCELESS AESTHETES.--The real fanatics of an artistic school are
 perhaps those utterly inartistic natures that are not even grounded in the
 elements of artistic study and creation, but are impressed with the
 strongest of all the elementary influences of an art. For them there is no
 aesthetic conscience--hence nothing to hold them back from fanaticism.
 
 
 
 
 134.
 
 
 HOW THE SOUL SHOULD BE MOVED BY THE NEW MUSIC.--The artistic purpose
 followed by the new music, in what is now forcibly but none too lucidly
 termed "endless melody," can be understood by going into the sea,
 gradually losing one's firm tread on the bottom, and finally surrendering
 unconditionally to the fluid element. One has to _swim_. In the previous,
 older music one was forced, with delicate or stately or impassioned
 movement, to _dance_. The measure necessary for dancing, the observance of
 a distinct balance of time and force in the soul of the hearer, imposed a
 continual self-control. Through the counteraction of the cooler draught of
 air which came from this caution and the warmer breath of musical
 enthusiasm, that music exercised its spell.--Richard Wagner aimed at a
 different excitation of the soul, allied, as above said, to swimming and
 floating. This is perhaps the most essential of his innovations. His
 famous method, originating from this aim and adapted to it--the "endless
 melody"--strives to break and sometimes even to despise all mathematical
 equilibrium of time and force. He is only too rich in the invention of
 such effects, which sound to the old school like rhythmic paradoxes and
 blasphemies. He dreads petrifaction, crystallisation, the development of
 music into the architectural. He accordingly sets up a three-time rhythm
 in opposition to the double-time, not infrequently introduces five-time
 and seven-time, immediately repeats a phrase, but with a prolation, so
 that its time is again doubled and trebled. From an easy-going imitation
 of such art may arise a great danger to music, for by the side of the
 superabundance of rhythmic emotion demoralisation and decadence lurk in
 ambush. The danger will become very great if such music comes to associate
 itself more and more closely with a quite naturalistic art of acting and
 pantomime, trained and dominated by no higher plastic models; an art that
 knows no measure in itself and can impart no measure to the kindred
 element, the all-too-womanish nature of music.
 
 
 
 
 135.
 
 
 POET AND REALITY.--The Muse of the poet who is not in love with reality
 will not be reality, and will bear him children with hollow eyes and all
 too tender bones.
 
 
 
 
 136.
 
 
 MEANS AND END.--In art the end does not justify the means, but holy means
 can justify the end.
 
 
 
 
 137.
 
 
 THE WORST READERS.--The worst readers are those who act like plundering
 soldiers. They take out some things that they might use, cover the rest
 with filth and confusion, and blaspheme about the whole.
 
 
 
 
 138.
 
 
 SIGNS OF A GOOD WRITER.--Good writers have two things in common: they
 prefer being understood to being admired, and they do not write for the
 critical and over-shrewd reader.
 
 
 
 
 139.
 
 
 THE MIXED SPECIES.--The mixed species in art bear witness to their authors'
 distrust of their own strength. They seek auxiliary powers, advocates,
 hiding-places--such is the case with the poet who calls in philosophy, the
 musician who calls in the drama, and the thinker who calls in rhetoric to
 his aid.
 
 
 
 
 140.
 
 
 SHUTTING ONE'S MOUTH.--When his book opens its mouth, the author must shut
 his.
 
 
 
 
 141.
 
 
 BADGES OF RANK.--All poets and men of letters who are in love with the
 superlative want to do more than they can.
 
 
 
 
 142.
 
 
 COLD BOOKS.--The deep thinker reckons on readers who feel with him the
 happiness that lies in deep thinking. Hence a book that looks cold and
 sober, if seen in the right light, may seem bathed in the sunshine of
 spiritual cheerfulness and become a genuine soul-comforter.
 
 
 
 
 143.
 
 
 A KNACK OF THE SLOW-WITTED.--The slow-witted thinker generally allies
 himself with loquacity and ceremoniousness. By the former he thinks he is
 gaining mobility and fluency, by the latter he gives his peculiarity the
 appearance of being a result of free will and artistic purpose, with a
 view to dignity, which needs slow movement.
 
 
 
 
 144.
 
 
 _LE STYLE BAROQUE._(11)--He who as thinker and writer is not born or
 trained to dialectic and the consecutive arrangement of ideas, will
 unconsciously turn to the rhetoric and dramatic forms. For, after all, his
 object is to make himself understood and to carry the day by force, and he
 is indifferent whether, as shepherd, he honestly guides to himself the
 hearts of his fellow-men, or, as robber, he captures them by surprise.
 This is true of the plastic arts as of music: where the feeling of
 insufficient dialectic or a deficiency in expression or narration,
 together with an urgent, over-powerful impulse to form, gives birth to
 that species of style known as "baroque." Only the ill-educated and the
 arrogant will at once find a depreciatory force in this word. The baroque
 style always arises at the time of decay of a great art, when the demands
 of art in classical expression have become too great. It is a natural
 phenomenon which will be observed with melancholy--for it is a forerunner
 of the night--but at the same time with admiration for its peculiar
 compensatory arts of expression and narration. To this style belongs
 already a choice of material and subjects of the highest dramatic tension,
 at which the heart trembles even when there is no art, because heaven and
 hell are all too near the emotions: then, the oratory of strong passion
 and gestures, of ugly sublimity, of great masses, in fact of absolute
 quantity _per se_ (as is shown in Michael Angelo, the father or
 grandfather of the Italian baroque stylists): the lights of dusk,
 illumination and conflagration playing upon those strongly moulded forms:
 ever-new ventures in means and aims, strongly underscored by artists for
 artists, while the layman must fancy he sees an unconscious overflowing of
 all the horns of plenty of an original nature-art: all these
 characteristics that constitute the greatness of that style are neither
 possible nor permitted in the earlier ante-classical and classical periods
 of a branch of art. Such luxuries hang long on the tree like forbidden
 fruit. Just now, when music is passing into this last phase, we may learn
 to know the phenomenon of the baroque style in peculiar splendour, and, by
 comparison, find much that is instructive for earlier ages. For from Greek
 times onward there has often been a baroque style, in poetry, oratory,
 prose writing, sculpture, and, as is well known, in architecture. This
 style, though wanting in the highest nobility,--the nobility of an
 innocent, unconscious, triumphant perfection,--has nevertheless given
 pleasure to many of the best and most serious minds of their time. Hence,
 as aforesaid, it is presumptuous to depreciate it without reserve, however
 happy we may feel because our taste for it has not made us insensible to
 the purer and greater style.
 
 
 
 
 145.
 
 
 THE VALUE OF HONEST BOOKS.--Honest books make the reader honest, at least
 by exciting his hatred and aversion, which otherwise cunning cleverness
 knows so well how to conceal. Against a book, however, we let ourselves
 go, however restrained we may be in our relations with men.
 
 
 
 
 146.
 
 
 HOW ART MAKES PARTISANS.--Individual fine passages, an exciting general
 tenor, a moving and absorbing finale--so much of a work of art is
 accessible even to most laymen. In an art period when it is desired to win
 over the great majority of the laymen to the side of the artists and to
 make a party perhaps for the very preservation of art, the creative artist
 will do well to offer nothing more than the above. Then he will not be a
 squanderer of his strength, in spheres where no one is grateful to him.
 For to perform the remaining functions, the imitation of Nature in her
 organic development and growth, would in that case be like sowing seeds in
 water.
 
 
 
 
 147.
 
 
 BECOMING GREAT TO THE DETRIMENT OF HISTORY.--Every later master who leads
 the taste of art-lovers into his channel unconsciously gives rise to a
 selection and revaluation of the older masters and their works. Whatever
 in them is conformable and akin to him, and anticipates and foreshadows
 him, appears henceforth as the only important element in them and their
 works--a fruit in which a great error usually lies hidden like a worm.
 
 
 
 
 148.
 
 
 HOW AN EPOCH BECOMES LURED TO ART.--If we teach people by all the
 enchantments of artists and thinkers to feel reverence for their defects,
 their intellectual poverty, their absurd infatuations and passions (as it
 is quite possible to do); if we show them only the lofty side of crime and
 folly, only the touching and appealing element in weakness and flabbiness
 and blind devotion (that too has often enough been done):--we have employed
 the means for inspiring even an unphilosophical and inartistic age with an
 ecstatic love of philosophy and art (especially of thinkers and artists as
 personalities) and, in the worst case, perhaps with the only means of
 defending the existence of such tender and fragile beings.
 
 
 
 
 149.
 
 
 CRITICISM AND JOY.--Criticism, one-sided and unjust as well as intelligent
 criticism, gives so much pleasure to him who exercises it that the world
 is indebted to every work and every action that inspires much criticism
 and many critics. For criticism draws after it a glittering train of
 joyousness, wit, self-admiration, pride, instruction, designs of
 improvement.--The God of joy created the bad and the mediocre for the same
 reason that he created the good.
 
 
 
 
 150.
 
 
 BEYOND HIS LIMITS.--When an artist wants to be more than an artist--for
 example, the moral awakener of his people--he at last falls in love, as a
 punishment, with a monster of moral substance. The Muse laughs, for,
 though a kind-hearted Goddess, she can also be malignant from jealousy.
 Milton and Klopstock are cases in point.
 
 
 
 
 151.
 
 
 A GLASS EYE.--The tendency of a talent towards moral subjects, characters,
 motives, towards the "beautiful soul" of the work of art, is often only a
 glass eye put on by the artist who lacks a beautiful soul. It may result,
 though rarely, that his eye finally becomes living Nature, if indeed it be
 Nature with a somewhat troubled look. But the ordinary result is that the
 whole world thinks it sees Nature where there is only cold glass.
 
 
 
 
 152.
 
 
 WRITING AND DESIRE FOR VICTORY.--Writing should always indicate a victory,
 indeed a conquest of oneself which must be communicated to others for
 their behoof. There are, however, dyspeptic authors who only write when
 they cannot digest something, or when something has remained stuck in
 their teeth. Through their anger they try unconsciously to disgust the
 reader too, and to exercise violence upon him--that is, they desire
 victory, but victory over others.
 
 
 
 
 153.
 
 
 A GOOD BOOK NEEDS TIME.--Every good book tastes bitter when it first comes
 out, for it has the defect of newness. Moreover, it suffers damage from
 its living author, if he is well known and much talked about. For all the
 world is accustomed to confuse the author with his work. Whatever of
 profundity, sweetness, and brilliance the work may contain must be
 developed as the years go by, under the care of growing, then old, and
 lastly traditional reverence. Many hours must pass, many a spider must
 have woven its web about the book. A book is made better by good readers
 and clearer by good opponents.
 
 
 
 
 154.
 
 
 EXTRAVAGANCE AS AN ARTISTIC MEANS.--Artists well understand the idea of
 using extravagance as an artistic means in order to convey an impression
 of wealth. This is one of those innocent wiles of soul-seduction that the
 artist must know, for in his world, which has only appearance in view, the
 means to appearance need not necessarily be genuine.
 
 
 
 
 155.
 
 
 THE HIDDEN BARREL-ORGAN.--Genius, by virtue of its more ample drapery,
 knows better than talent how to hide its barrel-organ. Yet after all it
 too can only play its seven old pieces over and over again.
 
 
 
 
 156.
 
 
 THE NAME ON THE TITLE-PAGE.--It is now a matter of custom and almost of
 duty for the author's name to appear on the book, and this is a main cause
 of the fact that books have so little influence. If they are good, they
 are worth more than the personalities of their authors, of which they are
 the quintessences. But as soon as the author makes himself known on the
 title-page, the quintessence, from the reader's point of view, becomes
 diluted with the personal, the most personal element, and the aim of the
 book is frustrated. It is the ambition of the intellect no longer to
 appear individual.
 
 
 
 
 157.
 
 
 THE MOST CUTTING CRITICISM.--We make the most cutting criticism of a man or
 a book when we indicate his or its ideal.
 
 
 
 
 158.
 
 
 LITTLE OR NO LOVE.--Every good book is written for a particular reader and
 men of his stamp, and for that very reason is looked upon unfavourably by
 all other readers, by the vast majority. Its reputation accordingly rests
 on a narrow basis and must be built up by degrees.--The mediocre and bad
 book is mediocre and bad because it seeks to please, and does please, a
 great number.
 
 
 
 
 159.
 
 
 MUSIC AND DISEASE.--The danger of the new music lies in the fact that it
 puts the cup of rapture and exaltation to the lips so invitingly, and with
 such a show of moral ecstasy, that even the noble and temperate man always
 drinks a drop too much. This minimum of intemperance, constantly repeated,
 can in the end bring about a deeper convulsion and destruction of mental
 health than any coarse excess could do. Hence nothing remains but some day
 to fly from the grotto of the nymph, and through perils and billowy seas
 to forge one's way to the smoke of Ithaca and the embraces of a simpler
 and more human spouse.
 
 
 
 
 160.
 
 
 ADVANTAGE FOR OPPONENTS.--A book full of intellect communicates something
 thereof even to its opponents.
 
 
 
 
 161.
 
 
 YOUTH AND CRITICISM.--To criticise a book means, for the young, not to let
 oneself be touched by a single productive thought therefrom, and to
 protect one's skin with hands and feet. The youngster lives in opposition
 to all novelty that he cannot love in the lump, in a position of
 self-defence, and in this connection he commits, as often as he can, a
 superfluous sin.
 
 
 
 
 162.
 
 
 EFFECT OF QUANTITY.--The greatest paradox in the history of poetic art lies
 in this: that in all that constitutes the greatness of the old poets a man
 may be a barbarian, faulty and deformed from top to toe, and still remain
 the greatest of poets. This is the case with Shakespeare, who, as compared
 with Sophocles, is like a mine of immeasurable wealth in gold, lead, and
 rubble, whereas Sophocles is not merely gold, but gold in its noblest
 form, one that almost makes us forget the money-value of the metal. But
 quantity in its highest intensity has the same effect as quality. That is
 a good thing for Shakespeare.
 
 
 
 
 163.
 
 
 ALL BEGINNING IS DANGEROUS.--The Poet can choose whether to raise emotion
 from one grade to another, and so finally to exalt it to a great height--or
 to try a surprise attack, and from the start to pull the bell-rope with
 might and main. Both processes have their danger--in the first case his
 hearer may run away from him through boredom, in the second through
 terror.
 
 
 
 
 164.
 
 
 IN FAVOUR OF CRITICS.--Insects sting, not from malice, but because they too
 want to live. It is the same with our critics--they desire our blood, not
 our pain.
 
 
 
 
 165.
 
 
 SUCCESS OF APHORISMS.--The inexperienced, when an aphorism at once
 illuminates their minds with its naked truth, always think that it is old
 and well known. They look askance at the author, as if he had wanted to
 steal the common property of all, whereas they enjoy highly spiced
 half-truths, and give the author to understand as much. He knows how to
 appreciate the hint, and easily guesses thereby where he has succeeded and
 failed.
 
 
 
 
 166.
 
 
 THE DESIRE FOR VICTORY.--An artist who exceeds the limit of his strength in
 all that he undertakes will end by carrying the multitude along with him
 through the spectacle of violent wrestling that he affords. Success is not
 always the accompaniment only of victory, but also of the desire for
 victory.
 
 
 
 
 167.
 
 
 _SIBI SCRIBERE._--The sensible author writes for no other posterity than
 his own--that is, for his age--so as to be able even then to take pleasure
 in himself.
 
 
 
 
 168.
 
 
 PRAISE OF THE APHORISM.--A good aphorism is too hard for the tooth of time,
 and is not worn away by all the centuries, although it serves as food for
 every epoch. Hence it is the greatest paradox in literature, the
 imperishable in the midst of change, the nourishment which always remains
 highly valued, as salt does, and never becomes stupid like salt.
 
 
 
 
 169.
 
 
 THE ART-NEED OF THE SECOND ORDER.--The people may have something of what
 can be called art-need, but it is small, and can be cheaply satisfied. On
 the whole, the remnant of art (it must be honestly confessed) suffices for
 this need. Let us consider, for example, the kind of melodies and songs in
 which the most vigorous, unspoiled, and true-hearted classes of the
 population find genuine delight; let us live among shepherds, cowherds,
 peasants, huntsmen, soldiers, and sailors, and give ourselves the answer.
 And in the country town, just in the houses that are the homes of
 inherited civic virtue, is it not the worst music at present produced that
 is loved and, one might say, cherished? He who speaks of deeper needs and
 unsatisfied yearnings for art among the people, as it is, is a crank or an
 impostor. Be honest! Only in exceptional men is there now an art-need in
 the highest sense--because art is once more on the down-grade, and human
 powers and hopes are for the time being directed to other matters.--Apart
 from this, outside the populace, there exists indeed, in the higher and
 highest strata of society, a broader and more comprehensive art-need, but
 _of the second order_. Here there is a sort of artistic commune, which
 possibly means to be sincere. But let us look at the elements! They are in
 general the more refined malcontents, who attain no genuine pleasure in
 themselves; the cultured, who have not become free enough to dispense with
 the consolations of religion, and yet do not find its incense sufficiently
 fragrant; the half-aristocratic, who are too weak to combat by a heroic
 conversion or renunciation the one fundamental error of their lives or the
 pernicious bent of their characters; the highly gifted, who think
 themselves too dignified to be of service by modest activity, and are too
 lazy for real, self-sacrificing work; girls who cannot create for
 themselves a satisfactory sphere of duties; women who have tied themselves
 by a light-hearted or nefarious marriage, and know that they are not tied
 securely enough; scholars, physicians, merchants, officials who
 specialised too early and never gave their lives a free enough scope--who
 do their work efficiently, it is true, but with a worm gnawing at their
 hearts; finally, all imperfect artists--these are nowadays the true needers
 of art! What do they really desire from art? Art is to drive away hours
 and moments of discomfort, boredom, half-bad conscience, and, if possible,
 transform the faults of their lives and characters into faults of
 world-destiny. Very different were the Greeks, who realised in their art
 the outflow and overflow of their own sense of well-being and health, and
 loved to see their perfection once more from a standpoint outside
 themselves. They were led to art by delight in themselves; our
 contemporaries--by disgust of themselves.
 
 
 
 
 170.
 
 
 THE GERMANS IN THE THEATRE.--The real theatrical talent of the Germans was
 Kotzebue. He and his Germans, those of higher as well as those of
 middle-class society, were necessarily associated, and his contemporaries
 should have said of him in all seriousness, "in him we live and move and
 have our being." Here was nothing--no constraint, pretence, or
 half-enjoyment: what he could and would do was understood. Yes, until now
 the honest theatrical success on the German stage has been in the hands of
 the shamefaced or unashamed heirs of Kotzebue's methods and influence--that
 is, as far as comedy still flourishes at all. The result is that much of
 the Germanism of that age, sometimes far off from the great towns, still
 survives. Good-natured; incontinent in small pleasures; always ready for
 tears; with the desire, in the theatre at any rate, to be able to get rid
 of their innate sobriety and strict attention to duty and exercise; a
 smiling, nay, a laughing indulgence; confusing goodness and sympathy and
 welding them into one, as is the essential characteristic of German
 sentimentality; exceedingly happy at a noble, magnanimous action; for the
 rest, submissive towards superiors, envious of each other, and yet in
 their heart of hearts thoroughly self-satisfied--such were they and such
 was he.--The second dramatic talent was Schiller. He discovered a class of
 hearers which had hitherto never been taken into consideration: among the
 callow German youth of both sexes. His poetry responded to their higher,
 nobler, more violent if more confused emotions, their delight in the
 jingle of moral words (a delight that begins to disappear when we reach
 the thirties). Thus he won for himself, by virtue of the passionateness
 and partisanship of the young, a success which gradually reacted with
 advantage upon those of riper years. Generally speaking, Schiller
 rejuvenated the Germans. Goethe stood and still stands above the Germans
 in every respect. To them he will never belong. How could a nation in
 well-being and well-wishing come up to the intellectuality of Goethe?
 Beethoven composed and Schopenhauer philosophised above the heads of the
 Germans, and it was above their heads, in the same way, that Goethe wrote
 his _Tasso_, his _Iphigenie_. He was followed by a small company of highly
 cultured persons, who were educated by antiquity, life, and travel, and
 had grown out of German ways of thought. He himself did not wish it to be
 otherwise.--When the Romantics set up their well-conceived Goethe cult;
 when their amazing skill in appreciation was passed on to the disciples of
 Hegel, the real educators of the Germans of this century; when the
 awakening national ambition turned out advantageous to the fame of the
 German poets; when the real standard of the nation, as to whether it could
 honestly find enjoyment in anything, became inexorably subordinated to the
 judgment of individuals and to that national ambition,--that is, when
 people began to enjoy by compulsion,--then arose that false, spurious
 German culture which was ashamed of Kotzebue; which brought Sophocles,
 Calderon, and even the Second Part of Goethe's _Faust_ on the stage; and
 which, on account of its foul tongue and congested stomach, no longer
 knows now what it likes and what it finds tedious.--Happy are those who
 have taste, even if it be a bad taste! Only by this characteristic can one
 be wise as well as happy. Hence the Greeks, who were very refined in such
 matters, designated the sage by a word that means "man of taste," and
 called wisdom, artistic as well as scientific, "taste" (_sophia_).
 
 
 
 
 171.
 
 
 MUSIC AS A LATE-COMER IN EVERY CULTURE.--Among all the arts that are
 accustomed to grow on a definite culture-soil and under definite social
 and political conditions, music is the last plant to come up, arising in
 the autumn and fading-season of the culture to which it belongs. At the
 same time, the first signs and harbingers of a new spring are usually
 already noticeable, and sometimes music, like the language of a forgotten
 age, rings out into a new, astonished world, and comes too late. In the
 art of the Dutch and Flemish musicians the soul of the Christian middle
 ages at last found its fullest tone: their sound-architecture is the
 posthumous but legitimate and equal sister of Gothic. Not until Handel's
 music was heard the note of the best in the soul of Luther and his kin,
 the great Judaeo-heroical impulse that created the whole Reformation
 movement. Mozart first expressed in golden melody the age of Louis XIV.
 and the art of Racine and Claude Lorrain. The eighteenth century--that
 century of rhapsody, of broken ideals and transitory happiness--only sang
 itself out in the music of Beethoven and Rossini. A lover of sentimental
 similes might say that all really important music was a swan-song.--Music
 is, in fact, not a universal language for all time, as is so often said in
 its praise, but responds exactly to a particular period and warmth of
 emotion which involves a quite definite, individual culture, determined by
 time and place, as its inner law. The music of Palestrina would be quite
 unintelligible to a Greek; and again, what would the music of Rossini
 convey to Palestrina?--It may be that our most modern German music, with
 all its pre-eminence and desire of pre-eminence, will soon be no longer
 understood. For this music sprang from a culture that is undergoing a
 rapid decay, from the soil of that epoch of reaction and restoration in
 which a certain Catholicism of feeling, as well as a delight in all
 indigenous, national, primitive manners, burst into bloom and scattered a
 blended perfume over Europe. These two emotional tendencies, adopted in
 their greatest strength and carried to their farthest limits, found final
 expression in the music of Wagner. Wagner's predilection for the old
 native sagas, his free idealisation of their unfamiliar gods and
 heroes,--who are really sovereign beasts of prey with occasional fits of
 thoughtfulness, magnanimity, and boredom,--his re-animation of those
 figures, to which he gave in addition the mediaeval Christian thirst for
 ecstatic sensuality and spiritualisation--all this Wagnerian give-and-take
 with regard to materials, souls, figures, and words--would clearly express
 the spirit of his music, if it could not, like all music, speak quite
 unambiguously of itself. This spirit wages the last campaign of reaction
 against the spirit of illumination which passed into this century from the
 last, and also against the super-national ideas of French revolutionary
 romanticism and of English and American insipidity in the reconstruction
 of state and society.--But is it not evident that the spheres of thought
 and emotion apparently suppressed by Wagner and his school have long since
 acquired fresh strength, and that his late musical protest against them
 generally rings into ears that prefer to hear different and opposite
 notes; so that one day that high and wonderful art will suddenly become
 unintelligible and will be covered by the spider's web of oblivion?--In
 considering this state of affairs we must not let ourselves be led astray
 by those transitory fluctuations which arise like a reaction within a
 reaction, as a temporary sinking of the mountainous wave in the midst of
 the general upheaval. Thus, this decade of national war, ultramontane
 martyrdom, and socialistic unrest may, in its remoter after-effect, even
 aid the Wagnerian art to acquire a sudden halo, without guaranteeing that
 it "has a future" or that it has _the_ future. It is in the very nature of
 music that the fruits of its great culture-vintage should lose their taste
 and wither earlier than the fruits of the plastic arts or those that grow
 on the tree of knowledge. Among all the products of the human artistic
 sense ideas are the most solid and lasting.
 
 
 
 
 172.
 
 
 THE POET NO LONGER A TEACHER.--Strange as it may sound to our time, there
 were once poets and artists whose soul was above the passions with their
 delights and convulsions, and who therefore took their pleasure in purer
 materials, worthier men, more delicate complications and denouements. If
 the artists of our day for the most part unfetter the will, and so are
 under certain circumstances for that very reason emancipators of life,
 those were tamers of the will, enchanters of animals, creators of men. In
 fact, they moulded, re-moulded, and new-moulded life, whereas the fame of
 poets of our day lies in unharnessing, unchaining, and shattering.--The
 ancient Greeks demanded of the poet that he should be the teacher of grown
 men. How ashamed the poet would be now if this demand were made of him! He
 is not even a good student of himself, and so never himself becomes a good
 poem or a fine picture. Under the most favourable circumstances he remains
 the shy, attractive ruin of a temple, but at the same time a cavern of
 cravings, overgrown like a ruin with flowers, nettles, and poisonous
 weeds, inhabited and haunted by snakes, worms, spiders, and birds; an
 object for sad reflection as to why the noblest and most precious must
 grow up at once like a ruin, without the past and future of perfection.
 
 
 
 
 173.
 
 
 LOOKING FORWARD AND BACKWARD.--An art like that which streams out of Homer,
 Sophocles, Theocritus, Calderon, Racine, Goethe, as the superabundance of
 a wise and harmonious conduct of life--that is the true art, at which we
 grasp when we have ourselves become wiser and more harmonious. It is not
 that barbaric, if ever so delightful, outpouring of hot and highly
 coloured things from an undisciplined, chaotic soul, which is what we
 understood by "art" in our youth. It is obvious from the nature of the
 case that for certain periods of life an art of overstrain, excitement,
 antipathy to the orderly, monotonous, simple, logical, is an inevitable
 need, to which artists must respond, lest the soul of such periods should
 unburden itself in other ways, through all kinds of disorder and
 impropriety. Hence youths as they generally are, full, fermenting,
 tortured above all things by boredom, and women who lack work that fully
 occupies their soul, require that art of delightful disorder. All the more
 violently on that account are they inflamed with a desire for satisfaction
 without change, happiness without stupor and intoxication.
 
 
 
 
 174.
 
 
 AGAINST THE ART OF WORKS OF ART.--Art is above all and first of all meant
 to embellish life, to make us ourselves endurable and if possible
 agreeable in the eyes of others. With this task in view, art moderates us
 and holds us in restraint, creates forms of intercourse, binds over the
 uneducated to laws of decency, cleanliness, politeness, well-timed speech
 and silence. Hence art must conceal or transfigure everything that is
 ugly--the painful, terrible, and disgusting elements which in spite of
 every effort will always break out afresh in accordance with the very
 origin of human nature. Art has to perform this duty especially in regard
 to the passions and spiritual agonies and anxieties, and to cause the
 significant factor to shine through unavoidable or unconquerable ugliness.
 To this great, super-great task the so-called art proper, that of works of
 art, is a mere accessary. A man who feels within himself a surplus of such
 powers of embellishment, concealment, and transfiguration will finally
 seek to unburden himself of this surplus in works of art. The same holds
 good, under special circumstances, of a whole nation.--But as a rule we
 nowadays begin art at the end, hang on to its tail, and think that works
 of art constitute art proper, and that life should be improved and
 transformed by this means--fools that we are! If we begin a dinner with
 dessert, and try sweet after sweet, small wonder that we ruin our
 digestions and even our appetites for the good, hearty, nourishing meal to
 which art invites us!
 
 
 
 
 175.
 
 
 CONTINUED EXISTENCE OF ART.--Why, really, does a creative art nowadays
 continue to exist? Because the majority who have hours of leisure (and
 such an art is for them only) think that they cannot fill up their time
 without music, theatres and picture-galleries, novels and poetry. Granted
 that one could keep them from this indulgence, either they would strive
 less eagerly for leisure, and the invidious sight of the rich would be
 less common (a great gain for the stability of society), or they would
 have leisure, but would learn to reflect on what can be learnt and
 unlearnt: on their work, for instance, their associations, the pleasure
 they could bestow. All the world, with the exception of the artist, would
 in both cases reap the advantage.--Certainly, there are many vigorous,
 sensible readers who could take objection to this. Still, it must be said
 on behalf of the coarse and malignant that the author himself is concerned
 with this protest, and that there is in his book much to be read that is
 not actually written down therein.
 
 
 
 
 176.
 
 
 THE MOUTHPIECE OF THE GODS.--The poet expresses the universal higher
 opinions of the nation, he is its mouthpiece and flute; but by virtue of
 metre and all other artistic means he so expresses them that the nation
 regards them as something quite new and wonderful, and believes in all
 seriousness that he is the mouthpiece of the Gods. Yes, under the clouds
 of creation the poet himself forgets whence he derives all his
 intellectual wisdom--from father and mother, from teachers and books of all
 kinds, from the street and particularly from the priest. He is deceived by
 his own art, and really believes, in a naive period, that a God is
 speaking through him, that he is creating in a state of religious
 inspiration. As a matter of fact, he is only saying what he has learnt, a
 medley of popular wisdom and popular foolishness. Hence, so far as a poet
 is really _vox populi_ he is held to be _vox dei_.
 
 
 
 
 177.
 
 
 WHAT ALL ART WANTS TO DO AND CANNOT.--The last and hardest task of the
 artist is the presentment of what remains the same, reposes in itself, is
 lofty and simple and free from the bizarre. Hence the noblest forms of
 moral perfection are rejected as inartistic by weaker artists, because the
 sight of these fruits is too painful for their ambition. The fruit gleams
 at them from the topmost branches of art, but they lack the ladder, the
 courage, the grip to venture so high. In himself a Phidias is quite
 possible as a poet, but, if modern strength be taken into consideration,
 almost solely in the sense that to God nothing is impossible. The desire
 for a poetical Claude Lorrain is already an immodesty at present, however
 earnestly one man's heart may yearn for such a consummation.--The
 presentment of the highest man, the most simple and at the same time the
 most complete, has hitherto been beyond the scope of all artists. Perhaps,
 however, the Greeks, in the ideal of Athene, saw farther than any men did
 before or after their time.
 
 
 
 
 178.
 
 
 ART AND RESTORATION.--The retrograde movements in history, the so-called
 periods of restoration, which try to revive intellectual and social
 conditions that existed before those immediately preceding,--and seem
 really to succeed in giving them a brief resurrection,--have the charm of
 sentimental recollection, ardent longing for what is almost lost, hasty
 embracing of a transitory happiness. It is on account of this strange
 trend towards seriousness that in such transient and almost dreamy periods
 art and poetry find a natural soil, just as the tenderest and rarest
 plants grow on mountain-slopes of steep declivity.--Thus many a good artist
 is unwittingly impelled to a "restoration" way of thinking in politics and
 society, for which, on his own account, he prepares a quiet little corner
 and garden. Here he collects about himself the human remains of the
 historical epoch that appeals to him, and plays his lyre to many who are
 dead, half-dead, and weary to death, perhaps with the above-mentioned
 result of a brief resurrection.
 
 
 
 
 179.
 
 
 HAPPINESS OF THE AGE.--In two respects our age is to be accounted happy.
 With respect to the _past_, we enjoy all cultures and their productions,
 and nurture ourselves on the noblest blood of all periods. We stand
 sufficiently near to the magic of the forces from whose womb these periods
 are born to be able in passing to submit to their spell with pleasure and
 terror; whereas earlier cultures could only enjoy themselves, and never
 looked beyond themselves, but were rather overarched by a bell of broader
 or narrower dome, through which indeed light streamed down to them, but
 which their gaze could not pierce. With respect to the _future_, there
 opens out to us for the first time a mighty, comprehensive vista of human
 and economic purposes engirdling the whole inhabited globe. At the same
 time, we feel conscious of a power ourselves to take this new task in hand
 without presumption, without requiring supernatural aids. Yes, whatever
 the result of our enterprise, however much we may have overestimated our
 strength, at any rate we need render account to no one but ourselves, and
 mankind can henceforth begin to do with itself what it will.--There are, it
 is true, peculiar human bees, who only know how to suck the bitterest and
 worst elements from the chalice of every flower. It is true that all
 flowers contain something that is not honey, but these bees may be allowed
 to feel in their own way about the happiness of our time, and continue to
 build up their hive of discomfort.
 
 
 
 
 180.
 
 
 A VISION.--Hours of instruction and meditation for adults, even the most
 mature, and such institutions visited without compulsion but in accordance
 with the moral injunction of the whole community; the churches as the
 meeting-places most worthy and rich in memories for the purpose; at the
 same time daily festivals in honour of the reason that is attained and
 attainable by man; a newer and fuller budding and blooming of the ideal of
 the teacher, in which the clergyman, the artist and the physician, the man
 of science and the sage are blended, and their individual virtues should
 come to the fore as a collective virtue in their teaching itself, in their
 discourses, in their method--this is my ever-recurring vision, of which I
 firmly believe that it has raised a corner of the veil of the future.
 
 
 
 
 181.
 
 
 EDUCATION A DISTORTION.--The extraordinary haphazardness of the whole
 system of education, which leads every adult to say nowadays that his sole
 educator was chance, and the weathercock-nature of educational methods and
 aims, may be explained as follows. The oldest and the newest
 culture-powers, as in a turbulent mass-meeting, would rather be heard than
 understood, and wish to prove at all costs by their outcries and
 clamourings that they still exist or already exist. The poor teachers and
 educators are first dazed by this senseless noise, then become silent and
 finally apathetic, allowing anything to be done to them just as they in
 their turn allow anything to be done to their pupils. They are not trained
 themselves, so how are they to train others? They are themselves no
 straight-growing, vigorous, succulent trees, and he who wishes to attach
 himself to them must wind and bend himself and finally become distorted
 and deformed as they.
 
 
 
 
 182.
 
 
 PHILOSOPHERS AND ARTISTS OF THE AGE.--Rhapsody and frigidity, burning
 desires and waning of the heart's glow--this wretched medley is to be found
 in the picture of the highest European society of the present day. There
 the artist thinks that he is achieving a great deal when through his art
 he lights the torch of the heart as well as the torch of desire. The
 philosopher has the same notion, when in the chilliness of his heart,
 which he has in common with his age, he cools hot desires in himself and
 his following by his world-denying judgments.
 
 
 
 
 183.
 
 
 NOT TO BE A SOLDIER OF CULTURE WITHOUT NECESSITY.--At last people are
 learning what it costs us so dear not to know in our youth--that we must
 first do superior actions and secondly seek the superior wherever and
 under whatever names it is to be found; that we must at once go out of the
 way of all badness and mediocrity _without fighting it_; and that even
 doubt as to the excellence of a thing (such as quickly arises in one of
 practised taste) should rank as an argument against it and a reason for
 completely avoiding it. We must not shrink from the danger of occasionally
 making a mistake and confounding the less accessible good with the bad and
 imperfect. Only he who can do nothing better should attack the world's
 evils as the soldier of culture. But those who should support culture and
 spread its teachings ruin themselves if they go about armed, and by
 precautions, night-watches, and bad dreams turn the peace of their
 domestic and artistic life into sinister unrest.
 
 
 
 
 184.
 
 
 HOW NATURAL HISTORY SHOULD BE EXPOUNDED.--Natural history, like the history
 of the war and victory of moral and intellectual forces in the campaign
 against anxiety, self-delusion, laziness, superstition, folly, should be
 so expounded that every reader or listener may be continually aroused to
 strive after mental and physical health and soundness, after the feeling
 of joy, and be awakened to the desire to be the heir and continuator of
 mankind, to an ever nobler adventurous impulse. Hitherto natural history
 has not found its true language, because the inventive and eloquent
 artists--who are needed for this purpose--never rid themselves of a secret
 mistrust of it, and above all never wish to learn from it a thorough
 lesson. Nevertheless it must be conceded to the English that their
 scientific manuals for the lower strata of the people have made admirable
 strides towards that ideal. But then such books are written by their
 foremost men of learning, full, complete, and inspiring natures, and not,
 as among us, by mediocre investigators.
 
 
 
 
 185.
 
 
 GENIUS IN HUMANITY.--If genius, according to Schopenhauer's observation,
 lies in the coherent and vivid recollection of our own experience, a
 striving towards genius in humanity collectively might be deduced from the
 striving towards knowledge of the whole historic past--which is beginning
 to mark off the modern age more and more as compared with earlier ages and
 has for the first time broken down the barriers between nature and spirit,
 men and animals, morality and physics. A perfectly conceived history would
 be cosmic self-consciousness.
 
 
 
 
 186.
 
 
 THE CULT OF CULTURE.--On great minds is bestowed the terrifying
 all-too-human of their natures, their blindnesses, deformities, and
 extravagances, so that their more powerful, easily all-too-powerful
 influence may be continually held within bounds through the distrust
 aroused by such qualities. For the sum-total of all that humanity needs
 for its continued existence is so comprehensive, and demands powers so
 diverse and so numerous, that for every one-sided predilection, whether in
 science or politics or art or commerce, to which such natures would
 persuade us, mankind as a whole has to pay a heavy price. It has always
 been a great disaster to culture when human beings are worshipped. In this
 sense we may understand the precept of Mosaic law which forbids us to have
 any other gods but God.--Side by side with the cult of genius and violence
 we must always place, as its complement and remedy, the cult of culture.
 This cult can find an intelligent appreciation even for the material, the
 inferior, the mean, the misunderstood, the weak, the imperfect, the
 one-sided, the incomplete, the untrue, the apparent, even the wicked and
 horrible, and can grant them the concession that _all this is necessary_.
 For the continued harmony of all things human, attained by amazing toil
 and strokes of luck, and just as much the work of Cyclopes and ants as of
 geniuses, shall never be lost. How, indeed, could we dispense with that
 deep, universal, and often uncanny bass, without which, after all, melody
 cannot be melody?
 
 
 
 
 187.
 
 
 THE ANTIQUE WORLD AND PLEASURE.--The man of the antique world understood
 better how to rejoice, we understand better how to grieve less. They
 continually found new motives for feeling happy, for celebrating
 festivals, being inventive with all their wealth of shrewdness and
 reflection. We, on the other hand, concentrate our intellect rather on the
 solving of problems which have in view painlessness and the removal of
 sources of discomfort. With regard to suffering existence, the ancients
 sought to forget or in some way to convert the sensation into a pleasant
 one, thus trying to supply palliatives. We attack the causes of suffering,
 and on the whole prefer to use prophylactics.--Perhaps we are only building
 upon a foundation whereon a later age will once more set up the temple of
 joy.
 
 
 
 
 188.
 
 
 THE MUSES AS LIARS.--"We know how to tell many lies," so sang the Muses
 once, when they revealed themselves to Hesiod.--The conception of the
 artist as deceiver, once grasped, leads to important discoveries.
 
 
 
 
 189.
 
 
 HOW PARADOXICAL HOMER CAN BE.--Is there anything more desperate, more
 horrible, more incredible, shining over human destiny like a winter sun,
 than that idea of Homer's:
 
 "So the decree of the Gods willed it, and doomed man to perish, that it
 might be a matter for song even to distant generations"?
 
 In other words, we suffer and perish so that poets may not lack material,
 and this is the dispensation of those very Gods of Homer who seem much
 concerned about the joyousness of generations to come, but very little
 about us men of the present. To think that such ideas should ever have
 entered the head of a Greek!
 
 
 
 
 190.
 
 
 SUPPLEMENTARY JUSTIFICATION OF EXISTENCE.--Many ideas have come into the
 world as errors and fancies but have turned out truths, because men have
 afterwards given them a genuine basis to rest upon.
 
 
 
 
 191.
 
 
 PRO AND CON NECESSARY.--He who has not realised that every great man must
 not only be encouraged but also, for the sake of the common welfare,
 opposed, is certainly still a great child--or himself a great man.
 
 
 
 
 192.
 
 
 INJUSTICE OF GENIUS.--Genius is most unjust towards geniuses, if they be
 contemporary. Either it thinks it has no need of them and considers them
 superfluous (for it can do without them), or their influence crosses the
 path of its electric current, in which case it even calls them pernicious.
 
 
 
 
 193.
 
 
 THE SADDEST DESTINY OF A PROPHET.--He has worked twenty years to convince
 his contemporaries, and succeeds at last, but in the meantime his
 adversaries have also succeeded--he is no longer convinced of himself.
 
 
 
 
 194.
 
 
 THREE THINKERS LIKE ONE SPIDER.--In every philosophical school three
 thinkers follow one another in this relation: the first produces from
 himself sap and seed, the second draws it out in threads and spins a
 cunning web, the third waits in this web for the victims who are caught in
 it--and tries to live upon this philosophy.
 
 
 
 
 195.
 
 
 FROM ASSOCIATION WITH AUTHORS.--It is as bad a habit to go about with an
 author grasping him by the nose as grasping him by the horn (and every
 author has his horn).
 
 
 
 
 196.
 
 
 A TEAM OF TWO.--Vagueness of thought and outbursts of sentimentality are as
 often wedded to the reckless desire to have one's own way by hook or by
 crook, to make oneself alone of any consequence, as a genuinely helpful,
 gracious, and kindly spirit is wedded to the impulse towards clearness and
 purity of thought and towards emotional moderation and self-restraint.
 
 
 
 
 197.
 
 
 BINDING AND SEPARATING FORCES.--Surely it is in the heads of men that there
 arises the force that binds them--an understanding of their common interest
 or the reverse; and in their hearts the force that separates them--a blind
 choosing and groping in love and hate, a devotion to one at the expense of
 all, and a consequent contempt for the common utility.
 
 
 
 
 198.
 
 
 MARKSMEN AND THINKERS.--There are curious marksmen who miss their mark, but
 leave the shooting-gallery with secret pride in the fact that their bullet
 at any rate flew very far (beyond the mark, it is true), or that it did
 not hit the mark but hit something else. There are thinkers of the same
 stamp.
 
 
 
 
 199.
 
 
 ATTACK FROM TWO SIDES.--We act as enemies towards an intellectual tendency
 or movement when we are superior to it and disapprove of its aim, or when
 its aim is too high and unrecognisable to our eye--in other words, when it
 is superior to us. So the same party may be attacked from two sides, from
 above and from below. Not infrequently the assailants, from common hatred,
 form an alliance which is more repulsive than all that they hate.
 
 
 
 
 200.
 
 
 ORIGINAL.--Original minds are distinguished not by being the first to see a
 new thing, but by seeing the old, well-known thing, which is seen and
 overlooked by every one, as something new. The first discoverer is usually
 that quite ordinary and unintellectual visionary--chance.
 
 
 
 
 201.
 
 
 ERROR OF PHILOSOPHERS.--The philosopher believes that the value of his
 philosophy lies in the whole, in the structure. Posterity finds it in the
 stone with which he built and with which, from that time forth, men will
 build oftener and better--in other words, in the fact that the structure
 may be destroyed and yet have value as material.
 
 
 
 
 202.
 
 
 WIT.--Wit is the epitaph of an emotion.
 
 
 
 
 203.
 
 
 THE MOMENT BEFORE SOLUTION.--In science it occurs every day and every hour
 that a man, immediately before the solution, remains stuck, being
 convinced that his efforts have been entirely in vain--like one who, in
 untying a noose, hesitates at the moment when it is nearest to coming
 loose, because at that very moment it looks most like a knot.
 
 
 
 
 204.
 
 
 AMONG THE VISIONARIES.--The thoughtful man, and he who is sure of his
 intelligence, may profitably consort with visionaries for a decade and
 abandon himself in their torrid zone to a moderate insanity. He will thus
 have travelled a good part of the road towards that cosmopolitanism of the
 intellect which can say without presumption, "Nothing intellectual is
 alien to me."
 
 
 
 
 205.
 
 
 KEEN AIR.--The best and healthiest element in science as amid the mountains
 is the keen air that plays about it.--Intellectual molly-coddles (such as
 artists) dread and abuse science on account of this atmosphere.
 
 
 
 
 206.
 
 
 WHY SAVANTS ARE NOBLER THAN ARTISTS.--Science requires nobler natures than
 does poetry; natures that are more simple, less ambitious, more
 restrained, calmer, that think less of posthumous fame and can bury
 themselves in studies which, in the eye of the many, scarcely seem worthy
 of such a sacrifice of personality. There is another loss of which they
 are conscious. The nature of their occupation, its continual exaction of
 the greatest sobriety, weakens their will; the fire is not kept up so
 vigorously as on the hearths of poetic minds. As such, they often lose
 their strength and prime earlier than artists do--and, as has been said,
 they are aware of their danger. Under all circumstances they seem less
 gifted because they shine less, and thus they will always be rated below
 their value.
 
 
 
 
 207.
 
 
 HOW FAR PIETY OBSCURES.--In later centuries the great man is credited with
 all the great qualities and virtues of his century. Thus all that is best
 is continually obscured by piety, which treats the picture as a sacred
 one, to be surrounded with all manner of votive offerings. In the end the
 picture is completely veiled and covered by the offerings, and thenceforth
 is more an object of faith than of contemplation.
 
 
 
 
 208.
 
 
 STANDING ON ONE'S HEAD.--If we make truth stand on its head, we generally
 fail to notice that our own head, too, is not in its right position.
 
 
 
 
 209.
 
 
 ORIGIN AND UTILITY OF FASHION.--The obvious satisfaction of the individual
 with his own form excites imitation and gradually creates the form of the
 many--that is, fashion. The many desire, and indeed attain, that same
 comforting satisfaction with their own form. Consider how many reasons
 every man has for anxiety and shy self-concealment, and how, on this
 account, three-fourths of his energy and goodwill is crippled and may
 become unproductive! So we must be very grateful to fashion for
 unfettering that three-fourths and communicating self-confidence and the
 power of cheerful compromise to those who feel themselves bound to each
 other by its law. Even foolish laws give freedom and calm of the spirit,
 so long as many persons have submitted to their sway.
 
 
 
 
 210.
 
 
 LOOSENERS OF TONGUES.--The value of many men and books rests solely on
 their faculty for compelling all to speak out the most hidden and intimate
 things. They are looseners of tongues and crowbars to open the most
 stubborn teeth. Many events and misdeeds which are apparently only sent as
 a curse to mankind possess this value and utility.
 
 
 
 
 211.
 
 
 INTELLECTUAL FREEDOM OF DOMICILE.(12)--Who of us could dare to call himself
 a "free spirit" if he could not render homage after his fashion, by taking
 on his own shoulders a portion of that burden of public dislike and abuse,
 to men to whom this name is attached as a reproach? We might as well call
 ourselves in all seriousness "spirits free of domicile" (_Freizuegig_) (and
 without that arrogant or high-spirited defiance) because we feel the
 impulse to freedom (_Zug zur Freiheit_) as the strongest instinct of our
 minds and, in contrast to fixed and limited minds, practically see our
 ideal in an intellectual nomadism--to use a modest and almost depreciatory
 expression.
 
 
 
 
 212.
 
 
 YES, THE FAVOUR OF THE MUSES!--What Homer says on this point goes right to
 our heart, so true, so terrible is it:
 
 "The Muse loved him with all her heart and gave him good and evil, for she
 took away his eyes and vouchsafed him sweet song."
 
 This is an endless text for thinking men: she gives good and evil, that is
 _her_ manner of loving with all her heart and soul! And each man will
 interpret specially for himself why we poets and thinkers have to give up
 our eyes in her service.(13)
 
 
 
 
 213.
 
 
 AGAINST THE CULTIVATION OF MUSIC.--The artistic training of the eye from
 childhood upwards by means of drawing, painting, landscape-sketching,
 figures, scenes, involves an estimable gain in life, making the eyesight
 keen, calm, and enduring in the observation of men and circumstances. No
 similar secondary advantage arises from the artistic cultivation of the
 ear, whence public schools will generally do well to give the art of the
 eye a preference over that of the ear.
 
 
 
 
 214.
 
 
 THE DISCOVERERS OF TRIVIALITIES.--Subtle minds, from which nothing is
 farther than trivialities, often discover a triviality after taking all
 manner of circuitous routes and mountain paths, and, to the astonishment
 of the non-subtle, rejoice exceedingly.
 
 
 
 
 215.
 
 
 MORALS OF SAVANTS.--A regular and rapid advance in the sciences is only
 possible when the individual is compelled to be not so distrustful as to
 test every calculation and assertion of others, in fields which are remote
 from his own. A necessary condition, however, is that every man should
 have competitors in his own sphere, who are extremely distrustful and keep
 a sharp eye upon him. From this juxtaposition of "not too distrustful" and
 "extremely distrustful" arises sincerity in the republic of learning.
 
 
 
 
 216.
 
 
 REASONS FOR STERILITY.--There are highly gifted minds which are always
 sterile only because, from temperamental weakness, they are too impatient
 to wait for their pregnancy.
 
 
 
 
 217.
 
 
 THE PERVERTED WORLD OF TEARS.--The manifold discomforts which the demands
 of higher culture cause to man finally pervert his nature to such an
 extent that he usually keeps himself stoical and unbending. Thus he has
 tears in reserve only for rare occasions of happiness, so that many must
 weep even at the enjoyment of painlessness--only when happy does his heart
 still beat.
 
 
 
 
 218.
 
 
 THE GREEKS AS INTERPRETERS.--When we speak of the Greeks we unwittingly
 speak of to-day and yesterday; their universally known history is a blank
 mirror, always reflecting something that is not in the mirror itself. We
 enjoy the freedom of speaking about them in order to have the right of
 being silent about others--so that these Greeks themselves may whisper
 something in the ear of the reflective reader. Thus the Greeks facilitate
 to modern men the communication of much that is debatable and hard to
 communicate.
 
 
 
 
 219.
 
 
 OF THE ACQUIRED CHARACTER OF THE GREEKS.--We are easily led astray by the
 renowned Greek clearness, transparency, simplicity, and order, by their
 crystal-like naturalness and crystal-like art, into believing that all
 these gifts were bestowed on the Greeks--for instance, that they could not
 but write well, as Lichtenberg expressed it on one occasion. Yet no
 statement could be more hasty and more untenable. The history of prose
 from Gorgias to Demosthenes shows a course of toiling and wrestling
 towards light from the obscure, overloaded, and tasteless, reminding one
 of the labour of heroes who had to construct the first roads through
 forest and bog. The dialogue of tragedy was the real achievement of the
 dramatist, owing to its uncommon clearness and precision, whereas the
 national tendency was to riot in symbolism and innuendo, a tendency
 expressly fostered by the great choral lyric. Similarly it was the
 achievement of Homer to liberate the Greeks from Asiatic pomp and gloom,
 and to have attained the clearness of architecture in details great and
 small. Nor was it by any means thought easy to say anything in a pure and
 illuminating style. How else should we account for the great admiration
 for the epigram of Simonides, which shows itself so simple, with no gilded
 points or arabesques of wit, but says all that it has to say plainly and
 with the calm of the sun, not with the straining after effect of the
 lightning. Since the struggle towards light from an almost native twilight
 is Greek, a thrill of jubilation runs through the people when they hear a
 laconic sentence, the language of elegy or the maxims of the Seven Wise
 Men. Hence they were so fond of giving precepts in verse, a practice that
 we find objectionable. This was the true Apolline task of the Hellenic
 spirit, with the aim of rising superior to the perils of metre and the
 obscurity which is otherwise characteristic of poetry. Simplicity,
 flexibility, and sobriety were wrestled for and not given by nature to
 this people. The danger of a relapse into Asianism constantly hovered over
 the Greeks, and really overtook them from time to time like a murky,
 overflowing tide of mystical impulses, primitive savagery and darkness. We
 see them plunge in; we see Europe, as it were, flooded, washed away--for
 Europe was very small then; but they always emerge once more to the light,
 good swimmers and divers that they are, those fellow-countrymen of
 Odysseus.
 
 
 
 
 220.
 
 
 THE PAGAN CHARACTERISTIC.--Perhaps there is nothing more astonishing to the
 observer of the Greek world than to discover that the Greeks from time to
 time held festivals, as it were, for all their passions and evil
 tendencies alike, and in fact even established a kind of series of
 festivals, by order of the State, for their "all-too-human." This is the
 pagan characteristic of their world, which Christianity has never
 understood and never can understand, and has always combated and
 despised.--They accepted this all-too-human as unavoidable, and preferred,
 instead of railing at it, to give it a kind of secondary right by grafting
 it on to the usages of society and religion. All in man that has power
 they called divine, and wrote it on the walls of their heaven. They do not
 deny this natural instinct that expresses itself in evil characteristics,
 but regulate and limit it to definite cults and days, so as to turn those
 turbulent streams into as harmless a course as possible, after devising
 sufficient precautionary measures. That is the root of all the moral
 broad-mindedness of antiquity. To the wicked, the dubious, the backward,
 the animal element, as to the barbaric, pre-Hellenic and Asiatic, which
 still lived in the depths of Greek nature, they allowed a moderate
 outflow, and did not strive to destroy it utterly. The whole system was
 under the domain of the State, which was built up not on individuals or
 castes, but on common human qualities. In the structure of the State the
 Greeks show that wonderful sense for typical facts which later on enabled
 them to become investigators of Nature, historians, geographers, and
 philosophers. It was not a limited moral law of priests or castes, which
 had to decide about the constitution of the State and State worship, but
 the most comprehensive view of the reality of all that is human. Whence do
 the Greeks derive this freedom, this sense of reality? Perhaps from Homer
 and the poets who preceded him. For just those poets whose nature is
 generally not the most wise or just possess, in compensation, that delight
 in reality and activity of every kind, and prefer not to deny even evil.
 It suffices for them if evil moderates itself, does not kill or inwardly
 poison everything--in other words, they have similar ideas to those of the
 founders of Greek constitutions, and were their teachers and forerunners.
 
 
 
 
 221.
 
 
 EXCEPTIONAL GREEKS.--In Greece, deep, thorough, serious minds were the
 exception. The national instinct tended rather to regard the serious and
 thorough as a kind of grimace. To borrow forms from a foreign source, not
 to create but to transform into the fairest shapes--that is Greek. To
 imitate, not for utility but for artistic illusion, ever and anon to gain
 the mastery over forced seriousness, to arrange, beautify, simplify--that
 is the continual task from Homer to the Sophists of the third and fourth
 centuries of our era, who are all outward show, pompous speech,
 declamatory gestures, and address themselves to shallow souls that care
 only for appearance, sound, and effect. And now let us estimate the
 greatness of those exceptional Greeks, who created science! Whoever tells
 of them, tells the most heroic story of the human mind!
 
 
 
 
 222.
 
 
 SIMPLICITY NOT THE FIRST NOR THE LAST THING IN POINT OF TIME.--In the
 history of religious ideas many errors about development and false
 gradations are made in matters which in reality are not consecutive
 outgrowths but contemporary yet separate phenomena. In particular,
 simplicity has still far too much the reputation of being the oldest, the
 initial thing. Much that is human arises by subtraction and division, and
 not merely by doubling, addition, and unification.--For instance, men still
 believe in a gradual development of the idea of God from those unwieldy
 stones and blocks of wood up to the highest forms of anthropomorphism. Yet
 the fact is that so long as divinity was attributed to and felt in trees,
 logs of wood, stones, and beasts, people shrank from humanising their
 forms as from an act of godlessness. First of all, poets, apart from all
 considerations of cult and the ban of religious shame, have had to make
 the inner imagination of man accustomed and compliant to this notion.
 Wherever more pious periods and phases of thought gained the upper hand,
 this liberating influence of poets fell into the background, and sanctity
 remained, after as before, on the side of the monstrous, uncanny, quite
 peculiarly inhuman. And then, much of what the inner imagination ventures
 to picture to itself would exert a painful influence if externally and
 corporeally represented. The inner eye is far bolder and more shameless
 than the outer (whence the well-known difficulty and, to some extent,
 impossibility, of working epic material into dramatic form). The religious
 imagination for a long time entirely refuses to believe in the identity of
 God with an image: the image is meant to fix the _numen_ of the Deity,
 actually and specifically, although in a mysterious and not altogether
 intelligible way. The oldest image of the Gods is meant to shelter and at
 the same time to hide(14) the God--to indicate him but not to expose him to
 view. No Greek really looked upon his Apollo as a pointed pillar of wood,
 his Eros as a lump of stone. These were symbols, which were intended to
 inspire dread of the manifestation of the God. It was the same with those
 blocks of wood out of which individual limbs, generally in excessive
 number, were fashioned with the scantiest of carving--as, for instance, a
 Laconian Apollo with four hands and four ears. In the incomplete,
 symbolical, or excessive lies a terrible sanctity, which is meant to
 prevent us from thinking of anything human or similar to humanity. It is
 not an embryonic stage of art in which such things are made--as if they
 were not _able_ to speak more plainly and portray more sensibly in the age
 when such images were honoured! Rather, men are afraid of just one
 thing--direct speaking out. Just as the cella hides and conceals in a
 mysterious twilight, yet not completely, the holy of holies, the real
 _numen_ of the Deity; just as, again, the peripteric temple hides the
 cella, protecting it from indiscreet eyes as with a screen and a veil, yet
 not completely--so it is with the image of the Deity, and at the same time
 the concealment of the Deity.--Only when outside the cult, in the profane
 world of athletic contest, the joy in the victor had risen so high that
 the ripples thus started reacted upon the lake of religious emotion, was
 the statue of the victor set up before the temple. Then the pious pilgrim
 had to accustom his eye and his soul, whether he would or no, to the
 inevitable sight of human beauty and super-strength, so that the worship
 of men and Gods melted into each other from physical and spiritual
 contact. Then too for the first time the fear of really humanising the
 figures of the Gods is lost, and the mighty arena for great plastic art is
 opened--even now with the limitation that wherever there is to be adoration
 the primitive form and ugliness are carefully preserved and copied. But
 the Hellene, as he dedicates and makes offerings, may now with religious
 sanction indulge in his delight in making God become a man.
 
 
 
 
 223.
 
 
 WHITHER WE MUST TRAVEL.--Immediate self-observation is not enough, by a
 long way, to enable us to learn to know ourselves. We need history, for
 the past continues to flow through us in a hundred channels. We ourselves
 are, after all, nothing but our own sensation at every moment of this
 continued flow. Even here, when we wish to step down into the stream of
 our apparently most peculiar and personal development, Heraclitus'
 aphorism, "You cannot step twice into the same river," holds good.--This is
 a piece of wisdom which has, indeed, gradually become trite, but
 nevertheless has remained as strong and true as it ever was. It is the
 same with the saying that, in order to understand history, we must
 scrutinise the living remains of historical periods; that we must travel,
 as old Herodotus travelled, to other nations, especially to those
 so-called savage or half-savage races in regions where man has doffed or
 not yet donned European garb. For they are ancient and firmly established
 steps of culture on which we can stand. There is, however, a more subtle
 art and aim in travelling, which does not always necessitate our passing
 from place to place and going thousands of miles away. Very probably the
 last three centuries, in all their colourings and refractions of culture,
 survive even in our vicinity, only they have to be discovered. In some
 families, or even in individuals, the strata are still superimposed on
 each other, beautifully and perceptibly; in other places there are
 dispersions and displacements of the structure which are harder to
 understand. Certainly in remote districts, in less known mountain valleys,
 circumscribed communities have been able more easily to maintain an
 admirable pattern of a far older sentiment, a pattern that must here be
 investigated. On the other hand, it is improbable that such discoveries
 will be made in Berlin, where man comes into the world washed-out and
 sapless. He who after long practice of this art of travel has become a
 hundred-eyed Argus will accompany his Io--I mean his ego--everywhere, and in
 Egypt and Greece, Byzantium and Rome, France and Germany, in the age of
 wandering or settled races, in Renaissance or Reformation, at home and
 abroad, in sea, forest, plant, and mountain, will again light upon the
 travel-adventure of this ever-growing, ever-altered ego.--Thus
 self-knowledge becomes universal knowledge as regards the entire past,
 and, by another chain of observation, which can only be indicated here,
 self-direction and self-training in the freest and most far-seeing spirits
 might become universal direction as regards all future humanity.
 
 
 
 
 224.
 
 
 BALM AND POISON.--We cannot ponder too deeply on this fact: Christianity is
 the religion of antiquity grown old; it presupposes degenerate old
 culture-stocks, and on them it had, and still has, power to work like
 balm. There are periods when ears and eyes are full of slime, so that they
 can no longer hear the voice of reason and philosophy or see the wisdom
 that walks in bodily shape, whether it bears the name of Epictetus or of
 Epicurus. Then, perhaps, the erection of the martyr's cross and the
 "trumpet of the last judgment" may have the effect of still inspiring such
 races to end their lives decently. If we think of Juvenal's Rome, of that
 poisonous toad with the eyes of Venus, we understand what it means to make
 the sign of the Cross before the world, we honour the silent Christian
 community and are grateful for its having stifled the Greco-Roman Empire.
 If, indeed, most men were then born in spiritual slavery, with the
 sensuality of old men, what a pleasure to meet beings who were more soul
 than body, and who seemed to realise the Greek idea of the shades of the
 under-world--shy, scurrying, chirping, kindly creatures, with a reversion
 on the "better life," and therefore so unassuming, so secretly scornful,
 so proudly patient!--This Christianity, as the evening chime of the _good_
 antiquity, with cracked, weary and yet melodious bell, is balm in the ears
 even to one who only now traverses those centuries historically. What must
 it have been to those men themselves!--To young and fresh barbarian
 nations, on the other hand, Christianity is a poison. For to implant the
 teaching of sinfulness and damnation in the heroic, childlike, and animal
 soul of the old Germans is nothing but poisoning. An enormous chemical
 fermentation and decomposition, a medley of sentiments and judgments, a
 rank growth of adventurous legend, and hence in the long run a fundamental
 weakening of such barbarian peoples, was the inevitable result. True,
 without this weakening what should we have left of Greek culture, of the
 whole cultured past of the human race? For the barbarians untouched by
 Christianity knew very well how to make a clean sweep of old cultures, as
 was only too clearly shown by the heathen conquerors of Romanised Britain.
 Thus Christianity, against its will, was compelled to aid in making "the
 antique world" immortal.--There remains, however, a counter-question and
 the possibility of a counter-reckoning. Without this weakening through the
 poisoning referred to, would any of those fresh stocks--the Germans, for
 instance--have been in a position gradually to find by themselves a higher,
 a peculiar, a new culture, of which the most distant conception would
 therefore have been lost to humanity?--In this, as in every case, we do not
 know, Christianly speaking, whether God owes the devil or the devil God
 more thanks for everything having turned out as it has.
 
 
 
 
 225.
 
 
 FAITH MAKES HOLY AND CONDEMNS.--A Christian who happened upon forbidden
 paths of thought might well ask himself on some occasion whether it is
 really necessary that there should be a God, side by side with a
 representative Lamb, if faith in the existence of these beings suffices to
 produce the same influences? If they do exist after all, are they not
 superfluous beings? For all that is given by the Christian religion to the
 human soul, all that is beneficent, consoling, and edifying, just as much
 as all that depresses and crushes, emanates from that faith and not from
 the objects of that faith. It is here as in another well-known case--there
 were indeed no witches, but the terrible effects of the belief in witches
 were the same as if they really had existed. For all occasions where the
 Christian awaits the immediate intervention of a God, though in vain (for
 there is no God), his religion is inventive enough to find subterfuges and
 reasons for tranquillity. In so far Christianity is an ingenious
 religion.--Faith, indeed, has up to the present not been able to move real
 mountains, although I do not know who assumed that it could. But it can
 put mountains where there are none.
 
 
 
 
 226.
 
 
 THE TRAGI-COMEDY OF REGENSBURG.--Here and there we see with terrible
 clearness the harlequinade of Fortune, how she fastens the rope, on which
 she wills that succeeding centuries should dance, on to a few days, one
 place, the condition and opinions of one brain. Thus the fate of modern
 German history lies in the days of that disputation at Regensburg: the
 peaceful settlement of ecclesiastical and moral affairs, without religious
 wars or a counter-reformation, and also the unity of the German nation,
 seemed assured: the deep, gentle spirit of Contarini hovered for one
 moment over the theological squabble, victorious, as representative of the
 riper Italian piety, reflecting the morning glory of intellectual freedom.
 But Luther's hard head, full of suspicions and strange misgivings, showed
 resistance. Because justification by grace appeared to him _his_ greatest
 motto and discovery, he did not believe the phrase in the mouth of
 Italians; whereas, in point of fact, as is well known, they had invented
 it much earlier and spread it throughout Italy in deep silence. In this
 apparent agreement Luther saw the tricks of the devil, and hindered the
 work of peace as well as he could, thereby advancing to a great extent the
 aims of the Empire's foes.--And now, in order to have a still stronger idea
 of the dreadful farcicality of it all, let us add that none of the
 principles about which men then disputed in Regensburg--neither that of
 original sin, nor that of redemption by proxy, nor that of justification
 by faith--is in any way true or even has any connection with truth: that
 they are now all recognised as incapable of being discussed. Yet on this
 account the world was set on fire--that is to say, by opinions which
 correspond to no things or realities; whereas as regards purely
 philological questions--as, for instance, that of the sacramental words in
 the Eucharist--discussion at any rate is permitted, because in this case
 the truth can be said. But "where nothing is, even truth has lost her
 right."(15)--Lastly, it only remains to be said that it is true these
 principles give rise to sources of power so mighty that without them all
 the mills of the modern world could not be driven with such force. And it
 is primarily a matter of force, only secondarily of truth (and perhaps not
 even secondarily)--is it not so, my dear up-to-date friends?
 
 
 
 
 227.
 
 
 GOETHE'S ERRORS.--Goethe is a signal exception among great artists in that
 he did not live within the limited confines of his real capacity, as if
 that must be the essential, the distinctive, the unconditional, and the
 last thing in him and for all the world. Twice he intended to possess
 something higher than he really possessed--and went astray in the second
 half of his life, where he seems quite convinced that he is one of the
 great scientific discoverers and illuminators. So too in the first half of
 his life he demanded of himself something higher than the poetic art
 seemed to him--and here already he made a mistake. That nature wished to
 make him a plastic artist,--_this_ was his inwardly glowing and scorching
 secret, which finally drove him to Italy, that he might give vent to his
 mania in this direction and make to it every possible sacrifice. At last,
 shrewd as he was, and honestly averse to any mental perversion in himself,
 he discovered that a tricksy elf of desire had attracted him to the belief
 in this calling, and that he must free himself of the greatest passion of
 his heart and bid it farewell. The painful conviction, tearing and gnawing
 at his vitals, that it was necessary to bid farewell, finds full
 expression in the character of Tasso. Over Tasso, that Werther
 intensified, hovers the premonition of something worse than death, as when
 one says: "Now it is over, after this farewell: how shall I go on living
 without going mad?" These two fundamental errors of his life gave Goethe,
 in face of a purely literary attitude towards poetry (the only attitude
 then known to the world), such an unembarrassed and apparently almost
 arbitrary position. Not to speak of the period when Schiller (poor
 Schiller, who had no time himself and left no time to others) drove away
 his shy dread of poetry, his fear of all literary life and craftsmanship,
 Goethe appears like a Greek who now and then visits his beloved, doubting
 whether she be not a Goddess to whom he can give no proper name. In all
 his poetry one notices the inspiring neighbourhood of plastic art and
 Nature. The features of these figures that floated before him--and perhaps
 he always thought he was on the track of the metamorphoses of one
 Goddess--became, without his will or knowledge, the features of all the
 children of his art. Without the extravagances of error he would not have
 been Goethe--that is, the only German artist in writing who has not yet
 become out of date--just because he desired as little to be a writer as a
 German by vocation.
 
 
 
 
 228.
 
 
 TRAVELLERS AND THEIR GRADES.--Among travellers we may distinguish five
 grades. The first and lowest grade is of those who travel and are
 seen--they become really travelled and are, as it were, blind. Next come
 those who really see the world. The third class experience the results of
 their seeing. The fourth weave their experience into their life and carry
 it with them henceforth. Lastly, there are some men of the highest
 strength who, as soon as they have returned home, must finally and
 necessarily work out in their lives and productions all the things seen
 that they have experienced and incorporated in themselves.--Like these five
 species of travellers, all mankind goes through the whole pilgrimage of
 life, the lowest as purely passive, the highest as those who act and live
 out their lives without keeping back any residue of inner experiences.
 
 
 
 
 229.
 
 
 IN CLIMBING HIGHER.--So soon as we climb higher than those who hitherto
 admired us, we appear to them as sunken and fallen. For they imagined that
 under all circumstances they were on the heights in our company (maybe
 also through our agency).
 
 
 
 
 230.
 
 
 MEASURE AND MODERATION.--Of two quite lofty things, measure and moderation,
 it is best never to speak. A few know their force and significance, from
 the mysterious paths of inner experiences and conversions: they honour in
 them something quite godlike, and are afraid to speak aloud. All the rest
 hardly listen when they are spoken about, and think the subjects under
 discussion are tedium and mediocrity. We must perhaps except those who
 have once heard a warning note from that realm but have stopped their ears
 against the sound. The recollection of it makes them angry and
 exasperated.
 
 
 
 
 231.
 
 
 HUMANITY OF FRIENDSHIP AND COMRADESHIP.--"If thou wilt take the left hand,
 then I will go to the right,"(16) that feeling is the hall-mark of
 humanity in intimate intercourse, and without that feeling every
 friendship, every band of apostles or disciples, sooner or later becomes a
 fraud.
 
 
 
 
 232.
 
 
 THE PROFOUND.--Men of profound thought appear to themselves in intercourse
 with others like comedians, for in order to be understood they must always
 simulate superficiality.
 
 
 
 
 233.
 
 
 FOR THE SCORNERS OF "HERD-HUMANITY."--He who regards human beings as a
 herd, and flies from them as fast as he can, will certainly be caught up
 by them and gored upon their horns.
 
 
 
 
 234.
 
 
 THE MAIN TRANSGRESSION AGAINST THE VAIN.--In society, he who gives another
 an opportunity of favourably setting forth his knowledge, sentiments, and
 experience sets himself above him. Unless he is felt by the other to be a
 superior being without limitation, he is guilty of an attack upon his
 vanity, while what he aimed at was the gratification of the other man's
 vanity.
 
 
 
 
 235.
 
 
 DISAPPOINTMENT.--When a long life of action distinguished by speeches and
 writings gives publicity to a man's personality, personal intercourse with
 him is generally disappointing on two grounds. Firstly, one expects too
 much from a brief period of intercourse (namely, all that the thousand and
 one opportunities of life can alone bring out). Secondly, no recognised
 person gives himself the trouble to woo recognition in individual cases.
 He is too careless, and we are at too high a tension.
 
 
 
 
 236.
 
 
 TWO SOURCES OF KINDNESS.--To treat all men with equal good-humour, and to
 be kind without distinction of persons, may arise as much from a profound
 contempt for mankind as from an ingrained love of humanity.
 
 
 
 
 237.
 
 
 THE WANDERER IN THE MOUNTAINS TO HIMSELF.--There are certain signs that you
 have gone farther and higher. There is a freer, wider prospect before you,
 the air blows cooler yet milder in your face (you have unlearned the folly
 of confounding mildness with warmth), your gait is more firm and vigorous,
 courage and discretion have waxed together. On all these grounds your
 journey may now be more lonely and in any case more perilous than
 heretofore, if indeed not to the extent believed by those who from the
 misty valley see you, the roamer, striding on the mountains.
 
 
 
 
 238.
 
 
 WITH THE EXCEPTION OF OUR NEIGHBOUR.--I admit that my head is set wrong on
 my neck only, for every other man, as is well known, knows better than I
 what I should do or leave alone. The only one who cannot help me is
 myself, poor beggar! Are we not all like statues on which false heads have
 been placed? Eh, dear neighbour?--Ah no; you, just you, are the exception!
 
 
 
 
 239.
 
 
 CAUTION.--We must either not go about at all with people who are lacking in
 the reverence for personalities, or inexorably fetter them beforehand with
 the manacles of convention.
 
 
 
 
 240.
 
 
 THE WISH TO APPEAR VAIN.--In conversation with strangers or little-known
 acquaintances, to express only selected thoughts, to speak of one's famous
 acquaintances, and important experiences and travels, is a sign that one
 is not proud, or at least would not like to appear proud. Vanity is the
 polite mask of pride.
 
 
 
 
 241.
 
 
 GOOD FRIENDSHIP.--A good friendship arises when the one man deeply respects
 the other, more even than himself; loves him also, though not so much as
 himself; and finally, to facilitate intercourse, knows how to add the
 delicate bloom and veneer of intimacy, but at the same time wisely
 refrains from a true, real intimacy, from the confounding of _meum_ and
 _tuum_.
 
 
 
 
 242.
 
 
 FRIENDS AS GHOSTS.--If we change ourselves vitally, our friends, who have
 not changed, become ghosts of our own past: their voice sounds shadowy and
 dreadful to us, as if we heard our own voice speaking, but younger,
 harder, less mellow.
 
 
 
 
 243.
 
 
 ONE EYE AND TWO GLANCES.--The same people whose eyes naturally plead for
 favours and indulgences are accustomed, from their frequent humiliations
 and cravings for revenge, to assume a shameless glance as well.
 
 
 
 
 244.
 
 
 THE HAZE OF DISTANCE.--A child throughout life--that sounds very touching,
 but is only the verdict from the distance. Seen and known close at hand,
 he is always called "puerile throughout life."
 
 
 
 
 245.
 
 
 ADVANTAGE AND DISADVANTAGE IN THE SAME MISUNDERSTANDING.--The mute
 perplexity of the subtle brain is usually understood by the non-subtle as
 a silent superiority, and is much dreaded whereas the perception of
 perplexity would produce good will.
 
 
 
 
 246.
 
 
 THE SAGE GIVING HIMSELF OUT TO BE A FOOL.--The philanthropy of the sage
 sometimes makes him decide to pretend to be excited, enraged, or
 delighted, so that he may not hurt his surroundings by the coldness and
 rationality of his true nature.
 
 
 
 
 247.
 
 
 FORCING ONESELF TO ATTENTION.--So soon as we note that any one in
 intercourse and conversation with us has to force himself to attention, we
 have adequate evidence that he loves us not, or loves us no longer.
 
 
 
 
 248.
 
 
 THE WAY TO A CHRISTIAN VIRTUE.--Learning from one's enemies is the best way
 to love them, for it inspires us with a grateful mood towards them.
 
 
 
 
 249.
 
 
 STRATAGEM OF THE IMPORTUNATE.--The importunate man gives us gold coins as
 change for our convention coins, and thereby tries to force us afterwards
 to treat our convention as an oversight and him as an exception.
 
 
 
 
 250.
 
 
 REASON FOR DISLIKE.--We become hostile to many an artist or writer, not
 because we notice in the end that he has duped us, but because he did not
 find more subtle means necessary to entrap us.
 
 
 
 
 251.
 
 
 IN PARTING.--Not by the way one soul approaches another, but by the way it
 separates, do I recognise its relationship and homogeneity with the other.
 
 
 
 
 252.
 
 
 SILENTIUM.--We must not speak about our friends, or we renounce the
 sentiment of friendship.
 
 
 
 
 253.
 
 
 IMPOLITENESS.--Impoliteness is often the sign of a clumsy modesty, which
 when taken by surprise loses its head and would fain hide the fact by
 means of rudeness.
 
 
 
 
 254.
 
 
 HONESTY'S MISCALCULATION.--Our newest acquaintances are sometimes the first
 to learn what we have hitherto kept dark. We have the foolish notion that
 our proof of confidence is the strongest fetter wherewith to hold them
 fast. But _they_ do not know enough about us to feel so strongly the
 sacrifice involved in our speaking out, and betray our secrets to others
 without any idea of betrayal. Hereby we possibly lose our old friends.
 
 
 
 
 255.
 
 
 IN THE ANTE-CHAMBER OF FAVOUR.--All men whom we let stand long in the
 ante-chamber of our favour get into a state of fermentation or become
 bitter.
 
 
 
 
 256.
 
 
 WARNING TO THE DESPISED.--When we have sunk unmistakably in the estimation
 of mankind we should cling tooth and nail to modesty in intercourse, or we
 shall betray to others that we have sunk in our own estimation as well.
 Cynicism in intercourse is a sign that a man, when alone, treats himself
 too as a dog.
 
 
 
 
 257.
 
 
 IGNORANCE OFTEN ENNOBLES.--With regard to the respect of those who pay
 respect, it is an advantage ostensibly not to understand certain things.
 Ignorance, too, confers privileges.
 
 
 
 
 258.
 
 
 THE OPPONENT OF GRACE.--The impatient and arrogant man does not care for
 grace, feeling it to be a corporeal, visible reproach against himself. For
 grace is heartfelt toleration in movement and gesture.
 
 
 
 
 259.
 
 
 ON SEEING AGAIN.--When old friends see each other again after a long
 separation, it often happens that they affect an interest in matters to
 which they have long since become indifferent. Sometimes both remark this,
 but dare not raise the veil--from a mournful doubt. Hence arise
 conversations as in the realm of the dead.
 
 
 
 
 260.
 
 
 MAKING FRIENDS ONLY WITH THE INDUSTRIOUS.--The man of leisure is dangerous
 to his friends, for, having nothing to do, he talks of what his friends
 are doing or not doing, interferes, and finally makes himself a nuisance.
 The clever man will only make friends with the industrious.
 
 
 
 
 261.
 
 
 ONE WEAPON TWICE AS MUCH AS TWO.--It is an unequal combat when one man
 defends his cause with head and heart, the other with head alone. The
 first has sun and wind against him, as it were, and his two weapons
 interfere with each other: he loses the prize--in the eyes of truth. True,
 the victory of the second, with his one weapon, is seldom a victory after
 the hearts of all the other spectators, and makes him unpopular.
 
 
 
 
 262.
 
 
 DEPTH AND TROUBLED WATERS.--The public easily confounds him who fishes in
 troubled waters with him who pumps up from the depths.
 
 
 
 
 263.
 
 
 DEMONSTRATING ONE'S VANITY TO FRIEND AND FOE.--Many a man, from vanity,
 maltreats even his friends, when in the presence of witnesses to whom he
 wishes to make his own preponderance clear. Others exaggerate the merits
 of their enemies, in order to point proudly to the fact that they are
 worthy of such foes.
 
 
 
 
 264.
 
 
 COOLING OFF.--The over-heating of the heart is generally allied with
 illness of the head and judgment. He who is concerned for a time with the
 health of his head must know what he has to cool, careless of the future
 of his heart. For if we are capable at all of giving warmth, we are sure
 to become warm again and then have our summer.
 
 
 
 
 265.
 
 
 MINGLED FEELINGS.--Towards science women and self-seeking artists entertain
 a feeling that is composed of envy and sentimentality.
 
 
 
 
 266.
 
 
 WHERE DANGER IS GREATEST.--We seldom break our leg so long as life
 continues a toilsome upward climb. The danger comes when we begin to take
 things easily and choose the convenient paths.
 
 
 
 
 267.
 
 
 NOT TOO EARLY.--We must beware of becoming sharp too early, or we shall
 also become thin too early.
 
 
 
 
 268.
 
 
 JOY IN REFRACTORINESS.--The good teacher knows cases where he is proud that
 his pupil remains true to himself in opposition to him--at times when the
 youth must not understand the man or would be harmed by understanding him.
 
 
 
 
 269.
 
 
 THE EXPERIMENT OF HONESTY.--Young men, who wish to be more honest than they
 have been, seek as victim some one acknowledged to be honest, attacking
 him first with an attempt to reach his height by abuse--with the underlying
 notion that this first experiment at any rate is void of danger. For just
 such a one has no right to chastise the impudence of the honest man.
 
 
 
 
 270.
 
 
 THE ETERNAL CHILD.--We think, short-sighted that we are, that fairy-tales
 and games belong to childhood. As if at any age we should care to live
 without fairy-tales and games! Our words and sentiments are indeed
 different, but the essential fact remains the same, as is proved by the
 child himself looking on games as his work and fairy-tales as his truth.
 The shortness of life ought to preserve us from a pedantic distinction
 between the different ages--as if every age brought something new--and a
 poet ought one day to portray a man of two hundred, who really lives
 without fairy-tales and games.
 
 
 
 
 271.
 
 
 EVERY PHILOSOPHY IS THE PHILOSOPHY OF A PERIOD OF LIFE.--The period of life
 in which a philosopher finds his teaching is manifested by his teaching;
 he cannot avoid that, however elevated above time and hour he may feel
 himself. Thus, Schopenhauer's philosophy remains a mirror of his hot and
 melancholy youth--it is no mode of thought for older men. Plato's
 philosophy reminds one of the middle thirties, when a warm and a cold
 current generally rush together, so that spray and delicate clouds and,
 under favourable circumstances and glimpses of sunshine, enchanting
 rainbow-pictures result.
 
 
 
 
 272.
 
 
 OF THE INTELLECT OF WOMEN.--The intellectual strength of a woman is best
 proved by the fact that she offers her own intellect as a sacrifice out of
 love for a man and his intellect, and that nevertheless in the new domain,
 which was previously foreign to her nature, a second intellect at once
 arises as an aftergrowth, to which the man's mind impels her.
 
 
 
 
 273.
 
 
 RAISING AND LOWERING IN THE SEXUAL DOMAIN.--The storm of desire will
 sometimes carry a man up to a height where all desire is silenced, where
 he really loves and lives in a better state of being rather than in a
 better state of choice. On the other hand, a good woman, from true love,
 often climbs down to desire, and lowers herself in her own eyes. The
 latter action in particular is one of the most pathetic sensations which
 the idea of a good marriage can involve.
 
 
 
 
 274.
 
 
 MAN PROMISES, WOMAN FULFILS.--By woman Nature shows how far she has
 hitherto achieved her task of fashioning humanity, by man she shows what
 she has had to overcome and what she still proposes to do for
 humanity.--The most perfect woman of every age is the holiday-task of the
 Creator on every seventh day of culture, the recreation of the artist from
 his work.
 
 
 
 
 275.
 
 
 TRANSPLANTING.--If we have spent our intellect in order to gain mastery
 over the intemperance of the passions, the sad result often follows that
 we transfer the intemperance to the intellect, and from that time forth
 are extravagant in thought and desire of knowledge.
 
 
 
 
 276.
 
 
 LAUGHTER AS TREACHERY.--How and when a woman laughs is a sign of her
 culture, but in the ring of laughter her nature reveals itself, and in
 highly cultured women perhaps even the last insoluble residue of their
 nature. Hence the psychologist will say with Horace, though from different
 reasons: "Ridete puellae."
 
 
 
 
 277.
 
 
 FROM THE YOUTHFUL SOUL.--Youths varyingly show devotion and impudence
 towards the same person, because at bottom they only despise or admire
 themselves in that other person, and between the two feelings but stagger
 to and fro in themselves, so long as they have not found in experience the
 measure of their will and ability.
 
 
 
 
 278.
 
 
 FOR THE AMELIORATION OF THE WORLD.--If we forbade the discontented, the
 sullen, and the atrabilious to propagate, we might transform the world
 into a garden of happiness.--This aphorism belongs to a practical
 philosophy for the female sex.
 
 
 
 
 279.
 
 
 NOT TO DISTRUST YOUR EMOTIONS.--The feminine phrase "Do not distrust your
 emotions" does not mean much more than "Eat what tastes good to you." This
 may also, especially for moderate natures, be a good everyday rule. But
 other natures must live according to another maxim: "You must eat not only
 with your mouth but also with your brain, in order that the greediness of
 your mouth may not prove your undoing."
 
 
 
 
 280.
 
 
 A CRUEL FANCY OF LOVE.--Every great love involves the cruel thought of
 killing the object of love, so that it may be removed once for all from
 the mischievous play of change. For love is more afraid of change than of
 destruction.
 
 
 
 
 281.
 
 
 DOORS.--In everything that is learnt or experienced, the child, just like
 the man, sees doors; but for the former they are places to go _to_, for
 the latter to go _through_.
 
 
 
 
 282.
 
 
 SYMPATHETIC WOMEN.--The sympathy of women, which is talkative, takes the
 sick-bed to market.
 
 
 
 
 283.
 
 
 EARLY MERIT.--He who acquires merit early in life tends to forget all
 reverence for age and old people, and accordingly, greatly to his
 disadvantage, excludes himself from the society of the mature, those who
 confer maturity. Thus in spite of his early merit he remains green,
 importunate, and boyish longer than others.
 
 
 
 
 284.
 
 
 SOULS ALL OF A PIECE.--Women and artists think that where we do not
 contradict them we cannot. Reverence on ten counts and silent disapproval
 on ten others appears to them an impossible combination, because their
 souls are all of a piece.
 
 
 
 
 285.
 
 
 YOUNG TALENTS.--With respect to young talents we must strictly follow
 Goethe's maxim, that we should often avoid harming error in order to avoid
 harming truth. Their condition is like the diseases of pregnancy, and
 involves strange appetites. These appetites should be satisfied and
 humoured as far as possible, for the sake of the fruit they may be
 expected to produce. It is true that, as nurse of these remarkable
 invalids, one must learn the difficult art of voluntary self-abasement.
 
 
 
 
 286.
 
 
 DISGUST WITH TRUTH.--Women are so constituted that all truth (in relation
 to men, love, children, society, aim of life) disgusts them--and that they
 try to be revenged on every one who opens their eyes.
 
 
 
 
 287.
 
 
 THE SOURCE OF GREAT LOVE.--Whence arises the sudden passion of a man for a
 woman, a passion so deep, so vital? Least of all from sensuality only: but
 when a man finds weakness, need of help, and high spirits united in the
 same creature, he suffers a sort of overflowing of soul, and is touched
 and offended at the same moment. At this point arises the source of great
 love.
 
 
 
 
 288.
 
 
 CLEANLINESS.--In the child, the sense for cleanliness should be fanned into
 a passion, and then later on he will raise himself, in ever new phases, to
 almost every virtue, and will finally appear, in compensation for all
 talent, as a shining cloud of purity, temperance, gentleness, and
 character, happy in himself and spreading happiness around.
 
 
 
 
 289.
 
 
 OF VAIN OLD MEN.--Profundity of thought belongs to youth, clarity of
 thought to old age. When, in spite of this, old men sometimes speak and
 write in the manner of the profound, they do so from vanity, imagining
 that they thereby assume the charm of juvenility, enthusiasm, growth,
 apprehensiveness, hopefulness.
 
 
 
 
 290.
 
 
 ENJOYMENT OF NOVELTY.--Men use a new lesson or experience later on as a
 ploughshare or perhaps also as a weapon, women at once make it into an
 ornament.
 
 
 
 
 291.
 
 
 HOW BOTH SEXES BEHAVE WHEN IN THE RIGHT.--If it is conceded to a woman that
 she is right, she cannot deny herself the triumph of setting her heel on
 the neck of the vanquished; she must taste her victory to the full. On the
 other hand, man towards man in such a case is ashamed of being right. But
 then man is accustomed to victory; with woman it is an exception.
 
 
 
 
 292.
 
 
 ABNEGATION IN THE WILL TO BEAUTY.--In order to become beautiful, a woman
 must not desire to be considered pretty. That is to say, in ninety-nine
 out of a hundred cases where she could please she must scorn and put aside
 all thoughts of pleasing. Only then can she ever reap the delight of him
 whose soul's portal is wide enough to admit the great.
 
 
 
 
 293.
 
 
 UNINTELLIGIBLE, UNENDURABLE.--A youth cannot understand that an old man has
 also had his delights, his dawns of feeling, his changings and soarings of
 thought. It offends him to think that such things have existed before. But
 it makes him very bitter to hear that, to become fruitful, he must lose
 those buds and dispense with their fragrance.
 
 
 
 
 294.
 
 
 THE PARTY WITH THE AIR OF MARTYRDOM.--Every party that can assume an air of
 martyrdom wins good-natured souls over to its side and thereby itself
 acquires an air of good nature--greatly to its advantage.
 
 
 
 
 295.
 
 
 ASSERTIONS SURER THAN ARGUMENTS.--An assertion has, with the majority of
 men at any rate, more effect than an argument, for arguments provoke
 mistrust. Hence demagogues seek to strengthen the arguments of their party
 by assertions.
 
 
 
 
 296.
 
 
 THE BEST CONCEALERS.--All regularly successful men are profoundly cunning
 in making their faults and weaknesses look like manifestations of
 strength. This proves that they must know their defects uncommonly well.
 
 
 
 
 297.
 
 
 FROM TIME TO TIME.--He sat in the city gateway and said to one who passed
 through that this was the city gate. The latter replied that this was
 true, but that one must not be too much in the right if one expected to be
 thanked for it. "Oh," answered the other, "I don't want thanks, but from
 time to time it is very pleasant not merely to be in the right but to
 remain in the right."
 
 
 
 
 298.
 
 
 VIRTUE WAS NOT INVENTED BY THE GERMANS.--Goethe's nobleness and freedom
 from envy, Beethoven's fine hermitical resignation, Mozart's cheerfulness
 and grace of heart, Handel's unbending manliness and freedom under the
 law, Bach's confident and luminous inner life, such as does not even need
 to renounce glamour and success--are these qualities peculiarly German?--If
 they are not, they at least prove to what goal Germans should strive and
 to what they can attain.
 
 
 
 
 299.
 
 
 _PIA FRAUS_ OR SOMETHING ELSE.--I hope I am mistaken, but I think that in
 Germany of to-day a twofold sort of hypocrisy is set up as the duty of the
 moment for every one. From imperial-political misgivings Germanism is
 demanded, and from social apprehensions Christianity--but both only in
 words and gestures, and particularly in ability to keep silent. It is the
 veneer that nowadays costs so much and is paid for so highly; and for the
 benefit of the spectators the face of the nation assumes German and
 Christian wrinkles.
 
 
 
 
 300.
 
 
 HOW FAR EVEN IN THE GOOD THE HALF MAY BE MORE THAN THE WHOLE.--In all
 things that are constructed to last and demand the service of many hands,
 much that is less good must be made a rule, although the organiser knows
 what is better and harder very well. He will calculate that there will
 never be a lack of persons who _can_ correspond to the rule, and he knows
 that the middling good is the rule.--The youth seldom sees this point, and
 as an innovator thinks how marvellously he is in the right and how strange
 is the blindness of others.
 
 
 
 
 301.
 
 
 THE PARTISAN.--The true partisan learns nothing more, he only experiences
 and judges. It is significant that Solon, who was never a partisan but
 pursued his aims above and apart from parties or even against them, was
 the father of that simple phrase wherein lies the secret of the health and
 vitality of Athens: "I grow old, but I am always learning."
 
 
 
 
 302.
 
 
 WHAT IS GERMAN ACCORDING TO GOETHE.--They are really intolerable people of
 whom one cannot even accept the good, who have freedom of disposition but
 do not remark that they are lacking in freedom of taste and spirit. Yet
 just this, according to Goethe's well-weighed judgment, is German.--His
 voice and his example indicate that the German should be more than a
 German if he wishes to be useful or even endurable to other nations--and
 which direction his striving should take, in order that he may rise above
 and beyond himself.
 
 
 
 
 303.
 
 
 WHEN IT IS NECESSARY TO REMAIN STATIONARY.--When the masses begin to rage,
 and reason is under a cloud, it is a good thing, if the health of one's
 soul is not quite assured, to go under a doorway and look out to see what
 the weather is like.
 
 
 
 
 304.
 
 
 THE REVOLUTION-SPIRIT AND THE POSSESSION-SPIRIT.--The only remedy against
 Socialism that still lies in your power is to avoid provoking Socialism--in
 other words, to live in moderation and contentment, to prevent as far as
 possible all lavish display, and to aid the State as far as possible in
 its taxing of all superfluities and luxuries. You do not like this remedy?
 Then, you rich bourgeois who call yourselves "Liberals," confess that it
 is your own inclination that you find so terrible and menacing in
 Socialists, but allow to prevail in yourselves as unavoidable, as if with
 you it were something different. As you are constituted, if you had not
 your fortune and the cares of maintaining it, this bent of yours would
 make Socialists of you. Possession alone differentiates you from them. If
 you wish to conquer the assailants of your prosperity, you must first
 conquer yourselves.--And if that prosperity only meant well-being, it would
 not be so external and provocative of envy; it would be more generous,
 more benevolent, more compensatory, more helpful. But the spurious,
 histrionic element in your pleasures, which lie more in the feeling of
 contrast (because others have them not, and feel envious) than in feelings
 of realised and heightened power--your houses, dresses, carriages, shops,
 the demands of your palates and your tables, your noisy operatic and
 musical enthusiasm; lastly your women, formed and fashioned but of base
 metal, gilded but without the ring of gold, chosen by you for show and
 considering themselves meant for show--these are the things that spread the
 poison of that national disease, which seizes the masses ever more and
 more as a Socialistic heart-itch, but has its origin and breeding-place in
 you. Who shall now arrest this epidemic?
 
 
 
 
 305.
 
 
 PARTY TACTICS.--When a party observes that a previous member has changed
 from an unqualified to a qualified adherent, it endures it so ill that it
 irritates and mortifies him in every possible way with the object of
 forcing him to a decisive break and making him an opponent. For the party
 suspects that the intention of finding a relative value in its faith, a
 value which admits of pro and con, of weighing and discarding, is more
 dangerous than downright opposition.
 
 
 
 
 306.
 
 
 FOR THE STRENGTHENING OF PARTIES.--Whoever wishes to strengthen a party
 internally should give it an opportunity of being forcibly treated with
 obvious injustice. The party thus acquires a capital of good conscience,
 which hitherto it perhaps lacked.
 
 
 
 
 307.
 
 
 TO PROVIDE FOR ONE'S PAST.--As men after all only respect the
 old-established and slowly developed, he who would survive after his death
 must not only provide for posterity but still more for the past. Hence
 tyrants of every sort (including tyrannical artists and politicians) like
 to do violence to history, so that history may seem a preparation and a
 ladder up to them.
 
 
 
 
 308.
 
 
 PARTY WRITERS.--The beating of drums, which delights young writers who
 serve a party, sounds to him who does not belong to the party like a
 rattling of chains, and excites sympathy rather than admiration.
 
 
 
 
 309.
 
 
 TAKING SIDES AGAINST OURSELVES.--Our followers never forgive us for taking
 sides against ourselves, for we seem in their eyes not only to be spurning
 their love but to be exposing them to the charge of lack of intelligence.
 
 
 
 
 310.
 
 
 DANGER IN WEALTH.--Only a man of intellect should hold property: otherwise
 property is dangerous to the community. For the owner, not knowing how to
 make use of the leisure which his possessions might secure to him, will
 continue to strive after more property. This strife will be his
 occupation, his strategy in the war with ennui. So in the end real wealth
 is produced from the moderate property that would be enough for an
 intellectual man. Such wealth, then, is the glittering outcrop of
 intellectual dependence and poverty, but it looks quite different from
 what its humble origin might lead one to expect, because it can mask
 itself with culture and art--it can, in fact, purchase the mask. Hence it
 excites envy in the poor and uncultured--who at bottom always envy culture
 and see no mask in the mask--and gradually paves the way for a social
 revolution. For a gilded coarseness and a histrionic blowing of trumpets
 in the pretended enjoyment of culture inspires that class with the
 thought, "It is only a matter of money," whereas it is indeed to some
 extent a matter of money, but far more of intellect.
 
 
 
 
 311.
 
 
 JOY IN COMMANDING AND OBEYING.--Commanding is a joy, like obeying; the
 former when it has not yet become a habit, the latter just when it has
 become a habit. Old servants under new masters advance each other mutually
 in giving pleasure.
 
 
 
 
 312.
 
 
 AMBITION FOR A FORLORN HOPE.--There is an ambition for a forlorn hope which
 forces a party to place itself at the post of extreme danger.
 
 
 
 
 313.
 
 
 WHEN ASSES ARE NEEDED.--We shall not move the crowd to cry "Hosanna!" until
 we have ridden into the city upon an ass.
 
 
 
 
 314.
 
 
 PARTY USAGE.--Every party attempts to represent the important elements that
 have sprung up outside it as unimportant, and if it does not succeed, it
 attacks those elements the more bitterly, the more excellent they are.
 
 
 
 
 315.
 
 
 BECOMING EMPTY.--Of him who abandons himself to the course of events, a
 smaller and smaller residue is continually left. Great politicians may
 therefore become quite empty men, although they were once full and rich.
 
 
 
 
 316.
 
 
 WELCOME ENEMIES.--The Socialistic movements are nowadays becoming more and
 more agreeable rather than terrifying to the dynastic governments, because
 by these movements they are provided with a right and a weapon for making
 exceptional rules, and can thus attack their real bogies, democrats and
 anti-dynasts.--Towards all that such governments professedly detest they
 feel a secret cordiality and inclination. But they are compelled to draw
 the veil over their soul.
 
 
 
 
 317.
 
 
 POSSESSION POSSESSES.--Only up to a certain point does possession make men
 feel freer and more independent; one step farther, and possession becomes
 lord, the possessor a slave. The latter must sacrifice his time, his
 thoughts to the former, and feels himself compelled to an intercourse,
 nailed to a spot, incorporated with the State--perhaps quite in conflict
 with his real and essential needs.
 
 
 
 
 318.
 
 
 OF THE MASTERY OF THEM THAT KNOW.--It is easy, ridiculously easy, to set up
 a model for the choice of a legislative body. First of all the honest and
 reliable men of the nation, who at the same time are masters and experts
 in some one branch, have to become prominent by mutual scenting-out and
 recognition. From these, by a narrower process of selection, the learned
 and expert of the first rank in each individual branch must again be
 chosen, also by mutual recognition and guarantee. If the legislative body
 be composed of these, it will finally be necessary, in each individual
 case, that only the voices and judgments of the most specialised experts
 should decide; the honesty of all the rest should have become so great
 that it is simply a matter of decency to leave the voting also in the
 hands of these men. The result would be that the law, in the strictest
 sense, would emanate from the intelligence of the most intelligent.--As
 things now are, voting is done by parties, and at every division there
 must be hundreds of uneasy consciences among the ill-taught, the incapable
 of judgment, among those who merely repeat, imitate, and go with the tide.
 Nothing lowers the dignity of a new law so much as this inherent
 shamefaced feeling of insincerity that necessarily results at every party
 division. But, as has been said, it is easy, ridiculously easy, to set up
 such a model: no power on earth is at present strong enough to realise
 such an ideal--unless the belief in the highest utility of knowledge, and
 of those that know, at last dawns even upon the most hostile minds and is
 preferred to the prevalent belief in majorities. In the sense of such a
 future may our watchword be: "More reverence for them that know, and down
 with all parties!"
 
 
 
 
 319.
 
 
 OF THE "NATION OF THINKERS" (OR OF BAD THINKING).--The vague, vacillating,
 premonitory, elementary, intuitive elements--to choose obscure names for
 obscure things--that are attributed to the German nature would be, if they
 really still existed, a proof that our culture has remained several stages
 behind and is still surrounded by the spell and atmosphere of the Middle
 Ages.--It is true that in this backwardness there are certain advantages:
 by these qualities the Germans (if, as has been said before, they still
 possess them) would possess the capacity, which other nations have now
 lost, for doing certain things and particularly for understanding certain
 things. Much undoubtedly is lost if the lack of sense--which is just the
 common factor in all those qualities--is lost. Here too, however, there are
 no losses without the highest compensatory gains, so that no reason is
 left for lamenting, granting that we do not, like children, and gourmands,
 wish to enjoy at once the fruits of all seasons of the year.
 
 
 
 
 320.
 
 
 CARRYING COALS TO NEWCASTLE.--The governments of the great States have two
 instruments for keeping the people dependent, in fear and obedience: a
 coarser, the army, and a more refined, the school. With the aid of the
 former they win over to their side the ambition of the higher strata and
 the strength of the lower, so far as both are characteristic of active and
 energetic men of moderate or inferior gifts. With the aid of the latter
 they win over gifted poverty, especially the intellectually pretentious
 semi-poverty of the middle classes. Above all, they make teachers of all
 grades into an intellectual court looking unconsciously "towards the
 heights." By putting obstacle after obstacle in the way of private schools
 and the wholly distasteful individual tuition they secure the disposal of
 a considerable number of educational posts, towards which numerous hungry
 and submissive eyes are turned to an extent five times as great as can
 ever be satisfied. These posts, however, must support the holder but
 meagrely, so that he maintains a feverish thirst for promotion and becomes
 still more closely attached to the views of the government. For it is
 always more advantageous to foster moderate discontent than contentment,
 the mother of courage, the grandmother of free thought and exuberance. By
 means of this physically and mentally bridled body of teachers, the youth
 of the country is as far as possible raised to a certain level of culture
 that is useful to the State and arranged on a suitable sliding-scale.
 Above all, the immature and ambitious minds of all classes are almost
 imperceptibly imbued with the idea that only a career which is recognised
 and hall-marked by the State can lead immediately to social distinction.
 The effect of this belief in government examinations and titles goes so
 far that even men who have remained independent and have risen by trade or
 handicraft still feel a pang of discontent in their hearts until their
 position too is marked and acknowledged by a gracious bestowal of rank and
 orders from above--until one becomes a "somebody." Finally the State
 connects all these hundreds of offices and posts in its hands with the
 obligation of being trained and hallmarked in these State schools if one
 ever wishes to enter this charmed circle. Honour in society, daily bread,
 the possibility of a family, protection from above, the feeling of
 community in a common culture--all this forms a network of hopes into which
 every young man walks: how should he feel the slightest breath of
 mistrust? In the end, perhaps, the obligation of being a soldier for one
 year has become with every one, after the lapse of a few generations, an
 unreflecting habit, an understood thing, with an eye to which we construct
 the plan of our lives quite early. Then the State can venture on the
 master-stroke of weaving together school and army, talent, ambition and
 strength by means of common advantages--that is, by attracting the more
 highly gifted on favourable terms to the army and inspiring them with the
 military spirit of joyful obedience; so that finally, perhaps, they become
 attached permanently to the flag and endow it by their talents with an
 ever new and more brilliant lustre. Then nothing more is wanted but an
 opportunity for great wars. These are provided from professional reasons
 (and so in all innocence) by diplomats, aided by newspapers and Stock
 Exchanges. For "the nation," as a nation of soldiers, need never be
 supplied with a good conscience in war--it has one already.
 
 
 
 
 321.
 
 
 THE PRESS.--If we consider how even to-day all great political transactions
 glide upon the stage secretly and stealthily; how they are hidden by
 unimportant events, and seem small when close at hand; how they only show
 their far-reaching effect, and leave the soil still quaking, long after
 they have taken place;--what significance can we attach to the Press in its
 present position, with its daily expenditure of lung-power in order to
 bawl, to deafen, to excite, to terrify? Is it anything more than an
 everlasting false alarm, which tries to lead our ears and our wits into a
 false direction?
 
 
 
 
 322.
 
 
 AFTER A GREAT EVENT.--A nation and a man whose soul has come to light
 through some great event generally feel the immediate need of some act of
 childishness or coarseness, as much from shame as for purposes of
 recreation.
 
 
 
 
 323.
 
 
 TO BE A GOOD GERMAN MEANS TO DE-GERMANISE ONESELF.--National differences
 consist, far more than has hitherto been observed, only in the differences
 of various grades of culture, and are only to a very small extent
 permanent (nor even that in a strict sense). For this reason all arguments
 based on national character are so little binding on one who aims at the
 alteration of convictions--in other words, at culture. If, for instance, we
 consider all that has already been German, we shall improve upon the
 hypothetical question, "What is German?" by the counter-question, "What is
 _now_ German?" and every good German will answer it practically, by
 overcoming his German characteristics. For when a nation advances and
 grows, it bursts the girdle previously given to it by its national
 outlook. When it remains stationary or declines, its soul is surrounded by
 a fresh girdle, and the crust, as it becomes harder and harder, builds a
 prison around, with walls growing ever higher. Hence if a nation has much
 that is firmly established, this is a sign that it wishes to petrify and
 would like to become nothing but a monument. This happened, from a
 definite date, in the case of Egypt. So he who is well-disposed towards
 the Germans may for his part consider how he may more and more grow out of
 what is German. The tendency to be un-German has therefore always been a
 mark of efficient members of our nation.
 
 
 
 
 324.
 
 
 FOREIGNISMS.--A foreigner who travelled in Germany found favour or the
 reverse by certain assertions of his, according to the districts in which
 he stayed. All intelligent Suabians, he used to say, are coquettish.--The
 other Suabians still believed that Uhland was a poet and Goethe
 immoral.--The best about German novels now in vogue was that one need not
 read them, for one knew already what they contained.--The native of Berlin
 seemed more good-humoured than the South German, for he was all too fond
 of mocking, and so could endure mockery himself, which the South German
 could not.--The intellect of the Germans was kept down by their beer and
 their newspapers: he recommended them tea and pamphlets, of course as a
 cure.--He advised us to contemplate the different nations of worn-out
 Europe and see how well each displayed some particular quality of old age,
 to the delight of those who sit before the great spectacle: how the French
 successfully represent the cleverness and amiability of old age, the
 English the experience and reserve, the Italians the innocence and
 candour. Can the other masks of old age be wanting? Where is the proud old
 man, the domineering old man, the covetous old man?--The most dangerous
 region in Germany was Saxony and Thuringia: nowhere else was there more
 mental nimbleness, more knowledge of men, side by side with freedom of
 thought; and all this was so modestly veiled by the ugly dialect and the
 zealous officiousness of the inhabitants that one hardly noticed that one
 here had to deal with the intellectual drill-sergeants of Germany, her
 teachers for good or evil.--The arrogance of the North Germans was kept in
 check by their tendency to obey, that of the South Germans by their
 tendency--to make themselves comfortable.--It appeared to him that in their
 women German men possessed awkward but self-opinionated housewives, who
 belauded themselves so perseveringly that they had almost persuaded the
 world, and at any rate their husbands, of their peculiarly German
 housewifely virtue.--When the conversation turned on Germany's home and
 foreign policy, he used to say (he called it "betray the secret") that
 Germany's greatest statesman did not believe in great statesmen.--The
 future of Germany he found menaced and menacing, for Germans had forgotten
 how to enjoy themselves (an art that the Italians understood so well),
 but, by the great games of chance called wars and dynastic revolutions,
 had accustomed themselves to emotionalism, and consequently would one day
 have an _emeute_. For that is the strongest emotion that a nation can
 procure for itself.--The German Socialist was all the more dangerous
 because impelled by no definite necessity: his trouble lay in not knowing
 what he wanted; so, even if he attained many of his objects, he would
 still pine away from desire in the midst of delights, just like Faust, but
 presumably like a very vulgar Faust. "For the Faust-Devil," he finally
 exclaimed, "by whom cultured Germans were so much plagued, was exorcised
 by Bismarck; but now the Devil has entered into the swine,(17) and is
 worse than ever!"
 
 
 
 
 325.
 
 
 OPINIONS.--Most men are nothing and count for nothing until they have
 arrayed themselves in universal convictions and public opinions. This is
 in accordance with the tailors' philosophy, "The apparel makes the man."
 Of exceptional men, however, it must be said, "The wearer primarily makes
 the apparel." Here opinions cease to be public, and become something else
 than masks, ornament, and disguise.
 
 
 
 
 326.
 
 
 TWO KINDS OF SOBRIETY.--In order not to confound the sobriety arising from
 mental exhaustion with that arising from moderation, one must remark that
 the former is peevish, the latter cheerful.
 
 
 
 
 327.
 
 
 DEBASEMENT OF JOY.--To call a thing good not a day longer than it appears
 to us good, and above all not a day earlier--that is the only way to keep
 joy pure. Otherwise, joy all too easily becomes insipid and rotten to the
 taste, and counts, for whole strata of the people, among the adulterated
 foodstuffs.
 
 
 
 
 328.
 
 
 THE SCAPEGOAT OF VIRTUE.--When a man does his very best, those who mean
 well towards him, but are not capable of appreciating him, speedily seek a
 scapegoat to immolate, thinking it is the scapegoat of sin--but it is the
 scapegoat of virtue.
 
 
 
 
 329.
 
 
 SOVEREIGNTY.--To honour and acknowledge even the bad, when it _pleases_
 one, and to have no conception of how one could be ashamed of being
 pleased thereat, is the mark of sovereignty in things great and small.
 
 
 
 
 330.
 
 
 INFLUENCE A PHANTOM, NOT A REALITY.--The man of mark gradually learns that
 so far as he has influence he is a phantom in other brains, and perhaps he
 falls into a state of subtle vexation of soul, in which he asks himself
 whether he must not maintain this phantom of himself for the benefit of
 his fellow-men.
 
 
 
 
 331.
 
 
 GIVING AND TAKING.--When one takes away (or anticipates) the smallest thing
 that another possesses, the latter is blind to the fact that he has been
 given something greater, nay, even the greatest thing.
 
 
 
 
 332.
 
 
 GOOD PLOUGHLAND.--All rejection and negation betoken a deficiency in
 fertility. If we were good ploughland, we should allow nothing to be
 unused or lost, and in every thing, event, or person we should welcome
 manure, rain, or sunshine.
 
 
 
 
 333.
 
 
 INTERCOURSE AS AN ENJOYMENT.--If a man renounces the world and
 intentionally lives in solitude, he may come to regard intercourse with
 others, which he enjoys but seldom, as a special delicacy.
 
 
 
 
 334.
 
 
 TO KNOW HOW TO SUFFER IN PUBLIC.--We must advertise our misfortunes and
 from time to time heave audible sighs and show visible marks of
 impatience. For if we could let others see how assured and happy we are in
 spite of pain and privation, how envious and ill-tempered they would
 become at the sight!--But we must take care not to corrupt our fellow-men;
 besides, if they knew the truth, they would levy a heavy toll upon us. At
 any rate our public misfortune is our private advantage.
 
 
 
 
 335.
 
 
 WARMTH ON THE HEIGHTS.--On the heights it is warmer than people in the
 valleys suppose, especially in winter. The thinker recognises the full
 import of this simile.
 
 
 
 
 336.
 
 
 TO WILL THE GOOD AND BE CAPABLE OF THE BEAUTIFUL.--It is not enough to
 practise the good one must have willed it, and, as the poet says, include
 the Godhead in our will. But the beautiful we must not will, we must be
 capable of it, in innocence and blindness, without any psychical
 curiosity. He that lights his lantern to find perfect men should remember
 the token by which to know them. They are the men who always act for the
 sake of the good and in so doing always attain to the beautiful without
 thinking of the beautiful. Many better and nobler men, from impotence or
 from want of beauty in their souls, remain unrefreshing and ugly to
 behold, with all their good will and good works. They rebuff and injure
 even virtue through the repulsive garb in which their bad taste arrays
 her.
 
 
 
 
 337.
 
 
 DANGER OF RENUNCIATION.--We must beware of basing our lives on too narrow a
 foundation of appetite. For if we renounce all the joys involved in
 positions, honours, associations, revels, creature comforts, and arts, a
 day may come when we perceive that this repudiation has led us not to
 wisdom but to satiety of life.
 
 
 
 
 338.
 
 
 FINAL OPINION ON OPINIONS.--Either we should hide our opinions or hide
 ourselves behind our opinions. Whoever does otherwise, does not know the
 way of the world, or belongs to the order of pious fire-eaters.
 
 
 
 
 339.
 
 
 "_GAUDEAMUS IGITUR._"--Joy must contain edifying and healing forces for the
 moral nature of man. Otherwise, how comes it that our soul, as soon as it
 basks in the sunshine of joy, unconsciously vows to itself, "I will be
 good!" "I will become perfect!" and is at once seized by a premonition of
 perfection that is like a shudder of religious awe?
 
 
 
 
 340.
 
 
 TO ONE WHO IS PRAISED.--So long as you are praised, believe that you are
 not yet on your own course but on that of another.
 
 
 
 
 341.
 
 
 LOVING THE MASTER.--The apprentice and the master love the master in
 different ways.
 
 
 
 
 342.
 
 
 ALL-TOO-BEAUTIFUL AND HUMAN.--"Nature is too beautiful for thee, poor
 mortal," one often feels. But now and then, at a profound contemplation of
 all that is human, in its fulness, vigour, tenderness, and complexity, I
 have felt as if I must say, in all humility, "Man also is too beautiful
 for the contemplation of man!" Nor did I mean the moral man alone, but
 every one.
 
 
 
 
 343.
 
 
 REAL AND PERSONAL ESTATE.--When life has treated us in true robber fashion,
 and has taken away all that it could of honour, joys, connections, health,
 and property of every kind, we perhaps discover in the end, after the
 first shock, that we are richer than before. For now we know for the first
 time what is so peculiarly ours that no robber hand can touch it, and
 perhaps, after all the plunder and devastation, we come forward with the
 airs of a mighty real estate owner.
 
 
 
 
 344.
 
 
 INVOLUNTARILY IDEALISED.--The most painful feeling that exists is finding
 out that we are always taken for something higher than we really are. For
 we must thereby confess to ourselves, "There is in you some element of
 fraud--your speech, your expression, your bearing, your eye, your dealings;
 and this deceitful something is as necessary as your usual honesty, but
 constantly destroys its effect and its value."
 
 
 
 
 345.
 
 
 IDEALIST AND LIAR.--We must not let ourselves be tyrannised even by that
 finest faculty of idealising things: otherwise, truth will one day part
 company from us with the insulting remark: "Thou arch-liar, what have I to
 do with thee?"
 
 
 
 
 346.
 
 
 BEING MISUNDERSTOOD.--When one is misunderstood generally, it is impossible
 to remove a particular misunderstanding. This point must be recognised, to
 save superfluous expenditure of energy in self-defence.
 
 
 
 
 347.
 
 
 THE WATER-DRINKER SPEAKS.--Go on drinking your wine, which has refreshed
 you all your life--what affair is it of yours if I have to be a
 water-drinker? Are not wine and water peaceable, brotherly elements, that
 can live side by side without mutual recriminations?
 
 
 
 
 348.
 
 
 FROM CANNIBAL COUNTRY.--In solitude the lonely man is eaten up by himself,
 among crowds by the many. Choose which you prefer.
 
 
 
 
 349.
 
 
 THE FREEZING-POINT OF THE WILL.--"Some time the hour will come at last, the
 hour that will envelop you in the golden cloud of painlessness; when the
 soul enjoys its own weariness and, happy in patient playing with patience,
 resembles the waves of a lake, which on a quiet summer day, in the
 reflection of a many-hued evening sky, sip and sip at the shore and again
 are hushed--without end, without purpose, without satiety, without need--all
 calm rejoicing in change, all ebb and flow of Nature's pulse." Such is the
 feeling and talk of all invalids, but if they attain that hour, a brief
 period of enjoyment is followed by ennui. But this is the thawing-wind of
 the frozen will, which awakes, stirs, and once more begets desire upon
 desire.--Desire is a sign of convalescence or recovery.
 
 
 
 
 350.
 
 
 THE DISCLAIMED IDEAL.--It happens sometimes by an exception that a man only
 reaches the highest when he disclaims his ideal. For this ideal previously
 drove him onward too violently, so that in the middle of the track he
 regularly got out of breath and had to rest.
 
 
 
 
 351.
 
 
 A TREACHEROUS INCLINATION.--It should be regarded as a sign of an envious
 but aspiring man, when he feels himself attracted by the thought that with
 regard to the eminent there is but one salvation--love.
 
 
 
 
 352.
 
 
 STAIRCASE HAPPINESS.--Just as the wit of many men does not keep pace with
 opportunity (so that opportunity has already passed through the door while
 wit still waits on the staircase outside), so others have a kind of
 staircase happiness, which walks too slowly to keep pace with swift-footed
 Time. The best that it can enjoy of an experience, of a whole span of
 life, falls to its share long afterwards, often only as a weak, spicy
 fragrance, giving rise to longing and sadness--as if "it might have been
 possible"--some time or other--to drink one's fill of this element: but now
 it is too late.
 
 
 
 
 353.
 
 
 WORMS.--The fact that an intellect contains a few worms does not detract
 from its ripeness.
 
 
 
 
 354.
 
 
 THE SEAT OF VICTORY.--A good seat on horseback robs an opponent of his
 courage, the spectator of his heart--why attack such a man? Sit like one
 who has been victorious!
 
 
 
 
 355.
 
 
 DANGER IN ADMIRATION.--From excessive admiration for the virtues of others
 one can lose the sense of one's own, and finally, through lack of
 practice, lose these virtues themselves, without retaining the alien
 virtues as compensation.
 
 
 
 
 356.
 
 
 USES OF SICKLINESS.--He who is often ill not only has a far greater
 pleasure in health, on account of his so often getting well, but acquires
 a very keen sense of what is healthy or sickly in actions and
 achievements, both his own and others'. Thus, for example, it is just the
 writers of uncertain health--among whom, unfortunately, nearly all great
 writers must be classed--who are wont to have a far more even and assured
 tone of health in their writings, because they are better versed than are
 the physically robust in the philosophy of psychical health and
 convalescence and in their teachers--morning, sunshine, forest, and
 fountain.
 
 
 
 
 357.
 
 
 DISLOYALTY A CONDITION OF MASTERY.--It cannot be helped--every master has
 but one pupil, and _he_ becomes disloyal to him, for he also is destined
 for mastery.
 
 
 
 
 358.
 
 
 NEVER IN VAIN.--In the mountains of truth you never climb in vain. Either
 you already reach a higher point to-day, or you exercise your strength in
 order to be able to climb higher to-morrow.
 
 
 
 
 359.
 
 
 THROUGH GREY WINDOW-PANES.--Is what you see through this window of the
 world so beautiful that you do not wish to look through any other
 window--ay, and even try to prevent others from so doing?
 
 
 
 
 360.
 
 
 A SIGN OF RADICAL CHANGES.--When we dream of persons long forgotten or
 dead, it is a sign that we have suffered radical changes, and that the
 soil on which we live has been completely undermined. The dead rise again,
 and our antiquity becomes modernity.
 
 
 
 
 361.
 
 
 MEDICINE OF THE SOUL.--To lie still and think little is the cheapest
 medicine for all diseases of the soul, and, with the aid of good-will,
 becomes pleasanter every hour that it is used.
 
 
 
 
 362.
 
 
 INTELLECTUAL ORDER OF PRECEDENCE.--You rank far below others when you try
 to establish the exception and they the rule.
 
 
 
 
 363.
 
 
 THE FATALIST.--You must believe in fate--science can compel you thereto. All
 that develops in you out of that belief--cowardice, devotion or loftiness,
 and uprightness--bears witness to the soil in which the grain was sown, but
 not to the grain itself, for from that seed anything and everything can
 grow.
 
 
 
 
 364.
 
 
 THE REASON FOR MUCH FRETFULNESS.--He that prefers the beautiful to the
 useful in life will undoubtedly, like children who prefer sweetmeats to
 bread, destroy his digestion and acquire a very fretful outlook on the
 world.
 
 
 
 
 365.
 
 
 EXCESS AS A REMEDY.--We can make our own talent once more acceptable to
 ourselves by honouring and enjoying the opposite talent for some time to
 excess.--Using excess as a remedy is one of the more refined devices in the
 art of life.
 
 
 
 
 366.
 
 
 "WILL A SELF."--Active, successful natures act, not according to the maxim,
 "Know thyself," but as if always confronted with the command, "Will a
 self, so you will become a self."--Fate seems always to have left them a
 choice. Inactive, contemplative natures, on the other hand, reflect on how
 they have chosen their self "once for all" at their entry into life.
 
 
 
 
 367.
 
 
 TO LIVE AS FAR AS POSSIBLE WITHOUT A FOLLOWING.--How small is the
 importance of followers we first grasp when we have ceased to be the
 followers of our followers.
 
 
 
 
 368.
 
 
 OBSCURING ONESELF.--We must understand how to obscure ourselves in order to
 get rid of the gnat-swarms of pestering admirers.
 
 
 
 
 369.
 
 
 ENNUI.--There is an ennui of the most subtle and cultured brains, to which
 the best that the world can offer has become stale. Accustomed to eat ever
 more and more recherche fare and to feel disgust at coarser diet, they are
 in danger of dying of hunger. For the very best exists but in small
 quantities, and has sometimes become inaccessible or hard as stone, so
 that even good teeth can no longer bite it.
 
 
 
 
 370.
 
 
 THE DANGER IN ADMIRATION.--The admiration of a quality or of an art may be
 so strong as to deter us from aspiring to possess that quality or art.
 
 
 
 
 371.
 
 
 WHAT IS REQUIRED OF ART.--One man wants to enjoy himself by means of art,
 another for a time to get out of or above himself.--To meet both
 requirements there exists a twofold species of artists.
 
 
 
 
 372.
 
 
 SECESSIONS.--Whoever secedes from us offends not us, perhaps, but certainly
 our adherents.
 
 
 
 
 373.
 
 
 AFTER DEATH.--It is only long after the death of a man that we find it
 inconceivable that he should be missed--in the case of really great men,
 only after decades. Those who are honest usually think when any one dies
 that he is not much missed, and that the pompous funeral oration is a
 piece of hypocrisy. Necessity first teaches the necessariness of an
 individual, and the proper epitaph is a belated sigh.
 
 
 
 
 374.
 
 
 LEAVING IN HADES.--We must leave many things in the Hades of half-conscious
 feeling, and not try to release them from their shadow-existence, or else
 they will become, as thoughts and words, our demoniacal tyrants, with
 cruel lust after our blood.
 
 
 
 
 375.
 
 
 NEAR TO BEGGARY.--Even the richest intellect sometimes mislays the key to
 the room in which his hoarded treasures repose. He is then like the
 poorest of the poor, who must beg to get a living.
 
 
 
 
 376.
 
 
 CHAIN-THINKERS.--To him who has thought a great deal, every new thought
 that he hears or reads at once assumes the form of a chain.
 
 
 
 
 377.
 
 
 PITY.--In the gilded sheath of pity is sometimes hidden the dagger of envy.
 
 
 
 
 378.
 
 
 WHAT IS GENIUS?--To aspire to a lofty aim and to will the means to that
 aim.
 
 
 
 
 379.
 
 
 VANITY OF COMBATANTS.--He who has no hope of victory in a combat, or who is
 obviously worsted, is all the more desirous that his style of fighting
 should be admired.
 
 
 
 
 380.
 
 
 THE PHILOSOPHIC LIFE MISINTERPRETED.--At the moment when one is beginning
 to take philosophy seriously, the whole world fancies that one is doing
 the reverse.
 
 
 
 
 381.
 
 
 IMITATION.--By imitation, the bad gains, the good loses credit--especially
 in art.
 
 
 
 
 382.
 
 
 FINAL TEACHING OF HISTORY.--"Oh that I had but lived in those times!" is
 the exclamation of foolish and frivolous men. At every period of history
 that we seriously review, even if it be the most belauded era of the past,
 we shall rather cry out at the end, "Anything but a return to that! The
 spirit of that age would oppress you with the weight of a hundred
 atmospheres, the good and beautiful in it you would not enjoy, its evil
 you could not digest." Depend upon it, posterity will pass the same
 verdict on our own epoch, and say that it was unbearable, that life under
 such conditions was intolerable. "And yet every one can endure his own
 times?" Yes, because the spirit of his age not only lies _upon_ him but is
 _in_ him. The spirit of the age offers resistance to itself and can bear
 itself.
 
 
 
 
 383.
 
 
 GREATNESS AS A MASK.--By greatness in our comportment we embitter our foes;
 by envy that we do not conceal we almost reconcile them to us. For envy
 levels and makes equal; it is an unconscious, plaintive variety of
 modesty.--It may be indeed that here and there, for the sake of the
 above-named advantage, envy has been assumed as a mask by those who are
 not envious. Certainly, however, greatness in comportment is often used as
 the mask of envy by ambitious men who would rather suffer drawbacks and
 embitter their foes than let it be seen that they place them on an equal
 footing with themselves.
 
 
 
 
 384.
 
 
 UNPARDONABLE.--You gave him an opportunity of displaying the greatness of
 his character, and he did not make use of the opportunity. He will never
 forgive you for that.
 
 
 
 
 385.
 
 
 CONTRASTS.--The most senile thought ever conceived about men lies in the
 famous saying, "The ego is always hateful," the most childish in the still
 more famous saying, "Love thy neighbour as thyself."--With the one
 knowledge of men has ceased, with the other it has not yet begun.
 
 
 
 
 386.
 
 
 A DEFECTIVE EAR.--"We still belong to the mob so long as we always shift
 the blame on to others; we are on the track of wisdom when we always make
 ourselves alone responsible; but the wise man finds no one to blame,
 neither himself nor others."--Who said that? Epictetus, eighteen hundred
 years ago.--The world has heard but forgotten the saying.--No, the world has
 not heard and not forgotten it: everything is not forgotten. But we had
 not the necessary ear, the ear of Epictetus.--So he whispered it into his
 own ear?--Even so: wisdom is the whispering of the sage to himself in the
 crowded market-place.
 
 
 
 
 387.
 
 
 A DEFECT OF STANDPOINT, NOT OF VISION.--We always stand a few paces too
 near ourselves and a few paces too far from our neighbour. Hence we judge
 him too much in the lump, and ourselves too much by individual,
 occasional, insignificant features and circumstances.
 
 
 
 
 388.
 
 
 IGNORANCE ABOUT WEAPONS.--How little we care whether another knows a
 subject or not!--whereas he perhaps sweats blood at the bare idea that he
 may be considered ignorant on the point. Yes, there are exquisite fools,
 who always go about with a quiverful of mighty, excommunicatory
 utterances, ready to shoot down any one who shows freely that there are
 matters in which their judgment is not taken into account.
 
 
 
 
 389.
 
 
 AT THE DRINKING-TABLE OF EXPERIENCE.--People whose innate moderation leads
 them to drink but the half of every glass, will not admit that everything
 in the world has its lees and sediment.
 
 
 
 
 390.
 
 
 SINGING-BIRDS.--The followers of a great man often put their own eyes out,
 so that they may be the better able to sing his praise.
 
 
 
 
 391.
 
 
 BEYOND OUR KEN.--The good generally displeases us when it is beyond our
 ken.
 
 
 
 
 392.
 
 
 RULE AS MOTHER OR AS CHILD.--There is one condition that gives birth to
 rules, another to which rules give birth.
 
 
 
 
 393.
 
 
 COMEDY.--We sometimes earn honour or love for actions and achievements
 which we have long since sloughed as the snake sloughs his skin. We are
 hereby easily seduced into becoming the comic actors of our own past, and
 into throwing the old skin once more about our shoulders--and that not
 merely from vanity, but from good-will towards our admirers.
 
 
 
 
 394.
 
 
 A MISTAKE OF BIOGRAPHERS.--The small force that is required to launch a
 boat into the stream must not be confounded with the force of the stream
 that carries the boat along. Yet this mistake is made in nearly all
 biographies.
 
 
 
 
 395.
 
 
 NOT BUYING TOO DEAR.--The things that we buy too dear we generally turn to
 bad use, because we have no love for them but only a painful recollection.
 Thus they involve a twofold drawback.
 
 
 
 
 396.
 
 
 THE PHILOSOPHY THAT SOCIETY ALWAYS NEEDS.--The pillars of the social
 structure rest upon the fundamental fact that every one cheerfully
 contemplates all that he is, does, and attempts, his sickness or health,
 his poverty or affluence, his honour or insignificance, and says to
 himself, "After all, I would not change places with any one!"--Whoever
 wishes to add a stone to the social structure should always try to implant
 in mankind this cheerful philosophy of contentment and refusal to change
 places.
 
 
 
 
 397.
 
 
 THE MARK OF A NOBLE SOUL.--A noble soul is not that which is capable of the
 highest flights, but that which rises little and falls little, living
 always in a free and bright atmosphere and altitude.
 
 
 
 
 398.
 
 
 GREATNESS AND ITS CONTEMPLATOR.--The noblest effect of greatness is that it
 gives the contemplator a power of vision that magnifies and embellishes.
 
 
 
 
 399.
 
 
 BEING SATISFIED.--We show that we have attained maturity of understanding
 when we no longer go where rare flowers lurk under the thorniest hedges of
 knowledge, but are satisfied with gardens, forests, meadows, and
 ploughlands, remembering that life is too short for the rare and uncommon.
 
 
 
 
 400.
 
 
 ADVANTAGE IN PRIVATION.--He who always lives in the warmth and fulness of
 the heart, and, as it were, in the summer air of the soul, cannot form an
 idea of that fearful delight which seizes more wintry natures, who for
 once in a way are kissed by the rays of love and the milder breath of a
 sunny February day.
 
 
 
 
 401.
 
 
 RECIPE FOR THE SUFFERER.--You find the burden of life too heavy? Then you
 must increase the burden of your life. When the sufferer finally thirsts
 after and seeks the river of Lethe, then he must become a _hero_ to be
 certain of finding it.
 
 
 
 
 402.
 
 
 THE JUDGE.--He who has seen another's ideal becomes his inexorable judge,
 and as it were his evil conscience.
 
 
 
 
 403.
 
 
 THE UTILITY OF GREAT RENUNCIATION.--The useful thing about great
 renunciation is that it invests us with that youthful pride through which
 we can thenceforth easily demand of ourselves small renunciations.
 
 
 
 
 404.
 
 
 HOW DUTY ACQUIRES A GLAMOUR.--You can change a brazen duty into gold in the
 eyes of all by always performing something more than you have promised.
 
 
 
 
 405.
 
 
 PRAYER TO MANKIND.--"Forgive us our virtues"--so should we pray to mankind.
 
 
 
 
 406.
 
 
 THEY THAT CREATE AND THEY THAT ENJOY.--Every one who enjoys thinks that the
 principal thing to the tree is the fruit, but in point of fact the
 principal thing to it is the seed.--Herein lies the difference between them
 that create and them that enjoy.
 
 
 
 
 407.
 
 
 THE GLORY OF ALL GREAT MEN.--What is the use of genius if it does not
 invest him who contemplates and reveres it with such freedom and loftiness
 of feeling that he no longer has need of genius?--To make themselves
 superfluous is the glory of all great men.
 
 
 
 
 408.
 
 
 THE JOURNEY TO HADES.--I too have been in the underworld, even as Odysseus,
 and I shall often be there again. Not sheep alone have I sacrificed, that
 I might be able to converse with a few dead souls, but not even my own
 blood have I spared. There were four pairs who responded to me in my
 sacrifice: Epicurus and Montaigne, Goethe and Spinoza, Plato and Rousseau,
 Pascal and Schopenhauer. With them I have to come to terms. When I have
 long wandered alone, I will let them prove me right or wrong; to them will
 I listen, if they prove each other right or wrong. In all that I say,
 conclude, or think out for myself and others, I fasten my eyes on those
 eight and see their eyes fastened on mine.--May the living forgive me if I
 look upon them at times as shadows, so pale and fretful, so restless and,
 alas! so eager for life. Those eight, on the other hand, seem to me so
 living that I feel as if even now, after their death, they could never
 become weary of life. But eternal vigour of life is the important point:
 what matters "eternal life," or indeed life at all?
 
 
 
 
 
 PART II. THE WANDERER AND HIS SHADOW.
 
 
 _The Shadow_: It is so long since I heard you speak that I should like to
 give you an opportunity of talking.
 
 _The Wanderer_: I hear a voice--where? whose? I almost fancied that I heard
 myself speaking, but with a voice yet weaker than my own.
 
 _The Shadow_ (after a pause): Are you not glad to have an opportunity of
 speaking?
 
 _The Wanderer_: By God and everything else in which I disbelieve, it is my
 shadow that speaks. I hear it, but I do not believe it.
 
 _The Shadow_: Let us assume that it exists, and think no more about it. In
 another hour all will be over.
 
 _The Wanderer_: That is just what I thought when in a forest near Pisa I
 saw first two and then five camels.
 
 _The Shadow_: It is all the better if we are both equally forbearing
 towards each other when for once our reason is silent. Thus we shall avoid
 losing our tempers in conversation, and shall not at once apply mutual
 thumb-screws in the event of any word sounding for once unintelligible to
 us. If one does not know exactly how to answer, it is enough to say
 _something_. Those are the reasonable terms on which I hold conversation
 with any person. During a long talk the wisest of men becomes a fool once
 and a simpleton thrice.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Your moderation is not flattering to those to whom you
 confess it.
 
 _The Shadow_: Am I, then, to flatter?
 
 _The Wanderer_: I thought a man's shadow was his vanity. Surely vanity
 would never say, "Am I, then, to flatter?"
 
 _The Shadow_: Nor does human vanity, so far as I am acquainted with it,
 ask, as I have done twice, whether it may speak. It simply speaks.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Now I see for the first time how rude I am to you, my
 beloved shadow. I have not said a word of my supreme _delight_ in hearing
 and not merely seeing you. You must know that I love shadows even as I
 love light. For the existence of beauty of face, clearness of speech,
 kindliness and firmness of character, the shadow is as necessary as the
 light. They are not opponents--rather do they hold each other's hands like
 good friends; and when the light vanishes, the shadow glides after it.
 
 _The Shadow_: Yes, and I hate the same thing that you hate--night. I love
 men because they are votaries of life. I rejoice in the gleam of their
 eyes when they recognise and discover, they who never weary of recognising
 and discovering. That shadow which all things cast when the sunshine of
 knowledge falls upon them--that shadow too am I.
 
 _The Wanderer_: I think I understand you, although you have expressed
 yourself in somewhat shadowy terms. You are right. Good friends give to
 each other here and there, as a sign of mutual understanding, an obscure
 phrase which to any third party is meant to be a riddle. And we are good
 friends, you and I. So enough of preambles! Some few hundred questions
 oppress my soul, and the time for you to answer them is perchance but
 short. Let us see how we may come to an understanding as quickly and
 peaceably as possible.
 
 _The Shadow_: But shadows are more shy than men. You will not reveal to
 any man the manner of our conversation?
 
 _The Wanderer_: _The manner_ of our conversation? Heaven preserve me from
 wire-drawn, literary dialogues! If Plato had found less pleasure in
 spinning them out, his readers would have found more pleasure in Plato. A
 dialogue that in real life is a source of delight, when turned into
 writing and read, is a picture with nothing but false perspectives.
 Everything is too long or too short.--Yet perhaps I may reveal the _points
 on which_ we have come to an understanding?
 
 _The Shadow_: With that I am content. For every one will only recognise
 your views once more, and no one will think of the shadow.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Perhaps you are wrong, my friend! Hitherto they have
 observed in my views more of the shadow than of me.
 
 _The Shadow_: More of the shadow than of the light? Is that possible?
 
 _The Wanderer_: Be serious, dear fool! My very first question demands
 seriousness.
 
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 OF THE TREE OF KNOWLEDGE.--Probability, but no truth; the semblance of
 freedom, but no freedom--these are the two fruits by virtue of which the
 tree of knowledge cannot be confounded with the tree of life.
 
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 THE WORLD'S REASON.--That the world is _not_ the abstract essence of an
 eternal reasonableness is sufficiently proved by the fact that that _bit
 of the world_ which we know--I mean our human reason--is none too
 reasonable. And if _this_ is not eternally and wholly wise and reasonable,
 the rest of the world will not be so either. Here the conclusion _a minori
 ad majus, a parte ad totum_ holds good, and that with decisive force.
 
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 "IN THE BEGINNING WAS."--To glorify the origin--that is the metaphysical
 after-shoot which sprouts again at the contemplation of history, and
 absolutely makes us imagine that _in the beginning_ of things lies all
 that is most valuable and essential.
 
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 STANDARD FOR THE VALUE OF TRUTH.--The difficulty of climbing mountains is
 no gauge of their height. Yet in the case of science it is different!--we
 are told by certain persons who wish to be considered "the initiated,"--the
 difficulty in finding truth is to determine the value of truth! This
 insane morality originates in the idea that "truths" are really nothing
 more than gymnastic appliances, with which we have to exercise ourselves
 until we are thoroughly tired. It is a morality for the athletes and
 gymnasts of the intellect.
 
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 USE OF WORDS AND REALITY.--There exists a simulated contempt for all the
 things that mankind actually holds most important, for all everyday
 matters. For instance, we say "we only eat to live"--an abominable _lie_,
 like that which speaks of the procreation of children as the real purpose
 of all sexual pleasure. Conversely, the reverence for "the most important
 things" is hardly ever quite genuine. The priests and metaphysicians have
 indeed accustomed us to a hypocritically exaggerated _use of words_
 regarding these matters, but they have not altered the feeling that these
 most important things are not so important as those despised "everyday
 matters." A fatal consequence of this twofold hypocrisy is that we never
 make these everyday matters (such as eating, housing, clothes, and
 intercourse) the object of a constant unprejudiced and _universal_
 reflection and revision, but, as such a process appears degrading, we
 divert from them our serious intellectual and artistic side. Hence in such
 matters habit and frivolity win an easy victory over the thoughtless,
 especially over inexperienced youth. On the other hand, our continual
 transgressions of the simplest laws of body and mind reduce us all, young
 and old, to a disgraceful state of dependence and servitude--I mean to that
 fundamentally superfluous dependence upon physicians, teachers and
 clergymen, whose dead-weight still lies heavy upon the whole of society.
 
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 EARTHLY INFIRMITIES AND THEIR MAIN CAUSE.--If we look about us, we are
 always coming across men who have eaten eggs all their lives without
 observing that the oblong-shaped taste the best; who do not know that a
 thunder-storm is beneficial to the stomach; that perfumes are most
 fragrant in cold, clear air; that our sense of taste varies in different
 parts of our mouths; that every meal at which we talk well or listen well
 does harm to the digestion. If we are not satisfied with these examples of
 defective powers of observation, we shall concede all the more readily
 that the everyday matters are very imperfectly seen and rarely observed by
 the majority. Is this a matter of indifference?--Let us remember, after
 all, that from this defect are derived _nearly all the bodily and
 spiritual infirmities_ of the individual. Ignorance of what is good and
 bad for us, in the arrangement of our mode of life, the division of our
 day, the selection of our friends and the time we devote to them, in
 business and leisure, commanding and obeying, our feeling for nature and
 for art, our eating, sleeping, and meditation; ignorance and lack of keen
 perceptions _in the smallest and most ordinary details_--this it is that
 makes the world "a vale of tears" for so many. Let us not say that here as
 everywhere the fault lies with human _unreason_. Of reason there is enough
 and to spare, but it is _wrongly directed_ and _artificially diverted_
 from these little intimate things. Priests and teachers, and the sublime
 ambition of all idealists, coarser and subtler, din it even into the
 child's ears that the means of serving mankind at large depend upon
 altogether different _things_--upon the salvation of the soul, the service
 of the State, the advancement of science, or even upon social position and
 property; whereas the needs of the individual, his requirements great and
 small during the twenty-four hours of the day, are quite paltry or
 indifferent.--Even Socrates attacked with all his might this arrogant
 neglect of the human for the benefit of humanity, and loved to indicate by
 a quotation from Homer the true sphere and conception of all anxiety and
 reflection: "All that really matters," he said, "is the good and evil hap
 I find at home."
 
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 TWO MEANS OF CONSOLATION.--Epicurus, the soul-comforter of later antiquity,
 said, with that marvellous insight which to this very day is so rarely to
 be found, that for the calming of the spirit the solution of the final and
 ultimate theoretical problems is by no means necessary. Hence, instead of
 raising a barren and remote discussion of the final question, whether the
 Gods existed, it sufficed him to say to those who were tormented by "fear
 of the Gods": "If there are Gods, they do not concern themselves with us."
 The latter position is far stronger and more favourable, for, by conceding
 a few points to the other, one makes him readier to listen and to take to
 heart. But as soon as he sets about proving the opposite (that the Gods do
 concern themselves with us), into what thorny jungles of error must the
 poor man fall, quite of his own accord, and without any cunning on the
 part of his interlocutor! The latter must only have enough subtlety and
 humanity to conceal his sympathy with this tragedy. Finally, the other
 comes to feel disgust--the strongest argument against any
 proposition--disgust with his own hypothesis. He becomes cold, and goes
 away in the same frame of mind as the pure atheist who says, "What do the
 Gods matter to me? The devil take them!"--In other cases, especially when a
 half-physical, half-moral assumption had cast a gloom over his spirit,
 Epicurus did not refute the assumption. He agreed that it might be true,
 but that there was _a second assumption_ to explain the same phenomenon,
 and that it could perhaps be maintained in other ways. The plurality of
 hypotheses (for example, that concerning the origin of conscientious
 scruples) suffices even in our time to remove from the soul the shadows
 that arise so easily from pondering over a hypothesis which is isolated,
 merely visible, and hence overvalued a hundredfold.--Thus whoever wishes to
 console the unfortunate, the criminal, the hypochondriac, the dying, may
 call to mind the two soothing suggestions of Epicurus, which can be
 applied to a great number of problems. In their simplest form they would
 run: firstly, granted the thing is so, it does not concern us; secondly,
 the thing may be so, but it may also be otherwise.
 
 
 
 
 8.
 
 
 IN THE NIGHT.--So soon as night begins to fall our sensations concerning
 everyday matters are altered. There is the wind, prowling as if on
 forbidden paths, whispering as if in search of something, fretting because
 he cannot find it. There is the lamplight, with its dim red glow, its
 weary look, unwillingly fighting against night, a sullen slave to wakeful
 man. There are the breathings of the sleeper, with their terrible rhythm,
 to which an ever-recurring care seems to blow the trumpet-melody--we do not
 hear it, but when the sleeper's bosom heaves we feel our heart-strings
 tighten; and when the breath sinks and almost dies away into a deathly
 stillness, we say to ourselves, "Rest awhile, poor troubled spirit!" All
 living creatures bear so great a burden that we wish them an eternal rest;
 night invites to death.--If human beings were deprived of the sun and
 resisted night by means of moonlight and oil-lamps, what a philosophy
 would cast its veil over them! We already see only too plainly how a
 shadow is thrown over the spiritual and intellectual nature of man by that
 moiety of darkness and sunlessness that envelops life.
 
 
 
 
 9.
 
 
 ORIGIN OF THE DOCTRINE OF FREE WILL.--Necessity sways one man in the shape
 of his passions, another as a habit of hearing and obeying, a third as a
 logical conscience, a fourth as a caprice and a mischievous delight in
 evasions. These four, however, seek the freedom of their will at the very
 point where they are most securely fettered. It is as if the silkworm
 sought freedom of will in spinning. What is the reason? Clearly this, that
 every one thinks himself most free where his vitality is strongest; hence,
 as I have said, now in passion, now in duty, now in knowledge, now in
 caprice. A man unconsciously imagines that where he is strong, where he
 feels most thoroughly alive, the element of his freedom must lie. He
 thinks of dependence and apathy, independence and vivacity as forming
 inevitable pairs.--Thus an experience that a man has undergone in the
 social and political sphere is wrongly transferred to the ultimate
 metaphysical sphere. There the strong man is also the free man, there the
 vivid feeling of joy and sorrow, the high hopes, the keen desires, the
 powerful hates are the attributes of the ruling, independent natures,
 while the thrall and the slave live in a state of dazed oppression.--The
 doctrine of free will is an invention of the ruling classes.
 
 
 
 
 10.
 
 
 ABSENCE OF FEELING OF NEW CHAINS.--So long as we do not feel that we are in
 some way dependent, we consider ourselves independent--a false conclusion
 that shows how proud man is, how eager for dominion. For he hereby assumes
 that he would always be sure to observe and recognise dependence so soon
 as he suffered it, the preliminary hypothesis being that he generally
 lives in independence, and that, should he lose that independence for once
 in a way, he would immediately detect a contrary sensation.--Suppose,
 however, the reverse to be true--that he is always living in a complex
 state of dependence, but thinks himself free where, through long habit, he
 no longer feels the weight of the chain? He only suffers from new chains,
 and "free will" really means nothing more than an absence of feeling of
 new chains.
 
 
 
 
 11.
 
 
 FREEDOM OF THE WILL AND THE ISOLATION OF FACTS.--Our ordinary inaccurate
 observation takes a group of phenomena as one and calls them a fact.
 Between this fact and another we imagine a vacuum, we isolate each fact.
 In reality, however, the sum of our actions and cognitions is no series of
 facts and intervening vacua, but a continuous stream. Now the belief in
 free will is incompatible with the idea of a continuous, uniform,
 undivided, indivisible flow. This belief presupposes that every single
 action is isolated and indivisible; it is an atomic theory as regards
 volition and cognition.--We misunderstand facts as we misunderstand
 characters, speaking of similar characters and similar facts, whereas both
 are non-existent. Further, we bestow praise and blame only on this false
 hypothesis, that there are similar facts, that a graduated order of
 species of facts exists, corresponding to a graduated order of values.
 Thus we isolate not only the single fact, but the groups of apparently
 equal facts (good, evil, compassionate, envious actions, and so forth). In
 both cases we are wrong.--The word and the concept are the most obvious
 reason for our belief in this isolation of groups of actions. We do not
 merely thereby designate the things; the thought at the back of our minds
 is that by the word and the concept we can grasp the essence of the
 actions. We are still constantly led astray by words and actions, and are
 induced to think of things as simpler than they are, as separate,
 indivisible, existing in the absolute. Language contains a hidden
 philosophical mythology, which, however careful we may be, breaks out
 afresh at every moment. The belief in free will--that is to say, in similar
 facts and isolated facts--finds in language its continual apostle and
 advocate.
 
 
 
 
 12.
 
 
 THE FUNDAMENTAL ERRORS.--A man cannot feel any psychical pleasure or pain
 unless he is swayed by one of two illusions. Either he believes in the
 identity of certain facts, certain sensations, and in that case finds
 spiritual pleasure and pain in comparing present with past conditions and
 in noting their similarity or difference (as is invariably the case with
 recollection); or he believes in the freedom of the will, perhaps when he
 reflects, "I ought not to have done this," "This might have turned out
 differently," and from these reflections likewise he derives pleasure and
 pain. Without the errors that are rife in every psychical pain and
 pleasure, humanity would never have developed. For the root idea of
 humanity is that man is free in a world of bondage--man, the eternal
 wonder-worker, whether his deeds be good or evil--man, the amazing
 exception, the super-beast, the quasi-God, the mind of creation, the
 indispensable, the key-word to the cosmic riddle, the mighty lord of
 nature and despiser of nature, the creature that calls _its_ history "the
 history of the world"! _Vanitas vanitatum homo._
 
 
 
 
 13.
 
 
 REPETITION.--It is an excellent thing to express a thing consecutively in
 two ways, and thus provide it with a right and a left foot. Truth can
 stand indeed on one leg, but with two she will walk and complete her
 journey.
 
 
 
 
 14.
 
 
 MAN AS THE COMIC ACTOR OF THE WORLD.--It would require beings more
 intellectual than men to relish to the full the humorous side of man's
 view of himself as the goal of all existence and of his serious
 pronouncement that he is satisfied only with the prospect of fulfilling a
 world-mission. If a God created the world, he created man to be his ape,
 as a perpetual source of amusement in the midst of his rather tedious
 eternities. The music of the spheres surrounding the world would then
 presumably be the mocking laughter of all the other creatures around
 mankind. God in his boredom uses pain for the tickling of his favourite
 animal, in order to enjoy his proudly tragic gestures and expressions of
 suffering, and, in general, the intellectual inventiveness of the vainest
 of his creatures--as inventor of this inventor. For he who invented man as
 a joke had more intellect and more joy in intellect than has man.--Even
 here, where our human nature is willing to humble itself, our vanity again
 plays us a trick, in that we men should like in this vanity at least to be
 quite marvellous and incomparable. Our uniqueness in the world! Oh, what
 an improbable thing it is! Astronomers, who occasionally acquire a horizon
 outside our world, give us to understand that the drop of life on the
 earth is without significance for the total character of the mighty ocean
 of birth and decay; that countless stars present conditions for the
 generation of life similar to those of the earth--and yet these are but a
 handful in comparison with the endless number that have never known, or
 have long been cured, of the eruption of life; that life on each of these
 stars, measured by the period of its existence, has been but an instant, a
 flicker, with long, long intervals afterwards--and thus in no way the aim
 and final purpose of their existence. Possibly the ant in the forest is
 quite as firmly convinced that it is the aim and purpose of the existence
 of the forest, as we are convinced in our imaginations (almost
 unconsciously) that the destruction of mankind involves the destruction of
 the world. It is even modesty on our part to go no farther than this, and
 not to arrange a universal twilight of the world and the Gods as the
 funeral ceremony of the last man. Even to the eye of the most unbiassed
 astronomer a lifeless world can scarcely appear otherwise than as a
 shining and swinging star wherein man lies buried.
 
 
 
 
 15.
 
 
 THE MODESTY OF MAN.--How little pleasure is enough for the majority to make
 them feel that life is good! How modest is man!
 
 
 
 
 16.
 
 
 WHERE INDIFFERENCE IS NECESSARY.--Nothing would be more perverse than to
 wait for the truths that science will finally establish concerning the
 first and last things, and until then to think (and especially to believe)
 in the traditional way, as one is so often advised to do. The impulse that
 bids us seek nothing but _certainties_ in this domain is a religious
 offshoot, nothing better--a hidden and only apparently sceptical variety of
 the "metaphysical need," the underlying idea being that for a long time no
 view of these ultimate certainties will be obtainable, and that until then
 the "believer" has the right not to trouble himself about the whole
 subject. We have no need of these certainties about the farthermost
 horizons in order to live a full and efficient human life, any more than
 the ant needs them in order to be a good ant. Rather must we ascertain the
 origin of that troublesome significance that we have attached to these
 things for so long. For this we require the history of ethical and
 religious sentiments, since it is only under the influence of such
 sentiments that these most acute problems of knowledge have become so
 weighty and terrifying. Into the outermost regions to which the mental eye
 can penetrate (without ever penetrating _into_ them), we have smuggled
 such concepts as guilt and punishment (everlasting punishment, too!). The
 darker those regions, the more careless we have been. For ages men have
 let their imaginations run riot where they could establish nothing, and
 have induced posterity to accept these fantasies as something serious and
 true, with this abominable lie as their final trump-card: that faith is
 worth more than knowledge. What we need now in regard to these ultimate
 things is not knowledge as against faith, but indifference as against
 faith and pretended knowledge in these matters!--Everything must lie nearer
 to us than what has hitherto been preached to us as the most important
 thing, I mean the questions: "What end does man serve?" "What is his fate
 after death?" "How does he make his peace with God?" and all the rest of
 that bag of tricks. The problems of the dogmatic philosophers, be they
 idealists, materialists, or realists, concern us as little as do these
 religious questions. They all have the same object in view--to force us to
 a decision in matters where neither faith nor knowledge is needed. It is
 better even for the most ardent lover of knowledge that the territory open
 to investigation and to reason should be encircled by a belt of fog-laden,
 treacherous marshland, a strip of ever watery, impenetrable, and
 indeterminable country. It is just by the comparison with the realm of
 darkness on the edge of the world of knowledge that the bright, accessible
 region of that world rises in value.--We must once more become good friends
 of the "everyday matters," and not, as hitherto, despise them and look
 beyond them at clouds and monsters of the night. In forests and caverns,
 in marshy tracts and under dull skies, on the lowest rungs of the ladder
 of culture, man has lived for aeons, and lived in poverty. There he has
 learnt to despise the present, his neighbours, his life, and himself, and
 we, the inhabitants of the brighter fields of Nature and mind, still
 inherit in our blood some taint of this contempt for everyday matters.
 
 
 
 
 17.
 
 
 PROFOUND INTERPRETATIONS.--He who has interpreted a passage in an author
 "more profoundly" than was intended, has not interpreted the author but
 has obscured him. Our metaphysicians are in the same relation, or even in
 a worse relation, to the text of Nature. For, to apply their profound
 interpretations, they often alter the text to suit their purpose--or, in
 other words, corrupt the text. A curious example of the corruption and
 obscuration of an author's text is furnished by the ideas of Schopenhauer
 on the pregnancy of women. "The sign of a continuous will to life in
 time," he says, "is copulation; the sign of the light of knowledge which
 is associated anew with this will and holds the possibility of a
 deliverance, and that too in the highest degree of clearness, is the
 renewed incarnation of the will to life. This incarnation is betokened by
 pregnancy, which is therefore frank and open, and even proud, whereas
 copulation hides itself like a criminal." He declares that every woman, if
 surprised in the sexual act, would be likely to die of shame, but
 "displays her pregnancy without a trace of shame, nay even with a sort of
 pride." Now, firstly, this condition cannot easily be displayed more
 aggressively than it displays itself, and when Schopenhauer gives
 prominence only to the intentional character of the display, he is
 fashioning his text to suit the interpretation. Moreover, his statement of
 the universality of the phenomenon is not true. He speaks of "every
 woman." Many women, especially the younger, often appear painfully ashamed
 of their condition, even in the presence of their nearest kinsfolk. And
 when women of riper years, especially in the humbler classes, do actually
 appear proud of their condition, it is because they would give us to
 understand that they are still desirable to their husbands. That a
 neighbour on seeing them or a passing stranger should say or think "Can it
 be possible?"--that is an alms always acceptable to the vanity of women of
 low mental capacity. In the reverse instance, to conclude from
 Schopenhauer's proposition, the cleverest and most intelligent women would
 tend more than any to exult openly in their condition. For they have the
 best prospect of giving birth to an intellectual prodigy, in whom "the
 will" can once more "negative" itself for the universal good. Stupid
 women, on the other hand, would have every reason to hide their pregnancy
 more modestly than anything they hide.--It cannot be said that this view
 corresponds to reality. Granted, however, that Schopenhauer was right on
 the general principle that women show more self-satisfaction when pregnant
 than at any other time, a better explanation than this lies to hand. One
 might imagine the clucking of a hen even before she lays an egg, saying,
 "Look! look! I shall lay an egg! I shall lay an egg!"
 
 
 
 
 18.
 
 
 THE MODERN DIOGENES.--Before we look for man, we must have found the
 lantern.--Will it have to be the Cynic's lantern?
 
 
 
 
 19.
 
 
 IMMORALISTS.--Moralists must now put up with being rated as immoralists,
 because they dissect morals. He, however, who would dissect must kill, but
 only in order that we may know more, judge better, live better, not in
 order that all the world may dissect. Unfortunately, men still think that
 every moralist in his every action must be a pattern for others to
 imitate. They confound him with the preacher of morality. The older
 moralists did not dissect enough and preached too often, whence that
 confusion and the unpleasant consequences for our latter-day moralists are
 derived.
 
 
 
 
 20.
 
 
 A CAUTION AGAINST CONFUSION.--There are moralists who treat the strong,
 noble, self-denying attitude of such beings as the heroes of Plutarch, or
 the pure, enlightened, warmth-giving state of soul peculiar to truly good
 men and women, as difficult scientific problems. They investigate the
 origin of such phenomena, indicating the complex element in the apparent
 simplicity, and directing their gaze to the tangled skein of motives, the
 delicate web of conceptual illusions, and the sentiments of individuals or
 of groups, that are a legacy of ancient days gradually increased. Such
 moralists are very different from those with whom they are most commonly
 confounded, from those petty minds that do not believe at all in these
 modes of thought and states of soul, and imagine their own poverty to be
 hidden somewhere behind the glamour of greatness and purity. The moralists
 say, "Here are problems," and these pitiable creatures say, "Here are
 impostors and deceptions." Thus the latter deny the existence of the very
 things which the former are at pains to explain.
 
 
 
 
 21.
 
 
 _Man as the Measurer._--Perhaps all human morality had its origin in the
 tremendous excitement that seized primitive man when he discovered measure
 and measuring, scales and weighing (for the word _Mensch_ [man] means "the
 measurer"--he wished to _name_ himself after his greatest discovery!). With
 these ideas they mounted into regions that are quite beyond all measuring
 and weighing, but did not appear to be so in the beginning.
 
 
 
 
 22.
 
 
 _The Principle of Equilibrium._--The robber and the man of power who
 promises to protect a community from robbers are perhaps at bottom beings
 of the same mould, save that the latter attains his ends by other means
 than the former--that is to say, through regular imposts paid to him by the
 community, and no longer through forced contributions. (The same relation
 exists between merchant and pirate, who for a long period are one and the
 same person: where the one function appears to them inadvisable, they
 exercise the other. Even to-day mercantile morality is really nothing but
 a refinement on piratical morality--buying in the cheapest market, at prime
 cost if possible, and selling in the dearest.) The essential point is that
 the man of power promises to maintain the equilibrium against the robber,
 and herein the weak find a possibility of living. For either they must
 group themselves into an equivalent power, or they must subject themselves
 to some one of equivalent power (_i.e._ render service in return for his
 efforts). The latter course is generally preferred, because it really
 keeps two dangerous beings in check--the robber through the man of power,
 and the man of power through the standpoint of advantage; for the latter
 profits by treating his subjects with graciousness and tolerance, in order
 that they may support not only themselves but their ruler. As a matter of
 fact, conditions may still be hard and cruel enough, yet in comparison
 with the complete annihilation that was formerly always a possibility, men
 breathe freely.--The community is at first the organisation of the weak to
 counterbalance menacing forces. An organisation to outweigh those forces
 would be more advisable, if its members grew strong enough to destroy the
 adverse power: and when it is a question of one mighty oppressor, the
 _attempt will_ certainly be made. But if the one man is the head of a
 clan, or if he has a large following, a rapid and decisive annihilation is
 improbable, and a long or permanent feud is only to be expected. This
 feud, however, involves the least desirable condition for the community,
 for it thereby loses the time to provide for its means of subsistence with
 the necessary regularity, and sees the product of all work hourly
 threatened. Hence the community prefers to raise its power of attack and
 defence to the exact plane on which the power of its dangerous neighbour
 stands, and to give him to understand that an equal weight now lies in its
 own side of the scales--so why not be good friends?--Thus equilibrium is a
 most important conception for the understanding of the ancient doctrines
 of law and morals. Equilibrium is, in fact, the basis of justice. When
 justice in ruder ages says, "An eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth," it
 presupposes the attainment of this equilibrium and tries to maintain it by
 means of this compensation; so that, when crime is committed, the injured
 party will not take the revenge of blind anger. By means of the _jus
 talionis_ the equilibrium of the disturbed relations of power is restored,
 for in such primitive times an eye or an arm more means a bit more power,
 more weight.--In a community where all consider themselves equal, disgrace
 and punishment await crime--that is, violations of the principle of
 equilibrium. Disgrace is thrown into the scale as a counter-weight against
 the encroaching individual, who has gained profit by his encroachment, and
 now suffers losses (through disgrace) which annul and outweigh the
 previous profits. Punishment, in the same way, sets up a far greater
 counter-weight against the preponderance which every criminal hopes to
 obtain--imprisonment as against a deed of violence, restitution and fines
 as against theft. Thus the sinner is reminded that his action has excluded
 him from the community and from its moral advantages, since the community
 treats him as an inferior, a weaker brother, an outsider. For this reason
 punishment is not merely retaliation, but has something more, something of
 the cruelty of the state of nature, and of this it would serve as a
 reminder.
 
 
 
 
 23.
 
 
 WHETHER THE ADHERENTS OF THE DOCTRINE OF FREE WILL HAVE A RIGHT TO
 PUNISH?--Men whose vocation it is to judge and punish try to establish in
 every case whether an evil-doer is really responsible for his act, whether
 he was able to apply his reasoning powers, whether he acted with motives
 and not unconsciously or under constraint. If he is punished, it is
 because he preferred the worse to the better motives, which he must
 consequently have known. Where this knowledge is wanting, man is,
 according to the prevailing view, not responsible--unless his ignorance,
 _e.g._ his _ignorantia legis_, be the consequence of an intentional
 neglect to learn what he ought: in that case he already preferred the
 worse to the better motives at the time when he refused to learn, and must
 now pay the penalty of his unwise choice. If, on the other hand, perhaps
 through stupidity or shortsightedness, he has never seen the better
 motives, he is generally not punished, for people say that he made a wrong
 choice, he acted like a brute beast. The intentional rejection of the
 better reason is now needed before we treat the offender as fit to be
 punished. But how can any one be intentionally more unreasonable than he
 ought to be? Whence comes the decision, if the scales are loaded with good
 and bad motives? So the origin is not error or blindness, not an internal
 or external constraint? (It should furthermore be remembered that every
 so-called "external constraint" is nothing more than the internal
 constraint of fear and pain.) Whence? is the repeated question. So reason
 is not to be the cause of action, because reason cannot decide against the
 better motives? Thus we call "free will" to our aid. Absolute discretion
 is to decide, and a moment is to intervene when no motive exercises an
 influence, when the deed is done as a miracle, resulting from nothing.
 This assumed discretion is punished in a case where no discretion should
 rule. Reason, which knows law, prohibition, and command, should have left
 no choice, they say, and should have acted as a constraint and a higher
 power. Hence the offender is punished because he makes use of "free
 will"--in other words, has acted without motive where he should have been
 guided by motives. But why did he do it? This question must not even be
 asked; the deed was done without a "Why?" without motive, without origin,
 being a thing purposeless, unreasoned.--However, according to the
 above-named preliminary condition of punishability, such a deed should not
 be punished at all! Moreover, even this reason for punishing should not
 hold good, that in this case something had _not_ been done, had been
 omitted, that reason had not been used at all: for at any rate the
 omission was unintentional, and only intentional omission is considered
 punishable. The offender has indeed preferred the worse to the better
 motives, but without motive and purpose: he has indeed failed to apply his
 reason, but not exactly with the object of not applying it. The very
 assumption made in the case of punishable crime, that the criminal
 intentionally renounced his reason, is removed by the hypothesis of "free
 will." According to your own principles, you must not punish, you
 adherents of the doctrine of free will!--These principles are, however,
 nothing but a very marvellous conceptual mythology, and the hen that
 hatched them has brooded on her eggs far away from all reality.
 
 
 
 
 24.
 
 
 JUDGING THE CRIMINAL AND HIS JUDGE.--The criminal, who knows the whole
 concatenation of circumstances, does not consider his act so far beyond
 the bounds of order and comprehension as does his judge. His punishment,
 however, is measured by the degree of astonishment that seizes the judge
 when he finds the crime incomprehensible.--If the defending counsel's
 knowledge of the case and its previous history extends far enough, the
 so-called extenuating circumstances which he duly pleads must end by
 absolving his client from all guilt. Or, to put it more plainly, the
 advocate will, step by step, tone down and finally remove the astonishment
 of the judge, by forcing every honest listener to the tacit avowal, "He
 was bound to act as he did, and if we punished, we should be punishing
 eternal Necessity."--Measuring the punishment by the degree of knowledge we
 possess or can obtain of the previous history of the crime--is that not in
 conflict with all equity?
 
 
 
 
 25.
 
 
 EXCHANGE AND EQUITY.--In an exchange, the only just and honest course would
 be for either party to demand only so much as he considers his commodity
 to be worth, allowance being made for trouble in acquisition, scarcity,
 time spent and so forth, besides the subjective value. As soon as you make
 your price bear a relation to the other's need, you become a refined sort
 of robber and extortioner.--If money is the sole medium of exchange, we
 must remember that a shilling is by no means the same thing in the hands
 of a rich heir, a farm labourer, a merchant, and a university student. It
 would be equitable for every one to receive much or little for his money,
 according as he has done much or little to earn it. In practice, as we all
 know, the reverse is the case. In the world of high finance the shilling
 of the idle rich man can buy more than that of the poor, industrious man.
 
 
 
 
 26.
 
 
 LEGAL CONDITIONS AS MEANS.--Law, where it rests upon contracts between
 equals, holds good so long as the power of the parties to the contract
 remains equal or similar. Wisdom created law to end all feuds and useless
 expenditure among men on an equal footing. Quite as definite an end is put
 to this waste, however, when one party has become decidedly weaker than
 the other. Subjection enters and law ceases, but the result is the same as
 that attained by law. For now it is the wisdom of the superior which
 advises to spare the inferior and not uselessly to squander his strength.
 Thus the position of the inferior is often more favourable than that of
 the equal.--Hence legal conditions are temporary _means_ counselled by
 wisdom, and not ends.
 
 
 
 
 27.
 
 
 EXPLANATION OF MALICIOUS JOY.--Malicious joy arises when a man consciously
 finds himself in evil plight and feels anxiety or remorse or pain. The
 misfortune that overtakes B. makes him equal to A., and A. is reconciled
 and no longer envious.--If A. is prosperous, he still hoards up in his
 memory B.'s misfortune as a capital, so as to throw it in the scale as a
 counter-weight when he himself suffers adversity. In this case too he
 feels "malicious joy" (_Schadenfreude_). The sentiment of equality thus
 applies its standard to the domain of luck and chance. Malicious joy is
 the commonest expression of victory and restoration of equality, even in a
 higher state of civilisation. This emotion has only been in existence
 since the time when man learnt to look upon another as his equal--in other
 words, since the foundation of society.
 
 
 
 
 28.
 
 
 THE ARBITRARY ELEMENT IN THE AWARD OF PUNISHMENT.--To most criminals
 punishment comes just as illegitimate children come to women. They have
 done the same thing a hundred times without any bad consequences. Suddenly
 comes discovery, and with discovery punishment. Yet habit should make the
 deed for which the criminal is punished appear more excusable, for he has
 developed a propensity that is hard to resist. Instead of this, the
 criminal is punished more severely if the suspicion of habitual crime
 rests on him, and habit is made a valid reason against all extenuation. On
 the other hand, a model life, wherein crime shows up in more terrible
 contrast, should make the guilt appear more heavy! But here the custom is
 to soften the punishment. Everything is measured not from the standpoint
 of the criminal but from that of society and its losses and dangers. The
 previous utility of an individual is weighed against his one nefarious
 action, his previous criminality is added to that recently discovered, and
 punishment is thus meted out as highly as possible. But if we thus punish
 or reward a man's past (for in the former case the diminution of
 punishment is a reward) we ought to go farther back and punish and reward
 the cause of his past--I mean parents, teachers, society. In many instances
 we shall then find the _judges_ somehow or other sharing in the guilt. It
 is arbitrary to stop at the criminal himself when we punish his past: if
 we will not grant the absolute excusability of every crime, we should stop
 at each individual case and probe no farther into the past--in other words,
 isolate guilt and not connect it with previous actions. Otherwise we sin
 against logic. The teachers of free will should draw the inevitable
 conclusion from their doctrine of "free will" and boldly decree: "No
 action has a past."
 
 
 
 
 29.
 
 
 ENVY AND HER NOBLER SISTER.--Where equality is really recognised and
 permanently established, we see the rise of that propensity that is
 generally considered immoral, and would scarcely be conceivable in a state
 of nature--envy. The envious man is susceptible to every sign of individual
 superiority to the common herd, and wishes to depress every one once more
 to the level--or raise himself to the superior plane. Hence arise two
 different modes of action, which Hesiod designated good and bad Eris. In
 the same way, in a condition of equality there arises indignation if A. is
 prosperous above and B. unfortunate beneath their deserts and equality.
 These latter, however, are emotions of nobler natures. They feel the want
 of justice and equity in things that are independent of the arbitrary
 choice of men--or, in other words, they desire the equality recognised by
 man to be recognised as well by Nature and chance. They are angry that men
 of equal merits should not have equal fortune.
 
 
 
 
 30.
 
 
 THE ENVY OF THE GODS.--"The envy of the Gods" arises when a despised person
 sets himself on an equality with his superior (like Ajax), or is made
 equal with him by the favour of fortune (like Niobe, the too favoured
 mother). In the social class system this envy demands that no one shall
 have merits above his station, that his prosperity shall be on a level
 with his position, and especially that his self-consciousness shall not
 outgrow the limits of his rank. Often the victorious general, or the pupil
 who achieves a masterpiece, has experienced "the envy of the gods."
 
 
 
 
 31.
 
 
 VANITY AS AN ANTI-SOCIAL AFTERGROWTH.--As men, for the sake of security,
 have made themselves equal in order to found communities, but as also this
 conception is imposed by a sort of constraint and is entirely opposed to
 the instincts of the individual, so, the more universal security is
 guaranteed, the more do new offshoots of the old instinct for predominance
 appear. Such offshoots appear in the setting-up of class distinctions, in
 the demand for professional dignities and privileges, and, generally
 speaking, in vanity (manners, dress, speech, and so forth). So soon as
 danger to the community is apparent, the majority, who were unable to
 assert their preponderance in a time of universal peace, once more bring
 about the condition of equality, and for the time being the absurd
 privileges and vanities disappear. If the community, however, collapses
 utterly and anarchy reigns supreme, there arises the state of nature: an
 absolutely ruthless inequality as recounted by Thucydides in the case of
 Corcyra. Neither a natural justice nor a natural injustice exists.
 
 
 
 
 32.
 
 
 EQUITY.--Equity is a development of justice, and arises among such as do
 not come into conflict with the communal equality. This more subtle
 recognition of the principle of equilibrium is applied to cases where
 nothing is prescribed by law. Equity looks forwards and backwards, its
 maxim being, "Do unto others as you would that they should do unto you."
 _Aequum_ means: "This principle is conformable to our equality; it tones
 down even our small differences to an appearance of equality, and expects
 us to be indulgent in cases where we are not compelled to pardon."
 
 
 
 
 33.
 
 
 ELEMENTS OF REVENGE.--The word "revenge" is spoken so quickly that it
 almost seems as if it could not contain more than one conceptual and
 emotional root. Hence we are still at pains to find this root. Our
 economists, in the same way, have never wearied of scenting a similar
 unity in the word "value," and of hunting after the primitive root idea of
 value. As if all words were not pockets, into which this or that or
 several things have been stuffed at once! So "revenge" is now one thing,
 now another, and sometimes more composite. Let us first distinguish that
 defensive counter-blow, which we strike, almost unconsciously, even at
 inanimate objects (such as machinery in motion) that have hurt us. The
 notion is to set a check to the object that has hurt us, by bringing the
 machine to a stop. Sometimes the force of this counter-blow, in order to
 attain its object, will have to be strong enough to shatter the machine.
 If the machine be too strong to be disorganised by one man, the latter
 will all the same strike the most violent blow he can--as a sort of last
 attempt. We behave similarly towards persons who hurt us, at the immediate
 sensation of the hurt. If we like to call this an act of revenge, well and
 good: but we must remember that here self-preservation alone has set its
 cog-wheels of reason in motion, and that after all we do not think of the
 doer of the injury but only of ourselves. We act without any idea of doing
 injury in return, only with a view to getting away safe and sound.--It
 needs time to pass in thought from oneself to one's adversary and ask
 oneself at what point he is most vulnerable. This is done in the second
 variety of revenge, the preliminary idea of which is to consider the
 vulnerability and susceptibility of the other. The intention then is to
 give pain. On the other hand, the idea of securing himself against further
 injury is in this case so entirely outside the avenger's horizon, that he
 almost regularly brings about his own further injury and often foresees it
 in cold blood. If in the first sort of revenge it was the fear of a second
 blow that made the counter-blow as strong as possible, in this case there
 is an almost complete indifference to what one's adversary will do: the
 strength of the counter-blow is only determined by what he has _already_
 done to us. Then what has he done? What profit is it to us if he is now
 suffering, after we have suffered through him? This is a case of
 readjustment, whereas the first act of revenge only serves the purpose of
 self-preservation. It may be that through our adversary we have lost
 property, rank, friends, children--these losses are not recovered by
 revenge, the readjustment only concerns a subsidiary loss which is added
 to all the other losses. The revenge of readjustment does not preserve one
 from further injury, it does not make good the injury already
 suffered--except in one case. If our honour has suffered through our
 adversary, revenge can restore it. But in any case honour _has_ suffered
 an injury if intentional harm has been done us, because our adversary
 proved thereby that he was not afraid of us. By revenge we prove that we
 are not afraid of him either, and herein lies the settlement, the
 readjustment. (The intention of showing their complete lack of fear goes
 so far in some people that the dangers of revenge--loss of health or life
 or other losses--are in their eyes an indispensable condition of every
 vengeful act. Hence they practise the duel, although the law also offers
 them aid in obtaining satisfaction for what they have suffered. They are
 not satisfied with a safe means of recovering their honour, because this
 would not prove their fearlessness.)--In the first-named variety of revenge
 it is just fear that strikes the counter-blow; in the second case it is
 the absence of fear, which, as has been said, wishes to manifest itself in
 the counter-blow.--Thus nothing appears more different than the motives of
 the two courses of action which are designated by the one word "revenge."
 Yet it often happens that the avenger is not precisely certain as to what
 really prompted his deed: perhaps he struck the counterblow from fear and
 the instinct of self-preservation, but in the background, when he has time
 to reflect upon the standpoint of wounded honour, he imagines that he has
 avenged himself for the sake of his honour--this motive is in any case more
 _reputable_ than the other. An essential point is whether he sees his
 honour injured in the eyes of others (the world) or only in the eyes of
 his offenders: in the latter case he will prefer secret, in the former
 open revenge. Accordingly, as he enters strongly or feebly into the soul
 of the doer and the spectator, his revenge will be more bitter or more
 tame. If he is entirely lacking in this sort of imagination, he will not
 think at all of revenge, as the feeling of "honour" is not present in him,
 and accordingly cannot be wounded. In the same way, he will not think of
 revenge if he despises the offender and the spectator; because as objects
 of his contempt they cannot give him honour, and accordingly cannot rob
 him of honour. Finally, he will forego revenge in the not uncommon case of
 his loving the offender. It is true that he then suffers loss of honour in
 the other's eyes, and will perhaps become less worthy of having his love
 returned. But even to renounce all requital of love is a sacrifice that
 love is ready to make when its only object is to avoid hurting the beloved
 object: this would mean hurting oneself more than one is hurt by the
 sacrifice.--Accordingly, every one will avenge himself, unless he be bereft
 of honour or inspired by contempt or by love for the offender. Even if he
 turns to the law-courts, he desires revenge as a private individual; but
 also, as a thoughtful, prudent man of society, he desires the revenge of
 society upon one who does not respect it. Thus by legal punishment private
 honour as well as that of society is restored--that is to say, punishment
 is revenge. Punishment undoubtedly contains the first-mentioned element of
 revenge, in as far as by its means society helps to preserve itself, and
 strikes a counter-blow in self-defence. Punishment desires to prevent
 further injury, to scare other offenders. In this way the two elements of
 revenge, different as they are, are united in punishment, and this may
 perhaps tend most of all to maintain the above-mentioned confusion of
 ideas, thanks to which the individual avenger generally does not know what
 he really wants.
 
 
 
 
 34.
 
 
 THE VIRTUES THAT DAMAGE US.--As members of communities we think we have no
 right to exercise certain virtues which afford us great honour and some
 pleasure as private individuals (for example, indulgence and favour
 towards miscreants of all kinds)--in short, every mode of action whereby
 the advantage of society would suffer through our virtue. No bench of
 judges, face to face with its conscience, may permit itself to be
 gracious. This privilege is reserved for the king as an individual, and we
 are glad when he makes use of it, proving that we should like to be
 gracious individually, but not collectively. Society recognises only the
 virtues profitable to her, or at least not injurious to her--virtues like
 justice, which are exercised without loss, or, in fact, at compound
 interest. The virtues that damage us cannot have originated in society,
 because even now opposition to them arises in every small society that is
 in the making. Such virtues are therefore those of men of unequal
 standing, invented by the superior individuals; they are the virtues of
 rulers, and the idea underlying them is: "I am mighty enough to put up
 with an obvious loss; that is a proof of my power." Thus they are virtues
 closely akin to pride.
 
 
 
 
 35.
 
 
 THE CASUISTRY OF ADVANTAGE.--There would be no moral casuistry if there
 were no casuistry of advantage. The most free and refined intelligence is
 often incapable of choosing between two alternatives in such a way that
 his choice necessarily involves the greater advantage. In such cases we
 choose because we must, and afterwards often feel a kind of emotional
 sea-sickness.
 
 
 
 
 36.
 
 
 TURNING HYPOCRITE.--Every beggar turns hypocrite, like every one who makes
 his living out of indigence, be it personal or public.--The beggar does not
 feel want nearly so keenly as he must make others feel it, if he wishes to
 make a living by mendicancy.
 
 
 
 
 37.
 
 
 A SORT OF CULT OF THE PASSIONS.--You hypochondriacs, you philosophic
 blind-worms talk of the formidable nature of human passions, in order to
 inveigh against the dreadsomeness of the whole world-structure. As if the
 passions were always and everywhere formidable! As if this sort of terror
 must always exist in the world!--Through a carelessness in small matters,
 through a deficiency in observation of self and of the rising generation,
 you have yourselves allowed your passions to develop into such unruly
 monsters that you are frightened now at the mere mention of the word
 "passion"! It rests with you and it rests with us to divest the passions
 of their formidable features and so to dam them that they do not become
 devastating floods.--We must not exalt our errors into eternal fatalities.
 Rather shall we honestly endeavour to convert all the passions of humanity
 into sources of joy.(18)
 
 
 
 
 38.
 
 
 THE STING OF CONSCIENCE.--The sting of conscience, like the gnawing of a
 dog at a stone, is mere foolishness.
 
 
 
 
 39.
 
 
 ORIGIN OF RIGHTS.--Rights may be traced to traditions, traditions to
 momentary agreements. At some time or other men were mutually content with
 the consequences of making an agreement, and, again, too indolent formally
 to renew it. Thus they went on living as if it had constantly been
 renewed, and gradually, when oblivion cast its veil over the origin, they
 thought they possessed a sacred, unalterable foundation on which every
 generation would be compelled to build. Tradition was now a constraint,
 even if it no more involved the profit originally derived from making the
 agreement.--Here the weak have always found their strong fortress. They are
 inclined to immortalise the momentary agreement, the single act of favour
 shown towards them.
 
 
 
 
 40.
 
 
 THE SIGNIFICANCE OF OBLIVION IN MORAL SENTIMENT.--The same actions that in
 primitive society first aimed at the common advantage were later on
 performed from other motives: from fear or reverence of those who demanded
 and recommended them; or from habit, because men had seen them done about
 them from childhood upwards; or from kindness, because the practising of
 them caused delight and approving looks on all sides; or from vanity,
 because they were praised. Such actions, in which the fundamental motive,
 that of utility, has been _forgotten_, are then called moral; not, indeed,
 because they are done from those other motives, but because they are not
 done with a conscious purpose of utility.--Whence the hatred of utility
 that suddenly manifests itself here, and by which all praiseworthy actions
 formally exclude all actions for the sake of utility?--Clearly society, the
 rallying-point of all morality and of all maxims in praise of moral
 action, has had to battle too long and too fiercely with the selfishness
 and obstinacy of the individual not to rate every motive morally higher
 than utility. Hence it looks as if morals had not sprung from utility,
 whereas in fact morals are originally the public utility, which had great
 difficulty in prevailing over the interests of the unit and securing a
 loftier reputation.
 
 
 
 
 41.
 
 
 THE HEIRS TO THE WEALTH OF MORALITY.--Even in the domain of morals there is
 an inherited wealth, which is owned by the gentle, the good-tempered, the
 compassionate, the indulgent. They have inherited from their forefathers
 their gentle mode of action, but not common sense (the source of that mode
 of action). The pleasant thing about this wealth is that one must always
 bestow and communicate a portion of it, if its presence is to be felt at
 all. Thus this wealth unconsciously aims at bridging the gulf between the
 morally rich and the morally poor, and, what is its best and most
 remarkable feature, not for the sake of a future mean between rich and
 poor, but for the sake of a universal prosperity and superfluity.--Such may
 be the prevailing view of inherited moral wealth, but it seems to me that
 this view is maintained more _in majorem gloriam_ of morality than in
 honour of truth. Experience at least establishes a maxim which must serve,
 if not as a refutation, at any rate as an important check upon that
 generalisation. Without the most exquisite intelligence, says experience,
 without the most refined capacity for choice and a strong propensity to
 observe the mean, the morally rich will become spendthrifts of morality.
 For by abandoning themselves without restraint to their compassionate,
 gentle, conciliatory, harmonising instincts, they make all about them more
 careless, more covetous, and more sentimental. The children of these
 highly moral spendthrifts easily and (sad to relate) at best become
 pleasant but futile wasters.
 
 
 
 
 42.
 
 
 THE JUDGE AND EXTENUATING CIRCUMSTANCES.--"One should behave as a man of
 honour even towards the devil and pay his debts," said an old soldier,
 when the story of Faust had been related to him in rather fuller detail.
 "Hell is the right place for Faust!" "You are terrible, you men!" cried
 his wife; "how can that be? After all, his only fault was having no ink in
 his ink-stand! It is indeed a sin to write with blood, but surely for that
 such a handsome man ought not to burn in Hell-fire?"
 
 
 
 
 43.
 
 
 PROBLEM OF THE DUTY OF TRUTH.--Duty is an imperious sentiment that forces
 us to action. We call it good, and consider it outside the pale of
 discussion. The origin, limits, and justification of duty we will not
 debate or allow to be debated. But the thinker considers everything an
 evolution and every evolution a subject for discussion, and is accordingly
 without duty so long as he is merely a thinker. As such, he would not
 recognise the duty of seeing and speaking the truth; he would not _feel_
 the sentiment at all. He asks, whence comes it and whither will it go? But
 even this questioning appears to him questionable. Surely, however, the
 consequence would be that the thinker's machinery would no longer work
 properly if he could really feel himself unencumbered by duty in the
 search for knowledge? It would appear, then, that for fuel the same
 element is necessary as must be investigated by means of the
 machine.--Perhaps the formula will be: granted there were a duty of
 recognising truth, what is then the truth in regard to every other kind of
 duty?--But is not a hypothetical sense of duty a contradiction in terms?
 
 
 
 
 44.
 
 
 GRADES OF MORALS.--Morality is primarily a means of preserving the
 community and saving it from destruction. Next it is a means of
 maintaining the community on a certain plane and in a certain degree of
 benevolence. Its motives are fear and hope, and these in a more coarse,
 rough, and powerful form, the more the propensity towards the perverse,
 one-sided, and personal still persists. The most terrible means of
 intimidation must be brought into play so long as milder forms have no
 effect and that twofold species of preservation cannot be attained. (The
 strongest intimidation, by the way, is the invention of a hereafter with a
 hell everlasting.) For this purpose we must have racks and torturers of
 the soul. Further grades of morality, and accordingly means to the end
 referred to, are the commandments of a God (as in the Mosaic law). Still
 further and higher are the commandments of an absolute sense of duty with
 a "Thou shalt"--all rather roughly hewn yet _broad_ steps, because on the
 finer, narrower steps men cannot yet set their feet. Then comes a morality
 of inclination, of taste, finally of insight--which is beyond all the
 illusory motives of morality, but has convinced itself that humanity for
 long periods could be allowed no other.
 
 
 
 
 45.
 
 
 THE MORALITY OF PITY IN THE MOUTHS OF THE INTEMPERATE.--All those who are
 not sufficiently masters of themselves and do not know morality as a
 self-control and self-conquest continuously exercised in things great and
 small, unconsciously come to glorify the good, compassionate, benevolent
 impulses of that instinctive morality which has no head, but seems merely
 to consist of a heart and helpful hands. It is to their interest even to
 cast suspicion upon a morality of reason and to set up the other as the
 sole morality.
 
 
 
 
 46.
 
 
 SEWERS OF THE SOUL.--Even the soul must have its definite sewers, through
 which it can allow its filth to flow off: for this purpose it may use
 persons, relations, social classes, its native country, or the world, or
 finally--for the wholly arrogant (I mean our modern "pessimists")--_le bon
 Dieu_.
 
 
 
 
 47.
 
 
 A KIND OF REST AND CONTEMPLATION.--Beware lest your rest and contemplation
 resemble that of a dog before a butcher's stall, prevented by fear from
 advancing and by greed from retiring, and opening its eyes wide as though
 they were mouths.
 
 
 
 
 48.
 
 
 PROHIBITIONS WITHOUT REASONS.--A prohibition, the reason of which we do not
 understand or admit, is almost a command, not only for the stiff-necked
 but for the thirster after knowledge. We at once make an experiment in
 order to learn _why_ the prohibition was made. Moral prohibitions, like
 those of the Decalogue, are only suited to ages when reason lies
 vanquished. Nowadays a prohibition like "Thou shalt not kill," "Thou shalt
 not commit adultery," laid down without reasons, would have an injurious
 rather than a beneficial effect.
 
 
 
 
 49.
 
 
 CHARACTER PORTRAIT.--What sort of a man is it that can say of himself: "I
 despise very easily, but never hate. I at once find out in every man
 something which can be honoured and for which I honour him: the so-called
 amiable qualities attract me but little"?
 
 
 
 
 50.
 
 
 PITY AND CONTEMPT.--The expression of pity is regarded as a sign of
 contempt, because one has clearly ceased to be an object of _fear_ as soon
 as one becomes an object of pity. One has sunk below the level of the
 equilibrium. For this equilibrium does not satisfy human vanity, which is
 only satisfied by the feeling that one is imposing respect and awe. Hence
 it is difficult to explain why pity is so highly prized, just as we need
 to explain why the unselfish man, who is originally despised or feared as
 being artful, is praised.
 
 
 
 
 51.
 
 
 THE CAPACITY OF BEING SMALL.--We must be as near to flowers, grasses, and
 butterflies as a child, that is, not much bigger than they. We adults have
 grown up beyond them and have to stoop to them. I think the grasses hate
 us when we confess our love for them.--He who would have a share in all
 good things must understand at times how to be small.
 
 
 
 
 52.
 
 
 THE SUM-TOTAL OF CONSCIENCE.--The sum-total of our conscience is all that
 has regularly been demanded of us, without reason, in the days of our
 childhood, by people whom we respected or feared. From conscience comes
 that feeling of obligation ("This I must do, this omit") which does not
 ask, Why must I?--In all cases where a thing is done with "because" and
 "why," man acts without conscience, but not necessarily on that account
 _against_ conscience.--The belief in authority is the source of conscience;
 which is therefore not the voice of God in the heart of man, but the voice
 of some men in man.
 
 
 
 
 53.
 
 
 CONQUEST OF THE PASSIONS.--The man who has overcome his passions has
 entered into possession of the most fruitful soil, like the colonist who
 has become lord over bogs and forests. To sow the seed of spiritual good
 works on the soil of the vanquished passions is the next and most urgent
 task. The conquest itself is a means, not an end: if it be not so
 regarded, all kind of weeds and devil's crop quickly spring up upon the
 fertile soil that has been cleared, and soon the growth is all wilder and
 more luxuriant than before.
 
 
 
 
 54.
 
 
 SKILL IN SERVICE.--All so-called practical men have skill in service,
 whether it be serving others or themselves; this is what makes them
 practical. Robinson owned a servant even better than Friday--his name was
 Crusoe.
 
 
 
 
 55.
 
 
 DANGER IN SPEECH TO INTELLECTUAL FREEDOM.--Every word is a preconceived
 judgment.
 
 
 
 
 56.
 
 
 INTELLECT AND BOREDOM.--The proverb, "The Hungarian is far too lazy to feel
 bored," gives food for thought. Only the highest and most active animals
 are capable of being bored.--The boredom of God on the seventh day of
 Creation would be a subject for a great poet.
 
 
 
 
 57.
 
 
 INTERCOURSE WITH ANIMALS.--The origin of our morality may still be observed
 in our relations with animals. Where advantage or the reverse do not come
 into play, we have a feeling of complete irresponsibility. For example, we
 kill or wound insects or let them live, and as a rule think no more about
 it. We are so clumsy that even our gracious acts towards flowers and small
 animals are almost always murderous: this does not in the least detract
 from our pleasure in them.--To-day is the festival of the small animals,
 the most sultry day of the year. There is a swarming and crawling around
 us, and we, without intention, but also without reflection, crush here and
 there a little fly or winged beetle.--If animals do us harm, we strive to
 _annihilate_ them in every possible way. The means are often cruel enough,
 even without our really intending them to be so--it is the cruelty of
 thoughtlessness. If they are useful, we turn them to advantage, until a
 more refined wisdom teaches us that certain animals amply reward a
 different mode of treatment, that of tending and breeding. Here
 responsibility first arises. Torturing is avoided in the case of the
 domestic animal. One man is indignant if another is cruel to his cow,
 quite in accordance with the primitive communal morality, which sees the
 commonwealth in danger whenever an individual does wrong. He who perceives
 any transgression in the community fears indirect harm to himself. Thus we
 fear in this case for the quality of meat, agriculture, and means of
 communication if we see the domestic animals ill-treated. Moreover, he who
 is harsh to animals awakens a suspicion that he is also harsh to men who
 are weak, inferior, and incapable of revenge. He is held to be ignoble and
 deficient in the finer form of pride. Thus arises a foundation of moral
 judgments and sentiments, but the greatest contribution is made by
 superstition. Many animals incite men by glances, tones, and gestures to
 transfer themselves into them in imagination, and some religions teach us,
 under certain circumstances, to see in animals the dwelling-place of human
 and divine souls: whence they recommend a nobler caution or even a
 reverential awe in intercourse with animals. Even after the disappearance
 of this superstition the sentiments awakened by it continue to exercise
 their influence, to ripen and to blossom.--Christianity, as is well known,
 has shown itself in this respect a poor and retrograde religion.
 
 
 
 
 58.
 
 
 NEW ACTORS.--Among human beings there is no greater banality than death.
 Second in order, because it is possible to die without being born, comes
 birth, and next comes marriage. But these hackneyed little tragi-comedies
 are always presented, at each of their unnumbered and innumerable
 performances, by new actors, and accordingly do not cease to find
 interested spectators: whereas we might well believe that the whole
 audience of the world-theatre had long since hanged themselves to every
 tree from sheer boredom at these performances. So much depends on new
 actors, so little on the piece.
 
 
 
 
 59.
 
 
 WHAT IS "BEING OBSTINATE"?--The shortest way is not the straightest
 possible, but that wherein favourable winds swell our sails. So says the
 wisdom of seamen. Not to follow his course is obstinate, firmness of
 character being then adulterated by stupidity.
 
 
 
 
 60.
 
 
 THE WORD "VANITY."--It is annoying that certain words, with which we
 moralists positively cannot dispense, involve in themselves a kind of
 censorship of morals, dating from the times when the most ordinary and
 natural impulses were denounced. Thus that fundamental conviction that on
 the waves of society we either find navigable waters or suffer shipwreck
 far more through what we appear than through what we are (a conviction
 that must act as guiding principle of all action in relation to society)
 is branded with the general word "vanity." In other words, one of the most
 weighty and significant of qualities is branded with an expression which
 denotes it as essentially empty and negative: a great thing is designated
 by a diminutive, ay, even slandered by the strokes of caricature. There is
 no help for it; we must use such words, but then we must shut our ears to
 the insinuations of ancient habits.
 
 
 
 
 61.
 
 
 THE FATALISM OF THE TURK.--The fatalism of the Turk has this fundamental
 defect, that it contrasts man and fate as two distinct things. Man, says
 this doctrine, may struggle against fate and try to baffle it, but in the
 end fate will always gain the victory. Hence the most rational course is
 to resign oneself or to live as one pleases. As a matter of fact, every
 man is himself a piece of fate. When he thinks that he is struggling
 against fate in this way, fate is accomplishing its ends even in that
 struggle. The combat is a fantasy, but so is the resignation in fate--all
 these fantasies are included in fate.--The fear felt by most people of the
 doctrine that denies the freedom of the will is a fear of the fatalism of
 the Turk. They imagine that man will become weakly resigned and will stand
 before the future with folded hands, because he cannot alter anything of
 the future. Or that he will give a free rein to his caprices, because the
 predestined cannot be made worse by that course. The follies of men are as
 much a piece of fate as are his wise actions, and even that fear of belief
 in fate is a fatality. You yourself, you poor timid creature, are that
 indomitable _Moira_, which rules even the Gods; whatever may happen, you
 are a curse or a blessing, and in any case the fetters wherein the
 strongest lies bound: in you the whole future of the human world is
 predestined, and it is no use for you to be frightened of yourself.
 
 
 
 
 62.
 
 
 THE ADVOCATE OF THE DEVIL.--"Only by our own suffering do we become wise,
 only by others' suffering do we become good"--so runs that strange
 philosophy which derives all morality from pity and all intellectuality
 from the isolation of the individual. Herein this philosophy is the
 unconscious pleader for all human deterioration. For pity needs suffering,
 and isolation contempt of others.
 
 
 
 
 63.
 
 
 THE MORAL CHARACTER-MASKS.--In ages when the character-masks of different
 classes are definitely fixed, like the classes themselves, moralists will
 be seduced into holding the moral character-masks, too, as absolute, and
 in delineating them accordingly. Thus Moliere is intelligible as the
 contemporary of the society of Louis XIV.: in our society of transitions
 and intermediate stages he would seem an inspired pedant.
 
 
 
 
 64.
 
 
 THE MOST NOBLE VIRTUE.--In the first era of the higher humanity courage is
 accounted the most noble virtue, in the next justice, in the third
 temperance, in the fourth wisdom. In which era do _we_ live? In which do
 _you_ live?
 
 
 
 
 65.
 
 
 A NECESSARY PRELIMINARY.--A man who will not become master of his
 irritability, his venomous and vengeful feelings, and his lust, and
 attempts to become master in anything else, is as stupid as the farmer who
 lays out his field beside a torrent without guarding against that torrent.
 
 
 
 
 66.
 
 
 WHAT IS TRUTH?--_Schwarzert_ (Melanchthon): We often preach our faith when
 we have lost it, and leave not a stone unturned to find it--and then we
 often do not preach worst!
 
 _Luther_: Brother, you are really speaking like an angel to-day.
 
 _Schwarzert_: But that is the idea of your enemies, and they apply it to
 you.
 
 _Luther_: Then it would be a lie from the devil's hind-quarters.
 
 
 
 
 67.
 
 
 THE HABIT OF CONTRASTS.--Superficial, inexact observation sees contrasts
 everywhere in nature (for instance, "hot and cold"), where there are no
 contrasts, only differences of degree. This bad habit has induced us to
 try to understand and interpret even the inner nature, the intellectual
 and moral world, in accordance with such contrasts. An infinite amount of
 cruelty, arrogance, harshness, estrangement, and coldness has entered into
 human emotion, because men imagined they saw contrasts where there were
 only transitions.
 
 
 
 
 68.
 
 
 CAN WE FORGIVE?--How can we forgive them at all, if they know not what they
 do? We have nothing to forgive. But does a man ever fully know what he is
 doing? And if this point at least remains always debatable, men never have
 anything to forgive each other, and indulgence is for the reasonable man
 an impossible thing. Finally, if the evil-doers had really known what they
 did, we should still only have a right to forgive if we had a right to
 accuse and to punish. But we have not that right.
 
 
 
 
 69.
 
 
 HABITUAL SHAME.--Why do we feel shame when some virtue or merit is
 attributed to us which, as the saying goes, "we have not deserved"?
 Because we appear to have intruded upon a territory to which we do not
 belong, from which we should be excluded, as from a holy place or holy of
 holies, which ought not to be trodden by our foot. Through the errors of
 others we have, nevertheless, penetrated to it, and we are now swayed
 partly by fear, partly by reverence, partly by surprise; we do not know
 whether we ought to fly or to enjoy the blissful moment with all its
 gracious advantages. In all shame there is a mystery, which seems
 desecrated or in danger of desecration through us. All _favour_ begets
 shame.--But if it be remembered that we have never really "deserved"
 anything, this feeling of shame, provided that we surrender ourselves to
 this point of view in a spirit of Christian contemplation, becomes
 habitual, because upon such a one God seems continually to be conferring
 his blessing and his favours. Apart from this Christian interpretation,
 the state of habitual shame will be possible even to the entirely godless
 sage, who clings firmly to the basic non-responsibility and
 non-meritoriousness of all action and being. If he be treated as if he had
 deserved this or that, he will seem to have won his way into a higher
 order of beings, who do actually deserve something, who are free and can
 really bear the burden of responsibility for their own volition and
 capacity. Whoever says to him, "You have deserved it," appears to cry out
 to him, "You are not a human being, but a God."
 
 
 
 
 70.
 
 
 THE MOST UNSKILFUL TEACHER.--In one man all his real virtues are implanted
 on the soil of his spirit of contradiction, in another on his incapacity
 to say "no"--in other words, on his spirit of acquiescence. A third has
 made all his morality grow out of his pride as a solitary, a fourth from
 his strong social instinct. Now, supposing that the seeds of the virtues
 in these four cases, owing to mischance or unskilful teachers, were not
 sown on the soil of their nature, which provides them with the richest and
 most abundant mould, they would become weak, unsatisfactory men (devoid of
 morality). And who would have been the most unskilful of teachers, the
 evil genius of these men? The moral fanatic, who thinks that the good can
 only grow out of the good and on the soil of the good.
 
 
 
 
 71.
 
 
 THE CAUTIOUS STYLE.--_A._ But if this were known to _all_, it would be
 injurious to the _majority_. You yourself call your opinions dangerous to
 those in danger, and yet you make them public?
 
 _B._ I write so that neither the mob, nor the _populi_, nor the parties of
 all kinds can read me. So my opinions will never be "public opinions."
 
 _A._ How do you write, then?
 
 _B._ Neither usefully nor pleasantly--for the three classes I have
 mentioned.
 
 
 
 
 72.
 
 
 DIVINE MISSIONARIES.--Even Socrates feels himself to be a divine
 missionary, but I am not sure whether we should not here detect a tincture
 of that Attic irony and fondness for jesting whereby this odious, arrogant
 conception would be toned down. He talks of the fact without unction--his
 images of the gadfly and the horse are simple and not sacerdotal. The real
 religious task which he has set himself--to _test_ God in a hundred ways
 and see whether he spoke the truth--betrays a bold and free attitude, in
 which the missionary walked by the side of his God. This testing of God is
 one of the most subtle compromises between piety and free-thinking that
 has ever been devised.--Nowadays we do not even need this compromise any
 longer.
 
 
 
 
 73.
 
 
 HONESTY IN PAINTING.--Raphael, who cared a great deal for the Church (so
 far as she could pay him), but, like the best men of his time, cared
 little for the objects of the Church's belief, did not advance one step to
 meet the exacting, ecstatic piety of many of his patrons. He remained
 honest even in that exceptional picture which was originally intended for
 a banner in a procession--the Sistine Madonna. Here for once he wished to
 paint a vision, but such a vision as even noble youths without "faith" may
 and will have--the vision of the future wife, a wise, high-souled, silent,
 and very beautiful woman, carrying her first-born in her arms. Let men of
 an older generation, accustomed to prayer and devotion, find here, like
 the worthy elder on the left, something superhuman to revere. We younger
 men (so Raphael seems to call to us) are occupied with the beautiful
 maiden on the right, who says to the spectator of the picture, with her
 challenging and by no means devout look, "The mother and her child--is not
 that a pleasant, inviting sight?" The face and the look are reflected in
 the joy in the faces of the beholders. The artist who devised all this
 enjoys himself in this way, and adds his own delight to the delight of the
 art-lover. As regards the "messianic" expression in the face of the child,
 Raphael, honest man, who would not paint any state of soul in which he did
 not believe, has amiably cheated his religious admirers. He painted that
 freak of nature which is very often found, the man's eye in the child's
 face, and that, too, the eye of a brave, helpful man who sees distress.
 This eye should be accompanied by a beard. The fact that a beard is
 wanting, and that two different ages are seen in one countenance, is the
 pleasing paradox which believers have interpreted in accordance with their
 faith in miracles. The artist could only expect as much from their art of
 exposition and interpretation.
 
 
 
 
 74.
 
 
 PRAYER.--On two hypotheses alone is there any sense in prayer, that not
 quite extinct custom of olden times. It would have to be possible either
 to fix or alter the will of the godhead, and the devotee would have to
 know best himself what he needs and should really desire. Both hypotheses,
 axiomatic and traditional in all other religions, are denied by
 Christianity. If Christianity nevertheless maintained prayer side by side
 with its belief in the all-wise and all-provident divine reason (a belief
 that makes prayer really senseless and even blasphemous), it showed here
 once more its admirable "wisdom of the serpent." For an outspoken command,
 "Thou shalt not pray," would have led Christians by way of boredom to the
 denial of Christianity. In the Christian _ora et labora ora_ plays the
 role of pleasure. Without _ora_ what could those unlucky saints who
 renounced _labora_ have done? But to have a chat with God, to ask him for
 all kinds of pleasant things, to feel a slight amusement at one's own
 folly in still having any wishes at all, in spite of so excellent a
 father--all that was an admirable invention for saints.
 
 
 
 
 75.
 
 
 A HOLY LIE.--The lie that was on Arria's lips when she died (_Paete, non
 dolet_(19)) obscures all the truths that have ever been uttered by the
 dying. It is the only holy _lie_ that has become famous, whereas elsewhere
 the odour of sanctity has clung only to _errors_.
 
 
 
 
 76.
 
 
 THE MOST NECESSARY APOSTLE.--Among twelve apostles one must always be hard
 as stone, in order that upon him the new church may be built.
 
 
 
 
 77.
 
 
 WHICH IS MORE TRANSITORY, THE BODY OR THE SPIRIT?--In legal, moral, and
 religious institutions the external and concrete elements--in other words,
 rites, gestures, and ceremonies--are the most permanent. They are the body
 to which a new spirit is constantly being superadded. The cult, like an
 unchangeable text, is ever interpreted anew. Concepts and emotions are
 fluid, customs are solid.
 
 
 
 
 78.
 
 
 THE BELIEF IN DISEASE _QUA_ DISEASE.--Christianity first painted the devil
 on the wall of the world. Christianity first brought the idea of sin into
 the world. The belief in the remedies, which is offered as an antidote,
 has gradually been shaken to its very foundations. But the belief in the
 disease, which Christianity has taught and propagated, still exists.
 
 
 
 
 79.
 
 
 SPEECH AND WRITINGS OF RELIGIOUS MEN.--If the priest's style and general
 expression, both in speaking and writing, do not clearly betray the
 religious man, we need no longer take his views upon religion and his
 pleading for religion seriously. These opinions have become powerless for
 him if, judging by his style, he has at command irony, arrogance, malice,
 hatred, and all the changing eddies of mood, just like the most
 irreligious of men--how far more powerless will they be for his hearers and
 readers! In short, he will serve to make the latter still more
 irreligious.
 
 
 
 
 80.
 
 
 THE DANGER IN PERSONALITY.--The more God has been regarded as a personality
 in himself, the less loyal have we been to him. Men are far more attached
 to their thought-images than to their best beloved. That is why they
 sacrifice themselves for State, Church, and even for God--so far as he
 remains _their_ creation, their thought, and is not too much looked upon
 as a personality. In the latter case they almost always quarrel with him.
 After all, it was the most pious of men who let slip that bitter cry: "My
 God, why hast thou forsaken me?"
 
 
 
 
 81.
 
 
 WORLDLY JUSTICE.--It is possible to unhinge worldly justice with the
 doctrine of the complete non-responsibility and innocence of every man. An
 attempt has been made in the same direction on the basis of the opposite
 doctrine of the full responsibility and guilt of every man. It was the
 founder of Christianity who wished to abolish worldly justice and banish
 judgment and punishment from the world. For he understood all guilt as
 "sin"--that is, an outrage against God and not against the world. On the
 other hand, he considered every man in a broad sense, and almost in every
 sense, a sinner. The guilty, however, are not to be the judges of their
 peers--so his rules of equity decided. Thus all dispensers of worldly
 justice were in his eyes as culpable as those they condemned, and their
 air of guiltlessness appeared to him hypocritical and pharisaical.
 Moreover, he looked to the motives and not to the results of actions, and
 thought that only one was keen-sighted enough to give a verdict on
 motives--himself or, as he expressed it, God.
 
 
 
 
 82.
 
 
 AN AFFECTATION IN PARTING.--He who wishes to sever his connection with a
 party or a creed thinks it necessary for him to refute it. This is a most
 arrogant notion. The only thing necessary is that he should clearly see
 what tentacles hitherto held him to this party or creed and no longer hold
 him, what views impelled him to it and now impel him in some other
 directions. We have not joined the party or creed on strict grounds of
 knowledge. We should not affect this attitude on parting from it either.
 
 
 
 
 83.
 
 
 SAVIOUR AND PHYSICIAN.--In his knowledge of the human soul the founder of
 Christianity was, as is natural, not without many great deficiencies and
 prejudices, and, as physician of the soul, was addicted to that
 disreputable, laical belief in a universal medicine. In his methods he
 sometimes resembles that dentist who wishes to heal all pain by extracting
 the tooth. Thus, for example, he assails sensuality with the advice: "If
 thine eye offend thee, pluck it out."--Yet there still remains the
 distinction that the dentist at least attains his object--painlessness for
 the patient--although in so clumsy a fashion that he becomes ridiculous;
 whereas the Christian who follows that advice and thinks he has killed his
 sensuality, is wrong, for his sensuality still lives in an uncanny,
 vampire form, and torments him in hideous disguises.
 
 
 
 
 84.
 
 
 PRISONERS.--One morning the prisoners entered the yard for work, but the
 warder was not there. Some, as their manner was, set to work at once;
 others stood idle and gazed defiantly around. Then one of them strode
 forward and cried, "Work as much as you will or do nothing, it all comes
 to the same. Your secret machinations have come to light; the warder has
 been keeping his eye on you of late, and will cause a terrible judgment to
 be passed upon you in a few days' time. You know him--he is of a cruel and
 resentful disposition. But now, listen: you have mistaken me hitherto. I
 am not what I seem, but far more--I am the son of the warder, and can get
 anything I like out of him. I can save you--nay, I will save you. But
 remember this: I will only save those of you who _believe_ that I am the
 son of the prison warder. The rest may reap the fruits of their unbelief."
 "Well," said an old prisoner after an interval of silence, "what can it
 matter to you whether we believe you or not? If you are really the son,
 and can do what you say, then put in a good word for us all. That would be
 a real kindness on your part. But have done with all talk of belief and
 unbelief!" "What is more," cried a younger man, "I don't believe him: he
 has only got a bee in his bonnet. I'll wager that in a week's time we
 shall find ourselves in the same place as we are to-day, and the warder
 will know nothing." "And if the warder ever knew anything, he knows it no
 longer," said the last of the prisoners, coming down into the yard at that
 moment, "for he has just died suddenly." "Ah ha!" cried several in
 confusion, "ah ha! Sir Son, Sir Son, how stands it now with your title?
 Are we by any chance _your_ prisoners now?" "I told you," answered the man
 gently, "I will set free all who believe in me, as surely as my father
 still lives."--The prisoners did not laugh, but shrugged their shoulders
 and left him to himself.
 
 
 
 
 85.
 
 
 THE PERSECUTORS OF GOD.--Paul conceived and Calvin followed up the idea
 that countless creatures have been predestined to damnation from time
 immemorial, and that this fair world was made in order that the glory of
 God might be manifested therein. So heaven and hell and mankind merely
 exist to satisfy the vanity of God! What a cruel, insatiable vanity must
 have smouldered in the soul of the first or second thinker of such a
 thought!--Paul, then, after all, remained Saul--the persecutor of God.
 
 
 
 
 86.
 
 
 SOCRATES.--If all goes well, the time will come when, in order to advance
 themselves on the path of moral reason, men will rather take up the
 _Memorabilia_ of Socrates than the Bible, and when Montaigne and Horace
 will be used as pioneers and guides for the understanding of Socrates, the
 simplest and most enduring of interpretative sages. In him converge the
 roads of the most different philosophic modes of life, which are in truth
 the modes of the different temperaments, crystallised by reason and habit
 and all ultimately directed towards the delight in life and in self. The
 apparent conclusion is that the most peculiar thing about Socrates was his
 share in all the temperaments. Socrates excels the founder of Christianity
 by virtue of his merry style of seriousness and by that wisdom of sheer
 roguish pranks which constitutes the best state of soul in a man.
 Moreover, he had a superior intelligence.
 
 
 
 
 87.
 
 
 LEARNING TO WRITE WELL.--The age of good speaking is over, because the age
 of city-state culture is over. The limit allowed by Aristotle to the great
 city--in which the town-crier must be able to make himself heard by the
 whole assembled community--troubles us as little as do any
 city-communities, us who even wish to be understood beyond the boundaries
 of nations. Therefore every one who is of a good European turn of mind
 must learn to _write_ well, and to write better and better. He cannot help
 himself, he must learn that: even if he was born in Germany, where bad
 writing is looked upon as a national privilege. Better writing means
 better thinking; always to discover matter more worthy of communication;
 to be able to communicate it properly; to be translateable into the
 tongues of neighbouring nations; to make oneself comprehensible to
 foreigners who learn our language; to work with the view of making all
 that is good common property, and of giving free access everywhere to the
 free; finally, to pave the way for that still remote state of things, when
 the great task shall come for good Europeans--guidance and guardianship of
 the universal world-culture.--Whoever preaches the opposite doctrine of not
 troubling about good writing and good reading (both virtues grow together
 and decline together) is really showing the peoples a way of becoming more
 and more _national_. He is intensifying the malady of this century, and is
 a foe to good Europeans, a foe to free spirits.
 
 
 
 
 88.
 
 
 THE THEORY OF THE BEST STYLE.--The theory of the best style may at one time
 be the theory of finding the expression by which we transfer every mood of
 ours to the reader and the listener. At another, it may be the theory of
 finding expressions for the more desirable human moods, the communication
 and transference of which one desires most--for the mood of a man moved
 from the depth of his heart, intellectually cheerful, bright, and sincere,
 who has conquered his passions. This will be the theory of the best style,
 a theory that corresponds to the good man.
 
 
 
 
 89.
 
 
 PAYING ATTENTION TO MOVEMENT.--The movement of the sentences shows whether
 the author be tired. Individual expressions may nevertheless be still
 strong and good, because they were invented earlier and for their own
 sake, when the thought first flashed across the author's mind. This is
 frequently the case with Goethe, who too often dictated when he was tired.
 
 
 
 
 90.
 
 
 "ALREADY" AND "STILL."--_A._ German prose is still very young. Goethe
 declares that Wieland is its father.
 
 _B._ So young and already so ugly!
 
 _C._ But, so far as I am aware, Bishop Ulfilas already wrote German prose,
 which must therefore be fifteen hundred years old.
 
 _B._ So old and still so ugly!
 
 
 
 
 91.
 
 
 ORIGINAL GERMAN.--German prose, which is really not fashioned on any
 pattern and must be considered an original creation of German taste,
 should give the eager advocate of a future original German culture an
 indication of how real German dress, German society, German furniture,
 German meals would look without the imitation of models.--Some one who had
 long reflected on these vistas finally cried in great horror, "But, Heaven
 help us, perhaps we already have that original culture--only we don't like
 to talk about it!"
 
 
 
 
 92.
 
 
 FORBIDDEN BOOKS.--One should never read anything written by those arrogant
 wiseacres and puzzle-brains who have the detestable vice of logical
 paradox. They apply _logical_ formulae just where everything is really
 improvised at random and built in the air. ("Therefore" with them means,
 "You idiot of a reader, this 'therefore' does not exist for you, but only
 for me." The answer to this is: "You idiot of a writer, then why do you
 write?")
 
 
 
 
 93.
 
 
 DISPLAYING ONE'S WIT.--Every one who wishes to display his wit thereby
 proclaims that he has also a plentiful lack of wit. That vice which clever
 Frenchmen have of adding a touch of _dedain_ to their best ideas arises
 from a desire to be considered richer than they really are. They wish to
 be carelessly generous, as if weary of continual spending from overfull
 treasuries.
 
 
 
 
 94.
 
 
 FRENCH AND GERMAN LITERATURE.--The misfortune of the French and German
 literature of the last hundred years is that the Germans ran away too
 early from the French school, and the French, later on, went too early to
 the German school.
 
 
 
 
 95.
 
 
 OUR PROSE.--None of the present-day cultured nations has so bad a prose as
 the German. When clever, _blase_ Frenchmen say, "There is no German
 prose," we ought really not to be angry, for this criticism is more polite
 than we deserve. If we look for reasons, we come at last to the strange
 phenomenon that the German knows only improvised prose and has no
 conception of any other. He simply cannot understand the Italian, who says
 that prose is as much harder than poetry as the representation of naked
 beauty is harder to the sculptor than that of draped beauty. Verse,
 images, rhythm, and rhyme need honest effort--that even the German
 realises, and he is not inclined to set a very high value on extempore
 poetry. But the notion of working at a page of prose as at a statue sounds
 to him like a tale from fairyland.
 
 
 
 
 96.
 
 
 THE GRAND STYLE.--The grand style comes into being when the beautiful wins
 a victory over the monstrous.
 
 
 
 
 97.
 
 
 DODGING.--We do not realise, in the case of distinguished minds, wherein
 lies the excellence of their expression, their turn of phrase, until we
 can say what word every mediocre writer would inevitably have hit upon in
 expressing the same idea. All great artists, in steering their car, show
 themselves prone to dodge and leave the track, but never to fall over.
 
 
 
 
 98.
 
 
 SOMETHING LIKE BREAD.--Bread neutralises and takes out the taste of other
 food, and is therefore necessary to every long meal. In all works of art
 there must be something like bread, in order that they may produce divers
 effects. If these effects followed one another without occasional pauses
 and intervals, they would soon make us weary and provoke disgust--in fact,
 a long meal of art would then be impossible.
 
 
 
 
 99.
 
 
 JEAN PAUL.--Jean Paul knew a great deal, but had no science; understood all
 manner of tricks of art, but had no art; found almost everything
 enjoyable, but had no taste; possessed feeling and seriousness, but in
 dispensing them poured over them a nauseous sauce of tears; had even wit,
 but, unfortunately for his ardent desire for it, far too little--whence he
 drives the reader to despair by his very lack of wit. In short, he was the
 bright, rank-smelling weed that shot up overnight in the fair pleasaunces
 of Schiller and Goethe. He was a good, comfortable man, and yet a destiny,
 a destiny in a dressing-gown.(20)
 
 
 
 
 100.
 
 
 PALATE FOR OPPOSITES.--In order to enjoy a work of the past as its
 contemporaries enjoyed it, one must have a palate for the prevailing taste
 of the age which it attacked.
 
 
 
 
 101.
 
 
 SPIRITS-OF-WINE AUTHORS.--Many writers are neither spirit nor wine, but
 spirits of wine. They can flare up, and then they give warmth.
 
 
 
 
 102.
 
 
 THE INTERPRETATIVE SENSE.--The sense of taste, as the true interpretative
 sense, often talks the other senses over to its point of view and imposes
 upon them its laws and customs. At table one can receive disclosures about
 the most subtle secrets of the arts; it suffices to observe what tastes
 good and when and after what and how long it tastes good.
 
 
 
 
 103.
 
 
 LESSING.--Lessing had a genuine French talent, and, as writer, went most
 assiduously to the French school. He knows well how to arrange and display
 his wares in his shop-window. Without this true art his thoughts, like the
 objects of them, would have remained rather in the dark, nor would the
 general loss be great. His art, however, has taught many (especially the
 last generation of German scholars) and has given enjoyment to a countless
 number. It is true his disciples had no need to learn from him, as they
 often did, his unpleasant tone with its mingling of petulance and
 candour.--Opinion is now unanimous on Lessing as "lyric poet," and will
 some day be unanimous on Lessing as "dramatic poet."
 
 
 
 
 104.
 
 
 UNDESIRABLE READERS.--How an author is vexed by those stolid, awkward
 readers who always fall at every place where they stumble, and always hurt
 themselves when they fall!
 
 
 
 
 105.
 
 
 POETS' THOUGHTS.--Real thoughts of real poets always go about with a veil
 on, like Egyptian women; only the deep _eye_ of thought looks out freely
 through the veil.--Poets' thoughts are as a rule not of such value as is
 supposed. We have to pay for the veil and for our own curiosity into the
 bargain.
 
 
 
 
 106.
 
 
 WRITE SIMPLY AND USEFULLY.--Transitions, details, colour in depicting the
 passions--we make a present of all these to the author because we bring
 them with us and set them down to the credit of his book, provided he
 makes us some compensation.
 
 
 
 
 107.
 
 
 WIELAND.--Wieland wrote German better than any one else, and had the
 genuine adequacies and inadequacies of the master. His translations of the
 letters of Cicero and Lucian are the best in the language. His ideas,
 however, add nothing to our store of thought. We can endure his cheerful
 moralities as little as his cheerful immoralities, for both are very
 closely connected. The men who enjoyed them were at bottom better men than
 we are, but also a good deal heavier. They _needed_ an author of this
 sort. The Germans did not need Goethe, and therefore cannot make proper
 use of him. We have only to consider the best of our statesmen and artists
 in this light. None of them had or _could_ have had Goethe as their
 teacher.
 
 
 
 
 108.
 
 
 RARE FESTIVALS.--Pithy conciseness, repose, and maturity--where you find
 these qualities in an author, cry halt and celebrate a great festival in
 the desert. It will be long before you have such a treat again.
 
 
 
 
 109.
 
 
 THE TREASURE OF GERMAN PROSE.--Apart from Goethe's writings and especially
 Goethe's conversations with Eckermann (the best German book in existence),
 what German prose literature remains that is worth reading over and over
 again? Lichtenberg's _Aphorisms_, the first book of Jung-Stilling's _Story
 of My Life_, Adalbert Stifter's _St. Martin's Summer_ and Gottfried
 Keller's _People of Seldwyla_--and there, for the time being, it comes to
 an end.
 
 
 
 
 110.
 
 
 LITERARY AND COLLOQUIAL STYLE.--The art of writing demands, first and
 foremost, substitutions for the means of expression which speech alone
 possesses--in other words, for gestures, accent, intonation, and look.
 Hence literary style is quite different from colloquial style, and far
 more difficult, because it has to make itself as intelligible as the
 latter with fewer accessaries. Demosthenes delivered his speeches
 differently from what we read; he worked them up for reading
 purposes.--Cicero's speeches ought to be "demosthenised" with the same
 object, for at present they contain more of the Roman Forum than we can
 endure.
 
 
 
 
 111.
 
 
 CAUTION IN QUOTATION.--Young authors do not know that a good expression or
 idea only looks well among its peers; that an excellent quotation may
 spoil whole pages, nay the whole book; for it seems to cry warningly to
 the reader, "Mark you, I am the precious stone, and round about me is
 lead--pale, worthless lead!" Every word, every idea only desires to live in
 its own company--that is the moral of a choice style.
 
 
 
 
 112.
 
 
 HOW SHOULD ERRORS BE ENUNCIATED?--We may dispute whether it be more
 injurious for errors to be enunciated badly or as well as the best truths.
 It is certain that in the former case they are doubly harmful to the brain
 and are less easily removed from it. But, on the other hand, they are not
 so certain of effect as in the latter case. They are, in fact, less
 contagious.
 
 
 
 
 113.
 
 
 LIMITING AND WIDENING.--Homer limited and diminished the horizon of his
 subject, but allowed individual scenes to expand and blossom out. Later,
 the tragedians are constantly renewing this process. Each takes his
 material in ever smaller and smaller fragments than his predecessor did,
 but each attains a greater wealth of blooms within the narrow hedges of
 these sequestered garden enclosures.
 
 
 
 
 114.
 
 
 LITERATURE AND MORALITY MUTUALLY EXPLANATORY.--We can show from Greek
 literature by what forces the Greek spirit developed, how it entered upon
 different channels, and where it became enfeebled. All this also depicts
 to us how Greek morality proceeded, and how all morality will proceed: how
 it was at first a constraint and displayed cruelty, then became gradually
 milder; how a pleasure in certain actions, in certain forms and
 conventions arose, and from this again a propensity for solitary exercise,
 for solitary possession; how the track becomes crowded and overcrowded
 with competitors; how satiety enters in, new objects of struggle and
 ambition are sought, and forgotten aims are awakened to life; how the
 drama is repeated, and the spectators become altogether weary of looking
 on, because the whole gamut seems to have been run through--and then comes
 a stoppage, an expiration, and the rivulets are lost in the sand. The end,
 or at any rate _an_ end, has come.
 
 
 
 
 115.
 
 
 WHAT LANDSCAPES GIVE PERMANENT DELIGHT.--Such and such a landscape has
 features eminently suited for painting, but I cannot find the formula for
 it; it remains beyond my grasp as a whole. I notice that all landscapes
 which please me permanently have a simple geometrical scheme of lines
 underneath all their complexity. Without such a mathematical substratum no
 scenery becomes artistically pleasing. Perhaps this rule may be applied
 symbolically to human beings.
 
 
 
 
 116.
 
 
 READING ALOUD.--The ability to read aloud involves of necessity the ability
 to declaim. Everywhere we must apply pale tints, but we must determine the
 degree of pallor in close relation to the richly and deeply coloured
 background, that always hovers before our eyes and acts as our guide--in
 other words, in accordance with the way in which we should _declaim_ the
 same passages. That is why we must be able to declaim.
 
 
 
 
 117.
 
 
 THE DRAMATIC SENSE.--He who has not the four subtler senses of art tries to
 understand everything with the fifth sense, which is the coarsest of
 all--the dramatic sense.
 
 
 
 
 118.
 
 
 HERDER.--Herder fails to be all that he made people think he was and
 himself wished to think he was. He was no great thinker or discoverer, no
 newly fertile soil with the unexhausted strength of a virgin forest. But
 he possessed in the highest degree the power of scenting the future, he
 saw and picked the first-fruits of the seasons earlier than all others,
 and they then believed that he had made them grow. Between darkness and
 light, youth and age, his mind was like a hunter on the watch, looking
 everywhere for transitions, depressions, convulsions, the outward and
 visible signs of internal growth. The unrest of spring drove him to and
 fro, but he was himself not the spring.--At times, indeed, he had some
 inkling of this, and yet would fain not have believed it--he, the ambitious
 priest, who would have so gladly been the intellectual pope of his epoch!
 This is his despair. He seems to have lived long as a pretender to several
 kingdoms or even to a universal monarchy. He had his following which
 believed in him, among others the young Goethe. But whenever crowns were
 really distributed, he was passed over. Kant, Goethe, and then the first
 true German historians and scholars robbed him of what he thought he had
 reserved for himself (although in silence and secret he often thought the
 reverse). Just when he doubted in himself, he gladly clothed himself in
 dignity and enthusiasm: these were often in him mere garments, which had
 to hide a great deal and also to deceive and comfort him. He really had
 fire and enthusiasm, but his ambition was far greater! It blew impatiently
 at the fire, which flickered, crackled, and smoked--his _style_ flickers,
 crackles, and smokes--but he yearned for the great flame which never broke
 out. He did not sit at the table of the genuine creators, and his ambition
 did not admit of his sitting modestly among those who simply enjoy. Thus
 he was a restless spirit, the taster of all intellectual dishes, which
 were collected by the Germans from every quarter and every age in the
 course of half a century. Never really happy and satisfied, Herder was
 also too often ill, and then at times envy sat by his bed, and hypocrisy
 paid her visit as well. He always had an air of being scarred and
 crippled, and he lacked simple, stalwart manliness more completely than
 any of the so-called "classical writers."
 
 
 
 
 119.
 
 
 SCENT OF WORDS.--Every word has its scent; there is a harmony and discord
 of scents, and so too of words.
 
 
 
 
 120.
 
 
 THE FAR-FETCHED STYLE.--The natural style is an offence to the lover of the
 far-fetched style.
 
 
 
 
 121.
 
 
 A VOW.--I will never again read an author of whom one can suspect that he
 _wanted_ to make a book, but only those writers whose thoughts
 unexpectedly became a book.
 
 
 
 
 122.
 
 
 THE ARTISTIC CONVENTION.--Three-fourths of Homer is convention, and the
 same is the case with all the Greek artists, who had no reason for falling
 into the modern craze for originality. They had no fear of convention, for
 after all convention was a link between them and their public. Conventions
 are the artistic means _acquired_ for the understanding of the hearer; the
 common speech, learnt with much toil, whereby the artist can really
 communicate his ideas. All the more when he wishes, like the Greek poets
 and musicians, to conquer at once with each of his works (since he is
 accustomed to compete publicly with one or two rivals), the first
 condition is that he must be understood at once, and this is only possible
 by means of convention. What the artist devises beyond convention he
 offers of his own free will and takes a risk, his success at best
 resulting in the setting-up of a new convention. As a rule originality is
 marvelled at, sometimes even worshipped, but seldom understood. A stubborn
 avoidance of convention means a desire not to be understood. What, then,
 is the object of the modern craze for originality?
 
 
 
 
 123.
 
 
 ARTISTS' AFFECTATION OF SCIENTIFIC METHOD.--Schiller, like other German
 artists, fancied that if a man had intellect he was entitled to improvise
 even with the pen on all difficult subjects. So there we see his prose
 essays--in every way a model of how _not_ to attack scientific questions of
 aesthetics and ethics, and a danger for young readers who, in their
 admiration for Schiller the poet, have not the courage to think meanly of
 Schiller the thinker and author.--The temptation to traverse for once the
 forbidden paths, and to have his say in science as well, is easy and
 pardonable in the artist. For even the ablest artist from time to time
 finds his handicraft and his workshop unendurable. This temptation is so
 strong that it makes the artist show all the world what no one wishes to
 see, that his little chamber of thought is cramped and untidy. Why not,
 indeed? He does not live there. He proceeds to show that the storeroom of
 his knowledge is partly empty, partly filled with lumber. Why not, indeed?
 This condition does not really become the artist-child badly. In
 particular, the artist shows that for the very easiest exercises of
 scientific method, which are accessible even to beginners, his joints are
 too stiff and untrained. Even of that he need not really be ashamed! On
 the other hand, he often develops no mean art in imitating all the
 mistakes, vices, and base pedantries that are practised in the scientific
 community, in the belief that these belong to the appearance of the thing,
 if not to the thing itself. This is the very point that is so amusing in
 artists' writing, that the artist involuntarily acts as his vocation
 demands: he parodies the scientific and inartistic natures. Towards
 science he should show no attitude but that of parody, in so far as he is
 an artist and only an artist.
 
 
 
 
 124.
 
 
 THE FAUST-IDEA.--A little sempstress is seduced and plunged into despair: a
 great scholar of all the four Faculties is the evil-doer. That cannot have
 happened in the ordinary course, surely? No, certainly not! Without the
 aid of the devil incarnate, the great scholar would never have achieved
 the deed.--Is this really destined to be the greatest German "tragic idea,"
 as one hears it said among Germans?--But for Goethe even this idea was too
 terrible. His kind heart could not avoid placing the little sempstress,
 "the good soul that forgot itself but once," near to the saints, after her
 involuntary death. Even the great scholar, "the good man" with "the dark
 impulse," is brought into heaven in the nick of time, by a trick which is
 played upon the devil at the decisive moment. In heaven the lovers find
 themselves again. Goethe once said that his nature was too conciliatory
 for really tragic subjects.
 
 
 
 
 125.
 
 
 ARE THERE "GERMAN CLASSICS"?--Sainte-Beuve observes somewhere that the word
 "classic" does not suit the genius of certain literatures. For instance,
 nobody could talk seriously of "German classics."--What do our German
 publishers, who are about to add fifty more to the fifty German classics
 we are told to accept, say to that? Does it not almost seem as if one need
 only have been dead for the last thirty years, and lie a lawful prey to
 the public,(21) in order to hear suddenly and unexpectedly the trumpet of
 resurrection as a "Classic"? And this in an age and a nation where at
 least five out of the six great fathers of its literature are undoubtedly
 antiquated or becoming antiquated--without there being any need for the age
 or the nation to be ashamed of this. For those writers have given way
 before the strength of our time--let that be considered in all
 fairness!--Goethe, as I have indicated, I do not include. He belongs to a
 higher species than "national literatures": hence life, revival, and decay
 do not enter into the reckoning in his relations with his countrymen. He
 lived and now lives but for the few; for the majority he is nothing but a
 flourish of vanity which is trumpeted from time to time across the border
 into foreign ears. Goethe, not merely a great and good man, but a
 _culture_, is in German history an interlude without a sequel. Who, for
 instance, would be able to point to any trace of Goethe's influence in
 German politics of the last seventy years (whereas the influence,
 certainly of Schiller, and perhaps of Lessing, can be traced in the
 political world)? But what of those five others? Klopstock, in a most
 honourable way, became out of date even in his own lifetime, and so
 completely that the meditative book of his later years, _The Republic of
 Learning_, has never been taken seriously from that day to this. Herder's
 misfortune was that his writings were always either new or antiquated.
 Thus for stronger and more subtle minds (like Lichtenberg) even Herder's
 masterpiece, his _Ideas for the History of Mankind_, was in a way
 antiquated at the very moment of its appearance. Wieland, who lived to the
 full and made others live likewise, was clever enough to anticipate by
 death the waning of his influence. Lessing, perhaps, still lives
 to-day--but among a young and ever younger band of scholars. Schiller has
 fallen from the hands of young men into those of boys, of all German boys.
 It is a well-known sign of obsolescence when a book descends to people of
 less and less mature age.--Well, what is it that has thrust these five into
 the background, so that well-educated men of affairs no longer read them?
 A better taste, a riper knowledge, a higher reverence for the real and the
 true: in other words, the very virtues which these five (and ten or twenty
 others of lesser repute) first re-planted in Germany, and which now, like
 a mighty forest, cast over their graves not only the shadow of awe, but
 something of the shadow of oblivion.--But classical writers are not
 planters of intellectual and literary virtues. They bring those virtues to
 perfection and are their highest luminous peaks, and being brighter,
 freer, and purer than all that surrounds them, they remain shining above
 the nations when the nations themselves perish. There may come an elevated
 stage of humanity, in which the Europe of the peoples is a dark, forgotten
 thing, but Europe lives on in thirty books, very old but never
 antiquated--in the classics.
 
 
 
 
 126.
 
 
 INTERESTING, BUT NOT BEAUTIFUL.--This countryside conceals its meaning, but
 it has one that we should like to guess. Everywhere that I look, I read
 words and hints of words, but I do not know where begins the sentence that
 solves the riddle of all these hints. So I get a stiff neck in trying to
 discover whether I should start reading from this or that point.
 
 
 
 
 127.
 
 
 AGAINST INNOVATORS IN LANGUAGE.--The use of neologisms or archaisms, the
 preference for the rare and the bizarre, the attempt to enrich rather than
 to limit the vocabulary, are always signs either of an immature or of a
 corrupted taste. A noble poverty but a masterly freedom within the limits
 of that modest wealth distinguishes the Greek artists in oratory. They
 wish to have less than the people has--for the people is richest in old and
 new--but they wish to have that little _better_. The reckoning up of their
 archaic and exotic forms is soon done, but we never cease marvelling if we
 have an eye for their light and delicate manner in handling the
 commonplace and apparently long outworn elements in word and phrase.
 
 
 
 
 128.
 
 
 GLOOMY AND SERIOUS AUTHORS.--He who commits his sufferings to paper becomes
 a gloomy author, but he becomes a serious one if he tells us what he _has_
 suffered and why he is now enjoying a pleasurable repose.
 
 
 
 
 129.
 
 
 HEALTHINESS OF TASTE.--How is it that health is less contagious than
 disease--generally, and particularly in matters of taste? Or are there
 epidemics of health?
 
 
 
 
 130.
 
 
 A RESOLUTION.--Never again to read a book that is born and christened (with
 ink) at the same moment.
 
 
 
 
 131.
 
 
 IMPROVING OUR IDEAS.--Improving our style means improving our ideas, and
 nothing else. He who does not at once concede this can never be convinced
 of the point.
 
 
 
 
 132.
 
 
 CLASSICAL BOOKS.--The weakest point in every classical book is that it is
 written too much in the mother tongue of its author.
 
 
 
 
 133.
 
 
 BAD BOOKS.--The book should demand pen, ink, and desk, but usually it is
 pen, ink, and desk that demand the book. That is why books are of so
 little account at present.
 
 
 
 
 134.
 
 
 PRESENCE OF SENSE.--When the public reflects on paintings, it becomes a
 poet; when on poems, an investigator. At the moment when the artist
 summons it it is always lacking in the right sense, and accordingly in
 presence of sense, not in presence of mind.
 
 
 
 
 135.
 
 
 CHOICE IDEAS.--The choice style of a momentous period does not only select
 its words but its ideas--and both from the customary and prevailing usage.
 Venturesome ideas, that smell too fresh, are to the maturer taste no less
 repugnant than new and reckless images and phrases. Later on both choice
 ideas and choice words soon smack of mediocrity, because the scent of the
 choice vanishes quickly, and then nothing but the customary and
 commonplace element is tasted.
 
 
 
 
 136.
 
 
 MAIN REASON FOR CORRUPTION OF STYLE.--The desire to display more sentiment
 than one really feels for a thing corrupts style, in language and in all
 art. All great art shows rather the opposite tendency. Like every man of
 moral significance, it loves to check emotion on its way and not let it
 run its course to the very end. This modesty of letting emotion but half
 appear is most clearly to be observed, for example, in Sophocles. The
 features of sentiment seem to become beautified when sentiment feigns to
 be more shy than it really is.
 
 
 
 
 137.
 
 
 AN EXCUSE FOR THE HEAVY STYLE.--The lightly uttered phrase seldom falls on
 the ear with the full weight of the subject. This is, however, due to the
 bad training of the ear, which by education must pass from what has
 hitherto been called music to the school of the higher harmony--in other
 words, to conversation.
 
 
 
 
 138.
 
 
 BIRD'S-EYE VIEWS.--Here torrents rush from every side into a ravine: their
 movement is so swift and stormy, and carries the eye along so quickly,
 that the bare or wooded mountain slopes around seem not to sink down but
 to fly down. We are in an agonised tension at the sight, as if behind all
 this were hidden some hostile element, before which all must fly, and
 against which the abyss alone gave protection. This landscape cannot be
 painted, unless we hover above it like a bird in the open air. Here for
 once the so-called bird's-eye view is not an artistic caprice, but the
 sole possibility.
 
 
 
 
 139.
 
 
 RASH COMPARISONS.--If rash comparisons are not proofs of the wantonness of
 the writer, they are proofs of the exhaustion of his imagination. In any
 case they bear witness to his bad taste.
 
 
 
 
 140.
 
 
 DANCING IN CHAINS.--In the case of every Greek artist, poet, or writer we
 must ask: What is the new constraint which he imposes upon himself and
 makes attractive to his contemporaries, so as to find imitators? For the
 thing called "invention" (in metre, for example) is always a self-imposed
 fetter of this kind. "Dancing in chains"--to make that hard for themselves
 and then to spread a false notion that it is easy--that is the trick that
 they wish to show us. Even in Homer we may perceive a wealth of inherited
 formulae and laws of epic narration, within the circle of which he had to
 dance, and he himself created new conventions for them that came after.
 This was the discipline of the Greek poets: first to impose upon
 themselves a manifold constraint by means of the earlier poets; then to
 invent in addition a new constraint, to impose it upon themselves and
 cheerfully to overcome it, so that constraint and victory are perceived
 and admired.
 
 
 
 
 141.
 
 
 AUTHORS' COPIOUSNESS.--The last quality that a good author acquires is
 copiousness: whoever has it to begin with will never become a good author.
 The noblest racehorses are lean until they are permitted to rest from
 their victories.
 
 
 
 
 142.
 
 
 WHEEZING HEROES.--Poets and artists who suffer from a narrow chest of the
 emotions generally make their heroes wheeze. They do not know what easy
 breathing means.
 
 
 
 
 143.
 
 
 THE SHORT-SIGHTED.(22)--The short-sighted are the deadly foes of all
 authors who let themselves go. These authors should know the wrath with
 which these people shut the book in which they observe that its creator
 needs fifty pages to express five ideas. And the cause of their wrath is
 that they have endangered what remains of their vision almost without
 compensation. A short-sighted person said, "All authors let themselves
 go." "Even the Holy Ghost?" "Even the Holy Ghost." But he had a right to,
 for he wrote for those who had lost their sight altogether.
 
 
 
 
 144.
 
 
 THE STYLE OF IMMORTALITY.--Thucydides and Tacitus both imagined immortal
 life for their works when they executed them. That might be guessed (if
 not known otherwise) from their style. The one thought to give permanence
 to his ideas by salting them, the other by boiling them down; and neither,
 it seems, made a miscalculation.
 
 
 
 
 145.
 
 
 AGAINST IMAGES AND SIMILES.--By images and similes we convince, but we do
 not prove. That is why science has such a horror of images and similes.
 Science does not want to convince or make plausible, and rather seeks to
 provoke cold distrust by its mode of expression, by the bareness of its
 walls. For distrust is the touchstone for the gold of certainty.
 
 
 
 
 146.
 
 
 CAUTION.--In Germany, he who lacks thorough knowledge should beware of
 writing. The good German does not say in that case "he is ignorant," but
 "he is of doubtful character."--This hasty conclusion, by the way, does
 great credit to the Germans.
 
 
 
 
 147.
 
 
 PAINTED SKELETONS.--Painted skeletons are those authors who try to make up
 for their want of flesh by artistic colourings.
 
 
 
 
 148.
 
 
 THE GRAND STYLE AND SOMETHING BETTER.--It is easier to learn how to write
 the grand style than how to write easily and simply. The reasons for this
 are inextricably bound up with morality.
 
 
 
 
 149.
 
 
 SEBASTIAN BACH.--In so far as we do not hear Bach's music as perfect and
 experienced connoisseurs of counterpoint and all the varieties of the
 fugal style (and accordingly must dispense with real artistic enjoyment),
 we shall feel in listening to his music--in Goethe's magnificent phrase--as
 if "we were present at God's creation of the world." In other words, we
 feel here that something great is in the making but not yet made--our
 mighty modern music, which by conquering nationalities, the Church, and
 counterpoint has conquered the world. In Bach there is still too much
 crude Christianity, crude Germanism, crude scholasticism. He stands on the
 threshold of modern European music, but turns from thence to look at the
 Middle Ages.
 
 
 
 
 150.
 
 
 HAeNDEL.--Haendel, who in the invention of his music was bold, original,
 truthful, powerful, inclined to and akin to all the heroism of which a
 _nation_ is capable, often proved stiff, cold, nay even weary of himself
 in composition. He applied a few well-tried methods of execution, wrote
 copiously and quickly, and was glad when he had finished--but that joy was
 not the joy of God and other creators in the eventide of their working
 day.
 
 
 
 
 151.
 
 
 HAYDN.--So far as genius can exist in a man who is merely _good_, Haydn had
 genius. He went just as far as the limit which morality sets to intellect,
 and only wrote music that has "no past."
 
 
 
 
 152.
 
 
 BEETHOVEN AND MOZART.--Beethoven's music often appears like a deeply
 emotional meditation on unexpectedly hearing once more a piece long
 thought to be forgotten, "Tonal Innocence": it is music about music. In
 the song of the beggar and child in the street, in the monotonous airs of
 vagrant Italians, in the dance of the village inn or in carnival nights he
 discovers his melodies. He stores them together like a bee, snatching here
 and there some notes or a short phrase. To him these are hallowed memories
 of "the better world," like the ideas of Plato.--Mozart stands in quite a
 different relation to his melodies. He finds his inspiration not in
 hearing music but in gazing at life, at the most stirring life of southern
 lands. He was always dreaming of Italy, when he was not there.
 
 
 
 
 153.
 
 
 RECITATIVE.--Formerly recitative was dry, but now we live in the age of
 moist recitative. It has fallen into the water, and the waves carry it
 whithersoever they list.
 
 
 
 
 154.
 
 
 "CHEERFUL" MUSIC.--If for a long time we have heard no music, it then goes
 like a heavy southern wine all too quickly into the blood and leaves
 behind it a soul dazed with narcotics, half-awake, longing for sleep. This
 is particularly the case with cheerful music, which inspires in us
 bitterness and pain, satiety and home-sickness together, and forces us to
 sip again and again as at a sweetened draught of poison. The hall of gay,
 noisy merriment then seems to grow narrow, the light to lose its
 brightness and become browner. At last we feel as if this music were
 penetrating to a prison where a poor wretch cannot sleep for
 home-sickness.
 
 
 
 
 155.
 
 
 FRANZ SCHUBERT.--Franz Schubert, inferior as an artist to the other great
 musicians, had nevertheless the largest share of inherited musical wealth.
 He spent it with a free hand and a kind heart, so that for a few centuries
 musicians will continue to _nibble_ at his ideas and inspirations. In his
 works we find a store of _unused_ inventions; the greatness of others will
 lie in making use of those inventions. If Beethoven may be called the
 ideal listener for a troubadour, Schubert has a right to be called the
 ideal troubadour.
 
 
 
 
 156.
 
 
 MODERN MUSICAL EXECUTION.--Great tragic or dramatic execution of music
 acquires its character by imitating the gesture of the great sinner, such
 as Christianity conceives and desires him: the slow-stepping, passionately
 brooding man, distracted by the agonies of conscience, now flying in
 terror, now clutching with delight, now standing still in despair--and all
 the other marks of great sinfulness. Only on the Christian assumption that
 all men are great sinners and do nothing but sin could we justify the
 application of this style of execution to _all_ music. So far, music would
 be the reflection of all the actions and impulses of man, and would
 continually have to express by gestures the language of the great sinner.
 At such a performance, a listener who was not enough of a Christian to
 understand this logic might indeed cry out in horror, "For the love of
 Heaven, how did sin find its way into music?"
 
 
 
 
 157.
 
 
 FELIX MENDELSSOHN.--Felix Mendelssohn's music is the music of the good
 taste that enjoys all the good things that have ever existed. It always
 points behind. How could it have much "in front," much of a future?--But
 did he want it to have a future? He possessed a virtue rare among artists,
 that of gratitude without _arriere-pensee_. This virtue, too, always
 points behind.
 
 
 
 
 158.
 
 
 A MOTHER OF ARTS.--In our sceptical age, real devotion requires almost a
 brutal heroism of ambition. Fanatical shutting of the eyes and bending of
 the knee no longer suffice. Would it not be possible for ambition--in its
 eagerness to be the last devotee of all the ages--to become the begetter of
 a final church music, as it has been the begetter of the final church
 architecture? (They call it the Jesuit style.)
 
 
 
 
 159.
 
 
 FREEDOM IN FETTERS--A PRINCELY FREEDOM.--Chopin, the last of the modern
 musicians, who gazed at and worshipped beauty, like Leopardi; Chopin, the
 Pole, the inimitable (none that came before or after him has a right to
 this name)--Chopin had the same princely punctilio in convention that
 Raphael shows in the use of the simplest traditional colours. The only
 difference is that Chopin applies them not to colour but to melodic and
 rhythmic traditions. He admitted the validity of these traditions because
 he was born under the sway of etiquette. But in these fetters he plays and
 dances as the freest and daintiest of spirits, and, be it observed, he
 does not spurn the chain.
 
 
 
 
 160.
 
 
 CHOPIN'S BARCAROLLE.--Almost all states and modes of life have a moment of
 rapture, and good artists know how to discover that moment. Such a moment
 there is even in life by the seashore--that dreary, sordid, unhealthy
 existence, dragged out in the neighbourhood of a noisy and covetous
 rabble. This moment of rapture Chopin in his Barcarolle expressed in sound
 so supremely that Gods themselves, when they heard it, might yearn to lie
 long summer evenings in a boat.
 
 
 
 
 161.
 
 
 ROBERT SCHUMANN.--"The Stripling," as the romantic songsters of Germany and
 France of the first three decades of this century imagined him--this
 stripling was completely translated into song and melody by Robert
 Schumann, the eternal youth, so long as he felt himself in full possession
 of his powers. There are indeed moments when his music reminds one of the
 eternal "old maid."
 
 
 
 
 162.
 
 
 DRAMATIC SINGERS.--"Why does this beggar sing?" "Probably he does not know
 how to wail." "Then he does right." But our dramatic singers, who wail
 because they do not know how to sing--are they also in the right?
 
 
 
 
 163.
 
 
 DRAMATIC MUSIC.--For him who does not see what is happening on the stage,
 dramatic music is a monstrosity, just as the running commentary to a lost
 text is a monstrosity. Such music requires us to have ears where our eyes
 are. This, however, is doing violence to Euterpe, who, poor Muse, wants to
 have her eyes and ears where the other Muses have theirs.
 
 
 
 
 164.
 
 
 VICTORY AND REASONABLENESS.--Unfortunately in the aesthetic wars, which
 artists provoke by their works and apologias for their works, just as is
 the case in real war, it is might and not reason that decides. All the
 world now assumes as a historical fact that, in his dispute with Piccini,
 Gluck was in the right. At any rate, he was victorious, and had might on
 his side.
 
 
 
 
 165.
 
 
 OF THE PRINCIPLE OF MUSICAL EXECUTION.--Do the modern musical performers
 really believe that the supreme law of their art is to give every piece as
 much high-relief as is possible, and to make it speak at all costs a
 dramatic language? Is not this principle, when applied for example to
 Mozart, a veritable sin against the spirit--the gay, sunny, airy, delicate
 spirit--of Mozart, whose seriousness was of a kindly and not awe-inspiring
 order, whose pictures do not try to leap from the wall and drive away the
 beholder in panic? Or do you think that all Mozart's music is identical
 with the statue-music in _Don Juan_? And not only Mozart's, but all
 music?--You reply that the advantage of your principle lies in its greater
 _effect_. You would be right if there did not remain the counter-question,
 "_On whom_ has the effect operated, and _on whom_ should an artist of the
 first rank desire to produce his effect?" Never on the populace! Never on
 the immature! Never on the morbidly sensitive! Never on the diseased! And
 above all--never on the _blase_!
 
 
 
 
 166.
 
 
 THE MUSIC OF TO-DAY.--This ultra-modern music, with its strong lungs and
 weak nerves, is frightened above all things of itself.
 
 
 
 
 167.
 
 
 WHERE MUSIC IS AT HOME.--Music reaches its high-water mark only among men
 who have not the ability or the right to argue. Accordingly, its chief
 promoters are princes, whose aim is that there should be not much
 criticism nor even much thought in their neighbourhood. Next come
 societies which, under some pressure or other (political or religious),
 are forced to become habituated to silence, and so feel all the greater
 need of spells to charm away emotional ennui--these spells being generally
 eternal love-making and eternal music. Thirdly, we must reckon whole
 nations in which there is no "society," but all the greater number of
 individuals with a bent towards solitude, mystical thinking, and a
 reverence for all that is inexpressible; these are the genuine "musical
 souls." The Greeks, as a nation delighting in talking and argument,
 accordingly put up with music only as an _hors d'oeuvre_ to those arts
 which really admit of discussion and dispute. About music one can hardly
 even _think_ clearly. The Pythagoreans, who in so many respects were
 exceptional Greeks, are said to have been great musicians. This was the
 school that invented a five-years' silence,(23) but did not invent a
 dialectic.
 
 
 
 
 168.
 
 
 SENTIMENTALITY IN MUSIC.--We may be ever so much in sympathy with serious
 and profound music, yet nevertheless, or perhaps all the more for that
 reason, we shall at occasional moments be overpowered, entranced, and
 almost melted away by its opposite--I mean, by those simple Italian
 operatic airs which, in spite of all their monotony of rhythm and
 childishness of harmony, seem at times to sing to us like the very soul of
 music. Admit this or not as you please, you Pharisees of good taste, it is
 so, and it is my present task to propound the riddle that it is so, and to
 nibble a little myself at the solution.--In childhood's days we tasted the
 honey of many things for the first time. Never was honey so good as then;
 it seduced us to life, into abundant life, in the guise of the first
 spring, the first flower, the first butterfly, the first friendship.
 Then--perhaps in our ninth year or so--we heard our first music, and this
 was the first that we understood; thus the simplest and most childish
 tunes, that were not much more than a sequel to the nurse's lullaby and
 the strolling fiddler's tune, were our first experience. (For even the
 most trifling "revelations" of art need preparation and study; there is no
 "immediate" effect of art, whatever charming fables the philosophers may
 tell.) Our sensation on hearing these Italian airs is associated with
 those first musical raptures, the strongest of our lives. The bliss of
 childhood and its flight, the feeling that our most precious possession
 can never be brought back, all this moves the chords of the soul more
 strongly than the most serious and profound music can move them.--This
 mingling of aesthetic pleasure with moral pain, which nowadays it is
 customary to call (rather too haughtily, I think) "sentimentality"--it is
 the mood of Faust at the end of the first scene--this "sentimentality" of
 the listener is all to the advantage of Italian music. It is a feeling
 which the experienced connoisseurs in art, the pure "aesthetes," like to
 ignore.--Moreover, almost all music has a magical effect only when we hear
 it speak the language of our own _past_. Accordingly, it seems to the
 layman that all the old music is continually growing better, and that all
 the latest is of little value. For the latter arouses no "sentimentality,"
 that most essential element of happiness, as aforesaid, for every man who
 cannot approach this art with pure aesthetic enjoyment.
 
 
 
 
 169.
 
 
 AS FRIENDS OF MUSIC.--Ultimately we are and remain good friends with music,
 as we are with the light of the moon. Neither, after all, tries to
 supplant the sun: they only want to illumine our nights to the best of
 their powers. Yet we may jest and laugh at them, may we not? Just a
 little, at least, and from time to time? At the man in the moon, at the
 woman in the music?
 
 
 
 
 170.
 
 
 ART IN AN AGE OF WORK.--We have the conscience of an industrious epoch.
 This debars us from devoting our best hours and the best part of our days
 to art, even though that art be the greatest and worthiest. Art is for us
 a matter of leisure, of recreation, and we consecrate to it the _residue_
 of our time and strength. This is the cardinal fact that has altered the
 relation of art to life. When art makes its great demands of time and
 strength upon its recipients, it has to battle against the conscience of
 the industrious and efficient, it is relegated to the idle and
 conscienceless, who, by their very nature, are not exactly suited to great
 art, and consider its claims arrogant. It might, therefore, be all over
 with art, since it lacks air and the power to breathe. But perhaps the
 great art attempts, by a sort of coarsening and disguising, to make itself
 at home in that other atmosphere, or at least to put up with it--an
 atmosphere which is really a natural element only for petty art, the art
 of recreation, of pleasant distraction. This happens nowadays almost
 everywhere. Even the exponents of great art promise recreation and
 distraction; even they address themselves to the exhausted; even they
 demand from him the evening hours of his working-day--just like the artists
 of the entertaining school, who are content to smooth the furrowed brow
 and brighten the lack-lustre eye. What, then, are the devices of their
 mightier brethren? These have in their medicine-chests the most powerful
 excitants, which might give a shock even to a man half-dead: they can
 deafen you, intoxicate you, make you shudder, or bring tears to your eyes.
 By this means they overpower the exhausted man and stimulate him for one
 night to an over-lively condition, to an ecstasy of terror and delight.
 This great art, as it now lives in opera, tragedy, and music--have we a
 right to be angry with it, because of its perilous fascination, as we
 should be angry with a cunning courtesan? Certainly not. It would far
 rather live in the pure element of morning calm, and would far rather make
 its appeal to the fresh, expectant, vigorous morning-soul of the beholder
 or listener. Let us be thankful that it prefers living thus to vanishing
 altogether. But let us also confess that an era that once more introduces
 free and complete high-days and holidays into life will have no use for
 _our_ great art.
 
 
 
 
 171.
 
 
 THE EMPLOYEES OF SCIENCE AND THE OTHERS.--Really efficient and successful
 men of science might be collectively called "The Employees." If in youth
 their acumen is sufficiently practised, their memory is full, and hand and
 eye have acquired sureness, they are appointed by an older
 fellow-craftsman to a scientific position where their qualities may prove
 useful. Later on, when they have themselves gained an eye for the gaps and
 defects in their science, they place themselves in whatever position they
 are needed. These persons all exist for the sake of science. But there are
 rarer spirits, spirits that seldom succeed or fully mature--"for whose sake
 science exists"--at least, in their view. They are often unpleasant,
 conceited, or cross-grained men, but almost always prodigies to a certain
 extent. They are neither employees nor employers; they make use of what
 those others have worked out and established, with a certain princely
 carelessness and with little and rare praise--just as if the others
 belonged to a lower order of beings. Yet they possess the same qualities
 as their fellow-workers, and that sometimes in a less developed form.
 Moreover, they have a peculiar limitation, from which the others are free;
 this makes it impossible to put them into a place and to see in them
 useful tools. They can only live in their own air and on their own soil.
 This limitation suggests to them what elements of a science "are
 theirs"--in other words, what they can carry home into their house and
 atmosphere: they think that they are always collecting their scattered
 "property." If they are prevented from building at their own nest, they
 perish like shelterless birds. The loss of freedom causes them to wilt
 away. If they show, like their colleagues, a fondness for certain regions
 of science, it is always only regions where the fruits and seeds necessary
 to them can thrive. What do they care whether science, taken as a whole,
 has untilled or badly tilled regions? They lack all impersonal interest in
 a scientific problem. As they are themselves personal through and through,
 all their knowledge and ideas are remoulded into a person, into a living
 complexity, with its parts interdependent, overlapping, jointly nurtured,
 and with a peculiar atmosphere and scent as a whole.--Such natures, with
 their system of personal knowledge, produce the illusion that a science
 (or even the whole of philosophy) is finished and has reached its goal.
 The life in their system works this magic, which at times has been fatal
 to science and deceptive to the really efficient workers above described,
 and at other times, when drought and exhaustion prevailed, has acted as a
 kind of restorative, as if it were the air of a cool, refreshing
 resting-place.--These men are usually called _philosophers_.
 
 
 
 
 172.
 
 
 RECOGNITION OF TALENT.--As I went through the village of S., a boy began to
 crack his whip with all his might--he had made great progress in this art,
 and he knew it. I threw him a look of recognition--in reality it hurt me
 cruelly. We do the same in our recognition of many of the talents. We do
 good to them when they hurt us.
 
 
 
 
 173.
 
 
 LAUGHING AND SMILING.--The more joyful and assured the mind becomes, the
 more man loses the habit of loud laughter. In compensation, there is an
 intellectual smile continually bubbling up in him, a sign of his
 astonishment at the innumerable concealed delights of a good existence.
 
 
 
 
 174.
 
 
 THE TALK OF INVALIDS.--Just as in spiritual grief we tear our hair, strike
 our foreheads, lacerate our cheeks or even (like OEdipus) gouge our eyes
 out, so against violent physical pain we call to our aid a bitter, violent
 emotion, through the recollection of slanderous and malignant people,
 through the denigration of our future, through the sword-pricks and acts
 of malice which we mentally direct against the absent. And at times it is
 true that one devil drives out another--but then we have the other.--Hence a
 different sort of talk, tending to alleviate pain, should be recommended
 invalids: reflections upon the kindnesses and courtesies that can be
 performed towards friend and foe.
 
 
 
 
 175.
 
 
 MEDIOCRITY AS A MASK.--Mediocrity is the happiest mask which the superior
 mind can wear, because it does not lead the great majority--that is, the
 mediocre--to think that there is any disguise. Yet the superior mind
 assumes the mask just for their sake--so as not to irritate them, nay,
 often from a feeling of pity and kindness.
 
 
 
 
 176.
 
 
 THE PATIENT.--The pine tree seems to listen, the fir tree to wait, and both
 without impatience. They do not give a thought to the petty human being
 below who is consumed by his impatience and his curiosity.
 
 
 
 
 177.
 
 
 THE BEST JOKER.--My favourite joke is the one that takes the place of a
 heavy and rather hesitating idea, and that at once beckons with its finger
 and winks its eye.
 
 
 
 
 178.
 
 
 THE ACCESSARIES OF ALL REVERENCE.--Wherever the past is revered, the
 over-cleanly and over-tidy people should not be admitted. Piety does not
 feel content without a little dust, dirt, and dross.
 
 
 
 
 179.
 
 
 THE GREAT DANGER OF SAVANTS.--It is just the most thorough and profound
 savants who are in peril of seeing their life's goal set ever lower and
 lower, and, with a feeling of this in their minds, to become ever more
 discouraged and more unendurable in the latter half of their lives. At
 first they plunge into their science with spacious hopes and set
 themselves daring tasks, the ends of which are already anticipated by
 their imaginations. Then there are moments as in the lives of the great
 maritime discoverers--knowledge, presentiment, and power raise each other
 higher and higher, until a new shore first dawns upon the eye in the far
 distance. But now the stern man recognises more and more how important it
 is that the individual task of the inquirer should be limited as far as
 possible, so that it may be entirely accomplished and the intolerable
 waste of force from which earlier periods of science suffered may be
 avoided. In those days everything was done ten times over, and then the
 eleventh always had the last and best word. Yet the more the savant learns
 and practises this art of solving riddles in their entirety, the more
 pleasure he finds in so doing. But at the same time his demands upon what
 is here called "entirety" grow more exacting. He sets aside everything
 that must remain in this sense incomplete, he acquires a disgust and an
 acute scent for the half-soluble--for all that can only give a kind of
 certainty in a general and indefinite form. His youthful plans crumble
 away before his eyes. There remains scarcely anything but a few little
 knots, in untying which the master now takes his pleasure and shows his
 strength. Then, in the midst of all this useful, restless activity, he,
 now grown old, is suddenly then often overcome by a deep misgiving, a sort
 of torment of conscience. He looks upon himself as one changed, as if he
 were diminished, humbled, transformed into a dexterous _dwarf_; he grows
 anxious as to whether mastery in small matters be not a convenience, an
 escape from the summons to greatness in life and form. But he cannot pass
 _beyond_ any longer--the time for that has gone by.
 
 
 
 
 180.
 
 
 TEACHERS IN THE AGE OF BOOKS.--Now that self-education and mutual education
 are becoming more widespread, the teacher in his usual form must become
 almost unnecessary. Friends eager to learn, who wish to master some branch
 of knowledge together, find in our age of books a shorter and more natural
 way than "school" and "teachers."
 
 
 
 
 181.
 
 
 VANITY AS THE GREATEST UTILITY.--Originally the strong individual uses not
 only Nature but even societies and weaker individuals as objects of
 rapine. He exploits them, so far as he can, and then passes on. As he
 lives from hand to mouth, alternating between hunger and superfluity, he
 kills more animals than he can eat, and robs and maltreats men more than
 is necessary. His manifestation of power is at the same time one of
 revenge against his cramped and worried existence. Furthermore, he wishes
 to be held more powerful than he is, and thus misuses opportunities; the
 accretion of fear that he begets being an accretion of power. He soon
 observes that he stands or falls not by what he _is_ but by what he is
 _thought_ to be. Herein lies the origin of vanity. The man of power seeks
 by every means to increase others' faith in his power.--The thralls who
 tremble before him and serve him know, for their part, that they are worth
 just so much as they appear to him to be worth, and so they work with an
 eye to this valuation rather than to their own self-satisfaction. We know
 vanity only in its most weakened forms, in its idealisations and its small
 doses, because we live in a late and very emasculated state of society.
 Originally vanity is the great utility, the strongest means of
 preservation. And indeed vanity will be greater, the cleverer the
 individual, because an increase in the belief in power is easier than an
 increase in the power itself, but only for him who has intellect or (as
 must be the case under primitive conditions) who is cunning and crafty.
 
 
 
 
 182.
 
 
 WEATHER-SIGNS OF CULTURE.--There are so few decisive weather-signs of
 culture that we must be glad to have at least one unfailing sign at hand
 for use in house and garden. To test whether a man belongs to us (I mean
 to the free spirits) or not, we must test his sentiments regarding
 Christianity. If he looks upon Christianity with other than a critical
 eye, we turn our backs to him, for he brings us impure air and bad
 weather.--It is no longer our task to teach such men what a sirocco wind
 is. They have Moses and the prophets of weather and of enlightenment.(24)
 If they will not listen to these, then----
 
 
 
 
 183.
 
 
 THERE IS A PROPER TIME FOR WRATH AND PUNISHMENT.--Wrath and punishment are
 our inheritance from the animals. Man does not become of age until he has
 restored to the animals this gift of the cradle.--Herein lies buried one of
 the mightiest ideas that men can have, the idea of a progress of all
 progresses.--Let us go forward together a few millenniums, my friends!
 There is still reserved for mankind a great deal of joy, the very scent of
 which has not yet been wafted to the men of our day! Indeed, we may
 promise ourselves this joy, nay summon and conjure it up as a necessary
 thing, so long as the development of human reason does not stand still.
 Some day we shall no longer be reconciled to the logical sin that lurks in
 all wrath and punishment, whether exercised by the individual or by
 society--some day, when head and heart have learnt to live as near together
 as they now are far apart. That they no longer stand so far apart as they
 did originally is fairly palpable from a glance at the whole course of
 humanity. The individual who can review a life of introspective work will
 become conscious of the _rapprochement_ arrived at, with a proud delight
 at the distance he has bridged, in order that he may thereupon venture
 upon more ample hopes.
 
 
 
 
 184.
 
 
 ORIGIN OF PESSIMISTS.--A snack of good food often decides whether we are to
 look to the future with hollow eye or in hopeful mood. The same influence
 extends to the very highest and most intellectual states. Discontent and
 reviling of the world are for the present generation an inheritance from
 starveling ancestors. Even in our artists and poets we often notice that,
 however exuberant their life, they are not of good birth, and have often,
 from oppressed and ill-nourished ancestors, inherited in their blood and
 brain much that comes out as the subject and even the conscious colouring
 of their work. The culture of the Greeks is a culture of men of wealth, in
 fact, inherited wealth. For a few centuries they lived better than we do
 (better in every sense, in particular far more simply in food and drink).
 Then the brain finally became so well-stored and subtle, and the blood
 flowed so quickly, like a joyous, clear wine, that the best in them came
 to light no longer as gloomy, distorted, and violent, but full of beauty
 and sunshine.
 
 
 
 
 185.
 
 
 OF REASONABLE DEATH.--Which is more reasonable, to stop the machine when
 the works have done the task demanded of them, or to let it run on until
 it stands still of its own accord--in other words, is destroyed? Is not the
 latter a waste of the cost of upkeep, a misuse of the strength and care of
 those who serve? Are men not here throwing away that which would be sorely
 needed elsewhere? Is not a kind of contempt of the machines propagated, in
 that many of them are so uselessly tended and kept up?--I am speaking of
 involuntary (natural) and voluntary (reasonable) death. Natural death is
 independent of all reason and is really an irrational death, in which the
 pitiable substance of the shell determines how long the kernel is to exist
 or not; in which, accordingly, the stunted, diseased and dull-witted
 jailer is lord, and indicates the moment at which his distinguished
 prisoner shall die. Natural death is the suicide of nature--in other words,
 the annihilation of the most rational being through the most irrational
 element that is attached thereto. Only through religious illumination can
 the reverse appear; for then, as is equitable, the higher reason (God)
 issues its orders, which the lower reason has to obey. Outside religious
 thought natural death is not worth glorifying. The wise dispensation and
 disposal of death belongs to that now quite incomprehensible and
 immoral-sounding morality of the future, the dawn of which it will be an
 ineffable delight to behold.
 
 
 
 
 186.
 
 
 RETROGRADE INFLUENCES.--All criminals force society back to earlier stages
 of culture than that in which they are placed for the time being. Their
 influence is retrograde. Let us consider the tools that society must forge
 and maintain for its defence: the cunning detectives, the jailers, the
 hangmen. Nor should we forget the public counsel for prosecution and
 defence. Finally we may ask ourselves whether the judge himself and
 punishment and the whole legal procedure are not oppressive rather than
 elevating in their reaction upon all who are not law-breakers. For we
 shall never succeed in arraying self-defence and revenge in the garb of
 innocence, and so long as men are used and sacrificed as a means to the
 end of society, all loftier humanity will deplore this necessity.
 
 
 
 
 187.
 
 
 WAR AS A REMEDY.--For nations that are growing weak and contemptible war
 may be prescribed as a remedy, if indeed they really want to go on living.
 National consumption as well as individual admits of a brutal cure. The
 eternal will to live and inability to die is, however, in itself already a
 sign of senility of emotion. The more fully and thoroughly we live, the
 more ready we are to sacrifice life for a single pleasurable emotion. A
 people that lives and feels in this wise has no need of war.
 
 
 
 
 188.
 
 
 INTELLECTUAL AND PHYSICAL TRANSPLANTATION AS REMEDIES.--The different
 cultures are so many intellectual climates, every one of which is
 peculiarly harmful or beneficial to this or that organism. History as a
 whole, as the knowledge of different cultures, is the science of remedies,
 but not the science of the healing art itself. We still need a physician
 who can make use of these remedies, in order to send every one--temporarily
 or permanently--to the climate that just suits him. To live in the present,
 within the limits of a single culture, is insufficient as a universal
 remedy: too many highly useful kinds of men, who cannot breathe freely in
 this atmosphere, would perish. With the aid of history we must give them
 air and try to preserve them: even men of lower cultures have their
 value.--Add to this cure of intellects that humanity, on considerations of
 bodily health, must strive to discover by means of a medical geography
 what kinds of degeneration and disease are caused by each region of the
 earth, and conversely, what ingredients of health the earth affords: and
 then, gradually, nations, families, and individuals must be transplanted
 long and permanently enough for them to become masters of their inherited
 physical infirmities. The whole world will finally be a series of
 sanatoria.
 
 
 
 
 189.
 
 
 REASON AND THE TREE OF MANKIND.--What you all fear in your senile
 short-sightedness, regarding the over-population of the world, gives the
 more hopeful a mighty task. Man is some day to become a tree overshadowing
 the whole earth, with millions upon millions of buds that shall all grow
 to fruits side by side, and the earth itself shall be prepared for the
 nourishment of this tree. That the shoot, tiny as yet, may increase in sap
 and strength; that the sap may flow in countless channels for the
 nutrition of the whole and the parts--from these and similar tasks we must
 derive our standard for measuring whether a man of to-day is useful or
 worthless. The task is unspeakably great and adventurous: let us all
 contribute our share to prevent the tree from rotting before its time! The
 historically trained mind will no doubt succeed in calling up the human
 activities of all the ages before its eyes, as the community of ants with
 its cunningly wrought mounds stands before our eyes. Superficially judged,
 mankind as a whole, like ant-kind, might admit of our speaking of
 "instinct." On a closer examination we observe how whole nations, nay
 whole centuries, take pains to discover and test new means of benefiting
 the great mass of humanity, and thus finally the great common fruit-tree
 of the world. Whatever injury the individual nations or periods may suffer
 in this testing process, they have each become wise through this injury,
 and from them the tide of wisdom slowly pours over the principles of whole
 races and whole epochs. Ants too go astray and make blunders. Through the
 folly of its remedies, mankind may well go to rack and ruin before the
 proper time. There is no sure guiding instinct for the former or the
 latter. Rather must we boldly face the great task of preparing the earth
 for a plant of the most ample and joyous fruitfulness--a task set by reason
 to reason!
 
 
 
 
 190.
 
 
 THE PRAISE OF DISINTERESTEDNESS AND ITS ORIGIN.--Between two neighbouring
 chieftains there was a long-standing quarrel: they laid waste each other's
 territories, stole cattle, and burnt down houses, with an indecisive
 result on the whole, because their power was fairly equal. A third, who
 from the distant situation of his property was able to keep aloof from
 these feuds, yet had reason to dread the day when one of the two
 neighbours should gain a decisive preponderance, at last intervened
 between the combatants with ceremonial goodwill. Secretly he lent a heavy
 weight to his peace proposal by giving either to understand that he would
 henceforth join forces with the other against the one who strove to break
 the peace. They met in his presence, they hesitatingly placed into his
 hand the hands that had hitherto been the tools and only too often the
 causes of hatred--and then they really and seriously tried to keep the
 peace. Either saw with astonishment how suddenly his prosperity and his
 comfort increased; how he now had as neighbour a dealer ready to buy and
 sell instead of a treacherous or openly scornful evil-doer; how even, in
 unforeseen troubles, they could reciprocally save each other from
 distress, instead of, as before, making capital out of this distress of
 his neighbour and enhancing it to the highest degree. It even seemed as if
 the human type had improved in both countries, for the eyes had become
 brighter, the forehead had lost its wrinkles; all now felt confidence in
 the future--and nothing is more advantageous for the souls and bodies of
 men than this confidence. They saw each other every year on the
 anniversary of the alliance, the chieftains as well as their retinue, and
 indeed before the eyes of the mediator, whose mode of action they admired
 and revered more and more, the greater the profit that they owed to him
 became. Then his mode of action was called _disinterested_. They had
 looked far too fixedly at the profit they had reaped themselves hitherto
 to see anything more of their neighbour's method of dealing than that his
 condition in consequence of this had not altered so much as their own; he
 had rather remained the same: and thus it appeared that the former had not
 had his profit in view. For the first time people said to themselves that
 disinterestedness was a virtue. It is true that in minor private matters
 similar circumstances had arisen, but men only had eyes for this virtue
 when it was depicted on the walls in a large script that was legible to
 the whole community. Moral qualities are not recognised as virtues,
 endowed with names, held in esteem, and recommended as worthy of
 acquisition until the moment when they have _visibly_ decided the
 happiness and destiny of whole societies. For then the loftiness of
 sentiment and the excitation of the inner creative forces is in many so
 great, that offerings are brought to this quality, offerings from the best
 of what each possesses. At its feet the serious man lays his seriousness,
 the dignified man his dignity, women their gentleness, the young all the
 wealth of hope and futurity that in them lies; the poet lends it words and
 names, sets it marching in the procession of similar beings, gives it a
 pedigree, and finally, as is the way of artists, adores the picture of his
 fancy as a new godhead--he even teaches others to adore. Thus in the end,
 with the co-operation of universal love and gratitude, a virtue becomes,
 like a statue, a repository of all that is good and honourable, a sort of
 temple and divine personage combined. It appears thenceforward as an
 individual virtue, as an absolute entity, which it was not before, and
 exercises the power and privileges of a sanctified super-humanity.--In the
 later days of Greece the cities were full of such deified human
 abstractions (if one may so call them). The nation, in its own fashion,
 had set up a Platonic "Heaven of Ideas" on earth, and I do not think that
 its inhabitants were felt to be less alive than any of the old Homeric
 divinities.
 
 
 
 
 191.
 
 
 DAYS OF DARKNESS.--"Days of Darkness" is the name given in Norway to the
 period when the sun remains below the horizon the whole day long. The
 temperature then falls slowly but continually.--A fine simile for all
 thinkers for whom the sun of the human future is temporarily eclipsed.
 
 
 
 
 192.
 
 
 THE PHILOSOPHY OF LUXURY.--A garden, figs, a little cheese, and three or
 four good friends--that was the luxury of Epicurus.
 
 
 
 
 193.
 
 
 THE EPOCHS OF LIFE.--The real epochs of life are those brief periods of
 cessation midway between the rise and decline of a dominating idea or
 emotion. Here once again there is satisfaction: all the rest is hunger and
 thirst--or satiety.
 
 
 
 
 194.
 
 
 DREAMS.--Our dreams, if for once in a way they succeed and are
 complete--generally a dream is a bungled piece of work--are symbolic
 concatenations of scenes and images in place of a narrative poetical
 language. They paraphrase our experiences or expectations or relations
 with poetic boldness and definiteness, so that in the morning we are
 always astonished at ourselves when we remember the nature of our dream.
 In dreams we use up too much artistry--and hence are often too poor in
 artistry in the daytime.
 
 
 
 
 195.
 
 
 NATURE AND SCIENCE.--As in nature, so in science the worse and less fertile
 soils are first cultivated--because the means that science in its early
 stages has at command are fairly sufficient for this purpose. The working
 of the most fertile soils requires an enormous, carefully developed,
 persevering method, tangible individual results, and an organised body of
 well-trained workers. All these are found together only at a late
 stage.--Impatience and ambition often grasp too early at these most fertile
 soils, but the results are then from the first null and void. In nature
 such losses would usually be avenged by the starvation of the settlers.
 
 
 
 
 196.
 
 
 THE SIMPLE LIFE.--A simple mode of life is nowadays difficult, requiring as
 it does far more reflection and gift for invention than even very clever
 people possess. The most honourable will perhaps still say, "I have not
 the time for such lengthy reflection. The simple life is for me too lofty
 a goal: I will wait till those wiser than I have discovered it."
 
 
 
 
 197.
 
 
 PEAKS AND NEEDLE-POINTS.--The poor fertility, the frequent celibacy, and in
 general the sexual coldness of the highest and most cultivated spirits, as
 that of the classes to which they belong, is essential in human economy.
 Intelligence recognises and makes use of the fact that at an acme of
 intellectual development the danger of a neurotic offspring is very great.
 Such men are the peaks of mankind--they ought no longer to run out into
 needle-points.
 
 
 
 
 198.
 
 
 _NATURA NON FACIT SALTUM._--However strongly man may develop upwards and
 seem to leap from one contradiction to another, a close observation will
 reveal the dovetails where the new building grows out of the old. This is
 the biographer's task: he must reflect upon his subject on the principle
 that nature takes no jumps.
 
 
 
 
 199.
 
 
 CLEAN, BUT--He who clothes himself with rags washed clean dresses cleanly,
 to be sure, but is still ragged.
 
 
 
 
 200.
 
 
 THE SOLITARY SPEAKS.--In compensation for much disgust, disheartenment,
 boredom--such as a lonely life without friends, books, duties, and passions
 must involve--we enjoy those short spans of deep communion with ourselves
 and with Nature. He who fortifies himself completely against boredom
 fortifies himself against himself too. He will never drink the most
 powerful elixir from his own innermost spring.
 
 
 
 
 201.
 
 
 FALSE RENOWN.--I hate those so-called natural beauties which really have
 significance only through science, especially geographical science, but
 are insignificant in an aesthetic sense: for example, the view of Mont
 Blanc from Geneva. This is an insignificant thing without the auxiliary
 mental joy of science: the nearer mountains are all more beautiful and
 fuller of expression, but "not nearly so high," adds that absurd
 depreciatory science. The eye here contradicts science: how can it truly
 rejoice in the contradiction?
 
 
 
 
 202.
 
 
 THOSE THAT TRAVEL FOR PLEASURE.--Like animals, stupid and perspiring, they
 climb mountains: people forgot to tell them that there were fine views on
 the way.
 
 
 
 
 203.
 
 
 TOO MUCH AND TOO LITTLE.--Men nowadays live too much and think too little.
 They have hunger and dyspepsia together, and become thinner and thinner,
 however much they eat. He who now says "Nothing has happened to me" is a
 blockhead.
 
 
 
 
 204.
 
 
 END AND GOAL.--Not every end is the goal. The end of a melody is not its
 goal, and yet if a melody has not reached its end, it has also not reached
 its goal. A parable.
 
 
 
 
 205.
 
 
 NEUTRALITY OF NATURE ON A GRAND SCALE.--The neutrality of Nature on a grand
 scale (in mountain, sea, forest, and desert) is pleasing, but only for a
 brief space. Afterwards we become impatient. "Have they all nothing to say
 to _us_? Do _we_ not exist so far as they are concerned?" There arises a
 feeling that a _lese-majeste_ is committed against humanity.
 
 
 
 
 206.
 
 
 FORGETTING OUR PURPOSE.--In a journey we commonly forget its goal. Almost
 every vocation is chosen and entered upon as means to an end, but is
 continued as the ultimate end. Forgetting our purpose is the most frequent
 form of folly.
 
 
 
 
 207.
 
 
 SOLAR ORBIT OF AN IDEA.--When an idea is just rising on the horizon, the
 soul's temperature is usually very low. Gradually the idea develops in
 warmth, and is hottest (that is to say, exerts its greatest influence)
 when belief in the idea is already on the wane.
 
 
 
 
 208.
 
 
 HOW TO HAVE EVERY MAN AGAINST YOU.--If some one now dared to say, "He that
 is not for me is against me," he would at once have all against him.--This
 sentiment does credit to our era.
 
 
 
 
 209.
 
 
 BEING ASHAMED OF WEALTH.--Our age endures only a single species of rich
 men--those who are ashamed of their wealth. If we hear it said of any one
 that he is very rich, we at once feel a similar sentiment to that
 experienced at the sight of a repulsively swollen invalid, one suffering
 from diabetes or dropsy. We must with an effort remember our humanity, in
 order to go about with this rich man in such a way that he does not notice
 our feeling of disgust. But as soon as he prides himself at all on his
 wealth, our feelings are mingled with an almost compassionate surprise at
 such a high degree of human unreason. We would fain raise our hands to
 heaven and cry, "Poor deformed and overburdened creature, fettered a
 hundredfold, to whom every hour brings or may bring something unpleasant,
 in whose frame twitches every event that occurs in scores of countries,
 how can you make us believe that you feel at ease in your position? If you
 appear anywhere in public, we know that it is a sort of running the
 gauntlet amid countless glances that have for you only cold hate or
 importunity or silent scorn. You may earn more easily than others, but it
 is only a superfluous earning, which brings little joy, and the guarding
 of what you have earned is now, at any rate, a more troublesome business
 than any toilsome process of earning. You are continually suffering,
 because you are continually losing. What avails it you that they are
 always injecting you with fresh artificial blood? That does not relieve
 the pain of those cupping-glasses that are fixed, for ever fixed, on your
 neck!--But, to be quite fair to you, it is difficult or perhaps impossible
 for you _not_ to be rich. You _must_ guard, you _must_ earn more; the
 inherited bent of your character is the yoke fastened upon you. But do not
 on that account deceive us--be honestly and visibly ashamed of the yoke you
 wear, as in your soul you are weary and unwilling to wear it. This shame
 is no disgrace."
 
 
 
 
 210.
 
 
 EXTRAVAGANT PRESUMPTIONS.--There are men so presumptuous that they can only
 praise a greatness which they publicly admire by representing it as steps
 and bridges that lead to themselves.
 
 
 
 
 211.
 
 
 ON THE SOIL OF INSULT.--He who wishes to deprive men of a conception is
 generally not satisfied with refuting it and drawing out of it the
 illogical worm that resides within. Rather, when the worm has been killed,
 does he throw the whole fruit as well into the mire, in order to make it
 ignoble in men's sight and to inspire disgust. Thus he thinks that he has
 found a means of making the usual "third-day resurrection" of conceptions
 an impossibility.--He is wrong, for on the very soil of insult, in the
 midst of the filth, the kernel of the conception soon produces new
 seeds.--The right thing then, is not to scorn and bespatter what one wishes
 finally to remove, but to lay it tenderly on ice again and again, having
 regard to the fact that conceptions are very tenacious of life. Here we
 must act according to the maxim: "One refutation is no refutation."
 
 
 
 
 212.
 
 
 THE LOT OF MORALITY.--Since spiritual bondage is being relaxed, morality
 (the inherited, traditional, instinctive mode of action in accordance with
 moral sentiments) is surely also on the decline. This, however, is not the
 case with the individual virtues, moderation, justice, repose; for the
 greatest freedom of the conscious intellect leads at some time, even
 unconsciously, back to these virtues, and then enjoins their practice as
 expedient.
 
 
 
 
 213.
 
 
 THE FANATIC OF DISTRUST AND HIS SURETY.--_The Elder_: You wish to make the
 tremendous venture and instruct mankind in the great things? What is your
 surety?
 
 _Pyrrho_: It is this: I intend to warn men against myself; I intend to
 confess all the defects of my character quite openly, and reveal to the
 world my hasty conclusions, my contradictions, and my foolish blunders.
 "Do not listen to me," I will say to them, "until I have become equal to
 the meanest among you, nay am even less than he. Struggle against truth as
 long as you can, from your disgust with her advocate. I shall be your
 seducer and betrayer if you find in me the slightest glimmering of
 respectability and dignity."
 
 _The Elder_: You promise too much; you cannot bear this burden.
 
 _Pyrrho_: Then I will tell men even that, and say that I am too weak, and
 cannot keep my promise. The greater my unworthiness, the more will they
 mistrust the truth, when it passes through my lips.
 
 _The Elder_: You propose to teach distrust of truth?
 
 _Pyrrho_: Yes; distrust as it never was yet on earth, distrust of anything
 and everything. This is the only road to truth. The right eye must not
 trust the left eye, and for some time light must be called darkness: this
 is the path that you must tread. Do not imagine that it will lead you to
 fruit trees and fair pastures. You will find on this road little hard
 grains--these are truths. For years and years you will have to swallow
 handfuls of lies, so as not to die of hunger, although you know that they
 are lies. But those grains will be sown and planted, and perhaps, perhaps
 some day will come the harvest. No one may _promise_ that day, unless he
 be a fanatic.
 
 _The Elder_: Friend, friend! Your words too are those of a fanatic!
 
 _Pyrrho_: You are right! I will be distrustful of all words.
 
 _The Elder_: Then you will have to be silent.
 
 _Pyrrho_: I shall tell men that I have to be silent, and that they are to
 mistrust my silence.
 
 _The Elder_: So you draw back from your undertaking?
 
 _Pyrrho_: On the contrary--you have shown me the door through which I must
 pass.
 
 _The Elder_: I don't know whether we yet completely understand each other?
 
 _Pyrrho_: Probably not.
 
 _The Elder_: If only you understand yourself!
 
 (Pyrrho turns round and laughs.)
 
 _The Elder_: Ah, friend! Silence and laughter--is that now your whole
 philosophy?
 
 _Pyrrho_: There might be a worse.
 
 
 
 
 214.
 
 
 EUROPEAN BOOKS.--In reading Montaigne, La Rochefoucauld, La Bruyere,
 Fontenelle (especially the _Dialogues des Morts_), Vauvenargues, and
 Chamfort we are nearer to antiquity than in any group of six authors of
 other nations. Through these six the spirit of the last centuries before
 Christ has once more come into being, and they collectively form an
 important link in the great and still continuous chain of the Renaissance.
 Their books are raised above all changes of national taste and
 philosophical nuances from which as a rule every book takes and must take
 its hue in order to become famous. They contain more real ideas than all
 the books of German philosophers put together: ideas of the sort that
 breed ideas----I am at a loss how to define to the end: enough to say that
 they appear to me writers who wrote neither for children nor for
 visionaries, neither for virgins nor for Christians, neither for Germans
 nor for--I am again at a loss how to finish my list. To praise them in
 plain terms, I may say that had they been written in Greek, they would
 have been understood by Greeks. How much, on the other hand, would even a
 Plato have understood of the writings of our best German thinkers--Goethe
 and Schopenhauer, for instance--to say nothing of the repugnance that he
 would have felt to their style, particularly to its obscure, exaggerated,
 and occasionally dry-as-dust elements? And these are defects from which
 these two among German thinkers suffer least and yet far too much (Goethe
 as thinker was fonder than he should have been of embracing the cloud, and
 Schopenhauer almost constantly wanders, not with impunity, among symbols
 of objects rather than among the objects themselves).--On the other hand,
 what clearness and graceful precision there is in these Frenchmen! The
 Greeks, whose ears were most refined, could not but have approved of this
 art, and one quality they would even have admired and reverenced--the
 French verbal wit: they were extremely fond of this quality, without being
 particularly strong in it themselves.
 
 
 
 
 215.
 
 
 FASHION AND MODERNITY.--Wherever ignorance, uncleanness, and superstition
 are still rife, where communication is backward, agriculture poor, and the
 priesthood powerful, national costumes are still worn. Fashion, on the
 other hand, rules where the opposite conditions prevail. Fashion is
 accordingly to be found next to the virtues in modern Europe. Are we to
 call it their seamy side?--Masculine dress that is fashionable and no
 longer national proclaims of its wearer: firstly, that he does not wish to
 appear as an individual or as member of a class or race; that he has made
 an intentional suppression of these kinds of vanity a law unto himself:
 secondly, that he is a worker, and has little time for dressing and
 self-adornment, and moreover regards anything expensive or luxurious in
 material and cut as out of harmony with his work: lastly, that by his
 clothes he indicates the more learned and intellectual callings as those
 to which he stands or would like to stand nearest as a European--whereas
 such national costumes as still exist would exhibit the occupations of
 brigand, shepherd, and soldier as the most desirable and distinguished.
 Within this general character of masculine fashion exist the slight
 fluctuations demanded by the vanity of young men, the dandies and dawdlers
 of our great cities--in other words, Europeans who have not yet reached
 maturity.--European women are as yet far less mature, and for this reason
 the fluctuations with them are much greater. They also will not have the
 national costume, and hate to be recognised by their dress as German,
 French, or Russian. They are, however, very desirous of creating an
 impression as individuals. Then, too, their dress must leave no one in
 doubt that they belong to one of the more reputable classes of society (to
 "good" or "high" or "great" society), and on this score their pretensions
 are all the greater if they belong scarcely or not at all to that class.
 Above all, the young woman does not want to wear what an older woman
 wears, because she thinks she loses her market value if she is suspected
 of being somewhat advanced in years. The older woman, on the other hand,
 would like to deceive the world as long as possible by a youthful garb.
 From this competition must continually arise temporary fashions, in which
 the youthful element is unmistakably and inimitably apparent. But after
 the inventive genius of the young female artists has run riot for some
 time in such indiscreet revelations of youth (or rather, after the
 inventive genius of older, courtly civilisations and of still existing
 peoples--in fact, of the whole world of dress--has been pressed into the
 service, and, say, the Spaniards, Turks, and ancient Greeks have been
 yoked together for the glorification of fair flesh), then they at last
 discover, time and again, that they have not been good judges of their own
 interest; that if they wish to have power over men, the game of
 hide-and-seek with the beautiful body is more likely to win than naked or
 half-naked honesty. And then the wheel of taste and vanity turns once more
 in an opposite direction. The rather older young women find that their
 kingdom has come, and the competition of the dear, absurd creatures rages
 again from the beginning.--But the more women advance mentally, and no
 longer among themselves concede the pre-eminence to an unripe age, the
 smaller their fluctuations of costume grow and the less elaborate their
 adornment. A just verdict in this respect must not be based on ancient
 models--in other words, not on the standard of the dress of women who dwell
 on the shores of the Mediterranean--but must have an eye to the climatic
 conditions of the central and northern regions, where the intellectual and
 creative spirit of Europe now finds its most natural home.--Generally
 speaking, therefore, it is not change that will be the characteristic mark
 of fashion and modernity, for change is retrograde, and betokens the still
 unripened men and women of Europe; but rather the repudiation of national,
 social, and individual vanity. Accordingly, it is commendable, because
 involving a saving of time and strength, if certain cities and districts
 of Europe think and invent for all the rest in the matter of dress, in
 view of the fact that a sense of form does not seem to have been bestowed
 upon all. Nor is it really an excessive ambition, so long as these
 fluctuations still exist, for Paris, for example, to claim to be the sole
 inventor and innovator in this sphere. If a German, from hatred of these
 claims on the part of a French city, wishes to dress differently,--as, for
 example, in the Duerer style,--let him reflect that he then has a costume
 which the Germans of olden times wore, but which the Germans have not in
 the slightest degree invented. For there has never been a style of dress
 that characterised the German as a German. Moreover, let him observe how
 he looks in his costume, and whether his altogether modern face, with all
 its hues and wrinkles, does not raise a protest against a Duerer fashion of
 dress.--Here, where the concepts "modern" and "European" are almost
 identical, we understand by "Europe" a far wider region than is embraced
 by the Europe of geography, the little peninsula of Asia. In particular,
 we must include America, in so far as America is the daughter of our
 civilisation. On the other hand, not all Europe falls under the heading of
 cultured "Europe," but only those nations and divisions of nations which
 have their common past in Greece, Rome, Judaism, and Christianity.
 
 
 
 
 216.
 
 
 "GERMAN VIRTUE."--There is no denying that from the end of the eighteenth
 century a current of moral awakening flowed through Europe. Then only
 Virtue found again the power of speech. She learnt to discover the
 unrestrained gestures of exaltation and emotion, she was no longer ashamed
 of herself, and she created philosophies and poems for her own
 glorification. If we look for the sources of this current, we come upon
 Rousseau, but the mythical Rousseau, the phantom formed from the
 impression left by his writings (one might almost say again, his
 mythically interpreted writings) and by the indications that he provided
 himself. He and his public constantly worked at the fashioning of this
 ideal figure. The other origin lies in the resurrection of the Stoical
 side of Rome's greatness, whereby the French so nobly carried on the task
 of the Renaissance. With striking success they proceeded from the
 reproduction of antique forms to the reproduction of antique characters.
 Thus they may always claim a title to the highest honours, as the nation
 which has hitherto given the modern world its best books and its best men.
 How this twofold archetype, the mythical Rousseau and the resurrected
 spirit of Rome, affected France's weaker neighbours, is particularly
 noticeable in Germany, which, in consequence of her novel and quite
 unwonted impulse to seriousness and loftiness in will and self-control,
 finally came to feel astonishment at her own newfound virtue, and launched
 into the world the concept "German virtue," as if this were the most
 original and hereditary of her possessions. The first great men who
 transfused into their own blood that French impulse towards greatness and
 consciousness of the moral will were more honest, and more grateful.
 Whence comes the moralism of Kant? He is continually reminding us: from
 Rousseau and the revival of Stoic Rome. The moralism of Schiller has the
 same source and the same glorification of the source. The moralism of
 Beethoven in notes is a continual song in praise of Rousseau, the antique
 French, and Schiller. "Young Germany" was the first to forget its
 gratitude, because in the meantime people had listened to the preachers of
 hatred of the French. The "young German" came to the fore with more
 consciousness than is generally allowed to youths. When he investigated
 his paternity, he might well think of the proximity of Schiller,
 Schleiermacher, and Fichte. But he should have looked for his grandfathers
 in Paris and Geneva, and it was very short-sighted of him to believe what
 he believed: that virtue was not more than thirty years old. People became
 used to demanding that the word "German" should connote "virtue," and this
 process has not been wholly forgotten to this day.--Be it observed further
 that this moral awakening, as may almost be guessed, has resulted only in
 drawbacks and obstacles to the _recognition_ of moral phenomena. What is
 the entire German philosophy, starting from Kant, with all its French,
 English, and Italian offshoots and by-products? A semi-theological attack
 upon Helvetius, a rejection of the slowly and laboriously acquired views
 and signposts of the right road, which in the end he collected and
 expressed so well. To this day Helvetius is the best-abused of all good
 moralists and good men in Germany.
 
 
 
 
 217.
 
 
 CLASSIC AND ROMANTIC.--Both classically and romantically minded spirits--two
 species that always exist--cherish a vision of the future; but the former
 derive their vision from the strength of their time, the latter from its
 weakness.
 
 
 
 
 218.
 
 
 THE MACHINE AS TEACHER.--Machinery teaches in itself the dovetailed working
 of masses of men, in activities where each has but one thing to do. It is
 the model of party organisations and of warfare. On the other hand, it
 does not teach individual self-glorification, for it makes of the many a
 machine, and of each individual a tool for one purpose. Its most general
 effect is to teach the advantage of centralisation.
 
 
 
 
 219.
 
 
 UNABLE TO SETTLE.--One likes to live in a small town. But from time to time
 just this small town drives us out into bare and lonely Nature, especially
 when we think we know it too well. Finally, in order to refresh ourselves
 from Nature, we go to the big town. A few draughts from this cup and we
 see its dregs, and the circle begins afresh, with the small town as
 starting-point.--So the moderns live; they are in all things rather too
 thorough to be able to settle like the men of other days.
 
 
 
 
 220.
 
 
 REACTION AGAINST THE CIVILISATION OF MACHINERY.--The machine, itself a
 product of the highest mental powers, sets in motion hardly any but the
 lower, unthinking forces of the men who serve it. True, it unfetters a
 vast quantity of force which would otherwise lie dormant. But it does not
 communicate the impulse to climb higher, to improve, to become artistic.
 It creates activity and monotony, but this in the long-run produces a
 counter-effect, a despairing ennui of the soul, which through machinery
 has learnt to hanker after the variety of leisure.
 
 
 
 
 221.
 
 
 THE DANGER OF ENLIGHTENMENT.--All the half-insane, theatrical, bestially
 cruel, licentious, and especially sentimental and self-intoxicating
 elements which go to form the true revolutionary substance, and became
 flesh and spirit, before the revolution, in Rousseau--all this composite
 being, with factitious enthusiasm, finally set even "enlightenment" upon
 its fanatical head, which thereby began itself to shine as in an
 illuminating halo. Yet, enlightenment is essentially foreign to that
 phenomenon, and, if left to itself, would have pierced silently through
 the clouds like a shaft of light, long content to transfigure individuals
 alone, and thus only slowly transfiguring national customs and
 institutions as well. But now, bound hand and foot to a violent and abrupt
 monster, enlightenment itself became violent and abrupt. Its danger has
 therefore become almost greater than its useful quality of liberation and
 illumination, which it introduced into the great revolutionary movement.
 Whoever grasps this will also know from what confusion it has to be
 extricated, from what impurities to be cleansed, in order that it may then
 by itself continue the work of enlightenment and also nip the revolution
 in the bud and nullify its effects.
 
 
 
 
 222.
 
 
 PASSION IN THE MIDDLE AGES.--The Middle Ages are the period of great
 passions. Neither antiquity nor our period possesses this widening of the
 soul. Never was the capacity of the soul greater or measured by larger
 standards. The physical, primeval sensuality of the barbarian races and
 the over-soulful, over-vigilant, over-brilliant eyes of Christian mystics,
 the most childish and youthful and the most over-ripe and world-weary, the
 savageness of the beast of prey and the effeminacy and excessive
 refinement of the late antique spirit--all these elements were then not
 seldom united in one and the same person. Thus, if a man was seized by a
 passion, the rapidity of the torrent must have been greater, the whirl
 more confused, the fall deeper than ever before.--We modern men may be
 content to feel that we have suffered a loss here.
 
 
 
 
 223.
 
 
 ROBBING AND SAVING.--All intellectual movements whereby the great may hope
 to rob and the small to save are sure to prosper. That is why, for
 instance, the German Reformation made progress.
 
 
 
 
 224.
 
 
 GLADSOME SOULS.--When even a remote hint of drink, drunkenness, and an
 evil-smelling kind of jocularity was given, the souls of the old Germans
 waxed gladsome. Otherwise they were depressed, but here they found
 something they really understood.
 
 
 
 
 225.
 
 
 DEBAUCHERY AT ATHENS.--Even when the fish-market of Athens acquired its
 thinkers and poets, Greek debauchery had a more idyllic and refined
 appearance than Roman or German debauchery ever had. The voice of Juvenal
 would have sounded there like a hollow trumpet, and would have been
 answered by a good-natured and almost childish outburst of laughter.
 
 
 
 
 226.
 
 
 CLEVERNESS OF THE GREEK.--As the desire for victory and pre-eminence is an
 ineradicable trait of human nature, older and more primitive than any
 respect of or joy in equality, the Greek State sanctioned gymnastic and
 artistic competitions among equals. In other words, it marked out an arena
 where this impulse to conquer would find a vent without jeopardising the
 political order. With the final decline of gymnastic and artistic contests
 the Greek State fell into a condition of profound unrest and dissolution.
 
 
 
 
 227.
 
 
 THE "ETERNAL EPICURUS."--Epicurus has lived in all periods, and lives yet,
 unbeknown to those who called and still call themselves Epicureans, and
 without repute among philosophers. He has himself even forgotten his own
 name--that was the heaviest luggage that he ever cast off.
 
 
 
 
 228.
 
 
 THE STYLE OF SUPERIORITY.--"University slang," the speech of the German
 students, has its origin among the students who do not study. The latter
 know how to acquire a preponderance over their more serious fellows by
 exposing all the farcical elements of culture, respectability, erudition,
 order, and moderation, and by having words taken from these realms always
 on their lips, like the better and more learned students, but with malice
 in their glance and an accompanying grimace. This language of
 superiority--the only one that is original in Germany--is nowadays
 unconsciously used by statesmen and newspaper critics as well. It is a
 continual process of ironical quotation, a restless, cantankerous
 squinting of the eye right and left, a language of inverted commas and
 grimaces.
 
 
 
 
 229.
 
 
 THE RECLUSE.--We retire into seclusion, but not from personal misgivings,
 as if the political and social conditions of the day did not satisfy us;
 rather because by our retirement we try to save and collect forces which
 will some day be urgently needed by culture, the more this present is
 _this present_, and, as such, fulfils its task. We form a capital and try
 to make it secure, but, as in times of real danger, our method is to bury
 our hoard.
 
 
 
 
 230.
 
 
 TYRANTS OF THE INTELLECT.--In our times, any one who expressed a single
 moral trait so thoroughly as the characters of Theophrastus and Moliere
 do, would be considered ill, and be spoken of as possessing "a fixed
 idea." The Athens of the third century, if we could visit it, would appear
 to us populated by fools. Nowadays the democracy of ideas rules in every
 brain--there the multitude collectively is lord. A single idea that tried
 to be lord is now called, as above stated, "a fixed idea." This is our
 method of murdering tyrants--we hint at the madhouse.
 
 
 
 
 231.
 
 
 A MOST DANGEROUS EMIGRATION.--In Russia there is an emigration of the
 intelligence. People cross the frontier in order to read and write good
 books. Thus, however, they are working towards turning their country,
 abandoned by the intellect, into a gaping Asiatic maw, which would fain
 swallow our little Europe.
 
 
 
 
 232.
 
 
 POLITICAL FOOLS.--The almost religious love of the king was transferred by
 the Greeks, when the monarchy was abolished, to the _polis_. An idea can
 be loved more than a person, and does not thwart the lover so often as a
 beloved human being (for the more men know themselves to be loved, the
 less considerate they usually become, until they are no longer worthy of
 love, and a rift really arises). Hence the reverence for State and _polis_
 was greater than the reverence for princes had ever been. The Greeks are
 the political fools of ancient history--today other nations boast that
 distinction.
 
 
 
 
 233.
 
 
 AGAINST NEGLECT OF THE EYES.--Might one not find among the cultured classes
 of England, who read the _Times_, a decline in their powers of sight every
 ten years?
 
 
 
 
 234.
 
 
 GREAT WORKS AND GREAT FAITH.--One man had great works, but his comrade had
 great faith in these works. They were inseparable, but obviously the
 former was entirely dependent upon the latter.
 
 
 
 
 235.
 
 
 THE SOCIABLE MAN.--"I don't get on well with myself," said some one in
 explanation of his fondness for society. "Society has a stronger digestion
 than I have, and can put up with me."
 
 
 
 
 236.
 
 
 SHUTTING THE MIND'S EYES.--If we are practised and accustomed to reflect
 upon our actions, we must nevertheless close the inner eye while
 performing an action (be this even only writing letters or eating or
 drinking). Even in conversation with average people we must know how to
 obscure our own mental vision in order to attain and grasp average
 thinking. This shutting of the eyes is a conscious act and can be achieved
 by the will.
 
 
 
 
 237.
 
 
 THE MOST TERRIBLE REVENGE.--If we wish to take a thorough revenge upon an
 opponent, we must wait until we have our hand quite full of truths and
 equities, and can calmly use the whole lot against him. Hence the exercise
 of revenge may be identified with the exercise of equity. It is the most
 terrible kind of revenge, for there is no higher court to which an appeal
 can be made. Thus did Voltaire revenge himself on Piron, with five lines
 that sum up Piron's whole life, work, and character: every word is a
 truth. So too he revenged himself upon Frederick the Great in a letter to
 him from Ferney.
 
 
 
 
 238.
 
 
 TAXES OF LUXURY.--In shops we buy the most necessary and urgent things, and
 have to pay very dear, because we pay as well for what is also to be had
 there cheap, but seldom finds a customer--articles of luxury that minister
 to pleasure. Thus luxury lays a constant tax upon the man of simple life
 who does without luxuries.
 
 
 
 
 239.
 
 
 WHY BEGGARS STILL LIVE.--If all alms were given only out of compassion, the
 whole tribe of beggars would long since have died of starvation.
 
 
 
 
 240.
 
 
 WHY BEGGARS STILL LIVE.--The greatest of almsgivers is cowardice.
 
 
 
 
 241.
 
 
 HOW THE THINKER MAKES USE OF A CONVERSATION.--Without being eavesdroppers,
 we can hear a good deal if we are able to see well, and at the same time
 to let ourselves occasionally get out of our own sight. But people do not
 know how to make use of a conversation. They pay far too much attention to
 what _they_ want to say and reply, whereas the true listener is often
 contented to make a provisional answer and to say something merely as a
 payment on account of politeness, but on the other hand, with his memory
 lurking in ambush, carries away with him all that the other said, together
 with his tones and gestures in speaking.--In ordinary conversation every
 one thinks _he_ is the leader, just as if two ships, sailing side by side
 and giving each other a slight push here and there, were each firmly
 convinced that the other ship was following or even being towed.
 
 
 
 
 242.
 
 
 THE ART OF EXCUSING ONESELF.--If some one excuses himself to us, he has to
 make out a very good case, otherwise we readily come to feel ourselves the
 culprits, and experience an unpleasant emotion.
 
 
 
 
 243.
 
 
 IMPOSSIBLE INTERCOURSE.--The ship of your thoughts goes too deep for you to
 be able to travel with it in the waters of these friendly, decorous,
 obliging people. There are too many shallows and sandbanks: you would have
 to tack and turn, and would find yourself continually at your wits' end,
 and they would soon also be in perplexity as to _your_ perplexity, the
 reason for which they cannot divine.
 
 
 
 
 244.
 
 
 THE FOX OF FOXES.--A true fox not only calls sour the grapes he cannot
 reach, but also those he has reached and snatched from the grasp of
 others.
 
 
 
 
 245.
 
 
 IN INTIMATE INTERCOURSE.--However closely men are connected, there are
 still all the four quarters of the heavens in their common horizon, and at
 times they become aware of this fact.
 
 
 
 
 246.
 
 
 THE SILENCE OF DISGUST.--Behold! some one undergoes a thorough and painful
 transformation as thinker and human being, and makes a public avowal of
 the change. And those who hear him see nothing, and still believe he is
 the same as before! This common experience has already disgusted many
 writers. They had rated the intellectuality of mankind too highly, and
 made a vow to be silent as soon as they became aware of their mistake.
 
 
 
 
 247.
 
 
 BUSINESS SERIOUSNESS.--The business of many rich and eminent men is their
 form of recreation from too long periods of habitual leisure. They then
 become as serious and impassioned as other people do in their rare moments
 of leisure and amusement.
 
 
 
 
 248.
 
 
 THE EYE'S DOUBLE SENSE.--Just as a sudden scaly ripple runs over the waters
 at your feet, so there are similar sudden uncertainties and ambiguities in
 the human eye. They lead to the question: is it a shudder, or a smile, or
 both?
 
 
 
 
 249.
 
 
 POSITIVE AND NEGATIVE.--This thinker needs no one to refute him--he is quite
 capable of doing that himself.
 
 
 
 
 250.
 
 
 THE REVENGE OF THE EMPTY NETS.--Above all we should beware of those who
 have the bitter feeling of the fisherman who after a hard day's work comes
 home in the evening with nets empty.
 
 
 
 
 251.
 
 
 NON-ASSERTION OF OUR RIGHTS.--The exertion of power is laborious and
 demands courage. That is why so many do not assert their most valid
 rights, because their rights are a kind of power, and they are too lazy or
 too cowardly to exercise them. _Indulgence_ and _patience_ are the names
 given to the virtues that cloak these faults.
 
 
 
 
 252.
 
 
 BEARERS OF LIGHT.--In Society there would be no sunshine if the born
 flatterers (I mean the so-called amiable people) did not bring some in
 with them.
 
 
 
 
 253.
 
 
 WHEN MOST BENEVOLENT.--When a man has been highly honoured and has eaten a
 little, he is most benevolent.
 
 
 
 
 254.
 
 
 TO THE LIGHT.--Men press forward to the light not in order to see better
 but to shine better.--The person before whom we shine we gladly allow to be
 called a light.
 
 
 
 
 255.
 
 
 THE HYPOCHONDRIAC.--The hypochondriac is a man who has just enough
 intellect and pleasure in the intellect to take his sorrows, his losses,
 and his mistakes seriously. But the field on which he grazes is too small:
 he crops it so close that in the end he has to look for single stalks.
 Thus he finally becomes envious and avaricious--and only then is he
 unbearable.
 
 
 
 
 256.
 
 
 GIVING IN RETURN.--Hesiod advises us to give the neighbour who has helped
 us good measure and, if possible, fuller measure in return, as soon as we
 have the power. For this is where the neighbour's pleasure comes in, since
 his former benevolence brings him interest. Moreover, he who gives in
 return also has his pleasure, inasmuch as, by giving a little more than he
 got, he redeems the slight humiliation of being compelled to seek aid.
 
 
 
 
 257.
 
 
 MORE SUBTLE THAN IS NECESSARY.--Our sense of observation for how far others
 perceive our weaknesses is far more subtle than our sense of observation
 for the weaknesses of others. It follows that the first-named sense is
 more subtle than is necessary.
 
 
 
 
 258.
 
 
 A KIND OF BRIGHT SHADOWS.--Close to the nocturnal type of man we almost
 regularly find, as if bound up with him, a bright soul. This is, as it
 were, the negative shadow cast by the former.
 
 
 
 
 259.
 
 
 NOT TO TAKE REVENGE.--There are so many subtle sorts of revenge that one
 who has occasion to take revenge can really do or omit to do what he
 likes. In any case, the whole world will agree, after a time, that he
 _has_ avenged himself. Hence the avoidance of revenge is hardly within
 man's power. He must not even so much as say that he does not _want_ to do
 so, since the contempt for revenge is interpreted and felt as a sublime
 and exquisite form of revenge.--It follows that we must do nothing
 superfluous.
 
 
 
 
 260.
 
 
 THE MISTAKE OF THOSE WHO PAY HOMAGE.--Every one thinks he is paying a most
 agreeable compliment to a thinker when he says that he himself hit upon
 exactly the same idea and even upon the same expression. The thinker,
 however, is seldom delighted at hearing such news, nay, rather, he often
 becomes distrustful of his own thoughts and expressions. He silently
 resolves to revise both some day. If we wish to pay homage to any one, we
 must beware of expressing our agreement, for this puts us on the same
 level.--Often it is a matter of social tact to listen to an opinion as if
 it were not ours or even travelled beyond the limits of our own
 horizon--as, for example, when an old man once in a while opens the
 storehouse of his acquired knowledge.
 
 
 
 
 261.
 
 
 LETTERS.--A letter is an unannounced visit, and the postman is the
 intermediary of impolite surprises. Every week we ought to have one hour
 for receiving letters, and then go and take a bath.
 
 
 
 
 262.
 
 
 PREJUDICED.--Some one said: I have been prejudiced against myself from
 childhood upwards, and hence I find some truth in every censure and some
 absurdity in every eulogy. Praise I generally value too low and blame too
 high.
 
 
 
 
 263.
 
 
 THE PATH TO EQUALITY.--A few hours of mountain-climbing make a blackguard
 and a saint two rather similar creatures. Weariness is the shortest path
 to equality and fraternity--and finally liberty is bestowed by sleep.
 
 
 
 
 264.
 
 
 CALUMNY.--If we begin to trace to its source a real scandalous
 misrepresentation, we shall rarely look for its origin in our honourable
 and straightforward enemies; for if they invented anything of the sort
 about us, they, as being our enemies, would gain no credence. Those,
 however, to whom for a time we have been most useful, but who, from some
 reason or other, may be secretly sure that they will obtain no more from
 us--such persons are in a position to start the ball of slander rolling.
 They gain credence, firstly, because it is assumed that they would invent
 nothing likely to do them damage; secondly, because they have learnt to
 know us intimately.--As a consolation, the much-slandered man may say to
 himself: Calumnies are diseases of others that break out in your body.
 They prove that Society is a (moral) organism, so that you can prescribe
 to _yourself_ the cure that will in the end be useful to others.
 
 
 
 
 265.
 
 
 THE CHILD'S KINGDOM OF HEAVEN.--The happiness of a child is as much of a
 myth as the happiness of the Hyperboreans of whom the Greeks fabled. The
 Greeks supposed that, if indeed happiness dwells anywhere on our earth, it
 must certainly dwell as far as possible from us, perhaps over yonder at
 the edge of the world. Old people have the same thought--if man is at all
 capable of being happy, he must be happy as far as possible from our age,
 at the frontiers and beginnings of life. For many a man the sight of
 children, through the veil of this myth, is the greatest happiness that he
 can feel. He enters himself into the forecourt of heaven when he says,
 "Suffer the little children to come unto me, for of them is the kingdom of
 heaven." The myth of the child's kingdom of heaven holds good, in some way
 or other, wherever in the modern world some sentimentality exists.
 
 
 
 
 266.
 
 
 THE IMPATIENT.--It is just the growing man who does not want things in the
 growing stage. He is too impatient for that. The youth will not wait
 until, after long study, suffering, and privation, his picture of men and
 things is complete. Accordingly, he confidently accepts another picture
 that lies ready to his hand and is recommended to him, and pins his faith
 to that, as if it must give him at once the lines and colours of his own
 painting. He presses a philosopher or a poet to his bosom, and must from
 that time forth perform long stretches of forced labour and renounce his
 own self. He learns much in the process, but he often forgets what is most
 worth learning and knowing--his self. He remains all his life a partisan.
 Ah, a vast amount of tedious work has to be done before you find your own
 colours, your own brush, your own canvas!--Even then you are very far from
 being a master in the art of life, but at least you are the boss in your
 own workshop.
 
 
 
 
 267.
 
 
 THERE ARE NO TEACHERS.--As thinkers we ought only to speak of
 self-teaching. The instruction of the young by others is either an
 experiment performed upon something as yet unknown and unknowable, or else
 a thorough levelling process, in order to make the new member of society
 conform to the customs and manners that prevail for the time being. In
 both cases the result is accordingly unworthy of a thinker--the handiwork
 of parents and teachers, whom some valiantly honest person(25) has called
 "_nos ennemis naturels_." One day, when, as the world thinks, we have long
 since finished our education, we _discover ourselves_. Then begins the
 task of the thinker, and then is the time to summon him to our aid--not as
 a teacher, but as a self-taught man who has experience.
 
 
 
 
 268.
 
 
 SYMPATHY WITH YOUTH.--We are sorry when we hear that some one who is still
 young is losing his teeth or growing blind. If we knew all the irrevocable
 and hopeless feelings hidden in his whole being, how great our sorrow
 would be! Why do we really suffer on this account? Because youth has to
 continue the work we have undertaken, and every flaw and failing in its
 strength is likely to injure _our_ work, that will fall into its hands. It
 is the sorrow at the imperfect guarantee of our immortality: or, if we
 only feel ourselves as executors of the human mission, it is the sorrow
 that this mission must pass to weaker hands than ours.
 
 
 
 
 269.
 
 
 THE AGES OF LIFE.--The comparison of the four ages of life with the four
 seasons of the year is a venerable piece of folly. Neither the first
 twenty nor the last twenty years of a life correspond to a season of the
 year, assuming that we are not satisfied with drawing a parallel between
 white hair and snow and similar colour-analogies. The first twenty years
 are a preparation for life in general, for the whole year of life, a sort
 of long New Year's Day. The last twenty review, assimilate, bring into
 union and harmony all that has been experienced till then: as, in a small
 degree, we do on every New Year's Eve with the whole past year. But in
 between there really lies an interval which suggests a comparison with the
 seasons--the time from the twentieth to the fiftieth year (to speak here of
 decades in the lump, while it is an understood thing that every one must
 refine for himself these rough outlines). Those three decades correspond
 to three seasons--summer, spring, and autumn. Winter human life has none,
 unless we like to call the (unfortunately) often intervening hard, cold,
 lonely, hopeless, unfruitful periods of disease the winters of man. The
 twenties, hot, oppressive, stormy, impetuous, exhausting years, when we
 praise the day in the evening, when it is over, as we wipe the sweat from
 our foreheads--years in which work seems to us cruel but necessary--these
 twenties are the summer of life. The thirties, on the other hand, are its
 spring-time, with the air now too warm, now too cold, ever restless and
 stimulating, bubbling sap, bloom of leaves, fragrance of buds everywhere,
 many delightful mornings and evenings, work to which the song of birds
 awakens us, a true work of the heart, a kind of joy in our own robustness,
 strengthened by the savour of hopeful anticipation. Lastly the forties,
 mysterious like all that is stationary, like a high, broad plateau,
 traversed by a fresh breeze, with a clear, cloudless sky above it, which
 always has the same gentle look all day and half the night--the time of
 harvest and cordial gaiety--that is the autumn of life.
 
 
 
 
 270.
 
 
 WOMEN'S INTELLECT IN MODERN SOCIETY.--What women nowadays think of men's
 intellect may be divined from the fact that in their art of adornment they
 think of anything but of emphasising the intellectual side of their faces
 or their single intellectual features. On the contrary, they conceal such
 traits, and understand, for example by an arrangement of their hair over
 their forehead, how to give themselves an appearance of vivid, eager
 sensuality and materialism, just when they but slightly possess those
 qualities. Their conviction that intellect in women frightens men goes so
 far that they even gladly deny the keenness of the most intellectual sense
 and purposely invite the reputation of short-sightedness. They think they
 will thereby make men more confiding. It is as if a soft, attractive
 twilight were spreading itself around them.
 
 
 
 
 271.
 
 
 GREAT AND TRANSITORY.--What moves the observer to tears is the rapturous
 look of happiness with which a fair young bride gazes upon her husband. We
 feel all the melancholy of autumn in thinking of the greatness and of the
 transitoriness of human happiness.
 
 
 
 
 272.
 
 
 SENSE AND SACRIFICE.--Many a woman has the _intelletto del sacrifizio_,(26)
 and no longer enjoys life when her husband refuses to sacrifice her. With
 all her wit, she then no longer knows--whither? and without perceiving it,
 is changed from sacrificial victim to sacrificial priest.
 
 
 
 
 273.
 
 
 THE UNFEMININE.--"Stupid as a man," say the women; "Cowardly as a woman,"
 say the men. Stupidity in a woman is unfeminine.
 
 
 
 
 274.
 
 
 MASCULINE AND FEMININE TEMPERAMENT AND MORTALITY.--That the male sex has a
 worse temperament than the female follows from the fact that male children
 have a greater mortality than female, clearly because they "leap out of
 their skins" more easily. Their wildness and unbearableness soon make all
 the bad stuff in them deadly.
 
 
 
 
 275.
 
 
 THE AGE OF CYCLOPEAN BUILDING.--The democratisation of Europe is a
 resistless force. Even he who would stem the tide uses those very means
 that democratic thought first put into men's hands, and he makes these
 means more handy and workable. The most inveterate enemies of democracy (I
 mean the spirits of upheaval) seem only to exist in order, by the fear
 that they inspire, to drive forward the different parties faster and
 faster on the democratic course. Now we may well feel sorry for those who
 are working consciously and honourably for this future. There is something
 dreary and monotonous in their faces, and the grey dust seems to have been
 wafted into their very brains. Nevertheless, posterity may possibly some
 day laugh at our anxiety, and see in the democratic work of several
 generations what we see in the building of stone dams and walls--an
 activity that necessarily covers clothes and face with a great deal of
 dust, and perhaps unavoidably makes the workmen, too, a little
 dull-witted; but who would on that account desire such work undone? It
 seems that the democratisation of Europe is a link in the chain of those
 mighty prophylactic principles which are the thought of the modern era,
 and whereby we rise up in revolt against the Middle Ages. Now, and now
 only, is the age of Cyclopean building! A final security in the
 foundations, that the future may build on them without danger! Henceforth,
 an impossibility of the orchards of culture being once more destroyed
 overnight by wild, senseless mountain torrents! Dams and walls against
 barbarians, against plagues, against physical and spiritual serfdom! And
 all this understood at first roughly and literally, but gradually in an
 ever higher and more spiritual sense, so that all the principles here
 indicated may appear as the intellectual preparation of the highest artist
 in horticulture, who can only apply himself to his own task when the other
 is fully accomplished!--True, if we consider the long intervals of time
 that here lie between means and end, the great, supreme labour, straining
 the powers and brains of centuries, that is necessary in order to create
 or to provide each individual means, we must not bear too hardly upon the
 workers of the present when they loudly proclaim that the wall and the
 fence are already the end and the final goal. After all, no one yet sees
 the gardener and the fruit, for whose sake the fence exists.
 
 
 
 
 276.
 
 
 THE RIGHT OF UNIVERSAL SUFFRAGE.--The people has not granted itself
 universal suffrage but, wherever this is now in force, it has received and
 accepted it as a temporary measure. But in any case the people has the
 right to restore the gift, if it does not satisfy its anticipations. This
 dissatisfaction seems universal nowadays, for when, at any occasion where
 the vote is exercised, scarce two-thirds, nay perhaps not even the
 majority of all voters, go to the polls, that very fact is a vote against
 the whole suffrage system.--On this point, in fact, we must pronounce a
 much sterner verdict. A law that enacts that the majority shall decide as
 to the welfare of all cannot be built up on the foundation that it alone
 has provided, for it is bound to require a far broader foundation, namely
 the unanimity of all. Universal suffrage must not only be the expression
 of the will of a majority, but of the whole country. Thus the dissent of a
 very small minority is already enough to set aside the system as
 impracticable; and the abstention from voting is in fact a dissent of this
 kind, which ruins the whole institution. The "absolute veto" of the
 individual, or--not to be too minute--the veto of a few thousands, hangs
 over the system as the consequence of justice. On every occasion when it
 is employed, the system must, according to the variety of the division,
 first prove that it has still a right to exist.
 
 
 
 
 277.
 
 
 FALSE CONCLUSIONS.--What false conclusions are drawn in spheres where we
 are not at home, even by those of us who are accustomed as men of science
 to draw right conclusions! It is humiliating! Now it is clear that in the
 great turmoil of worldly doings, in political affairs, in all sudden and
 urgent matters such as almost every day brings up, these false conclusions
 must decide. For no one feels at home with novelties that have sprung up
 in the night. All political work, even with great statesmen, is an
 improvisation that trusts to luck.
 
 
 
 
 278.
 
 
 PREMISSES OF THE AGE OF MACHINERY.--The press, the machine, the railway,
 the telegraph are premisses of which no one has yet dared to draw the
 conclusions that will follow in a thousand years.
 
 
 
 
 279.
 
 
 A DRAG UPON CULTURE.--When we are told that here men have no time for
 productive occupations, because military manoeuvres and processions take up
 their days, and the rest of the population must feed and clothe them,
 their dress, however, being striking, often gay and full of absurdities;
 that there only a few distinguished qualities are recognised, individuals
 resemble each other more than elsewhere, or at any rate are treated as
 equals, yet obedience is exacted and yielded without reasoning, for men
 command and make no attempt to convince; that here punishments are few,
 but these few cruel and likely to become the final and most terrible; that
 there treason ranks as the capital offence, and even the criticism of
 evils is only ventured on by the most audacious; that there, again, human
 life is cheap, and ambition often takes the form of setting life in
 danger--when we hear all this, we at once say, "This is a picture of a
 barbarous society that rests on a hazardous footing." One man perhaps will
 add, "It is a portrait of Sparta." But another will become meditative and
 declare that this is a description of our modern military system, as it
 exists in the midst of our altogether different culture and society, a
 living anachronism, the picture, as above said, of a community resting on
 a hazardous footing; a posthumous work of the past, which can only act as
 a drag upon the wheels of the present.--Yet at times even a drag upon
 culture is vitally necessary--that is to say, when culture is advancing too
 rapidly downhill or (as perhaps in this case) _uphill_.
 
 
 
 
 280.
 
 
 MORE REVERENCE FOR THEM THAT KNOW.--In the competition of production and
 sale the public is made judge of the product. But the public has no
 special knowledge, and judges by the appearance of the wares. In
 consequence, the art of appearance (and perhaps the taste for it) must
 increase under the dominance of competition, while on the other hand the
 quality of every product must deteriorate. The result will be--so far as
 reason does not fall in value--that one day an end will be put to that
 competition, and a new principle will win the day. Only the master of the
 craft should pronounce a verdict on the work, and the public should be
 dependent on the belief in the personality of the judge and his honesty.
 Accordingly, no anonymous work! At least an expert should be there as
 guarantor and pledge his name if the name of the creator is lacking or is
 unknown. The cheapness of an article is for the layman another kind of
 illusion and deceit, since only durability can decide that a thing is
 cheap and to what an extent. But it is difficult, and for a layman
 impossible, to judge of its durability.--Hence that which produces an
 effect on the eye and costs little at present gains the advantage--this
 being naturally machine-made work. Again, machinery--that is to say, the
 cause of the greatest rapidity and facility in production--favours the most
 saleable kind of article. Otherwise it involves no tangible profit; it
 would be too little used and too often stand idle. But as to what is most
 saleable, the public, as above said, decides: it must be the most
 exchangeable--in other words, the thing that appears good and also appears
 cheap. Thus in the domain of labour our motto must also hold good: "More
 respect for them that know!"
 
 
 
 
 281.
 
 
 THE DANGER OF KINGS.--Democracy has it in its power, without any violent
 means, and only by a lawful pressure steadily exerted, to make kingship
 and emperorship hollow, until only a zero remains, perhaps with the
 significance of every zero in that, while nothing in itself, it multiplies
 a number tenfold if placed on the right side. Kingship and emperorship
 would remain a gorgeous ornament upon the simple and appropriate dress of
 democracy, a beautiful superfluity that democracy allows itself, a relic
 of all the historically venerable, primitive ornaments, nay the symbol of
 history itself, and in this unique position a highly effective thing if,
 as above said, it does not stand alone, but is put on the right side.--In
 order to avoid the danger of this nullification, kings hold by their teeth
 to their dignity as war-lords. To this end they need wars, or in other
 words exceptional circumstances, in which that slow, lawful pressure of
 the democratic forces is relaxed.
 
 
 
 
 282.
 
 
 THE TEACHER A NECESSARY EVIL.--Let us have as few people as possible
 between the productive minds and the hungry and recipient minds! The
 middlemen almost unconsciously adulterate the food which they supply. For
 their work as middlemen they want too high a fee for themselves, and this
 is drawn from the original, productive spirits--namely, interest,
 admiration, leisure, money, and other advantages.--Accordingly, we should
 always look upon the teacher as a necessary evil, just like the merchant;
 as an evil that we should make as small as possible.--Perhaps the
 prevailing distress in Germany has its main cause in the fact that too
 many wish to live and live well by trade (in other words, desiring as far
 as possible to diminish prices for the producer and raise prices for the
 consumer, and thus to profit by the greatest possible loss to both). In
 the same way, we may certainly trace a main cause of the prevailing
 intellectual poverty in the superabundance of teachers. It is because of
 teachers that so little is learnt, and that so badly.
 
 
 
 
 283.
 
 
 THE TAX OF HOMAGE.--Him whom we know and honour,--be he physician, artist,
 or artisan,--who does and produces something for us, we gladly pay as
 highly as we can, often a fee beyond our means. On the other hand, we pay
 the unknown as low a price as possible; here is a contest in which every
 one struggles and makes others struggle for a foot's breadth of land. In
 the work of the known there is something that cannot be bought, the
 sentiment and ingenuity put into his work for our own sake. We think we
 cannot better express our sense of obligation than by a sort of sacrifice
 on our part.--The heaviest tax is the tax of homage. The more competition
 prevails, the more we buy for the unknown and work for the unknown, the
 lower does this tax become, whereas it is really the standard for the
 loftiness of man's spiritual intercourse.
 
 
 
 
 284.
 
 
 THE MEANS TOWARDS GENUINE PEACE.--No government will nowadays admit that it
 maintains an army in order to satisfy occasionally its passion for
 conquest. The army is said to serve only defensive purposes. This
 morality, which justifies self-defence, is called in as the government's
 advocate. This means, however, reserving morality for ourselves and
 immorality for our neighbour, because he must be thought eager for attack
 and conquest if our state is forced to consider means of self-defence.--At
 the same time, by our explanation of our need of an army (because he
 denies the lust of attack just as our state does, and ostensibly also
 maintains his army for defensive reasons), we proclaim him a hypocrite and
 cunning criminal, who would fain seize by surprise, without any fighting,
 a harmless and unwary victim. In this attitude all states face each other
 to-day. They presuppose evil intentions on their neighbour's part and good
 intentions on their own. This hypothesis, however, is an _inhuman_ notion,
 as bad as and worse than war. Nay, at bottom it is a challenge and motive
 to war, foisting as it does upon the neighbouring state the charge of
 immorality, and thus provoking hostile intentions and acts. The doctrine
 of the army as a means of self-defence must be abjured as completely as
 the lust of conquest. Perhaps a memorable day will come when a nation
 renowned in wars and victories, distinguished by the highest development
 of military order and intelligence, and accustomed to make the heaviest
 sacrifice to these objects, will voluntarily exclaim, "We will break our
 swords," and will destroy its whole military system, lock, stock, and
 barrel. Making ourselves defenceless (after having been the most strongly
 defended) from a loftiness of sentiment--that is the means towards genuine
 peace, which must always rest upon a pacific disposition. The so-called
 armed peace that prevails at present in all countries is a sign of a
 bellicose disposition, of a disposition that trusts neither itself nor its
 neighbour, and, partly from hate, partly from fear, refuses to lay down
 its weapons. Better to perish than to hate and fear, and twice as far
 better to perish than to make oneself hated and feared--this must some day
 become the supreme maxim of every political community!--Our liberal
 representatives of the people, as is well known, have not the time for
 reflection on the nature of humanity, or else they would know that they
 are working in vain when they work for "a gradual diminution of the
 military burdens." On the contrary, when the distress of these burdens is
 greatest, the sort of God who alone can help here will be nearest. The
 tree of military glory can only be destroyed at one swoop, with one stroke
 of lightning. But, as you know, lightning comes from the cloud and from
 above.
 
 
 
 
 285.
 
 
 WHETHER PROPERTY CAN BE SQUARED WITH JUSTICE.--When the injustice of
 property is strongly felt (and the hand of the great clock is once more at
 this place), we formulate two methods of relieving this injustice: either
 an equal distribution, or an abolition of private possession and a return
 to State ownership. The latter method is especially dear to the hearts of
 our Socialists, who are angry with that primitive Jew for saying, "Thou
 shalt not steal." In their view the eighth(27) commandment should rather
 run, "Thou shalt not possess."--The former method was frequently tried in
 antiquity, always indeed on a small scale, and yet with poor success. From
 this failure we too may learn. "Equal plots of land" is easily enough
 said, but how much bitterness is aroused by the necessary division and
 separation, by the loss of time-honoured possessions, how much piety is
 wounded and sacrificed! We uproot the foundation of morality when we
 uproot boundary-stones. Again, how much fresh bitterness among the new
 owners, how much envy and looking askance! For there have never been two
 really equal plots of land, and if there were, man's envy of his neighbour
 would prevent him from believing in their equality. And how long would
 this equality, unhealthy and poisoned at the very roots, endure? In a few
 generations, by inheritance, here one plot would come to five owners,
 there five plots to one. Even supposing that men acquiesced in such abuses
 through the enactment of stern laws of inheritance, the same equal plots
 would indeed exist, but there would also be needy malcontents, owning
 nothing but dislike of their kinsmen and neighbours, and longing for a
 general upheaval.--If, however, by the second method we try to restore
 ownership to the community and make the individual but a temporary tenant,
 we interfere with agriculture. For man is opposed to all that is only a
 transitory possession, unblessed with his own care and sacrifice. With
 such property he behaves in freebooter fashion, as robber or as worthless
 spendthrift. When Plato declares that self-seeking would be removed with
 the abolition of property, we may answer him that, if self-seeking be
 taken away, man will no longer possess the four cardinal virtues either;
 as we must say that the most deadly plague could not injure mankind so
 terribly as if vanity were one day to disappear. Without vanity and
 self-seeking what are human virtues? By this I am far from meaning that
 these virtues are but varied names and masks for these two qualities.
 Plato's Utopian refrain, which is still sung by Socialists, rests upon a
 deficient knowledge of men. He lacked the historical science of moral
 emotions, the insight into the origin of the good and useful
 characteristics of the human soul. He believed, like all antiquity, in
 good and evil as in black and white--that is to say, in a radical
 difference between good and bad men and good and bad qualities.--In order
 that property may henceforth inspire more confidence and become more
 moral, we should keep open all the paths of work for small fortunes, but
 should prevent the effortless and sudden acquisition of wealth.
 Accordingly, we should take all the branches of transport and trade which
 favour the accumulation of large fortunes--especially, therefore, the money
 market--out of the hands of private persons or private companies, and look
 upon those who own too much, just as upon those who own nothing, as types
 fraught with danger to the community.
 
 
 
 
 286.
 
 
 THE VALUE OF LABOUR.--If we try to determine the value of labour by the
 amount of time, industry, good or bad will, constraint, inventiveness or
 laziness, honesty or make-believe bestowed upon it, the valuation can
 never be a just one. For the whole personality would have to be thrown
 into the scale, and this is impossible. Here the motto is, "Judge not!"
 But after all the cry for justice is the cry we now hear from those who
 are dissatisfied with the present valuation of labour. If we reflect
 further we find every person non-responsible for his product, the labour;
 hence merit can never be derived therefrom, and every labour is as good or
 as bad as it must be through this or that necessary concatenation of
 forces and weaknesses, abilities and desires. The worker is not at liberty
 to say whether he shall work or not, or to decide how he shall work. Only
 the standpoints of usefulness, wider and narrower, have created the
 valuation of labour. What we at present call justice does very well in
 this sphere as a highly refined utility, which does not only consider the
 moment and exploit the immediate opportunity, but looks to the permanence
 of all conditions, and thus also keeps in view the well-being of the
 worker, his physical and spiritual contentment: in order that he and his
 posterity may work well for our posterity and become trustworthy for
 longer periods than the individual span of human life. The _exploitation_
 of the worker was, as we now understand, a piece of folly, a robbery at
 the expense of the future, a jeopardisation of society. We almost have the
 war now, and in any case the expense of maintaining peace, of concluding
 treaties and winning confidence, will henceforth be very great, because
 the folly of the exploiters was very great and long-lasting.
 
 
 
 
 287.
 
 
 OF THE STUDY OF THE SOCIAL BODY.--The worst drawback for the modern student
 of economics and political science in Europe, and especially in Germany,
 is that the actual conditions, instead of exemplifying rules, illustrate
 exceptions or stages of transition and extinction. We must therefore learn
 to look beyond actually existing conditions and, for example, turn our
 eyes to distant North America, where we can still contemplate and
 investigate, if we will, the initial and normal movement of the social
 body. In Germany such a study requires arduous and historical research,
 or, as I have suggested, a telescope.
 
 
 
 
 288.
 
 
 HOW FAR MACHINERY HUMILIATES.--Machinery is impersonal; it robs the piece
 of work of its pride, of the individual merits and defects that cling to
 all work that is not machine-made--in other words, of its bit of humanity.
 Formerly, all buying from handicraftsmen meant a mark of distinction for
 their personalities, with whose productions people surrounded themselves.
 Furniture and dress accordingly became the symbols of mutual valuation and
 personal connection. Nowadays, on the other hand, we seem to live in the
 midst of anonymous and impersonal serfdom.--We must not buy the
 facilitation of labour too dear.
 
 
 
 
 289.
 
 
 CENTURY-OLD QUARANTINE.--Democratic institutions are centres of quarantine
 against the old plague of tyrannical desires. As such they are extremely
 useful and extremely tedious.
 
 
 
 
 290.
 
 
 THE MOST DANGEROUS PARTISAN.--The most dangerous partisan is he whose
 defection would involve the ruin of the whole party--in other words, the
 best partisan.
 
 
 
 
 291.
 
 
 DESTINY AND THE STOMACH.--A piece more or less of bread and butter in the
 jockey's body is occasionally the decisive factor in races and bets, and
 thus in the good and bad luck of thousands.--So long as the destiny of
 nations depends upon diplomats, the stomachs of diplomats will always be
 the object of patriotic misgivings. _Quousque tandem_....
 
 
 
 
 292.
 
 
 THE VICTORY OF DEMOCRACY.--All political powers nowadays attempt to exploit
 the fear of Socialism for their own strengthening. Yet in the long run
 democracy alone gains the advantage, for _all_ parties are now compelled
 to flatter "the masses" and grant them facilities and liberties of all
 kinds, with the result that the masses finally become omnipotent. The
 masses are as far as possible removed from Socialism as a doctrine of
 altering the acquisition of property. If once they get the steering-wheel
 into their hands, through great majorities in their Parliaments, they will
 attack with progressive taxation the whole dominant system of capitalists,
 merchants, and financiers, and will in fact slowly create a middle class
 which may forget Socialism like a disease that has been overcome.--The
 practical result of this increasing democratisation will next be a
 European league of nations, in which each individual nation, delimited by
 the proper geographical frontiers, has the position of a canton with its
 separate rights. Small account will be taken of the historic memories of
 previously existing nations, because the pious affection for these
 memories will be gradually uprooted under the democratic regime, with all
 its craze for novelty and experiment. The corrections of frontiers that
 will prove necessary will be so carried out as to serve the interests of
 the great cantons and at the same time that of the whole federation, but
 not that of any venerable memories. To find the standpoints for these
 corrections will be the task of future diplomats, who will have to be at
 the same time students of civilisation, agriculturists, and commercial
 experts, with no armies but motives and utilities at their back. Then only
 will foreign and home politics be inseparably connected, whereas to-day
 the latter follows its haughty dictator, and gleans in sorry baskets the
 stubble that is left over from the harvest of the former.
 
 
 
 
 293.
 
 
 GOAL AND MEANS OF DEMOCRACY.--Democracy tries to create and guarantee
 independence for as many as possible in their opinions, way of life, and
 occupation. For this purpose democracy must withhold the political
 suffrage both from those who have nothing and from those who are really
 rich, as being the two intolerable classes of men. At the removal of these
 classes it must always work, because they are continually calling its task
 in question. In the same way democracy must prevent all measures that seem
 to aim at party organisation. For the three great foes of independence, in
 that threefold sense, are the have-nots, the rich, and the parties.--I
 speak of democracy as of a thing to come. What at present goes by that
 name is distinguished from older forms of government only by the fact that
 it drives with new horses; the roads and the wheels are the same as of
 yore.--Has the danger really become less with _these_ conveyances of the
 commonwealth?
 
 
 
 
 294.
 
 
 DISCRETION AND SUCCESS.--That great quality of discretion, which is
 fundamentally the virtue of virtues, their ancestress and queen, has in
 common life by no means always success on its side. The wooer would find
 himself deceived if he had wooed that virtue only for the sake of success.
 For it is rated by practical people as suspicious, and is confused with
 cunning and hypocrisy: he who obviously lacks discretion, the man who
 quickly grasps and sometimes misses his grasp, has prejudice on his
 side--he is an honest, trustworthy fellow. Practical people, accordingly,
 do not like the prudent man, thinking he is to them a danger. Moreover, we
 often assume the prudent man to be anxious, preoccupied,
 pedantic--unpractical, butterfly people find him uncomfortable, because he
 does not live in their happy-go-lucky way, without thinking of actions and
 duties; he appears among them as their embodied conscience, and the bright
 day is dimmed to their eyes before his gaze. Thus when success and
 popularity fail him, he may often say by way of private consolation, "So
 high are the taxes you have to pay for the possession of the most precious
 of human commodities--still it is worth the price!"
 
 
 
 
 295.
 
 
 _ET IN ARCADIA EGO._--I looked down, over waves of hills, to a milky-green
 lake, through firs and pines austere with age; rocky crags of all shapes
 about me, the soil gay with flowers and grasses. A herd of cattle moved,
 stretched, and expanded itself before me; single cows and groups in the
 distance, in the clearest evening light, hard by the forest of pines;
 others nearer and darker; all in calm and eventide contentment. My watch
 pointed to half-past six. The bull of the herd had stepped into the white
 foaming brook, and went forward slowly, now striving against, now giving
 way to his tempestuous course; thus, no doubt, he took his sort of fierce
 pleasure. Two dark brown beings, of Bergamasque origin, tended the herd,
 the girl dressed almost like a boy. On the left, overhanging cliffs and
 fields of snow above broad belts of woodland; to the right, two enormous
 ice-covered peaks, high above me, shimmering in the veil of the sunny
 haze--all large, silent, and bright. The beauty of the whole was
 awe-inspiring and induced to a mute worship of the moment and its
 revelation. Unconsciously, as if nothing could be more natural, you
 peopled this pure, clear world of light (which had no trace of yearning,
 of expectancy, of looking forward or backward) with Greek heroes. You felt
 it all as Poussin and his school felt--at once heroic and idyllic.--So
 individual men too have lived, constantly feeling themselves in the world
 and the world in themselves, and among them one of the greatest men, the
 inventor of a heroico-idyllic form of philosophy--Epicurus.
 
 
 
 
 296.
 
 
 COUNTING AND MEASURING.--The art of seeing many things, of weighing one
 with another, of reckoning one thing with another and constructing from
 them a rapid conclusion, a fairly correct sum--that goes to make a great
 politician or general or merchant. This quality is, in fact, a power of
 speedy mental calculation. The art of seeing _one_ thing alone, of finding
 therein the sole motive for action, the guiding principle of all other
 action, goes to make the hero and also the fanatic. This quality means a
 dexterity in measuring with one scale.
 
 
 
 
 297.
 
 
 NOT TO SEE TOO SOON.--As long as we undergo some experience, we must give
 ourselves up to the experience and shut our eyes--in other words, not
 become observers of what we are undergoing. For to observe would disturb
 good digestion of the experience, and instead of wisdom we should gain
 nothing but dyspepsia.
 
 
 
 
 298.
 
 
 FROM THE PRACTICE OF THE WISE.--To become wise we must _will_ to undergo
 certain experiences, and accordingly leap into their jaws. This, it is
 true, is very dangerous. Many a "sage" has been eaten up in the process.
 
 
 
 
 299.
 
 
 EXHAUSTION OF THE INTELLECT.--Our occasional coldness and indifference
 towards people, which is imputed to us as hardness and defect of
 character, is often only an exhaustion of the intellect. In this state
 other men are to us, as we are to ourselves, tedious or immaterial.
 
 
 
 
 300.
 
 
 "THE ONE THING NEEDFUL."--If we are clever, the one thing we need is to
 have joy in our hearts. "Ah," adds some one, "if we are clever, the best
 thing we can do is to be wise."
 
 
 
 
 301.
 
 
 A SIGN OF LOVE.--Some one said, "There are two persons about whom I have
 never thought deeply. That is a sign of my love for them."
 
 
 
 
 302.
 
 
 HOW WE SEEK TO IMPROVE BAD ARGUMENTS.--Many a man adds a bit of his
 personality to his bad arguments, as if they would thus go better and
 change into straight and good arguments. In the same way, players at
 skittles, even after a throw, try to give a direction to the ball by turns
 and gestures.
 
 
 
 
 303.
 
 
 HONESTY.--It is but a small thing to be a pattern sort of man with regard
 to rights and property--for instance (to name trifling points, which of
 course give a better proof of this sort of pattern nature than great
 examples), if as a boy one never steals fruit from another's orchard, and
 as a man never walks on unmown fields. It is but little; you are then
 still only a "law-abiding person," with just that degree of morality of
 which a "society," a group of human beings, is capable.
 
 
 
 
 304.
 
 
 "MAN!"--What is the vanity of the vainest individual as compared with the
 vanity which the most modest person feels when he thinks of his position
 in nature and in the world as "Man!"
 
 
 
 
 305.
 
 
 THE MOST NECESSARY GYMNASTIC.--Through deficiency in self-control in small
 matters a similar deficiency on great occasions slowly arises. Every day
 on which we have not at least once denied ourselves some _trifle_ is
 turned to bad use and a danger to the next day. This gymnastic is
 indispensable if we wish to maintain the joy of being our own master.
 
 
 
 
 306.
 
 
 LOSING OURSELVES.--When we have first found ourselves, we must understand
 how from time to time to _lose_ ourselves and then to find ourselves
 again.--This is true on the assumption that we are thinkers. A thinker
 finds it a drawback always to be tied to one person.
 
 
 
 
 307.
 
 
 WHEN IT IS NECESSARY TO PART.--You must, for a time at least, part from
 that which you want to know and measure. Only when you have left a city do
 you see how high its towers rise above its houses.
 
 
 
 
 308.
 
 
 AT NOONTIDE.--He to whom an active and stormy morning of life is allotted,
 at the noontide of life feels his soul overcome by a strange longing for a
 rest that may last for months and years. All grows silent around him,
 voices sound farther and farther in the distance, the sun shines straight
 down upon him. On a hidden woodland sward he sees the great God Pan
 sleeping, and with Pan Nature seems to him to have gone to sleep with an
 expression of eternity on their faces. He wants nothing, he troubles about
 nothing; his heart stands still, only his eye lives. It is a death with
 waking eyes. Then man sees much that he never saw before, and, so far as
 his eye can reach, all is woven into and as it were buried in a net of
 light. He feels happy, but it is a heavy, very heavy kind of
 happiness.--Then at last the wind stirs in the trees, noontide is over,
 life carries him away again, life with its blind eyes, and its tempestuous
 retinue behind it--desire, illusion, oblivion, enjoyment, destruction,
 decay. And so comes evening, more stormy and more active than was even the
 morning.--To the really active man these prolonged phases of cognition seem
 almost uncanny and morbid, but not unpleasant.
 
 
 
 
 309.
 
 
 TO BEWARE OF ONE'S PORTRAIT-PAINTER.--A great painter, who in a portrait
 has revealed and put on canvas the fullest expression and look of which a
 man is capable, will almost always think, when he sees the man later in
 real life, that he is only looking at a caricature.
 
 
 
 
 310.
 
 
 THE TWO PRINCIPLES OF THE NEW LIFE.--_First Principle_: to arrange one's
 life on the most secure and tangible basis, not as hitherto upon the most
 distant, undetermined, and cloudy foundation. _Second Principle_: to
 establish the rank of the nearest and nearer things, and of the more and
 less secure, before one arranges one's life and directs it to a final end.
 
 
 
 
 311.
 
 
 DANGEROUS IRRITABILITY.--Talented men who are at the same time _idle_ will
 always appear somewhat irritated when one of their friends has
 accomplished a thorough piece of work. Their jealousy is awakened, they
 are ashamed of their own laziness, or rather, they fear that their active
 friend will now despise them even more than before. In such a mood they
 criticise the new achievement, and, to the utter astonishment of the
 author, their criticism becomes a revenge.
 
 
 
 
 312.
 
 
 DESTRUCTIONS OF ILLUSIONS.--Illusions are certainly expensive amusements;
 but the destruction of illusions is still more expensive, if looked upon
 as an amusement, as it undoubtedly is by some people.
 
 
 
 
 313.
 
 
 THE MONOTONE OF THE "SAGE."--Cows sometimes have a look of wondering which
 stops short on the path to questioning. In the eye of the higher
 intelligence, on the other hand, the _nil admirari_ is spread out like the
 monotony of the cloudless sky.
 
 
 
 
 314.
 
 
 NOT TO BE ILL TOO LONG.--We should beware of being ill too long. The
 lookers-on become impatient of their customary duty of showing sympathy,
 because they find it too much trouble to maintain the appearance of this
 emotion for any length of time. Then they immediately pass to suspicion of
 our character, with the conclusion: "You deserve to be ill, and we need no
 longer be at pains to show our sympathy."
 
 
 
 
 315.
 
 
 A HINT TO ENTHUSIASTS.--He who likes to be carried away, and would fain be
 carried on high, must beware lest he become too heavy. For instance, he
 must not learn much, and especially not let himself be crammed with
 science. Science makes men ponderous--take care, ye enthusiasts!
 
 
 
 
 316.
 
 
 KNOWLEDGE OF HOW TO SURPRISE ONESELF.--He who would see himself as he is,
 must know how to _surprise_ himself, torch in hand. For with the mind it
 is as with the body: whoever is accustomed to look at himself in the glass
 forgets his ugliness, and only recognises it again by means of the
 portrait-painter. Yet he even grows used to the picture and forgets his
 ugliness all over again.--Herein we see the universal law that man cannot
 endure unalterable ugliness, unless for a moment. He forgets or denies it
 in all cases.--The moralists must reckon upon that "moment" for bringing
 forward their truths.
 
 
 
 
 317.
 
 
 OPINIONS AND FISH.--We are possessors of our opinions as of fish--that is,
 in so far as we are possessors of a fish pond. We must go fishing and have
 luck--then we have _our_ fish, _our_ opinions. I speak here of live
 opinions, of live fish. Others are content to possess a cabinet of
 fossils--and, in their head, "convictions."
 
 
 
 
 318.
 
 
 SIGNS OF FREEDOM AND SERVITUDE.--To satisfy one's needs so far as possible
 oneself, even if imperfectly, is the path towards freedom in mind and
 personality. To satisfy many even superfluous needs, and that as fully as
 possible, is a training for servitude. The Sophist Hippias, who himself
 earned and made all that he wore within and without, is the representative
 of the highest freedom of mind and personality. It does not matter whether
 all is done equally well and perfectly--pride can repair the damaged
 places.
 
 
 
 
 319.
 
 
 BELIEF IN ONESELF.--In our times we mistrust every one who believes in
 himself. Formerly this was enough to make people believe in one. The
 recipe for finding faith now runs: "Spare not thyself! In order to set thy
 opinion in a credible light, thou must first set fire to thy own hut!"
 
 
 
 
 320.
 
 
 AT ONCE RICHER AND POORER.--I know a man who accustomed himself even in
 childhood to think well of the intellectuality of mankind--in other words,
 of their real devotion as regards things of the intellect, their unselfish
 preference for that which is recognised as true--but who had at the same
 time a modest or even depreciatory view of his own brain (judgment,
 memory, presence of mind, imagination). He set no value on himself when he
 compared himself with others. Now in the course of years he was compelled,
 first once and then in a hundred ways, to revise this verdict. One would
 have thought he would be thoroughly satisfied and delighted. Such, in
 fact, was to some extent the case, but, as he once said, "Yet a bitterness
 of the deepest dye is mingled with my feeling, such as I did not know in
 earlier life; for since I learnt to value men and myself more correctly,
 my intellect seems to me of less use. I scarcely think I can now do any
 good at all with it, because the minds of others cannot understand the
 good. I now always see before me the frightful gulf between those who
 could give help and those who need help. So I am troubled by the
 misfortune of having my intellect to myself and of being forced to enjoy
 it alone so far as it can give any enjoyment. But to give is more blessed
 than to possess, and what is the richest man in the solitude of a
 desert?"(28)
 
 
 
 
 321.
 
 
 HOW WE SHOULD ATTACK.--The reasons for which men believe or do not believe
 are in very few people as strong as they might be. As a rule, in order to
 shake a belief it is far from necessary to use the heaviest weapon of
 attack. Many attain their object by merely making the attack with some
 noise--in fact, pop-guns are often enough. In dealing with very vain
 persons, the semblance of a strong attack is enough. They think they are
 being taken quite seriously, and readily give way.
 
 
 
 
 322.
 
 
 DEATH.--Through the certain prospect of death a precious, fragrant drop of
 frivolity might be mixed with every life--and now, you singular
 druggist-souls, you have made of death a drop of poison, unpleasant to
 taste, which makes the whole of life hideous.
 
 
 
 
 323.
 
 
 REPENTANCE.--Never allow repentance free play, but say at once to yourself,
 "That would be adding a second piece of folly to the first." If you have
 worked evil, you must bethink yourself of doing good. If you are punished
 for your actions, submit to the punishment with the feeling that by this
 very submission you are somehow doing good, in that you are deterring
 others from falling into the same error. Every malefactor who is punished
 has a right to consider himself a benefactor to mankind.
 
 
 
 
 324.
 
 
 BECOMING A THINKER.--How can any one become a thinker if he does not spend
 at least a third part of the day without passions, men, and books?
 
 
 
 
 325.
 
 
 THE BEST REMEDY.--A little health on and off is the best remedy for the
 invalid.
 
 
 
 
 326.
 
 
 DON'T TOUCH.--There are dreadful people who, instead of solving a problem,
 complicate it for those who deal with it and make it harder to solve.(29)
 Whoever does not know how to hit the nail on the head should be entreated
 not to hit the nail at all.
 
 
 
 
 327.
 
 
 FORGETTING NATURE.--We speak of Nature, and, in doing so, forget ourselves:
 we ourselves are Nature, _quand meme_.--Consequently, Nature is something
 quite different from what we feel on hearing her name pronounced.
 
 
 
 
 328.
 
 
 PROFUNDITY AND ENNUI.--In the case of profound men, as of deep wells, it
 takes a long time before anything that is thrown into them reaches the
 bottom. The spectators, who generally do not wait long enough, too readily
 look upon such a man as callous and hard--or even as boring.
 
 
 
 
 329.
 
 
 WHEN IT IS TIME TO VOW FIDELITY TO ONESELF.--We sometimes go astray in an
 intellectual direction which does not correspond to our talents. For a
 time we struggle heroically against wind and tide, really against
 ourselves; but finally we become weary and we pant. What we accomplish
 gives us no real pleasure, since we think that we have paid too heavy a
 price for these successes. We even despair of our productivity, of our
 future, perhaps in the midst of victory.--Finally, finally we turn back--and
 then the wind swells our sails and bears us into our smooth water. What
 bliss! How certain of victory we feel! Only now do we know what we are and
 what we intend, and now we vow fidelity to ourselves, and have a right to
 do so--as men that know.
 
 
 
 
 330.
 
 
 WEATHER PROPHETS.--Just as the clouds reveal to us the direction of the
 wind high above our heads, so the lightest and freest spirits give signs
 of future weather by their course. The wind in the valley and the
 market-place opinions of to-day have no significance for the future, but
 only for the past.
 
 
 
 
 331.
 
 
 CONTINUAL ACCELERATION.--Those who begin slowly and find it hard to become
 familiar with a subject, sometimes acquire afterwards the quality of
 continual acceleration--so that in the end no one knows where the current
 will take them.
 
 
 
 
 332.
 
 
 THE THREE GOOD THINGS.--Greatness, calm, sunlight--these three embrace all
 that a thinker desires and also demands of himself: his hopes and duties,
 his claims in the intellectual and moral sphere, nay even in his daily
 manner of life and the scenic background of his residence. Corresponding
 to these three things are, firstly thoughts that exalt, secondly thoughts
 that soothe, and thirdly thoughts that illuminate--but, fourthly, thoughts
 that share in all these three qualities, in which all earthly things are
 transfigured. This is the kingdom of the great _trinity of joy_.
 
 
 
 
 333.
 
 
 DYING FOR "TRUTH."--We should not let ourselves be burnt for our
 opinions--we are not so certain of them as all that. But we might let
 ourselves be burnt for the right of possessing and changing our opinions.
 
 
 
 
 334.
 
 
 MARKET VALUE.--If we wish to pass exactly for what we are, we must be
 something that has its market value. As, however, only objects in common
 use have a market value, this desire is the consequence either of shrewd
 modesty or of stupid immodesty.
 
 
 
 
 335.
 
 
 MORAL FOR BUILDERS.--We must remove the scaffolding when the house has been
 built.
 
 
 
 
 336.
 
 
 SOPHOCLEANISM.--Who poured more water into wine than the Greeks? Sobriety
 and grace combined--that was the aristocratic privilege of the Athenian in
 the time of Sophocles and after. Imitate that whoever can! In life and in
 work!
 
 
 
 
 337.
 
 
 HEROISM.--The heroic consists in doing something great (or in nobly _not_
 doing something) without feeling oneself to be in competition _with_ or
 _before_ others. The hero carries with him, wherever he goes, the
 wilderness and the holy land with inviolable precincts.
 
 
 
 
 338.
 
 
 FINDING OUR "DOUBLE" IN NATURE.--In some country places we rediscover
 ourselves, with a delightful shudder: it is the pleasantest way of finding
 our "double."--How happy must he be who has that feeling just here, in this
 perpetually sunny October air, in this happy elfin play of the wind from
 morn till eve, in this clearest of atmospheres and mildest of
 temperatures, in all the serious yet cheerful landscape of hill, lake, and
 forest on this plateau, which has encamped fearlessly next to the terrors
 of eternal snow: here, where Italy and Finland have joined hands, and
 where the home of all the silver colour-tones of Nature seems to be
 established. How happy must he be who can say, "True, there are many
 grander and finer pieces of scenery, but this is so familiar and intimate
 to me, related by blood, nay even more to me!"
 
 
 
 
 339.
 
 
 AFFABILITY OF THE SAGE.--The sage will unconsciously be affable in his
 intercourse with other men, as a prince would be, and will readily treat
 them as equals, in spite of all differences of talent, rank, and
 character. For this characteristic, however, so soon as people notice it,
 he is most heavily censured.
 
 
 
 
 340.
 
 
 GOLD.--All that is gold does not glitter. A soft sheen characterises the
 most precious metal.
 
 
 
 
 341.
 
 
 WHEEL AND DRAG.--The wheel and the drag have different duties, but also one
 in common--that of hurting each other.
 
 
 
 
 342.
 
 
 DISTURBANCES OF THE THINKER.--All that interrupts the thinker in his
 thoughts (disturbs him, as people say) must be regarded by him calmly, as
 a new model who comes in by the door to offer himself to the artist.
 Interruptions are the ravens which bring food to the recluse.
 
 
 
 
 343.
 
 
 BEING VERY CLEVER.--Being very clever keeps men young, but they must put up
 with being considered, for that very reason, older than they are. For men
 read the handwriting of the intellect as signs of _experience_--that is, of
 having lived much and evilly, of suffering, error, and repentance. Hence,
 if we are very clever and show it, we appear to them older and wickeder
 than we are.
 
 
 
 
 344.
 
 
 HOW WE MUST CONQUER.--We ought not to desire victory if we only have the
 prospect of overcoming our opponent by a hair's breadth. A good victory
 makes the vanquished rejoice, and must have about it something divine
 which spares _humiliation_.
 
 
 
 
 345.
 
 
 AN ILLUSION OF SUPERIOR MINDS.--Superior minds find it difficult to free
 themselves from an illusion; for they imagine that they excite envy among
 the mediocre and are looked upon as exceptions. As a matter of fact,
 however, they are looked upon as superfluous, as something that would not
 be missed if it did not exist.
 
 
 
 
 346.
 
 
 DEMANDED BY CLEANLINESS.--Changing opinions is in some natures as much
 demanded by cleanliness as changing clothes. In the case of other natures
 it is only demanded by vanity.
 
 
 
 
 347.
 
 
 ALSO WORTHY OF A HERO.--Here is a hero who did nothing but shake the tree
 as soon as the fruits were ripe. Do you think that too small a thing?
 Well, just look at the tree that he shook.
 
 
 
 
 348.
 
 
 A GAUGE FOR WISDOM.--The growth of wisdom may be gauged exactly by the
 diminution of ill-temper.
 
 
 
 
 349.
 
 
 EXPRESSING AN ERROR DISAGREEABLY.--It is not to every one's taste to hear
 truth pleasantly expressed. But let no one at least believe that error
 will become truth if it is disagreeably expressed.
 
 
 
 
 350.
 
 
 THE GOLDEN MAXIM.--Man has been bound with many chains, in order that he
 may forget to comport himself like an animal. And indeed he has become
 more gentle, more intellectual, more joyous, more meditative than any
 animal. But now he still suffers from having carried his chains so long,
 from having been so long without pure air and free movement--these chains,
 however, are, as I repeat again and again, the ponderous and significant
 errors of moral, religious, and metaphysical ideas. Only when the disease
 of chains is overcome is the first great goal reached--the separation of
 man from the brute. At present we stand in the midst of our work of
 removing the chains, and in doing so we need the strictest precautions.
 Only the ennobled man may be granted freedom of spirit; to him alone comes
 the alleviation of life and heals his wounds; he is the first who can say
 that he lives for the sake of joy, with no other aim; in any other mouth,
 his motto of "Peace around me and goodwill towards all the most familiar
 things," would be dangerous.--In this motto for single individuals he is
 thinking of an ancient saying, magnificent and pathetic, which applied to
 all, and has remained standing above all mankind, as a motto and a beacon
 whereby shall perish all who adorn their banner too early--the rock on
 which Christianity foundered. It is not even yet time, it seems, for _all
 men_ to have the lot of those shepherds who saw the heavens lit up above
 them and heard the words: "Peace on earth and goodwill to one another
 among men."--It is still the age of the individual.
 
 
 
 
                   -------------------------------------
 
 
 
 
 _The Shadow_: Of all that you have enunciated, nothing pleased me more
 than one promise: "Ye want again to be good neighbours to the most
 familiar things." This will be to the advantage of us poor shadows too.
 For do but confess that you have hitherto been only too fond of reviling
 us.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Reviling? But why did you never defend yourselves? After
 all, you were very close to our ears.
 
 _The Shadow_: It seemed to us that we were too near you to have a right to
 talk of ourselves.
 
 _The Wanderer_: What delicacy! Ah, you shadows are "better men"(30) than
 we, I can see that.
 
 _The Shadow_: And yet you called us "importunate"--us, who know one thing
 at least extremely well: how to be silent and to wait--no Englishman knows
 it better. It is true we are very, very often in the retinue of men, but
 never as their bondsmen. When man shuns light, we shun man--so far, at
 least, we are free.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Ah, light shuns man far oftener, and then also you abandon
 him.
 
 _The Shadow_: It has often pained me to leave you. I am eager for
 knowledge, and much in man has remained obscure to me, because I cannot
 always be in his company. At the price of complete knowledge of man I
 would gladly be your slave.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Do you know, do I know, whether you would not then
 unwittingly become master instead of slave? Or would remain a slave
 indeed, but would lead a life of humiliation and disgust because you
 despised your master? Let us both be content with freedom such as you have
 enjoyed up to now--you and I! For the sight of a being not free would
 embitter my greatest joys; all that is best would be repugnant to me if
 any one had to share it with me--I will not hear of any slaves about me.
 That is why I do not care for the dog, that lazy, tail-wagging parasite,
 who first became "doggish" as the slave of man, and of whom they still say
 that he is loyal to his master and follows him like----
 
 _The Shadow_: Like his shadow, they say. Perhaps I have already followed
 you too long to-day? It has been the longest day, but we are nearing the
 end; be patient a little more! The grass is damp; I am feeling chilly.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Oh, is it already time to part? And I had to hurt you in
 the end--I saw you became darker.
 
 _The Shadow_: I blushed the only colour I have at command. I remembered
 that I had often lain at your feet like a dog, and that you then----
 
 _The Wanderer_: Can I not with all speed do something to please you? Have
 you no wish?
 
 _The Shadow_: None, except perhaps the wish that the philosophic "dog"(31)
 expressed to Alexander the Great--just move a little out of my light; I
 feel cold.
 
 _The Wanderer_: What am I to do?
 
 _The Shadow_: Walk under those fir-trees and look around you towards the
 mountains; the sun is sinking.
 
 _The Wanderer_: Where are you? Where are you?
 
 
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES
 
 
     1 "Foreword" and "forword" would be the literal rendering of the play
       on words.--TR.
 
     2 The allusion is to the ending of the Second Part of Goethe's
       _Faust_--"das Ewig Weibliche Zieht uns _hinan_!"--"The Eternal
       Feminine Draweth us _on_!"--TR.
 
     3 It has been attempted to render the play on "Gewissen" and
       "Wissen."--TR.
 
     4 Cf. John i. 1.--TR.
 
     5 The German word _Mitfreude_, coined by Nietzsche in opposition to
       _Mitleid_ (sympathy), is untranslateable.--TR.
 
     6 Herostratus of Ephesus (in 356 B.C.) set fire to the temple of Diana
       in order (as he confessed on the rack) to gain notoriety.--TR.
 
     7 Quotation from Schiller, _Don Carlos_, i. 5.--TR.
 
     8 This, of course, refers to Jesus and Socrates.--TR.
 
     9 Queen of the Amazons, slain by Achilles in the Trojan War.--TR.
 
    10 From Schiller, _Wallenstein's Lager_: "Wer den Besten seiner Zeit
       genug gethan, der hat gelebt fuer alle Zeiten" ("He that has
       satisfied the best men of his time has lived for all time").
 
    11 In German _Barockstil_, _i.e._ the degenerate post-Renaissance style
       in art and literature, which spread from Italy in the seventeenth
       century.--TR.
 
    12 The original word, _Freizuegig_, means, in the modern German Empire,
       possessing the free right of migration, without pecuniary burdens or
       other restrictions, from one German state to another. The play on
       words in _Zug zur Freiheit_ ("impulse to freedom") is
       untranslateable.--TR.
 
    13 Nietzsche seems to allude to his own case, for he ultimately
       contracted a myopia which bordered on blindness.--TR.
 
    14 The play on _bergen_ (shelter) and _verbergen_ (hide) is
       untranslateable.--TR.
 
    15 Allusion to German proverb: "Where there is nothing, the Emperor has
       lost his rights."--TR.
 
    16 Genesis xiii. 9.--TR.
 
    17 Luke viii. 33.--TR.
 
    18 The play on Freudenschaften (_i.e._ pleasure-giving passions) and
       _Leidenschaften_ (_i.e._ pain-giving passions) is often used by
       Nietzsche, and is untranslateable.--_Tr._
 
    19 The wife of the Stoic Thrasea Paetus, when their complicity in the
       great conspiracy of 65 A.D. against Nero was discovered, is reported
       to have said as she committed suicide, "It doesn't hurt,
       Paetus."--_Tr._
 
    20 It is interesting to compare this judgment with Carlyle's praise of
       Jean Paul. The dressing-gown is an allusion to Jean Paul's favourite
       costume.--TR.
 
    21 The German copyright expires thirty years after publication.--TR.
 
    22 Nietzsche himself was extremely short-sighted.--TR.
 
    23 In the sixth century B.C. Pythagoras founded at Croton a "school"
       somewhat resembling a monastic order. Among the ordeals for
       novitiates was enforced silence for five years.--TR.
 
    24 In the German _Aufklaerung_ there is a play on the sense "clearing
       up" (of weather) and "enlightenment."--TR.
 
    25 Stendhal.--TR.
 
    26 A transposition of _sacrifizio dell' intelletto_, the Jesuit
       maxim.--TR.
 
    27 The original, by a curious slip, has "seventh."--TR.
 
    28 Clearly autobiographical. Nietzsche, like all great men, passed
       through a period of modesty and doubt.--TR.
 
    29 Nietzsche here alludes to his own countrymen.--TR.
 
    30 An allusion to the poem "Der Wilde" (The Savage) by Saeume, which
       ends with the line, "Sehet, wir wilden sind doch bessere Menschen"
       (Behold, after all, we savages are better men).--TR.
 
    31 Diogenes, founder of the Cynic school, which derived its name from
       {~GREEK SMALL LETTER KAPPA~}{~GREEK SMALL LETTER UPSILON~}{~GREEK SMALL LETTER OMEGA WITH OXIA~}{~GREEK SMALL LETTER NU~} (dog).--TR.
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Gary Rees, Matthew Wheaton and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
 book was produced from scanned images of public domain
 material from the Google Print project.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
     HUMAN, ALL TOO HUMAN
 
     A BOOK FOR FREE SPIRITS
 
     BY FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
 
     TRANSLATED BY ALEXANDER HARVEY
 
     CHICAGO
     CHARLES H. KERR & COMPANY
     1908
 
 
     Copyright 1908
     By Charles H. Kerr & Company
 
 
 
 
     CONTENTS
 
 
     AUTHOR'S PREFACE
 
     OF THE FIRST AND LAST THINGS
 
     HISTORY OF THE MORAL FEELINGS
 
     THE RELIGIOUS LIFE
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 1
 
 It is often enough, and always with great surprise, intimated to me that
 there is something both ordinary and unusual in all my writings, from
 the "Birth of Tragedy" to the recently published "Prelude to a
 Philosophy of the Future": they all contain, I have been told, snares
 and nets for short sighted birds, and something that is almost a
 constant, subtle, incitement to an overturning of habitual opinions and
 of approved customs. What!? Everything is merely--human--all too human?
 With this exclamation my writings are gone through, not without a
 certain dread and mistrust of ethic itself and not without a disposition
 to ask the exponent of evil things if those things be not simply
 misrepresented. My writings have been termed a school of distrust, still
 more of disdain: also, and more happily, of courage, audacity even. And
 in fact, I myself do not believe that anybody ever looked into the world
 with a distrust as deep as mine, seeming, as I do, not simply the timely
 advocate of the devil, but, to employ theological terms, an enemy and
 challenger of God; and whosoever has experienced any of the consequences
 of such deep distrust, anything of the chills and the agonies of
 isolation to which such an unqualified difference of standpoint condemns
 him endowed with it, will also understand how often I must have sought
 relief and self-forgetfulness from any source--through any object of
 veneration or enmity, of scientific seriousness or wanton lightness;
 also why I, when I could not find what I was in need of, had to fashion
 it for myself, counterfeiting it or imagining it (and what poet or
 writer has ever done anything else, and what other purpose can all the
 art in the world possibly have?) That which I always stood most in need
 of in order to effect my cure and self-recovery was faith, faith enough
 not to be thus isolated, not to look at life from so singular a point of
 view--a magic apprehension (in eye and mind) of relationship and
 equality, a calm confidence in friendship, a blindness, free from
 suspicion and questioning, to two sidedness; a pleasure in externals,
 superficialities, the near, the accessible, in all things possessed of
 color, skin and seeming. Perhaps I could be fairly reproached with much
 "art" in this regard, many fine counterfeitings; for example, that,
 wisely or wilfully, I had shut my eyes to Schopenhauer's blind will
 towards ethic, at a time when I was already clear sighted enough on the
 subject of ethic; likewise that I had deceived myself concerning Richard
 Wagner's incurable romanticism, as if it were a beginning and not an
 end; likewise concerning the Greeks, likewise concerning the Germans and
 their future--and there may be, perhaps, a long list of such likewises.
 Granted, however, that all this were true, and with justice urged
 against me, what does it signify, what can it signify in regard to how
 much of the self-sustaining capacity, how much of reason and higher
 protection are embraced in such self-deception?--and how much more
 falsity is still necessary to me that I may therewith always reassure
 myself regarding the luxury of my truth. Enough, I still live; and life
 is not considered now apart from ethic; it _will_ [have] deception; it
 thrives (lebt) on deception ... but am I not beginning to do all over
 again what I have always done, I, the old immoralist, and bird
 snarer--talk unmorally, ultramorally, "beyond good and evil"?
 
 
 2
 
 Thus, then, have I evolved for myself the "free spirits" to whom this
 discouraging-encouraging work, under the general title "Human, All Too
 Human," is dedicated. Such "free spirits" do not really exist and never
 did exist. But I stood in need of them, as I have pointed out, in order
 that some good might be mixed with my evils (illness, loneliness,
 strangeness, _acedia_, incapacity): to serve as gay spirits and
 comrades, with whom one may talk and laugh when one is disposed to talk
 and laugh, and whom one may send to the devil when they grow wearisome.
 They are some compensation for the lack of friends. That such free
 spirits can possibly exist, that our Europe will yet number among her
 sons of to-morrow or of the day after to-morrow, such a brilliant and
 enthusiastic company, alive and palpable and not merely, as in my case,
 fantasms and imaginary shades, I, myself, can by no means doubt. I see
 them already coming, slowly, slowly. May it not be that I am doing a
 little something to expedite their coming when I describe in advance the
 influences under which I see them evolving and the ways along which they
 travel?
 
 
 3
 
 It may be conjectured that a soul in which the type of "free spirit" can
 attain maturity and completeness had its decisive and deciding event in
 the form of a great emancipation or unbinding, and that prior to that
 event it seemed only the more firmly and forever chained to its place
 and pillar. What binds strongest? What cords seem almost unbreakable? In
 the case of mortals of a choice and lofty nature they will be those of
 duty: that reverence, which in youth is most typical, that timidity and
 tenderness in the presence of the traditionally honored and the worthy,
 that gratitude to the soil from which we sprung, for the hand that
 guided us, for the relic before which we were taught to pray--their
 sublimest moments will themselves bind these souls most strongly. The
 great liberation comes suddenly to such prisoners, like an earthquake:
 the young soul is all at once shaken, torn apart, cast forth--it
 comprehends not itself what is taking place. An involuntary onward
 impulse rules them with the mastery of command; a will, a wish are
 developed to go forward, anywhere, at any price; a strong, dangerous
 curiosity regarding an undiscovered world flames and flashes in all
 their being. "Better to die than live _here_"--so sounds the tempting
 voice: and this "here," this "at home" constitutes all they have
 hitherto loved. A sudden dread and distrust of that which they loved, a
 flash of contempt for that which is called their "duty," a mutinous,
 wilful, volcanic-like longing for a far away journey, strange scenes and
 people, annihilation, petrifaction, a hatred surmounting love, perhaps a
 sacrilegious impulse and look backwards, to where they so long prayed
 and loved, perhaps a flush of shame for what they did and at the same
 time an exultation at having done it, an inner, intoxicating,
 delightful tremor in which is betrayed the sense of victory--a victory?
 over what? over whom? a riddle-like victory, fruitful in questioning and
 well worth questioning, but the _first_ victory, for all--such things of
 pain and ill belong to the history of the great liberation. And it is at
 the same time a malady that can destroy a man, this first outbreak of
 strength and will for self-destination, self-valuation, this will for
 free will: and how much illness is forced to the surface in the frantic
 strivings and singularities with which the freedman, the liberated seeks
 henceforth to attest his mastery over things! He roves fiercely around,
 with an unsatisfied longing and whatever objects he may encounter must
 suffer from the perilous expectancy of his pride; he tears to pieces
 whatever attracts him. With a sardonic laugh he overturns whatever he
 finds veiled or protected by any reverential awe: he would see what
 these things look like when they are overturned. It is wilfulness and
 delight in the wilfulness of it, if he now, perhaps, gives his approval
 to that which has heretofore been in ill repute--if, in curiosity and
 experiment, he penetrates stealthily to the most forbidden things. In
 the background during all his plunging and roaming--for he is as
 restless and aimless in his course as if lost in a wilderness--is the
 interrogation mark of a curiosity growing ever more dangerous. "Can we
 not upset every standard? and is good perhaps evil? and God only an
 invention and a subtlety of the devil? Is everything, in the last
 resort, false? And if we are dupes are we not on that very account
 dupers also? _must_ we not be dupers also?" Such reflections lead and
 mislead him, ever further on, ever further away. Solitude, that dread
 goddess and mater saeva cupidinum, encircles and besets him, ever more
 threatening, more violent, more heart breaking--but who to-day knows
 what solitude is?
 
 
 4
 
 From this morbid solitude, from the deserts of such trial years, the way
 is yet far to that great, overflowing certainty and healthiness which
 cannot dispense even with sickness as a means and a grappling hook of
 knowledge; to that matured freedom of the spirit which is, in an equal
 degree, self mastery and discipline of the heart, and gives access to
 the path of much and various reflection--to that inner comprehensiveness
 and self satisfaction of over-richness which precludes all danger that
 the spirit has gone astray even in its own path and is sitting
 intoxicated in some corner or other; to that overplus of plastic,
 healing, imitative and restorative power which is the very sign of
 vigorous health, that overplus which confers upon the free spirit the
 perilous prerogative of spending a life in experiment and of running
 adventurous risks: the past-master-privilege of the free spirit. In the
 interval there may be long years of convalescence, years filled with
 many hued painfully-bewitching transformations, dominated and led to the
 goal by a tenacious will for health that is often emboldened to assume
 the guise and the disguise of health. There is a middle ground to this,
 which a man of such destiny can not subsequently recall without emotion;
 he basks in a special fine sun of his own, with a feeling of birdlike
 freedom, birdlike visual power, birdlike irrepressibleness, a something
 extraneous (Drittes) in which curiosity and delicate disdain have
 united. A "free spirit"--this refreshing term is grateful in any mood,
 it almost sets one aglow. One lives--no longer in the bonds of love and
 hate, without a yes or no, here or there indifferently, best pleased to
 evade, to avoid, to beat about, neither advancing nor retreating. One is
 habituated to the bad, like a person who all at once sees a fearful
 hurly-burly _beneath_ him--and one was the counterpart of him who
 bothers himself with things that do not concern him. As a matter of fact
 the free spirit is bothered with mere things--and how many
 things--which no longer _concern_ him.
 
 
 5
 
 A step further in recovery: and the free spirit draws near to life
 again, slowly indeed, almost refractorily, almost distrustfully. There
 is again warmth and mellowness: feeling and fellow feeling acquire
 depth, lambent airs stir all about him. He almost feels: it seems as if
 now for the first time his eyes are open to things _near_. He is in
 amaze and sits hushed: for where had he been? These near and immediate
 things: how changed they seem to him! He looks gratefully back--grateful
 for his wandering, his self exile and severity, his lookings afar and
 his bird flights in the cold heights. How fortunate that he has not,
 like a sensitive, dull home body, remained always "in the house" and "at
 home!" He had been beside himself, beyond a doubt. Now for the first
 time he really sees himself--and what surprises in the process. What
 hitherto unfelt tremors! Yet what joy in the exhaustion, the old
 sickness, the relapses of the convalescent! How it delights him,
 suffering, to sit still, to exercise patience, to lie in the sun! Who so
 well as he appreciates the fact that there comes balmy weather even in
 winter, who delights more in the sunshine athwart the wall? They are
 the most appreciative creatures in the world, and also the most humble,
 these convalescents and lizards, crawling back towards life: there are
 some among them who can let no day slip past them without addressing
 some song of praise to its retreating light. And speaking seriously, it
 is a fundamental cure for all pessimism (the cankerous vice, as is well
 known, of all idealists and humbugs), to become ill in the manner of
 these free spirits, to remain ill quite a while and then bit by bit grow
 healthy--I mean healthier. It is wisdom, worldly wisdom, to administer
 even health to oneself for a long time in small doses.
 
 
 6
 
 About this time it becomes at last possible, amid the flash lights of a
 still unestablished, still precarious health, for the free, the ever
 freer spirit to begin to read the riddle of that great liberation, a
 riddle which has hitherto lingered, obscure, well worth questioning,
 almost impalpable, in his memory. If once he hardly dared to ask "why so
 apart? so alone? renouncing all I loved? renouncing respect itself? why
 this coldness, this suspicion, this hate for one's very virtues?"--now
 he dares, and asks it loudly, already hearing the answer, "you had to
 become master over yourself, master of your own good qualities. Formerly
 they were your masters: but they should be merely your tools along with
 other tools. You had to acquire power over your aye and no and learn to
 hold and withhold them in accordance with your higher aims. You had to
 grasp the perspective of every representation (Werthschaetzung)--the
 dislocation, distortion and the apparent end or teleology of the
 horizon, besides whatever else appertains to the perspective: also the
 element of demerit in its relation to opposing merit, and the whole
 intellectual cost of every affirmative, every negative. You had to find
 out the _inevitable_ error[1] in every Yes and in every No, error as
 inseparable from life, life itself as conditioned by the perspective and
 its inaccuracy.[1] Above all, you had to see with your own eyes where
 the error[1] is always greatest: there, namely, where life is littlest,
 narrowest, meanest, least developed and yet cannot help looking upon
 itself as the goal and standard of things, and smugly and ignobly and
 incessantly tearing to tatters all that is highest and greatest and
 richest, and putting the shreds into the form of questions from the
 standpoint of its own well being. You had to see with your own eyes the
 problem of classification, (Rangordnung, regulation concerning rank and
 station) and how strength and sweep and reach of perspective wax upward
 together: You had"--enough, the free spirit knows henceforward which
 "you had" it has obeyed and also what it now can do and what it now, for
 the first time, _dare_.
 
 [1] Ungerechtigkeit, literally wrongfulness, injustice, unrighteousness.
 
 
 7
 
 Accordingly, the free spirit works out for itself an answer to that
 riddle of its liberation and concludes by generalizing upon its
 experience in the following fashion: "What I went through everyone must
 go through" in whom any problem is germinated and strives to body itself
 forth. The inner power and inevitability of this problem will assert
 themselves in due course, as in the case of any unsuspected
 pregnancy--long before the spirit has seen this problem in its true
 aspect and learned to call it by its right name. Our destiny exercises
 its influence over us even when, as yet, we have not learned its nature:
 it is our future that lays down the law to our to-day. Granted, that it
 is the problem of classification[2] of which we free spirits may say,
 this is _our_ problem, yet it is only now, in the midday of our life,
 that we fully appreciate what preparations, shifts, trials, ordeals,
 stages, were essential to that problem before it could emerge to our
 view, and why we had to go through the various and contradictory
 longings and satisfactions of body and soul, as circumnavigators and
 adventurers of that inner world called "man"; as surveyors of that
 "higher" and of that "progression"[3] that is also called
 "man"--crowding in everywhere, almost without fear, disdaining nothing,
 missing nothing, testing everything, sifting everything and eliminating
 the chance impurities--until at last we could say, we free spirits:
 "Here--a _new_ problem! Here, a long ladder on the rungs of which we
 ourselves have rested and risen, which we have actually been at times.
 Here is a something higher, a something deeper, a something below us, a
 vastly extensive order, (Ordnung) a comparative classification
 (Rangordnung), that we perceive: here--_our_ problem!"
 
 [2] Rangordnung: the meaning is "the problem of grasping the relative
 importance of things."
 
 [3] Uebereinander: one over another.
 
 
 8
 
 To what stage in the development just outlined the present book belongs
 (or is assigned) is something that will be hidden from no augur or
 psychologist for an instant. But where are there psychologists to-day?
 In France, certainly; in Russia, perhaps; certainly not in Germany.
 Grounds are not wanting, to be sure, upon which the Germans of to-day
 may adduce this fact to their credit: unhappily for one who in this
 matter is fashioned and mentored in an un-German school! This _German_
 book, which has found its readers in a wide circle of lands and
 peoples--it has been some ten years on its rounds--and which must make
 its way by means of any musical art and tune that will captivate the
 foreign ear as well as the native--this book has been read most
 indifferently in Germany itself and little heeded there: to what is that
 due? "It requires too much," I have been told, "it addresses itself to
 men free from the press of petty obligations, it demands fine and
 trained perceptions, it requires a surplus, a surplus of time, of the
 lightness of heaven and of the heart, of otium in the most unrestricted
 sense: mere good things that we Germans of to-day have not got and
 therefore cannot give." After so graceful a retort, my philosophy bids
 me be silent and ask no more questions: at times, as the proverb says,
 one remains a philosopher only because one says--nothing!
 
 Nice, Spring, 1886.
 
 
 
 
 OF THE FIRST AND LAST THINGS.
 
 
 1
 
 =Chemistry of the Notions and the Feelings.=--Philosophical problems, in
 almost all their aspects, present themselves in the same interrogative
 formula now that they did two thousand years ago: how can a thing
 develop out of its antithesis? for example, the reasonable from the
 non-reasonable, the animate from the inanimate, the logical from the
 illogical, altruism from egoism, disinterestedness from greed, truth
 from error? The metaphysical philosophy formerly steered itself clear of
 this difficulty to such extent as to repudiate the evolution of one
 thing from another and to assign a miraculous origin to what it deemed
 highest and best, due to the very nature and being of the
 "thing-in-itself." The historical philosophy, on the other hand, which
 can no longer be viewed apart from physical science, the youngest of all
 philosophical methods, discovered experimentally (and its results will
 probably always be the same) that there is no antithesis whatever,
 except in the usual exaggerations of popular or metaphysical
 comprehension, and that an error of the reason is at the bottom of such
 contradiction. According to its explanation, there is, strictly
 speaking, neither unselfish conduct, nor a wholly disinterested point of
 view. Both are simply sublimations in which the basic element seems
 almost evaporated and betrays its presence only to the keenest
 observation. All that we need and that could possibly be given us in the
 present state of development of the sciences, is a chemistry of the
 moral, religious, aesthetic conceptions and feeling, as well as of those
 emotions which we experience in the affairs, great and small, of society
 and civilization, and which we are sensible of even in solitude. But
 what if this chemistry established the fact that, even in _its_ domain,
 the most magnificent results were attained with the basest and most
 despised ingredients? Would many feel disposed to continue such
 investigations? Mankind loves to put by the questions of its origin and
 beginning: must one not be almost inhuman in order to follow the
 opposite course?
 
 
 2
 
 =The Traditional Error of Philosophers.=--All philosophers make the
 common mistake of taking contemporary man as their starting point and of
 trying, through an analysis of him, to reach a conclusion. "Man"
 involuntarily presents himself to them as an aeterna veritas as a
 passive element in every hurly-burly, as a fixed standard of things. Yet
 everything uttered by the philosopher on the subject of man is, in the
 last resort, nothing more than a piece of testimony concerning man
 during a very limited period of time. Lack of the historical sense is
 the traditional defect in all philosophers. Many innocently take man in
 his most childish state as fashioned through the influence of certain
 religious and even of certain political developments, as the permanent
 form under which man must be viewed. They will not learn that man has
 evolved,[4] that the intellectual faculty itself is an evolution,
 whereas some philosophers make the whole cosmos out of this intellectual
 faculty. But everything essential in human evolution took place aeons
 ago, long before the four thousand years or so of which we know
 anything: during these man may not have changed very much. However, the
 philosopher ascribes "instinct" to contemporary man and assumes that
 this is one of the unalterable facts regarding man himself, and hence
 affords a clue to the understanding of the universe in general. The
 whole teleology is so planned that man during the last four thousand
 years shall be spoken of as a being existing from all eternity, and
 with reference to whom everything in the cosmos from its very inception
 is naturally ordered. Yet everything evolved: there are no eternal facts
 as there are no absolute truths. Accordingly, historical philosophising
 is henceforth indispensable, and with it honesty of judgment.
 
 [4] geworden.
 
 
 3
 
 =Appreciation of Simple Truths.=--It is the characteristic of an
 advanced civilization to set a higher value upon little, simple truths,
 ascertained by scientific method, than upon the pleasing and magnificent
 errors originating in metaphysical and aesthetical epochs and peoples. To
 begin with, the former are spoken of with contempt as if there could be
 no question of comparison respecting them, so rigid, homely, prosaic and
 even discouraging is the aspect of the first, while so beautiful,
 decorative, intoxicating and perhaps beatific appear the last named.
 Nevertheless, the hardwon, the certain, the lasting and, therefore, the
 fertile in new knowledge, is the higher; to hold fast to it is manly and
 evinces courage, directness, endurance. And not only individual men but
 all mankind will by degrees be uplifted to this manliness when they are
 finally habituated to the proper appreciation of tenable, enduring
 knowledge and have lost all faith in inspiration and in the miraculous
 revelation of truth. The reverers of forms, indeed, with their standards
 of beauty and taste, may have good reason to laugh when the appreciation
 of little truths and the scientific spirit begin to prevail, but that
 will be only because their eyes are not yet opened to the charm of the
 utmost simplicity of form or because men though reared in the rightly
 appreciative spirit, will still not be fully permeated by it, so that
 they continue unwittingly imitating ancient forms (and that ill enough,
 as anybody does who no longer feels any interest in a thing). Formerly
 the mind was not brought into play through the medium of exact thought.
 Its serious business lay in the working out of forms and symbols. That
 has now changed. Any seriousness in symbolism is at present the
 indication of a deficient education. As our very acts become more
 intellectual, our tendencies more rational, and our judgment, for
 example, as to what seems reasonable, is very different from what it was
 a hundred years ago: so the forms of our lives grow ever more
 intellectual and, to the old fashioned eye, perhaps, uglier, but only
 because it cannot see that the richness of inner, rational beauty always
 spreads and deepens, and that the inner, rational aspect of all things
 should now be of more consequence to us than the most beautiful
 externality and the most exquisite limning.
 
 
 4
 
 =Astrology and the Like.=--It is presumable that the objects of the
 religious, moral, aesthetic and logical notions pertain simply to the
 superficialities of things, although man flatters himself with the
 thought that here at least he is getting to the heart of the cosmos. He
 deceives himself because these things have power to make him so happy
 and so wretched, and so he evinces, in this respect, the same conceit
 that characterises astrology. Astrology presupposes that the heavenly
 bodies are regulated in their movements in harmony with the destiny of
 mortals: the moral man presupposes that that which concerns himself most
 nearly must also be the heart and soul of things.
 
 
 5
 
 =Misconception of Dreams.=--In the dream, mankind, in epochs of crude
 primitive civilization, thought they were introduced to a second,
 substantial world: here we have the source of all metaphysic. Without
 the dream, men would never have been incited to an analysis of the
 world. Even the distinction between soul and body is wholly due to the
 primitive conception of the dream, as also the hypothesis of the
 embodied soul, whence the development of all superstition, and also,
 probably, the belief in god. "The dead still live: for they appear to
 the living in dreams." So reasoned mankind at one time, and through many
 thousands of years.
 
 
 6
 
 =The Scientific Spirit Prevails only Partially, not Wholly.=--The
 specialized, minutest departments of science are dealt with purely
 objectively. But the general universal sciences, considered as a great,
 basic unity, posit the question--truly a very living question--: to what
 purpose? what is the use? Because of this reference to utility they are,
 as a whole, less impersonal than when looked at in their specialized
 aspects. Now in the case of philosophy, as forming the apex of the
 scientific pyramid, this question of the utility of knowledge is
 necessarily brought very conspicuously forward, so that every philosophy
 has, unconsciously, the air of ascribing the highest utility to itself.
 It is for this reason that all philosophies contain such a great amount
 of high flying metaphysic, and such a shrinking from the seeming
 insignificance of the deliverances of physical science: for the
 significance of knowledge in relation to life must be made to appear as
 great as possible. This constitutes the antagonism between the
 specialties of science and philosophy. The latter aims, as art aims, at
 imparting to life and conduct the utmost depth and significance: in the
 former mere knowledge is sought and nothing else--whatever else be
 incidentally obtained. Heretofore there has never been a philosophical
 system in which philosophy itself was not made the apologist of
 knowledge [in the abstract]. On this point, at least, each is optimistic
 and insists that to knowledge the highest utility must be ascribed. They
 are all under the tyranny of logic, which is, from its very nature,
 optimism.
 
 
 7
 
 =The Discordant Element in Science.=--Philosophy severed itself from
 science when it put the question: what is that knowledge of the world
 and of life through which mankind may be made happiest? This happened
 when the Socratic school arose: with the standpoint of _happiness_ the
 arteries of investigating science were compressed too tightly to permit
 of any circulation of the blood--and are so compressed to-day.
 
 
 8
 
 =Pneumatic Explanation of Nature.=[5]--Metaphysic reads the message of
 nature as if it were written purely pneumatically, as the church and its
 learned ones formerly did where the bible was concerned. It requires a
 great deal of expertness to apply to nature the same strict science of
 interpretation that the philologists have devised for all literature,
 and to apply it for the purpose of a simple, direct interpretation of
 the message, and at the same time, not bring out a double meaning. But,
 as in the case of books and literature, errors of exposition are far
 from being completely eliminated, and vestiges of allegorical and
 mystical interpretations are still to be met with in the most cultivated
 circles, so where nature is concerned the case is--actually much worse.
 
 [5] Pneumatic is here used in the sense of spiritual. Pneuma being the
 Greek word in the New Testament for the Holy Spirit.--Ed.
 
 
 9
 
 =Metaphysical World.=--It is true, there may be a metaphysical world;
 the absolute possibility of it can scarcely be disputed. We see all
 things through the medium of the human head and we cannot well cut off
 this head: although there remains the question what part of the world
 would be left after it had been cut off. But that is a purely abstract
 scientific problem and one not much calculated to give men uneasiness:
 yet everything that has heretofore made metaphysical assumptions
 valuable, fearful or delightful to men, all that gave rise to them is
 passion, error and self deception: the worst systems of knowledge, not
 the best, pin their tenets of belief thereto. When such methods are once
 brought to view as the basis of all existing religions and metaphysics,
 they are already discredited. There always remains, however, the
 possibility already conceded: but nothing at all can be made out of
 that, to say not a word about letting happiness, salvation and life hang
 upon the threads spun from such a possibility. Accordingly, nothing
 could be predicated of the metaphysical world beyond the fact that it is
 an elsewhere,[6] another sphere, inaccessible and incomprehensible to
 us: it would become a thing of negative properties. Even were the
 existence of such a world absolutely established, it would nevertheless
 remain incontrovertible that of all kinds of knowledge, knowledge of
 such a world would be of least consequence--of even less consequence
 than knowledge of the chemical analysis of water would be to a storm
 tossed mariner.
 
 [6] Anderssein.
 
 
 10
 
 =The Harmlessness of Metaphysic in the Future.=--As soon as religion,
 art and ethics are so understood that a full comprehension of them can
 be gained without taking refuge in the postulates of metaphysical
 claptrap at any point in the line of reasoning, there will be a complete
 cessation of interest in the purely theoretical problem of the "thing in
 itself" and the "phenomenon." For here, too, the same truth applies: in
 religion, art and ethics we are not concerned with the "essence of the
 cosmos".[7] We are in the sphere of pure conception. No presentiment [or
 intuition] can carry us any further. With perfect tranquility the
 question of how our conception of the world could differ so sharply from
 the actual world as it is manifest to us, will be relegated to the
 physiological sciences and to the history of the evolution of ideas and
 organisms.
 
 [7] "Wesen der Welt an sich."
 
 
 11
 
 =Language as a Presumptive Science.=--The importance of language in the
 development of civilization consists in the fact that by means of it
 man placed one world, his own, alongside another, a place of leverage
 that he thought so firm as to admit of his turning the rest of the
 cosmos on a pivot that he might master it. In so far as man for ages
 looked upon mere ideas and names of things as upon aeternae veritates,
 he evinced the very pride with which he raised himself above the brute.
 He really supposed that in language he possessed a knowledge of the
 cosmos. The language builder was not so modest as to believe that he was
 only giving names to things. On the contrary he thought he embodied the
 highest wisdom concerning things in [mere] words; and, in truth,
 language is the first movement in all strivings for wisdom. Here, too,
 it is _faith in ascertained truth_[8] from which the mightiest fountains
 of strength have flowed. Very tardily--only now--it dawns upon men that
 they have propagated a monstrous error in their belief in language.
 Fortunately, it is too late now to arrest and turn back the evolutionary
 process of the reason, which had its inception in this belief. Logic
 itself rests upon assumptions to which nothing in the world of reality
 corresponds. For example, the correspondence of certain things to one
 another and the identity of those things at different periods of time
 are assumptions pure and simple, but the science of logic originated in
 the positive belief that they were not assumptions at all but
 established facts. It is the same with the science of mathematics which
 certainly would never have come into existence if mankind had known from
 the beginning that in all nature there is no perfectly straight line, no
 true circle, no standard of measurement.
 
 [8] Glaube an die gefundene Wahrheit, as distinguished from faith in
 what is taken on trust as truth.
 
 
 12
 
 =Dream and Civilization.=--The function of the brain which is most
 encroached upon in slumber is the memory; not that it is wholly
 suspended, but it is reduced to a state of imperfection as, in primitive
 ages of mankind, was probably the case with everyone, whether waking or
 sleeping. Uncontrolled and entangled as it is, it perpetually confuses
 things as a result of the most trifling similarities, yet in the same
 mental confusion and lack of control the nations invented their
 mythologies, while nowadays travelers habitually observe how prone the
 savage is to forgetfulness, how his mind, after the least exertion of
 memory, begins to wander and lose itself until finally he utters
 falsehood and nonsense from sheer exhaustion. Yet, in dreams, we all
 resemble this savage. Inadequacy of distinction and error of comparison
 are the basis of the preposterous things we do and say in dreams, so
 that when we clearly recall a dream we are startled that so much idiocy
 lurks within us. The absolute distinctness of all dream-images, due to
 implicit faith in their substantial reality, recalls the conditions in
 which earlier mankind were placed, for whom hallucinations had
 extraordinary vividness, entire communities and even entire nations
 laboring simultaneously under them. Therefore: in sleep and in dream we
 make the pilgrimage of early mankind over again.
 
 
 13
 
 =Logic of the Dream.=--During sleep the nervous system, through various
 inner provocatives, is in constant agitation. Almost all the organs act
 independently and vigorously. The blood circulates rapidly. The posture
 of the sleeper compresses some portions of the body. The coverlets
 influence the sensations in different ways. The stomach carries on the
 digestive process and acts upon other organs thereby. The intestines are
 in motion. The position of the head induces unaccustomed action. The
 feet, shoeless, no longer pressing the ground, are the occasion of other
 sensations of novelty, as is, indeed, the changed garb of the entire
 body. All these things, following the bustle and change of the day,
 result, through their novelty, in a movement throughout the entire
 system that extends even to the brain functions. Thus there are a
 hundred circumstances to induce perplexity in the mind, a questioning as
 to the cause of this excitation. Now, the dream is a _seeking and
 presenting of reasons_ for these excitations of feeling, of the supposed
 reasons, that is to say. Thus, for example, whoever has his feet bound
 with two threads will probably dream that a pair of serpents are coiled
 about his feet. This is at first a hypothesis, then a belief with an
 accompanying imaginative picture and the argument: "these snakes must be
 the _causa_ of those sensations which I, the sleeper, now have." So
 reasons the mind of the sleeper. The conditions precedent, as thus
 conjectured, become, owing to the excitation of the fancy, present
 realities. Everyone knows from experience how a dreamer will transform
 one piercing sound, for example, that of a bell, into another of quite a
 different nature, say, the report of cannon. In his dream he becomes
 aware first of the effects, which he explains by a subsequent hypothesis
 and becomes persuaded of the purely conjectural nature of the sound. But
 how comes it that the mind of the dreamer goes so far astray when the
 same mind, awake, is habitually cautious, careful, and so conservative
 in its dealings with hypotheses? why does the first plausible
 hypothesis of the cause of a sensation gain credit in the dreaming
 state? (For in a dream we look upon that dream as reality, that is, we
 accept our hypotheses as fully established). I have no doubt that as men
 argue in their dreams to-day, mankind argued, even in their waking
 moments, for thousands of years: the first _causa_, that occurred to the
 mind with reference to anything that stood in need of explanation, was
 accepted as the true explanation and served as such. (Savages show the
 same tendency in operation, as the reports of travelers agree). In the
 dream this atavistic relic of humanity manifests its existence within
 us, for it is the foundation upon which the higher rational faculty
 developed itself and still develops itself in every individual. Dreams
 carry us back to the earlier stages of human culture and afford us a
 means of understanding it more clearly. Dream thought comes so easily to
 us now because we are so thoroughly trained to it through the
 interminable stages of evolution during which this fanciful and facile
 form of theorising has prevailed. To a certain extent the dream is a
 restorative for the brain, which, during the day, is called upon to meet
 the many demands for trained thought made upon it by the conditions of a
 higher civilization.--We may, if we please, become sensible, even in our
 waking moments, of a condition that is as a door and vestibule to
 dreaming. If we close our eyes the brain immediately conjures up a
 medley of impressions of light and color, apparently a sort of imitation
 and echo of the impressions forced in upon the brain during its waking
 moments. And now the mind, in co-operation with the imagination,
 transforms this formless play of light and color into definite figures,
 moving groups, landscapes. What really takes place is a sort of
 reasoning from effect back to cause. As the brain inquires: whence these
 impressions of light and color? it posits as the inducing causes of such
 lights and colors, those shapes and figures. They serve the brain as the
 occasions of those lights and colors because the brain, when the eyes
 are open and the senses awake, is accustomed to perceiving the cause of
 every impression of light and color made upon it. Here again the
 imagination is continually interposing its images inasmuch as it
 participates in the production of the impressions made through the
 senses day by day: and the dream-fancy does exactly the same thing--that
 is, the presumed cause is determined from the effect and _after_ the
 effect: all this, too, with extraordinary rapidity, so that in this
 matter, as in a matter of jugglery or sleight-of-hand, a confusion of
 the mind is produced and an after effect is made to appear a
 simultaneous action, an inverted succession of events, even.--From
 these considerations we can see how _late_ strict, logical thought, the
 true notion of cause and effect must have been in developing, since our
 intellectual and rational faculties to this very day revert to these
 primitive processes of deduction, while practically half our lifetime is
 spent in the super-inducing conditions.--Even the poet, the artist,
 ascribes to his sentimental and emotional states causes which are not
 the true ones. To that extent he is a reminder of early mankind and can
 aid us in its comprehension.
 
 
 14
 
 =Association.=[9]--All strong feelings are associated with a variety of
 allied sentiments and emotions. They stir up the memory at the same
 time. When we are under their influence we are reminded of similar
 states and we feel a renewal of them within us. Thus are formed habitual
 successions of feelings and notions, which, at last, when they follow
 one another with lightning rapidity are no longer felt as complexities
 but as unities. In this sense we hear of moral feelings, of religious
 feelings, as if they were absolute unities. In reality they are streams
 with a hundred sources and tributaries. Here again, the unity of the
 word speaks nothing for the unity of the thing.
 
 [9] Miterklingen: to sound simultaneously with.
 
 
 15
 
 =No Within and Without in the World.=[10]--As Democritus transferred the
 notions above and below to limitless space, where they are destitute of
 meaning, so the philosophers do generally with the idea "within and
 without," as regards the form and substance (Wesen und Erscheinung) of
 the world. What they claim is that through the medium of profound
 feelings one can penetrate deep into the soul of things (Innre), draw
 close to the heart of nature. But these feelings are deep only in so far
 as with them are simultaneously aroused, although almost imperceptibly,
 certain complicated groups of thoughts (Gedankengruppen) which we call
 deep: a feeling is deep because we deem the thoughts accompanying it
 deep. But deep thought can nevertheless be very widely sundered from
 truth, as for instance every metaphysical thought. Take from deep
 feeling the element of thought blended with it and all that remains is
 _strength_ of feeling which is no voucher for the validity of
 knowledge, as intense faith is evidence only of its own intensity and
 not of the truth of that in which the faith is felt.
 
 [10] Kein Innen und Aussen in der Welt: the above translation may seem
 too literal but some dispute has arisen concerning the precise idea the
 author means to convey.
 
 
 16
 
 =Phenomenon and Thing-in-Itself.=--The philosophers are in the habit of
 placing themselves in front of life and experience--that which they call
 the world of phenomena--as if they were standing before a picture that
 is unrolled before them in its final completeness. This panorama, they
 think, must be studied in every detail in order to reach some conclusion
 regarding the object represented by the picture. From effect,
 accordingly is deduced cause and from cause is deduced the
 unconditioned. This process is generally looked upon as affording the
 all sufficient explanation of the world of phenomena. On the other hand
 one must, (while putting the conception of the metaphysical distinctly
 forward as that of the unconditioned, and consequently of the
 unconditioning) absolutely deny any connection between the unconditioned
 (of the metaphysical world) and the world known to us: so that
 throughout phenomena there is no manifestation of the thing-in-itself,
 and getting from one to the other is out of the question. Thus is left
 quite ignored the circumstance that the picture--that which we now call
 life and experience--is a gradual evolution, is, indeed, still in
 process of evolution and for that reason should not be regarded as an
 enduring whole from which any conclusion as to its author (the
 all-sufficient reason) could be arrived at, or even pronounced out of
 the question. It is because we have for thousands of years looked into
 the world with moral, aesthetic, religious predispositions, with blind
 prejudice, passion or fear, and surfeited ourselves with indulgence in
 the follies of illogical thought, that the world has gradually become so
 wondrously motley, frightful, significant, soulful: it has taken on
 tints, but we have been the colorists: the human intellect, upon the
 foundation of human needs, of human passions, has reared all these
 "phenomena" and injected its own erroneous fundamental conceptions into
 things. Late, very late, the human intellect checks itself: and now the
 world of experience and the thing-in-itself seem to it so severed and so
 antithetical that it denies the possibility of one's hinging upon the
 other--or else summons us to surrender our intellect, our personal will,
 to the secret and the awe-inspiring in order that thereby we may attain
 certainty of certainty hereafter. Again, there are those who have
 combined all the characteristic features of our world of
 phenomena--that is, the conception of the world which has been formed
 and inherited through a series of intellectual vagaries--and instead of
 holding the intellect responsible for it all, have pronounced the very
 nature of things accountable for the present very sinister aspect of the
 world, and preached annihilation of existence. Through all these views
 and opinions the toilsome, steady process of science (which now for the
 first time begins to celebrate its greatest triumph in the genesis of
 thought) will definitely work itself out, the result, being, perhaps, to
 the following effect: That which we now call the world is the result of
 a crowd of errors and fancies which gradually developed in the general
 evolution of organic nature, have grown together and been transmitted to
 us as the accumulated treasure of all the past--as the _treasure_, for
 whatever is worth anything in our humanity rests upon it. From this
 world of conception it is in the power of science to release us only to
 a slight extent--and this is all that could be wished--inasmuch as it
 cannot eradicate the influence of hereditary habits of feeling, but it
 can light up by degrees the stages of the development of that world of
 conception, and lift us, at least for a time, above the whole spectacle.
 Perhaps we may then perceive that the thing-in-itself is a meet subject
 for Homeric laughter: that it seemed so much, everything, indeed, and
 is really a void--void, that is to say, of meaning.
 
 
 17
 
 =Metaphysical Explanation.=--Man, when he is young, prizes metaphysical
 explanations, because they make him see matters of the highest import in
 things he found disagreeable or contemptible: and if he is not satisfied
 with himself, this feeling of dissatisfaction is soothed when he sees
 the most hidden world-problem or world-pain in that which he finds so
 displeasing in himself. To feel himself more unresponsible and at the
 same time to find things (Dinge) more interesting--that is to him the
 double benefit he owes to metaphysics. Later, indeed, he acquires
 distrust of the whole metaphysical method of explaining things: he then
 perceives, perhaps, that those effects could have been attained just as
 well and more scientifically by another method: that physical and
 historical explanations would, at least, have given that feeling of
 freedom from personal responsibility just as well, while interest in
 life and its problems would be stimulated, perhaps, even more.
 
 
 18
 
 =The Fundamental Problems of Metaphysics.=--If a history of the
 development of thought is ever written, the following proposition,
 advanced by a distinguished logician, will be illuminated with a new
 light: "The universal, primordial law of the apprehending subject
 consists in the inner necessity of cognizing every object by itself, as
 in its essence a thing unto itself, therefore as self-existing and
 unchanging, in short, as a substance." Even this law, which is here
 called "primordial," is an evolution: it has yet to be shown how
 gradually this evolution takes place in lower organizations: how the
 dim, mole eyes of such organizations see, at first, nothing but a blank
 sameness: how later, when the various excitations of desire and aversion
 manifest themselves, various substances are gradually distinguished, but
 each with an attribute, that is, a special relationship to such an
 organization. The first step towards the logical is judgment, the
 essence of which, according to the best logicians, is belief. At the
 foundation of all beliefs lie sensations of pleasure or pain in relation
 to the apprehending subject. A third feeling, as the result of two
 prior, single, separate feelings, is judgment in its crudest form. We
 organic beings are primordially interested by nothing whatever in any
 thing (Ding) except its relation to ourselves with reference to pleasure
 and pain. Between the moments in which we are conscious of this
 relation, (the states of feeling) lie the moments of rest, of
 not-feeling: then the world and every thing (Ding) have no interest for
 us: we observe no change in them (as at present a person absorbed in
 something does not notice anyone passing by). To plants all things are,
 as a rule, at rest, eternal, every object like itself. From the period
 of lower organisms has been handed down to man the belief that there are
 like things (gleiche Dinge): only the trained experience attained
 through the most advanced science contradicts this postulate. The
 primordial belief of all organisms is, perhaps, that all the rest of the
 world is one thing and motionless.--Furthest away from this first step
 towards the logical is the notion of causation: even to-day we think
 that all our feelings and doings are, at bottom, acts of the free will;
 when the sentient individual contemplates himself he deems every
 feeling, every change, a something isolated, disconnected, that is to
 say, unqualified by any thing; it comes suddenly to the surface,
 independent of anything that went before or came after. We are hungry,
 but originally we do not know that the organism must be nourished: on
 the contrary that feeling seems to manifest itself without reason or
 purpose; it stands out by itself and seems quite independent. Therefore:
 the belief in the freedom of the will is a primordial error of
 everything organic as old as the very earliest inward prompting of the
 logical faculty; belief in unconditioned substances and in like things
 (gleiche Dinge) is also a primordial and equally ancient error of
 everything organic. Inasmuch as all metaphysic has concerned itself
 particularly with substance and with freedom of the will, it should be
 designated as the science that deals with the fundamental errors of
 mankind as if they were fundamental truths.
 
 
 19
 
 =Number.=--The invention of the laws of number has as its basis the
 primordial and prior-prevailing delusion that many like things exist
 (although in point of fact there is no such thing is a duplicate), or
 that, at least, there are things (but there is no "thing"). The
 assumption of plurality always presupposes that _something_ exists which
 manifests itself repeatedly, but just here is where the delusion
 prevails; in this very matter we feign realities, unities, that have no
 existence. Our feelings, notions, of space and time are false for they
 lead, when duly tested, to logical contradictions. In all scientific
 demonstrations we always unavoidably base our calculation upon some
 false standards [of duration or measurement] but as these standards are
 at least _constant_, as, for example, our notions of time and space, the
 results arrived at by science possess absolute accuracy and certainty in
 their relationship to one another: one can keep on building upon
 them--until is reached that final limit at which the erroneous
 fundamental conceptions, (the invariable breakdown) come into conflict
 with the results established--as, for example, in the case of the atomic
 theory. Here we always find ourselves obliged to give credence to a
 "thing" or material "substratum" that is set in motion, although, at the
 same time, the whole scientific programme has had as its aim the
 resolving of everything material into motions [themselves]: here again
 we distinguish with our feeling [that which does the] moving and [that
 which is] moved,[11] and we never get out of this circle, because the
 belief in things[12] has been from time immemorial rooted in our
 nature.--When Kant says "the intellect does not derive its laws from
 nature, but dictates them to her" he states the full truth as regards
 the _idea of nature_ which we form (nature = world, as notion, that is,
 as error) but which is merely the synthesis of a host of errors of the
 intellect. To a world not [the outcome of] our conception, the laws of
 number are wholly inapplicable: such laws are valid only in the world of
 mankind.
 
 [11] Wir scheiden auch hier noch mit unserer Empfindung Bewegendes und
 Bewegtes.
 
 [12] Glaube an Dinge.
 
 
 20
 
 =Some Backward Steps.=--One very forward step in education is taken when
 man emerges from his superstitious and religious ideas and fears and,
 for instance, no longer believes in the dear little angels or in
 original sin, and has stopped talking about the salvation of the soul:
 when he has taken this step to freedom he has, nevertheless, through the
 utmost exertion of his mental power, to overcome metaphysics. Then a
 backward movement is necessary: he must appreciate the historical
 justification, and to an equal extent the psychological considerations,
 in such a movement. He must understand that the greatest advances made
 by mankind have resulted from such a course and that without this very
 backward movement the highest achievements of man hitherto would have
 been impossible.--With regard to philosophical metaphysics I see ever
 more and more who have arrived at the negative goal (that all positive
 metaphysic is a delusion) but as yet very few who go a few steps
 backward: one should look out over the last rungs of the ladder, but not
 try to stand on them, that is to say. The most advanced as yet go only
 far enough to free themselves from metaphysic and look back at it with
 an air of superiority: whereas here, no less than in the hippodrome, it
 is necessary to turn around in order to reach the end of the course.
 
 
 21
 
 =Presumable [Nature of the] Victory of Doubt.=--Let us assume for a
 moment the validity of the skeptical standpoint: granted that there is
 no metaphysical world, and that all the metaphysical explanations of the
 only world we know are useless to us, how would we then contemplate men
 and things? [Menschen und Dinge]. This can be thought out and it is
 worth while doing so, even if the question whether anything metaphysical
 has ever been demonstrated by or through Kant and Schopenhauer, be put
 altogether aside. For it is, to all appearances, highly probable that
 men, on this point, will be, in the mass, skeptical. The question thus
 becomes: what sort of a notion will human society, under the influence
 of such a state of mind, form of itself? Perhaps the _scientific
 demonstration_ of any metaphysical world is now so difficult that
 mankind will never be free from a distrust of it. And when there is
 formed a feeling of distrust of metaphysics, the results are, in the
 mass, the same as if metaphysics were refuted altogether and _could_ no
 longer be believed. In both cases the historical question, with regard
 to an unmetaphysical disposition in mankind, remains the same.
 
 
 22
 
 =Disbelief in the "monumentum aere perennius".=[13]--A decided
 disadvantage, attending the termination of metaphysical modes of
 thought, is that the individual fixes his mind too attentively upon his
 own brief lifetime and feels no strong inducement to aid in the
 foundation of institutions capable of enduring for centuries: he wishes
 himself to gather the fruit from the tree that he plants and
 consequently he no longer plants those trees which require centuries of
 constant cultivation and are destined to afford shade to generation
 after generation in the future. For metaphysical views inspire the
 belief that in them is afforded the final sure foundation upon which
 henceforth the whole future of mankind may rest and be built up: the
 individual promotes his own salvation; when, for example, he builds a
 church or a monastery he is of opinion that he is doing something for
 the salvation of his immortal soul:--Can science, as well, inspire such
 faith in the efficacy of her results? In actual fact, science requires
 doubt and distrust as her surest auxiliaries; nevertheless, the sum of
 the irresistible (that is all the onslaughts of skepticism, all the
 disintegrating effects of surviving truths) can easily become so great
 (as, for instance, in the case of hygienic science) as to inspire the
 determination to build "eternal" works upon it. At present the contrast
 between our excitated ephemeral existence and the tranquil repose of
 metaphysical epochs is too great because both are as yet in too close
 juxtaposition. The individual man himself now goes through too many
 stages of inner and outer evolution for him to venture to make a plan
 even for his life time alone. A perfectly modern man, indeed, who wants
 to build himself a house feels as if he were walling himself up alive in
 a mausoleum.
 
 [13] Monument more enduring than brass: Horace, Odes III:XXX.
 
 
 23
 
 =Age of Comparison.=--The less men are bound by tradition, the greater
 is the inner activity of motives, the greater, correspondingly, the
 outer restlessness, the promiscuous flow of humanity, the polyphony of
 strivings. Who now feels any great impulse to establish himself and his
 posterity in a particular place? For whom, moreover, does there exist,
 at present, any strong tie? As all the methods of the arts were copied
 from one another, so were all the methods and advancements of moral
 codes, of manners, of civilizations.--Such an age derives its
 significance from the fact that in it the various ideas, codes, manners
 and civilizations can be compared and experienced side by side; which
 was impossible at an earlier period in view of the localised nature of
 the rule of every civilization, corresponding to the limitation of all
 artistic effects by time and place. To-day the growth of the aesthetic
 feeling is decided, owing to the great number of [artistic] forms which
 offer themselves for comparison. The majority--those that are condemned
 by the method of comparison--will be allowed to die out. In the same way
 there is to-day taking place a selection of the forms and customs of the
 higher morality which can result only in the extinction of the vulgar
 moralities. This is the age of comparison! That is its glory--but also
 its pain. Let us not, however shrink from this pain. Rather would we
 comprehend the nature of the task imposed upon us by our age as
 adequately as we can: posterity will bless us for doing so--a posterity
 that knows itself to be [developed] through and above the narrow, early
 race-civilizations as well as the culture-civilization of comparison,
 but yet looks gratefully back upon both as venerable monuments of
 antiquity.
 
 
 24
 
 =Possibility of Progress.=--When a master of the old civilization (den
 alten Cultur) vows to hold no more discussion with men who believe in
 progress, he is quite right. For the old civilization[14] has its
 greatness and its advantages behind it, and historic training forces one
 to acknowledge that it can never again acquire vigor: only intolerable
 stupidity or equally intolerable fanaticism could fail to perceive this
 fact. But men may consciously determine to evolve to a new civilization
 where formerly they evolved unconsciously and accidentally. They can now
 devise better conditions for the advancement of mankind, for their
 nourishment, training and education, they can administer the earth as an
 economic power, and, particularly, compare the capacities of men and
 select them accordingly. This new, conscious civilization is killing the
 other which, on the whole, has led but an unreflective animal and plant
 life: it is also destroying the doubt of progress itself--progress is
 possible. I mean: it is hasty and almost unreflective to assume that
 progress must _necessarily_ take place: but how can it be doubted that
 progress is possible? On the other hand, progress in the sense and along
 the lines of the old civilization is not even conceivable. If romantic
 fantasy employs the word progress in connection with certain aims and
 ends identical with those of the circumscribed primitive national
 civilizations, the picture presented of progress is always borrowed from
 the past. The idea and the image of progress thus formed are quite
 without originality.
 
 [14] Cultur, culture, civilisation etc., but there is no exact English
 equivalent.
 
 
 25
 
 =Private Ethics and World Ethics.=--Since the extinction of the belief
 that a god guides the general destiny of the world and, notwithstanding
 all the contortions and windings of the path of mankind, leads it
 gloriously forward, men must shape oecumenical, world-embracing ends for
 themselves. The older ethics, namely Kant's, required of the individual
 such a course of conduct as he wishes all men to follow. This evinces
 much simplicity--as if any individual could determine off hand what
 course of conduct would conduce to the welfare of humanity, and what
 course of conduct is preeminently desirable! This is a theory like that
 of freedom of competition, which takes it for granted that the general
 harmony [of things] _must_ prevail of itself in accordance with some
 inherent law of betterment or amelioration. It may be that a later
 contemplation of the needs of mankind will reveal that it is by no means
 desirable that all men should regulate their conduct according to the
 same principle; it may be best, from the standpoint of certain ends yet
 to be attained, that men, during long periods should regulate their
 conduct with reference to special, and even, in certain circumstances,
 evil, objects. At any rate, if mankind is not to be led astray by such a
 universal rule of conduct, it behooves it to attain a _knowledge of the
 condition of culture_ that will serve as a scientific standard of
 comparison in connection with cosmical ends. Herein is comprised the
 tremendous mission of the great spirits of the next century.
 
 
 26
 
 =Reaction as Progress.=--Occasionally harsh, powerful, impetuous, yet
 nevertheless backward spirits, appear, who try to conjure back some past
 era in the history of mankind: they serve as evidence that the new
 tendencies which they oppose, are not yet potent enough, that there is
 something lacking in them: otherwise they [the tendencies] would better
 withstand the effects of this conjuring back process. Thus Luther's
 reformation shows that in his century all the impulses to freedom of the
 spirit were still uncertain, lacking in vigor, and immature. Science
 could not yet rear her head. Indeed the whole Renaissance appears but as
 an early spring smothered in snow. But even in the present century
 Schopenhauer's metaphysic shows that the scientific spirit is not yet
 powerful enough: for the whole mediaeval Christian world-standpoint
 (Weltbetrachtung) and conception of man (Mensch-Empfindung)[15] once
 again, notwithstanding the slowly wrought destruction of all Christian
 dogma, celebrated a resurrection in Schopenhauer's doctrine. There is
 much science in his teaching although the science does not dominate,
 but, instead of it, the old, trite "metaphysical necessity." It is one
 of the greatest and most priceless advantages of Schopenhauer's teaching
 that by it our feelings are temporarily forced back to those old human
 and cosmical standpoints to which no other path could conduct us so
 easily. The gain for history and justice is very great. I believe that
 without Schopenhauer's aid it would be no easy matter for anyone now to
 do justice to Christianity and its Asiatic relatives--a thing impossible
 as regards the christianity that still survives. After according this
 great triumph to justice, after we have corrected in so essential a
 respect the historical point of view which the age of learning brought
 with it, we may begin to bear still farther onward the banner of
 enlightenment--a banner bearing the three names: Petrarch, Erasmus,
 Voltaire. We have taken a forward step out of reaction.
 
 [15] Literally man-feeling or human outlook.
 
 
 27
 
 =A Substitute for Religion.=--It is supposed to be a recommendation for
 philosophy to say of it that it provides the people with a substitute
 for religion. And in fact, the training of the intellect does
 necessitate the convenient laying out of the track of thought, since the
 transition from religion by way of science entails a powerful, perilous
 leap,--something that should be advised against. With this
 qualification, the recommendation referred to is a just one. At the same
 time, it should be further explained that the needs which religion
 satisfies and which science must now satisfy, are not immutable. Even
 they can be diminished and uprooted. Think, for instance, of the
 christian soul-need, the sighs over one's inner corruption, the anxiety
 regarding salvation--all notions that arise simply out of errors of the
 reason and require no satisfaction at all, but annihilation. A
 philosophy can either so affect these needs as to appease them or else
 put them aside altogether, for they are acquired, circumscribed needs,
 based upon hypotheses which those of science explode. Here, for the
 purpose of affording the means of transition, for the sake of lightening
 the spirit overburdened with feeling, art can be employed to far better
 purpose, as these hypotheses receive far less support from art than from
 a metaphysical philosophy. Then from art it is easier to go over to a
 really emancipating philosophical science.
 
 
 28
 
 =Discredited Words.=--Away with the disgustingly over-used words
 optimism and pessimism! For the occasion for using them grows daily
 less; only drivelers now find them indispensably necessary. What earthly
 reason could anyone have for being an optimist unless he had a god to
 defend who _must_ have created the best of all possible worlds, since he
 is himself all goodness and perfection?--but what thinking man has now
 any need for the hypothesis that there is a god?--There is also no
 occasion whatever for a pessimistic confession of faith, unless one has
 a personal interest in denouncing the advocate of god, the theologian or
 the theological philosopher, and maintaining the counter proposition
 that evil reigns, that wretchedness is more potent than joy, that the
 world is a piece of botch work, that phenomenon (Erscheinung) is but the
 manifestation of some evil spirit. But who bothers his head about the
 theologians any more--except the theologians themselves? Apart from all
 theology and its antagonism, it is manifest that the world is neither
 good nor bad, (to say nothing about its being the best or the worst) and
 that these ideas of "good" and "bad" have significance only in relation
 to men, indeed, are without significance at all, in view of the sense in
 which they are usually employed. The contemptuous and the eulogistic
 point of view must, in every case, be repudiated.
 
 
 29
 
 =Intoxicated by the Perfume of Flowers.=--The ship of humanity, it is
 thought, acquires an ever deeper draught the more it is laden. It is
 believed that the more profoundly man thinks, the more exquisitely he
 feels, the higher the standard he sets for himself, the greater his
 distance from the other animals--the more he appears as a genius
 (Genie) among animals--the nearer he gets to the true nature of the
 world and to comprehension thereof: this, indeed, he really does through
 science, but he thinks he does it far more adequately through his
 religions and arts. These are, certainly, a blossoming of the world, but
 not, therefore, _nearer the roots of the world_ than is the stalk. One
 cannot learn best from it the nature of the world, although nearly
 everyone thinks so. _Error_ has made men so deep, sensitive and
 imaginative in order to bring forth such flowers as religions and arts.
 Pure apprehension would be unable to do that. Whoever should disclose to
 us the essence of the world would be undeceiving us most cruelly. Not
 the world as thing-in-itself but the world as idea[16] (as error) is
 rich in portent, deep, wonderful, carrying happiness and unhappiness in
 its womb. This result leads to a philosophy of world negation: which, at
 any rate, can be as well combined with a practical world affirmation as
 with its opposite.
 
 [16] Vorstellung: this word sometimes corresponds to the English word
 "idea", at others to "conception" or "notion."
 
 
 30
 
 =Evil Habits in Reaching Conclusions.=--The most usual erroneous
 conclusions of men are these: a thing[17] exists, therefore it is right:
 Here from capacity to live is deduced fitness, from fitness, is deduced
 justification. So also: an opinion gives happiness, therefore it is the
 true one, its effect is good, therefore it is itself good and true. Here
 is predicated of the effect that it gives happiness, that it is good in
 the sense of utility, and there is likewise predicated of the cause that
 it is good, but good in the sense of logical validity. Conversely, the
 proposition would run: a thing[17] cannot attain success, cannot
 maintain itself, therefore it is evil: a belief troubles [the believer],
 occasions pain, therefore it is false. The free spirit, who is sensible
 of the defect in this method of reaching conclusions and has had to
 suffer its consequences, often succumbs to the temptation to come to the
 very opposite conclusions (which, in general, are, of course, equally
 erroneous): a thing cannot maintain itself: therefore it is good; a
 belief is troublesome, therefore it is true.
 
 [17] Sache, thing but not in the sense of Ding. Sache is of very
 indefinite application (res).
 
 
 31
 
 =The Illogical is Necessary.=--Among the things which can bring a
 thinker to distraction is the knowledge that the illogical is necessary
 to mankind and that from the illogical springs much that is good. The
 illogical is so imbedded in the passions, in language, in art, in
 religion and, above all, in everything that imparts value to life that
 it cannot be taken away without irreparably injuring those beautiful
 things. Only men of the utmost simplicity can believe that the nature
 man knows can be changed into a purely logical nature. Yet were there
 steps affording approach to this goal, how utterly everything would be
 lost on the way! Even the most rational man needs nature again, from
 time to time, that is, his illogical fundamental relation
 (Grundstellung) to all things.
 
 
 32
 
 =Being Unjust is Essential.=--All judgments of the value of life are
 illogically developed and therefore unjust. The vice of the judgment
 consists, first, in the way in which the subject matter comes under
 observation, that is, very incompletely; secondly in the way in which
 the total is summed up; and, thirdly, in the fact that each single item
 in the totality of the subject matter is itself the result of defective
 perception, and this from absolute necessity. No practical knowledge of
 a man, for example, stood he never so near to us, can be complete--so
 that we could have a logical right to form a total estimate of him; all
 estimates are summary and must be so. Then the standard by which we
 measure, (our being) is not an immutable quantity; we have moods and
 variations, and yet we should know ourselves as an invariable standard
 before we undertake to establish the nature of the relation of any thing
 (Sache) to ourselves. Perhaps it will follow from all this that one
 should form no judgments whatever; if one could but merely _live_
 without having to form estimates, without aversion and without
 partiality!--for everything most abhorred is closely connected with an
 estimate, as well as every strongest partiality. An inclination towards
 a thing, or from a thing, without an accompanying feeling that the
 beneficial is desired and the pernicious contemned, an inclination
 without a sort of experiential estimation of the desirability of an end,
 does not exist in man. We are primordially illogical and hence unjust
 beings _and can recognise this fact_: this is one of the greatest and
 most baffling discords of existence.
 
 
 33
 
 =Error Respecting Living for the Sake of Living Essential.=--Every
 belief in the value and worthiness of life rests upon defective
 thinking; it is for this reason alone possible that sympathy with the
 general life and suffering of mankind is so imperfectly developed in the
 individual. Even exceptional men, who can think beyond their own
 personalities, do not have this general life in view, but isolated
 portions of it. If one is capable of fixing his observation upon
 exceptional cases, I mean upon highly endowed individuals and pure
 souled beings, if their development is taken as the true end of
 world-evolution and if joy be felt in their existence, then it is
 possible to believe in the value of life, because in that case the rest
 of humanity is overlooked: hence we have here defective thinking. So,
 too, it is even if all mankind be taken into consideration, and one
 species only of impulses (the less egoistic) brought under review and
 those, in consideration of the other impulses, exalted: then something
 could still be hoped of mankind in the mass and to that extent there
 could exist belief in the value of life: here, again, as a result of
 defective thinking. Whatever attitude, thus, one may assume, one is, as
 a result of this attitude, an exception among mankind. Now, the great
 majority of mankind endure life without any great protest, and believe,
 to this extent, in the value of existence, but that is because each
 individual decides and determines alone, and never comes out of his own
 personality like these exceptions: everything outside of the personal
 has no existence for them or at the utmost is observed as but a faint
 shadow. Consequently the value of life for the generality of mankind
 consists simply in the fact that the individual attaches more importance
 to himself than he does to the world. The great lack of imagination from
 which he suffers is responsible for his inability to enter into the
 feelings of beings other than himself, and hence his sympathy with their
 fate and suffering is of the slightest possible description. On the
 other hand, whosoever really _could_ sympathise, necessarily doubts the
 value of life; were it possible for him to sum up and to feel in himself
 the total consciousness of mankind, he would collapse with a malediction
 against existence,--for mankind is, in the mass, without a goal, and
 hence man cannot find, in the contemplation of his whole course,
 anything to serve him as a mainstay and a comfort, but rather a reason
 to despair. If he looks beyond the things that immediately engage him to
 the final aimlessness of humanity, his own conduct assumes in his eyes
 the character of a frittering away. To feel oneself, however, as
 humanity (not alone as an individual) frittered away exactly as we see
 the stray leaves frittered away by nature, is a feeling transcending all
 feeling. But who is capable of it? Only a poet, certainly: and poets
 always know how to console themselves.
 
 
 34
 
 =For Tranquility.=--But will not our philosophy become thus a tragedy?
 Will not truth prove the enemy of life, of betterment? A question seems
 to weigh upon our tongue and yet will not put itself into words: whether
 one _can_ knowingly remain in the domain of the untruthful? or, if one
 _must_, whether, then, death would not be preferable? For there is no
 longer any ought (Sollen), morality; so far as it is involved "ought,"
 is, through our point of view, as utterly annihilated as religion. Our
 knowledge can permit only pleasure and pain, benefit and injury, to
 subsist as motives. But how can these motives be distinguished from the
 desire for truth? Even they rest upon error (in so far, as already
 stated, partiality and dislike and their very inaccurate estimates
 palpably modify our pleasure and our pain). The whole of human life is
 deeply involved in _untruth_. The individual cannot extricate it from
 this pit without thereby fundamentally clashing with his whole past,
 without finding his present motives of conduct, (as that of honor)
 illegitimate, and without opposing scorn and contempt to the ambitions
 which prompt one to have regard for the future and for one's happiness
 in the future. Is it true, does there, then, remain but one way of
 thinking, which, as a personal consequence brings in its train despair,
 and as a theoretical [consequence brings in its train] a philosophy of
 decay, disintegration, self annihilation? I believe the deciding
 influence, as regards the after-effect of knowledge, will be the
 _temperament_ of a man; I can, in addition to this after-effect just
 mentioned, suppose another, by means of which a much simpler life, and
 one freer from disturbances than the present, could be lived; so that at
 first the old motives of vehement passion might still have strength,
 owing to hereditary habit, but they would gradually grow weaker under
 the influence of purifying knowledge. A man would live, at last, both
 among men and unto himself, as in the natural state, without praise,
 reproach, competition, feasting one's eyes, as if it were a play, upon
 much that formerly inspired dread. One would be rid of the strenuous
 element, and would no longer feel the goad of the reflection that man is
 not even [as much as] nature, nor more than nature. To be sure, this
 requires, as already stated, a good temperament, a fortified, gentle and
 naturally cheerful soul, a disposition that has no need to be on its
 guard against its own eccentricities and sudden outbreaks and that in
 its utterances manifests neither sullenness nor a snarling tone--those
 familiar, disagreeable characteristics of old dogs and old men that have
 been a long time chained up. Rather must a man, from whom the ordinary
 bondages of life have fallen away to so great an extent, so do that he
 only lives on in order to grow continually in knowledge, and to learn to
 resign, without envy and without disappointment, much, yes nearly
 everything, that has value in the eyes of men. He must be content with
 such a free, fearless soaring above men, manners, laws and traditional
 estimates of things, as the most desirable of all situations. He will
 freely share the joy of being in such a situation, and he has, perhaps,
 nothing else to share--in which renunciation and self-denial really most
 consist. But if more is asked of him, he will, with a benevolent shake
 of the head, refer to his brother, the free man of fact, and will,
 perhaps, not dissemble a little contempt: for, as regards his "freedom,"
 thereby hangs a tale.[18]
 
 [18] den mit dessen "Freiheit" hat es eine eigene Bewandtniss.
 
 
 
 
 HISTORY OF THE MORAL FEELINGS.
 
 
 35
 
 =Advantages of Psychological Observation.=--That reflection regarding
 the human, all-too-human--or as the learned jargon is: psychological
 observation--is among the means whereby the burden of life can be made
 lighter, that practice in this art affords presence of mind in difficult
 situations and entertainment amid a wearisome environment, aye, that
 maxims may be culled in the thorniest and least pleasing paths of life
 and invigoration thereby obtained: this much was believed, was known--in
 former centuries. Why was this forgotten in our own century, during
 which, at least in Germany, yes in Europe, poverty as regards
 psychological observation would have been manifest in many ways had
 there been anyone to whom this poverty could have manifested itself. Not
 only in the novel, in the romance, in philosophical standpoints--these
 are the works of exceptional men; still more in the state of opinion
 regarding public events and personages; above all in general society,
 which says much about men but nothing whatever about man, there is
 totally lacking the art of psychological analysis and synthesis. But why
 is the richest and most harmless source of entertainment thus allowed to
 run to waste? Why is the greatest master of the psychological maxim no
 longer read?--for, with no exaggeration whatever be it said: the
 educated person in Europe who has read La Rochefoucauld and his
 intellectual and artistic affinities is very hard to find; still harder,
 the person who knows them and does not disparage them. Apparently, too,
 this unusual reader takes far less pleasure in them than the form
 adopted by these artists should afford him: for the subtlest mind cannot
 adequately appreciate the art of maxim-making unless it has had training
 in it, unless it has competed in it. Without such practical
 acquaintance, one is apt to look upon this making and forming as a much
 easier thing than it really is; one is not keenly enough alive to the
 felicity and the charm of success. Hence present day readers of maxims
 have but a moderate, tempered pleasure in them, scarcely, indeed, a true
 perception of their merit, so that their experiences are about the same
 as those of the average beholder of cameos: people who praise because
 they cannot appreciate, and are very ready to admire and still readier
 to turn away.
 
 
 36
 
 =Objection.=--Or is there a counter-proposition to the dictum that
 psychological observation is one of the means of consoling, lightening,
 charming existence? Have enough of the unpleasant effects of this art
 been experienced to justify the person striving for culture in turning
 his regard away from it? In all truth, a certain blind faith in the
 goodness of human nature, an implanted distaste for any disparagement of
 human concerns, a sort of shamefacedness at the nakedness of the soul,
 may be far more desirable things in the general happiness of a man, than
 this only occasionally advantageous quality of psychological
 sharpsightedness; and perhaps belief in the good, in virtuous men and
 actions, in a plenitude of disinterested benevolence has been more
 productive of good in the world of men in so far as it has made men less
 distrustful. If Plutarch's heroes are enthusiastically imitated and a
 reluctance is experienced to looking too critically into the motives of
 their actions, not the knowledge but the welfare of human society is
 promoted thereby: psychological error and above all obtuseness in regard
 to it, help human nature forward, whereas knowledge of the truth is more
 promoted by means of the stimulating strength of a hypothesis; as La
 Rochefoucauld in the first edition of his "Sentences and Moral Maxims"
 has expressed it: "What the world calls virtue is ordinarily but a
 phantom created by the passions, and to which we give a good name in
 order to do whatever we please with impunity." La Rochefoucauld and
 those other French masters of soul-searching (to the number of whom has
 lately been added a German, the author of "Psychological Observations")
 are like expert marksmen who again and again hit the black spot--but it
 is the black spot in human nature. Their art inspires amazement, but
 finally some spectator, inspired, not by the scientific spirit but by a
 humanitarian feeling, execrates an art that seems to implant in the soul
 a taste for belittling and impeaching mankind.
 
 
 37
 
 =Nevertheless.=--The matter therefore, as regards pro and con, stands
 thus: in the present state of philosophy an awakening of the moral
 observation is essential. The repulsive aspect of psychological
 dissection, with the knife and tweezers entailed by the process, can no
 longer be spared humanity. Such is the imperative duty of any science
 that investigates the origin and history of the so-called moral feelings
 and which, in its progress, is called upon to posit and to solve
 advanced social problems:--The older philosophy does not recognize the
 newer at all and, through paltry evasions, has always gone astray in the
 investigation of the origin and history of human estimates
 (Werthschaetzungen). With what results may now be very clearly perceived,
 since it has been shown by many examples, how the errors of the greatest
 philosophers have their origin in a false explanation of certain human
 actions and feelings; how upon the foundation of an erroneous analysis
 (for example, of the so called disinterested actions), a false ethic is
 reared, to support which religion and like mythological monstrosities
 are called in, until finally the shades of these troubled spirits
 collapse in physics and in the comprehensive world point of view. But if
 it be established that superficiality of psychological observation has
 heretofore set the most dangerous snares for human judgment and
 deduction, and will continue to do so, all the greater need is there of
 that steady continuance of labor that never wearies putting stone upon
 stone, little stone upon little stone; all the greater need is there of
 a courage that is not ashamed of such humble labor and that will oppose
 persistence, to all contempt. It is, finally, also true that countless
 single observations concerning the human, all-too-human, have been
 first made and uttered in circles accustomed, not to furnish matter for
 scientific knowledge, but for intellectual pleasure-seeking; and the
 original home atmosphere--a very seductive atmosphere--of the moral
 maxim has almost inextricably interpenetrated the entire species, so
 that the scientific man involuntarily manifests a sort of mistrust of
 this species and of its seriousness. But it is sufficient to point to
 the consequences: for already it is becoming evident that events of the
 most portentous nature are developing in the domain of psychological
 observation. What is the leading conclusion arrived at by one of the
 subtlest and calmest of thinkers, the author of the work "Concerning the
 Origin of the Moral Feelings", as a result of his thorough and incisive
 analysis of human conduct? "The moral man," he says, "stands no nearer
 the knowable (metaphysical) world than the physical man."[19] This
 dictum, grown hard and cutting beneath the hammer-blow of historical
 knowledge, can some day, perhaps, in some future or other, serve as the
 axe that will be laid to the root of the "metaphysical necessities" of
 men--whether more to the blessing than to the banning of universal well
 being who can say?--but in any event a dictum fraught with the most
 momentous consequences, fruitful and fearful at once, and confronting
 the world in the two faced way characteristic of all great facts.
 
 [19] "Der moralische Mensch, sagt er, steht der intelligiblen
 (metaphysischen) Welt nicht naeher, als der physische Mensch."
 
 
 38
 
 =To What Extent Useful.=--Therefore, whether psychological observation
 is more an advantage than a disadvantage to mankind may always remain
 undetermined: but there is no doubt that it is necessary, because
 science can no longer dispense with it. Science, however, recognizes no
 considerations of ultimate goals or ends any more than nature does; but
 as the latter duly matures things of the highest fitness for certain
 ends without any intention of doing it, so will true science, doing with
 ideas what nature does with matter,[20] promote the purposes and the
 welfare of humanity, (as occasion may afford, and in many ways) and
 attain fitness [to ends]--but likewise without having intended it.
 
 [20] als die Nachahmung der Natur in Begriffen, literally: "as the
 counterfeit of nature in (regard to) ideas."
 
 He to whom the atmospheric conditions of such a prospect are too wintry,
 has too little fire in him: let him look about him, and he will become
 sensible of maladies requiring an icy air, and of people who are so
 "kneaded together" out of ardor and intellect that they can scarcely
 find anywhere an atmosphere too cold and cutting for them. Moreover: as
 too serious individuals and nations stand in need of trivial
 relaxations; as others, too volatile and excitable require onerous,
 weighty ordeals to render them entirely healthy: should not we, the more
 intellectual men of this age, which is swept more and more by
 conflagrations, catch up every cooling and extinguishing appliance we
 can find that we may always remain as self contained, steady and calm as
 we are now, and thereby perhaps serve this age as its mirror and self
 reflector, when the occasion arises?
 
 
 39
 
 =The Fable of Discretionary Freedom.=--The history of the feelings, on
 the basis of which we make everyone responsible, hence, the so-called
 moral feelings, is traceable in the following leading phases. At first
 single actions are termed good or bad without any reference to their
 motive, but solely because of the utilitarian or prejudicial
 consequences they have for the community. In time, however, the origin
 of these designations is forgotten [but] it is imagined that action in
 itself, without reference to its consequences, contains the property
 "good" or "bad": with the same error according to which language
 designates the stone itself as hard[ness] the tree itself as
 green[ness]--for the reason, therefore, that what is a consequence is
 comprehended as a cause. Accordingly, the good[ness] or bad[ness] is
 incorporated into the motive and [any] deed by itself is regarded as
 morally ambiguous. A step further is taken, and the predication good or
 bad is no longer made of the particular motives but of the entire nature
 of a man, out of which motive grows as grow the plants out of the soil.
 Thus man is successively made responsible for his [particular] acts,
 then for his [course of] conduct, then for his motives and finally for
 his nature. Now, at last, is it discovered that this nature, even,
 cannot be responsible, inasmuch as it is only and wholly a necessary
 consequence and is synthesised out of the elements and influence of past
 and present things: therefore, that man is to be made responsible for
 nothing, neither for his nature, nor his motives, nor his [course of]
 conduct nor his [particular] acts. By this [process] is gained the
 knowledge that the history of moral estimates is the history of error,
 of the error of responsibility: as is whatever rests upon the error of
 the freedom of the will. Schopenhauer concluded just the other way,
 thus: since certain actions bring depression ("consciousness of guilt")
 in their train, there must, then, exist responsibility, for there would
 be no basis for this depression at hand if all man's affairs did not
 follow their course of necessity--as they do, indeed, according to the
 opinion of this philosopher, follow their course--but man himself,
 subject to the same necessity, would be just the man that he is--which
 Schopenhauer denies. From the fact of such depression Schopenhauer
 believes himself able to prove a freedom which man in some way must have
 had, not indeed in regard to his actions but in regard to his nature:
 freedom, therefore, to be thus and so, not to act thus and so. Out of
 the _esse_, the sphere of freedom and responsibility, follows, according
 to his opinion, the _operari_, the spheres of invariable causation,
 necessity and irresponsibility. This depression, indeed, is due
 apparently to the _operari_--in so far as it be delusive--but in truth
 to whatever _esse_ be the deed of a free will, the basic cause of the
 existence of an individual: [in order to] let man become whatever he
 wills to become, his [to] will (Wollen) must precede his
 existence.--Here, apart from the absurdity of the statement just made,
 there is drawn the wrong inference that the fact of the depression
 explains its character, the rational admissibility of it: from such a
 wrong inference does Schopenhauer first come to his fantastic consequent
 of the so called discretionary freedom (intelligibeln Freiheit). (For
 the origin of this fabulous entity Plato and Kant are equally
 responsible). But depression after the act does not need to be rational:
 indeed, it is certainly not so at all, for it rests upon the erroneous
 assumption that the act need not necessarily have come to pass.
 Therefore: only because man deems himself free, but not because
 he is free, does he experience remorse and the stings of
 conscience.--Moreover, this depression is something that can be grown
 out of; in many men it is not present at all as a consequence of acts
 which inspire it in many other men. It is a very varying thing and one
 closely connected with the development of custom and civilization, and
 perhaps manifest only during a relatively brief period of the world's
 history.--No one is responsible for his acts, no one for his nature; to
 judge is tantamount to being unjust. This applies as well when the
 individual judges himself. The proposition is as clear as sunlight, and
 yet here everyone prefers to go back to darkness and untruth: for fear
 of the consequences.
 
 
 40
 
 =Above Animal.=--The beast in us must be wheedled: ethic is necessary,
 that we may not be torn to pieces. Without the errors involved in the
 assumptions of ethics, man would have remained an animal. Thus has he
 taken himself as something higher and imposed rigid laws upon himself.
 He feels hatred, consequently, for states approximating the animal:
 whence the former contempt for the slave as a not-yet-man, as a thing,
 is to be explained.
 
 
 41
 
 =Unalterable Character.=--That character is unalterable is not, in the
 strict sense, true; rather is this favorite proposition valid only to
 the extent that during the brief life period of a man the potent new
 motives can not, usually, press down hard enough to obliterate the lines
 imprinted by ages. Could we conceive of a man eighty thousand years old,
 we should have in him an absolutely alterable character; so that the
 maturities of successive, varying individuals would develop in him. The
 shortness of human life leads to many erroneous assertions concerning
 the qualities of man.
 
 
 42
 
 =Classification of Enjoyments and Ethic.=--The once accepted comparative
 classification of enjoyments, according to which an inferior, higher,
 highest egoism may crave one or another enjoyment, now decides as to
 ethical status or unethical status. A lower enjoyment (for example,
 sensual pleasure) preferred to a more highly esteemed one (for example,
 health) rates as unethical, as does welfare preferred to freedom. The
 comparative classification of enjoyments is not, however, alike or the
 same at all periods; when anyone demands satisfaction of the law, he is,
 from the point of view of an earlier civilization, moral, from that of
 the present, non-moral. "Unethical" indicates, therefore, that a man is
 not sufficiently sensible to the higher, finer impulses which the
 present civilization has brought with it, or is not sensible to them at
 all; it indicates backwardness, but only from the point of view of the
 contemporary degree of distinction.--The comparative classification of
 enjoyments itself is not determined according to absolute ethics; but
 after each new ethical adjustment, it is then decided whether conduct be
 ethical or the reverse.
 
 
 43
 
 =Inhuman Men as Survivals.=--Men who are now inhuman must serve us as
 surviving specimens of earlier civilizations. The mountain height of
 humanity here reveals its lower formations, which might otherwise remain
 hidden from view. There are surviving specimens of humanity whose brains
 through the vicissitudes of heredity, have escaped proper development.
 They show us what we all were and thus appal us; but they are as little
 responsible on this account as is a piece of granite for being granite.
 In our own brains there must be courses and windings corresponding to
 such characters, just as in the forms of some human organs there survive
 traces of fishhood. But these courses and windings are no longer the bed
 in which flows the stream of our feeling.
 
 
 44
 
 =Gratitude and Revenge.=--The reason the powerful man is grateful is
 this. His benefactor has, through his benefaction, invaded the domain of
 the powerful man and established himself on an equal footing: the
 powerful man in turn invades the domain of the benefactor and gets
 satisfaction through the act of gratitude. It is a mild form of revenge.
 By not obtaining the satisfaction of gratitude the powerful would have
 shown himself powerless and have ranked as such thenceforward. Hence
 every society of the good, that is to say, of the powerful originally,
 places gratitude among the first of duties.--Swift has added the dictum
 that man is grateful in the same degree that he is revengeful.
 
 
 45
 
 =Two-fold Historical Origin of Good and Evil.=--The notion of good and
 bad has a two-fold historical origin: namely, first, in the spirit of
 ruling races and castes. Whoever has power to requite good with good and
 evil with evil and actually brings requital, (that is, is grateful and
 revengeful) acquires the name of being good; whoever is powerless and
 cannot requite is called bad. A man belongs, as a good individual, to
 the "good" of a community, who have a feeling in common, because all the
 individuals are allied with one another through the requiting sentiment.
 A man belongs, as a bad individual, to the "bad," to a mass of
 subjugated, powerless men who have no feeling in common. The good are a
 caste, the bad are a quantity, like dust. Good and bad is, for a
 considerable period, tantamount to noble and servile, master and slave.
 On the other hand an enemy is not looked upon as bad: he can requite.
 The Trojan and the Greek are in Homer both good. Not he, who does no
 harm, but he who is despised, is deemed bad. In the community of the
 good individuals [the quality of] good[ness] is inherited; it is
 impossible for a bad individual to grow from such a rich soil. If,
 notwithstanding, one of the good individuals does something unworthy of
 his goodness, recourse is had to exorcism; thus the guilt is ascribed to
 a deity, the while it is declared that this deity bewitched the good man
 into madness and blindness.--Second, in the spirit of the subjugated,
 the powerless. Here every other man is, to the individual, hostile,
 inconsiderate, greedy, inhuman, avaricious, be he noble or servile; bad
 is the characteristic term for man, for every living being, indeed, that
 is recognized at all, even for a god: human, divine, these notions are
 tantamount to devilish, bad. Manifestations of goodness, sympathy,
 helpfulness, are regarded with anxiety as trickiness, preludes to an
 evil end, deception, subtlety, in short, as refined badness. With such a
 predisposition in individuals, a feeling in common can scarcely arise at
 all, at most only the rudest form of it: so that everywhere that this
 conception of good and evil prevails, the destruction of the
 individuals, their race and nation, is imminent.--Our existing morality
 has developed upon the foundation laid by ruling races and castes.
 
 
 46
 
 =Sympathy Greater than Suffering.=--There are circumstances in which
 sympathy is stronger than the suffering itself. We feel more pain, for
 instance, when one of our friends becomes guilty of a reprehensible
 action than if we had done the deed ourselves. We once, that is, had
 more faith in the purity of his character than he had himself. Hence our
 love for him, (apparently because of this very faith) is stronger than
 is his own love for himself. If, indeed, his egoism really suffers more,
 as a result, than our egoism, inasmuch as he must take the consequences
 of his fault to a greater extent than ourselves, nevertheless, the
 unegoistic--this word is not to be taken too strictly, but simply as a
 modified form of expression--in us is more affected by his guilt than
 the unegoistic in him.
 
 
 47
 
 =Hypochondria.=--There are people who, from sympathy and anxiety for
 others become hypochondriacal. The resulting form of compassion is
 nothing else than sickness. So, also, is there a Christian hypochondria,
 from which those singular, religiously agitated people suffer who place
 always before their eyes the suffering and death of Christ.
 
 
 48
 
 =Economy of Blessings.=--The advantageous and the pleasing, as the
 healthiest growths and powers in the intercourse of men, are such
 precious treasures that it is much to be wished the use made of these
 balsamic means were as economical as possible: but this is impossible.
 Economy in the use of blessings is the dream of the craziest of
 Utopians.
 
 
 49
 
 =Well-Wishing.=--Among the small, but infinitely plentiful and therefore
 very potent things to which science must pay more attention than to the
 great, uncommon things, well-wishing[21] must be reckoned; I mean those
 manifestations of friendly disposition in intercourse, that laughter of
 the eye, every hand pressure, every courtesy from which, in general,
 every human act gets its quality. Every teacher, every functionary adds
 this element as a gratuity to whatever he does as a duty; it is the
 perpetual well spring of humanity, like the waves of light in which
 everything grows; thus, in the narrowest circles, within the family,
 life blooms and flowers only through this kind feeling. The
 cheerfulness, friendliness and kindness of a heart are unfailing
 sources of unegoistic impulse and have made far more for civilization
 than those other more noised manifestations of it that are styled
 sympathy, benevolence and sacrifice. But it is customary to depreciate
 these little tokens of kindly feeling, and, indeed, there is not much of
 the unegoistic in them. The sum of these little doses is very great,
 nevertheless; their combined strength is of the greatest of
 strengths.--Thus, too, much more happiness is to be found in the world
 than gloomy eyes discover: that is, if the calculation be just, and all
 these pleasing moments in which every day, even the meanest human life,
 is rich, be not forgotten.
 
 [21] Wohl-wollen, kind feeling. It stands here for benevolence but not
 benevolence in the restricted sense of the word now prevailing.
 
 
 50
 
 =The Desire to Inspire Compassion.=--La Rochefoucauld, in the most
 notable part of his self portraiture (first printed 1658) reaches the
 vital spot of truth when he warns all those endowed with reason to be on
 their guard against compassion, when he advises that this sentiment be
 left to men of the masses who stand in need of the promptings of the
 emotions (since they are not guided by reason) to induce them to give
 aid to the suffering and to be of service in misfortune: whereas
 compassion, in his (and Plato's) view, deprives the heart of strength.
 To be sure, sympathy should be manifested but men should take care not
 to feel it; for the unfortunate are rendered so dull that the
 manifestation of sympathy affords them the greatest happiness in the
 world.--Perhaps a more effectual warning against this compassion can be
 given if this need of the unfortunate be considered not simply as
 stupidity and intellectual weakness, not as a sort of distraction of the
 spirit entailed by misfortune itself (and thus, indeed, does La
 Rochefoucauld seem to view it) but as something quite different and more
 momentous. Let note be taken of children who cry and scream in order to
 be compassionated and who, therefore, await the moment when their
 condition will be observed; come into contact with the sick and the
 oppressed in spirit and try to ascertain if the wailing and sighing, the
 posturing and posing of misfortune do not have as end and aim the
 causing of pain to the beholder: the sympathy which each beholder
 manifests is a consolation to the weak and suffering only in as much as
 they are made to perceive that at least they have the power,
 notwithstanding all their weakness, to inflict pain. The unfortunate
 experiences a species of joy in the sense of superiority which the
 manifestation of sympathy entails; his imagination is exalted; he is
 always strong enough, then, to cause the world pain. Thus is the thirst
 for sympathy a thirst for self enjoyment and at the expense of one's
 fellow creatures: it shows man in the whole ruthlessness of his own dear
 self: not in his mere "dullness" as La Rochefoucauld thinks.--In social
 conversation three fourths of all the questions are asked, and three
 fourths of all the replies are made in order to inflict some little
 pain; that is why so many people crave social intercourse: it gives them
 a sense of their power. In these countless but very small doses in which
 the quality of badness is administered it proves a potent stimulant of
 life: to the same extent that well wishing--(Wohl-wollen) distributed
 through the world in like manner, is one of the ever ready
 restoratives.--But will many honorable people be found to admit that
 there is any pleasure in administering pain? that entertainment--and
 rare entertainment--is not seldom found in causing others, at least in
 thought, some pain, and in raking them with the small shot of
 wickedness? The majority are too ignoble and a few are too good to know
 anything of this pudendum: the latter may, consequently, be prompt to
 deny that Prosper Merimee is right when he says: "Know, also, that
 nothing is more common than to do wrong for the pleasure of doing it."
 
 
 51
 
 =How Appearance Becomes Reality.=--The actor cannot, at last, refrain,
 even in moments of the deepest pain, from thinking of the effect
 produced by his deportment and by his surroundings--for example, even at
 the funeral of his own child: he will weep at his own sorrow and its
 manifestations as though he were his own audience. The hypocrite who
 always plays one and the same part, finally ceases to be a hypocrite; as
 in the case of priests who, when young men, are always, either
 consciously or unconsciously, hypocrites, and finally become naturally
 and then really, without affectation, mere priests: or if the father
 does not carry it to this extent, the son, who inherits his father's
 calling and gets the advantage of the paternal progress, does. When
 anyone, during a long period, and persistently, wishes to appear
 something, it will at last prove difficult for him to be anything else.
 The calling of almost every man, even of the artist, begins with
 hypocrisy, with an imitation of deportment, with a copying of the
 effective in manner. He who always wears the mask of a friendly man must
 at last gain a power over friendliness of disposition, without which the
 expression itself of friendliness is not to be gained--and finally
 friendliness of disposition gains the ascendancy over him--he _is_
 benevolent.
 
 
 52
 
 =The Point of Honor in Deception.=--In all great deceivers one
 characteristic is prominent, to which they owe their power. In the very
 act of deception, amid all the accompaniments, the agitation in the
 voice, the expression, the bearing, in the crisis of the scene, there
 comes over them a belief in themselves; this it is that acts so
 effectively and irresistibly upon the beholders. Founders of religions
 differ from such great deceivers in that they never come out of this
 state of self deception, or else they have, very rarely, a few moments
 of enlightenment in which they are overcome by doubt; generally,
 however, they soothe themselves by ascribing such moments of
 enlightenment to the evil adversary. Self deception must exist that both
 classes of deceivers may attain far reaching results. For men believe in
 the truth of all that is manifestly believed with due implicitness by
 others.
 
 
 53
 
 =Presumed Degrees of Truth.=--One of the most usual errors of deduction
 is: because someone truly and openly is against us, therefore he speaks
 the truth. Hence the child has faith in the judgments of its elders, the
 Christian in the assertions of the founder of the church. So, too, it
 will not be admitted that all for which men sacrificed life and
 happiness in former centuries was nothing but delusion: perhaps it is
 alleged these things were degrees of truth. But what is really meant is
 that, if a person sincerely believes a thing and has fought and died for
 his faith, it would be too _unjust_ if only delusion had inspired him.
 Such a state of affairs seems to contradict eternal justice. For that
 reason the heart of a sensitive man pronounces against his head the
 judgment: between moral conduct and intellectual insight there must
 always exist an inherent connection. It is, unfortunately, otherwise:
 for there is no eternal justice.
 
 
 54
 
 =Falsehood.=--Why do men, as a rule, speak the truth in the ordinary
 affairs of life? Certainly not for the reason that a god has forbidden
 lying. But because first: it is more convenient, as falsehood entails
 invention, make-believe and recollection (wherefore Swift says that
 whoever invents a lie seldom realises the heavy burden he takes up: he
 must, namely, for every lie that he tells, insert twenty more).
 Therefore, because in plain ordinary relations of life it is expedient
 to say without circumlocution: I want this, I have done this, and the
 like; therefore, because the way of freedom and certainty is surer than
 that of ruse.--But if it happens that a child is brought up in sinister
 domestic circumstances, it will then indulge in falsehood as matter of
 course, and involuntarily say anything its own interests may prompt: an
 inclination for truth, an aversion to falsehood, is quite foreign and
 uncongenial to it, and hence it lies in all innocence.
 
 
 55
 
 =Ethic Discredited for Faith's Sake.=--No power can sustain itself when
 it is represented by mere humbugs: the Catholic Church may possess ever
 so many "worldly" sources of strength, but its true might is comprised
 in those still numberless priestly natures who make their lives stern
 and strenuous and whose looks and emaciated bodies are eloquent of night
 vigils, fasts, ardent prayer, perhaps even of whip lashes: these things
 make men tremble and cause them anxiety: what, if it be really
 imperative to live thus? This is the dreadful question which their
 aspect occasions. As they spread this doubt, they lay anew the prop of
 their power: even the free thinkers dare not oppose such
 disinterestedness with severe truth and cry: "Thou deceived one,
 deceive not!"--Only the difference of standpoint separates them from
 him: no difference in goodness or badness. But things we cannot
 accomplish ourselves, we are apt to criticise unfairly. Thus we are told
 of the cunning and perverted acts of the Jesuits, but we overlook the
 self mastery that each Jesuit imposes upon himself and also the fact
 that the easy life which the Jesuit manuals advocate is for the benefit,
 not of the Jesuits but the laity. Indeed, it may be questioned whether
 we enlightened ones would become equally competent workers as the result
 of similar tactics and organization, and equally worthy of admiration as
 the result of self mastery, indefatigable industry and devotion.
 
 
 56
 
 =Victory of Knowledge over Radical Evil.=--It proves a material gain to
 him who would attain knowledge to have had during a considerable period
 the idea that mankind is a radically bad and perverted thing: it is a
 false idea, as is its opposite, but it long held sway and its roots have
 reached down even to ourselves and our present world. In order to
 understand _ourselves_ we must understand _it_; but in order to attain a
 loftier height we must step above it. We then perceive that there is no
 such thing as sin in the metaphysical sense: but also, in the same
 sense, no such thing as virtue; that this whole domain of ethical
 notions is one of constant variation; that there are higher and deeper
 conceptions of good and evil, moral and immoral. Whoever desires no more
 of things than knowledge of them attains speedily to peace of mind and
 will at most err through lack of knowledge, but scarcely through
 eagerness for knowledge (or through sin, as the world calls it). He will
 not ask that eagerness for knowledge be interdicted and rooted out; but
 his single, all powerful ambition to _know_ as thoroughly and as fully
 as possible, will soothe him and moderate all that is strenuous in his
 circumstances. Moreover, he is now rid of a number of disturbing
 notions; he is no longer beguiled by such words as hell-pain,
 sinfulness, unworthiness: he sees in them merely the flitting shadow
 pictures of false views of life and of the world.
 
 
 57
 
 =Ethic as Man's Self-Analysis.=--A good author, whose heart is really in
 his work, wishes that someone would arise and wholly refute him if only
 thereby his subject be wholly clarified and made plain. The maid in love
 wishes that she could attest the fidelity of her own passion through
 the faithlessness of her beloved. The soldier wishes to sacrifice his
 life on the field of his fatherland's victory: for in the victory of his
 fatherland his highest end is attained. The mother gives her child what
 she deprives herself of--sleep, the best nourishment and, in certain
 circumstances, her health, her self.--But are all these acts unegoistic?
 Are these moral deeds miracles because they are, in Schopenhauer's
 phrase "impossible and yet accomplished"? Is it not evident that in all
 four cases man loves one part of himself, (a thought, a longing, an
 experience) more than he loves another part of himself? that he thus
 analyses his being and sacrifices one part of it to another part? Is
 this essentially different from the behavior of the obstinate man who
 says "I would rather be shot than go a step out of my way for this
 fellow"?--Preference for something (wish, impulse, longing) is present
 in all four instances: to yield to it, with all its consequences, is not
 "unegoistic."--In the domain of the ethical man conducts himself not as
 individuum but as dividuum.
 
 
 58
 
 =What Can be Promised.=--Actions can be promised, but not feelings, for
 these are involuntary. Whoever promises somebody to love him always, or
 to hate him always, or to be ever true to him, promises something that
 it is out of his power to bestow. But he really can promise such courses
 of conduct as are the ordinary accompaniments of love, of hate, of
 fidelity, but which may also have their source in motives quite
 different: for various ways and motives lead to the same conduct. The
 promise to love someone always, means, consequently: as long as I love
 you, I will manifest the deportment of love; but if I cease to love you
 my deportment, although from some other motive, will be just the same,
 so that to the people about us it will seem as if my love remained
 unchanged.--Hence it is the continuance of the deportment of love that
 is promised in every instance in which eternal love (provided no element
 of self deception be involved) is sworn.
 
 
 59
 
 =Intellect and Ethic.=--One must have a good memory to be able to keep
 the promises one makes. One must have a strong imagination in order to
 feel sympathy. So closely is ethics connected with intellectual
 capacity.
 
 
 60
 
 =Desire for Vengeance and Vengeance Itself.=--To meditate revenge and
 attain it is tantamount to an attack of fever, that passes away: but to
 meditate revenge without possessing the strength or courage to attain it
 is tantamount to suffering from a chronic malady, or poisoning of body
 and soul. Ethics, which takes only the motive into account, rates both
 cases alike: people generally estimate the first case as the worst
 (because of the consequences which the deed of vengeance may entail).
 Both views are short sighted.
 
 
 61
 
 =Ability to Wait.=--Ability to wait is so hard to acquire that great
 poets have not disdained to make inability to wait the central motive of
 their poems. So Shakespeare in Othello, Sophocles in Ajax, whose suicide
 would not have seemed to him so imperative had he only been able to cool
 his ardor for a day, as the oracle foreboded: apparently he would then
 have repulsed somewhat the fearful whispers of distracted thought and
 have said to himself: Who has not already, in my situation, mistaken a
 sheep for a hero? is it so extraordinary a thing? On the contrary it is
 something universally human: Ajax should thus have soothed himself.
 Passion will not wait: the tragic element in the lives of great men does
 not generally consist in their conflict with time and the inferiority
 of their fellowmen but in their inability to put off their work a year
 or two: they cannot wait.--In all duels, the friends who advise have but
 to ascertain if the principals can wait: if this be not possible, a duel
 is rational inasmuch as each of the combatants may say: "either I
 continue to live and the other dies instantly, or vice versa." To wait
 in such circumstances would be equivalent to the frightful martyrdom of
 enduring dishonor in the presence of him responsible for the dishonor:
 and this can easily cost more anguish than life is worth.
 
 
 62
 
 =Glutting Revenge.=--Coarse men, who feel a sense of injury, are in the
 habit of rating the extent of their injury as high as possible and of
 stating the occasion of it in greatly exaggerated language, in order to
 be able to feast themselves on the sentiments of hatred and revenge thus
 aroused.
 
 
 63
 
 =Value of Disparagement.=--Not a few, perhaps the majority of men, find
 it necessary, in order to retain their self esteem and a certain
 uprightness in conduct, to mentally disparage and belittle all the
 people they know. But as the inferior natures are in the majority and as
 a great deal depends upon whether they retain or lose this uprightness,
 so--
 
 
 64
 
 =The Man in a Rage.=--We should be on our guard against the man who is
 enraged against us, as against one who has attempted our life, for the
 fact that we still live consists solely in the inability to kill: were
 looks sufficient, it would have been all up with us long since. To
 reduce anyone to silence by physical manifestations of savagery or by a
 terrorizing process is a relic of under civilization. So, too, that cold
 look which great personages cast upon their servitors is a remnant of
 the caste distinction between man and man; a specimen of rude antiquity:
 women, the conservers of the old, have maintained this survival, too,
 more perfectly than men.
 
 
 65
 
 =Whither Honesty May Lead.=--Someone once had the bad habit of
 expressing himself upon occasion, and with perfect honesty, on the
 subject of the motives of his conduct, which were as good or as bad as
 the motives of all men. He aroused first disfavor, then suspicion,
 became gradually of ill repute and was pronounced a person of whom
 society should beware, until at last the law took note of such a
 perverted being for reasons which usually have no weight with it or to
 which it closes its eyes. Lack of taciturnity concerning what is
 universally held secret, and an irresponsible predisposition to see what
 no one wants to see--oneself--brought him to prison and to early death.
 
 
 66
 
 =Punishable, not Punished.=--Our crime against criminals consists in the
 fact that we treat them as rascals.
 
 
 67
 
 =Sancta simplicitas of Virtue.=--Every virtue has its privilege: for
 example, that of contributing its own little bundle of wood to the
 funeral pyre of one condemned.
 
 
 68
 
 =Morality and Consequence.=--Not alone the beholders of an act generally
 estimate the ethical or unethical element in it by the result: no, the
 one who performed the act does the same. For the motives and the
 intentions are seldom sufficiently apparent, and amid them the memory
 itself seems to become clouded by the results of the act, so that a man
 often ascribes the wrong motives to his acts or regards the remote
 motives as the direct ones. Success often imparts to an action all the
 brilliance and honor of good intention, while failure throws the shadow
 of conscience over the most estimable deeds. Hence arises the familiar
 maxim of the politician: "Give me only success: with it I can win all
 the noble souls over to my side--and make myself noble even in my own
 eyes."--In like manner will success prove an excellent substitute for a
 better argument. To this very day many well educated men think the
 triumph of Christianity over Greek philosophy is a proof of the superior
 truth of the former--although in this case it was simply the coarser and
 more powerful that triumphed over the more delicate and intellectual. As
 regards superiority of truth, it is evident that because of it the
 reviving sciences have connected themselves, point for point, with the
 philosophy of Epicurus, while Christianity has, point for point,
 recoiled from it.
 
 
 69
 
 =Love and Justice.=--Why is love so highly prized at the expense of
 justice and why are such beautiful things spoken of the former as if it
 were a far higher entity than the latter? Is the former not palpably a
 far more stupid thing than the latter?--Certainly, and on that very
 account so much the more agreeable to everybody: it is blind and has a
 rich horn of plenty out of which it distributes its gifts to everyone,
 even when they are unmerited, even when no thanks are returned. It is
 impartial like the rain, which according to the bible and experience,
 wets not alone the unjust but, in certain circumstances, the just as
 well, and to their skins at that.
 
 
 70
 
 =Execution.=--How comes it that every execution causes us more pain than
 a murder? It is the coolness of the executioner, the painful
 preparation, the perception that here a man is being used as an
 instrument for the intimidation of others. For the guilt is not punished
 even if there be any: this is ascribable to the teachers, the parents,
 the environment, in ourselves, not in the murderer--I mean the
 predisposing circumstances.
 
 
 71
 
 =Hope.=--Pandora brought the box containing evils and opened it. It was
 the gift of the gods to men, a gift of most enticing appearance
 externally and called the "box of happiness." Thereupon all the evils,
 (living, moving things) flew out: from that time to the present they fly
 about and do ill to men by day and night. One evil only did not fly out
 of the box: Pandora shut the lid at the behest of Zeus and it remained
 inside. Now man has this box of happiness perpetually in the house and
 congratulates himself upon the treasure inside of it; it is at his
 service: he grasps it whenever he is so disposed, for he knows not that
 the box which Pandora brought was a box of evils. Hence he looks upon
 the one evil still remaining as the greatest source of happiness--it is
 hope.--Zeus intended that man, notwithstanding the evils oppressing him,
 should continue to live and not rid himself of life, but keep on making
 himself miserable. For this purpose he bestowed hope upon man: it is, in
 truth, the greatest of evils for it lengthens the ordeal of man.
 
 
 72
 
 =Degree of Moral Susceptibility Unknown.=--The fact that one has or has
 not had certain profoundly moving impressions and insights into
 things--for example, an unjustly executed, slain or martyred father, a
 faithless wife, a shattering, serious accident,--is the factor upon
 which the excitation of our passions to white heat principally depends,
 as well as the course of our whole lives. No one knows to what lengths
 circumstances (sympathy, emotion) may lead him. He does not know the
 full extent of his own susceptibility. Wretched environment makes him
 wretched. It is as a rule not the quality of our experience but its
 quantity upon which depends the development of our superiority or
 inferiority, from the point of view of good and evil.
 
 
 73
 
 =The Martyr Against His Will.=--In a certain movement there was a man
 who was too cowardly and vacillating ever to contradict his comrades. He
 was made use of in each emergency, every sacrifice was demanded of him
 because he feared the disfavor of his comrades more than he feared
 death: he was a petty, abject spirit. They perceived this and upon the
 foundation of the qualities just mentioned they elevated him to the
 altitude of a hero, and finally even of a martyr. Although the cowardly
 creature always inwardly said No, he always said Yes with his lips, even
 upon the scaffold, where he died for the tenets of his party: for beside
 him stood one of his old associates who so domineered him with look and
 word that he actually went to his death with the utmost fortitude and
 has ever since been celebrated as a martyr and exalted character.
 
 
 74
 
 =General Standard.=--One will rarely err if extreme actions be ascribed
 to vanity, ordinary actions to habit and mean actions to fear.
 
 
 75
 
 =Misunderstanding of Virtue.=--Whoever has obtained his experience of
 vice in connection with pleasure as in the case of one with a youth of
 wild oats behind him, comes to the conclusion that virtue must be
 connected with self denial. Whoever, on the other hand, has been very
 much plagued by his passions and vices, longs to find in virtue the rest
 and peace of the soul. That is why it is possible for two virtuous
 people to misunderstand one another wholly.
 
 
 76
 
 =The Ascetic.=--The ascetic makes out of virtue a slavery.
 
 
 77
 
 =Honor Transferred from Persons to Things.=--Actions prompted by love or
 by the spirit of self sacrifice for others are universally honored
 wherever they are manifest. Hence is magnified the value set upon
 whatever things may be loved or whatever things conduce to self
 sacrifice: although in themselves they may be worth nothing much. A
 valiant army is evidence of the value of the thing it fights for.
 
 
 78
 
 =Ambition a Substitute for Moral Feeling.=--Moral feeling should never
 become extinct in natures that are destitute of ambition. The ambitious
 can get along without moral feeling just as well as with it.--Hence the
 sons of retired, ambitionless families, generally become by a series of
 rapid gradations, when they lose moral feeling, the most absolute
 lunkheads.
 
 
 79
 
 =Vanity Enriches.=--How poor the human mind would be without vanity! As
 it is, it resembles a well stacked and ever renewed ware-emporium that
 attracts buyers of every class: they can find almost everything, have
 almost everything, provided they bring with them the right kind of
 money--admiration.
 
 
 80
 
 =Senility and Death.=--Apart from the demands made by religion, it may
 well be asked why it is more honorable in an aged man, who feels the
 decline of his powers, to await slow extinction than to fix a term to
 his existence himself? Suicide in such a case is a quite natural and due
 proceeding that ought to command respect as a triumph of reason: and did
 in fact command respect during the times of the masters of Greek
 philosophy and the bravest Roman patriots, who usually died by their own
 hand. Eagerness, on the other hand, to keep alive from day to day with
 the anxious counsel of physicians, without capacity to attain any nearer
 to one's ideal of life, is far less worthy of respect.--Religions are
 very rich in refuges from the mandate of suicide: hence they ingratiate
 themselves with those who cling to life.
 
 
 81
 
 =Delusions Regarding Victim and Regarding Evil Doer.=--When the rich man
 takes a possession away from the poor man (for example, a prince who
 deprives a plebeian of his beloved) there arises in the mind of the poor
 man a delusion: he thinks the rich man must be wholly perverted to take
 from him the little that he has. But the rich man appreciates the value
 of a single possession much less because he is accustomed to many
 possessions, so that he cannot put himself in the place of the poor man
 and does not act by any means as ill as the latter supposes. Both have a
 totally false idea of each other. The iniquities of the mighty which
 bulk most largely in history are not nearly so monstrous as they seem.
 The hereditary consciousness of being a superior being with superior
 environment renders one very callous and lulls the conscience to rest.
 We all feel, when the difference between ourselves and some other being
 is exceedingly great, that no element of injustice can be involved, and
 we kill a fly with no qualms of conscience whatever. So, too, it is no
 indication of wickedness in Xerxes (whom even the Greeks represent as
 exceptionally noble) that he deprived a father of his son and had him
 drawn and quartered because the latter had manifested a troublesome,
 ominous distrust of an entire expedition: the individual was in this
 case brushed aside as a pestiferous insect. He was too low and mean to
 justify continued sentiments of compunction in the ruler of the world.
 Indeed no cruel man is ever as cruel, in the main, as his victim thinks.
 The idea of pain is never the same as the sensation. The rule is
 precisely analogous in the case of the unjust judge, and of the
 journalist who by means of devious rhetorical methods, leads public
 opinion astray. Cause and effect are in all these instances entwined
 with totally different series of feeling and thoughts, whereas it is
 unconsciously assumed that principal and victim feel and think exactly
 alike, and because of this assumption the guilt of the one is based upon
 the pain of the other.
 
 
 82
 
 =The Soul's Skin.=--As the bones, flesh, entrails and blood vessels are
 enclosed by a skin that renders the aspect of men endurable, so the
 impulses and passions of the soul are enclosed by vanity: it is the skin
 of the soul.
 
 
 83
 
 =Sleep of Virtue.=--If virtue goes to sleep, it will be more vigorous
 when it awakes.
 
 
 84
 
 =Subtlety of Shame.=--Men are not ashamed of obscene thoughts, but they
 are ashamed when they suspect that obscene thoughts are attributed to
 them.
 
 
 85
 
 =Naughtiness Is Rare.=--Most people are too much absorbed in themselves
 to be bad.
 
 
 86
 
 =The Mite in the Balance.=--We are praised or blamed, as the one or the
 other may be expedient, for displaying to advantage our power of
 discernment.
 
 
 87
 
 =Luke 18:14 Improved.=--He that humbleth himself wisheth to be exalted.
 
 
 88
 
 =Prevention of Suicide.=--There is a justice according to which we may
 deprive a man of life, but none that permits us to deprive him of death:
 this is merely cruelty.
 
 
 89
 
 =Vanity.=--We set store by the good opinion of men, first because it is
 of use to us and next because we wish to give them pleasure (children
 their parents, pupils their teacher, and well disposed persons all
 others generally). Only when the good opinion of men is important to
 somebody, apart from personal advantage or the desire to give pleasure,
 do we speak of vanity. In this last case, a man wants to give himself
 pleasure, but at the expense of his fellow creatures, inasmuch as he
 inspires them with a false opinion of himself or else inspires "good
 opinion" in such a way that it is a source of pain to others (by
 arousing envy). The individual generally seeks, through the opinion of
 others, to attest and fortify the opinion he has of himself; but the
 potent influence of authority--an influence as old as man himself--leads
 many, also, to strengthen their own opinion of themselves by means of
 authority, that is, to borrow from others the expedient of relying more
 upon the judgment of their fellow men than upon their own.--Interest in
 oneself, the wish to please oneself attains, with the vain man, such
 proportions that he first misleads others into a false, unduly exalted
 estimate of himself and then relies upon the authority of others for his
 self estimate; he thus creates the delusion that he pins his faith
 to.--It must, however, be admitted that the vain man does not desire to
 please others so much as himself and he will often go so far, on this
 account, as to overlook his own interests: for he often inspires his
 fellow creatures with malicious envy and renders them ill disposed in
 order that he may thus increase his own delight in himself.
 
 
 90
 
 =Limits of the Love of Mankind.=--Every man who has declared that some
 other man is an ass or a scoundrel, gets angry when the other man
 conclusively shows that the assertion was erroneous.
 
 
 91
 
 =Weeping Morality.=--How much delight morality occasions! Think of the
 ocean of pleasing tears that has flowed from the narration of noble,
 great-hearted deeds!--This charm of life would disappear if the belief
 in complete irresponsibility gained the upper hand.
 
 
 92
 
 =Origin of Justice.=--Justice (reasonableness) has its origin among
 approximate equals in power, as Thucydides (in the dreadful conferences
 of the Athenian and Melian envoys) has rightly conceived. Thus, where
 there exists no demonstrable supremacy and a struggle leads but to
 mutual, useless damage, the reflection arises that an understanding
 would best be arrived at and some compromise entered into. The
 reciprocal nature is hence the first nature of justice. Each party makes
 the other content inasmuch as each receives what it prizes more highly
 than the other. Each surrenders to the other what the other wants and
 receives in return its own desire. Justice is therefore reprisal and
 exchange upon the basis of an approximate equality of power. Thus
 revenge pertains originally to the domain of justice as it is a sort of
 reciprocity. Equally so, gratitude.--Justice reverts naturally to the
 standpoint of self preservation, therefore to the egoism of this
 consideration: "why should I injure myself to no purpose and perhaps
 never attain my end?"--So much for the origin of justice. Only because
 men, through mental habits, have forgotten the original motive of so
 called just and rational acts, and also because for thousands of years
 children have been brought to admire and imitate such acts, have they
 gradually assumed the appearance of being unegotistical. Upon this
 appearance is founded the high estimate of them, which, moreover, like
 all estimates, is continually developing, for whatever is highly
 esteemed is striven for, imitated, made the object of self sacrifice,
 while the merit of the pain and emulation thus expended is, by each
 individual, ascribed to the thing esteemed.--How slightly moral would
 the world appear without forgetfulness! A poet could say that God had
 posted forgetfulness as a sentinel at the portal of the temple of human
 merit!
 
 
 93
 
 =Concerning the Law of the Weaker.=--Whenever any party, for instance, a
 besieged city, yields to a stronger party, under stipulated conditions,
 the counter stipulation is that there be a reduction to insignificance,
 a burning and destruction of the city and thus a great damage inflicted
 upon the stronger party. Thus arises a sort of equalization principle
 upon the basis of which a law can be established. The enemy has an
 advantage to gain by its maintenance.--To this extent there is also a
 law between slaves and masters, limited only by the extent to which the
 slave may be useful to his master. The law goes originally only so far
 as the one party may appear to the other potent, invincible, stable, and
 the like. To such an extent, then, the weaker has rights, but very
 limited ones. Hence the famous dictum that each has as much law on his
 side as his power extends (or more accurately, as his power is believed
 to extend).
 
 
 94
 
 =The Three Phases of Morality Hitherto.=--It is the first evidence that
 the animal has become human when his conduct ceases to be based upon the
 immediately expedient, but upon the permanently useful; when he has,
 therefore, grown utilitarian, capable of purpose. Thus is manifested the
 first rule of reason. A still higher stage is attained when he regulates
 his conduct upon the basis of honor, by means of which he gains mastery
 of himself and surrenders his desires to principles; this lifts him far
 above the phase in which he was actuated only by considerations of
 personal advantage as he understood it. He respects and wishes to be
 respected. This means that he comprehends utility as a thing dependent
 upon what his opinion of others is and their opinion of him. Finally he
 regulates his conduct (the highest phase of morality hitherto attained)
 by his own standard of men and things. He himself decides, for himself
 and for others, what is honorable and what is useful. He has become a
 law giver to opinion, upon the basis of his ever higher developing
 conception of the utilitarian and the honorable. Knowledge makes him
 capable of placing the highest utility, (that is, the universal,
 enduring utility) before merely personal utility,--of placing ennobling
 recognition of the enduring and universal before the merely temporary:
 he lives and acts as a collective individuality.
 
 
 95
 
 =Ethic of the Developed Individual.=--Hitherto the altruistic has been
 looked upon as the distinctive characteristic of moral conduct, and it
 is manifest that it was the consideration of universal utility that
 prompted praise and recognition of altruistic conduct. Must not a
 radical departure from this point of view be imminent, now that it is
 being ever more clearly perceived that in the most personal
 considerations the most general welfare is attained: so that conduct
 inspired by the most personal considerations of advantage is just the
 sort which has its origin in the present conception of morality (as a
 universal utilitarianism)? To contemplate oneself as a complete
 personality and bear the welfare of that personality in mind in all that
 one does--this is productive of better results than any sympathetic
 susceptibility and conduct in behalf of others. Indeed we all suffer
 from such disparagement of our own personalities, which are at present
 made to deteriorate from neglect. Capacity is, in fact, divorced from
 our personality in most cases, and sacrificed to the state, to science,
 to the needy, as if it were the bad which deserved to be made a
 sacrifice. Now, we are willing to labor for our fellowmen but only to
 the extent that we find our own highest advantage in so doing, no more,
 no less. The whole matter depends upon what may be understood as one's
 advantage: the crude, undeveloped, rough individualities will be the
 very ones to estimate it most inadequately.
 
 
 96
 
 =Usage and Ethic.=--To be moral, virtuous, praiseworthy means to yield
 obedience to ancient law and hereditary usage. Whether this obedience be
 rendered readily or with difficulty is long immaterial. Enough that it
 be rendered. "Good" finally comes to mean him who acts in the
 traditional manner, as a result of heredity or natural disposition, that
 is to say does what is customary with scarcely an effort, whatever that
 may be (for example revenges injuries when revenge, as with the ancient
 Greeks, was part of good morals). He is called good because he is good
 "to some purpose," and as benevolence, sympathy, considerateness,
 moderation and the like come, in the general course of conduct, to be
 finally recognized as "good to some purpose" (as utilitarian) the
 benevolent man, the helpful man, is duly styled "good". (At first other
 and more important kinds of utilitarian qualities stand in the
 foreground.) Bad is "not habitual" (unusual), to do things not in
 accordance with usage, to oppose the traditional, however rational or
 the reverse the traditional may be. To do injury to one's social group
 or community (and to one's neighbor as thus understood) is looked upon,
 through all the variations of moral laws, in different ages, as the
 peculiarly "immoral" act, so that to-day we associate the word "bad"
 with deliberate injury to one's neighbor or community. "Egoistic" and
 "non-egoistic" do not constitute the fundamental opposites that have
 brought mankind to make a distinction between moral and immoral, good
 and bad; but adherence to traditional custom, and emancipation from it.
 How the traditional had its origin is quite immaterial; in any event it
 had no reference to good and bad or any categorical imperative but to
 the all important end of maintaining and sustaining the community, the
 race, the confederation, the nation. Every superstitious custom that
 originated in a misinterpreted event or casualty entailed some
 tradition, to adhere to which is moral. To break loose from it is
 dangerous, more prejudicial to the community than to the individual
 (because divinity visits the consequences of impiety and sacrilege upon
 the community rather than upon the individual). Now every tradition
 grows ever more venerable--the more remote is its origin, the more
 confused that origin is. The reverence due to it increases from
 generation to generation. The tradition finally becomes holy and
 inspires awe. Thus it is that the precept of piety is a far loftier
 morality than that inculcated by altruistic conduct.
 
 
 97
 
 =Delight in the Moral.=--A potent species of joy (and thereby the source
 of morality) is custom. The customary is done more easily, better,
 therefore preferably. A pleasure is felt in it and experience thus shows
 that since this practice has held its own it must be good. A manner or
 moral that lives and lets live is thus demonstrated advantageous,
 necessary, in contradistinction to all new and not yet adopted
 practices. The custom is therefore the blending of the agreeable and the
 useful. Moreover it does not require deliberation. As soon as man can
 exercise compulsion, he exercises it to enforce and establish his
 customs, for they are to him attested lifewisdom. So, too, a community
 of individuals constrains each one of their number to adopt the same
 moral or custom. The error herein is this: Because a certain custom has
 been agreeable to the feelings or at least because it proves a means of
 maintenance, this custom must be imperative, for it is regarded as the
 only thing that can possibly be consistent with well being. The well
 being of life seems to spring from it alone. This conception of the
 customary as a condition of existence is carried into the slightest
 detail of morality. Inasmuch as insight into true causation is quite
 restricted in all inferior peoples, a superstitious anxiety is felt that
 everything be done in due routine. Even when a custom is exceedingly
 burdensome it is preserved because of its supposed vital utility. It is
 not known that the same degree of satisfaction can be experienced
 through some other custom and even higher degrees of satisfaction, too.
 But it is fully appreciated that all customs do become more agreeable
 with the lapse of time, no matter how difficult they may have been found
 in the beginning, and that even the severest way of life may be rendered
 a matter of habit and therefore a pleasure.
 
 
 98
 
 =Pleasure and Social Instinct.=--Through his relations with other men,
 man derives a new species of delight in those pleasurable emotions which
 his own personality affords him; whereby the domain of pleasurable
 emotions is made infinitely more comprehensive. No doubt he has
 inherited many of these feelings from the brutes, which palpably feel
 delight when they sport with one another, as mothers with their young.
 So, too, the sexual relations must be taken into account: they make
 every young woman interesting to every young man from the standpoint of
 pleasure, and conversely. The feeling of pleasure originating in human
 relationships makes men in general better. The delight in common, the
 pleasures enjoyed together heighten one another. The individual feels a
 sense of security. He becomes better natured. Distrust and malice
 dissolve. For the man feels the sense of benefit and observes the same
 feeling in others. Mutual manifestations of pleasure inspire mutual
 sympathy, the sentiment of homogeneity. The same effect is felt also at
 mutual sufferings, in a common danger, in stormy weather. Upon such a
 foundation are built the earliest alliances: the object of which is the
 mutual protection and safety from threatening misfortunes, and the
 welfare of each individual. And thus the social instinct develops from
 pleasure.
 
 
 99
 
 =The Guiltless Nature of So-Called Bad Acts.=--All "bad" acts are
 inspired by the impulse to self preservation or, more accurately, by
 the desire for pleasure and for the avoidance of pain in the individual.
 Thus are they occasioned, but they are not, therefore, bad. "Pain self
 prepared" does not exist, except in the brains of the philosophers, any
 more than "pleasure self prepared" (sympathy in the Schopenhauer sense).
 In the condition anterior to the state we kill the creature, be it man
 or ape, that attempts to pluck the fruit of a tree before we pluck it
 ourselves should we happen to be hungry at the time and making for that
 tree: as we would do to-day, so far as the brute is concerned, if we
 were wandering in savage regions.--The bad acts which most disturb us at
 present do so because of the erroneous supposition that the one who is
 guilty of them towards us has a free will in the matter and that it was
 within his discretion not to have done these evil things. This belief in
 discretionary power inspires hate, thirst for revenge, malice, the
 entire perversion of the mental processes, whereas we would feel in no
 way incensed against the brute, as we hold it irresponsible. To inflict
 pain not from the instinct of self preservation but in requital--this is
 the consequence of false judgment and is equally a guiltless course of
 conduct. The individual can, in that condition which is anterior to the
 state, act with fierceness and violence for the intimidation of another
 creature, in order to render his own power more secure as a result of
 such acts of intimidation. Thus acts the powerful, the superior, the
 original state founder, who subjugates the weaker. He has the right to
 do so, as the state nowadays assumes the same right, or, to be more
 accurate, there is no right that can conflict with this. A foundation
 for all morality can first be laid only when a stronger individuality or
 a collective individuality, for example society, the state, subjects the
 single personalities, hence builds upon their unification and
 establishes a bond of union. Morality results from compulsion, it is
 indeed itself one long compulsion to which obedience is rendered in
 order that pain may be avoided. At first it is but custom, later free
 obedience and finally almost instinct. At last it is (like everything
 habitual and natural) associated with pleasure--and is then called
 virtue.
 
 
 100
 
 =Shame.=--Shame exists wherever a "mystery" exists: but this is a
 religious notion which in the earlier period of human civilization had
 great vogue. Everywhere there were circumscribed spots to which access
 was denied on account of some divine law, except in special
 circumstances. At first these spots were quite extensive, inasmuch as
 stipulated areas could not be trod by the uninitiated, who, when near
 them, felt tremors and anxieties. This sentiment was frequently
 transferred to other relationships, for example to sexual relations,
 which, as the privilege and gateway of mature age, must be withdrawn
 from the contemplation of youth for its own advantage: relations which
 many divinities were busy in preserving and sanctifying, images of which
 divinities were duly placed in marital chambers as guardians. (In
 Turkish such an apartment is termed a harem or holy thing, the same word
 also designating the vestibule of a mosque). So, too, Kingship is
 regarded as a centre from which power and brilliance stream forth, as a
 mystery to the subjects, impregnated with secrecy and shame, sentiments
 still quite operative among peoples who in other respects are without
 any shame at all. So, too, is the whole world of inward states, the
 so-called "soul," even now, for all non-philosophical persons, a
 "mystery," and during countless ages it was looked upon as a something
 of divine origin, in direct communion with deity. It is, therefore, an
 adytum and occasions shame.
 
 
 101
 
 =Judge Not.=--Care must be taken, in the contemplation of earlier ages,
 that there be no falling into unjust scornfulness. The injustice in
 slavery, the cruelty in the subjugation of persons and peoples must not
 be estimated by our standard. For in that period the instinct of justice
 was not so highly developed. Who dare reproach the Genoese Calvin for
 burning the physician Servetus at the stake? It was a proceeding growing
 out of his convictions. And the Inquisition, too, had its justification.
 The only thing is that the prevailing views were false and led to those
 proceedings which seem so cruel to us, simply because such views have
 become foreign to us. Besides, what is the burning alive of one
 individual compared with eternal hell pains for everybody else? And yet
 this idea then had hold of all the world without in the least vitiating,
 with its frightfulness, the other idea of a god. Even we nowadays are
 hard and merciless to political revolutionists, but that is because we
 are in the habit of believing the state a necessity, and hence the
 cruelty of the proceeding is not so much understood as in the other
 cases where the points of view are repudiated. The cruelty to animals
 shown by children and Italians is due to the same misunderstanding. The
 animal, owing to the exigencies of the church catechism, is placed too
 far below the level of mankind.--Much, too, that is frightful and
 inhuman in history, and which is almost incredible, is rendered less
 atrocious by the reflection that the one who commands and the one who
 executes are different persons. The former does not witness the
 performance and hence it makes no strong impression on him. The latter
 obeys a superior and hence feels no responsibility. Most princes and
 military chieftains appear, through lack of true perception, cruel and
 hard without really being so.--Egoism is not bad because the idea of the
 "neighbor"--the word is of Christian origin and does not correspond to
 truth--is very weak in us, and we feel ourselves, in regard to him, as
 free from responsibility as if plants and stones were involved. That
 another is in suffering must be learned and it can never be wholly
 learned.
 
 
 102
 
 "=Man Always Does Right.="--We do not blame nature when she sends a
 thunder storm and makes us wet: why then do we term the man who inflicts
 injury immoral? Because in the latter case we assume a voluntary,
 ruling, free will, and in the former necessity. But this distinction is
 a delusion. Moreover, even the intentional infliction of injury is not,
 in all circumstances termed immoral. Thus, we kill a fly intentionally
 without thinking very much about it, simply because its buzzing about is
 disagreeable; and we punish a criminal and inflict pain upon him in
 order to protect ourselves and society. In the first case it is the
 individual who, for the sake of preserving himself or in order to spare
 himself pain, does injury with design: in the second case, it is the
 state. All ethic deems intentional infliction of injury justified by
 necessity; that is when it is a matter of self preservation. But these
 two points of view are sufficient to explain all bad acts done by man to
 men. It is desired to obtain pleasure or avoid pain. In any sense, it is
 a question, always, of self preservation. Socrates and Plato are right:
 whatever man does he always does right: that is, does what seems to him
 good (advantageous) according to the degree of advancement his intellect
 has attained, which is always the measure of his rational capacity.
 
 
 103
 
 =The Inoffensive in Badness.=--Badness has not for its object the
 infliction of pain upon others but simply our own satisfaction as, for
 instance, in the case of thirst for vengeance or of nerve excitation.
 Every act of teasing shows what pleasure is caused by the display of
 our power over others and what feelings of delight are experienced in
 the sense of domination. Is there, then, anything immoral in feeling
 pleasure in the pain of others? Is malicious joy devilish, as
 Schopenhauer says? In the realm of nature we feel joy in breaking
 boughs, shattering rocks, fighting with wild beasts, simply to attest
 our strength thereby. Should not the knowledge that another suffers on
 our account here, in this case, make the same kind of act, (which, by
 the way, arouses no qualms of conscience in us) immoral also? But if we
 had not this knowledge there would be no pleasure in one's own
 superiority or power, for this pleasure is experienced only in the
 suffering of another, as in the case of teasing. All pleasure is, in
 itself, neither good nor bad. Whence comes the conviction that one
 should not cause pain in others in order to feel pleasure oneself?
 Simply from the standpoint of utility, that is, in consideration of the
 consequences, of ultimate pain, since the injured party or state will
 demand satisfaction and revenge. This consideration alone can have led
 to the determination to renounce such pleasure.--Sympathy has the
 satisfaction of others in view no more than, as already stated, badness
 has the pain of others in view. For there are at least two (perhaps many
 more) elementary ingredients in personal gratification which enter
 largely into our self satisfaction: one of them being the pleasure of
 the emotion, of which species is sympathy with tragedy, and another,
 when the impulse is to action, being the pleasure of exercising one's
 power. Should a sufferer be very dear to us, we divest ourselves of pain
 by the performance of acts of sympathy.--With the exception of some few
 philosophers, men have placed sympathy very low in the rank of moral
 feelings: and rightly.
 
 
 104
 
 =Self Defence.=--If self defence is in general held a valid
 justification, then nearly every manifestation of so called immoral
 egoism must be justified, too. Pain is inflicted, robbery or killing
 done in order to maintain life or to protect oneself and ward off harm.
 A man lies when cunning and delusion are valid means of self
 preservation. To injure intentionally when our safety and our existence
 are involved, or the continuance of our well being, is conceded to be
 moral. The state itself injures from this motive when it hangs
 criminals. In unintentional injury the immoral, of course, can not be
 present, as accident alone is involved. But is there any sort of
 intentional injury in which our existence and the maintenance of our
 well being be not involved? Is there such a thing as injuring from
 absolute badness, for example, in the case of cruelty? If a man does not
 know what pain an act occasions, that act is not one of wickedness. Thus
 the child is not bad to the animal, not evil. It disturbs and rends it
 as if it were one of its playthings. Does a man ever fully know how much
 pain an act may cause another? As far as our nervous system extends, we
 shield ourselves from pain. If it extended further, that is, to our
 fellow men, we would never cause anyone else any pain (except in such
 cases as we cause it to ourselves, when we cut ourselves, surgically, to
 heal our ills, or strive and trouble ourselves to gain health). We
 conclude from analogy that something pains somebody and can in
 consequence, through recollection and the power of imagination, feel
 pain also. But what a difference there always is between the tooth ache
 and the pain (sympathy) that the spectacle of tooth ache occasions!
 Therefore when injury is inflicted from so called badness the degree of
 pain thereby experienced is always unknown to us: in so far, however, as
 pleasure is felt in the act (a sense of one's own power, of one's own
 excitation) the act is committed to maintain the well being of the
 individual and hence comes under the purview of self defence and lying
 for self preservation. Without pleasure, there is no life; the struggle
 for pleasure is the struggle for life. Whether the individual shall
 carry on this struggle in such a way that he be called good or in such a
 way that he be called bad is something that the standard and the
 capacity of his own intellect must determine for him.
 
 
 105
 
 =Justice that Rewards.=--Whoever has fully understood the doctrine of
 absolute irresponsibility can no longer include the so called rewarding
 and punishing justice in the idea of justice, if the latter be taken to
 mean that to each be given his due. For he who is punished does not
 deserve the punishment. He is used simply as a means to intimidate
 others from certain acts. Equally, he who is rewarded does not merit the
 reward. He could not act any differently than he did act. Hence the
 reward has only the significance of an encouragement to him and others
 as a motive for subsequent acts. The praise is called out only to him
 who is running in the race and not to him who has arrived at the goal.
 Something that comes to someone as his own is neither a punishment nor a
 reward. It is given to him from utiliarian considerations, without his
 having any claim to it in justice. Hence one must say "the wise man
 praises not because a good act has been done" precisely as was once
 said: "the wise man punishes not because a bad act has been done but in
 order that a bad act may not be done." If punishment and reward ceased,
 there would cease with them the most powerful incentives to certain acts
 and away from other acts. The purposes of men demand their continuance
 [of punishment and reward] and inasmuch as punishment and reward, blame
 and praise operate most potently upon vanity, these same purposes of men
 imperatively require the continuance of vanity.
 
 
 106
 
 =The Water Fall.=--At the sight of a water fall we may opine that in the
 countless curves, spirations and dashes of the waves we behold freedom
 of the will and of the impulses. But everything is compulsory,
 everything can be mathematically calculated. Thus it is, too, with human
 acts. We would be able to calculate in advance every single action if we
 were all knowing, as well as every advance in knowledge, every delusion,
 every bad deed. The acting individual himself is held fast in the
 illusion of volition. If, on a sudden, the entire movement of the world
 stopped short, and an all knowing and reasoning intelligence were there
 to take advantage of this pause, he could foretell the future of every
 being to the remotest ages and indicate the path that would be taken in
 the world's further course. The deception of the acting individual as
 regards himself, the assumption of the freedom of the will, is a part of
 this computable mechanism.
 
 
 107
 
 =Non-Responsibility and Non-Guilt.=--The absolute irresponsibility of
 man for his acts and his nature is the bitterest drop in the cup of him
 who has knowledge, if he be accustomed to behold in responsibility and
 duty the patent of nobility of his human nature. All his estimates,
 preferences, dislikes are thus made worthless and false. His deepest
 sentiment, with which he honored the sufferer, the hero, sprang from an
 error. He may no longer praise, no longer blame, for it is irrational to
 blame and praise nature and necessity. Just as he cherishes the
 beautiful work of art, but does not praise it (as it is incapable of
 doing anything for itself), just as he stands in the presence of plants,
 he must stand in the presence of human conduct, his own included. He may
 admire strength, beauty, capacity, therein, but he can discern no merit.
 The chemical process and the conflict of the elements, the ordeal of
 the invalid who strives for convalescence, are no more merits than the
 soul-struggles and extremities in which one is torn this way and that by
 contending motives until one finally decides in favor of the
 strongest--as the phrase has it, although, in fact, it is the strongest
 motive that decides for us. All these motives, however, whatever fine
 names we may give them, have grown from the same roots in which we
 believe the baneful poisons lurk. Between good and bad actions there is
 no difference in kind but, at most, in degree. Good acts are sublimated
 evil. Bad acts are degraded, imbruted good. The very longing of the
 individual for self gratification (together with the fear of being
 deprived of it) obtains satisfaction in all circumstances, let the
 individual act as he may, that is, as he must: be it in deeds of vanity,
 revenge, pleasure, utility, badness, cunning, be it in deeds of self
 sacrifice, sympathy or knowledge. The degrees of rational capacity
 determine the direction in which this longing impels: every society,
 every individual has constantly present a comparative classification of
 benefits in accordance with which conduct is determined and others are
 judged. But this standard perpetually changes. Many acts are called bad
 that are only stupid, because the degree of intelligence that decided
 for them was low. Indeed, in a certain sense, all acts now are stupid,
 for the highest degree of human intelligence that has yet been attained
 will in time most certainly be surpassed and then, in retrospection, all
 our present conduct and opinion will appear as narrow and petty as we
 now deem the conduct and opinion of savage peoples and ages.--To
 perceive all these things may occasion profound pain but there is,
 nevertheless, a consolation. Such pains are birth pains. The butterfly
 insists upon breaking through the cocoon, he presses through it, tears
 it to pieces, only to be blinded and confused by the strange light, by
 the realm of liberty. By such men as are capable of this sadness--how
 few there are!--will the first attempt be made to see if humanity may
 convert itself from a thing of morality to a thing of wisdom. The sun of
 a new gospel sheds its first ray upon the loftiest height in the souls
 of those few: but the clouds are massed there, too, thicker than ever,
 and not far apart are the brightest sunlight and the deepest gloom.
 Everything is necessity--so says the new knowledge: and this knowledge
 is itself necessity. All is guiltlessness, and knowledge is the way to
 insight into this guiltlessness. If pleasure, egoism, vanity be
 necessary to attest the moral phenomena and their richest blooms, the
 instinct for truth and accuracy of knowledge; if delusion and confusion
 of the imagination were the only means whereby mankind could gradually
 lift itself up to this degree of self enlightenment and self
 emancipation--who would venture to disparage the means? Who would have
 the right to feel sad if made aware of the goal to which those paths
 lead? Everything in the domain of ethic is evolved, changeable,
 tottering; all things flow, it is true--but all things are also in the
 stream: to their goal. Though within us the hereditary habit of
 erroneous judgment, love, hate, may be ever dominant, yet under the
 influence of awaking knowledge it will ever become weaker: a new habit,
 that of understanding, not-loving, not-hating, looking from above, grows
 up within us gradually and in the same soil, and may, perhaps, in
 thousands of years be powerful enough to endow mankind with capacity to
 develop the wise, guiltless man (conscious of guiltlessness) as
 unfailingly as it now developes the unwise, irrational, guilt-conscious
 man--that is to say, the necessary higher step, not the opposite of it.
 
 
 
 
 THE RELIGIOUS LIFE.
 
 
 108
 
 =The Double Contest Against Evil.=--If an evil afflicts us we can either
 so deal with it as to remove its cause or else so deal with it that its
 effect upon our feeling is changed: hence look upon the evil as a
 benefit of which the uses will perhaps first become evident in some
 subsequent period. Religion and art (and also the metaphysical
 philosophy) strive to effect an alteration of the feeling, partly by an
 alteration of our judgment respecting the experience (for example, with
 the aid of the dictum "whom God loves, he chastizes") partly by the
 awakening of a joy in pain, in emotion especially (whence the art of
 tragedy had its origin). The more one is disposed to interpret away and
 justify, the less likely he is to look directly at the causes of evil
 and eliminate them. An instant alleviation and narcotizing of pain, as
 is usual in the case of tooth ache, is sufficient for him even in the
 severest suffering. The more the domination of religions and of all
 narcotic arts declines, the more searchingly do men look to the
 elimination of evil itself, which is a rather bad thing for the tragic
 poets--for there is ever less and less material for tragedy, since the
 domain of unsparing, immutable destiny grows constantly more
 circumscribed--and a still worse thing for the priests, for these last
 have lived heretofore upon the narcoticizing of human ill.
 
 
 109
 
 =Sorrow is Knowledge.=--How willingly would not one exchange the false
 assertions of the homines religiosi that there is a god who commands us
 to be good, who is the sentinel and witness of every act, every moment,
 every thought, who loves us, who plans our welfare in every
 misfortune--how willingly would not one exchange these for truths as
 healing, beneficial and grateful as those delusions! But there are no
 such truths. Philosophy can at most set up in opposition to them other
 metaphysical plausibilities (fundamental untruths as well). The tragedy
 of it all is that, although one cannot believe these dogmas of religion
 and metaphysics if one adopts in heart and head the potent methods of
 truth, one has yet become, through human evolution, so tender,
 susceptible, sensitive, as to stand in need of the most effective means
 of rest and consolation. From this state of things arises the danger
 that, through the perception of truth or, more accurately, seeing
 through delusion, one may bleed to death. Byron has put this into
 deathless verse:
 
      "Sorrow is knowledge: they who know the most
      Must mourn the deepest o'er the fatal truth,
      The tree of knowledge is not that of life."
 
 Against such cares there is no better protective than the light fancy of
 Horace, (at any rate during the darkest hours and sun eclipses of the
 soul) expressed in the words
 
      "quid aeternis minorem
      consiliis animum fatigas?
      cur non sub alta vel platano vel hac
      pinu jacentes."[22]
 
 [22] Then wherefore should you, who are mortal, outwear
      Your soul with a profitless burden of care
      Say, why should we not, flung at ease neath this pine,
      Or a plane-tree's broad umbrage, quaff gaily our wine?
                       (Translation of Sir Theodore Martin.)
 
 At any rate, light fancy or heavy heartedness of any degree must be
 better than a romantic retrogression and desertion of one's flag, an
 approach to Christianity in any form: for with it, in the present state
 of knowledge, one can have nothing to do without hopelessly defiling
 one's intellectual integrity and surrendering it unconditionally. These
 woes may be painful enough, but without pain one cannot become a leader
 and guide of humanity: and woe to him who would be such and lacks this
 pure integrity of the intellect!
 
 
 110
 
 =The Truth in Religion.=--In the ages of enlightenment justice was not
 done to the importance of religion, of this there can be no doubt. It is
 also equally certain that in the ensuing reaction of enlightenment, the
 demands of justice were far exceeded inasmuch as religion was treated
 with love, even with infatuation and proclaimed as a profound, indeed
 the most profound knowledge of the world, which science had but to
 divest of its dogmatic garb in order to possess "truth" in its
 unmythical form. Religions must therefore--this was the contention of
 all foes of enlightenment--sensu allegorico, with regard for the
 comprehension of the masses, give expression to that ancient truth which
 is wisdom in itself, inasmuch as all science of modern times has led up
 to it instead of away from it. So that between the most ancient wisdom
 of man and all later wisdom there prevails harmony, even similarity of
 viewpoint; and the advancement of knowledge--if one be disposed to
 concede such a thing--has to do not with its nature but with its
 propagation. This whole conception of religion and science is through
 and through erroneous, and none would to-day be hardy enough to
 countenance it had not Schopenhauer's rhetoric taken it under
 protection, this high sounding rhetoric which now gains auditors after
 the lapse of a generation. Much as may be gained from Schopenhauer's
 religio-ethical human and cosmical oracle as regards the comprehension
 of Christianity and other religions, it is nevertheless certain that he
 erred regarding the value of religion to knowledge. He himself was in
 this but a servile pupil of the scientific teachers of his time who had
 all taken romanticism under their protection and renounced the spirit of
 enlightenment. Had he been born in our own time it would have been
 impossible for him to have spoken of the sensus allegoricus of religion.
 He would instead have done truth the justice to say: never has a
 religion, directly or indirectly, either as dogma or as allegory,
 contained a truth. For all religions grew out of dread or necessity, and
 came into existence through an error of the reason. They have, perhaps,
 in times of danger from science, incorporated some philosophical
 doctrine or other into their systems in order to make it possible to
 continue one's existence within them. But this is but a theological work
 of art dating from the time in which a religion began to doubt of
 itself. These theological feats of art, which are most common in
 Christianity as the religion of a learned age, impregnated with
 philosophy, have led to this superstition of the sensus allegoricus, as
 has, even more, the habit of the philosophers (namely those
 half-natures, the poetical philosophers and the philosophising artists)
 of dealing with their own feelings as if they constituted the
 fundamental nature of humanity and hence of giving their own religious
 feelings a predominant influence over the structure of their systems. As
 the philosophers mostly philosophised under the influence of hereditary
 religious habits, or at least under the traditional influence of this
 "metaphysical necessity," they naturally arrived at conclusions
 closely resembling the Judaic or Christian or Indian religious
 tenets--resembling, in the way that children are apt to look like their
 mothers: only in this case the fathers were not certain as to the
 maternity, as easily happens--but in the innocence of their admiration,
 they fabled regarding the family likeness of all religion and science.
 In reality, there exists between religion and true science neither
 relationship nor friendship, not even enmity: they dwell in different
 spheres. Every philosophy that lets the religious comet gleam through
 the darkness of its last outposts renders everything within it that
 purports to be science, suspicious. It is all probably religion,
 although it may assume the guise of science.--Moreover, though all the
 peoples agree concerning certain religious things, for example, the
 existence of a god (which, by the way, as regards this point, is not
 the case) this fact would constitute an argument against the thing
 agreed upon, for example the very existence of a god. The consensus
 gentium and especially hominum can probably amount only to an absurdity.
 Against it there is no consensus omnium sapientium whatever, on any
 point, with the exception of which Goethe's verse speaks:
 
      "All greatest sages to all latest ages
          Will smile, wink and slily agree
      'Tis folly to wait till a fool's empty pate
          Has learned to be knowing and free.
      So children of wisdom must look upon fools
      As creatures who're never the better for schools."
 
 Stated without rhyme or metre and adapted to our case: the consensus
 sapientium is to the effect that the consensus gentium amounts to an
 absurdity.
 
 
 111
 
 =Origin of Religious Worship.=--Let us transport ourselves back to the
 times in which religious life flourished most vigorously and we will
 find a fundamental conviction prevalent which we no longer share and
 which has resulted in the closing of the door to religious life once for
 all so far as we are concerned: this conviction has to do with nature
 and intercourse with her. In those times nothing is yet known of
 nature's laws. Neither for earth nor for heaven is there a must. A
 season, sunshine, rain can come or stay away as it pleases. There is
 wanting, in particular, all idea of natural causation. If a man rows, it
 is not the oar that moves the boat, but rowing is a magical ceremony
 whereby a demon is constrained to move the boat. All illness, death
 itself, is a consequence of magical influences. In sickness and death
 nothing natural is conceived. The whole idea of "natural course" is
 wanting. The idea dawns first upon the ancient Greeks, that is to say in
 a very late period of humanity, in the conception of a Moira [fate]
 ruling over the gods. If any person shoots off a bow, there is always an
 irrational strength and agency in the act. If the wells suddenly run
 dry, the first thought is of subterranean demons and their pranks. It
 must have been the dart of a god beneath whose invisible influence a
 human being suddenly collapses. In India, the carpenter (according to
 Lubbock) is in the habit of making devout offerings to his hammer and
 hatchet. A Brahmin treats the plume with which he writes, a soldier the
 weapon that he takes into the field, a mason his trowel, a laborer his
 plow, in the same way. All nature is, in the opinion of religious
 people, a sum total of the doings of conscious and willing beings, an
 immense mass of complex volitions. In regard to all that takes place
 outside of us no conclusion is permissible that anything will result
 thus and so, must result thus and so, that we are comparatively
 calculable and certain in our experiences, that man is the rule, nature
 the ruleless. This view forms the fundamental conviction that dominates
 crude, religion-producing, early civilizations. We contemporary men feel
 exactly the opposite: the richer man now feels himself inwardly, the
 more polyphone the music and the sounding of his soul, the more
 powerfully does the uniformity of nature impress him. We all, with
 Goethe, recognize in nature the great means of repose for the soul. We
 listen to the pendulum stroke of this great clock with longing for rest,
 for absolute calm and quiescence, as if we could drink in the uniformity
 of nature and thereby arrive first at an enjoyment of oneself. Formerly
 it was the reverse: if we carry ourselves back to the periods of crude
 civilization, or if we contemplate contemporary savages, we will find
 them most strongly influenced by rule, by tradition. The individual is
 almost automatically bound to rule and tradition and moves with the
 uniformity of a pendulum. To him nature--the uncomprehended, fearful,
 mysterious nature--must seem the domain of freedom, of volition, of
 higher power, indeed as an ultra-human degree of destiny, as god. Every
 individual in such periods and circumstances feels that his existence,
 his happiness, the existence and happiness of the family, the state,
 the success or failure of every undertaking, must depend upon these
 dispositions of nature. Certain natural events must occur at the proper
 time and certain others must not occur. How can influence be exercised
 over this fearful unknown, how can this domain of freedom be brought
 under subjection? thus he asks himself, thus he worries: Is there no
 means to render these powers of nature as subject to rule and tradition
 as you are yourself?--The cogitation of the superstitious and
 magic-deluded man is upon the theme of imposing a law upon nature: and
 to put it briefly, religious worship is the result of such cogitation.
 The problem which is present to every man is closely connected with this
 one: how can the weaker party dictate laws to the stronger, control its
 acts in reference to the weaker? At first the most harmless form of
 influence is recollected, that influence which is acquired when the
 partiality of anyone has been won. Through beseeching and prayer,
 through abject humiliation, through obligations to regular gifts and
 propitiations, through flattering homages, it is possible, therefore, to
 impose some guidance upon the forces of nature, to the extent that their
 partiality be won: love binds and is bound. Then agreements can be
 entered into by means of which certain courses of conduct are mutually
 concluded, vows are made and authorities prescribed. But far more potent
 is that species of power exercised by means of magic and incantation. As
 a man is able to injure a powerful enemy by means of the magician and
 render him helpless with fear, as the love potion operates at a
 distance, so can the mighty forces of nature, in the opinion of weaker
 mankind, be controlled by similar means. The principal means of
 effecting incantations is to acquire control of something belonging to
 the party to be influenced, hair, finger nails, food from his table,
 even his picture or his name. With such apparatus it is possible to act
 by means of magic, for the basic principle is that to everything
 spiritual corresponds something corporeal. With the aid of this
 corporeal element the spirit may be bound, injured or destroyed. The
 corporeal affords the handle by which the spiritual can be laid hold of.
 In the same way that man influences mankind does he influences some
 spirit of nature, for this latter has also its corporeal element that
 can be grasped. The tree, and on the same basis, the seed from which it
 grew: this puzzling sequence seems to demonstrate that in both forms the
 same spirit is embodied, now large, now small. A stone that suddenly
 rolls, is the body in which the spirit works. Does a huge boulder lie in
 a lonely moor? It is impossible to think of mortal power having placed
 it there. The stone must have moved itself there. That is to say some
 spirit must dominate it. Everything that has a body is subject to magic,
 including, therefore, the spirits of nature. If a god is directly
 connected with his portrait, a direct influence (by refraining from
 devout offerings, by whippings, chainings and the like) can be brought
 to bear upon him. The lower classes in China tie cords around the
 picture of their god in order to defy his departing favor, when he has
 left them in the lurch, and tear the picture to pieces, drag it through
 the streets into dung heaps and gutters, crying: "You dog of a spirit,
 we housed you in a beautiful temple, we gilded you prettily, we fed you
 well, we brought you offerings, and yet how ungrateful you are!" Similar
 displays of resentment have been made against pictures of the mother of
 god and pictures of saints in Catholic countries during the present
 century when such pictures would not do their duty during times of
 pestilence and drought.
 
 Through all these magical relationships to nature countless ceremonies
 are occasioned, and finally, when their complexity and confusion grow
 too great, pains are taken to systematize them, to arrange them so that
 the favorable course of nature's progress, namely the great yearly
 circle of the seasons, may be brought about by a corresponding course of
 the ceremonial progress. The aim of religious worship is to influence
 nature to human advantage, and hence to instil a subjection to law into
 her that originally she has not, whereas at present man desires to find
 out the subjection to law of nature in order to guide himself thereby.
 In brief, the system of religious worship rests upon the idea of magic
 between man and man, and the magician is older than the priest. But it
 rests equally upon other and higher ideas. It brings into prominence the
 sympathetic relation of man to man, the existence of benevolence,
 gratitude, prayer, of truces between enemies, of loans upon security, of
 arrangements for the protection of property. Man, even in very inferior
 degrees of civilization, does not stand in the presence of nature as a
 helpless slave, he is not willy-nilly the absolute servant of nature. In
 the Greek development of religion, especially in the relationship to the
 Olympian gods, it becomes possible to entertain the idea of an existence
 side by side of two castes, a higher, more powerful, and a lower, less
 powerful: but both are bound together in some way, on account of their
 origin and are one species. They need not be ashamed of one another.
 This is the element of distinction in Greek religion.
 
 
 112
 
 =At the Contemplation of Certain Ancient Sacrificial Proceedings.=--How
 many sentiments are lost to us is manifest in the union of the farcical,
 even of the obscene, with the religious feeling. The feeling that this
 mixture is possible is becoming extinct. We realize the mixture only
 historically, in the mysteries of Demeter and Dionysos and in the
 Christian Easter festivals and religious mysteries. But we still
 perceive the sublime in connection with the ridiculous, and the like,
 the emotional with the absurd. Perhaps a later age will be unable to
 understand even these combinations.
 
 
 113
 
 =Christianity as Antiquity.=--When on a Sunday morning we hear the old
 bells ringing, we ask ourselves: Is it possible? All this for a Jew
 crucified two thousand years ago who said he was God's son? The proof of
 such an assertion is lacking.--Certainly, the Christian religion
 constitutes in our time a protruding bit of antiquity from very remote
 ages and that its assertions are still generally believed--although men
 have become so keen in the scrutiny of claims--constitutes the oldest
 relic of this inheritance. A god who begets children by a mortal woman;
 a sage who demands that no more work be done, that no more justice be
 administered but that the signs of the approaching end of the world be
 heeded; a system of justice that accepts an innocent as a vicarious
 sacrifice in the place of the guilty; a person who bids his disciples
 drink his blood; prayers for miracles; sins against a god expiated upon
 a god; fear of a hereafter to which death is the portal; the figure of
 the cross as a symbol in an age that no longer knows the purpose and the
 ignominy of the cross--how ghostly all these things flit before us out
 of the grave of their primitive antiquity! Is one to believe that such
 things can still be believed?
 
 
 114
 
 =The Un-Greek in Christianity.=--The Greeks did not look upon the
 Homeric gods above them as lords nor upon themselves beneath as
 servants, after the fashion of the Jews. They saw but the counterpart as
 in a mirror of the most perfect specimens of their own caste, hence an
 ideal, but no contradiction of their own nature. There was a feeling of
 mutual relationship, resulting in a mutual interest, a sort of alliance.
 Man thinks well of himself when he gives himself such gods and places
 himself in a relationship akin to that of the lower nobility with the
 higher; whereas the Italian races have a decidedly vulgar religion,
 involving perpetual anxiety because of bad and mischievous powers and
 soul disturbers. Wherever the Olympian gods receded into the background,
 there even Greek life became gloomier and more perturbed.--Christianity,
 on the other hand, oppressed and degraded humanity completely and sank
 it into deepest mire: into the feeling of utter abasement it suddenly
 flashed the gleam of divine compassion, so that the amazed and
 grace-dazzled stupefied one gave a cry of delight and for a moment
 believed that the whole of heaven was within him. Upon this unhealthy
 excess of feeling, upon the accompanying corruption of heart and head,
 Christianity attains all its psychological effects. It wants to
 annihilate, debase, stupefy, amaze, bedazzle. There is but one thing
 that it does not want: measure, standard (das Maas) and therefore is it
 in the worst sense barbarous, asiatic, vulgar, un-Greek.
 
 
 115
 
 =Being Religious to Some Purpose.=--There are certain insipid,
 traffic-virtuous people to whom religion is pinned like the hem of some
 garb of a higher humanity. These people do well to remain religious: it
 adorns them. All who are not versed in some professional
 weapon--including tongue and pen as weapons--are servile: to all such
 the Christian religion is very useful, for then their servility assumes
 the aspect of Christian virtue and is amazingly adorned.--People whose
 daily lives are empty and colorless are readily religious. This is
 comprehensible and pardonable, but they have no right to demand that
 others, whose daily lives are not empty and colorless, should be
 religious also.
 
 
 116
 
 =The Everyday Christian.=--If Christianity, with its allegations of an
 avenging God, universal sinfulness, choice of grace, and the danger of
 eternal damnation, were true, it would be an indication of weakness of
 mind and character not to be a priest or an apostle or a hermit, and
 toil for one's own salvation. It would be irrational to lose sight of
 one's eternal well being in comparison with temporary advantage:
 Assuming these dogmas to be generally believed, the every day Christian
 is a pitiable figure, a man who really cannot count as far as three, and
 who, for the rest, just because of his intellectual incapacity, does not
 deserve to be as hard punished as Christianity promises he shall be.
 
 
 117
 
 =Concerning the Cleverness of Christianity.=--It is a master stroke of
 Christianity to so emphasize the unworthiness, sinfulness and
 degradation of men in general that contempt of one's fellow creatures
 becomes impossible. "He may sin as much as he pleases, he is not by
 nature different from me. It is I who in every way am unworthy and
 contemptible." So says the Christian to himself. But even this feeling
 has lost its keenest sting for the Christian does not believe in his
 individual degradation. He is bad in his general human capacity and he
 soothes himself a little with the assertion that we are all alike.
 
 
 118
 
 =Personal Change.=--As soon as a religion rules, it has for its
 opponents those who were its first disciples.
 
 
 119
 
 =Fate of Christianity.=--Christianity arose to lighten the heart, but
 now it must first make the heart heavy in order to be able to lighten it
 afterwards. Christianity will consequently go down.
 
 
 120
 
 =The Testimony of Pleasure.=--The agreeable opinion is accepted as true.
 This is the testimony of pleasure (or as the church says, the evidence
 of strength) of which all religions are so proud, although they should
 all be ashamed of it. If a belief did not make blessed it would not be
 believed. How little it would be worth, then!
 
 
 121
 
 =Dangerous Play.=--Whoever gives religious feeling room, must then also
 let it grow. He can do nothing else. Then his being gradually changes.
 The religious element brings with it affinities and kinships. The whole
 circle of his judgment and feeling is clouded and draped in religious
 shadows. Feeling cannot stand still. One should be on one's guard.
 
 
 122
 
 =The Blind Pupil.=--As long as one knows very well the strength and the
 weakness of one's dogma, one's art, one's religion, its strength is
 still low. The pupil and apostle who has no eye for the weaknesses of a
 dogma, a religion and so on, dazzled by the aspect of the master and by
 his own reverence for him, has, on that very account, generally more
 power than the master. Without blind pupils the influence of a man and
 his work has never become great. To give victory to knowledge, often
 amounts to no more than so allying it with stupidity that the brute
 force of the latter forces triumph for the former.
 
 
 123
 
 =The Breaking off of Churches.=--There is not sufficient religion in the
 world merely to put an end to the number of religions.
 
 
 124
 
 =Sinlessness of Men.=--If one have understood how "Sin came into the
 world," namely through errors of the reason, through which men in their
 intercourse with one another and even individual men looked upon
 themselves as much blacker and wickeder than was really the case, one's
 whole feeling is much lightened and man and the world appear together in
 such a halo of harmlessness that a sentiment of well being is instilled
 into one's whole nature. Man in the midst of nature is as a child left
 to its own devices. This child indeed dreams a heavy, anxious dream. But
 when it opens its eyes it finds itself always in paradise.
 
 
 125
 
 =Irreligiousness of Artists.=--Homer is so much at home among his gods
 and is as a poet so good natured to them that he must have been
 profoundly irreligious. That which was brought to him by the popular
 faith--a mean, crude and partially repulsive superstition--he dealt with
 as freely as the Sculptor with his clay, therefore with the same freedom
 that AEschylus and Aristophanes evinced and with which in later times the
 great artists of the renaissance, and also Shakespeare and Goethe, drew
 their pictures.
 
 
 126
 
 =Art and Strength of False Interpretation.=--All the visions, fears,
 exhaustions and delights of the saint are well known symptoms of
 sickness, which in him, owing to deep rooted religious and psychological
 delusions, are explained quite differently, that is not as symptoms of
 sickness.--So, too, perhaps, the demon of Socrates was nothing but a
 malady of the ear that he explained, in view of his predominant moral
 theory, in a manner different from what would be thought rational
 to-day. Nor is the case different with the frenzy and the frenzied
 speeches of the prophets and of the priests of the oracles. It is always
 the degree of wisdom, imagination, capacity and morality in the heart
 and mind of the interpreters that got so much out of them. It is among
 the greatest feats of the men who are called geniuses and saints that
 they made interpreters for themselves who, fortunately for mankind, did
 not understand them.
 
 
 127
 
 =Reverence for Madness.=--Because it was perceived that an excitement of
 some kind often made the head clearer and occasioned fortunate
 inspirations, it was concluded that the utmost excitement would occasion
 the most fortunate inspirations. Hence the frenzied being was revered as
 a sage and an oracle giver. A false conclusion lies at the bottom of all
 this.
 
 
 128
 
 =Promises of Wisdom.=--Modern science has as its object as little pain
 as possible, as long a life as possible--hence a sort of eternal
 blessedness, but of a very limited kind in comparison with the promises
 of religion.
 
 
 129
 
 =Forbidden Generosity.=--There is not enough of love and goodness in the
 world to throw any of it away on conceited people.
 
 
 130
 
 =Survival of Religious Training in the Disposition.=--The Catholic
 Church, and before it all ancient education, controlled the whole domain
 of means through which man was put into certain unordinary moods and
 withdrawn from the cold calculation of personal advantage and from calm,
 rational reflection. A church vibrating with deep tones; gloomy,
 regular, restraining exhortations from a priestly band, who
 involuntarily communicate their own tension to their congregation and
 lead them to listen almost with anxiety as if some miracle were in
 course of preparation; the awesome pile of architecture which, as the
 house of a god, rears itself vastly into the vague and in all its
 shadowy nooks inspires fear of its nerve-exciting power--who would care
 to reduce men to the level of these things if the ideas upon which they
 rest became extinct? But the results of all these things are
 nevertheless not thrown away: the inner world of exalted, emotional,
 prophetic, profoundly repentant, hope-blessed moods has become inborn in
 man largely through cultivation. What still exists in his soul was
 formerly, as he germinated, grew and bloomed, thoroughly disciplined.
 
 
 131
 
 =Religious After-Pains.=--Though one believe oneself absolutely weaned
 away from religion, the process has yet not been so thorough as to make
 impossible a feeling of joy at the presence of religious feelings and
 dispositions without intelligible content, as, for example, in music;
 and if a philosophy alleges to us the validity of metaphysical hopes,
 through the peace of soul therein attainable, and also speaks of "the
 whole true gospel in the look of Raphael's Madonna," we greet such
 declarations and innuendoes with a welcome smile. The philosopher has
 here a matter easy of demonstration. He responds with that which he is
 glad to give, namely a heart that is glad to accept. Hence it is
 observable how the less reflective free spirits collide only with dogmas
 but yield readily to the magic of religious feelings; it is a source of
 pain to them to let the latter go simply on account of the
 former.--Scientific philosophy must be very much on its guard lest on
 account of this necessity--an evolved and hence, also, a transitory
 necessity--delusions are smuggled in. Even logicians speak of
 "presentiments" of truth in ethics and in art (for example of the
 presentiment that the essence of things is unity) a thing which,
 nevertheless, ought to be prohibited. Between carefully deduced truths
 and such "foreboded" things there lies the abysmal distinction that the
 former are products of the intellect and the latter of the necessity.
 Hunger is no evidence that there is food at hand to appease it. Hunger
 merely craves food. "Presentiment" does not denote that the existence of
 a thing is known in any way whatever. It denotes merely that it is
 deemed possible to the extent that it is desired or feared. The
 "presentiment" is not one step forward in the domain of certainty.--It
 is involuntarily believed that the religious tinted sections of a
 philosophy are better attested than the others, but the case is at
 bottom just the opposite: there is simply the inner wish that it may be
 so, that the thing which beautifies may also be true. This wish leads us
 to accept bad grounds as good.
 
 
 132
 
 =Of the Christian Need of Salvation.=--Careful consideration must render
 it possible to propound some explanation of that process in the soul of
 a Christian which is termed need of salvation, and to propound an
 explanation, too, free from mythology: hence one purely psychological.
 Heretofore psychological explanations of religious conditions and
 processes have really been in disrepute, inasmuch as a theology calling
 itself free gave vent to its unprofitable nature in this domain; for its
 principal aim, so far as may be judged from the spirit of its creator,
 Schleier-macher, was the preservation of the Christian religion and the
 maintenance of the Christian theology. It appeared that in the
 psychological analysis of religious "facts" a new anchorage and above
 all a new calling were to be gained. Undisturbed by such predecessors,
 we venture the following exposition of the phenomena alluded to. Man is
 conscious of certain acts which are very firmly implanted in the general
 course of conduct: indeed he discovers in himself a predisposition to
 such acts that seems to him to be as unalterable as his very being. How
 gladly he would essay some other kind of acts which in the general
 estimate of conduct are rated the best and highest, how gladly he would
 welcome the consciousness of well doing which ought to follow unselfish
 motive! Unfortunately, however, it goes no further than this longing:
 the discontent consequent upon being unable to satisfy it is added to
 all other kinds of discontent which result from his life destiny in
 particular or which may be due to so called bad acts; so that a deep
 depression ensues accompanied by a desire for some physician to remove
 it and all its causes.--This condition would not be found so bitter if
 the individual but compared himself freely with other men: for then he
 would have no reason to be discontented with himself in particular as he
 is merely bearing his share of the general burden of human discontent
 and incompleteness. But he compares himself with a being who alone must
 be capable of the conduct that is called unegoistic and of an enduring
 consciousness of unselfish motive, with God. It is because he gazes into
 this clear mirror, that his own self seems so extraordinarily distracted
 and so troubled. Thereupon the thought of that being, in so far as it
 flits before his fancy as retributive justice, occasions him anxiety. In
 every conceivable small and great experience he believes he sees the
 anger of the being, his threats, the very implements and manacles of his
 judge and prison. What succors him in this danger, which, in the
 prospect of an eternal duration of punishment, transcends in hideousness
 all the horrors that can be presented to the imagination?
 
 
 133
 
 Before we consider this condition in its further effects, we would admit
 to ourselves that man is betrayed into this condition not through his
 "fault" and "sin" but through a series of delusions of the reason; that
 it was the fault of the mirror if his own self appeared to him in the
 highest degree dark and hateful, and that that mirror was his own work,
 the very imperfect work of human imagination and judgment. In the first
 place a being capable of absolutely unegoistic conduct is as fabulous as
 the phoenix. Such a being is not even thinkable for the very reason that
 the whole notion of "unegoistic conduct," when closely examined,
 vanishes into air. Never yet has a man done anything solely for others
 and entirely without reference to a personal motive; indeed how could he
 possibly do anything that had no reference to himself, that is without
 inward compulsion (which must always have its basis in a personal need)?
 How could the ego act without ego?--A god, who, on the other hand, is
 all love, as he is usually represented, would not be capable of a
 solitary unegoistic act: whence one is reminded of a reflection of
 Lichtenberg's which is, in truth, taken from a lower sphere: "We cannot
 possibly feel for others, as the expression goes; we feel only for
 ourselves. The assertion sounds hard, but it is not, if rightly
 understood. A man loves neither his father nor his mother nor his wife
 nor his child, but simply the feelings which they inspire." Or, as La
 Rochefoucauld says: "If you think you love your mistress for the mere
 love of her, you are very much mistaken." Why acts of love are more
 highly prized than others, namely not on account of their nature, but on
 account of their utility, has already been explained in the section on
 the origin of moral feelings. But if a man should wish to be all love
 like the god aforesaid, and want to do all things for others and nothing
 for himself, the procedure would be fundamentally impossible because he
 _must_ do a great deal for himself before there would be any possibility
 of doing anything for the love of others. It is also essential that
 others be sufficiently egoistic to accept always and at all times this
 self sacrifice and living for others, so that the men of love and self
 sacrifice have an interest in the survival of unloving and selfish
 egoists, while the highest morality, in order to maintain itself must
 formally enforce the existence of immorality (wherein it would be really
 destroying itself.)--Further: the idea of a god perturbs and discourages
 as long as it is accepted but as to how it originated can no longer, in
 the present state of comparative ethnological science, be a matter of
 doubt, and with the insight into the origin of this belief all faith
 collapses. What happens to the Christian who compares his nature with
 that of God is exactly what happened to Don Quixote, who depreciated his
 own prowess because his head was filled with the wondrous deeds of the
 heroes of chivalrous romance. The standard of measurement which both
 employ belongs to the domain of fable.--But if the idea of God
 collapses, so too, does the feeling of "sin" as a violation of divine
 rescript, as a stain upon a god-like creation. There still apparently
 remains that discouragement which is closely allied with fear of the
 punishment of worldly justice or of the contempt of one's fellow men.
 The keenest thorn in the sentiment of sin is dulled when it is perceived
 that one's acts have contravened human tradition, human rules and human
 laws without having thereby endangered the "eternal salvation of the
 soul" and its relations with deity. If finally men attain to the
 conviction of the absolute necessity of all acts and of their utter
 irresponsibility and then absorb it into their flesh and blood, every
 relic of conscience pangs will disappear.
 
 
 134
 
 If now, as stated, the Christian, through certain delusive feelings, is
 betrayed into self contempt, that is by a false and unscientific view of
 his acts and feelings, he must, nevertheless, perceive with the utmost
 amazement that this state of self contempt, of conscience pangs, of
 despair in particular, does not last, that there are hours during which
 all these things are wafted away from the soul and he feels himself once
 more free and courageous. The truth is that joy in his own being, the
 fulness of his own powers in connection with the inevitable decline of
 his profound excitation with the lapse of time, bore off the palm of
 victory. The man loves himself once more, he feels it--but this very new
 love, this new self esteem seems to him incredible. He can see in it
 only the wholly unmerited stream of the light of grace shed down upon
 him. If he formerly saw in every event merely warnings, threats,
 punishments and every kind of indication of divine anger, he now reads
 into his experiences the grace of god. The latter circumstance seems to
 him full of love, the former as a helpful pointing of the way, and his
 entirely joyful frame of mind now seems to him to be an absolute proof
 of the goodness of God. As formerly in his states of discouragement he
 interpreted his conduct falsely so now he does the same with his
 experiences. His state of consolation is now regarded as the effect
 produced by some external power. The love with which, at bottom, he
 loves himself, seems to be the divine love. That which he calls grace
 and the preliminary of salvation is in reality self-grace,
 self-salvation.
 
 
 135
 
 Therefore a certain false psychology, a certain kind of imaginativeness
 in the interpretation of motives and experiences is the essential
 preliminary to being a Christian and to experiencing the need of
 salvation. Upon gaining an insight into this wandering of the reason and
 the imagination, one ceases to be a Christian.
 
 
 136
 
 =Of Christian Asceticism and Sanctity.=--Much as some thinkers have
 exerted themselves to impart an air of the miraculous to those singular
 phenomena known as asceticism and sanctity, to question which or to
 account for which upon a rational basis would be wickedness and
 sacrilege, the temptation to this wickedness is none the less great. A
 powerful impulse of nature has in every age led to protest against such
 phenomena. At any rate science, inasmuch as it is the imitation of
 nature, permits the casting of doubts upon the inexplicable character
 and the supernal degree of such phenomena. It is true that heretofore
 science has not succeeded in its attempts at explanation. The phenomena
 remain unexplained still, to the great satisfaction of those who revere
 moral miracles. For, speaking generally, the unexplained must rank as
 the inexplicable, the inexplicable as the non-natural, supernatural,
 miraculous--so runs the demand in the souls of all the religious and all
 the metaphysicians (even the artists if they happen to be thinkers),
 whereas the scientific man sees in this demand the "evil
 principle."--The universal, first, apparent truth that is encountered in
 the contemplation of sanctity and asceticism is that their nature is
 complicated; for nearly always, within the physical world as well as in
 the moral, the apparently miraculous may be traced successfully to the
 complex, the obscure, the multi-conditioned. Let us venture then to
 isolate a few impulses in the soul of the saint and the ascetic, to
 consider them separately and then view them as a synthetic development.
 
 
 137
 
 There is an obstinacy against oneself, certain sublimated forms of which
 are included in asceticism. Certain kinds of men are under such a strong
 necessity of exercising their power and dominating impulses that, if
 other objects are lacking or if they have not succeeded with other
 objects they will actually tyrannize over some portions of their own
 nature or over sections and stages of their own personality. Thus do
 many thinkers bring themselves to views which are far from likely to
 increase or improve their fame. Many deliberately bring down the
 contempt of others upon themselves although they could easily have
 retained consideration by silence. Others contradict earlier opinions
 and do not shrink from the ordeal of being deemed inconsistent. On the
 contrary they strive for this and act like eager riders who enjoy
 horseback exercise most when the horse is skittish. Thus will men in
 dangerous paths ascend to the highest steeps in order to laugh to scorn
 their own fear and their own trembling limbs. Thus will the philosopher
 embrace the dogmas of asceticism, humility, sanctity, in the light of
 which his own image appears in its most hideous aspect. This crushing of
 self, this mockery of one's own nature, this spernere se sperni out of
 which religions have made so much is in reality but a very high
 development of vanity. The whole ethic of the sermon on the mount
 belongs in this category: man has a true delight in mastering himself
 through exaggerated pretensions or excessive expedients and later
 deifying this tyrannically exacting something within him. In every
 scheme of ascetic ethics, man prays to one part of himself as if it were
 god and hence it is necessary for him to treat the rest of himself as
 devil.
 
 
 138
 
 =Man is Not at All Hours Equally Moral=; this is established. If one's
 morality be judged according to one's capacity for great, self
 sacrificing resolutions and abnegations (which when continual, and made
 a habit are known as sanctity) one is, in affection, or disposition, the
 most moral: while higher excitement supplies wholly new impulses which,
 were one calm and cool as ordinarily, one would not deem oneself even
 capable of. How comes this? Apparently from the propinquity of all great
 and lofty emotional states. If a man is brought to an extraordinary
 pitch of feeling he can resolve upon a fearful revenge or upon a fearful
 renunciation of his thirst for vengeance indifferently. He craves, under
 the influences of powerful emotion, the great, the powerful, the
 immense, and if he chances to perceive that the sacrifice of himself
 will afford him as much satisfaction as the sacrifice of another, or
 will afford him more, he will choose self sacrifice. What concerns him
 particularly is simply the unloading of his emotion. Hence he readily,
 to relieve his tension, grasps the darts of the enemy and buries them in
 his own breast. That in self abnegation and not in revenge the element
 of greatness consisted must have been brought home to mankind only after
 long habituation. A god who sacrifices himself would be the most
 powerful and most effective symbol of this sort of greatness. As the
 conquest of the most hardly conquered enemy, the sudden mastering of a
 passion--thus does such abnegation _appear_: hence it passes for the
 summit of morality. In reality all that is involved is the exchange of
 one idea for another whilst the temperament remained at a like altitude,
 a like tidal state. Men when coming out of the spell, or resting from
 such passionate excitation, no longer understand the morality of such
 instants, but the admiration of all who participated in the occasion
 sustains them. Pride is their support if the passion and the
 comprehension of their act weaken. Therefore, at bottom even such acts
 of self-abnegation are not moral inasmuch as they are not done with a
 strict regard for others. Rather do others afford the high strung
 temperament an opportunity to lighten itself through such abnegation.
 
 
 139
 
 =Even the Ascetic Seeks to Make Life Easier=, and generally by means of
 absolute subjection to another will or to an all inclusive rule and
 ritual, pretty much as the Brahmin leaves absolutely nothing to his own
 volition but is guided in every moment of his life by some holy
 injunction or other. This subjection is a potent means of acquiring
 dominion over oneself. One is occupied, hence time does not bang heavy
 and there is no incitement of the personal will and of the individual
 passion. The deed once done there is no feeling of responsibility nor
 the sting of regret. One has given up one's own will once for all and
 this is easier than to give it up occasionally, as it is also easier
 wholly to renounce a desire than to yield to it in measured degree. When
 we consider the present relation of man to the state we perceive
 unconditional obedience is easier than conditional. The holy person also
 makes his lot easier through the complete surrender of his life
 personality and it is all delusion to admire such a phenomenon as the
 loftiest heroism of morality. It is always more difficult to assert
 one's personality without shrinking and without hesitation than to give
 it up altogether in the manner indicated, and it requires moreover more
 intellect and thought.
 
 
 140
 
 After having discovered in many of the less comprehensible actions mere
 manifestations of pleasure in emotion for its own sake, I fancy I can
 detect in the self contempt which characterises holy persons, and also
 in their acts of self torture (through hunger and scourgings,
 distortions and chaining of the limbs, acts of madness) simply a means
 whereby such natures may resist the general exhaustion of their will to
 live (their nerves). They employ the most painful expedients to escape
 if only for a time from the heaviness and weariness in which they are
 steeped by their great mental indolence and their subjection to a will
 other than their own.
 
 
 141
 
 =The Most Usual Means= by which the ascetic and the sanctified
 individual seeks to make life more endurable comprises certain combats
 of an inner nature involving alternations of victory and prostration.
 For this purpose an enemy is necessary and he is found in the so called
 "inner enemy." That is, the holy individual makes use of his tendency to
 vanity, domineering and pride, and of his mental longings in order to
 contemplate his life as a sort of continuous battle and himself as a
 battlefield, in which good and evil spirits wage war with varying
 fortune. It is an established fact that the imagination is restrained
 through the regularity and adequacy of sexual intercourse while on the
 other hand abstention from or great irregularity in sexual intercourse
 will cause the imagination to run riot. The imaginations of many of the
 Christian saints were obscene to a degree; and because of the theory
 that sexual desires were in reality demons that raged within them, the
 saints did not feel wholly responsible for them. It is to this
 conviction that we are indebted for the highly instructive sincerity of
 their evidence against themselves. It was to their interest that this
 contest should always be kept up in some fashion because by means of
 this contest, as already stated, their empty lives gained distraction.
 In order that the contest might seem sufficiently great to inspire
 sympathy and admiration in the unsanctified, it was essential that
 sexual capacity be ever more and more damned and denounced. Indeed the
 danger of eternal damnation was so closely allied to this capacity that
 for whole generations Christians showed their children with actual
 conscience pangs. What evil may not have been done to humanity through
 this! And yet here the truth is just upside down: an exceedingly
 unseemly attitude for the truth. Christianity, it is true, had said that
 every man is conceived and born in sin, and in the intolerable and
 excessive Christianity of Calderon this thought is again perverted and
 entangled into the most distorted paradox extant in the well known lines
 
      The greatest sin of man
      Is the sin of being born.
 
 In all pessimistic religions the act of procreation is looked upon as
 evil in itself. This is far from being the general human opinion. It is
 not even the opinion of all pessimists. Empedocles, for example, knows
 nothing of anything shameful, devilish and sinful in it. He sees rather
 in the great field of bliss of unholiness simply a healthful and hopeful
 phenomenon, Aphrodite. She is to him an evidence that strife does not
 always rage but that some time a gentle demon is to wield the sceptre.
 The Christian pessimists of practice, had, as stated, a direct interest
 in the prevalence of an opposite belief. They needed in the loneliness
 and the spiritual wilderness of their lives an ever living enemy, and a
 universally known enemy through whose conquest they might appear to the
 unsanctified as utterly incomprehensible and half unnatural beings. When
 this enemy at last, as a result of their mode of life and their
 shattered health, took flight forever, they were able immediately to
 people their inner selves with new demons. The rise and fall of the
 balance of cheerfulness and despair maintained their addled brains in a
 totally new fluctuation of longing and peace of soul. And in that period
 psychology served not only to cast suspicion on everything human but to
 wound and scourge it, to crucify it. Man wanted to find himself as base
 and evil as possible. Man sought to become anxious about the state of
 his soul, he wished to be doubtful of his own capacity. Everything
 natural with which man connects the idea of badness and sinfulness (as,
 for instance, is still customary in regard to the erotic) injures and
 degrades the imagination, occasions a shamed aspect, leads man to war
 upon himself and makes him uncertain, distrustful of himself. Even his
 dreams acquire a tincture of the unclean conscience. And yet this
 suffering because of the natural element in certain things is wholly
 superfluous. It is simply the result of opinions regarding the things.
 It is easy to understand why men become worse than they are if they are
 brought to look upon the unavoidably natural as bad and later to feel it
 as of evil origin. It is the master stroke of religions and metaphysics
 that wish to make man out bad and sinful by nature, to render nature
 suspicious in his eyes and to so make himself evil, for he learns to
 feel himself evil when he cannot divest himself of nature. He gradually
 comes to look upon himself, after a long life lived naturally, so
 oppressed by a weight of sin that supernatural powers become necessary
 to relieve him of the burden; and with this notion comes the so called
 need of salvation, which is the result not of a real but of an imaginary
 sinfulness. Go through the separate moral expositions in the vouchers of
 christianity and it will always be found that the demands are excessive
 in order that it may be impossible for man to satisfy them. The object
 is not that he may become moral but that he may feel as sinful as
 possible. If this feeling had not been rendered agreeable to man--why
 should he have improvised such an ideal and clung to it so long? As in
 the ancient world an incalculable strength of intellect and capacity for
 feeling was squandered in order to increase the joy of living through
 feastful systems of worship, so in the era of christianity an equally
 incalculable quantity of intellectual capacity has been sacrificed in
 another endeavor: that man should in every way feel himself sinful and
 thereby be moved, inspired, inspirited. To move, to inspire, to inspirit
 at any cost--is not this the freedom cry of an exhausted, over-ripe,
 over cultivated age? The circle of all the natural sensations had been
 gone through a hundred times: the soul had grown weary. Then the saints
 and the ascetics found a new order of ecstacies. They set themselves
 before the eyes of all not alone as models for imitation to many, but as
 fearful and yet delightful spectacles on the boundary line between this
 world and the next world, where in that period everyone thought he saw
 at one time rays of heavenly light, at another fearful, threatening
 tongues of flame. The eye of the saint, directed upon the fearful
 significance of the shortness of earthly life, upon the imminence of the
 last judgment, upon eternal life hereafter; this glowering eye in an
 emaciated body caused men, in the old time world, to tremble to the
 depths of their being. To look, to look away and shudder, to feel anew
 the fascination of the spectacle, to yield to it, sate oneself upon it
 until the soul trembled with ardor and fever--that was the last pleasure
 left to classical antiquity when its sensibilities had been blunted by
 the arena and the gladiatorial show.
 
 
 142
 
 =To Sum Up All That Has Been Said=: that condition of soul at which the
 saint or expectant saint is rejoiced is a combination of elements which
 we are all familiar with, except that under other influences than those
 of mere religious ideation they customarily arouse the censure of men in
 the same way that when combined with religion itself and regarded as the
 supreme attainment of sanctity, they are object of admiration and even
 of prayer--at least in more simple times. Very soon the saint turns upon
 himself that severity that is so closely allied to the instinct of
 domination at any price and which inspire even in the most solitary
 individual the sense of power. Soon his swollen sensitiveness of feeling
 breaks forth from the longing to restrain his passions within it and is
 transformed into a longing to master them as if they were wild steeds,
 the master impulse being ever that of a proud spirit; next he craves a
 complete cessation of all perturbing, fascinating feelings, a waking
 sleep, an enduring repose in the lap of a dull, animal, plant-like
 indolence. Next he seeks the battle and extinguishes it within himself
 because weariness and boredom confront him. He binds his
 self-deification with self-contempt. He delights in the wild tumult of
 his desires and the sharp pain of sin, in the very idea of being lost.
 He is able to play his very passions, for instance the desire to
 domineer, a trick so that he goes to the other extreme of abject
 humiliation and subjection, so that his overwrought soul is without any
 restraint through this antithesis. And, finally, when indulgence in
 visions, in talks with the dead or with divine beings overcomes him,
 this is really but a form of gratification that he craves, perhaps a
 form of gratification in which all other gratifications are blended.
 Novalis, one of the authorities in matters of sanctity, because of his
 experience and instinct, betrays the whole secret with the utmost
 simplicity when he says: "It is remarkable that the close connection of
 gratification, religion and cruelty has not long ago made men aware of
 their inner relationship and common tendency."
 
 
 143
 
 =Not What the Saint is but what he was in= the eyes of the
 non-sanctified gives him his historical importance. Because there
 existed a delusion respecting the saint, his soul states being falsely
 viewed and his personality being sundered as much as possible from
 humanity as a something incomparable and supernatural, because of these
 things he attained the extraordinary with which he swayed the
 imaginations of whole nations and whole ages. Even he knew himself not
 for even he regarded his dispositions, passions and actions in
 accordance with a system of interpretation as artificial and exaggerated
 as the pneumatic interpretation of the bible. The distorted and diseased
 in his own nature with its blending of spiritual poverty, defective
 knowledge, ruined health, overwrought nerves, remained as hidden from
 his view as from the view of his beholders. He was neither a
 particularly good man nor a particularly bad man but he stood for
 something that was far above the human standard in wisdom and goodness.
 Faith in him sustained faith in the divine and miraculous, in a
 religious significance of all existence, in an impending day of
 judgment. In the last rays of the setting sun of the ancient world,
 which fell upon the christian peoples, the shadowy form of the saint
 attained enormous proportions--to such enormous proportions, indeed,
 that down even to our own age, which no longer believes in god, there
 are thinkers who believe in the saints.
 
 
 144
 
 It stands to reason that this sketch of the saint, made upon the model
 of the whole species, can be confronted with many opposing sketches that
 would create a more agreeable impression. There are certain exceptions
 among the species who distinguish themselves either by especial
 gentleness or especial humanity, and perhaps by the strength of their
 own personality. Others are in the highest degree fascinating because
 certain of their delusions shed a particular glow over their whole
 being, as is the case with the founder of christianity who took himself
 for the only begotten son of God and hence felt himself sinless; so that
 through his imagination--that should not be too harshly judged since the
 whole of antiquity swarmed with sons of god--he attained the same goal,
 the sense of complete sinlessness, complete irresponsibility, that can
 now be attained by every individual through science.--In the same manner
 I have viewed the saints of India who occupy an intermediate station
 between the christian saints and the Greek philosophers and hence are
 not to be regarded as a pure type. Knowledge and science--as far as they
 existed--and superiority to the rest of mankind by logical discipline
 and training of the intellectual powers were insisted upon by the
 Buddhists as essential to sanctity, just as they were denounced by the
 christian world as the indications of sinfulness.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by John Mamoun, Charles Franks and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
 BEYOND GOOD AND EVIL
 
 By Friedrich Nietzsche
 
 
 Translated by Helen Zimmern
 
 
 
 TRANSCRIBER'S NOTE ABOUT THIS E-TEXT EDITION:
 
 The following is a reprint of the Helen Zimmern translation from German
 into English of "Beyond Good and Evil," as published in The Complete
 Works of Friedrich Nietzsche (1909-1913). Some adaptations from the
 original text were made to format it into an e-text. Italics in the
 original book are capitalized in this e-text, except for most foreign
 language phrases that were italicized. Original footnotes are put in
 brackets "[]" at the points where they are cited in the text. Some
 spellings were altered. "To-day" and "To-morrow" are spelled "today"
 and "tomorrow." Some words containing the letters "ise" in the original
 text, such as "idealise," had these letters changed to "ize," such as
 "idealize." "Sceptic" was changed to "skeptic."
 
 
 TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
     PREFACE
     BEYOND GOOD AND EVIL
 
     CHAPTER I:    PREJUDICES OF PHILOSOPHERS
     CHAPTER II:   THE FREE SPIRIT
     CHAPTER III:  THE RELIGIOUS MOOD
     CHAPTER IV:   APOPHTHEGMS AND INTERLUDES
     CHAPTER V:    THE NATURAL HISTORY OF MORALS
     CHAPTER VI:   WE SCHOLARS
     CHAPTER VII:  OUR VIRTUES
     CHAPTER VIII: PEOPLES AND COUNTRIES
     CHAPTER IX:   WHAT IS NOBLE?
 
     FROM THE HEIGHTS (POEM TRANSLATED BY L.A. MAGNUS)
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 SUPPOSING that Truth is a woman--what then? Is there not ground
 for suspecting that all philosophers, in so far as they have been
 dogmatists, have failed to understand women--that the terrible
 seriousness and clumsy importunity with which they have usually paid
 their addresses to Truth, have been unskilled and unseemly methods for
 winning a woman? Certainly she has never allowed herself to be won; and
 at present every kind of dogma stands with sad and discouraged mien--IF,
 indeed, it stands at all! For there are scoffers who maintain that it
 has fallen, that all dogma lies on the ground--nay more, that it is at
 its last gasp. But to speak seriously, there are good grounds for hoping
 that all dogmatizing in philosophy, whatever solemn, whatever conclusive
 and decided airs it has assumed, may have been only a noble puerilism
 and tyronism; and probably the time is at hand when it will be once
 and again understood WHAT has actually sufficed for the basis of such
 imposing and absolute philosophical edifices as the dogmatists have
 hitherto reared: perhaps some popular superstition of immemorial time
 (such as the soul-superstition, which, in the form of subject- and
 ego-superstition, has not yet ceased doing mischief): perhaps some
 play upon words, a deception on the part of grammar, or an
 audacious generalization of very restricted, very personal, very
 human--all-too-human facts. The philosophy of the dogmatists, it is to
 be hoped, was only a promise for thousands of years afterwards, as was
 astrology in still earlier times, in the service of which probably more
 labour, gold, acuteness, and patience have been spent than on any
 actual science hitherto: we owe to it, and to its "super-terrestrial"
 pretensions in Asia and Egypt, the grand style of architecture. It seems
 that in order to inscribe themselves upon the heart of humanity with
 everlasting claims, all great things have first to wander about the
 earth as enormous and awe-inspiring caricatures: dogmatic philosophy has
 been a caricature of this kind--for instance, the Vedanta doctrine in
 Asia, and Platonism in Europe. Let us not be ungrateful to it, although
 it must certainly be confessed that the worst, the most tiresome,
 and the most dangerous of errors hitherto has been a dogmatist
 error--namely, Plato's invention of Pure Spirit and the Good in Itself.
 But now when it has been surmounted, when Europe, rid of this nightmare,
 can again draw breath freely and at least enjoy a healthier--sleep,
 we, WHOSE DUTY IS WAKEFULNESS ITSELF, are the heirs of all the strength
 which the struggle against this error has fostered. It amounted to
 the very inversion of truth, and the denial of the PERSPECTIVE--the
 fundamental condition--of life, to speak of Spirit and the Good as Plato
 spoke of them; indeed one might ask, as a physician: "How did such a
 malady attack that finest product of antiquity, Plato? Had the wicked
 Socrates really corrupted him? Was Socrates after all a corrupter of
 youths, and deserved his hemlock?" But the struggle against Plato,
 or--to speak plainer, and for the "people"--the struggle against
 the ecclesiastical oppression of millenniums of Christianity (FOR
 CHRISTIANITY IS PLATONISM FOR THE "PEOPLE"), produced in Europe
 a magnificent tension of soul, such as had not existed anywhere
 previously; with such a tensely strained bow one can now aim at the
 furthest goals. As a matter of fact, the European feels this tension as
 a state of distress, and twice attempts have been made in grand style to
 unbend the bow: once by means of Jesuitism, and the second time by means
 of democratic enlightenment--which, with the aid of liberty of the press
 and newspaper-reading, might, in fact, bring it about that the spirit
 would not so easily find itself in "distress"! (The Germans invented
 gunpowder--all credit to them! but they again made things square--they
 invented printing.) But we, who are neither Jesuits, nor democrats,
 nor even sufficiently Germans, we GOOD EUROPEANS, and free, VERY free
 spirits--we have it still, all the distress of spirit and all the
 tension of its bow! And perhaps also the arrow, the duty, and, who
 knows? THE GOAL TO AIM AT....
 
 Sils Maria Upper Engadine, JUNE, 1885.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I. PREJUDICES OF PHILOSOPHERS
 
 
 1. The Will to Truth, which is to tempt us to many a hazardous
 enterprise, the famous Truthfulness of which all philosophers have
 hitherto spoken with respect, what questions has this Will to Truth not
 laid before us! What strange, perplexing, questionable questions! It is
 already a long story; yet it seems as if it were hardly commenced. Is
 it any wonder if we at last grow distrustful, lose patience, and turn
 impatiently away? That this Sphinx teaches us at last to ask questions
 ourselves? WHO is it really that puts questions to us here? WHAT really
 is this "Will to Truth" in us? In fact we made a long halt at the
 question as to the origin of this Will--until at last we came to an
 absolute standstill before a yet more fundamental question. We inquired
 about the VALUE of this Will. Granted that we want the truth: WHY NOT
 RATHER untruth? And uncertainty? Even ignorance? The problem of the
 value of truth presented itself before us--or was it we who presented
 ourselves before the problem? Which of us is the Oedipus here? Which
 the Sphinx? It would seem to be a rendezvous of questions and notes of
 interrogation. And could it be believed that it at last seems to us as
 if the problem had never been propounded before, as if we were the first
 to discern it, get a sight of it, and RISK RAISING it? For there is risk
 in raising it, perhaps there is no greater risk.
 
 2. "HOW COULD anything originate out of its opposite? For example, truth
 out of error? or the Will to Truth out of the will to deception? or the
 generous deed out of selfishness? or the pure sun-bright vision of the
 wise man out of covetousness? Such genesis is impossible; whoever dreams
 of it is a fool, nay, worse than a fool; things of the highest
 value must have a different origin, an origin of THEIR own--in this
 transitory, seductive, illusory, paltry world, in this turmoil of
 delusion and cupidity, they cannot have their source. But rather in
 the lap of Being, in the intransitory, in the concealed God, in the
 'Thing-in-itself--THERE must be their source, and nowhere else!"--This
 mode of reasoning discloses the typical prejudice by which
 metaphysicians of all times can be recognized, this mode of valuation
 is at the back of all their logical procedure; through this "belief" of
 theirs, they exert themselves for their "knowledge," for something that
 is in the end solemnly christened "the Truth." The fundamental belief of
 metaphysicians is THE BELIEF IN ANTITHESES OF VALUES. It never occurred
 even to the wariest of them to doubt here on the very threshold (where
 doubt, however, was most necessary); though they had made a solemn
 vow, "DE OMNIBUS DUBITANDUM." For it may be doubted, firstly, whether
 antitheses exist at all; and secondly, whether the popular valuations
 and antitheses of value upon which metaphysicians have set their
 seal, are not perhaps merely superficial estimates, merely provisional
 perspectives, besides being probably made from some corner, perhaps from
 below--"frog perspectives," as it were, to borrow an expression current
 among painters. In spite of all the value which may belong to the true,
 the positive, and the unselfish, it might be possible that a higher
 and more fundamental value for life generally should be assigned to
 pretence, to the will to delusion, to selfishness, and cupidity. It
 might even be possible that WHAT constitutes the value of those good and
 respected things, consists precisely in their being insidiously
 related, knotted, and crocheted to these evil and apparently opposed
 things--perhaps even in being essentially identical with them. Perhaps!
 But who wishes to concern himself with such dangerous "Perhapses"!
 For that investigation one must await the advent of a new order of
 philosophers, such as will have other tastes and inclinations, the
 reverse of those hitherto prevalent--philosophers of the dangerous
 "Perhaps" in every sense of the term. And to speak in all seriousness, I
 see such new philosophers beginning to appear.
 
 3. Having kept a sharp eye on philosophers, and having read between
 their lines long enough, I now say to myself that the greater part of
 conscious thinking must be counted among the instinctive functions, and
 it is so even in the case of philosophical thinking; one has here to
 learn anew, as one learned anew about heredity and "innateness." As
 little as the act of birth comes into consideration in the whole process
 and procedure of heredity, just as little is "being-conscious" OPPOSED
 to the instinctive in any decisive sense; the greater part of the
 conscious thinking of a philosopher is secretly influenced by his
 instincts, and forced into definite channels. And behind all logic and
 its seeming sovereignty of movement, there are valuations, or to speak
 more plainly, physiological demands, for the maintenance of a definite
 mode of life For example, that the certain is worth more than the
 uncertain, that illusion is less valuable than "truth" such valuations,
 in spite of their regulative importance for US, might notwithstanding be
 only superficial valuations, special kinds of _niaiserie_, such as may
 be necessary for the maintenance of beings such as ourselves. Supposing,
 in effect, that man is not just the "measure of things."
 
 4. The falseness of an opinion is not for us any objection to it: it is
 here, perhaps, that our new language sounds most strangely. The
 question is, how far an opinion is life-furthering, life-preserving,
 species-preserving, perhaps species-rearing, and we are fundamentally
 inclined to maintain that the falsest opinions (to which the synthetic
 judgments a priori belong), are the most indispensable to us, that
 without a recognition of logical fictions, without a comparison of
 reality with the purely IMAGINED world of the absolute and immutable,
 without a constant counterfeiting of the world by means of numbers,
 man could not live--that the renunciation of false opinions would be
 a renunciation of life, a negation of life. TO RECOGNISE UNTRUTH AS A
 CONDITION OF LIFE; that is certainly to impugn the traditional ideas of
 value in a dangerous manner, and a philosophy which ventures to do so,
 has thereby alone placed itself beyond good and evil.
 
 5. That which causes philosophers to be regarded half-distrustfully
 and half-mockingly, is not the oft-repeated discovery how innocent they
 are--how often and easily they make mistakes and lose their way, in
 short, how childish and childlike they are,--but that there is not
 enough honest dealing with them, whereas they all raise a loud and
 virtuous outcry when the problem of truthfulness is even hinted at in
 the remotest manner. They all pose as though their real opinions had
 been discovered and attained through the self-evolving of a cold, pure,
 divinely indifferent dialectic (in contrast to all sorts of mystics,
 who, fairer and foolisher, talk of "inspiration"), whereas, in fact, a
 prejudiced proposition, idea, or "suggestion," which is generally
 their heart's desire abstracted and refined, is defended by them with
 arguments sought out after the event. They are all advocates who do not
 wish to be regarded as such, generally astute defenders, also, of their
 prejudices, which they dub "truths,"--and VERY far from having the
 conscience which bravely admits this to itself, very far from having
 the good taste of the courage which goes so far as to let this be
 understood, perhaps to warn friend or foe, or in cheerful confidence
 and self-ridicule. The spectacle of the Tartuffery of old Kant, equally
 stiff and decent, with which he entices us into the dialectic
 by-ways that lead (more correctly mislead) to his "categorical
 imperative"--makes us fastidious ones smile, we who find no small
 amusement in spying out the subtle tricks of old moralists and ethical
 preachers. Or, still more so, the hocus-pocus in mathematical form, by
 means of which Spinoza has, as it were, clad his philosophy in mail and
 mask--in fact, the "love of HIS wisdom," to translate the term fairly
 and squarely--in order thereby to strike terror at once into the heart
 of the assailant who should dare to cast a glance on that invincible
 maiden, that Pallas Athene:--how much of personal timidity and
 vulnerability does this masquerade of a sickly recluse betray!
 
 6. It has gradually become clear to me what every great philosophy up
 till now has consisted of--namely, the confession of its originator, and
 a species of involuntary and unconscious auto-biography; and moreover
 that the moral (or immoral) purpose in every philosophy has constituted
 the true vital germ out of which the entire plant has always grown.
 Indeed, to understand how the abstrusest metaphysical assertions of a
 philosopher have been arrived at, it is always well (and wise) to first
 ask oneself: "What morality do they (or does he) aim at?" Accordingly,
 I do not believe that an "impulse to knowledge" is the father of
 philosophy; but that another impulse, here as elsewhere, has only made
 use of knowledge (and mistaken knowledge!) as an instrument. But whoever
 considers the fundamental impulses of man with a view to determining
 how far they may have here acted as INSPIRING GENII (or as demons and
 cobolds), will find that they have all practiced philosophy at one time
 or another, and that each one of them would have been only too glad to
 look upon itself as the ultimate end of existence and the legitimate
 LORD over all the other impulses. For every impulse is imperious, and as
 SUCH, attempts to philosophize. To be sure, in the case of scholars, in
 the case of really scientific men, it may be otherwise--"better," if
 you will; there there may really be such a thing as an "impulse to
 knowledge," some kind of small, independent clock-work, which, when well
 wound up, works away industriously to that end, WITHOUT the rest of
 the scholarly impulses taking any material part therein. The actual
 "interests" of the scholar, therefore, are generally in quite another
 direction--in the family, perhaps, or in money-making, or in politics;
 it is, in fact, almost indifferent at what point of research his little
 machine is placed, and whether the hopeful young worker becomes a
 good philologist, a mushroom specialist, or a chemist; he is not
 CHARACTERISED by becoming this or that. In the philosopher, on the
 contrary, there is absolutely nothing impersonal; and above all,
 his morality furnishes a decided and decisive testimony as to WHO HE
 IS,--that is to say, in what order the deepest impulses of his nature
 stand to each other.
 
 7. How malicious philosophers can be! I know of nothing more stinging
 than the joke Epicurus took the liberty of making on Plato and the
 Platonists; he called them Dionysiokolakes. In its original sense,
 and on the face of it, the word signifies "Flatterers of
 Dionysius"--consequently, tyrants' accessories and lick-spittles;
 besides this, however, it is as much as to say, "They are all ACTORS,
 there is nothing genuine about them" (for Dionysiokolax was a popular
 name for an actor). And the latter is really the malignant reproach that
 Epicurus cast upon Plato: he was annoyed by the grandiose manner, the
 mise en scene style of which Plato and his scholars were masters--of
 which Epicurus was not a master! He, the old school-teacher of Samos,
 who sat concealed in his little garden at Athens, and wrote three
 hundred books, perhaps out of rage and ambitious envy of Plato, who
 knows! Greece took a hundred years to find out who the garden-god
 Epicurus really was. Did she ever find out?
 
 8. There is a point in every philosophy at which the "conviction" of
 the philosopher appears on the scene; or, to put it in the words of an
 ancient mystery:
 
 Adventavit asinus, Pulcher et fortissimus.
 
 9. You desire to LIVE "according to Nature"? Oh, you noble Stoics, what
 fraud of words! Imagine to yourselves a being like Nature, boundlessly
 extravagant, boundlessly indifferent, without purpose or consideration,
 without pity or justice, at once fruitful and barren and uncertain:
 imagine to yourselves INDIFFERENCE as a power--how COULD you live
 in accordance with such indifference? To live--is not that just
 endeavouring to be otherwise than this Nature? Is not living valuing,
 preferring, being unjust, being limited, endeavouring to be different?
 And granted that your imperative, "living according to Nature," means
 actually the same as "living according to life"--how could you do
 DIFFERENTLY? Why should you make a principle out of what you yourselves
 are, and must be? In reality, however, it is quite otherwise with you:
 while you pretend to read with rapture the canon of your law in Nature,
 you want something quite the contrary, you extraordinary stage-players
 and self-deluders! In your pride you wish to dictate your morals and
 ideals to Nature, to Nature herself, and to incorporate them therein;
 you insist that it shall be Nature "according to the Stoa," and would
 like everything to be made after your own image, as a vast, eternal
 glorification and generalism of Stoicism! With all your love for truth,
 you have forced yourselves so long, so persistently, and with such
 hypnotic rigidity to see Nature FALSELY, that is to say, Stoically,
 that you are no longer able to see it otherwise--and to crown all, some
 unfathomable superciliousness gives you the Bedlamite hope that
 BECAUSE you are able to tyrannize over yourselves--Stoicism is
 self-tyranny--Nature will also allow herself to be tyrannized over: is
 not the Stoic a PART of Nature?... But this is an old and everlasting
 story: what happened in old times with the Stoics still happens today,
 as soon as ever a philosophy begins to believe in itself. It always
 creates the world in its own image; it cannot do otherwise; philosophy
 is this tyrannical impulse itself, the most spiritual Will to Power, the
 will to "creation of the world," the will to the causa prima.
 
 10. The eagerness and subtlety, I should even say craftiness, with
 which the problem of "the real and the apparent world" is dealt with at
 present throughout Europe, furnishes food for thought and attention; and
 he who hears only a "Will to Truth" in the background, and nothing else,
 cannot certainly boast of the sharpest ears. In rare and isolated
 cases, it may really have happened that such a Will to Truth--a certain
 extravagant and adventurous pluck, a metaphysician's ambition of the
 forlorn hope--has participated therein: that which in the end always
 prefers a handful of "certainty" to a whole cartload of beautiful
 possibilities; there may even be puritanical fanatics of conscience,
 who prefer to put their last trust in a sure nothing, rather than in an
 uncertain something. But that is Nihilism, and the sign of a despairing,
 mortally wearied soul, notwithstanding the courageous bearing such a
 virtue may display. It seems, however, to be otherwise with stronger
 and livelier thinkers who are still eager for life. In that they side
 AGAINST appearance, and speak superciliously of "perspective," in
 that they rank the credibility of their own bodies about as low as the
 credibility of the ocular evidence that "the earth stands still," and
 thus, apparently, allowing with complacency their securest possession
 to escape (for what does one at present believe in more firmly than
 in one's body?),--who knows if they are not really trying to win back
 something which was formerly an even securer possession, something
 of the old domain of the faith of former times, perhaps the "immortal
 soul," perhaps "the old God," in short, ideas by which they could live
 better, that is to say, more vigorously and more joyously, than by
 "modern ideas"? There is DISTRUST of these modern ideas in this mode
 of looking at things, a disbelief in all that has been constructed
 yesterday and today; there is perhaps some slight admixture of satiety
 and scorn, which can no longer endure the BRIC-A-BRAC of ideas of the
 most varied origin, such as so-called Positivism at present throws on
 the market; a disgust of the more refined taste at the village-fair
 motleyness and patchiness of all these reality-philosophasters, in whom
 there is nothing either new or true, except this motleyness. Therein it
 seems to me that we should agree with those skeptical anti-realists and
 knowledge-microscopists of the present day; their instinct, which repels
 them from MODERN reality, is unrefuted... what do their retrograde
 by-paths concern us! The main thing about them is NOT that they wish
 to go "back," but that they wish to get AWAY therefrom. A little MORE
 strength, swing, courage, and artistic power, and they would be OFF--and
 not back!
 
 11. It seems to me that there is everywhere an attempt at present to
 divert attention from the actual influence which Kant exercised on
 German philosophy, and especially to ignore prudently the value which
 he set upon himself. Kant was first and foremost proud of his Table of
 Categories; with it in his hand he said: "This is the most difficult
 thing that could ever be undertaken on behalf of metaphysics." Let us
 only understand this "could be"! He was proud of having DISCOVERED a
 new faculty in man, the faculty of synthetic judgment a priori. Granting
 that he deceived himself in this matter; the development and rapid
 flourishing of German philosophy depended nevertheless on his pride, and
 on the eager rivalry of the younger generation to discover if possible
 something--at all events "new faculties"--of which to be still
 prouder!--But let us reflect for a moment--it is high time to do so.
 "How are synthetic judgments a priori POSSIBLE?" Kant asks himself--and
 what is really his answer? "BY MEANS OF A MEANS (faculty)"--but
 unfortunately not in five words, but so circumstantially, imposingly,
 and with such display of German profundity and verbal flourishes, that
 one altogether loses sight of the comical niaiserie allemande involved
 in such an answer. People were beside themselves with delight over this
 new faculty, and the jubilation reached its climax when Kant further
 discovered a moral faculty in man--for at that time Germans were still
 moral, not yet dabbling in the "Politics of hard fact." Then came
 the honeymoon of German philosophy. All the young theologians of the
 Tubingen institution went immediately into the groves--all seeking for
 "faculties." And what did they not find--in that innocent, rich, and
 still youthful period of the German spirit, to which Romanticism, the
 malicious fairy, piped and sang, when one could not yet distinguish
 between "finding" and "inventing"! Above all a faculty for the
 "transcendental"; Schelling christened it, intellectual intuition,
 and thereby gratified the most earnest longings of the naturally
 pious-inclined Germans. One can do no greater wrong to the whole of
 this exuberant and eccentric movement (which was really youthfulness,
 notwithstanding that it disguised itself so boldly, in hoary and senile
 conceptions), than to take it seriously, or even treat it with moral
 indignation. Enough, however--the world grew older, and the dream
 vanished. A time came when people rubbed their foreheads, and they still
 rub them today. People had been dreaming, and first and foremost--old
 Kant. "By means of a means (faculty)"--he had said, or at least meant to
 say. But, is that--an answer? An explanation? Or is it not rather merely
 a repetition of the question? How does opium induce sleep? "By means of
 a means (faculty)," namely the virtus dormitiva, replies the doctor in
 Moliere,
 
     Quia est in eo virtus dormitiva,
     Cujus est natura sensus assoupire.
 
 But such replies belong to the realm of comedy, and it is high time
 to replace the Kantian question, "How are synthetic judgments a PRIORI
 possible?" by another question, "Why is belief in such judgments
 necessary?"--in effect, it is high time that we should understand
 that such judgments must be believed to be true, for the sake of the
 preservation of creatures like ourselves; though they still might
 naturally be false judgments! Or, more plainly spoken, and roughly and
 readily--synthetic judgments a priori should not "be possible" at all;
 we have no right to them; in our mouths they are nothing but false
 judgments. Only, of course, the belief in their truth is necessary, as
 plausible belief and ocular evidence belonging to the perspective view
 of life. And finally, to call to mind the enormous influence which
 "German philosophy"--I hope you understand its right to inverted commas
 (goosefeet)?--has exercised throughout the whole of Europe, there is
 no doubt that a certain VIRTUS DORMITIVA had a share in it; thanks to
 German philosophy, it was a delight to the noble idlers, the virtuous,
 the mystics, the artiste, the three-fourths Christians, and the
 political obscurantists of all nations, to find an antidote to the still
 overwhelming sensualism which overflowed from the last century into
 this, in short--"sensus assoupire."...
 
 12. As regards materialistic atomism, it is one of the best-refuted
 theories that have been advanced, and in Europe there is now perhaps
 no one in the learned world so unscholarly as to attach serious
 signification to it, except for convenient everyday use (as an
 abbreviation of the means of expression)--thanks chiefly to the Pole
 Boscovich: he and the Pole Copernicus have hitherto been the greatest
 and most successful opponents of ocular evidence. For while Copernicus
 has persuaded us to believe, contrary to all the senses, that the earth
 does NOT stand fast, Boscovich has taught us to abjure the belief in the
 last thing that "stood fast" of the earth--the belief in "substance," in
 "matter," in the earth-residuum, and particle-atom: it is the greatest
 triumph over the senses that has hitherto been gained on earth. One
 must, however, go still further, and also declare war, relentless war
 to the knife, against the "atomistic requirements" which still lead a
 dangerous after-life in places where no one suspects them, like the more
 celebrated "metaphysical requirements": one must also above all give
 the finishing stroke to that other and more portentous atomism which
 Christianity has taught best and longest, the SOUL-ATOMISM. Let it be
 permitted to designate by this expression the belief which regards the
 soul as something indestructible, eternal, indivisible, as a monad,
 as an atomon: this belief ought to be expelled from science! Between
 ourselves, it is not at all necessary to get rid of "the soul" thereby,
 and thus renounce one of the oldest and most venerated hypotheses--as
 happens frequently to the clumsiness of naturalists, who can hardly
 touch on the soul without immediately losing it. But the way is open
 for new acceptations and refinements of the soul-hypothesis; and such
 conceptions as "mortal soul," and "soul of subjective multiplicity,"
 and "soul as social structure of the instincts and passions," want
 henceforth to have legitimate rights in science. In that the NEW
 psychologist is about to put an end to the superstitions which have
 hitherto flourished with almost tropical luxuriance around the idea of
 the soul, he is really, as it were, thrusting himself into a new desert
 and a new distrust--it is possible that the older psychologists had a
 merrier and more comfortable time of it; eventually, however, he finds
 that precisely thereby he is also condemned to INVENT--and, who knows?
 perhaps to DISCOVER the new.
 
 13. Psychologists should bethink themselves before putting down the
 instinct of self-preservation as the cardinal instinct of an organic
 being. A living thing seeks above all to DISCHARGE its strength--life
 itself is WILL TO POWER; self-preservation is only one of the indirect
 and most frequent RESULTS thereof. In short, here, as everywhere else,
 let us beware of SUPERFLUOUS teleological principles!--one of which
 is the instinct of self-preservation (we owe it to Spinoza's
 inconsistency). It is thus, in effect, that method ordains, which must
 be essentially economy of principles.
 
 14. It is perhaps just dawning on five or six minds that natural
 philosophy is only a world-exposition and world-arrangement (according
 to us, if I may say so!) and NOT a world-explanation; but in so far as
 it is based on belief in the senses, it is regarded as more, and for a
 long time to come must be regarded as more--namely, as an explanation.
 It has eyes and fingers of its own, it has ocular evidence and
 palpableness of its own: this operates fascinatingly, persuasively, and
 CONVINCINGLY upon an age with fundamentally plebeian tastes--in fact, it
 follows instinctively the canon of truth of eternal popular sensualism.
 What is clear, what is "explained"? Only that which can be seen and
 felt--one must pursue every problem thus far. Obversely, however, the
 charm of the Platonic mode of thought, which was an ARISTOCRATIC mode,
 consisted precisely in RESISTANCE to obvious sense-evidence--perhaps
 among men who enjoyed even stronger and more fastidious senses than our
 contemporaries, but who knew how to find a higher triumph in remaining
 masters of them: and this by means of pale, cold, grey conceptional
 networks which they threw over the motley whirl of the senses--the
 mob of the senses, as Plato said. In this overcoming of the world, and
 interpreting of the world in the manner of Plato, there was an ENJOYMENT
 different from that which the physicists of today offer us--and likewise
 the Darwinists and anti-teleologists among the physiological workers,
 with their principle of the "smallest possible effort," and the greatest
 possible blunder. "Where there is nothing more to see or to grasp, there
 is also nothing more for men to do"--that is certainly an imperative
 different from the Platonic one, but it may notwithstanding be the right
 imperative for a hardy, laborious race of machinists and bridge-builders
 of the future, who have nothing but ROUGH work to perform.
 
 15. To study physiology with a clear conscience, one must insist on
 the fact that the sense-organs are not phenomena in the sense of the
 idealistic philosophy; as such they certainly could not be causes!
 Sensualism, therefore, at least as regulative hypothesis, if not as
 heuristic principle. What? And others say even that the external world
 is the work of our organs? But then our body, as a part of this external
 world, would be the work of our organs! But then our organs themselves
 would be the work of our organs! It seems to me that this is a
 complete REDUCTIO AD ABSURDUM, if the conception CAUSA SUI is something
 fundamentally absurd. Consequently, the external world is NOT the work
 of our organs--?
 
 16. There are still harmless self-observers who believe that there are
 "immediate certainties"; for instance, "I think," or as the superstition
 of Schopenhauer puts it, "I will"; as though cognition here got hold
 of its object purely and simply as "the thing in itself," without any
 falsification taking place either on the part of the subject or the
 object. I would repeat it, however, a hundred times, that "immediate
 certainty," as well as "absolute knowledge" and the "thing in itself,"
 involve a CONTRADICTIO IN ADJECTO; we really ought to free ourselves
 from the misleading significance of words! The people on their part may
 think that cognition is knowing all about things, but the philosopher
 must say to himself: "When I analyze the process that is expressed in
 the sentence, 'I think,' I find a whole series of daring assertions, the
 argumentative proof of which would be difficult, perhaps impossible:
 for instance, that it is _I_ who think, that there must necessarily be
 something that thinks, that thinking is an activity and operation on the
 part of a being who is thought of as a cause, that there is an 'ego,'
 and finally, that it is already determined what is to be designated by
 thinking--that I KNOW what thinking is. For if I had not already decided
 within myself what it is, by what standard could I determine whether
 that which is just happening is not perhaps 'willing' or 'feeling'? In
 short, the assertion 'I think,' assumes that I COMPARE my state at the
 present moment with other states of myself which I know, in order to
 determine what it is; on account of this retrospective connection with
 further 'knowledge,' it has, at any rate, no immediate certainty for
 me."--In place of the "immediate certainty" in which the people may
 believe in the special case, the philosopher thus finds a series of
 metaphysical questions presented to him, veritable conscience questions
 of the intellect, to wit: "Whence did I get the notion of 'thinking'?
 Why do I believe in cause and effect? What gives me the right to speak
 of an 'ego,' and even of an 'ego' as cause, and finally of an 'ego'
 as cause of thought?" He who ventures to answer these metaphysical
 questions at once by an appeal to a sort of INTUITIVE perception, like
 the person who says, "I think, and know that this, at least, is
 true, actual, and certain"--will encounter a smile and two notes of
 interrogation in a philosopher nowadays. "Sir," the philosopher will
 perhaps give him to understand, "it is improbable that you are not
 mistaken, but why should it be the truth?"
 
 17. With regard to the superstitions of logicians, I shall never tire
 of emphasizing a small, terse fact, which is unwillingly recognized by
 these credulous minds--namely, that a thought comes when "it" wishes,
 and not when "I" wish; so that it is a PERVERSION of the facts of the
 case to say that the subject "I" is the condition of the predicate
 "think." ONE thinks; but that this "one" is precisely the famous old
 "ego," is, to put it mildly, only a supposition, an assertion, and
 assuredly not an "immediate certainty." After all, one has even gone too
 far with this "one thinks"--even the "one" contains an INTERPRETATION of
 the process, and does not belong to the process itself. One infers here
 according to the usual grammatical formula--"To think is an activity;
 every activity requires an agency that is active; consequently"... It
 was pretty much on the same lines that the older atomism sought, besides
 the operating "power," the material particle wherein it resides and out
 of which it operates--the atom. More rigorous minds, however, learnt at
 last to get along without this "earth-residuum," and perhaps some day we
 shall accustom ourselves, even from the logician's point of view, to
 get along without the little "one" (to which the worthy old "ego" has
 refined itself).
 
 18. It is certainly not the least charm of a theory that it is
 refutable; it is precisely thereby that it attracts the more subtle
 minds. It seems that the hundred-times-refuted theory of the "free will"
 owes its persistence to this charm alone; some one is always appearing
 who feels himself strong enough to refute it.
 
 19. Philosophers are accustomed to speak of the will as though it were
 the best-known thing in the world; indeed, Schopenhauer has given us
 to understand that the will alone is really known to us, absolutely and
 completely known, without deduction or addition. But it again and
 again seems to me that in this case Schopenhauer also only did what
 philosophers are in the habit of doing--he seems to have adopted a
 POPULAR PREJUDICE and exaggerated it. Willing seems to me to be above
 all something COMPLICATED, something that is a unity only in name--and
 it is precisely in a name that popular prejudice lurks, which has got
 the mastery over the inadequate precautions of philosophers in all ages.
 So let us for once be more cautious, let us be "unphilosophical": let
 us say that in all willing there is firstly a plurality of sensations,
 namely, the sensation of the condition "AWAY FROM WHICH we go," the
 sensation of the condition "TOWARDS WHICH we go," the sensation of this
 "FROM" and "TOWARDS" itself, and then besides, an accompanying muscular
 sensation, which, even without our putting in motion "arms and legs,"
 commences its action by force of habit, directly we "will" anything.
 Therefore, just as sensations (and indeed many kinds of sensations) are
 to be recognized as ingredients of the will, so, in the second place,
 thinking is also to be recognized; in every act of the will there is
 a ruling thought;--and let us not imagine it possible to sever this
 thought from the "willing," as if the will would then remain over!
 In the third place, the will is not only a complex of sensation and
 thinking, but it is above all an EMOTION, and in fact the emotion of the
 command. That which is termed "freedom of the will" is essentially the
 emotion of supremacy in respect to him who must obey: "I am free, 'he'
 must obey"--this consciousness is inherent in every will; and equally
 so the straining of the attention, the straight look which fixes itself
 exclusively on one thing, the unconditional judgment that "this and
 nothing else is necessary now," the inward certainty that obedience
 will be rendered--and whatever else pertains to the position of the
 commander. A man who WILLS commands something within himself which
 renders obedience, or which he believes renders obedience. But now let
 us notice what is the strangest thing about the will,--this affair so
 extremely complex, for which the people have only one name. Inasmuch as
 in the given circumstances we are at the same time the commanding AND
 the obeying parties, and as the obeying party we know the sensations of
 constraint, impulsion, pressure, resistance, and motion, which usually
 commence immediately after the act of will; inasmuch as, on the other
 hand, we are accustomed to disregard this duality, and to deceive
 ourselves about it by means of the synthetic term "I": a whole series
 of erroneous conclusions, and consequently of false judgments about the
 will itself, has become attached to the act of willing--to such a degree
 that he who wills believes firmly that willing SUFFICES for action.
 Since in the majority of cases there has only been exercise of will
 when the effect of the command--consequently obedience, and therefore
 action--was to be EXPECTED, the APPEARANCE has translated itself into
 the sentiment, as if there were a NECESSITY OF EFFECT; in a word, he who
 wills believes with a fair amount of certainty that will and action are
 somehow one; he ascribes the success, the carrying out of the willing,
 to the will itself, and thereby enjoys an increase of the sensation
 of power which accompanies all success. "Freedom of Will"--that is the
 expression for the complex state of delight of the person exercising
 volition, who commands and at the same time identifies himself with
 the executor of the order--who, as such, enjoys also the triumph over
 obstacles, but thinks within himself that it was really his own will
 that overcame them. In this way the person exercising volition adds the
 feelings of delight of his successful executive instruments, the useful
 "underwills" or under-souls--indeed, our body is but a social structure
 composed of many souls--to his feelings of delight as commander. L'EFFET
 C'EST MOI. what happens here is what happens in every well-constructed
 and happy commonwealth, namely, that the governing class identifies
 itself with the successes of the commonwealth. In all willing it is
 absolutely a question of commanding and obeying, on the basis, as
 already said, of a social structure composed of many "souls", on which
 account a philosopher should claim the right to include willing-as-such
 within the sphere of morals--regarded as the doctrine of the relations
 of supremacy under which the phenomenon of "life" manifests itself.
 
 20. That the separate philosophical ideas are not anything optional or
 autonomously evolving, but grow up in connection and relationship with
 each other, that, however suddenly and arbitrarily they seem to appear
 in the history of thought, they nevertheless belong just as much to
 a system as the collective members of the fauna of a Continent--is
 betrayed in the end by the circumstance: how unfailingly the most
 diverse philosophers always fill in again a definite fundamental scheme
 of POSSIBLE philosophies. Under an invisible spell, they always revolve
 once more in the same orbit, however independent of each other they
 may feel themselves with their critical or systematic wills, something
 within them leads them, something impels them in definite order the
 one after the other--to wit, the innate methodology and relationship
 of their ideas. Their thinking is, in fact, far less a discovery than a
 re-recognizing, a remembering, a return and a home-coming to a far-off,
 ancient common-household of the soul, out of which those ideas formerly
 grew: philosophizing is so far a kind of atavism of the highest order.
 The wonderful family resemblance of all Indian, Greek, and German
 philosophizing is easily enough explained. In fact, where there is
 affinity of language, owing to the common philosophy of grammar--I mean
 owing to the unconscious domination and guidance of similar grammatical
 functions--it cannot but be that everything is prepared at the outset
 for a similar development and succession of philosophical systems,
 just as the way seems barred against certain other possibilities of
 world-interpretation. It is highly probable that philosophers within the
 domain of the Ural-Altaic languages (where the conception of the subject
 is least developed) look otherwise "into the world," and will be
 found on paths of thought different from those of the Indo-Germans and
 Mussulmans, the spell of certain grammatical functions is ultimately
 also the spell of PHYSIOLOGICAL valuations and racial conditions.--So
 much by way of rejecting Locke's superficiality with regard to the
 origin of ideas.
 
 21. The CAUSA SUI is the best self-contradiction that has yet been
 conceived, it is a sort of logical violation and unnaturalness; but the
 extravagant pride of man has managed to entangle itself profoundly and
 frightfully with this very folly. The desire for "freedom of will"
 in the superlative, metaphysical sense, such as still holds sway,
 unfortunately, in the minds of the half-educated, the desire to bear
 the entire and ultimate responsibility for one's actions oneself, and
 to absolve God, the world, ancestors, chance, and society therefrom,
 involves nothing less than to be precisely this CAUSA SUI, and, with
 more than Munchausen daring, to pull oneself up into existence by the
 hair, out of the slough of nothingness. If any one should find out in
 this manner the crass stupidity of the celebrated conception of "free
 will" and put it out of his head altogether, I beg of him to carry
 his "enlightenment" a step further, and also put out of his head the
 contrary of this monstrous conception of "free will": I mean "non-free
 will," which is tantamount to a misuse of cause and effect. One
 should not wrongly MATERIALISE "cause" and "effect," as the natural
 philosophers do (and whoever like them naturalize in thinking at
 present), according to the prevailing mechanical doltishness which makes
 the cause press and push until it "effects" its end; one should use
 "cause" and "effect" only as pure CONCEPTIONS, that is to say, as
 conventional fictions for the purpose of designation and mutual
 understanding,--NOT for explanation. In "being-in-itself" there is
 nothing of "casual-connection," of "necessity," or of "psychological
 non-freedom"; there the effect does NOT follow the cause, there "law"
 does not obtain. It is WE alone who have devised cause, sequence,
 reciprocity, relativity, constraint, number, law, freedom, motive,
 and purpose; and when we interpret and intermix this symbol-world,
 as "being-in-itself," with things, we act once more as we have always
 acted--MYTHOLOGICALLY. The "non-free will" is mythology; in real life
 it is only a question of STRONG and WEAK wills.--It is almost always
 a symptom of what is lacking in himself, when a thinker, in every
 "causal-connection" and "psychological necessity," manifests something
 of compulsion, indigence, obsequiousness, oppression, and non-freedom;
 it is suspicious to have such feelings--the person betrays himself. And
 in general, if I have observed correctly, the "non-freedom of the will"
 is regarded as a problem from two entirely opposite standpoints, but
 always in a profoundly PERSONAL manner: some will not give up their
 "responsibility," their belief in THEMSELVES, the personal right to
 THEIR merits, at any price (the vain races belong to this class); others
 on the contrary, do not wish to be answerable for anything, or blamed
 for anything, and owing to an inward self-contempt, seek to GET OUT OF
 THE BUSINESS, no matter how. The latter, when they write books, are
 in the habit at present of taking the side of criminals; a sort of
 socialistic sympathy is their favourite disguise. And as a matter of
 fact, the fatalism of the weak-willed embellishes itself surprisingly
 when it can pose as "la religion de la souffrance humaine"; that is ITS
 "good taste."
 
 22. Let me be pardoned, as an old philologist who cannot desist from
 the mischief of putting his finger on bad modes of interpretation, but
 "Nature's conformity to law," of which you physicists talk so proudly,
 as though--why, it exists only owing to your interpretation and bad
 "philology." It is no matter of fact, no "text," but rather just a
 naively humanitarian adjustment and perversion of meaning, with which
 you make abundant concessions to the democratic instincts of the modern
 soul! "Everywhere equality before the law--Nature is not different in
 that respect, nor better than we": a fine instance of secret motive,
 in which the vulgar antagonism to everything privileged and
 autocratic--likewise a second and more refined atheism--is once more
 disguised. "Ni dieu, ni maitre"--that, also, is what you want; and
 therefore "Cheers for natural law!"--is it not so? But, as has been
 said, that is interpretation, not text; and somebody might come along,
 who, with opposite intentions and modes of interpretation, could read
 out of the same "Nature," and with regard to the same phenomena, just
 the tyrannically inconsiderate and relentless enforcement of the claims
 of power--an interpreter who should so place the unexceptionalness and
 unconditionalness of all "Will to Power" before your eyes, that almost
 every word, and the word "tyranny" itself, would eventually seem
 unsuitable, or like a weakening and softening metaphor--as being too
 human; and who should, nevertheless, end by asserting the same about
 this world as you do, namely, that it has a "necessary" and "calculable"
 course, NOT, however, because laws obtain in it, but because they are
 absolutely LACKING, and every power effects its ultimate consequences
 every moment. Granted that this also is only interpretation--and you
 will be eager enough to make this objection?--well, so much the better.
 
 23. All psychology hitherto has run aground on moral prejudices and
 timidities, it has not dared to launch out into the depths. In so far
 as it is allowable to recognize in that which has hitherto been written,
 evidence of that which has hitherto been kept silent, it seems as if
 nobody had yet harboured the notion of psychology as the Morphology
 and DEVELOPMENT-DOCTRINE OF THE WILL TO POWER, as I conceive of it.
 The power of moral prejudices has penetrated deeply into the most
 intellectual world, the world apparently most indifferent and
 unprejudiced, and has obviously operated in an injurious, obstructive,
 blinding, and distorting manner. A proper physio-psychology has to
 contend with unconscious antagonism in the heart of the investigator,
 it has "the heart" against it even a doctrine of the reciprocal
 conditionalness of the "good" and the "bad" impulses, causes (as
 refined immorality) distress and aversion in a still strong and manly
 conscience--still more so, a doctrine of the derivation of all good
 impulses from bad ones. If, however, a person should regard even
 the emotions of hatred, envy, covetousness, and imperiousness
 as life-conditioning emotions, as factors which must be present,
 fundamentally and essentially, in the general economy of life (which
 must, therefore, be further developed if life is to be further
 developed), he will suffer from such a view of things as from
 sea-sickness. And yet this hypothesis is far from being the strangest
 and most painful in this immense and almost new domain of dangerous
 knowledge, and there are in fact a hundred good reasons why every one
 should keep away from it who CAN do so! On the other hand, if one has
 once drifted hither with one's bark, well! very good! now let us set our
 teeth firmly! let us open our eyes and keep our hand fast on the helm!
 We sail away right OVER morality, we crush out, we destroy perhaps the
 remains of our own morality by daring to make our voyage thither--but
 what do WE matter. Never yet did a PROFOUNDER world of insight reveal
 itself to daring travelers and adventurers, and the psychologist who
 thus "makes a sacrifice"--it is not the sacrifizio dell' intelletto,
 on the contrary!--will at least be entitled to demand in return that
 psychology shall once more be recognized as the queen of the sciences,
 for whose service and equipment the other sciences exist. For psychology
 is once more the path to the fundamental problems.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II. THE FREE SPIRIT
 
 
 24. O sancta simplicitiatas! In what strange simplification and
 falsification man lives! One can never cease wondering when once one has
 got eyes for beholding this marvel! How we have made everything around
 us clear and free and easy and simple! how we have been able to give
 our senses a passport to everything superficial, our thoughts a godlike
 desire for wanton pranks and wrong inferences!--how from the beginning,
 we have contrived to retain our ignorance in order to enjoy an almost
 inconceivable freedom, thoughtlessness, imprudence, heartiness,
 and gaiety--in order to enjoy life! And only on this solidified,
 granite-like foundation of ignorance could knowledge rear itself
 hitherto, the will to knowledge on the foundation of a far more powerful
 will, the will to ignorance, to the uncertain, to the untrue! Not as
 its opposite, but--as its refinement! It is to be hoped, indeed, that
 LANGUAGE, here as elsewhere, will not get over its awkwardness, and that
 it will continue to talk of opposites where there are only degrees
 and many refinements of gradation; it is equally to be hoped that the
 incarnated Tartuffery of morals, which now belongs to our unconquerable
 "flesh and blood," will turn the words round in the mouths of us
 discerning ones. Here and there we understand it, and laugh at the way
 in which precisely the best knowledge seeks most to retain us in this
 SIMPLIFIED, thoroughly artificial, suitably imagined, and suitably
 falsified world: at the way in which, whether it will or not, it loves
 error, because, as living itself, it loves life!
 
 25. After such a cheerful commencement, a serious word would fain be
 heard; it appeals to the most serious minds. Take care, ye philosophers
 and friends of knowledge, and beware of martyrdom! Of suffering "for the
 truth's sake"! even in your own defense! It spoils all the innocence
 and fine neutrality of your conscience; it makes you headstrong against
 objections and red rags; it stupefies, animalizes, and brutalizes, when
 in the struggle with danger, slander, suspicion, expulsion, and even
 worse consequences of enmity, ye have at last to play your last card
 as protectors of truth upon earth--as though "the Truth" were such an
 innocent and incompetent creature as to require protectors! and you of
 all people, ye knights of the sorrowful countenance, Messrs Loafers and
 Cobweb-spinners of the spirit! Finally, ye know sufficiently well that
 it cannot be of any consequence if YE just carry your point; ye know
 that hitherto no philosopher has carried his point, and that there might
 be a more laudable truthfulness in every little interrogative mark
 which you place after your special words and favourite doctrines (and
 occasionally after yourselves) than in all the solemn pantomime and
 trumping games before accusers and law-courts! Rather go out of the way!
 Flee into concealment! And have your masks and your ruses, that ye may
 be mistaken for what you are, or somewhat feared! And pray, don't forget
 the garden, the garden with golden trellis-work! And have people around
 you who are as a garden--or as music on the waters at eventide, when
 already the day becomes a memory. Choose the GOOD solitude, the free,
 wanton, lightsome solitude, which also gives you the right still to
 remain good in any sense whatsoever! How poisonous, how crafty, how bad,
 does every long war make one, which cannot be waged openly by means
 of force! How PERSONAL does a long fear make one, a long watching
 of enemies, of possible enemies! These pariahs of society, these
 long-pursued, badly-persecuted ones--also the compulsory recluses, the
 Spinozas or Giordano Brunos--always become in the end, even under the
 most intellectual masquerade, and perhaps without being themselves aware
 of it, refined vengeance-seekers and poison-Brewers (just lay bare
 the foundation of Spinoza's ethics and theology!), not to speak of
 the stupidity of moral indignation, which is the unfailing sign in a
 philosopher that the sense of philosophical humour has left him. The
 martyrdom of the philosopher, his "sacrifice for the sake of truth,"
 forces into the light whatever of the agitator and actor lurks in him;
 and if one has hitherto contemplated him only with artistic curiosity,
 with regard to many a philosopher it is easy to understand the dangerous
 desire to see him also in his deterioration (deteriorated into a
 "martyr," into a stage-and-tribune-bawler). Only, that it is necessary
 with such a desire to be clear WHAT spectacle one will see in any
 case--merely a satyric play, merely an epilogue farce, merely the
 continued proof that the long, real tragedy IS AT AN END, supposing that
 every philosophy has been a long tragedy in its origin.
 
 26. Every select man strives instinctively for a citadel and a privacy,
 where he is FREE from the crowd, the many, the majority--where he may
 forget "men who are the rule," as their exception;--exclusive only of
 the case in which he is pushed straight to such men by a still stronger
 instinct, as a discerner in the great and exceptional sense. Whoever, in
 intercourse with men, does not occasionally glisten in all the green
 and grey colours of distress, owing to disgust, satiety, sympathy,
 gloominess, and solitariness, is assuredly not a man of elevated tastes;
 supposing, however, that he does not voluntarily take all this burden
 and disgust upon himself, that he persistently avoids it, and remains,
 as I said, quietly and proudly hidden in his citadel, one thing is then
 certain: he was not made, he was not predestined for knowledge. For as
 such, he would one day have to say to himself: "The devil take my good
 taste! but 'the rule' is more interesting than the exception--than
 myself, the exception!" And he would go DOWN, and above all, he would
 go "inside." The long and serious study of the AVERAGE man--and
 consequently much disguise, self-overcoming, familiarity, and bad
 intercourse (all intercourse is bad intercourse except with one's
 equals):--that constitutes a necessary part of the life-history of every
 philosopher; perhaps the most disagreeable, odious, and disappointing
 part. If he is fortunate, however, as a favourite child of knowledge
 should be, he will meet with suitable auxiliaries who will shorten and
 lighten his task; I mean so-called cynics, those who simply recognize
 the animal, the commonplace and "the rule" in themselves, and at the
 same time have so much spirituality and ticklishness as to make them
 talk of themselves and their like BEFORE WITNESSES--sometimes they
 wallow, even in books, as on their own dung-hill. Cynicism is the only
 form in which base souls approach what is called honesty; and the
 higher man must open his ears to all the coarser or finer cynicism, and
 congratulate himself when the clown becomes shameless right before
 him, or the scientific satyr speaks out. There are even cases where
 enchantment mixes with the disgust--namely, where by a freak of nature,
 genius is bound to some such indiscreet billy-goat and ape, as in the
 case of the Abbe Galiani, the profoundest, acutest, and perhaps also
 filthiest man of his century--he was far profounder than Voltaire, and
 consequently also, a good deal more silent. It happens more frequently,
 as has been hinted, that a scientific head is placed on an ape's body, a
 fine exceptional understanding in a base soul, an occurrence by no means
 rare, especially among doctors and moral physiologists. And whenever
 anyone speaks without bitterness, or rather quite innocently, of man
 as a belly with two requirements, and a head with one; whenever any one
 sees, seeks, and WANTS to see only hunger, sexual instinct, and vanity
 as the real and only motives of human actions; in short, when any one
 speaks "badly"--and not even "ill"--of man, then ought the lover of
 knowledge to hearken attentively and diligently; he ought, in general,
 to have an open ear wherever there is talk without indignation. For the
 indignant man, and he who perpetually tears and lacerates himself with
 his own teeth (or, in place of himself, the world, God, or society),
 may indeed, morally speaking, stand higher than the laughing and
 self-satisfied satyr, but in every other sense he is the more ordinary,
 more indifferent, and less instructive case. And no one is such a LIAR
 as the indignant man.
 
 27. It is difficult to be understood, especially when one thinks and
 lives gangasrotogati [Footnote: Like the river Ganges: presto.] among
 those only who think and live otherwise--namely, kurmagati [Footnote:
 Like the tortoise: lento.], or at best "froglike," mandeikagati
 [Footnote: Like the frog: staccato.] (I do everything to be "difficultly
 understood" myself!)--and one should be heartily grateful for the
 good will to some refinement of interpretation. As regards "the good
 friends," however, who are always too easy-going, and think that as
 friends they have a right to ease, one does well at the very first to
 grant them a play-ground and romping-place for misunderstanding--one can
 thus laugh still; or get rid of them altogether, these good friends--and
 laugh then also!
 
 28. What is most difficult to render from one language into another
 is the TEMPO of its style, which has its basis in the character of the
 race, or to speak more physiologically, in the average TEMPO of the
 assimilation of its nutriment. There are honestly meant translations,
 which, as involuntary vulgarizations, are almost falsifications of the
 original, merely because its lively and merry TEMPO (which overleaps and
 obviates all dangers in word and expression) could not also be
 rendered. A German is almost incapacitated for PRESTO in his language;
 consequently also, as may be reasonably inferred, for many of the most
 delightful and daring NUANCES of free, free-spirited thought. And just
 as the buffoon and satyr are foreign to him in body and conscience,
 so Aristophanes and Petronius are untranslatable for him. Everything
 ponderous, viscous, and pompously clumsy, all long-winded and wearying
 species of style, are developed in profuse variety among Germans--pardon
 me for stating the fact that even Goethe's prose, in its mixture of
 stiffness and elegance, is no exception, as a reflection of the "good
 old time" to which it belongs, and as an expression of German taste at a
 time when there was still a "German taste," which was a rococo-taste
 in moribus et artibus. Lessing is an exception, owing to his histrionic
 nature, which understood much, and was versed in many things; he who was
 not the translator of Bayle to no purpose, who took refuge willingly in
 the shadow of Diderot and Voltaire, and still more willingly among the
 Roman comedy-writers--Lessing loved also free-spiritism in the TEMPO,
 and flight out of Germany. But how could the German language, even
 in the prose of Lessing, imitate the TEMPO of Machiavelli, who in his
 "Principe" makes us breathe the dry, fine air of Florence, and cannot
 help presenting the most serious events in a boisterous allegrissimo,
 perhaps not without a malicious artistic sense of the contrast he
 ventures to present--long, heavy, difficult, dangerous thoughts, and
 a TEMPO of the gallop, and of the best, wantonest humour? Finally, who
 would venture on a German translation of Petronius, who, more than any
 great musician hitherto, was a master of PRESTO in invention, ideas, and
 words? What matter in the end about the swamps of the sick, evil world,
 or of the "ancient world," when like him, one has the feet of a wind,
 the rush, the breath, the emancipating scorn of a wind, which makes
 everything healthy, by making everything RUN! And with regard to
 Aristophanes--that transfiguring, complementary genius, for whose
 sake one PARDONS all Hellenism for having existed, provided one has
 understood in its full profundity ALL that there requires pardon and
 transfiguration; there is nothing that has caused me to meditate more on
 PLATO'S secrecy and sphinx-like nature, than the happily preserved petit
 fait that under the pillow of his death-bed there was found no
 "Bible," nor anything Egyptian, Pythagorean, or Platonic--but a book of
 Aristophanes. How could even Plato have endured life--a Greek life which
 he repudiated--without an Aristophanes!
 
 29. It is the business of the very few to be independent; it is a
 privilege of the strong. And whoever attempts it, even with the best
 right, but without being OBLIGED to do so, proves that he is probably
 not only strong, but also daring beyond measure. He enters into a
 labyrinth, he multiplies a thousandfold the dangers which life in itself
 already brings with it; not the least of which is that no one can see
 how and where he loses his way, becomes isolated, and is torn piecemeal
 by some minotaur of conscience. Supposing such a one comes to grief, it
 is so far from the comprehension of men that they neither feel it, nor
 sympathize with it. And he cannot any longer go back! He cannot even go
 back again to the sympathy of men!
 
 30. Our deepest insights must--and should--appear as follies, and under
 certain circumstances as crimes, when they come unauthorizedly to
 the ears of those who are not disposed and predestined for them. The
 exoteric and the esoteric, as they were formerly distinguished by
 philosophers--among the Indians, as among the Greeks, Persians, and
 Mussulmans, in short, wherever people believed in gradations of rank and
 NOT in equality and equal rights--are not so much in contradistinction
 to one another in respect to the exoteric class, standing without, and
 viewing, estimating, measuring, and judging from the outside, and not
 from the inside; the more essential distinction is that the class in
 question views things from below upwards--while the esoteric class views
 things FROM ABOVE DOWNWARDS. There are heights of the soul from which
 tragedy itself no longer appears to operate tragically; and if all the
 woe in the world were taken together, who would dare to decide whether
 the sight of it would NECESSARILY seduce and constrain to sympathy, and
 thus to a doubling of the woe?... That which serves the higher class of
 men for nourishment or refreshment, must be almost poison to an entirely
 different and lower order of human beings. The virtues of the common
 man would perhaps mean vice and weakness in a philosopher; it might be
 possible for a highly developed man, supposing him to degenerate and go
 to ruin, to acquire qualities thereby alone, for the sake of which he
 would have to be honoured as a saint in the lower world into which he
 had sunk. There are books which have an inverse value for the soul and
 the health according as the inferior soul and the lower vitality, or the
 higher and more powerful, make use of them. In the former case they are
 dangerous, disturbing, unsettling books, in the latter case they are
 herald-calls which summon the bravest to THEIR bravery. Books for the
 general reader are always ill-smelling books, the odour of paltry people
 clings to them. Where the populace eat and drink, and even where they
 reverence, it is accustomed to stink. One should not go into churches if
 one wishes to breathe PURE air.
 
 31. In our youthful years we still venerate and despise without the art
 of NUANCE, which is the best gain of life, and we have rightly to do
 hard penance for having fallen upon men and things with Yea and Nay.
 Everything is so arranged that the worst of all tastes, THE TASTE FOR
 THE UNCONDITIONAL, is cruelly befooled and abused, until a man learns
 to introduce a little art into his sentiments, and prefers to try
 conclusions with the artificial, as do the real artists of life. The
 angry and reverent spirit peculiar to youth appears to allow itself no
 peace, until it has suitably falsified men and things, to be able
 to vent its passion upon them: youth in itself even, is something
 falsifying and deceptive. Later on, when the young soul, tortured by
 continual disillusions, finally turns suspiciously against itself--still
 ardent and savage even in its suspicion and remorse of conscience: how
 it upbraids itself, how impatiently it tears itself, how it revenges
 itself for its long self-blinding, as though it had been a voluntary
 blindness! In this transition one punishes oneself by distrust of one's
 sentiments; one tortures one's enthusiasm with doubt, one feels even the
 good conscience to be a danger, as if it were the self-concealment and
 lassitude of a more refined uprightness; and above all, one espouses
 upon principle the cause AGAINST "youth."--A decade later, and one
 comprehends that all this was also still--youth!
 
 32. Throughout the longest period of human history--one calls it the
 prehistoric period--the value or non-value of an action was inferred
 from its CONSEQUENCES; the action in itself was not taken into
 consideration, any more than its origin; but pretty much as in China at
 present, where the distinction or disgrace of a child redounds to
 its parents, the retro-operating power of success or failure was what
 induced men to think well or ill of an action. Let us call this period
 the PRE-MORAL period of mankind; the imperative, "Know thyself!" was
 then still unknown.--In the last ten thousand years, on the other hand,
 on certain large portions of the earth, one has gradually got so far,
 that one no longer lets the consequences of an action, but its origin,
 decide with regard to its worth: a great achievement as a whole, an
 important refinement of vision and of criterion, the unconscious effect
 of the supremacy of aristocratic values and of the belief in "origin,"
 the mark of a period which may be designated in the narrower sense as
 the MORAL one: the first attempt at self-knowledge is thereby
 made. Instead of the consequences, the origin--what an inversion
 of perspective! And assuredly an inversion effected only after long
 struggle and wavering! To be sure, an ominous new superstition, a
 peculiar narrowness of interpretation, attained supremacy precisely
 thereby: the origin of an action was interpreted in the most definite
 sense possible, as origin out of an INTENTION; people were agreed in the
 belief that the value of an action lay in the value of its intention.
 The intention as the sole origin and antecedent history of an action:
 under the influence of this prejudice moral praise and blame have been
 bestowed, and men have judged and even philosophized almost up to the
 present day.--Is it not possible, however, that the necessity may now
 have arisen of again making up our minds with regard to the reversing
 and fundamental shifting of values, owing to a new self-consciousness
 and acuteness in man--is it not possible that we may be standing on
 the threshold of a period which to begin with, would be distinguished
 negatively as ULTRA-MORAL: nowadays when, at least among us immoralists,
 the suspicion arises that the decisive value of an action lies precisely
 in that which is NOT INTENTIONAL, and that all its intentionalness, all
 that is seen, sensible, or "sensed" in it, belongs to its surface or
 skin--which, like every skin, betrays something, but CONCEALS still
 more? In short, we believe that the intention is only a sign or symptom,
 which first requires an explanation--a sign, moreover, which has too
 many interpretations, and consequently hardly any meaning in itself
 alone: that morality, in the sense in which it has been understood
 hitherto, as intention-morality, has been a prejudice, perhaps a
 prematureness or preliminariness, probably something of the same rank
 as astrology and alchemy, but in any case something which must be
 surmounted. The surmounting of morality, in a certain sense even the
 self-mounting of morality--let that be the name for the long-secret
 labour which has been reserved for the most refined, the most upright,
 and also the most wicked consciences of today, as the living touchstones
 of the soul.
 
 33. It cannot be helped: the sentiment of surrender, of sacrifice for
 one's neighbour, and all self-renunciation-morality, must be mercilessly
 called to account, and brought to judgment; just as the aesthetics
 of "disinterested contemplation," under which the emasculation of art
 nowadays seeks insidiously enough to create itself a good conscience.
 There is far too much witchery and sugar in the sentiments "for others"
 and "NOT for myself," for one not needing to be doubly distrustful here,
 and for one asking promptly: "Are they not perhaps--DECEPTIONS?"--That
 they PLEASE--him who has them, and him who enjoys their fruit, and also
 the mere spectator--that is still no argument in their FAVOUR, but just
 calls for caution. Let us therefore be cautious!
 
 34. At whatever standpoint of philosophy one may place oneself nowadays,
 seen from every position, the ERRONEOUSNESS of the world in which we
 think we live is the surest and most certain thing our eyes can light
 upon: we find proof after proof thereof, which would fain allure us into
 surmises concerning a deceptive principle in the "nature of things."
 He, however, who makes thinking itself, and consequently "the spirit,"
 responsible for the falseness of the world--an honourable exit, which
 every conscious or unconscious advocatus dei avails himself of--he
 who regards this world, including space, time, form, and movement, as
 falsely DEDUCED, would have at least good reason in the end to become
 distrustful also of all thinking; has it not hitherto been playing upon
 us the worst of scurvy tricks? and what guarantee would it give that
 it would not continue to do what it has always been doing? In all
 seriousness, the innocence of thinkers has something touching and
 respect-inspiring in it, which even nowadays permits them to wait upon
 consciousness with the request that it will give them HONEST answers:
 for example, whether it be "real" or not, and why it keeps the outer
 world so resolutely at a distance, and other questions of the same
 description. The belief in "immediate certainties" is a MORAL NAIVETE
 which does honour to us philosophers; but--we have now to cease being
 "MERELY moral" men! Apart from morality, such belief is a folly which
 does little honour to us! If in middle-class life an ever-ready distrust
 is regarded as the sign of a "bad character," and consequently as an
 imprudence, here among us, beyond the middle-class world and its Yeas
 and Nays, what should prevent our being imprudent and saying: the
 philosopher has at length a RIGHT to "bad character," as the being who
 has hitherto been most befooled on earth--he is now under OBLIGATION
 to distrustfulness, to the wickedest squinting out of every abyss of
 suspicion.--Forgive me the joke of this gloomy grimace and turn of
 expression; for I myself have long ago learned to think and estimate
 differently with regard to deceiving and being deceived, and I keep at
 least a couple of pokes in the ribs ready for the blind rage with which
 philosophers struggle against being deceived. Why NOT? It is nothing
 more than a moral prejudice that truth is worth more than semblance; it
 is, in fact, the worst proved supposition in the world. So much must be
 conceded: there could have been no life at all except upon the basis
 of perspective estimates and semblances; and if, with the virtuous
 enthusiasm and stupidity of many philosophers, one wished to do away
 altogether with the "seeming world"--well, granted that YOU could do
 that,--at least nothing of your "truth" would thereby remain! Indeed,
 what is it that forces us in general to the supposition that there is an
 essential opposition of "true" and "false"? Is it not enough to suppose
 degrees of seemingness, and as it were lighter and darker shades and
 tones of semblance--different valeurs, as the painters say? Why might
 not the world WHICH CONCERNS US--be a fiction? And to any one who
 suggested: "But to a fiction belongs an originator?"--might it not be
 bluntly replied: WHY? May not this "belong" also belong to the fiction?
 Is it not at length permitted to be a little ironical towards the
 subject, just as towards the predicate and object? Might not the
 philosopher elevate himself above faith in grammar? All respect
 to governesses, but is it not time that philosophy should renounce
 governess-faith?
 
 35. O Voltaire! O humanity! O idiocy! There is something ticklish in
 "the truth," and in the SEARCH for the truth; and if man goes about it
 too humanely--"il ne cherche le vrai que pour faire le bien"--I wager he
 finds nothing!
 
 36. Supposing that nothing else is "given" as real but our world of
 desires and passions, that we cannot sink or rise to any other "reality"
 but just that of our impulses--for thinking is only a relation of these
 impulses to one another:--are we not permitted to make the attempt and
 to ask the question whether this which is "given" does not SUFFICE, by
 means of our counterparts, for the understanding even of the so-called
 mechanical (or "material") world? I do not mean as an illusion, a
 "semblance," a "representation" (in the Berkeleyan and Schopenhauerian
 sense), but as possessing the same degree of reality as our emotions
 themselves--as a more primitive form of the world of emotions, in
 which everything still lies locked in a mighty unity, which afterwards
 branches off and develops itself in organic processes (naturally also,
 refines and debilitates)--as a kind of instinctive life in which all
 organic functions, including self-regulation, assimilation, nutrition,
 secretion, and change of matter, are still synthetically united with
 one another--as a PRIMARY FORM of life?--In the end, it is not only
 permitted to make this attempt, it is commanded by the conscience of
 LOGICAL METHOD. Not to assume several kinds of causality, so long as
 the attempt to get along with a single one has not been pushed to its
 furthest extent (to absurdity, if I may be allowed to say so): that is
 a morality of method which one may not repudiate nowadays--it follows
 "from its definition," as mathematicians say. The question is ultimately
 whether we really recognize the will as OPERATING, whether we believe in
 the causality of the will; if we do so--and fundamentally our belief IN
 THIS is just our belief in causality itself--we MUST make the attempt
 to posit hypothetically the causality of the will as the only causality.
 "Will" can naturally only operate on "will"--and not on "matter" (not
 on "nerves," for instance): in short, the hypothesis must be
 hazarded, whether will does not operate on will wherever "effects"
 are recognized--and whether all mechanical action, inasmuch as a power
 operates therein, is not just the power of will, the effect of will.
 Granted, finally, that we succeeded in explaining our entire instinctive
 life as the development and ramification of one fundamental form of
 will--namely, the Will to Power, as my thesis puts it; granted that all
 organic functions could be traced back to this Will to Power, and that
 the solution of the problem of generation and nutrition--it is one
 problem--could also be found therein: one would thus have acquired the
 right to define ALL active force unequivocally as WILL TO POWER. The
 world seen from within, the world defined and designated according to
 its "intelligible character"--it would simply be "Will to Power," and
 nothing else.
 
 37. "What? Does not that mean in popular language: God is disproved, but
 not the devil?"--On the contrary! On the contrary, my friends! And who
 the devil also compels you to speak popularly!
 
 38. As happened finally in all the enlightenment of modern times with
 the French Revolution (that terrible farce, quite superfluous when
 judged close at hand, into which, however, the noble and visionary
 spectators of all Europe have interpreted from a distance their own
 indignation and enthusiasm so long and passionately, UNTIL THE TEXT HAS
 DISAPPEARED UNDER THE INTERPRETATION), so a noble posterity might once
 more misunderstand the whole of the past, and perhaps only thereby make
 ITS aspect endurable.--Or rather, has not this already happened? Have
 not we ourselves been--that "noble posterity"? And, in so far as we now
 comprehend this, is it not--thereby already past?
 
 39. Nobody will very readily regard a doctrine as true merely because
 it makes people happy or virtuous--excepting, perhaps, the amiable
 "Idealists," who are enthusiastic about the good, true, and beautiful,
 and let all kinds of motley, coarse, and good-natured desirabilities
 swim about promiscuously in their pond. Happiness and virtue are no
 arguments. It is willingly forgotten, however, even on the part of
 thoughtful minds, that to make unhappy and to make bad are just as
 little counter-arguments. A thing could be TRUE, although it were in
 the highest degree injurious and dangerous; indeed, the fundamental
 constitution of existence might be such that one succumbed by a full
 knowledge of it--so that the strength of a mind might be measured by
 the amount of "truth" it could endure--or to speak more plainly, by the
 extent to which it REQUIRED truth attenuated, veiled, sweetened, damped,
 and falsified. But there is no doubt that for the discovery of certain
 PORTIONS of truth the wicked and unfortunate are more favourably
 situated and have a greater likelihood of success; not to speak of the
 wicked who are happy--a species about whom moralists are silent. Perhaps
 severity and craft are more favourable conditions for the development of
 strong, independent spirits and philosophers than the gentle, refined,
 yielding good-nature, and habit of taking things easily, which are
 prized, and rightly prized in a learned man. Presupposing always,
 to begin with, that the term "philosopher" be not confined to the
 philosopher who writes books, or even introduces HIS philosophy into
 books!--Stendhal furnishes a last feature of the portrait of the
 free-spirited philosopher, which for the sake of German taste I will
 not omit to underline--for it is OPPOSED to German taste. "Pour etre
 bon philosophe," says this last great psychologist, "il faut etre sec,
 clair, sans illusion. Un banquier, qui a fait fortune, a une partie du
 caractere requis pour faire des decouvertes en philosophie, c'est-a-dire
 pour voir clair dans ce qui est."
 
 40. Everything that is profound loves the mask: the profoundest things
 have a hatred even of figure and likeness. Should not the CONTRARY only
 be the right disguise for the shame of a God to go about in? A question
 worth asking!--it would be strange if some mystic has not already
 ventured on the same kind of thing. There are proceedings of such a
 delicate nature that it is well to overwhelm them with coarseness
 and make them unrecognizable; there are actions of love and of an
 extravagant magnanimity after which nothing can be wiser than to take
 a stick and thrash the witness soundly: one thereby obscures his
 recollection. Many a one is able to obscure and abuse his own memory, in
 order at least to have vengeance on this sole party in the secret:
 shame is inventive. They are not the worst things of which one is
 most ashamed: there is not only deceit behind a mask--there is so much
 goodness in craft. I could imagine that a man with something costly and
 fragile to conceal, would roll through life clumsily and rotundly like
 an old, green, heavily-hooped wine-cask: the refinement of his shame
 requiring it to be so. A man who has depths in his shame meets his
 destiny and his delicate decisions upon paths which few ever reach,
 and with regard to the existence of which his nearest and most intimate
 friends may be ignorant; his mortal danger conceals itself from their
 eyes, and equally so his regained security. Such a hidden nature,
 which instinctively employs speech for silence and concealment, and is
 inexhaustible in evasion of communication, DESIRES and insists that a
 mask of himself shall occupy his place in the hearts and heads of his
 friends; and supposing he does not desire it, his eyes will some day be
 opened to the fact that there is nevertheless a mask of him there--and
 that it is well to be so. Every profound spirit needs a mask; nay, more,
 around every profound spirit there continually grows a mask, owing to
 the constantly false, that is to say, SUPERFICIAL interpretation
 of every word he utters, every step he takes, every sign of life he
 manifests.
 
 41. One must subject oneself to one's own tests that one is destined
 for independence and command, and do so at the right time. One must not
 avoid one's tests, although they constitute perhaps the most dangerous
 game one can play, and are in the end tests made only before ourselves
 and before no other judge. Not to cleave to any person, be it even the
 dearest--every person is a prison and also a recess. Not to cleave to
 a fatherland, be it even the most suffering and necessitous--it is even
 less difficult to detach one's heart from a victorious fatherland. Not
 to cleave to a sympathy, be it even for higher men, into whose peculiar
 torture and helplessness chance has given us an insight. Not to cleave
 to a science, though it tempt one with the most valuable discoveries,
 apparently specially reserved for us. Not to cleave to one's own
 liberation, to the voluptuous distance and remoteness of the bird, which
 always flies further aloft in order always to see more under it--the
 danger of the flier. Not to cleave to our own virtues, nor become as
 a whole a victim to any of our specialties, to our "hospitality" for
 instance, which is the danger of dangers for highly developed
 and wealthy souls, who deal prodigally, almost indifferently with
 themselves, and push the virtue of liberality so far that it becomes
 a vice. One must know how TO CONSERVE ONESELF--the best test of
 independence.
 
 42. A new order of philosophers is appearing; I shall venture to baptize
 them by a name not without danger. As far as I understand them, as far
 as they allow themselves to be understood--for it is their nature to
 WISH to remain something of a puzzle--these philosophers of the
 future might rightly, perhaps also wrongly, claim to be designated as
 "tempters." This name itself is after all only an attempt, or, if it be
 preferred, a temptation.
 
 43. Will they be new friends of "truth," these coming philosophers? Very
 probably, for all philosophers hitherto have loved their truths. But
 assuredly they will not be dogmatists. It must be contrary to their
 pride, and also contrary to their taste, that their truth should still
 be truth for every one--that which has hitherto been the secret wish
 and ultimate purpose of all dogmatic efforts. "My opinion is MY opinion:
 another person has not easily a right to it"--such a philosopher of the
 future will say, perhaps. One must renounce the bad taste of wishing to
 agree with many people. "Good" is no longer good when one's neighbour
 takes it into his mouth. And how could there be a "common good"! The
 expression contradicts itself; that which can be common is always of
 small value. In the end things must be as they are and have always
 been--the great things remain for the great, the abysses for the
 profound, the delicacies and thrills for the refined, and, to sum up
 shortly, everything rare for the rare.
 
 
 44. Need I say expressly after all this that they will be free, VERY
 free spirits, these philosophers of the future--as certainly also they
 will not be merely free spirits, but something more, higher, greater,
 and fundamentally different, which does not wish to be misunderstood and
 mistaken? But while I say this, I feel under OBLIGATION almost as much
 to them as to ourselves (we free spirits who are their heralds and
 forerunners), to sweep away from ourselves altogether a stupid old
 prejudice and misunderstanding, which, like a fog, has too long made the
 conception of "free spirit" obscure. In every country of Europe, and the
 same in America, there is at present something which makes an abuse of
 this name a very narrow, prepossessed, enchained class of spirits,
 who desire almost the opposite of what our intentions and instincts
 prompt--not to mention that in respect to the NEW philosophers who are
 appearing, they must still more be closed windows and bolted doors.
 Briefly and regrettably, they belong to the LEVELLERS, these wrongly
 named "free spirits"--as glib-tongued and scribe-fingered slaves of
 the democratic taste and its "modern ideas" all of them men without
 solitude, without personal solitude, blunt honest fellows to whom
 neither courage nor honourable conduct ought to be denied, only, they
 are not free, and are ludicrously superficial, especially in their
 innate partiality for seeing the cause of almost ALL human misery and
 failure in the old forms in which society has hitherto existed--a notion
 which happily inverts the truth entirely! What they would fain attain
 with all their strength, is the universal, green-meadow happiness of the
 herd, together with security, safety, comfort, and alleviation of life
 for every one, their two most frequently chanted songs and doctrines
 are called "Equality of Rights" and "Sympathy with All Sufferers"--and
 suffering itself is looked upon by them as something which must be
 DONE AWAY WITH. We opposite ones, however, who have opened our eye and
 conscience to the question how and where the plant "man" has hitherto
 grown most vigorously, believe that this has always taken place under
 the opposite conditions, that for this end the dangerousness of his
 situation had to be increased enormously, his inventive faculty and
 dissembling power (his "spirit") had to develop into subtlety and daring
 under long oppression and compulsion, and his Will to Life had to be
 increased to the unconditioned Will to Power--we believe that severity,
 violence, slavery, danger in the street and in the heart, secrecy,
 stoicism, tempter's art and devilry of every kind,--that everything
 wicked, terrible, tyrannical, predatory, and serpentine in man, serves
 as well for the elevation of the human species as its opposite--we do
 not even say enough when we only say THIS MUCH, and in any case we
 find ourselves here, both with our speech and our silence, at the OTHER
 extreme of all modern ideology and gregarious desirability, as their
 antipodes perhaps? What wonder that we "free spirits" are not exactly
 the most communicative spirits? that we do not wish to betray in every
 respect WHAT a spirit can free itself from, and WHERE perhaps it will
 then be driven? And as to the import of the dangerous formula, "Beyond
 Good and Evil," with which we at least avoid confusion, we ARE something
 else than "libres-penseurs," "liben pensatori" "free-thinkers,"
 and whatever these honest advocates of "modern ideas" like to call
 themselves. Having been at home, or at least guests, in many realms of
 the spirit, having escaped again and again from the gloomy, agreeable
 nooks in which preferences and prejudices, youth, origin, the accident
 of men and books, or even the weariness of travel seemed to confine us,
 full of malice against the seductions of dependency which he concealed
 in honours, money, positions, or exaltation of the senses, grateful even
 for distress and the vicissitudes of illness, because they always free
 us from some rule, and its "prejudice," grateful to the God, devil,
 sheep, and worm in us, inquisitive to a fault, investigators to the
 point of cruelty, with unhesitating fingers for the intangible, with
 teeth and stomachs for the most indigestible, ready for any business
 that requires sagacity and acute senses, ready for every adventure,
 owing to an excess of "free will", with anterior and posterior souls,
 into the ultimate intentions of which it is difficult to pry, with
 foregrounds and backgrounds to the end of which no foot may run, hidden
 ones under the mantles of light, appropriators, although we resemble
 heirs and spendthrifts, arrangers and collectors from morning till
 night, misers of our wealth and our full-crammed drawers, economical
 in learning and forgetting, inventive in scheming, sometimes proud of
 tables of categories, sometimes pedants, sometimes night-owls of
 work even in full day, yea, if necessary, even scarecrows--and it is
 necessary nowadays, that is to say, inasmuch as we are the born, sworn,
 jealous friends of SOLITUDE, of our own profoundest midnight and midday
 solitude--such kind of men are we, we free spirits! And perhaps ye are
 also something of the same kind, ye coming ones? ye NEW philosophers?
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III. THE RELIGIOUS MOOD
 
 
 45. The human soul and its limits, the range of man's inner experiences
 hitherto attained, the heights, depths, and distances of these
 experiences, the entire history of the soul UP TO THE PRESENT TIME,
 and its still unexhausted possibilities: this is the preordained
 hunting-domain for a born psychologist and lover of a "big hunt". But
 how often must he say despairingly to himself: "A single individual!
 alas, only a single individual! and this great forest, this virgin
 forest!" So he would like to have some hundreds of hunting assistants,
 and fine trained hounds, that he could send into the history of the
 human soul, to drive HIS game together. In vain: again and again he
 experiences, profoundly and bitterly, how difficult it is to find
 assistants and dogs for all the things that directly excite his
 curiosity. The evil of sending scholars into new and dangerous
 hunting-domains, where courage, sagacity, and subtlety in every sense
 are required, is that they are no longer serviceable just when the "BIG
 hunt," and also the great danger commences,--it is precisely then that
 they lose their keen eye and nose. In order, for instance, to divine and
 determine what sort of history the problem of KNOWLEDGE AND CONSCIENCE
 has hitherto had in the souls of homines religiosi, a person would
 perhaps himself have to possess as profound, as bruised, as immense an
 experience as the intellectual conscience of Pascal; and then he would
 still require that wide-spread heaven of clear, wicked spirituality,
 which, from above, would be able to oversee, arrange, and effectively
 formulize this mass of dangerous and painful experiences.--But who
 could do me this service! And who would have time to wait for such
 servants!--they evidently appear too rarely, they are so improbable at
 all times! Eventually one must do everything ONESELF in order to know
 something; which means that one has MUCH to do!--But a curiosity like
 mine is once for all the most agreeable of vices--pardon me! I mean to
 say that the love of truth has its reward in heaven, and already upon
 earth.
 
 46. Faith, such as early Christianity desired, and not infrequently
 achieved in the midst of a skeptical and southernly free-spirited world,
 which had centuries of struggle between philosophical schools behind
 it and in it, counting besides the education in tolerance which
 the Imperium Romanum gave--this faith is NOT that sincere, austere
 slave-faith by which perhaps a Luther or a Cromwell, or some other
 northern barbarian of the spirit remained attached to his God and
 Christianity, it is much rather the faith of Pascal, which resembles in
 a terrible manner a continuous suicide of reason--a tough, long-lived,
 worm-like reason, which is not to be slain at once and with a single
 blow. The Christian faith from the beginning, is sacrifice the sacrifice
 of all freedom, all pride, all self-confidence of spirit, it is at
 the same time subjection, self-derision, and self-mutilation. There is
 cruelty and religious Phoenicianism in this faith, which is adapted to a
 tender, many-sided, and very fastidious conscience, it takes for granted
 that the subjection of the spirit is indescribably PAINFUL, that all the
 past and all the habits of such a spirit resist the absurdissimum, in
 the form of which "faith" comes to it. Modern men, with their obtuseness
 as regards all Christian nomenclature, have no longer the sense for the
 terribly superlative conception which was implied to an antique taste by
 the paradox of the formula, "God on the Cross". Hitherto there had never
 and nowhere been such boldness in inversion, nor anything at once so
 dreadful, questioning, and questionable as this formula: it promised a
 transvaluation of all ancient values--It was the Orient, the PROFOUND
 Orient, it was the Oriental slave who thus took revenge on Rome and its
 noble, light-minded toleration, on the Roman "Catholicism" of non-faith,
 and it was always not the faith, but the freedom from the faith, the
 half-stoical and smiling indifference to the seriousness of the faith,
 which made the slaves indignant at their masters and revolt against
 them. "Enlightenment" causes revolt, for the slave desires the
 unconditioned, he understands nothing but the tyrannous, even in morals,
 he loves as he hates, without NUANCE, to the very depths, to the point
 of pain, to the point of sickness--his many HIDDEN sufferings make
 him revolt against the noble taste which seems to DENY suffering. The
 skepticism with regard to suffering, fundamentally only an attitude of
 aristocratic morality, was not the least of the causes, also, of the
 last great slave-insurrection which began with the French Revolution.
 
 47. Wherever the religious neurosis has appeared on the earth so far,
 we find it connected with three dangerous prescriptions as to regimen:
 solitude, fasting, and sexual abstinence--but without its being possible
 to determine with certainty which is cause and which is effect, or IF
 any relation at all of cause and effect exists there. This latter doubt
 is justified by the fact that one of the most regular symptoms among
 savage as well as among civilized peoples is the most sudden and
 excessive sensuality, which then with equal suddenness transforms into
 penitential paroxysms, world-renunciation, and will-renunciation, both
 symptoms perhaps explainable as disguised epilepsy? But nowhere is it
 MORE obligatory to put aside explanations around no other type has there
 grown such a mass of absurdity and superstition, no other type seems to
 have been more interesting to men and even to philosophers--perhaps it
 is time to become just a little indifferent here, to learn caution, or,
 better still, to look AWAY, TO GO AWAY--Yet in the background of the
 most recent philosophy, that of Schopenhauer, we find almost as the
 problem in itself, this terrible note of interrogation of the religious
 crisis and awakening. How is the negation of will POSSIBLE? how is the
 saint possible?--that seems to have been the very question with which
 Schopenhauer made a start and became a philosopher. And thus it was a
 genuine Schopenhauerian consequence, that his most convinced adherent
 (perhaps also his last, as far as Germany is concerned), namely, Richard
 Wagner, should bring his own life-work to an end just here, and should
 finally put that terrible and eternal type upon the stage as Kundry,
 type vecu, and as it loved and lived, at the very time that the
 mad-doctors in almost all European countries had an opportunity to study
 the type close at hand, wherever the religious neurosis--or as I call
 it, "the religious mood"--made its latest epidemical outbreak and
 display as the "Salvation Army"--If it be a question, however, as to
 what has been so extremely interesting to men of all sorts in all ages,
 and even to philosophers, in the whole phenomenon of the saint, it
 is undoubtedly the appearance of the miraculous therein--namely, the
 immediate SUCCESSION OF OPPOSITES, of states of the soul regarded as
 morally antithetical: it was believed here to be self-evident that
 a "bad man" was all at once turned into a "saint," a good man. The
 hitherto existing psychology was wrecked at this point, is it not
 possible it may have happened principally because psychology had placed
 itself under the dominion of morals, because it BELIEVED in oppositions
 of moral values, and saw, read, and INTERPRETED these oppositions
 into the text and facts of the case? What? "Miracle" only an error of
 interpretation? A lack of philology?
 
 48. It seems that the Latin races are far more deeply attached to their
 Catholicism than we Northerners are to Christianity generally, and
 that consequently unbelief in Catholic countries means something quite
 different from what it does among Protestants--namely, a sort of revolt
 against the spirit of the race, while with us it is rather a return to
 the spirit (or non-spirit) of the race.
 
 We Northerners undoubtedly derive our origin from barbarous races, even
 as regards our talents for religion--we have POOR talents for it. One
 may make an exception in the case of the Celts, who have theretofore
 furnished also the best soil for Christian infection in the North: the
 Christian ideal blossomed forth in France as much as ever the pale sun
 of the north would allow it. How strangely pious for our taste are still
 these later French skeptics, whenever there is any Celtic blood in their
 origin! How Catholic, how un-German does Auguste Comte's Sociology
 seem to us, with the Roman logic of its instincts! How Jesuitical, that
 amiable and shrewd cicerone of Port Royal, Sainte-Beuve, in spite of all
 his hostility to Jesuits! And even Ernest Renan: how inaccessible to
 us Northerners does the language of such a Renan appear, in whom
 every instant the merest touch of religious thrill throws his refined
 voluptuous and comfortably couching soul off its balance! Let us repeat
 after him these fine sentences--and what wickedness and haughtiness is
 immediately aroused by way of answer in our probably less beautiful but
 harder souls, that is to say, in our more German souls!--"DISONS DONC
 HARDIMENT QUE LA RELIGION EST UN PRODUIT DE L'HOMME NORMAL, QUE L'HOMME
 EST LE PLUS DANS LE VRAI QUANT IL EST LE PLUS RELIGIEUX ET LE PLUS
 ASSURE D'UNE DESTINEE INFINIE.... C'EST QUAND IL EST BON QU'IL VEUT QUE
 LA VIRTU CORRESPONDE A UN ORDER ETERNAL, C'EST QUAND IL CONTEMPLE LES
 CHOSES D'UNE MANIERE DESINTERESSEE QU'IL TROUVE LA MORT REVOLTANTE ET
 ABSURDE. COMMENT NE PAS SUPPOSER QUE C'EST DANS CES MOMENTS-LA, QUE
 L'HOMME VOIT LE MIEUX?"... These sentences are so extremely ANTIPODAL
 to my ears and habits of thought, that in my first impulse of rage
 on finding them, I wrote on the margin, "LA NIAISERIE RELIGIEUSE PAR
 EXCELLENCE!"--until in my later rage I even took a fancy to them, these
 sentences with their truth absolutely inverted! It is so nice and such a
 distinction to have one's own antipodes!
 
 49. That which is so astonishing in the religious life of the ancient
 Greeks is the irrestrainable stream of GRATITUDE which it pours
 forth--it is a very superior kind of man who takes SUCH an attitude
 towards nature and life.--Later on, when the populace got the upper hand
 in Greece, FEAR became rampant also in religion; and Christianity was
 preparing itself.
 
 50. The passion for God: there are churlish, honest-hearted, and
 importunate kinds of it, like that of Luther--the whole of Protestantism
 lacks the southern DELICATEZZA. There is an Oriental exaltation of the
 mind in it, like that of an undeservedly favoured or elevated slave, as
 in the case of St. Augustine, for instance, who lacks in an offensive
 manner, all nobility in bearing and desires. There is a feminine
 tenderness and sensuality in it, which modestly and unconsciously longs
 for a UNIO MYSTICA ET PHYSICA, as in the case of Madame de Guyon. In
 many cases it appears, curiously enough, as the disguise of a girl's
 or youth's puberty; here and there even as the hysteria of an old maid,
 also as her last ambition. The Church has frequently canonized the woman
 in such a case.
 
 51. The mightiest men have hitherto always bowed reverently before
 the saint, as the enigma of self-subjugation and utter voluntary
 privation--why did they thus bow? They divined in him--and as it were
 behind the questionableness of his frail and wretched appearance--the
 superior force which wished to test itself by such a subjugation; the
 strength of will, in which they recognized their own strength and
 love of power, and knew how to honour it: they honoured something
 in themselves when they honoured the saint. In addition to this, the
 contemplation of the saint suggested to them a suspicion: such an
 enormity of self-negation and anti-naturalness will not have been
 coveted for nothing--they have said, inquiringly. There is perhaps a
 reason for it, some very great danger, about which the ascetic might
 wish to be more accurately informed through his secret interlocutors and
 visitors? In a word, the mighty ones of the world learned to have a new
 fear before him, they divined a new power, a strange, still unconquered
 enemy:--it was the "Will to Power" which obliged them to halt before the
 saint. They had to question him.
 
 52. In the Jewish "Old Testament," the book of divine justice, there are
 men, things, and sayings on such an immense scale, that Greek and Indian
 literature has nothing to compare with it. One stands with fear and
 reverence before those stupendous remains of what man was formerly, and
 one has sad thoughts about old Asia and its little out-pushed peninsula
 Europe, which would like, by all means, to figure before Asia as the
 "Progress of Mankind." To be sure, he who is himself only a slender,
 tame house-animal, and knows only the wants of a house-animal (like
 our cultured people of today, including the Christians of "cultured"
 Christianity), need neither be amazed nor even sad amid those ruins--the
 taste for the Old Testament is a touchstone with respect to "great" and
 "small": perhaps he will find that the New Testament, the book of grace,
 still appeals more to his heart (there is much of the odour of the
 genuine, tender, stupid beadsman and petty soul in it). To have bound
 up this New Testament (a kind of ROCOCO of taste in every respect) along
 with the Old Testament into one book, as the "Bible," as "The Book in
 Itself," is perhaps the greatest audacity and "sin against the Spirit"
 which literary Europe has upon its conscience.
 
 53. Why Atheism nowadays? "The father" in God is thoroughly refuted;
 equally so "the judge," "the rewarder." Also his "free will": he does
 not hear--and even if he did, he would not know how to help. The worst
 is that he seems incapable of communicating himself clearly; is he
 uncertain?--This is what I have made out (by questioning and listening
 at a variety of conversations) to be the cause of the decline of
 European theism; it appears to me that though the religious instinct is
 in vigorous growth,--it rejects the theistic satisfaction with profound
 distrust.
 
 54. What does all modern philosophy mainly do? Since Descartes--and
 indeed more in defiance of him than on the basis of his procedure--an
 ATTENTAT has been made on the part of all philosophers on the old
 conception of the soul, under the guise of a criticism of the subject
 and predicate conception--that is to say, an ATTENTAT on the
 fundamental presupposition of Christian doctrine. Modern philosophy,
 as epistemological skepticism, is secretly or openly ANTI-CHRISTIAN,
 although (for keener ears, be it said) by no means anti-religious.
 Formerly, in effect, one believed in "the soul" as one believed in
 grammar and the grammatical subject: one said, "I" is the condition,
 "think" is the predicate and is conditioned--to think is an activity for
 which one MUST suppose a subject as cause. The attempt was then made,
 with marvelous tenacity and subtlety, to see if one could not get out
 of this net,--to see if the opposite was not perhaps true: "think" the
 condition, and "I" the conditioned; "I," therefore, only a synthesis
 which has been MADE by thinking itself. KANT really wished to prove
 that, starting from the subject, the subject could not be proved--nor
 the object either: the possibility of an APPARENT EXISTENCE of the
 subject, and therefore of "the soul," may not always have been strange
 to him,--the thought which once had an immense power on earth as the
 Vedanta philosophy.
 
 55. There is a great ladder of religious cruelty, with many rounds; but
 three of these are the most important. Once on a time men sacrificed
 human beings to their God, and perhaps just those they loved the
 best--to this category belong the firstling sacrifices of all primitive
 religions, and also the sacrifice of the Emperor Tiberius in the
 Mithra-Grotto on the Island of Capri, that most terrible of all Roman
 anachronisms. Then, during the moral epoch of mankind, they sacrificed
 to their God the strongest instincts they possessed, their "nature";
 THIS festal joy shines in the cruel glances of ascetics and
 "anti-natural" fanatics. Finally, what still remained to be sacrificed?
 Was it not necessary in the end for men to sacrifice everything
 comforting, holy, healing, all hope, all faith in hidden harmonies, in
 future blessedness and justice? Was it not necessary to sacrifice God
 himself, and out of cruelty to themselves to worship stone, stupidity,
 gravity, fate, nothingness? To sacrifice God for nothingness--this
 paradoxical mystery of the ultimate cruelty has been reserved for the
 rising generation; we all know something thereof already.
 
 56. Whoever, like myself, prompted by some enigmatical desire, has long
 endeavoured to go to the bottom of the question of pessimism and free it
 from the half-Christian, half-German narrowness and stupidity in which
 it has finally presented itself to this century, namely, in the form of
 Schopenhauer's philosophy; whoever, with an Asiatic and super-Asiatic
 eye, has actually looked inside, and into the most world-renouncing of
 all possible modes of thought--beyond good and evil, and no longer
 like Buddha and Schopenhauer, under the dominion and delusion of
 morality,--whoever has done this, has perhaps just thereby, without
 really desiring it, opened his eyes to behold the opposite ideal: the
 ideal of the most world-approving, exuberant, and vivacious man, who has
 not only learnt to compromise and arrange with that which was and
 is, but wishes to have it again AS IT WAS AND IS, for all eternity,
 insatiably calling out da capo, not only to himself, but to the whole
 piece and play; and not only the play, but actually to him who requires
 the play--and makes it necessary; because he always requires
 himself anew--and makes himself necessary.--What? And this would not
 be--circulus vitiosus deus?
 
 57. The distance, and as it were the space around man, grows with the
 strength of his intellectual vision and insight: his world becomes
 profounder; new stars, new enigmas, and notions are ever coming into
 view. Perhaps everything on which the intellectual eye has exercised
 its acuteness and profundity has just been an occasion for its exercise,
 something of a game, something for children and childish minds. Perhaps
 the most solemn conceptions that have caused the most fighting and
 suffering, the conceptions "God" and "sin," will one day seem to us of
 no more importance than a child's plaything or a child's pain seems to
 an old man;--and perhaps another plaything and another pain will then
 be necessary once more for "the old man"--always childish enough, an
 eternal child!
 
 58. Has it been observed to what extent outward idleness, or
 semi-idleness, is necessary to a real religious life (alike for its
 favourite microscopic labour of self-examination, and for its soft
 placidity called "prayer," the state of perpetual readiness for the
 "coming of God"), I mean the idleness with a good conscience, the
 idleness of olden times and of blood, to which the aristocratic
 sentiment that work is DISHONOURING--that it vulgarizes body and
 soul--is not quite unfamiliar? And that consequently the modern, noisy,
 time-engrossing, conceited, foolishly proud laboriousness educates
 and prepares for "unbelief" more than anything else? Among these, for
 instance, who are at present living apart from religion in Germany, I
 find "free-thinkers" of diversified species and origin, but above all
 a majority of those in whom laboriousness from generation to generation
 has dissolved the religious instincts; so that they no longer know what
 purpose religions serve, and only note their existence in the world
 with a kind of dull astonishment. They feel themselves already fully
 occupied, these good people, be it by their business or by their
 pleasures, not to mention the "Fatherland," and the newspapers, and
 their "family duties"; it seems that they have no time whatever left
 for religion; and above all, it is not obvious to them whether it is a
 question of a new business or a new pleasure--for it is impossible, they
 say to themselves, that people should go to church merely to spoil
 their tempers. They are by no means enemies of religious customs;
 should certain circumstances, State affairs perhaps, require their
 participation in such customs, they do what is required, as so many
 things are done--with a patient and unassuming seriousness, and without
 much curiosity or discomfort;--they live too much apart and outside
 to feel even the necessity for a FOR or AGAINST in such matters. Among
 those indifferent persons may be reckoned nowadays the majority of
 German Protestants of the middle classes, especially in the great
 laborious centres of trade and commerce; also the majority of laborious
 scholars, and the entire University personnel (with the exception of
 the theologians, whose existence and possibility there always gives
 psychologists new and more subtle puzzles to solve). On the part of
 pious, or merely church-going people, there is seldom any idea of HOW
 MUCH good-will, one might say arbitrary will, is now necessary for a
 German scholar to take the problem of religion seriously; his whole
 profession (and as I have said, his whole workmanlike laboriousness, to
 which he is compelled by his modern conscience) inclines him to a
 lofty and almost charitable serenity as regards religion, with which is
 occasionally mingled a slight disdain for the "uncleanliness" of spirit
 which he takes for granted wherever any one still professes to belong
 to the Church. It is only with the help of history (NOT through his own
 personal experience, therefore) that the scholar succeeds in bringing
 himself to a respectful seriousness, and to a certain timid deference
 in presence of religions; but even when his sentiments have reached the
 stage of gratitude towards them, he has not personally advanced one
 step nearer to that which still maintains itself as Church or as piety;
 perhaps even the contrary. The practical indifference to religious
 matters in the midst of which he has been born and brought up, usually
 sublimates itself in his case into circumspection and cleanliness, which
 shuns contact with religious men and things; and it may be just the
 depth of his tolerance and humanity which prompts him to avoid the
 delicate trouble which tolerance itself brings with it.--Every age has
 its own divine type of naivete, for the discovery of which other ages
 may envy it: and how much naivete--adorable, childlike, and boundlessly
 foolish naivete is involved in this belief of the scholar in
 his superiority, in the good conscience of his tolerance, in the
 unsuspecting, simple certainty with which his instinct treats the
 religious man as a lower and less valuable type, beyond, before, and
 ABOVE which he himself has developed--he, the little arrogant dwarf
 and mob-man, the sedulously alert, head-and-hand drudge of "ideas," of
 "modern ideas"!
 
 59. Whoever has seen deeply into the world has doubtless divined what
 wisdom there is in the fact that men are superficial. It is their
 preservative instinct which teaches them to be flighty, lightsome, and
 false. Here and there one finds a passionate and exaggerated adoration
 of "pure forms" in philosophers as well as in artists: it is not to be
 doubted that whoever has NEED of the cult of the superficial to that
 extent, has at one time or another made an unlucky dive BENEATH it.
 Perhaps there is even an order of rank with respect to those burnt
 children, the born artists who find the enjoyment of life only in trying
 to FALSIFY its image (as if taking wearisome revenge on it), one might
 guess to what degree life has disgusted them, by the extent to which
 they wish to see its image falsified, attenuated, ultrified, and
 deified,--one might reckon the homines religiosi among the artists, as
 their HIGHEST rank. It is the profound, suspicious fear of an incurable
 pessimism which compels whole centuries to fasten their teeth into a
 religious interpretation of existence: the fear of the instinct which
 divines that truth might be attained TOO soon, before man has become
 strong enough, hard enough, artist enough.... Piety, the "Life in God,"
 regarded in this light, would appear as the most elaborate and
 ultimate product of the FEAR of truth, as artist-adoration
 and artist-intoxication in presence of the most logical of all
 falsifications, as the will to the inversion of truth, to untruth at
 any price. Perhaps there has hitherto been no more effective means of
 beautifying man than piety, by means of it man can become so artful, so
 superficial, so iridescent, and so good, that his appearance no longer
 offends.
 
 60. To love mankind FOR GOD'S SAKE--this has so far been the noblest and
 remotest sentiment to which mankind has attained. That love to mankind,
 without any redeeming intention in the background, is only an ADDITIONAL
 folly and brutishness, that the inclination to this love has first to
 get its proportion, its delicacy, its gram of salt and sprinkling
 of ambergris from a higher inclination--whoever first perceived
 and "experienced" this, however his tongue may have stammered as it
 attempted to express such a delicate matter, let him for all time be
 holy and respected, as the man who has so far flown highest and gone
 astray in the finest fashion!
 
 61. The philosopher, as WE free spirits understand him--as the man of
 the greatest responsibility, who has the conscience for the general
 development of mankind,--will use religion for his disciplining and
 educating work, just as he will use the contemporary political
 and economic conditions. The selecting and disciplining
 influence--destructive, as well as creative and fashioning--which can be
 exercised by means of religion is manifold and varied, according to the
 sort of people placed under its spell and protection. For those who are
 strong and independent, destined and trained to command, in whom the
 judgment and skill of a ruling race is incorporated, religion is
 an additional means for overcoming resistance in the exercise of
 authority--as a bond which binds rulers and subjects in common,
 betraying and surrendering to the former the conscience of the latter,
 their inmost heart, which would fain escape obedience. And in the
 case of the unique natures of noble origin, if by virtue of superior
 spirituality they should incline to a more retired and contemplative
 life, reserving to themselves only the more refined forms of government
 (over chosen disciples or members of an order), religion itself may
 be used as a means for obtaining peace from the noise and trouble of
 managing GROSSER affairs, and for securing immunity from the UNAVOIDABLE
 filth of all political agitation. The Brahmins, for instance, understood
 this fact. With the help of a religious organization, they secured to
 themselves the power of nominating kings for the people, while their
 sentiments prompted them to keep apart and outside, as men with a higher
 and super-regal mission. At the same time religion gives inducement and
 opportunity to some of the subjects to qualify themselves for future
 ruling and commanding the slowly ascending ranks and classes, in which,
 through fortunate marriage customs, volitional power and delight in
 self-control are on the increase. To them religion offers sufficient
 incentives and temptations to aspire to higher intellectuality, and to
 experience the sentiments of authoritative self-control, of silence, and
 of solitude. Asceticism and Puritanism are almost indispensable means of
 educating and ennobling a race which seeks to rise above its hereditary
 baseness and work itself upwards to future supremacy. And finally, to
 ordinary men, to the majority of the people, who exist for service and
 general utility, and are only so far entitled to exist, religion gives
 invaluable contentedness with their lot and condition, peace of heart,
 ennoblement of obedience, additional social happiness and sympathy,
 with something of transfiguration and embellishment, something of
 justification of all the commonplaceness, all the meanness, all
 the semi-animal poverty of their souls. Religion, together with the
 religious significance of life, sheds sunshine over such perpetually
 harassed men, and makes even their own aspect endurable to them, it
 operates upon them as the Epicurean philosophy usually operates upon
 sufferers of a higher order, in a refreshing and refining manner,
 almost TURNING suffering TO ACCOUNT, and in the end even hallowing and
 vindicating it. There is perhaps nothing so admirable in Christianity
 and Buddhism as their art of teaching even the lowest to elevate
 themselves by piety to a seemingly higher order of things, and thereby
 to retain their satisfaction with the actual world in which they find it
 difficult enough to live--this very difficulty being necessary.
 
 62. To be sure--to make also the bad counter-reckoning against such
 religions, and to bring to light their secret dangers--the cost is
 always excessive and terrible when religions do NOT operate as an
 educational and disciplinary medium in the hands of the philosopher, but
 rule voluntarily and PARAMOUNTLY, when they wish to be the final end,
 and not a means along with other means. Among men, as among all other
 animals, there is a surplus of defective, diseased, degenerating,
 infirm, and necessarily suffering individuals; the successful cases,
 among men also, are always the exception; and in view of the fact that
 man is THE ANIMAL NOT YET PROPERLY ADAPTED TO HIS ENVIRONMENT, the rare
 exception. But worse still. The higher the type a man represents, the
 greater is the improbability that he will SUCCEED; the accidental, the
 law of irrationality in the general constitution of mankind, manifests
 itself most terribly in its destructive effect on the higher orders of
 men, the conditions of whose lives are delicate, diverse, and difficult
 to determine. What, then, is the attitude of the two greatest religions
 above-mentioned to the SURPLUS of failures in life? They endeavour
 to preserve and keep alive whatever can be preserved; in fact, as the
 religions FOR SUFFERERS, they take the part of these upon principle;
 they are always in favour of those who suffer from life as from a
 disease, and they would fain treat every other experience of life as
 false and impossible. However highly we may esteem this indulgent and
 preservative care (inasmuch as in applying to others, it has applied,
 and applies also to the highest and usually the most suffering type of
 man), the hitherto PARAMOUNT religions--to give a general appreciation
 of them--are among the principal causes which have kept the type of
 "man" upon a lower level--they have preserved too much THAT WHICH SHOULD
 HAVE PERISHED. One has to thank them for invaluable services; and who is
 sufficiently rich in gratitude not to feel poor at the contemplation
 of all that the "spiritual men" of Christianity have done for Europe
 hitherto! But when they had given comfort to the sufferers, courage to
 the oppressed and despairing, a staff and support to the helpless,
 and when they had allured from society into convents and spiritual
 penitentiaries the broken-hearted and distracted: what else had they
 to do in order to work systematically in that fashion, and with a good
 conscience, for the preservation of all the sick and suffering, which
 means, in deed and in truth, to work for the DETERIORATION OF THE
 EUROPEAN RACE? To REVERSE all estimates of value--THAT is what they
 had to do! And to shatter the strong, to spoil great hopes, to cast
 suspicion on the delight in beauty, to break down everything autonomous,
 manly, conquering, and imperious--all instincts which are natural to the
 highest and most successful type of "man"--into uncertainty, distress
 of conscience, and self-destruction; forsooth, to invert all love of the
 earthly and of supremacy over the earth, into hatred of the earth and
 earthly things--THAT is the task the Church imposed on itself, and
 was obliged to impose, until, according to its standard of value,
 "unworldliness," "unsensuousness," and "higher man" fused into one
 sentiment. If one could observe the strangely painful, equally coarse
 and refined comedy of European Christianity with the derisive and
 impartial eye of an Epicurean god, I should think one would never cease
 marvelling and laughing; does it not actually seem that some single will
 has ruled over Europe for eighteen centuries in order to make a SUBLIME
 ABORTION of man? He, however, who, with opposite requirements (no longer
 Epicurean) and with some divine hammer in his hand, could approach this
 almost voluntary degeneration and stunting of mankind, as exemplified in
 the European Christian (Pascal, for instance), would he not have to
 cry aloud with rage, pity, and horror: "Oh, you bunglers, presumptuous
 pitiful bunglers, what have you done! Was that a work for your hands?
 How you have hacked and botched my finest stone! What have you presumed
 to do!"--I should say that Christianity has hitherto been the most
 portentous of presumptions. Men, not great enough, nor hard enough,
 to be entitled as artists to take part in fashioning MAN; men,
 not sufficiently strong and far-sighted to ALLOW, with sublime
 self-constraint, the obvious law of the thousandfold failures and
 perishings to prevail; men, not sufficiently noble to see the radically
 different grades of rank and intervals of rank that separate man from
 man:--SUCH men, with their "equality before God," have hitherto swayed
 the destiny of Europe; until at last a dwarfed, almost ludicrous species
 has been produced, a gregarious animal, something obliging, sickly,
 mediocre, the European of the present day.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV. APOPHTHEGMS AND INTERLUDES
 
 
 63. He who is a thorough teacher takes things seriously--and even
 himself--only in relation to his pupils.
 
 64. "Knowledge for its own sake"--that is the last snare laid by
 morality: we are thereby completely entangled in morals once more.
 
 65. The charm of knowledge would be small, were it not so much shame has
 to be overcome on the way to it.
 
 65A. We are most dishonourable towards our God: he is not PERMITTED to
 sin.
 
 66. The tendency of a person to allow himself to be degraded, robbed,
 deceived, and exploited might be the diffidence of a God among men.
 
 67. Love to one only is a barbarity, for it is exercised at the expense
 of all others. Love to God also!
 
 68. "I did that," says my memory. "I could not have done that," says my
 pride, and remains inexorable. Eventually--the memory yields.
 
 69. One has regarded life carelessly, if one has failed to see the hand
 that--kills with leniency.
 
 70. If a man has character, he has also his typical experience, which
 always recurs.
 
 71. THE SAGE AS ASTRONOMER.--So long as thou feelest the stars as an
 "above thee," thou lackest the eye of the discerning one.
 
 72. It is not the strength, but the duration of great sentiments that
 makes great men.
 
 73. He who attains his ideal, precisely thereby surpasses it.
 
 73A. Many a peacock hides his tail from every eye--and calls it his
 pride.
 
 74. A man of genius is unbearable, unless he possess at least two things
 besides: gratitude and purity.
 
 75. The degree and nature of a man's sensuality extends to the highest
 altitudes of his spirit.
 
 76. Under peaceful conditions the militant man attacks himself.
 
 77. With his principles a man seeks either to dominate, or justify,
 or honour, or reproach, or conceal his habits: two men with the same
 principles probably seek fundamentally different ends therewith.
 
 78. He who despises himself, nevertheless esteems himself thereby, as a
 despiser.
 
 79. A soul which knows that it is loved, but does not itself love,
 betrays its sediment: its dregs come up.
 
 80. A thing that is explained ceases to concern us--What did the God
 mean who gave the advice, "Know thyself!" Did it perhaps imply "Cease to
 be concerned about thyself! become objective!"--And Socrates?--And the
 "scientific man"?
 
 81. It is terrible to die of thirst at sea. Is it necessary that you
 should so salt your truth that it will no longer--quench thirst?
 
 82. "Sympathy for all"--would be harshness and tyranny for THEE, my good
 neighbour.
 
 83. INSTINCT--When the house is on fire one forgets even the
 dinner--Yes, but one recovers it from among the ashes.
 
 84. Woman learns how to hate in proportion as she--forgets how to charm.
 
 85. The same emotions are in man and woman, but in different TEMPO, on
 that account man and woman never cease to misunderstand each other.
 
 86. In the background of all their personal vanity, women themselves
 have still their impersonal scorn--for "woman".
 
 87. FETTERED HEART, FREE SPIRIT--When one firmly fetters one's heart
 and keeps it prisoner, one can allow one's spirit many liberties: I said
 this once before But people do not believe it when I say so, unless they
 know it already.
 
 88. One begins to distrust very clever persons when they become
 embarrassed.
 
 89. Dreadful experiences raise the question whether he who experiences
 them is not something dreadful also.
 
 90. Heavy, melancholy men turn lighter, and come temporarily to their
 surface, precisely by that which makes others heavy--by hatred and love.
 
 91. So cold, so icy, that one burns one's finger at the touch of him!
 Every hand that lays hold of him shrinks back!--And for that very reason
 many think him red-hot.
 
 92. Who has not, at one time or another--sacrificed himself for the sake
 of his good name?
 
 93. In affability there is no hatred of men, but precisely on that
 account a great deal too much contempt of men.
 
 94. The maturity of man--that means, to have reacquired the seriousness
 that one had as a child at play.
 
 95. To be ashamed of one's immorality is a step on the ladder at the end
 of which one is ashamed also of one's morality.
 
 96. One should part from life as Ulysses parted from Nausicaa--blessing
 it rather than in love with it.
 
 97. What? A great man? I always see merely the play-actor of his own
 ideal.
 
 98. When one trains one's conscience, it kisses one while it bites.
 
 99. THE DISAPPOINTED ONE SPEAKS--"I listened for the echo and I heard
 only praise."
 
 100. We all feign to ourselves that we are simpler than we are, we thus
 relax ourselves away from our fellows.
 
 101. A discerning one might easily regard himself at present as the
 animalization of God.
 
 102. Discovering reciprocal love should really disenchant the lover with
 regard to the beloved. "What! She is modest enough to love even you? Or
 stupid enough? Or--or---"
 
 103. THE DANGER IN HAPPINESS.--"Everything now turns out best for me, I
 now love every fate:--who would like to be my fate?"
 
 104. Not their love of humanity, but the impotence of their love,
 prevents the Christians of today--burning us.
 
 105. The pia fraus is still more repugnant to the taste (the "piety")
 of the free spirit (the "pious man of knowledge") than the impia fraus.
 Hence the profound lack of judgment, in comparison with the Church,
 characteristic of the type "free spirit"--as ITS non-freedom.
 
 106. By means of music the very passions enjoy themselves.
 
 107. A sign of strong character, when once the resolution has been
 taken, to shut the ear even to the best counter-arguments. Occasionally,
 therefore, a will to stupidity.
 
 108. There is no such thing as moral phenomena, but only a moral
 interpretation of phenomena.
 
 109. The criminal is often enough not equal to his deed: he extenuates
 and maligns it.
 
 110. The advocates of a criminal are seldom artists enough to turn the
 beautiful terribleness of the deed to the advantage of the doer.
 
 111. Our vanity is most difficult to wound just when our pride has been
 wounded.
 
 112. To him who feels himself preordained to contemplation and not to
 belief, all believers are too noisy and obtrusive; he guards against
 them.
 
 113. "You want to prepossess him in your favour? Then you must be
 embarrassed before him."
 
 114. The immense expectation with regard to sexual love, and the coyness
 in this expectation, spoils all the perspectives of women at the outset.
 
 115. Where there is neither love nor hatred in the game, woman's play is
 mediocre.
 
 116. The great epochs of our life are at the points when we gain courage
 to rebaptize our badness as the best in us.
 
 117. The will to overcome an emotion, is ultimately only the will of
 another, or of several other, emotions.
 
 118. There is an innocence of admiration: it is possessed by him to whom
 it has not yet occurred that he himself may be admired some day.
 
 119. Our loathing of dirt may be so great as to prevent our cleaning
 ourselves--"justifying" ourselves.
 
 120. Sensuality often forces the growth of love too much, so that its
 root remains weak, and is easily torn up.
 
 121. It is a curious thing that God learned Greek when he wished to turn
 author--and that he did not learn it better.
 
 122. To rejoice on account of praise is in many cases merely politeness
 of heart--and the very opposite of vanity of spirit.
 
 123. Even concubinage has been corrupted--by marriage.
 
 124. He who exults at the stake, does not triumph over pain, but because
 of the fact that he does not feel pain where he expected it. A parable.
 
 125. When we have to change an opinion about any one, we charge heavily
 to his account the inconvenience he thereby causes us.
 
 126. A nation is a detour of nature to arrive at six or seven great
 men.--Yes, and then to get round them.
 
 127. In the eyes of all true women science is hostile to the sense of
 shame. They feel as if one wished to peep under their skin with it--or
 worse still! under their dress and finery.
 
 128. The more abstract the truth you wish to teach, the more must you
 allure the senses to it.
 
 129. The devil has the most extensive perspectives for God; on that
 account he keeps so far away from him:--the devil, in effect, as the
 oldest friend of knowledge.
 
 130. What a person IS begins to betray itself when his talent
 decreases,--when he ceases to show what he CAN do. Talent is also an
 adornment; an adornment is also a concealment.
 
 131. The sexes deceive themselves about each other: the reason is that
 in reality they honour and love only themselves (or their own ideal, to
 express it more agreeably). Thus man wishes woman to be peaceable: but
 in fact woman is ESSENTIALLY unpeaceable, like the cat, however well she
 may have assumed the peaceable demeanour.
 
 132. One is punished best for one's virtues.
 
 133. He who cannot find the way to HIS ideal, lives more frivolously and
 shamelessly than the man without an ideal.
 
 134. From the senses originate all trustworthiness, all good conscience,
 all evidence of truth.
 
 135. Pharisaism is not a deterioration of the good man; a considerable
 part of it is rather an essential condition of being good.
 
 136. The one seeks an accoucheur for his thoughts, the other seeks some
 one whom he can assist: a good conversation thus originates.
 
 137. In intercourse with scholars and artists one readily makes mistakes
 of opposite kinds: in a remarkable scholar one not infrequently finds
 a mediocre man; and often, even in a mediocre artist, one finds a very
 remarkable man.
 
 138. We do the same when awake as when dreaming: we only invent and
 imagine him with whom we have intercourse--and forget it immediately.
 
 139. In revenge and in love woman is more barbarous than man.
 
 140. ADVICE AS A RIDDLE.--"If the band is not to break, bite it
 first--secure to make!"
 
 141. The belly is the reason why man does not so readily take himself
 for a God.
 
 142. The chastest utterance I ever heard: "Dans le veritable amour c'est
 l'ame qui enveloppe le corps."
 
 143. Our vanity would like what we do best to pass precisely for what is
 most difficult to us.--Concerning the origin of many systems of morals.
 
 144. When a woman has scholarly inclinations there is generally
 something wrong with her sexual nature. Barrenness itself conduces to a
 certain virility of taste; man, indeed, if I may say so, is "the barren
 animal."
 
 145. Comparing man and woman generally, one may say that woman would
 not have the genius for adornment, if she had not the instinct for the
 SECONDARY role.
 
 146. He who fights with monsters should be careful lest he thereby
 become a monster. And if thou gaze long into an abyss, the abyss will
 also gaze into thee.
 
 147. From old Florentine novels--moreover, from life: Buona femmina e
 mala femmina vuol bastone.--Sacchetti, Nov. 86.
 
 148. To seduce their neighbour to a favourable opinion, and afterwards
 to believe implicitly in this opinion of their neighbour--who can do
 this conjuring trick so well as women?
 
 149. That which an age considers evil is usually an unseasonable echo of
 what was formerly considered good--the atavism of an old ideal.
 
 150. Around the hero everything becomes a tragedy; around the
 demigod everything becomes a satyr-play; and around God everything
 becomes--what? perhaps a "world"?
 
 151. It is not enough to possess a talent: one must also have your
 permission to possess it;--eh, my friends?
 
 152. "Where there is the tree of knowledge, there is always Paradise":
 so say the most ancient and the most modern serpents.
 
 153. What is done out of love always takes place beyond good and evil.
 
 154. Objection, evasion, joyous distrust, and love of irony are signs of
 health; everything absolute belongs to pathology.
 
 155. The sense of the tragic increases and declines with sensuousness.
 
 156. Insanity in individuals is something rare--but in groups, parties,
 nations, and epochs it is the rule.
 
 157. The thought of suicide is a great consolation: by means of it one
 gets successfully through many a bad night.
 
 158. Not only our reason, but also our conscience, truckles to our
 strongest impulse--the tyrant in us.
 
 159. One MUST repay good and ill; but why just to the person who did us
 good or ill?
 
 160. One no longer loves one's knowledge sufficiently after one has
 communicated it.
 
 161. Poets act shamelessly towards their experiences: they exploit them.
 
 162. "Our fellow-creature is not our neighbour, but our neighbour's
 neighbour":--so thinks every nation.
 
 163. Love brings to light the noble and hidden qualities of a lover--his
 rare and exceptional traits: it is thus liable to be deceptive as to his
 normal character.
 
 164. Jesus said to his Jews: "The law was for servants;--love God as I
 love him, as his Son! What have we Sons of God to do with morals!"
 
 165. IN SIGHT OF EVERY PARTY.--A shepherd has always need of a
 bell-wether--or he has himself to be a wether occasionally.
 
 166. One may indeed lie with the mouth; but with the accompanying
 grimace one nevertheless tells the truth.
 
 167. To vigorous men intimacy is a matter of shame--and something
 precious.
 
 168. Christianity gave Eros poison to drink; he did not die of it,
 certainly, but degenerated to Vice.
 
 169. To talk much about oneself may also be a means of concealing
 oneself.
 
 170. In praise there is more obtrusiveness than in blame.
 
 171. Pity has an almost ludicrous effect on a man of knowledge, like
 tender hands on a Cyclops.
 
 172. One occasionally embraces some one or other, out of love to mankind
 (because one cannot embrace all); but this is what one must never
 confess to the individual.
 
 173. One does not hate as long as one disesteems, but only when one
 esteems equal or superior.
 
 174. Ye Utilitarians--ye, too, love the UTILE only as a VEHICLE for
 your inclinations,--ye, too, really find the noise of its wheels
 insupportable!
 
 175. One loves ultimately one's desires, not the thing desired.
 
 176. The vanity of others is only counter to our taste when it is
 counter to our vanity.
 
 177. With regard to what "truthfulness" is, perhaps nobody has ever been
 sufficiently truthful.
 
 178. One does not believe in the follies of clever men: what a
 forfeiture of the rights of man!
 
 179. The consequences of our actions seize us by the forelock, very
 indifferent to the fact that we have meanwhile "reformed."
 
 180. There is an innocence in lying which is the sign of good faith in a
 cause.
 
 181. It is inhuman to bless when one is being cursed.
 
 182. The familiarity of superiors embitters one, because it may not be
 returned.
 
 183. "I am affected, not because you have deceived me, but because I can
 no longer believe in you."
 
 184. There is a haughtiness of kindness which has the appearance of
 wickedness.
 
 185. "I dislike him."--Why?--"I am not a match for him."--Did any one
 ever answer so?
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V. THE NATURAL HISTORY OF MORALS
 
 
 186. The moral sentiment in Europe at present is perhaps as subtle,
 belated, diverse, sensitive, and refined, as the "Science of Morals"
 belonging thereto is recent, initial, awkward, and coarse-fingered:--an
 interesting contrast, which sometimes becomes incarnate and obvious
 in the very person of a moralist. Indeed, the expression, "Science
 of Morals" is, in respect to what is designated thereby, far too
 presumptuous and counter to GOOD taste,--which is always a foretaste of
 more modest expressions. One ought to avow with the utmost fairness WHAT
 is still necessary here for a long time, WHAT is alone proper for the
 present: namely, the collection of material, the comprehensive survey
 and classification of an immense domain of delicate sentiments of worth,
 and distinctions of worth, which live, grow, propagate, and perish--and
 perhaps attempts to give a clear idea of the recurring and more common
 forms of these living crystallizations--as preparation for a THEORY OF
 TYPES of morality. To be sure, people have not hitherto been so modest.
 All the philosophers, with a pedantic and ridiculous seriousness,
 demanded of themselves something very much higher, more pretentious, and
 ceremonious, when they concerned themselves with morality as a science:
 they wanted to GIVE A BASIC to morality--and every philosopher hitherto
 has believed that he has given it a basis; morality itself, however, has
 been regarded as something "given." How far from their awkward pride
 was the seemingly insignificant problem--left in dust and decay--of a
 description of forms of morality, notwithstanding that the finest hands
 and senses could hardly be fine enough for it! It was precisely owing to
 moral philosophers' knowing the moral facts imperfectly, in an arbitrary
 epitome, or an accidental abridgement--perhaps as the morality of
 their environment, their position, their church, their Zeitgeist, their
 climate and zone--it was precisely because they were badly instructed
 with regard to nations, eras, and past ages, and were by no means eager
 to know about these matters, that they did not even come in sight of the
 real problems of morals--problems which only disclose themselves by
 a comparison of MANY kinds of morality. In every "Science of Morals"
 hitherto, strange as it may sound, the problem of morality itself
 has been OMITTED: there has been no suspicion that there was anything
 problematic there! That which philosophers called "giving a basis to
 morality," and endeavoured to realize, has, when seen in a right light,
 proved merely a learned form of good FAITH in prevailing morality, a new
 means of its EXPRESSION, consequently just a matter-of-fact within the
 sphere of a definite morality, yea, in its ultimate motive, a sort of
 denial that it is LAWFUL for this morality to be called in question--and
 in any case the reverse of the testing, analyzing, doubting, and
 vivisecting of this very faith. Hear, for instance, with what
 innocence--almost worthy of honour--Schopenhauer represents his own
 task, and draw your conclusions concerning the scientificness of a
 "Science" whose latest master still talks in the strain of children and
 old wives: "The principle," he says (page 136 of the Grundprobleme der
 Ethik), [Footnote: Pages 54-55 of Schopenhauer's Basis of Morality,
 translated by Arthur B. Bullock, M.A. (1903).] "the axiom about the
 purport of which all moralists are PRACTICALLY agreed: neminem laede,
 immo omnes quantum potes juva--is REALLY the proposition which all moral
 teachers strive to establish, ... the REAL basis of ethics which
 has been sought, like the philosopher's stone, for centuries."--The
 difficulty of establishing the proposition referred to may indeed be
 great--it is well known that Schopenhauer also was unsuccessful in his
 efforts; and whoever has thoroughly realized how absurdly false and
 sentimental this proposition is, in a world whose essence is Will
 to Power, may be reminded that Schopenhauer, although a pessimist,
 ACTUALLY--played the flute... daily after dinner: one may read about
 the matter in his biography. A question by the way: a pessimist, a
 repudiator of God and of the world, who MAKES A HALT at morality--who
 assents to morality, and plays the flute to laede-neminem morals, what?
 Is that really--a pessimist?
 
 187. Apart from the value of such assertions as "there is a categorical
 imperative in us," one can always ask: What does such an assertion
 indicate about him who makes it? There are systems of morals which are
 meant to justify their author in the eyes of other people; other systems
 of morals are meant to tranquilize him, and make him self-satisfied;
 with other systems he wants to crucify and humble himself, with others
 he wishes to take revenge, with others to conceal himself, with others
 to glorify himself and gave superiority and distinction,--this system of
 morals helps its author to forget, that system makes him, or something
 of him, forgotten, many a moralist would like to exercise power and
 creative arbitrariness over mankind, many another, perhaps, Kant
 especially, gives us to understand by his morals that "what is estimable
 in me, is that I know how to obey--and with you it SHALL not be
 otherwise than with me!" In short, systems of morals are only a
 SIGN-LANGUAGE OF THE EMOTIONS.
 
 188. In contrast to laisser-aller, every system of morals is a sort of
 tyranny against "nature" and also against "reason", that is, however, no
 objection, unless one should again decree by some system of morals, that
 all kinds of tyranny and unreasonableness are unlawful What is
 essential and invaluable in every system of morals, is that it is a
 long constraint. In order to understand Stoicism, or Port Royal,
 or Puritanism, one should remember the constraint under which every
 language has attained to strength and freedom--the metrical constraint,
 the tyranny of rhyme and rhythm. How much trouble have the poets and
 orators of every nation given themselves!--not excepting some of
 the prose writers of today, in whose ear dwells an inexorable
 conscientiousness--"for the sake of a folly," as utilitarian bunglers
 say, and thereby deem themselves wise--"from submission to arbitrary
 laws," as the anarchists say, and thereby fancy themselves "free," even
 free-spirited. The singular fact remains, however, that everything
 of the nature of freedom, elegance, boldness, dance, and masterly
 certainty, which exists or has existed, whether it be in thought itself,
 or in administration, or in speaking and persuading, in art just as in
 conduct, has only developed by means of the tyranny of such arbitrary
 law, and in all seriousness, it is not at all improbable that precisely
 this is "nature" and "natural"--and not laisser-aller! Every artist
 knows how different from the state of letting himself go, is his
 "most natural" condition, the free arranging, locating, disposing,
 and constructing in the moments of "inspiration"--and how strictly and
 delicately he then obeys a thousand laws, which, by their very rigidness
 and precision, defy all formulation by means of ideas (even the most
 stable idea has, in comparison therewith, something floating, manifold,
 and ambiguous in it). The essential thing "in heaven and in earth" is,
 apparently (to repeat it once more), that there should be long OBEDIENCE
 in the same direction, there thereby results, and has always resulted in
 the long run, something which has made life worth living; for instance,
 virtue, art, music, dancing, reason, spirituality--anything whatever
 that is transfiguring, refined, foolish, or divine. The long bondage of
 the spirit, the distrustful constraint in the communicability of
 ideas, the discipline which the thinker imposed on himself to think
 in accordance with the rules of a church or a court, or conformable
 to Aristotelian premises, the persistent spiritual will to interpret
 everything that happened according to a Christian scheme, and in every
 occurrence to rediscover and justify the Christian God:--all this
 violence, arbitrariness, severity, dreadfulness, and unreasonableness,
 has proved itself the disciplinary means whereby the European spirit has
 attained its strength, its remorseless curiosity and subtle mobility;
 granted also that much irrecoverable strength and spirit had to be
 stifled, suffocated, and spoilt in the process (for here, as everywhere,
 "nature" shows herself as she is, in all her extravagant and INDIFFERENT
 magnificence, which is shocking, but nevertheless noble). That
 for centuries European thinkers only thought in order to prove
 something--nowadays, on the contrary, we are suspicious of every thinker
 who "wishes to prove something"--that it was always settled beforehand
 what WAS TO BE the result of their strictest thinking, as it was perhaps
 in the Asiatic astrology of former times, or as it is still at the
 present day in the innocent, Christian-moral explanation of immediate
 personal events "for the glory of God," or "for the good of the
 soul":--this tyranny, this arbitrariness, this severe and magnificent
 stupidity, has EDUCATED the spirit; slavery, both in the coarser and
 the finer sense, is apparently an indispensable means even of spiritual
 education and discipline. One may look at every system of morals in this
 light: it is "nature" therein which teaches to hate the laisser-aller,
 the too great freedom, and implants the need for limited horizons, for
 immediate duties--it teaches the NARROWING OF PERSPECTIVES, and thus, in
 a certain sense, that stupidity is a condition of life and development.
 "Thou must obey some one, and for a long time; OTHERWISE thou wilt come
 to grief, and lose all respect for thyself"--this seems to me to be the
 moral imperative of nature, which is certainly neither "categorical,"
 as old Kant wished (consequently the "otherwise"), nor does it address
 itself to the individual (what does nature care for the individual!),
 but to nations, races, ages, and ranks; above all, however, to the
 animal "man" generally, to MANKIND.
 
 189. Industrious races find it a great hardship to be idle: it was a
 master stroke of ENGLISH instinct to hallow and begloom Sunday to such
 an extent that the Englishman unconsciously hankers for his week--and
 work-day again:--as a kind of cleverly devised, cleverly intercalated
 FAST, such as is also frequently found in the ancient world (although,
 as is appropriate in southern nations, not precisely with respect
 to work). Many kinds of fasts are necessary; and wherever powerful
 influences and habits prevail, legislators have to see that intercalary
 days are appointed, on which such impulses are fettered, and learn to
 hunger anew. Viewed from a higher standpoint, whole generations and
 epochs, when they show themselves infected with any moral fanaticism,
 seem like those intercalated periods of restraint and fasting, during
 which an impulse learns to humble and submit itself--at the same time
 also to PURIFY and SHARPEN itself; certain philosophical sects likewise
 admit of a similar interpretation (for instance, the Stoa, in the midst
 of Hellenic culture, with the atmosphere rank and overcharged with
 Aphrodisiacal odours).--Here also is a hint for the explanation of the
 paradox, why it was precisely in the most Christian period of European
 history, and in general only under the pressure of Christian sentiments,
 that the sexual impulse sublimated into love (amour-passion).
 
 190. There is something in the morality of Plato which does not really
 belong to Plato, but which only appears in his philosophy, one might
 say, in spite of him: namely, Socratism, for which he himself was
 too noble. "No one desires to injure himself, hence all evil is done
 unwittingly. The evil man inflicts injury on himself; he would not do
 so, however, if he knew that evil is evil. The evil man, therefore, is
 only evil through error; if one free him from error one will necessarily
 make him--good."--This mode of reasoning savours of the POPULACE, who
 perceive only the unpleasant consequences of evil-doing, and practically
 judge that "it is STUPID to do wrong"; while they accept "good" as
 identical with "useful and pleasant," without further thought. As
 regards every system of utilitarianism, one may at once assume that it
 has the same origin, and follow the scent: one will seldom err.--Plato
 did all he could to interpret something refined and noble into the
 tenets of his teacher, and above all to interpret himself into them--he,
 the most daring of all interpreters, who lifted the entire Socrates out
 of the street, as a popular theme and song, to exhibit him in endless
 and impossible modifications--namely, in all his own disguises and
 multiplicities. In jest, and in Homeric language as well, what is the
 Platonic Socrates, if not--[Greek words inserted here.]
 
 191. The old theological problem of "Faith" and "Knowledge," or more
 plainly, of instinct and reason--the question whether, in respect to the
 valuation of things, instinct deserves more authority than rationality,
 which wants to appreciate and act according to motives, according to
 a "Why," that is to say, in conformity to purpose and utility--it
 is always the old moral problem that first appeared in the person of
 Socrates, and had divided men's minds long before Christianity. Socrates
 himself, following, of course, the taste of his talent--that of a
 surpassing dialectician--took first the side of reason; and, in fact,
 what did he do all his life but laugh at the awkward incapacity of the
 noble Athenians, who were men of instinct, like all noble men, and could
 never give satisfactory answers concerning the motives of their actions?
 In the end, however, though silently and secretly, he laughed also
 at himself: with his finer conscience and introspection, he found
 in himself the same difficulty and incapacity. "But why"--he said
 to himself--"should one on that account separate oneself from the
 instincts! One must set them right, and the reason ALSO--one must follow
 the instincts, but at the same time persuade the reason to support them
 with good arguments." This was the real FALSENESS of that great and
 mysterious ironist; he brought his conscience up to the point that he
 was satisfied with a kind of self-outwitting: in fact, he perceived
 the irrationality in the moral judgment.--Plato, more innocent in such
 matters, and without the craftiness of the plebeian, wished to prove to
 himself, at the expenditure of all his strength--the greatest strength
 a philosopher had ever expended--that reason and instinct lead
 spontaneously to one goal, to the good, to "God"; and since Plato, all
 theologians and philosophers have followed the same path--which means
 that in matters of morality, instinct (or as Christians call it,
 "Faith," or as I call it, "the herd") has hitherto triumphed. Unless
 one should make an exception in the case of Descartes, the father of
 rationalism (and consequently the grandfather of the Revolution), who
 recognized only the authority of reason: but reason is only a tool, and
 Descartes was superficial.
 
 192. Whoever has followed the history of a single science, finds in
 its development a clue to the understanding of the oldest and commonest
 processes of all "knowledge and cognizance": there, as here, the
 premature hypotheses, the fictions, the good stupid will to "belief,"
 and the lack of distrust and patience are first developed--our senses
 learn late, and never learn completely, to be subtle, reliable, and
 cautious organs of knowledge. Our eyes find it easier on a given
 occasion to produce a picture already often produced, than to seize upon
 the divergence and novelty of an impression: the latter requires more
 force, more "morality." It is difficult and painful for the ear to
 listen to anything new; we hear strange music badly. When we hear
 another language spoken, we involuntarily attempt to form the sounds
 into words with which we are more familiar and conversant--it was thus,
 for example, that the Germans modified the spoken word ARCUBALISTA into
 ARMBRUST (cross-bow). Our senses are also hostile and averse to the
 new; and generally, even in the "simplest" processes of sensation, the
 emotions DOMINATE--such as fear, love, hatred, and the passive emotion
 of indolence.--As little as a reader nowadays reads all the single words
 (not to speak of syllables) of a page--he rather takes about five out
 of every twenty words at random, and "guesses" the probably appropriate
 sense to them--just as little do we see a tree correctly and completely
 in respect to its leaves, branches, colour, and shape; we find it so
 much easier to fancy the chance of a tree. Even in the midst of the
 most remarkable experiences, we still do just the same; we fabricate the
 greater part of the experience, and can hardly be made to contemplate
 any event, EXCEPT as "inventors" thereof. All this goes to prove
 that from our fundamental nature and from remote ages we have
 been--ACCUSTOMED TO LYING. Or, to express it more politely and
 hypocritically, in short, more pleasantly--one is much more of an artist
 than one is aware of.--In an animated conversation, I often see the face
 of the person with whom I am speaking so clearly and sharply defined
 before me, according to the thought he expresses, or which I believe to
 be evoked in his mind, that the degree of distinctness far exceeds the
 STRENGTH of my visual faculty--the delicacy of the play of the muscles
 and of the expression of the eyes MUST therefore be imagined by me.
 Probably the person put on quite a different expression, or none at all.
 
 193. Quidquid luce fuit, tenebris agit: but also contrariwise. What we
 experience in dreams, provided we experience it often, pertains at
 last just as much to the general belongings of our soul as anything
 "actually" experienced; by virtue thereof we are richer or poorer, we
 have a requirement more or less, and finally, in broad daylight, and
 even in the brightest moments of our waking life, we are ruled to some
 extent by the nature of our dreams. Supposing that someone has often
 flown in his dreams, and that at last, as soon as he dreams, he is
 conscious of the power and art of flying as his privilege and his
 peculiarly enviable happiness; such a person, who believes that on the
 slightest impulse, he can actualize all sorts of curves and angles, who
 knows the sensation of a certain divine levity, an "upwards"
 without effort or constraint, a "downwards" without descending
 or lowering--without TROUBLE!--how could the man with such
 dream-experiences and dream-habits fail to find "happiness" differently
 coloured and defined, even in his waking hours! How could he fail--to
 long DIFFERENTLY for happiness? "Flight," such as is described by poets,
 must, when compared with his own "flying," be far too earthly, muscular,
 violent, far too "troublesome" for him.
 
 194. The difference among men does not manifest itself only in the
 difference of their lists of desirable things--in their regarding
 different good things as worth striving for, and being disagreed as to
 the greater or less value, the order of rank, of the commonly recognized
 desirable things:--it manifests itself much more in what they regard as
 actually HAVING and POSSESSING a desirable thing. As regards a woman,
 for instance, the control over her body and her sexual gratification
 serves as an amply sufficient sign of ownership and possession to the
 more modest man; another with a more suspicious and ambitious thirst for
 possession, sees the "questionableness," the mere apparentness of such
 ownership, and wishes to have finer tests in order to know especially
 whether the woman not only gives herself to him, but also gives up for
 his sake what she has or would like to have--only THEN does he look upon
 her as "possessed." A third, however, has not even here got to the limit
 of his distrust and his desire for possession: he asks himself whether
 the woman, when she gives up everything for him, does not perhaps do
 so for a phantom of him; he wishes first to be thoroughly, indeed,
 profoundly well known; in order to be loved at all he ventures to let
 himself be found out. Only then does he feel the beloved one fully in
 his possession, when she no longer deceives herself about him, when
 she loves him just as much for the sake of his devilry and concealed
 insatiability, as for his goodness, patience, and spirituality. One
 man would like to possess a nation, and he finds all the higher arts of
 Cagliostro and Catalina suitable for his purpose. Another, with a more
 refined thirst for possession, says to himself: "One may not deceive
 where one desires to possess"--he is irritated and impatient at the idea
 that a mask of him should rule in the hearts of the people: "I must,
 therefore, MAKE myself known, and first of all learn to know myself!"
 Among helpful and charitable people, one almost always finds the awkward
 craftiness which first gets up suitably him who has to be helped, as
 though, for instance, he should "merit" help, seek just THEIR help, and
 would show himself deeply grateful, attached, and subservient to them
 for all help. With these conceits, they take control of the needy as a
 property, just as in general they are charitable and helpful out of a
 desire for property. One finds them jealous when they are crossed or
 forestalled in their charity. Parents involuntarily make something like
 themselves out of their children--they call that "education"; no mother
 doubts at the bottom of her heart that the child she has borne is
 thereby her property, no father hesitates about his right to HIS OWN
 ideas and notions of worth. Indeed, in former times fathers deemed it
 right to use their discretion concerning the life or death of the newly
 born (as among the ancient Germans). And like the father, so also do the
 teacher, the class, the priest, and the prince still see in every new
 individual an unobjectionable opportunity for a new possession. The
 consequence is...
 
 195. The Jews--a people "born for slavery," as Tacitus and the whole
 ancient world say of them; "the chosen people among the nations," as
 they themselves say and believe--the Jews performed the miracle of the
 inversion of valuations, by means of which life on earth obtained a new
 and dangerous charm for a couple of millenniums. Their prophets fused
 into one the expressions "rich," "godless," "wicked," "violent,"
 "sensual," and for the first time coined the word "world" as a term of
 reproach. In this inversion of valuations (in which is also included
 the use of the word "poor" as synonymous with "saint" and "friend") the
 significance of the Jewish people is to be found; it is with THEM that
 the SLAVE-INSURRECTION IN MORALS commences.
 
 196. It is to be INFERRED that there are countless dark bodies near the
 sun--such as we shall never see. Among ourselves, this is an allegory;
 and the psychologist of morals reads the whole star-writing merely as an
 allegorical and symbolic language in which much may be unexpressed.
 
 197. The beast of prey and the man of prey (for instance, Caesar Borgia)
 are fundamentally misunderstood, "nature" is misunderstood, so long as
 one seeks a "morbidness" in the constitution of these healthiest of
 all tropical monsters and growths, or even an innate "hell" in them--as
 almost all moralists have done hitherto. Does it not seem that there is
 a hatred of the virgin forest and of the tropics among moralists? And
 that the "tropical man" must be discredited at all costs, whether
 as disease and deterioration of mankind, or as his own hell and
 self-torture? And why? In favour of the "temperate zones"? In favour
 of the temperate men? The "moral"? The mediocre?--This for the chapter:
 "Morals as Timidity."
 
 198. All the systems of morals which address themselves with a view to
 their "happiness," as it is called--what else are they but suggestions
 for behaviour adapted to the degree of DANGER from themselves in which
 the individuals live; recipes for their passions, their good and bad
 propensities, insofar as such have the Will to Power and would like
 to play the master; small and great expediencies and elaborations,
 permeated with the musty odour of old family medicines and old-wife
 wisdom; all of them grotesque and absurd in their form--because
 they address themselves to "all," because they generalize where
 generalization is not authorized; all of them speaking unconditionally,
 and taking themselves unconditionally; all of them flavoured not merely
 with one grain of salt, but rather endurable only, and sometimes even
 seductive, when they are over-spiced and begin to smell dangerously,
 especially of "the other world." That is all of little value when
 estimated intellectually, and is far from being "science," much less
 "wisdom"; but, repeated once more, and three times repeated, it is
 expediency, expediency, expediency, mixed with stupidity, stupidity,
 stupidity--whether it be the indifference and statuesque coldness
 towards the heated folly of the emotions, which the Stoics advised and
 fostered; or the no-more-laughing and no-more-weeping of Spinoza, the
 destruction of the emotions by their analysis and vivisection, which he
 recommended so naively; or the lowering of the emotions to an innocent
 mean at which they may be satisfied, the Aristotelianism of morals;
 or even morality as the enjoyment of the emotions in a voluntary
 attenuation and spiritualization by the symbolism of art, perhaps as
 music, or as love of God, and of mankind for God's sake--for in religion
 the passions are once more enfranchised, provided that...; or, finally,
 even the complaisant and wanton surrender to the emotions, as has
 been taught by Hafis and Goethe, the bold letting-go of the reins, the
 spiritual and corporeal licentia morum in the exceptional cases of
 wise old codgers and drunkards, with whom it "no longer has much
 danger."--This also for the chapter: "Morals as Timidity."
 
 199. Inasmuch as in all ages, as long as mankind has existed, there have
 also been human herds (family alliances, communities, tribes, peoples,
 states, churches), and always a great number who obey in proportion
 to the small number who command--in view, therefore, of the fact that
 obedience has been most practiced and fostered among mankind hitherto,
 one may reasonably suppose that, generally speaking, the need thereof is
 now innate in every one, as a kind of FORMAL CONSCIENCE which gives
 the command "Thou shalt unconditionally do something, unconditionally
 refrain from something", in short, "Thou shalt". This need tries to
 satisfy itself and to fill its form with a content, according to its
 strength, impatience, and eagerness, it at once seizes as an omnivorous
 appetite with little selection, and accepts whatever is shouted into
 its ear by all sorts of commanders--parents, teachers, laws, class
 prejudices, or public opinion. The extraordinary limitation of human
 development, the hesitation, protractedness, frequent retrogression, and
 turning thereof, is attributable to the fact that the herd-instinct of
 obedience is transmitted best, and at the cost of the art of command. If
 one imagine this instinct increasing to its greatest extent, commanders
 and independent individuals will finally be lacking altogether, or they
 will suffer inwardly from a bad conscience, and will have to impose
 a deception on themselves in the first place in order to be able to
 command just as if they also were only obeying. This condition of things
 actually exists in Europe at present--I call it the moral hypocrisy of
 the commanding class. They know no other way of protecting themselves
 from their bad conscience than by playing the role of executors of older
 and higher orders (of predecessors, of the constitution, of justice, of
 the law, or of God himself), or they even justify themselves by maxims
 from the current opinions of the herd, as "first servants of their
 people," or "instruments of the public weal". On the other hand, the
 gregarious European man nowadays assumes an air as if he were the only
 kind of man that is allowable, he glorifies his qualities, such as
 public spirit, kindness, deference, industry, temperance, modesty,
 indulgence, sympathy, by virtue of which he is gentle, endurable, and
 useful to the herd, as the peculiarly human virtues. In cases, however,
 where it is believed that the leader and bell-wether cannot be dispensed
 with, attempt after attempt is made nowadays to replace commanders
 by the summing together of clever gregarious men all representative
 constitutions, for example, are of this origin. In spite of all, what a
 blessing, what a deliverance from a weight becoming unendurable, is the
 appearance of an absolute ruler for these gregarious Europeans--of this
 fact the effect of the appearance of Napoleon was the last great proof
 the history of the influence of Napoleon is almost the history of
 the higher happiness to which the entire century has attained in its
 worthiest individuals and periods.
 
 200. The man of an age of dissolution which mixes the races with
 one another, who has the inheritance of a diversified descent in his
 body--that is to say, contrary, and often not only contrary, instincts
 and standards of value, which struggle with one another and are seldom
 at peace--such a man of late culture and broken lights, will, on an
 average, be a weak man. His fundamental desire is that the war which is
 IN HIM should come to an end; happiness appears to him in the character
 of a soothing medicine and mode of thought (for instance, Epicurean
 or Christian); it is above all things the happiness of repose, of
 undisturbedness, of repletion, of final unity--it is the "Sabbath of
 Sabbaths," to use the expression of the holy rhetorician, St. Augustine,
 who was himself such a man.--Should, however, the contrariety and
 conflict in such natures operate as an ADDITIONAL incentive and stimulus
 to life--and if, on the other hand, in addition to their powerful and
 irreconcilable instincts, they have also inherited and indoctrinated
 into them a proper mastery and subtlety for carrying on the conflict
 with themselves (that is to say, the faculty of self-control and
 self-deception), there then arise those marvelously incomprehensible and
 inexplicable beings, those enigmatical men, predestined for conquering
 and circumventing others, the finest examples of which are Alcibiades
 and Caesar (with whom I should like to associate the FIRST of Europeans
 according to my taste, the Hohenstaufen, Frederick the Second), and
 among artists, perhaps Leonardo da Vinci. They appear precisely in the
 same periods when that weaker type, with its longing for repose, comes
 to the front; the two types are complementary to each other, and spring
 from the same causes.
 
 201. As long as the utility which determines moral estimates is only
 gregarious utility, as long as the preservation of the community is only
 kept in view, and the immoral is sought precisely and exclusively in
 what seems dangerous to the maintenance of the community, there can be
 no "morality of love to one's neighbour." Granted even that there is
 already a little constant exercise of consideration, sympathy, fairness,
 gentleness, and mutual assistance, granted that even in this condition
 of society all those instincts are already active which are latterly
 distinguished by honourable names as "virtues," and eventually almost
 coincide with the conception "morality": in that period they do not
 as yet belong to the domain of moral valuations--they are still
 ULTRA-MORAL. A sympathetic action, for instance, is neither called good
 nor bad, moral nor immoral, in the best period of the Romans; and should
 it be praised, a sort of resentful disdain is compatible with this
 praise, even at the best, directly the sympathetic action is compared
 with one which contributes to the welfare of the whole, to the RES
 PUBLICA. After all, "love to our neighbour" is always a secondary
 matter, partly conventional and arbitrarily manifested in relation to
 our FEAR OF OUR NEIGHBOUR. After the fabric of society seems on the
 whole established and secured against external dangers, it is this
 fear of our neighbour which again creates new perspectives of moral
 valuation. Certain strong and dangerous instincts, such as the love of
 enterprise, foolhardiness, revengefulness, astuteness, rapacity, and
 love of power, which up till then had not only to be honoured from the
 point of view of general utility--under other names, of course, than
 those here given--but had to be fostered and cultivated (because they
 were perpetually required in the common danger against the common
 enemies), are now felt in their dangerousness to be doubly strong--when
 the outlets for them are lacking--and are gradually branded as immoral
 and given over to calumny. The contrary instincts and inclinations now
 attain to moral honour, the gregarious instinct gradually draws its
 conclusions. How much or how little dangerousness to the community or
 to equality is contained in an opinion, a condition, an emotion, a
 disposition, or an endowment--that is now the moral perspective, here
 again fear is the mother of morals. It is by the loftiest and strongest
 instincts, when they break out passionately and carry the individual
 far above and beyond the average, and the low level of the gregarious
 conscience, that the self-reliance of the community is destroyed, its
 belief in itself, its backbone, as it were, breaks, consequently these
 very instincts will be most branded and defamed. The lofty independent
 spirituality, the will to stand alone, and even the cogent reason, are
 felt to be dangers, everything that elevates the individual above the
 herd, and is a source of fear to the neighbour, is henceforth called
 EVIL, the tolerant, unassuming, self-adapting, self-equalizing
 disposition, the MEDIOCRITY of desires, attains to moral distinction and
 honour. Finally, under very peaceful circumstances, there is always
 less opportunity and necessity for training the feelings to severity
 and rigour, and now every form of severity, even in justice, begins
 to disturb the conscience, a lofty and rigorous nobleness and
 self-responsibility almost offends, and awakens distrust, "the lamb,"
 and still more "the sheep," wins respect. There is a point of diseased
 mellowness and effeminacy in the history of society, at which society
 itself takes the part of him who injures it, the part of the CRIMINAL,
 and does so, in fact, seriously and honestly. To punish, appears to it
 to be somehow unfair--it is certain that the idea of "punishment" and
 "the obligation to punish" are then painful and alarming to people. "Is
 it not sufficient if the criminal be rendered HARMLESS? Why should we
 still punish? Punishment itself is terrible!"--with these questions
 gregarious morality, the morality of fear, draws its ultimate
 conclusion. If one could at all do away with danger, the cause of fear,
 one would have done away with this morality at the same time, it
 would no longer be necessary, it WOULD NOT CONSIDER ITSELF any longer
 necessary!--Whoever examines the conscience of the present-day European,
 will always elicit the same imperative from its thousand moral folds
 and hidden recesses, the imperative of the timidity of the herd "we wish
 that some time or other there may be NOTHING MORE TO FEAR!" Some time
 or other--the will and the way THERETO is nowadays called "progress" all
 over Europe.
 
 202. Let us at once say again what we have already said a hundred
 times, for people's ears nowadays are unwilling to hear such truths--OUR
 truths. We know well enough how offensive it sounds when any one
 plainly, and without metaphor, counts man among the animals, but it will
 be accounted to us almost a CRIME, that it is precisely in respect to
 men of "modern ideas" that we have constantly applied the terms "herd,"
 "herd-instincts," and such like expressions. What avail is it? We cannot
 do otherwise, for it is precisely here that our new insight is. We
 have found that in all the principal moral judgments, Europe has become
 unanimous, including likewise the countries where European influence
 prevails in Europe people evidently KNOW what Socrates thought he
 did not know, and what the famous serpent of old once promised to
 teach--they "know" today what is good and evil. It must then sound hard
 and be distasteful to the ear, when we always insist that that which
 here thinks it knows, that which here glorifies itself with praise
 and blame, and calls itself good, is the instinct of the herding human
 animal, the instinct which has come and is ever coming more and more
 to the front, to preponderance and supremacy over other instincts,
 according to the increasing physiological approximation and resemblance
 of which it is the symptom. MORALITY IN EUROPE AT PRESENT IS
 HERDING-ANIMAL MORALITY, and therefore, as we understand the matter,
 only one kind of human morality, beside which, before which, and after
 which many other moralities, and above all HIGHER moralities, are or
 should be possible. Against such a "possibility," against such a "should
 be," however, this morality defends itself with all its strength, it
 says obstinately and inexorably "I am morality itself and nothing else
 is morality!" Indeed, with the help of a religion which has humoured
 and flattered the sublimest desires of the herding-animal, things have
 reached such a point that we always find a more visible expression of
 this morality even in political and social arrangements: the DEMOCRATIC
 movement is the inheritance of the Christian movement. That its TEMPO,
 however, is much too slow and sleepy for the more impatient ones, for
 those who are sick and distracted by the herding-instinct, is indicated
 by the increasingly furious howling, and always less disguised
 teeth-gnashing of the anarchist dogs, who are now roving through the
 highways of European culture. Apparently in opposition to the peacefully
 industrious democrats and Revolution-ideologues, and still more so
 to the awkward philosophasters and fraternity-visionaries who call
 themselves Socialists and want a "free society," those are really at one
 with them all in their thorough and instinctive hostility to every form
 of society other than that of the AUTONOMOUS herd (to the extent even of
 repudiating the notions "master" and "servant"--ni dieu ni maitre, says
 a socialist formula); at one in their tenacious opposition to every
 special claim, every special right and privilege (this means ultimately
 opposition to EVERY right, for when all are equal, no one needs "rights"
 any longer); at one in their distrust of punitive justice (as though it
 were a violation of the weak, unfair to the NECESSARY consequences of
 all former society); but equally at one in their religion of sympathy,
 in their compassion for all that feels, lives, and suffers (down to the
 very animals, up even to "God"--the extravagance of "sympathy for
 God" belongs to a democratic age); altogether at one in the cry and
 impatience of their sympathy, in their deadly hatred of suffering
 generally, in their almost feminine incapacity for witnessing it or
 ALLOWING it; at one in their involuntary beglooming and heart-softening,
 under the spell of which Europe seems to be threatened with a new
 Buddhism; at one in their belief in the morality of MUTUAL sympathy, as
 though it were morality in itself, the climax, the ATTAINED climax of
 mankind, the sole hope of the future, the consolation of the present,
 the great discharge from all the obligations of the past; altogether at
 one in their belief in the community as the DELIVERER, in the herd, and
 therefore in "themselves."
 
 203. We, who hold a different belief--we, who regard the democratic
 movement, not only as a degenerating form of political organization, but
 as equivalent to a degenerating, a waning type of man, as involving his
 mediocrising and depreciation: where have WE to fix our hopes? In
 NEW PHILOSOPHERS--there is no other alternative: in minds strong and
 original enough to initiate opposite estimates of value, to transvalue
 and invert "eternal valuations"; in forerunners, in men of the future,
 who in the present shall fix the constraints and fasten the knots which
 will compel millenniums to take NEW paths. To teach man the future
 of humanity as his WILL, as depending on human will, and to make
 preparation for vast hazardous enterprises and collective attempts in
 rearing and educating, in order thereby to put an end to the frightful
 rule of folly and chance which has hitherto gone by the name of
 "history" (the folly of the "greatest number" is only its last
 form)--for that purpose a new type of philosopher and commander will
 some time or other be needed, at the very idea of which everything that
 has existed in the way of occult, terrible, and benevolent beings might
 look pale and dwarfed. The image of such leaders hovers before OUR
 eyes:--is it lawful for me to say it aloud, ye free spirits? The
 conditions which one would partly have to create and partly utilize for
 their genesis; the presumptive methods and tests by virtue of which
 a soul should grow up to such an elevation and power as to feel a
 CONSTRAINT to these tasks; a transvaluation of values, under the new
 pressure and hammer of which a conscience should be steeled and a heart
 transformed into brass, so as to bear the weight of such responsibility;
 and on the other hand the necessity for such leaders, the dreadful
 danger that they might be lacking, or miscarry and degenerate:--these
 are OUR real anxieties and glooms, ye know it well, ye free spirits!
 these are the heavy distant thoughts and storms which sweep across the
 heaven of OUR life. There are few pains so grievous as to have seen,
 divined, or experienced how an exceptional man has missed his way and
 deteriorated; but he who has the rare eye for the universal danger
 of "man" himself DETERIORATING, he who like us has recognized the
 extraordinary fortuitousness which has hitherto played its game in
 respect to the future of mankind--a game in which neither the hand, nor
 even a "finger of God" has participated!--he who divines the fate that
 is hidden under the idiotic unwariness and blind confidence of
 "modern ideas," and still more under the whole of Christo-European
 morality--suffers from an anguish with which no other is to be compared.
 He sees at a glance all that could still BE MADE OUT OF MAN through
 a favourable accumulation and augmentation of human powers and
 arrangements; he knows with all the knowledge of his conviction how
 unexhausted man still is for the greatest possibilities, and how often
 in the past the type man has stood in presence of mysterious decisions
 and new paths:--he knows still better from his painfulest recollections
 on what wretched obstacles promising developments of the highest rank
 have hitherto usually gone to pieces, broken down, sunk, and become
 contemptible. The UNIVERSAL DEGENERACY OF MANKIND to the level of
 the "man of the future"--as idealized by the socialistic fools and
 shallow-pates--this degeneracy and dwarfing of man to an absolutely
 gregarious animal (or as they call it, to a man of "free society"),
 this brutalizing of man into a pigmy with equal rights and claims, is
 undoubtedly POSSIBLE! He who has thought out this possibility to its
 ultimate conclusion knows ANOTHER loathing unknown to the rest of
 mankind--and perhaps also a new MISSION!
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI. WE SCHOLARS
 
 
 204. At the risk that moralizing may also reveal itself here as that
 which it has always been--namely, resolutely MONTRER SES PLAIES,
 according to Balzac--I would venture to protest against an improper and
 injurious alteration of rank, which quite unnoticed, and as if with the
 best conscience, threatens nowadays to establish itself in the relations
 of science and philosophy. I mean to say that one must have the right
 out of one's own EXPERIENCE--experience, as it seems to me, always
 implies unfortunate experience?--to treat of such an important question
 of rank, so as not to speak of colour like the blind, or AGAINST science
 like women and artists ("Ah! this dreadful science!" sigh their instinct
 and their shame, "it always FINDS THINGS OUT!"). The declaration of
 independence of the scientific man, his emancipation from philosophy,
 is one of the subtler after-effects of democratic organization and
 disorganization: the self-glorification and self-conceitedness of
 the learned man is now everywhere in full bloom, and in its best
 springtime--which does not mean to imply that in this case self-praise
 smells sweet. Here also the instinct of the populace cries, "Freedom
 from all masters!" and after science has, with the happiest results,
 resisted theology, whose "hand-maid" it had been too long, it now
 proposes in its wantonness and indiscretion to lay down laws for
 philosophy, and in its turn to play the "master"--what am I saying!
 to play the PHILOSOPHER on its own account. My memory--the memory of
 a scientific man, if you please!--teems with the naivetes of insolence
 which I have heard about philosophy and philosophers from young
 naturalists and old physicians (not to mention the most cultured and
 most conceited of all learned men, the philologists and schoolmasters,
 who are both the one and the other by profession). On one occasion it
 was the specialist and the Jack Horner who instinctively stood on the
 defensive against all synthetic tasks and capabilities; at another time
 it was the industrious worker who had got a scent of OTIUM and refined
 luxuriousness in the internal economy of the philosopher, and felt
 himself aggrieved and belittled thereby. On another occasion it was the
 colour-blindness of the utilitarian, who sees nothing in philosophy but
 a series of REFUTED systems, and an extravagant expenditure which "does
 nobody any good". At another time the fear of disguised mysticism and of
 the boundary-adjustment of knowledge became conspicuous, at another
 time the disregard of individual philosophers, which had involuntarily
 extended to disregard of philosophy generally. In fine, I found most
 frequently, behind the proud disdain of philosophy in young scholars,
 the evil after-effect of some particular philosopher, to whom on the
 whole obedience had been foresworn, without, however, the spell of his
 scornful estimates of other philosophers having been got rid of--the
 result being a general ill-will to all philosophy. (Such seems to
 me, for instance, the after-effect of Schopenhauer on the most modern
 Germany: by his unintelligent rage against Hegel, he has succeeded in
 severing the whole of the last generation of Germans from its connection
 with German culture, which culture, all things considered, has been
 an elevation and a divining refinement of the HISTORICAL SENSE, but
 precisely at this point Schopenhauer himself was poor, irreceptive,
 and un-German to the extent of ingeniousness.) On the whole, speaking
 generally, it may just have been the humanness, all-too-humanness of the
 modern philosophers themselves, in short, their contemptibleness, which
 has injured most radically the reverence for philosophy and opened the
 doors to the instinct of the populace. Let it but be acknowledged to
 what an extent our modern world diverges from the whole style of the
 world of Heraclitus, Plato, Empedocles, and whatever else all the royal
 and magnificent anchorites of the spirit were called, and with what
 justice an honest man of science MAY feel himself of a better family and
 origin, in view of such representatives of philosophy, who, owing to
 the fashion of the present day, are just as much aloft as they are down
 below--in Germany, for instance, the two lions of Berlin, the anarchist
 Eugen Duhring and the amalgamist Eduard von Hartmann. It is especially
 the sight of those hotch-potch philosophers, who call themselves
 "realists," or "positivists," which is calculated to implant a
 dangerous distrust in the soul of a young and ambitious scholar those
 philosophers, at the best, are themselves but scholars and specialists,
 that is very evident! All of them are persons who have been vanquished
 and BROUGHT BACK AGAIN under the dominion of science, who at one time
 or another claimed more from themselves, without having a right to the
 "more" and its responsibility--and who now, creditably, rancorously, and
 vindictively, represent in word and deed, DISBELIEF in the master-task
 and supremacy of philosophy After all, how could it be otherwise?
 Science flourishes nowadays and has the good conscience clearly visible
 on its countenance, while that to which the entire modern philosophy has
 gradually sunk, the remnant of philosophy of the present day, excites
 distrust and displeasure, if not scorn and pity Philosophy reduced to
 a "theory of knowledge," no more in fact than a diffident science of
 epochs and doctrine of forbearance a philosophy that never even
 gets beyond the threshold, and rigorously DENIES itself the right
 to enter--that is philosophy in its last throes, an end, an agony,
 something that awakens pity. How could such a philosophy--RULE!
 
 205. The dangers that beset the evolution of the philosopher are, in
 fact, so manifold nowadays, that one might doubt whether this fruit
 could still come to maturity. The extent and towering structure of the
 sciences have increased enormously, and therewith also the probability
 that the philosopher will grow tired even as a learner, or will attach
 himself somewhere and "specialize" so that he will no longer attain to
 his elevation, that is to say, to his superspection, his circumspection,
 and his DESPECTION. Or he gets aloft too late, when the best of his
 maturity and strength is past, or when he is impaired, coarsened, and
 deteriorated, so that his view, his general estimate of things, is no
 longer of much importance. It is perhaps just the refinement of his
 intellectual conscience that makes him hesitate and linger on the
 way, he dreads the temptation to become a dilettante, a millepede, a
 milleantenna, he knows too well that as a discerner, one who has lost
 his self-respect no longer commands, no longer LEADS, unless he should
 aspire to become a great play-actor, a philosophical Cagliostro and
 spiritual rat-catcher--in short, a misleader. This is in the last
 instance a question of taste, if it has not really been a question of
 conscience. To double once more the philosopher's difficulties, there is
 also the fact that he demands from himself a verdict, a Yea or Nay, not
 concerning science, but concerning life and the worth of life--he learns
 unwillingly to believe that it is his right and even his duty to obtain
 this verdict, and he has to seek his way to the right and the belief
 only through the most extensive (perhaps disturbing and destroying)
 experiences, often hesitating, doubting, and dumbfounded. In fact, the
 philosopher has long been mistaken and confused by the multitude, either
 with the scientific man and ideal scholar, or with the religiously
 elevated, desensualized, desecularized visionary and God-intoxicated
 man; and even yet when one hears anybody praised, because he lives
 "wisely," or "as a philosopher," it hardly means anything more than
 "prudently and apart." Wisdom: that seems to the populace to be a kind
 of flight, a means and artifice for withdrawing successfully from a
 bad game; but the GENUINE philosopher--does it not seem so to US,
 my friends?--lives "unphilosophically" and "unwisely," above all,
 IMPRUDENTLY, and feels the obligation and burden of a hundred attempts
 and temptations of life--he risks HIMSELF constantly, he plays THIS bad
 game.
 
 206. In relation to the genius, that is to say, a being who either
 ENGENDERS or PRODUCES--both words understood in their fullest sense--the
 man of learning, the scientific average man, has always something of
 the old maid about him; for, like her, he is not conversant with the two
 principal functions of man. To both, of course, to the scholar and
 to the old maid, one concedes respectability, as if by way of
 indemnification--in these cases one emphasizes the respectability--and
 yet, in the compulsion of this concession, one has the same admixture
 of vexation. Let us examine more closely: what is the scientific man?
 Firstly, a commonplace type of man, with commonplace virtues: that is
 to say, a non-ruling, non-authoritative, and non-self-sufficient type
 of man; he possesses industry, patient adaptableness to rank and file,
 equability and moderation in capacity and requirement; he has the
 instinct for people like himself, and for that which they require--for
 instance: the portion of independence and green meadow without which
 there is no rest from labour, the claim to honour and consideration
 (which first and foremost presupposes recognition and recognisability),
 the sunshine of a good name, the perpetual ratification of his value and
 usefulness, with which the inward DISTRUST which lies at the bottom of
 the heart of all dependent men and gregarious animals, has again and
 again to be overcome. The learned man, as is appropriate, has also
 maladies and faults of an ignoble kind: he is full of petty envy, and
 has a lynx-eye for the weak points in those natures to whose elevations
 he cannot attain. He is confiding, yet only as one who lets himself go,
 but does not FLOW; and precisely before the man of the great current he
 stands all the colder and more reserved--his eye is then like a smooth
 and irresponsive lake, which is no longer moved by rapture or sympathy.
 The worst and most dangerous thing of which a scholar is capable results
 from the instinct of mediocrity of his type, from the Jesuitism of
 mediocrity, which labours instinctively for the destruction of
 the exceptional man, and endeavours to break--or still better, to
 relax--every bent bow To relax, of course, with consideration, and
 naturally with an indulgent hand--to RELAX with confiding sympathy
 that is the real art of Jesuitism, which has always understood how to
 introduce itself as the religion of sympathy.
 
 207. However gratefully one may welcome the OBJECTIVE spirit--and
 who has not been sick to death of all subjectivity and its confounded
 IPSISIMOSITY!--in the end, however, one must learn caution even with
 regard to one's gratitude, and put a stop to the exaggeration with
 which the unselfing and depersonalizing of the spirit has recently been
 celebrated, as if it were the goal in itself, as if it were salvation
 and glorification--as is especially accustomed to happen in the
 pessimist school, which has also in its turn good reasons for paying the
 highest honours to "disinterested knowledge" The objective man, who no
 longer curses and scolds like the pessimist, the IDEAL man of learning
 in whom the scientific instinct blossoms forth fully after a thousand
 complete and partial failures, is assuredly one of the most costly
 instruments that exist, but his place is in the hand of one who is more
 powerful He is only an instrument, we may say, he is a MIRROR--he is no
 "purpose in himself" The objective man is in truth a mirror accustomed
 to prostration before everything that wants to be known, with such
 desires only as knowing or "reflecting" implies--he waits until
 something comes, and then expands himself sensitively, so that even the
 light footsteps and gliding-past of spiritual beings may not be lost on
 his surface and film Whatever "personality" he still possesses seems to
 him accidental, arbitrary, or still oftener, disturbing, so much has he
 come to regard himself as the passage and reflection of outside forms
 and events He calls up the recollection of "himself" with an effort,
 and not infrequently wrongly, he readily confounds himself with other
 persons, he makes mistakes with regard to his own needs, and here only
 is he unrefined and negligent Perhaps he is troubled about the health,
 or the pettiness and confined atmosphere of wife and friend, or the lack
 of companions and society--indeed, he sets himself to reflect on his
 suffering, but in vain! His thoughts already rove away to the MORE
 GENERAL case, and tomorrow he knows as little as he knew yesterday how
 to help himself He does not now take himself seriously and devote time
 to himself he is serene, NOT from lack of trouble, but from lack
 of capacity for grasping and dealing with HIS trouble The habitual
 complaisance with respect to all objects and experiences, the radiant
 and impartial hospitality with which he receives everything that
 comes his way, his habit of inconsiderate good-nature, of dangerous
 indifference as to Yea and Nay: alas! there are enough of cases in which
 he has to atone for these virtues of his!--and as man generally, he
 becomes far too easily the CAPUT MORTUUM of such virtues. Should one
 wish love or hatred from him--I mean love and hatred as God, woman, and
 animal understand them--he will do what he can, and furnish what he can.
 But one must not be surprised if it should not be much--if he should
 show himself just at this point to be false, fragile, questionable, and
 deteriorated. His love is constrained, his hatred is artificial, and
 rather UN TOUR DE FORCE, a slight ostentation and exaggeration. He is
 only genuine so far as he can be objective; only in his serene totality
 is he still "nature" and "natural." His mirroring and eternally
 self-polishing soul no longer knows how to affirm, no longer how to
 deny; he does not command; neither does he destroy. "JE NE MEPRISE
 PRESQUE RIEN"--he says, with Leibniz: let us not overlook nor undervalue
 the PRESQUE! Neither is he a model man; he does not go in advance of any
 one, nor after, either; he places himself generally too far off to have
 any reason for espousing the cause of either good or evil. If he has
 been so long confounded with the PHILOSOPHER, with the Caesarian trainer
 and dictator of civilization, he has had far too much honour, and what
 is more essential in him has been overlooked--he is an instrument,
 something of a slave, though certainly the sublimest sort of slave, but
 nothing in himself--PRESQUE RIEN! The objective man is an instrument,
 a costly, easily injured, easily tarnished measuring instrument and
 mirroring apparatus, which is to be taken care of and respected; but he
 is no goal, not outgoing nor upgoing, no complementary man in whom the
 REST of existence justifies itself, no termination--and still less a
 commencement, an engendering, or primary cause, nothing hardy, powerful,
 self-centred, that wants to be master; but rather only a soft, inflated,
 delicate, movable potter's-form, that must wait for some kind of content
 and frame to "shape" itself thereto--for the most part a man without
 frame and content, a "selfless" man. Consequently, also, nothing for
 women, IN PARENTHESI.
 
 208. When a philosopher nowadays makes known that he is not a skeptic--I
 hope that has been gathered from the foregoing description of the
 objective spirit?--people all hear it impatiently; they regard him on
 that account with some apprehension, they would like to ask so many,
 many questions... indeed among timid hearers, of whom there are now so
 many, he is henceforth said to be dangerous. With his repudiation of
 skepticism, it seems to them as if they heard some evil-threatening
 sound in the distance, as if a new kind of explosive were being tried
 somewhere, a dynamite of the spirit, perhaps a newly discovered Russian
 NIHILINE, a pessimism BONAE VOLUNTATIS, that not only denies, means
 denial, but--dreadful thought! PRACTISES denial. Against this kind of
 "good-will"--a will to the veritable, actual negation of life--there is,
 as is generally acknowledged nowadays, no better soporific and sedative
 than skepticism, the mild, pleasing, lulling poppy of skepticism;
 and Hamlet himself is now prescribed by the doctors of the day as an
 antidote to the "spirit," and its underground noises. "Are not our ears
 already full of bad sounds?" say the skeptics, as lovers of repose, and
 almost as a kind of safety police; "this subterranean Nay is terrible!
 Be still, ye pessimistic moles!" The skeptic, in effect, that delicate
 creature, is far too easily frightened; his conscience is schooled so
 as to start at every Nay, and even at that sharp, decided Yea, and feels
 something like a bite thereby. Yea! and Nay!--they seem to him opposed
 to morality; he loves, on the contrary, to make a festival to his virtue
 by a noble aloofness, while perhaps he says with Montaigne: "What do I
 know?" Or with Socrates: "I know that I know nothing." Or: "Here I do
 not trust myself, no door is open to me." Or: "Even if the door were
 open, why should I enter immediately?" Or: "What is the use of any hasty
 hypotheses? It might quite well be in good taste to make no hypotheses
 at all. Are you absolutely obliged to straighten at once what is
 crooked? to stuff every hole with some kind of oakum? Is there not time
 enough for that? Has not the time leisure? Oh, ye demons, can ye not
 at all WAIT? The uncertain also has its charms, the Sphinx, too, is a
 Circe, and Circe, too, was a philosopher."--Thus does a skeptic console
 himself; and in truth he needs some consolation. For skepticism is
 the most spiritual expression of a certain many-sided physiological
 temperament, which in ordinary language is called nervous debility and
 sickliness; it arises whenever races or classes which have been long
 separated, decisively and suddenly blend with one another. In the new
 generation, which has inherited as it were different standards and
 valuations in its blood, everything is disquiet, derangement, doubt, and
 tentativeness; the best powers operate restrictively, the very virtues
 prevent each other growing and becoming strong, equilibrium, ballast,
 and perpendicular stability are lacking in body and soul. That, however,
 which is most diseased and degenerated in such nondescripts is the
 WILL; they are no longer familiar with independence of decision, or
 the courageous feeling of pleasure in willing--they are doubtful of the
 "freedom of the will" even in their dreams Our present-day Europe,
 the scene of a senseless, precipitate attempt at a radical blending of
 classes, and CONSEQUENTLY of races, is therefore skeptical in all its
 heights and depths, sometimes exhibiting the mobile skepticism which
 springs impatiently and wantonly from branch to branch, sometimes with
 gloomy aspect, like a cloud over-charged with interrogative signs--and
 often sick unto death of its will! Paralysis of will, where do we not
 find this cripple sitting nowadays! And yet how bedecked oftentimes' How
 seductively ornamented! There are the finest gala dresses and disguises
 for this disease, and that, for instance, most of what places itself
 nowadays in the show-cases as "objectiveness," "the scientific spirit,"
 "L'ART POUR L'ART," and "pure voluntary knowledge," is only decked-out
 skepticism and paralysis of will--I am ready to answer for this
 diagnosis of the European disease--The disease of the will is diffused
 unequally over Europe, it is worst and most varied where civilization
 has longest prevailed, it decreases according as "the barbarian"
 still--or again--asserts his claims under the loose drapery of Western
 culture It is therefore in the France of today, as can be readily
 disclosed and comprehended, that the will is most infirm, and France,
 which has always had a masterly aptitude for converting even the
 portentous crises of its spirit into something charming and seductive,
 now manifests emphatically its intellectual ascendancy over Europe,
 by being the school and exhibition of all the charms of skepticism The
 power to will and to persist, moreover, in a resolution, is already
 somewhat stronger in Germany, and again in the North of Germany it
 is stronger than in Central Germany, it is considerably stronger in
 England, Spain, and Corsica, associated with phlegm in the former and
 with hard skulls in the latter--not to mention Italy, which is too young
 yet to know what it wants, and must first show whether it can exercise
 will, but it is strongest and most surprising of all in that immense
 middle empire where Europe as it were flows back to Asia--namely, in
 Russia There the power to will has been long stored up and accumulated,
 there the will--uncertain whether to be negative or affirmative--waits
 threateningly to be discharged (to borrow their pet phrase from our
 physicists) Perhaps not only Indian wars and complications in Asia would
 be necessary to free Europe from its greatest danger, but also internal
 subversion, the shattering of the empire into small states, and above
 all the introduction of parliamentary imbecility, together with the
 obligation of every one to read his newspaper at breakfast I do not
 say this as one who desires it, in my heart I should rather prefer the
 contrary--I mean such an increase in the threatening attitude of
 Russia, that Europe would have to make up its mind to become equally
 threatening--namely, TO ACQUIRE ONE WILL, by means of a new caste to
 rule over the Continent, a persistent, dreadful will of its own, that
 can set its aims thousands of years ahead; so that the long spun-out
 comedy of its petty-statism, and its dynastic as well as its democratic
 many-willed-ness, might finally be brought to a close. The time for
 petty politics is past; the next century will bring the struggle for the
 dominion of the world--the COMPULSION to great politics.
 
 209. As to how far the new warlike age on which we Europeans have
 evidently entered may perhaps favour the growth of another and stronger
 kind of skepticism, I should like to express myself preliminarily
 merely by a parable, which the lovers of German history will already
 understand. That unscrupulous enthusiast for big, handsome grenadiers
 (who, as King of Prussia, brought into being a military and skeptical
 genius--and therewith, in reality, the new and now triumphantly emerged
 type of German), the problematic, crazy father of Frederick the Great,
 had on one point the very knack and lucky grasp of the genius: he knew
 what was then lacking in Germany, the want of which was a hundred times
 more alarming and serious than any lack of culture and social form--his
 ill-will to the young Frederick resulted from the anxiety of a profound
 instinct. MEN WERE LACKING; and he suspected, to his bitterest regret,
 that his own son was not man enough. There, however, he deceived
 himself; but who would not have deceived himself in his place? He saw
 his son lapsed to atheism, to the ESPRIT, to the pleasant frivolity of
 clever Frenchmen--he saw in the background the great bloodsucker, the
 spider skepticism; he suspected the incurable wretchedness of a heart no
 longer hard enough either for evil or good, and of a broken will that no
 longer commands, is no longer ABLE to command. Meanwhile, however,
 there grew up in his son that new kind of harder and more dangerous
 skepticism--who knows TO WHAT EXTENT it was encouraged just by
 his father's hatred and the icy melancholy of a will condemned to
 solitude?--the skepticism of daring manliness, which is closely related
 to the genius for war and conquest, and made its first entrance into
 Germany in the person of the great Frederick. This skepticism despises
 and nevertheless grasps; it undermines and takes possession; it does
 not believe, but it does not thereby lose itself; it gives the spirit a
 dangerous liberty, but it keeps strict guard over the heart. It is the
 GERMAN form of skepticism, which, as a continued Fredericianism, risen
 to the highest spirituality, has kept Europe for a considerable time
 under the dominion of the German spirit and its critical and historical
 distrust Owing to the insuperably strong and tough masculine character
 of the great German philologists and historical critics (who,
 rightly estimated, were also all of them artists of destruction
 and dissolution), a NEW conception of the German spirit gradually
 established itself--in spite of all Romanticism in music and
 philosophy--in which the leaning towards masculine skepticism was
 decidedly prominent whether, for instance, as fearlessness of gaze, as
 courage and sternness of the dissecting hand, or as resolute will to
 dangerous voyages of discovery, to spiritualized North Pole expeditions
 under barren and dangerous skies. There may be good grounds for it when
 warm-blooded and superficial humanitarians cross themselves before this
 spirit, CET ESPRIT FATALISTE, IRONIQUE, MEPHISTOPHELIQUE, as Michelet
 calls it, not without a shudder. But if one would realize how
 characteristic is this fear of the "man" in the German spirit which
 awakened Europe out of its "dogmatic slumber," let us call to mind the
 former conception which had to be overcome by this new one--and that
 it is not so very long ago that a masculinized woman could dare, with
 unbridled presumption, to recommend the Germans to the interest of
 Europe as gentle, good-hearted, weak-willed, and poetical fools.
 Finally, let us only understand profoundly enough Napoleon's
 astonishment when he saw Goethe it reveals what had been regarded for
 centuries as the "German spirit" "VOILA UN HOMME!"--that was as much as
 to say "But this is a MAN! And I only expected to see a German!"
 
 210. Supposing, then, that in the picture of the philosophers of the
 future, some trait suggests the question whether they must not perhaps
 be skeptics in the last-mentioned sense, something in them would only be
 designated thereby--and not they themselves. With equal right they might
 call themselves critics, and assuredly they will be men of experiments.
 By the name with which I ventured to baptize them, I have already
 expressly emphasized their attempting and their love of attempting is
 this because, as critics in body and soul, they will love to make use
 of experiments in a new, and perhaps wider and more dangerous sense? In
 their passion for knowledge, will they have to go further in daring and
 painful attempts than the sensitive and pampered taste of a democratic
 century can approve of?--There is no doubt these coming ones will be
 least able to dispense with the serious and not unscrupulous qualities
 which distinguish the critic from the skeptic I mean the certainty as to
 standards of worth, the conscious employment of a unity of method,
 the wary courage, the standing-alone, and the capacity for
 self-responsibility, indeed, they will avow among themselves a DELIGHT
 in denial and dissection, and a certain considerate cruelty, which knows
 how to handle the knife surely and deftly, even when the heart bleeds
 They will be STERNER (and perhaps not always towards themselves only)
 than humane people may desire, they will not deal with the "truth" in
 order that it may "please" them, or "elevate" and "inspire" them--they
 will rather have little faith in "TRUTH" bringing with it such revels
 for the feelings. They will smile, those rigorous spirits, when any one
 says in their presence "That thought elevates me, why should it not be
 true?" or "That work enchants me, why should it not be beautiful?" or
 "That artist enlarges me, why should he not be great?" Perhaps they
 will not only have a smile, but a genuine disgust for all that is thus
 rapturous, idealistic, feminine, and hermaphroditic, and if any one
 could look into their inmost hearts, he would not easily find therein
 the intention to reconcile "Christian sentiments" with "antique taste,"
 or even with "modern parliamentarism" (the kind of reconciliation
 necessarily found even among philosophers in our very uncertain and
 consequently very conciliatory century). Critical discipline, and every
 habit that conduces to purity and rigour in intellectual matters,
 will not only be demanded from themselves by these philosophers of
 the future, they may even make a display thereof as their special
 adornment--nevertheless they will not want to be called critics on that
 account. It will seem to them no small indignity to philosophy to
 have it decreed, as is so welcome nowadays, that "philosophy itself is
 criticism and critical science--and nothing else whatever!" Though this
 estimate of philosophy may enjoy the approval of all the Positivists of
 France and Germany (and possibly it even flattered the heart and taste
 of KANT: let us call to mind the titles of his principal works), our new
 philosophers will say, notwithstanding, that critics are instruments of
 the philosopher, and just on that account, as instruments, they are
 far from being philosophers themselves! Even the great Chinaman of
 Konigsberg was only a great critic.
 
 211. I insist upon it that people finally cease confounding
 philosophical workers, and in general scientific men, with
 philosophers--that precisely here one should strictly give "each his
 own," and not give those far too much, these far too little. It may
 be necessary for the education of the real philosopher that he himself
 should have once stood upon all those steps upon which his servants,
 the scientific workers of philosophy, remain standing, and MUST remain
 standing he himself must perhaps have been critic, and dogmatist,
 and historian, and besides, poet, and collector, and traveler, and
 riddle-reader, and moralist, and seer, and "free spirit," and almost
 everything, in order to traverse the whole range of human values
 and estimations, and that he may BE ABLE with a variety of eyes and
 consciences to look from a height to any distance, from a depth up
 to any height, from a nook into any expanse. But all these are only
 preliminary conditions for his task; this task itself demands something
 else--it requires him TO CREATE VALUES. The philosophical workers, after
 the excellent pattern of Kant and Hegel, have to fix and formalize some
 great existing body of valuations--that is to say, former DETERMINATIONS
 OF VALUE, creations of value, which have become prevalent, and are for
 a time called "truths"--whether in the domain of the LOGICAL, the
 POLITICAL (moral), or the ARTISTIC. It is for these investigators to
 make whatever has happened and been esteemed hitherto, conspicuous,
 conceivable, intelligible, and manageable, to shorten everything long,
 even "time" itself, and to SUBJUGATE the entire past: an immense and
 wonderful task, in the carrying out of which all refined pride, all
 tenacious will, can surely find satisfaction. THE REAL PHILOSOPHERS,
 HOWEVER, ARE COMMANDERS AND LAW-GIVERS; they say: "Thus SHALL it be!"
 They determine first the Whither and the Why of mankind, and thereby
 set aside the previous labour of all philosophical workers, and all
 subjugators of the past--they grasp at the future with a creative
 hand, and whatever is and was, becomes for them thereby a means, an
 instrument, and a hammer. Their "knowing" is CREATING, their creating
 is a law-giving, their will to truth is--WILL TO POWER.--Are there at
 present such philosophers? Have there ever been such philosophers? MUST
 there not be such philosophers some day? ...
 
 212. It is always more obvious to me that the philosopher, as a man
 INDISPENSABLE for the morrow and the day after the morrow, has ever
 found himself, and HAS BEEN OBLIGED to find himself, in contradiction
 to the day in which he lives; his enemy has always been the ideal of his
 day. Hitherto all those extraordinary furtherers of humanity whom one
 calls philosophers--who rarely regarded themselves as lovers of wisdom,
 but rather as disagreeable fools and dangerous interrogators--have found
 their mission, their hard, involuntary, imperative mission (in the end,
 however, the greatness of their mission), in being the bad conscience of
 their age. In putting the vivisector's knife to the breast of the very
 VIRTUES OF THEIR AGE, they have betrayed their own secret; it has been
 for the sake of a NEW greatness of man, a new untrodden path to
 his aggrandizement. They have always disclosed how much hypocrisy,
 indolence, self-indulgence, and self-neglect, how much falsehood was
 concealed under the most venerated types of contemporary morality, how
 much virtue was OUTLIVED, they have always said "We must remove hence to
 where YOU are least at home" In the face of a world of "modern ideas,"
 which would like to confine every one in a corner, in a "specialty," a
 philosopher, if there could be philosophers nowadays, would be compelled
 to place the greatness of man, the conception of "greatness," precisely
 in his comprehensiveness and multifariousness, in his all-roundness, he
 would even determine worth and rank according to the amount and variety
 of that which a man could bear and take upon himself, according to the
 EXTENT to which a man could stretch his responsibility Nowadays the
 taste and virtue of the age weaken and attenuate the will, nothing is
 so adapted to the spirit of the age as weakness of will consequently, in
 the ideal of the philosopher, strength of will, sternness, and capacity
 for prolonged resolution, must specially be included in the conception
 of "greatness", with as good a right as the opposite doctrine, with its
 ideal of a silly, renouncing, humble, selfless humanity, was suited to
 an opposite age--such as the sixteenth century, which suffered from its
 accumulated energy of will, and from the wildest torrents and floods
 of selfishness In the time of Socrates, among men only of worn-out
 instincts, old conservative Athenians who let themselves go--"for the
 sake of happiness," as they said, for the sake of pleasure, as their
 conduct indicated--and who had continually on their lips the old pompous
 words to which they had long forfeited the right by the life they led,
 IRONY was perhaps necessary for greatness of soul, the wicked Socratic
 assurance of the old physician and plebeian, who cut ruthlessly into his
 own flesh, as into the flesh and heart of the "noble," with a look that
 said plainly enough "Do not dissemble before me! here--we are equal!"
 At present, on the contrary, when throughout Europe the herding-animal
 alone attains to honours, and dispenses honours, when "equality of
 right" can too readily be transformed into equality in wrong--I mean to
 say into general war against everything rare, strange, and privileged,
 against the higher man, the higher soul, the higher duty, the higher
 responsibility, the creative plenipotence and lordliness--at present
 it belongs to the conception of "greatness" to be noble, to wish to be
 apart, to be capable of being different, to stand alone, to have to live
 by personal initiative, and the philosopher will betray something of his
 own ideal when he asserts "He shall be the greatest who can be the most
 solitary, the most concealed, the most divergent, the man beyond good
 and evil, the master of his virtues, and of super-abundance of will;
 precisely this shall be called GREATNESS: as diversified as can be
 entire, as ample as can be full." And to ask once more the question: Is
 greatness POSSIBLE--nowadays?
 
 213. It is difficult to learn what a philosopher is, because it cannot
 be taught: one must "know" it by experience--or one should have the
 pride NOT to know it. The fact that at present people all talk of things
 of which they CANNOT have any experience, is true more especially
 and unfortunately as concerns the philosopher and philosophical
 matters:--the very few know them, are permitted to know them, and
 all popular ideas about them are false. Thus, for instance, the truly
 philosophical combination of a bold, exuberant spirituality which runs
 at presto pace, and a dialectic rigour and necessity which makes no
 false step, is unknown to most thinkers and scholars from their own
 experience, and therefore, should any one speak of it in their
 presence, it is incredible to them. They conceive of every necessity as
 troublesome, as a painful compulsory obedience and state of constraint;
 thinking itself is regarded by them as something slow and hesitating,
 almost as a trouble, and often enough as "worthy of the SWEAT of the
 noble"--but not at all as something easy and divine, closely related
 to dancing and exuberance! "To think" and to take a matter "seriously,"
 "arduously"--that is one and the same thing to them; such only has been
 their "experience."--Artists have here perhaps a finer intuition; they
 who know only too well that precisely when they no longer do anything
 "arbitrarily," and everything of necessity, their feeling of freedom,
 of subtlety, of power, of creatively fixing, disposing, and shaping,
 reaches its climax--in short, that necessity and "freedom of will" are
 then the same thing with them. There is, in fine, a gradation of rank
 in psychical states, to which the gradation of rank in the problems
 corresponds; and the highest problems repel ruthlessly every one who
 ventures too near them, without being predestined for their solution
 by the loftiness and power of his spirituality. Of what use is it for
 nimble, everyday intellects, or clumsy, honest mechanics and empiricists
 to press, in their plebeian ambition, close to such problems, and as
 it were into this "holy of holies"--as so often happens nowadays! But
 coarse feet must never tread upon such carpets: this is provided for in
 the primary law of things; the doors remain closed to those intruders,
 though they may dash and break their heads thereon. People have always
 to be born to a high station, or, more definitely, they have to be BRED
 for it: a person has only a right to philosophy--taking the word in
 its higher significance--in virtue of his descent; the ancestors, the
 "blood," decide here also. Many generations must have prepared the way
 for the coming of the philosopher; each of his virtues must have been
 separately acquired, nurtured, transmitted, and embodied; not only the
 bold, easy, delicate course and current of his thoughts, but above all
 the readiness for great responsibilities, the majesty of ruling glance
 and contemning look, the feeling of separation from the multitude with
 their duties and virtues, the kindly patronage and defense of whatever
 is misunderstood and calumniated, be it God or devil, the delight and
 practice of supreme justice, the art of commanding, the amplitude of
 will, the lingering eye which rarely admires, rarely looks up, rarely
 loves....
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII. OUR VIRTUES
 
 
 214. OUR Virtues?--It is probable that we, too, have still our virtues,
 although naturally they are not those sincere and massive virtues on
 account of which we hold our grandfathers in esteem and also at a little
 distance from us. We Europeans of the day after tomorrow, we firstlings
 of the twentieth century--with all our dangerous curiosity, our
 multifariousness and art of disguising, our mellow and seemingly
 sweetened cruelty in sense and spirit--we shall presumably, IF we must
 have virtues, have those only which have come to agreement with our most
 secret and heartfelt inclinations, with our most ardent requirements:
 well, then, let us look for them in our labyrinths!--where, as we know,
 so many things lose themselves, so many things get quite lost! And is
 there anything finer than to SEARCH for one's own virtues? Is it not
 almost to BELIEVE in one's own virtues? But this "believing in one's
 own virtues"--is it not practically the same as what was formerly called
 one's "good conscience," that long, respectable pigtail of an idea,
 which our grandfathers used to hang behind their heads, and often enough
 also behind their understandings? It seems, therefore, that however
 little we may imagine ourselves to be old-fashioned and grandfatherly
 respectable in other respects, in one thing we are nevertheless the
 worthy grandchildren of our grandfathers, we last Europeans with good
 consciences: we also still wear their pigtail.--Ah! if you only knew how
 soon, so very soon--it will be different!
 
 215. As in the stellar firmament there are sometimes two suns which
 determine the path of one planet, and in certain cases suns of different
 colours shine around a single planet, now with red light, now with
 green, and then simultaneously illumine and flood it with motley
 colours: so we modern men, owing to the complicated mechanism of our
 "firmament," are determined by DIFFERENT moralities; our actions shine
 alternately in different colours, and are seldom unequivocal--and there
 are often cases, also, in which our actions are MOTLEY-COLOURED.
 
 216. To love one's enemies? I think that has been well learnt: it takes
 place thousands of times at present on a large and small scale; indeed,
 at times the higher and sublimer thing takes place:--we learn to DESPISE
 when we love, and precisely when we love best; all of it, however,
 unconsciously, without noise, without ostentation, with the shame and
 secrecy of goodness, which forbids the utterance of the pompous word
 and the formula of virtue. Morality as attitude--is opposed to our taste
 nowadays. This is ALSO an advance, as it was an advance in our fathers
 that religion as an attitude finally became opposed to their taste,
 including the enmity and Voltairean bitterness against religion (and all
 that formerly belonged to freethinker-pantomime). It is the music in our
 conscience, the dance in our spirit, to which Puritan litanies, moral
 sermons, and goody-goodness won't chime.
 
 217. Let us be careful in dealing with those who attach great importance
 to being credited with moral tact and subtlety in moral discernment!
 They never forgive us if they have once made a mistake BEFORE us
 (or even with REGARD to us)--they inevitably become our instinctive
 calumniators and detractors, even when they still remain our
 "friends."--Blessed are the forgetful: for they "get the better" even of
 their blunders.
 
 218. The psychologists of France--and where else are there still
 psychologists nowadays?--have never yet exhausted their bitter and
 manifold enjoyment of the betise bourgeoise, just as though... in
 short, they betray something thereby. Flaubert, for instance, the honest
 citizen of Rouen, neither saw, heard, nor tasted anything else in the
 end; it was his mode of self-torment and refined cruelty. As this is
 growing wearisome, I would now recommend for a change something else
 for a pleasure--namely, the unconscious astuteness with which good, fat,
 honest mediocrity always behaves towards loftier spirits and the tasks
 they have to perform, the subtle, barbed, Jesuitical astuteness, which
 is a thousand times subtler than the taste and understanding of the
 middle-class in its best moments--subtler even than the understanding of
 its victims:--a repeated proof that "instinct" is the most intelligent
 of all kinds of intelligence which have hitherto been discovered. In
 short, you psychologists, study the philosophy of the "rule" in its
 struggle with the "exception": there you have a spectacle fit for Gods
 and godlike malignity! Or, in plainer words, practise vivisection on
 "good people," on the "homo bonae voluntatis," ON YOURSELVES!
 
 219. The practice of judging and condemning morally, is the favourite
 revenge of the intellectually shallow on those who are less so, it is
 also a kind of indemnity for their being badly endowed by nature,
 and finally, it is an opportunity for acquiring spirit and BECOMING
 subtle--malice spiritualises. They are glad in their inmost heart that
 there is a standard according to which those who are over-endowed with
 intellectual goods and privileges, are equal to them, they contend for
 the "equality of all before God," and almost NEED the belief in God for
 this purpose. It is among them that the most powerful antagonists of
 atheism are found. If any one were to say to them "A lofty spirituality
 is beyond all comparison with the honesty and respectability of a merely
 moral man"--it would make them furious, I shall take care not to say
 so. I would rather flatter them with my theory that lofty spirituality
 itself exists only as the ultimate product of moral qualities, that it
 is a synthesis of all qualities attributed to the "merely moral" man,
 after they have been acquired singly through long training and practice,
 perhaps during a whole series of generations, that lofty spirituality
 is precisely the spiritualising of justice, and the beneficent severity
 which knows that it is authorized to maintain GRADATIONS OF RANK in the
 world, even among things--and not only among men.
 
 220. Now that the praise of the "disinterested person" is so popular
 one must--probably not without some danger--get an idea of WHAT people
 actually take an interest in, and what are the things generally which
 fundamentally and profoundly concern ordinary men--including the
 cultured, even the learned, and perhaps philosophers also, if
 appearances do not deceive. The fact thereby becomes obvious that the
 greater part of what interests and charms higher natures, and more
 refined and fastidious tastes, seems absolutely "uninteresting" to
 the average man--if, notwithstanding, he perceive devotion to these
 interests, he calls it desinteresse, and wonders how it is possible to
 act "disinterestedly." There have been philosophers who could give this
 popular astonishment a seductive and mystical, other-worldly expression
 (perhaps because they did not know the higher nature by experience?),
 instead of stating the naked and candidly reasonable truth that
 "disinterested" action is very interesting and "interested" action,
 provided that... "And love?"--What! Even an action for love's sake
 shall be "unegoistic"? But you fools--! "And the praise of the
 self-sacrificer?"--But whoever has really offered sacrifice knows that
 he wanted and obtained something for it--perhaps something from himself
 for something from himself; that he relinquished here in order to have
 more there, perhaps in general to be more, or even feel himself "more."
 But this is a realm of questions and answers in which a more fastidious
 spirit does not like to stay: for here truth has to stifle her yawns so
 much when she is obliged to answer. And after all, truth is a woman; one
 must not use force with her.
 
 221. "It sometimes happens," said a moralistic pedant and
 trifle-retailer, "that I honour and respect an unselfish man: not,
 however, because he is unselfish, but because I think he has a right to
 be useful to another man at his own expense. In short, the question
 is always who HE is, and who THE OTHER is. For instance, in a person
 created and destined for command, self-denial and modest retirement,
 instead of being virtues, would be the waste of virtues: so it seems
 to me. Every system of unegoistic morality which takes itself
 unconditionally and appeals to every one, not only sins against good
 taste, but is also an incentive to sins of omission, an ADDITIONAL
 seduction under the mask of philanthropy--and precisely a seduction and
 injury to the higher, rarer, and more privileged types of men. Moral
 systems must be compelled first of all to bow before the GRADATIONS OF
 RANK; their presumption must be driven home to their conscience--until
 they thoroughly understand at last that it is IMMORAL to say that 'what
 is right for one is proper for another.'"--So said my moralistic pedant
 and bonhomme. Did he perhaps deserve to be laughed at when he thus
 exhorted systems of morals to practise morality? But one should not be
 too much in the right if one wishes to have the laughers on ONE'S OWN
 side; a grain of wrong pertains even to good taste.
 
 222. Wherever sympathy (fellow-suffering) is preached nowadays--and,
 if I gather rightly, no other religion is any longer preached--let the
 psychologist have his ears open through all the vanity, through all the
 noise which is natural to these preachers (as to all preachers), he will
 hear a hoarse, groaning, genuine note of SELF-CONTEMPT. It belongs
 to the overshadowing and uglifying of Europe, which has been on
 the increase for a century (the first symptoms of which are already
 specified documentarily in a thoughtful letter of Galiani to Madame
 d'Epinay)--IF IT IS NOT REALLY THE CAUSE THEREOF! The man of
 "modern ideas," the conceited ape, is excessively dissatisfied with
 himself--this is perfectly certain. He suffers, and his vanity wants him
 only "to suffer with his fellows."
 
 223. The hybrid European--a tolerably ugly plebeian, taken all in
 all--absolutely requires a costume: he needs history as a storeroom
 of costumes. To be sure, he notices that none of the costumes fit him
 properly--he changes and changes. Let us look at the nineteenth century
 with respect to these hasty preferences and changes in its masquerades
 of style, and also with respect to its moments of desperation on account
 of "nothing suiting" us. It is in vain to get ourselves up as romantic,
 or classical, or Christian, or Florentine, or barocco, or "national,"
 in moribus et artibus: it does not "clothe us"! But the "spirit,"
 especially the "historical spirit," profits even by this desperation:
 once and again a new sample of the past or of the foreign is tested,
 put on, taken off, packed up, and above all studied--we are the first
 studious age in puncto of "costumes," I mean as concerns morals,
 articles of belief, artistic tastes, and religions; we are prepared as
 no other age has ever been for a carnival in the grand style, for the
 most spiritual festival--laughter and arrogance, for the transcendental
 height of supreme folly and Aristophanic ridicule of the world. Perhaps
 we are still discovering the domain of our invention just here, the
 domain where even we can still be original, probably as parodists of
 the world's history and as God's Merry-Andrews,--perhaps, though nothing
 else of the present have a future, our laughter itself may have a
 future!
 
 224. The historical sense (or the capacity for divining quickly
 the order of rank of the valuations according to which a people, a
 community, or an individual has lived, the "divining instinct" for the
 relationships of these valuations, for the relation of the authority
 of the valuations to the authority of the operating forces),--this
 historical sense, which we Europeans claim as our specialty, has come
 to us in the train of the enchanting and mad semi-barbarity into which
 Europe has been plunged by the democratic mingling of classes and
 races--it is only the nineteenth century that has recognized this
 faculty as its sixth sense. Owing to this mingling, the past of every
 form and mode of life, and of cultures which were formerly closely
 contiguous and superimposed on one another, flows forth into us "modern
 souls"; our instincts now run back in all directions, we ourselves are
 a kind of chaos: in the end, as we have said, the spirit perceives its
 advantage therein. By means of our semi-barbarity in body and in desire,
 we have secret access everywhere, such as a noble age never had; we have
 access above all to the labyrinth of imperfect civilizations, and to
 every form of semi-barbarity that has at any time existed on earth; and
 in so far as the most considerable part of human civilization hitherto
 has just been semi-barbarity, the "historical sense" implies almost the
 sense and instinct for everything, the taste and tongue for everything:
 whereby it immediately proves itself to be an IGNOBLE sense. For
 instance, we enjoy Homer once more: it is perhaps our happiest
 acquisition that we know how to appreciate Homer, whom men of
 distinguished culture (as the French of the seventeenth century, like
 Saint-Evremond, who reproached him for his ESPRIT VASTE, and even
 Voltaire, the last echo of the century) cannot and could not so easily
 appropriate--whom they scarcely permitted themselves to enjoy. The very
 decided Yea and Nay of their palate, their promptly ready disgust, their
 hesitating reluctance with regard to everything strange, their horror of
 the bad taste even of lively curiosity, and in general the averseness of
 every distinguished and self-sufficing culture to avow a new desire,
 a dissatisfaction with its own condition, or an admiration of what is
 strange: all this determines and disposes them unfavourably even towards
 the best things of the world which are not their property or could not
 become their prey--and no faculty is more unintelligible to such men
 than just this historical sense, with its truckling, plebeian
 curiosity. The case is not different with Shakespeare, that marvelous
 Spanish-Moorish-Saxon synthesis of taste, over whom an ancient Athenian
 of the circle of AEschylus would have half-killed himself with laughter
 or irritation: but we--accept precisely this wild motleyness, this
 medley of the most delicate, the most coarse, and the most artificial,
 with a secret confidence and cordiality; we enjoy it as a refinement
 of art reserved expressly for us, and allow ourselves to be as little
 disturbed by the repulsive fumes and the proximity of the English
 populace in which Shakespeare's art and taste lives, as perhaps on
 the Chiaja of Naples, where, with all our senses awake, we go our way,
 enchanted and voluntarily, in spite of the drain-odour of the lower
 quarters of the town. That as men of the "historical sense" we have
 our virtues, is not to be disputed:--we are unpretentious, unselfish,
 modest, brave, habituated to self-control and self-renunciation, very
 grateful, very patient, very complaisant--but with all this we are
 perhaps not very "tasteful." Let us finally confess it, that what is
 most difficult for us men of the "historical sense" to grasp, feel,
 taste, and love, what finds us fundamentally prejudiced and almost
 hostile, is precisely the perfection and ultimate maturity in every
 culture and art, the essentially noble in works and men, their moment
 of smooth sea and halcyon self-sufficiency, the goldenness and coldness
 which all things show that have perfected themselves. Perhaps our great
 virtue of the historical sense is in necessary contrast to GOOD taste,
 at least to the very bad taste; and we can only evoke in ourselves
 imperfectly, hesitatingly, and with compulsion the small, short, and
 happy godsends and glorifications of human life as they shine here and
 there: those moments and marvelous experiences when a great power has
 voluntarily come to a halt before the boundless and infinite,--when a
 super-abundance of refined delight has been enjoyed by a sudden checking
 and petrifying, by standing firmly and planting oneself fixedly on still
 trembling ground. PROPORTIONATENESS is strange to us, let us confess it
 to ourselves; our itching is really the itching for the infinite, the
 immeasurable. Like the rider on his forward panting horse, we let the
 reins fall before the infinite, we modern men, we semi-barbarians--and
 are only in OUR highest bliss when we--ARE IN MOST DANGER.
 
 225. Whether it be hedonism, pessimism, utilitarianism, or eudaemonism,
 all those modes of thinking which measure the worth of things according
 to PLEASURE and PAIN, that is, according to accompanying circumstances
 and secondary considerations, are plausible modes of thought and
 naivetes, which every one conscious of CREATIVE powers and an artist's
 conscience will look down upon with scorn, though not without sympathy.
 Sympathy for you!--to be sure, that is not sympathy as you understand
 it: it is not sympathy for social "distress," for "society" with its
 sick and misfortuned, for the hereditarily vicious and defective who lie
 on the ground around us; still less is it sympathy for the grumbling,
 vexed, revolutionary slave-classes who strive after power--they call it
 "freedom." OUR sympathy is a loftier and further-sighted sympathy:--we
 see how MAN dwarfs himself, how YOU dwarf him! and there are moments
 when we view YOUR sympathy with an indescribable anguish, when we resist
 it,--when we regard your seriousness as more dangerous than any kind
 of levity. You want, if possible--and there is not a more foolish "if
 possible"--TO DO AWAY WITH SUFFERING; and we?--it really seems that WE
 would rather have it increased and made worse than it has ever been!
 Well-being, as you understand it--is certainly not a goal; it seems
 to us an END; a condition which at once renders man ludicrous and
 contemptible--and makes his destruction DESIRABLE! The discipline
 of suffering, of GREAT suffering--know ye not that it is only THIS
 discipline that has produced all the elevations of humanity hitherto?
 The tension of soul in misfortune which communicates to it its energy,
 its shuddering in view of rack and ruin, its inventiveness and bravery
 in undergoing, enduring, interpreting, and exploiting misfortune, and
 whatever depth, mystery, disguise, spirit, artifice, or greatness has
 been bestowed upon the soul--has it not been bestowed through suffering,
 through the discipline of great suffering? In man CREATURE and CREATOR
 are united: in man there is not only matter, shred, excess, clay, mire,
 folly, chaos; but there is also the creator, the sculptor, the hardness
 of the hammer, the divinity of the spectator, and the seventh day--do
 ye understand this contrast? And that YOUR sympathy for the "creature
 in man" applies to that which has to be fashioned, bruised, forged,
 stretched, roasted, annealed, refined--to that which must necessarily
 SUFFER, and IS MEANT to suffer? And our sympathy--do ye not understand
 what our REVERSE sympathy applies to, when it resists your sympathy as
 the worst of all pampering and enervation?--So it is sympathy AGAINST
 sympathy!--But to repeat it once more, there are higher problems than
 the problems of pleasure and pain and sympathy; and all systems of
 philosophy which deal only with these are naivetes.
 
 226. WE IMMORALISTS.--This world with which WE are concerned, in which
 we have to fear and love, this almost invisible, inaudible world of
 delicate command and delicate obedience, a world of "almost" in every
 respect, captious, insidious, sharp, and tender--yes, it is well
 protected from clumsy spectators and familiar curiosity! We are
 woven into a strong net and garment of duties, and CANNOT disengage
 ourselves--precisely here, we are "men of duty," even we! Occasionally,
 it is true, we dance in our "chains" and betwixt our "swords"; it
 is none the less true that more often we gnash our teeth under the
 circumstances, and are impatient at the secret hardship of our lot. But
 do what we will, fools and appearances say of us: "These are men WITHOUT
 duty,"--we have always fools and appearances against us!
 
 227. Honesty, granting that it is the virtue of which we cannot rid
 ourselves, we free spirits--well, we will labour at it with all our
 perversity and love, and not tire of "perfecting" ourselves in OUR
 virtue, which alone remains: may its glance some day overspread like
 a gilded, blue, mocking twilight this aging civilization with its dull
 gloomy seriousness! And if, nevertheless, our honesty should one day
 grow weary, and sigh, and stretch its limbs, and find us too hard, and
 would fain have it pleasanter, easier, and gentler, like an agreeable
 vice, let us remain HARD, we latest Stoics, and let us send to its
 help whatever devilry we have in us:--our disgust at the clumsy
 and undefined, our "NITIMUR IN VETITUM," our love of adventure,
 our sharpened and fastidious curiosity, our most subtle, disguised,
 intellectual Will to Power and universal conquest, which rambles and
 roves avidiously around all the realms of the future--let us go with all
 our "devils" to the help of our "God"! It is probable that people will
 misunderstand and mistake us on that account: what does it matter! They
 will say: "Their 'honesty'--that is their devilry, and nothing else!"
 What does it matter! And even if they were right--have not all Gods
 hitherto been such sanctified, re-baptized devils? And after all, what
 do we know of ourselves? And what the spirit that leads us wants TO BE
 CALLED? (It is a question of names.) And how many spirits we harbour?
 Our honesty, we free spirits--let us be careful lest it become our
 vanity, our ornament and ostentation, our limitation, our stupidity!
 Every virtue inclines to stupidity, every stupidity to virtue; "stupid
 to the point of sanctity," they say in Russia,--let us be careful lest
 out of pure honesty we eventually become saints and bores! Is not life
 a hundred times too short for us--to bore ourselves? One would have to
 believe in eternal life in order to...
 
 228. I hope to be forgiven for discovering that all moral philosophy
 hitherto has been tedious and has belonged to the soporific
 appliances--and that "virtue," in my opinion, has been MORE injured
 by the TEDIOUSNESS of its advocates than by anything else; at the same
 time, however, I would not wish to overlook their general usefulness. It
 is desirable that as few people as possible should reflect upon morals,
 and consequently it is very desirable that morals should not some day
 become interesting! But let us not be afraid! Things still remain today
 as they have always been: I see no one in Europe who has (or DISCLOSES)
 an idea of the fact that philosophizing concerning morals might be
 conducted in a dangerous, captious, and ensnaring manner--that CALAMITY
 might be involved therein. Observe, for example, the indefatigable,
 inevitable English utilitarians: how ponderously and respectably they
 stalk on, stalk along (a Homeric metaphor expresses it better) in the
 footsteps of Bentham, just as he had already stalked in the footsteps of
 the respectable Helvetius! (no, he was not a dangerous man, Helvetius,
 CE SENATEUR POCOCURANTE, to use an expression of Galiani). No new
 thought, nothing of the nature of a finer turning or better expression
 of an old thought, not even a proper history of what has been previously
 thought on the subject: an IMPOSSIBLE literature, taking it all in all,
 unless one knows how to leaven it with some mischief. In effect, the
 old English vice called CANT, which is MORAL TARTUFFISM, has insinuated
 itself also into these moralists (whom one must certainly read with an
 eye to their motives if one MUST read them), concealed this time under
 the new form of the scientific spirit; moreover, there is not absent
 from them a secret struggle with the pangs of conscience, from which a
 race of former Puritans must naturally suffer, in all their scientific
 tinkering with morals. (Is not a moralist the opposite of a Puritan?
 That is to say, as a thinker who regards morality as questionable,
 as worthy of interrogation, in short, as a problem? Is moralizing
 not-immoral?) In the end, they all want English morality to be
 recognized as authoritative, inasmuch as mankind, or the "general
 utility," or "the happiness of the greatest number,"--no! the happiness
 of ENGLAND, will be best served thereby. They would like, by all means,
 to convince themselves that the striving after English happiness, I
 mean after COMFORT and FASHION (and in the highest instance, a seat in
 Parliament), is at the same time the true path of virtue; in fact, that
 in so far as there has been virtue in the world hitherto, it has
 just consisted in such striving. Not one of those ponderous,
 conscience-stricken herding-animals (who undertake to advocate the
 cause of egoism as conducive to the general welfare) wants to have
 any knowledge or inkling of the facts that the "general welfare" is
 no ideal, no goal, no notion that can be at all grasped, but is only a
 nostrum,--that what is fair to one MAY NOT at all be fair to another,
 that the requirement of one morality for all is really a detriment to
 higher men, in short, that there is a DISTINCTION OF RANK between man
 and man, and consequently between morality and morality. They are an
 unassuming and fundamentally mediocre species of men, these utilitarian
 Englishmen, and, as already remarked, in so far as they are tedious, one
 cannot think highly enough of their utility. One ought even to ENCOURAGE
 them, as has been partially attempted in the following rhymes:--
 
     Hail, ye worthies, barrow-wheeling,
     "Longer--better," aye revealing,
 
     Stiffer aye in head and knee;
     Unenraptured, never jesting,
     Mediocre everlasting,
 
     SANS GENIE ET SANS ESPRIT!
 
 
 229. In these later ages, which may be proud of their humanity, there
 still remains so much fear, so much SUPERSTITION of the fear, of the
 "cruel wild beast," the mastering of which constitutes the very pride of
 these humaner ages--that even obvious truths, as if by the agreement
 of centuries, have long remained unuttered, because they have the
 appearance of helping the finally slain wild beast back to life again.
 I perhaps risk something when I allow such a truth to escape; let
 others capture it again and give it so much "milk of pious sentiment"
 [FOOTNOTE: An expression from Schiller's William Tell, Act IV, Scene
 3.] to drink, that it will lie down quiet and forgotten, in its old
 corner.--One ought to learn anew about cruelty, and open one's eyes;
 one ought at last to learn impatience, in order that such immodest
 gross errors--as, for instance, have been fostered by ancient and
 modern philosophers with regard to tragedy--may no longer wander about
 virtuously and boldly. Almost everything that we call "higher culture"
 is based upon the spiritualising and intensifying of CRUELTY--this is
 my thesis; the "wild beast" has not been slain at all, it lives, it
 flourishes, it has only been--transfigured. That which constitutes the
 painful delight of tragedy is cruelty; that which operates agreeably in
 so-called tragic sympathy, and at the basis even of everything sublime,
 up to the highest and most delicate thrills of metaphysics, obtains its
 sweetness solely from the intermingled ingredient of cruelty. What the
 Roman enjoys in the arena, the Christian in the ecstasies of the cross,
 the Spaniard at the sight of the faggot and stake, or of the bull-fight,
 the present-day Japanese who presses his way to the tragedy, the workman
 of the Parisian suburbs who has a homesickness for bloody revolutions,
 the Wagnerienne who, with unhinged will, "undergoes" the performance of
 "Tristan and Isolde"--what all these enjoy, and strive with mysterious
 ardour to drink in, is the philtre of the great Circe "cruelty." Here,
 to be sure, we must put aside entirely the blundering psychology of
 former times, which could only teach with regard to cruelty that
 it originated at the sight of the suffering of OTHERS: there is an
 abundant, super-abundant enjoyment even in one's own suffering, in
 causing one's own suffering--and wherever man has allowed himself to be
 persuaded to self-denial in the RELIGIOUS sense, or to self-mutilation,
 as among the Phoenicians and ascetics, or in general, to
 desensualisation, decarnalisation, and contrition, to Puritanical
 repentance-spasms, to vivisection of conscience and to Pascal-like
 SACRIFIZIA DELL' INTELLETO, he is secretly allured and impelled
 forwards by his cruelty, by the dangerous thrill of cruelty TOWARDS
 HIMSELF.--Finally, let us consider that even the seeker of knowledge
 operates as an artist and glorifier of cruelty, in that he compels his
 spirit to perceive AGAINST its own inclination, and often enough against
 the wishes of his heart:--he forces it to say Nay, where he would like
 to affirm, love, and adore; indeed, every instance of taking a thing
 profoundly and fundamentally, is a violation, an intentional injuring
 of the fundamental will of the spirit, which instinctively aims at
 appearance and superficiality,--even in every desire for knowledge there
 is a drop of cruelty.
 
 230. Perhaps what I have said here about a "fundamental will of the
 spirit" may not be understood without further details; I may be allowed
 a word of explanation.--That imperious something which is popularly
 called "the spirit," wishes to be master internally and externally,
 and to feel itself master; it has the will of a multiplicity for a
 simplicity, a binding, taming, imperious, and essentially ruling will.
 Its requirements and capacities here, are the same as those assigned by
 physiologists to everything that lives, grows, and multiplies. The power
 of the spirit to appropriate foreign elements reveals itself in a strong
 tendency to assimilate the new to the old, to simplify the manifold,
 to overlook or repudiate the absolutely contradictory; just as it
 arbitrarily re-underlines, makes prominent, and falsifies for itself
 certain traits and lines in the foreign elements, in every portion of
 the "outside world." Its object thereby is the incorporation of new
 "experiences," the assortment of new things in the old arrangements--in
 short, growth; or more properly, the FEELING of growth, the feeling of
 increased power--is its object. This same will has at its service an
 apparently opposed impulse of the spirit, a suddenly adopted preference
 of ignorance, of arbitrary shutting out, a closing of windows, an inner
 denial of this or that, a prohibition to approach, a sort of defensive
 attitude against much that is knowable, a contentment with obscurity,
 with the shutting-in horizon, an acceptance and approval of ignorance:
 as that which is all necessary according to the degree of its
 appropriating power, its "digestive power," to speak figuratively (and
 in fact "the spirit" resembles a stomach more than anything else). Here
 also belong an occasional propensity of the spirit to let itself be
 deceived (perhaps with a waggish suspicion that it is NOT so and so,
 but is only allowed to pass as such), a delight in uncertainty and
 ambiguity, an exulting enjoyment of arbitrary, out-of-the-way narrowness
 and mystery, of the too-near, of the foreground, of the magnified,
 the diminished, the misshapen, the beautified--an enjoyment of the
 arbitrariness of all these manifestations of power. Finally, in this
 connection, there is the not unscrupulous readiness of the spirit to
 deceive other spirits and dissemble before them--the constant pressing
 and straining of a creating, shaping, changeable power: the spirit
 enjoys therein its craftiness and its variety of disguises, it enjoys
 also its feeling of security therein--it is precisely by its Protean
 arts that it is best protected and concealed!--COUNTER TO this
 propensity for appearance, for simplification, for a disguise, for a
 cloak, in short, for an outside--for every outside is a cloak--there
 operates the sublime tendency of the man of knowledge, which takes, and
 INSISTS on taking things profoundly, variously, and thoroughly; as a
 kind of cruelty of the intellectual conscience and taste, which every
 courageous thinker will acknowledge in himself, provided, as it ought
 to be, that he has sharpened and hardened his eye sufficiently long for
 introspection, and is accustomed to severe discipline and even severe
 words. He will say: "There is something cruel in the tendency of my
 spirit": let the virtuous and amiable try to convince him that it is not
 so! In fact, it would sound nicer, if, instead of our cruelty, perhaps
 our "extravagant honesty" were talked about, whispered about, and
 glorified--we free, VERY free spirits--and some day perhaps SUCH will
 actually be our--posthumous glory! Meanwhile--for there is plenty of
 time until then--we should be least inclined to deck ourselves out in
 such florid and fringed moral verbiage; our whole former work has
 just made us sick of this taste and its sprightly exuberance. They are
 beautiful, glistening, jingling, festive words: honesty, love of truth,
 love of wisdom, sacrifice for knowledge, heroism of the truthful--there
 is something in them that makes one's heart swell with pride. But we
 anchorites and marmots have long ago persuaded ourselves in all the
 secrecy of an anchorite's conscience, that this worthy parade of
 verbiage also belongs to the old false adornment, frippery, and
 gold-dust of unconscious human vanity, and that even under such
 flattering colour and repainting, the terrible original text HOMO NATURA
 must again be recognized. In effect, to translate man back again into
 nature; to master the many vain and visionary interpretations and
 subordinate meanings which have hitherto been scratched and daubed over
 the eternal original text, HOMO NATURA; to bring it about that man shall
 henceforth stand before man as he now, hardened by the discipline
 of science, stands before the OTHER forms of nature, with fearless
 Oedipus-eyes, and stopped Ulysses-ears, deaf to the enticements of old
 metaphysical bird-catchers, who have piped to him far too long: "Thou
 art more! thou art higher! thou hast a different origin!"--this may be
 a strange and foolish task, but that it is a TASK, who can deny! Why did
 we choose it, this foolish task? Or, to put the question differently:
 "Why knowledge at all?" Every one will ask us about this. And thus
 pressed, we, who have asked ourselves the question a hundred times, have
 not found and cannot find any better answer....
 
 231. Learning alters us, it does what all nourishment does that does not
 merely "conserve"--as the physiologist knows. But at the bottom of our
 souls, quite "down below," there is certainly something unteachable,
 a granite of spiritual fate, of predetermined decision and answer to
 predetermined, chosen questions. In each cardinal problem there speaks
 an unchangeable "I am this"; a thinker cannot learn anew about man and
 woman, for instance, but can only learn fully--he can only follow to the
 end what is "fixed" about them in himself. Occasionally we find certain
 solutions of problems which make strong beliefs for us; perhaps they
 are henceforth called "convictions." Later on--one sees in them only
 footsteps to self-knowledge, guide-posts to the problem which we
 ourselves ARE--or more correctly to the great stupidity which we embody,
 our spiritual fate, the UNTEACHABLE in us, quite "down below."--In view
 of this liberal compliment which I have just paid myself, permission
 will perhaps be more readily allowed me to utter some truths about
 "woman as she is," provided that it is known at the outset how literally
 they are merely--MY truths.
 
 232. Woman wishes to be independent, and therefore she begins to
 enlighten men about "woman as she is"--THIS is one of the worst
 developments of the general UGLIFYING of Europe. For what must these
 clumsy attempts of feminine scientificality and self-exposure bring
 to light! Woman has so much cause for shame; in woman there is so
 much pedantry, superficiality, schoolmasterliness, petty presumption,
 unbridledness, and indiscretion concealed--study only woman's behaviour
 towards children!--which has really been best restrained and dominated
 hitherto by the FEAR of man. Alas, if ever the "eternally tedious in
 woman"--she has plenty of it!--is allowed to venture forth! if she
 begins radically and on principle to unlearn her wisdom and art-of
 charming, of playing, of frightening away sorrow, of alleviating and
 taking easily; if she forgets her delicate aptitude for agreeable
 desires! Female voices are already raised, which, by Saint Aristophanes!
 make one afraid:--with medical explicitness it is stated in a
 threatening manner what woman first and last REQUIRES from man. Is
 it not in the very worst taste that woman thus sets herself up to be
 scientific? Enlightenment hitherto has fortunately been men's affair,
 men's gift--we remained therewith "among ourselves"; and in the end,
 in view of all that women write about "woman," we may well have
 considerable doubt as to whether woman really DESIRES enlightenment
 about herself--and CAN desire it. If woman does not thereby seek a new
 ORNAMENT for herself--I believe ornamentation belongs to the eternally
 feminine?--why, then, she wishes to make herself feared: perhaps she
 thereby wishes to get the mastery. But she does not want truth--what
 does woman care for truth? From the very first, nothing is more foreign,
 more repugnant, or more hostile to woman than truth--her great art is
 falsehood, her chief concern is appearance and beauty. Let us confess
 it, we men: we honour and love this very art and this very instinct in
 woman: we who have the hard task, and for our recreation gladly seek the
 company of beings under whose hands, glances, and delicate follies, our
 seriousness, our gravity, and profundity appear almost like follies to
 us. Finally, I ask the question: Did a woman herself ever acknowledge
 profundity in a woman's mind, or justice in a woman's heart? And is it
 not true that on the whole "woman" has hitherto been most despised by
 woman herself, and not at all by us?--We men desire that woman should
 not continue to compromise herself by enlightening us; just as it was
 man's care and the consideration for woman, when the church decreed:
 mulier taceat in ecclesia. It was to the benefit of woman when Napoleon
 gave the too eloquent Madame de Stael to understand: mulier taceat in
 politicis!--and in my opinion, he is a true friend of woman who calls
 out to women today: mulier taceat de mulierel.
 
 233. It betrays corruption of the instincts--apart from the fact that
 it betrays bad taste--when a woman refers to Madame Roland, or Madame de
 Stael, or Monsieur George Sand, as though something were proved thereby
 in favour of "woman as she is." Among men, these are the three comical
 women as they are--nothing more!--and just the best involuntary
 counter-arguments against feminine emancipation and autonomy.
 
 234. Stupidity in the kitchen; woman as cook; the terrible
 thoughtlessness with which the feeding of the family and the master of
 the house is managed! Woman does not understand what food means, and she
 insists on being cook! If woman had been a thinking creature, she should
 certainly, as cook for thousands of years, have discovered the most
 important physiological facts, and should likewise have got possession
 of the healing art! Through bad female cooks--through the entire lack
 of reason in the kitchen--the development of mankind has been longest
 retarded and most interfered with: even today matters are very little
 better. A word to High School girls.
 
 235. There are turns and casts of fancy, there are sentences, little
 handfuls of words, in which a whole culture, a whole society suddenly
 crystallises itself. Among these is the incidental remark of Madame de
 Lambert to her son: "MON AMI, NE VOUS PERMETTEZ JAMAIS QUE DES FOLIES,
 QUI VOUS FERONT GRAND PLAISIR"--the motherliest and wisest remark, by
 the way, that was ever addressed to a son.
 
 236. I have no doubt that every noble woman will oppose what Dante and
 Goethe believed about woman--the former when he sang, "ELLA GUARDAVA
 SUSO, ED IO IN LEI," and the latter when he interpreted it, "the
 eternally feminine draws us ALOFT"; for THIS is just what she believes
 of the eternally masculine.
 
 237.
 
 SEVEN APOPHTHEGMS FOR WOMEN
 
 How the longest ennui flees, When a man comes to our knees!
 
 Age, alas! and science staid, Furnish even weak virtue aid.
 
 Sombre garb and silence meet: Dress for every dame--discreet.
 
 Whom I thank when in my bliss? God!--and my good tailoress!
 
 Young, a flower-decked cavern home; Old, a dragon thence doth roam.
 
 Noble title, leg that's fine, Man as well: Oh, were HE mine!
 
 Speech in brief and sense in mass--Slippery for the jenny-ass!
 
 237A. Woman has hitherto been treated by men like birds, which, losing
 their way, have come down among them from an elevation: as something
 delicate, fragile, wild, strange, sweet, and animating--but as something
 also which must be cooped up to prevent it flying away.
 
 238. To be mistaken in the fundamental problem of "man and woman," to
 deny here the profoundest antagonism and the necessity for an eternally
 hostile tension, to dream here perhaps of equal rights, equal
 training, equal claims and obligations: that is a TYPICAL sign of
 shallow-mindedness; and a thinker who has proved himself shallow at
 this dangerous spot--shallow in instinct!--may generally be regarded as
 suspicious, nay more, as betrayed, as discovered; he will probably prove
 too "short" for all fundamental questions of life, future as well as
 present, and will be unable to descend into ANY of the depths. On the
 other hand, a man who has depth of spirit as well as of desires, and
 has also the depth of benevolence which is capable of severity and
 harshness, and easily confounded with them, can only think of woman as
 ORIENTALS do: he must conceive of her as a possession, as confinable
 property, as a being predestined for service and accomplishing her
 mission therein--he must take his stand in this matter upon the immense
 rationality of Asia, upon the superiority of the instinct of Asia, as
 the Greeks did formerly; those best heirs and scholars of Asia--who,
 as is well known, with their INCREASING culture and amplitude of power,
 from Homer to the time of Pericles, became gradually STRICTER towards
 woman, in short, more Oriental. HOW necessary, HOW logical, even HOW
 humanely desirable this was, let us consider for ourselves!
 
 239. The weaker sex has in no previous age been treated with so
 much respect by men as at present--this belongs to the tendency and
 fundamental taste of democracy, in the same way as disrespectfulness to
 old age--what wonder is it that abuse should be immediately made of
 this respect? They want more, they learn to make claims, the tribute
 of respect is at last felt to be well-nigh galling; rivalry for rights,
 indeed actual strife itself, would be preferred: in a word, woman is
 losing modesty. And let us immediately add that she is also losing
 taste. She is unlearning to FEAR man: but the woman who "unlearns to
 fear" sacrifices her most womanly instincts. That woman should venture
 forward when the fear-inspiring quality in man--or more definitely,
 the MAN in man--is no longer either desired or fully developed, is
 reasonable enough and also intelligible enough; what is more difficult
 to understand is that precisely thereby--woman deteriorates. This is
 what is happening nowadays: let us not deceive ourselves about it!
 Wherever the industrial spirit has triumphed over the military
 and aristocratic spirit, woman strives for the economic and legal
 independence of a clerk: "woman as clerkess" is inscribed on the portal
 of the modern society which is in course of formation. While she
 thus appropriates new rights, aspires to be "master," and inscribes
 "progress" of woman on her flags and banners, the very opposite realises
 itself with terrible obviousness: WOMAN RETROGRADES. Since the French
 Revolution the influence of woman in Europe has DECLINED in proportion
 as she has increased her rights and claims; and the "emancipation of
 woman," insofar as it is desired and demanded by women themselves (and
 not only by masculine shallow-pates), thus proves to be a remarkable
 symptom of the increased weakening and deadening of the most womanly
 instincts. There is STUPIDITY in this movement, an almost masculine
 stupidity, of which a well-reared woman--who is always a sensible
 woman--might be heartily ashamed. To lose the intuition as to the ground
 upon which she can most surely achieve victory; to neglect exercise in
 the use of her proper weapons; to let-herself-go before man, perhaps
 even "to the book," where formerly she kept herself in control and in
 refined, artful humility; to neutralize with her virtuous audacity man's
 faith in a VEILED, fundamentally different ideal in woman, something
 eternally, necessarily feminine; to emphatically and loquaciously
 dissuade man from the idea that woman must be preserved, cared for,
 protected, and indulged, like some delicate, strangely wild, and
 often pleasant domestic animal; the clumsy and indignant collection of
 everything of the nature of servitude and bondage which the position of
 woman in the hitherto existing order of society has entailed and still
 entails (as though slavery were a counter-argument, and not rather a
 condition of every higher culture, of every elevation of culture):--what
 does all this betoken, if not a disintegration of womanly instincts,
 a defeminising? Certainly, there are enough of idiotic friends and
 corrupters of woman among the learned asses of the masculine sex, who
 advise woman to defeminize herself in this manner, and to imitate
 all the stupidities from which "man" in Europe, European "manliness,"
 suffers,--who would like to lower woman to "general culture," indeed
 even to newspaper reading and meddling with politics. Here and there
 they wish even to make women into free spirits and literary workers: as
 though a woman without piety would not be something perfectly obnoxious
 or ludicrous to a profound and godless man;--almost everywhere her
 nerves are being ruined by the most morbid and dangerous kind of music
 (our latest German music), and she is daily being made more hysterical
 and more incapable of fulfilling her first and last function, that of
 bearing robust children. They wish to "cultivate" her in general still
 more, and intend, as they say, to make the "weaker sex" STRONG by
 culture: as if history did not teach in the most emphatic manner that
 the "cultivating" of mankind and his weakening--that is to say, the
 weakening, dissipating, and languishing of his FORCE OF WILL--have
 always kept pace with one another, and that the most powerful and
 influential women in the world (and lastly, the mother of Napoleon)
 had just to thank their force of will--and not their schoolmasters--for
 their power and ascendancy over men. That which inspires respect
 in woman, and often enough fear also, is her NATURE, which is more
 "natural" than that of man, her genuine, carnivora-like, cunning
 flexibility, her tiger-claws beneath the glove, her NAIVETE in egoism,
 her untrainableness and innate wildness, the incomprehensibleness,
 extent, and deviation of her desires and virtues. That which, in spite
 of fear, excites one's sympathy for the dangerous and beautiful cat,
 "woman," is that she seems more afflicted, more vulnerable, more
 necessitous of love, and more condemned to disillusionment than any
 other creature. Fear and sympathy it is with these feelings that man has
 hitherto stood in the presence of woman, always with one foot already in
 tragedy, which rends while it delights--What? And all that is now to
 be at an end? And the DISENCHANTMENT of woman is in progress? The
 tediousness of woman is slowly evolving? Oh Europe! Europe! We know
 the horned animal which was always most attractive to thee, from which
 danger is ever again threatening thee! Thy old fable might once more
 become "history"--an immense stupidity might once again overmaster
 thee and carry thee away! And no God concealed beneath it--no! only an
 "idea," a "modern idea"!
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII. PEOPLES AND COUNTRIES
 
 
 240. I HEARD, once again for the first time, Richard Wagner's overture
 to the Mastersinger: it is a piece of magnificent, gorgeous, heavy,
 latter-day art, which has the pride to presuppose two centuries of music
 as still living, in order that it may be understood:--it is an honour
 to Germans that such a pride did not miscalculate! What flavours
 and forces, what seasons and climes do we not find mingled in it! It
 impresses us at one time as ancient, at another time as foreign, bitter,
 and too modern, it is as arbitrary as it is pompously traditional, it
 is not infrequently roguish, still oftener rough and coarse--it has fire
 and courage, and at the same time the loose, dun-coloured skin of fruits
 which ripen too late. It flows broad and full: and suddenly there is a
 moment of inexplicable hesitation, like a gap that opens between cause
 and effect, an oppression that makes us dream, almost a nightmare; but
 already it broadens and widens anew, the old stream of delight--the most
 manifold delight,--of old and new happiness; including ESPECIALLY
 the joy of the artist in himself, which he refuses to conceal, his
 astonished, happy cognizance of his mastery of the expedients here
 employed, the new, newly acquired, imperfectly tested expedients of art
 which he apparently betrays to us. All in all, however, no beauty, no
 South, nothing of the delicate southern clearness of the sky, nothing
 of grace, no dance, hardly a will to logic; a certain clumsiness even,
 which is also emphasized, as though the artist wished to say to us: "It
 is part of my intention"; a cumbersome drapery, something arbitrarily
 barbaric and ceremonious, a flirring of learned and venerable conceits
 and witticisms; something German in the best and worst sense of
 the word, something in the German style, manifold, formless, and
 inexhaustible; a certain German potency and super-plenitude of
 soul, which is not afraid to hide itself under the RAFFINEMENTS of
 decadence--which, perhaps, feels itself most at ease there; a real,
 genuine token of the German soul, which is at the same time young and
 aged, too ripe and yet still too rich in futurity. This kind of music
 expresses best what I think of the Germans: they belong to the day
 before yesterday and the day after tomorrow--THEY HAVE AS YET NO TODAY.
 
 241. We "good Europeans," we also have hours when we allow ourselves a
 warm-hearted patriotism, a plunge and relapse into old loves and narrow
 views--I have just given an example of it--hours of national excitement,
 of patriotic anguish, and all other sorts of old-fashioned floods of
 sentiment. Duller spirits may perhaps only get done with what confines
 its operations in us to hours and plays itself out in hours--in a
 considerable time: some in half a year, others in half a lifetime,
 according to the speed and strength with which they digest and "change
 their material." Indeed, I could think of sluggish, hesitating races,
 which even in our rapidly moving Europe, would require half a century
 ere they could surmount such atavistic attacks of patriotism and
 soil-attachment, and return once more to reason, that is to say, to
 "good Europeanism." And while digressing on this possibility, I
 happen to become an ear-witness of a conversation between two old
 patriots--they were evidently both hard of hearing and consequently
 spoke all the louder. "HE has as much, and knows as much, philosophy as
 a peasant or a corps-student," said the one--"he is still innocent. But
 what does that matter nowadays! It is the age of the masses: they lie on
 their belly before everything that is massive. And so also in politicis.
 A statesman who rears up for them a new Tower of Babel, some monstrosity
 of empire and power, they call 'great'--what does it matter that we more
 prudent and conservative ones do not meanwhile give up the old belief
 that it is only the great thought that gives greatness to an action or
 affair. Supposing a statesman were to bring his people into the position
 of being obliged henceforth to practise 'high politics,' for which they
 were by nature badly endowed and prepared, so that they would have
 to sacrifice their old and reliable virtues, out of love to a new and
 doubtful mediocrity;--supposing a statesman were to condemn his people
 generally to 'practise politics,' when they have hitherto had something
 better to do and think about, and when in the depths of their souls
 they have been unable to free themselves from a prudent loathing of
 the restlessness, emptiness, and noisy wranglings of the essentially
 politics-practising nations;--supposing such a statesman were to
 stimulate the slumbering passions and avidities of his people, were to
 make a stigma out of their former diffidence and delight in aloofness,
 an offence out of their exoticism and hidden permanency, were to
 depreciate their most radical proclivities, subvert their consciences,
 make their minds narrow, and their tastes 'national'--what! a statesman
 who should do all this, which his people would have to do penance for
 throughout their whole future, if they had a future, such a statesman
 would be GREAT, would he?"--"Undoubtedly!" replied the other old patriot
 vehemently, "otherwise he COULD NOT have done it! It was mad perhaps to
 wish such a thing! But perhaps everything great has been just as mad
 at its commencement!"--"Misuse of words!" cried his interlocutor,
 contradictorily--"strong! strong! Strong and mad! NOT great!"--The old
 men had obviously become heated as they thus shouted their "truths" in
 each other's faces, but I, in my happiness and apartness, considered how
 soon a stronger one may become master of the strong, and also that
 there is a compensation for the intellectual superficialising of a
 nation--namely, in the deepening of another.
 
 242. Whether we call it "civilization," or "humanising," or "progress,"
 which now distinguishes the European, whether we call it simply, without
 praise or blame, by the political formula the DEMOCRATIC movement in
 Europe--behind all the moral and political foregrounds pointed to by
 such formulas, an immense PHYSIOLOGICAL PROCESS goes on, which is ever
 extending the process of the assimilation of Europeans, their
 increasing detachment from the conditions under which, climatically and
 hereditarily, united races originate, their increasing independence of
 every definite milieu, that for centuries would fain inscribe itself
 with equal demands on soul and body,--that is to say, the slow emergence
 of an essentially SUPER-NATIONAL and nomadic species of man, who
 possesses, physiologically speaking, a maximum of the art and power
 of adaptation as his typical distinction. This process of the EVOLVING
 EUROPEAN, which can be retarded in its TEMPO by great relapses, but
 will perhaps just gain and grow thereby in vehemence and depth--the
 still-raging storm and stress of "national sentiment" pertains to it,
 and also the anarchism which is appearing at present--this process
 will probably arrive at results on which its naive propagators and
 panegyrists, the apostles of "modern ideas," would least care to reckon.
 The same new conditions under which on an average a levelling and
 mediocrising of man will take place--a useful, industrious, variously
 serviceable, and clever gregarious man--are in the highest degree
 suitable to give rise to exceptional men of the most dangerous and
 attractive qualities. For, while the capacity for adaptation, which is
 every day trying changing conditions, and begins a new work with every
 generation, almost with every decade, makes the POWERFULNESS of the type
 impossible; while the collective impression of such future Europeans
 will probably be that of numerous, talkative, weak-willed, and very
 handy workmen who REQUIRE a master, a commander, as they require their
 daily bread; while, therefore, the democratising of Europe will tend to
 the production of a type prepared for SLAVERY in the most subtle
 sense of the term: the STRONG man will necessarily in individual and
 exceptional cases, become stronger and richer than he has perhaps ever
 been before--owing to the unprejudicedness of his schooling, owing to
 the immense variety of practice, art, and disguise. I meant to say
 that the democratising of Europe is at the same time an involuntary
 arrangement for the rearing of TYRANTS--taking the word in all its
 meanings, even in its most spiritual sense.
 
 243. I hear with pleasure that our sun is moving rapidly towards the
 constellation Hercules: and I hope that the men on this earth will do
 like the sun. And we foremost, we good Europeans!
 
 244. There was a time when it was customary to call Germans "deep"
 by way of distinction; but now that the most successful type of new
 Germanism is covetous of quite other honours, and perhaps misses
 "smartness" in all that has depth, it is almost opportune and patriotic
 to doubt whether we did not formerly deceive ourselves with that
 commendation: in short, whether German depth is not at bottom something
 different and worse--and something from which, thank God, we are on the
 point of successfully ridding ourselves. Let us try, then, to relearn
 with regard to German depth; the only thing necessary for the purpose is
 a little vivisection of the German soul.--The German soul is above all
 manifold, varied in its source, aggregated and super-imposed, rather
 than actually built: this is owing to its origin. A German who would
 embolden himself to assert: "Two souls, alas, dwell in my breast," would
 make a bad guess at the truth, or, more correctly, he would come far
 short of the truth about the number of souls. As a people made up of
 the most extraordinary mixing and mingling of races, perhaps even with a
 preponderance of the pre-Aryan element as the "people of the centre" in
 every sense of the term, the Germans are more intangible, more ample,
 more contradictory, more unknown, more incalculable, more surprising,
 and even more terrifying than other peoples are to themselves:--they
 escape DEFINITION, and are thereby alone the despair of the French. It
 IS characteristic of the Germans that the question: "What is German?"
 never dies out among them. Kotzebue certainly knew his Germans well
 enough: "We are known," they cried jubilantly to him--but Sand also
 thought he knew them. Jean Paul knew what he was doing when he declared
 himself incensed at Fichte's lying but patriotic flatteries and
 exaggerations,--but it is probable that Goethe thought differently about
 Germans from Jean Paul, even though he acknowledged him to be right with
 regard to Fichte. It is a question what Goethe really thought about the
 Germans?--But about many things around him he never spoke explicitly,
 and all his life he knew how to keep an astute silence--probably he
 had good reason for it. It is certain that it was not the "Wars of
 Independence" that made him look up more joyfully, any more than it was
 the French Revolution,--the event on account of which he RECONSTRUCTED
 his "Faust," and indeed the whole problem of "man," was the appearance
 of Napoleon. There are words of Goethe in which he condemns with
 impatient severity, as from a foreign land, that which Germans take a
 pride in, he once defined the famous German turn of mind as "Indulgence
 towards its own and others' weaknesses." Was he wrong? it is
 characteristic of Germans that one is seldom entirely wrong about them.
 The German soul has passages and galleries in it, there are caves,
 hiding-places, and dungeons therein, its disorder has much of the charm
 of the mysterious, the German is well acquainted with the bypaths to
 chaos. And as everything loves its symbol, so the German loves the
 clouds and all that is obscure, evolving, crepuscular, damp, and
 shrouded, it seems to him that everything uncertain, undeveloped,
 self-displacing, and growing is "deep". The German himself does not
 EXIST, he is BECOMING, he is "developing himself". "Development" is
 therefore the essentially German discovery and hit in the great domain
 of philosophical formulas,--a ruling idea, which, together with German
 beer and German music, is labouring to Germanise all Europe. Foreigners
 are astonished and attracted by the riddles which the conflicting nature
 at the basis of the German soul propounds to them (riddles which
 Hegel systematised and Richard Wagner has in the end set to music).
 "Good-natured and spiteful"--such a juxtaposition, preposterous in the
 case of every other people, is unfortunately only too often justified
 in Germany one has only to live for a while among Swabians to know this!
 The clumsiness of the German scholar and his social distastefulness
 agree alarmingly well with his physical rope-dancing and nimble
 boldness, of which all the Gods have learnt to be afraid. If any one
 wishes to see the "German soul" demonstrated ad oculos, let him
 only look at German taste, at German arts and manners what boorish
 indifference to "taste"! How the noblest and the commonest stand there
 in juxtaposition! How disorderly and how rich is the whole constitution
 of this soul! The German DRAGS at his soul, he drags at everything he
 experiences. He digests his events badly; he never gets "done"
 with them; and German depth is often only a difficult, hesitating
 "digestion." And just as all chronic invalids, all dyspeptics like what
 is convenient, so the German loves "frankness" and "honesty"; it is
 so CONVENIENT to be frank and honest!--This confidingness, this
 complaisance, this showing-the-cards of German HONESTY, is probably the
 most dangerous and most successful disguise which the German is up to
 nowadays: it is his proper Mephistophelean art; with this he can "still
 achieve much"! The German lets himself go, and thereby gazes with
 faithful, blue, empty German eyes--and other countries immediately
 confound him with his dressing-gown!--I meant to say that, let "German
 depth" be what it will--among ourselves alone we perhaps take the
 liberty to laugh at it--we shall do well to continue henceforth to
 honour its appearance and good name, and not barter away too cheaply our
 old reputation as a people of depth for Prussian "smartness," and
 Berlin wit and sand. It is wise for a people to pose, and LET itself
 be regarded, as profound, clumsy, good-natured, honest, and foolish: it
 might even be--profound to do so! Finally, we should do honour to
 our name--we are not called the "TIUSCHE VOLK" (deceptive people) for
 nothing....
 
 245. The "good old" time is past, it sang itself out in Mozart--how
 happy are WE that his ROCOCO still speaks to us, that his "good
 company," his tender enthusiasm, his childish delight in the Chinese and
 its flourishes, his courtesy of heart, his longing for the elegant, the
 amorous, the tripping, the tearful, and his belief in the South, can
 still appeal to SOMETHING LEFT in us! Ah, some time or other it will be
 over with it!--but who can doubt that it will be over still sooner with
 the intelligence and taste for Beethoven! For he was only the last echo
 of a break and transition in style, and NOT, like Mozart, the last echo
 of a great European taste which had existed for centuries. Beethoven
 is the intermediate event between an old mellow soul that is constantly
 breaking down, and a future over-young soul that is always COMING;
 there is spread over his music the twilight of eternal loss and eternal
 extravagant hope,--the same light in which Europe was bathed when it
 dreamed with Rousseau, when it danced round the Tree of Liberty of the
 Revolution, and finally almost fell down in adoration before Napoleon.
 But how rapidly does THIS very sentiment now pale, how difficult
 nowadays is even the APPREHENSION of this sentiment, how strangely does
 the language of Rousseau, Schiller, Shelley, and Byron sound to our ear,
 in whom COLLECTIVELY the same fate of Europe was able to SPEAK, which
 knew how to SING in Beethoven!--Whatever German music came afterwards,
 belongs to Romanticism, that is to say, to a movement which,
 historically considered, was still shorter, more fleeting, and more
 superficial than that great interlude, the transition of Europe from
 Rousseau to Napoleon, and to the rise of democracy. Weber--but what do
 WE care nowadays for "Freischutz" and "Oberon"! Or Marschner's "Hans
 Heiling" and "Vampyre"! Or even Wagner's "Tannhauser"! That is extinct,
 although not yet forgotten music. This whole music of Romanticism,
 besides, was not noble enough, was not musical enough, to maintain its
 position anywhere but in the theatre and before the masses; from the
 beginning it was second-rate music, which was little thought of by
 genuine musicians. It was different with Felix Mendelssohn, that halcyon
 master, who, on account of his lighter, purer, happier soul, quickly
 acquired admiration, and was equally quickly forgotten: as the beautiful
 EPISODE of German music. But with regard to Robert Schumann, who took
 things seriously, and has been taken seriously from the first--he
 was the last that founded a school,--do we not now regard it as a
 satisfaction, a relief, a deliverance, that this very Romanticism
 of Schumann's has been surmounted? Schumann, fleeing into the "Saxon
 Switzerland" of his soul, with a half Werther-like, half Jean-Paul-like
 nature (assuredly not like Beethoven! assuredly not like Byron!)--his
 MANFRED music is a mistake and a misunderstanding to the extent of
 injustice; Schumann, with his taste, which was fundamentally a PETTY
 taste (that is to say, a dangerous propensity--doubly dangerous among
 Germans--for quiet lyricism and intoxication of the feelings), going
 constantly apart, timidly withdrawing and retiring, a noble weakling who
 revelled in nothing but anonymous joy and sorrow, from the beginning
 a sort of girl and NOLI ME TANGERE--this Schumann was already merely a
 GERMAN event in music, and no longer a European event, as Beethoven had
 been, as in a still greater degree Mozart had been; with Schumann German
 music was threatened with its greatest danger, that of LOSING THE VOICE
 FOR THE SOUL OF EUROPE and sinking into a merely national affair.
 
 246. What a torture are books written in German to a reader who has a
 THIRD ear! How indignantly he stands beside the slowly turning swamp
 of sounds without tune and rhythms without dance, which Germans call
 a "book"! And even the German who READS books! How lazily, how
 reluctantly, how badly he reads! How many Germans know, and consider it
 obligatory to know, that there is ART in every good sentence--art which
 must be divined, if the sentence is to be understood! If there is a
 misunderstanding about its TEMPO, for instance, the sentence itself
 is misunderstood! That one must not be doubtful about the
 rhythm-determining syllables, that one should feel the breaking of the
 too-rigid symmetry as intentional and as a charm, that one should lend a
 fine and patient ear to every STACCATO and every RUBATO, that one should
 divine the sense in the sequence of the vowels and diphthongs, and how
 delicately and richly they can be tinted and retinted in the order of
 their arrangement--who among book-reading Germans is complaisant enough
 to recognize such duties and requirements, and to listen to so much art
 and intention in language? After all, one just "has no ear for it";
 and so the most marked contrasts of style are not heard, and the most
 delicate artistry is as it were SQUANDERED on the deaf.--These were my
 thoughts when I noticed how clumsily and unintuitively two masters in
 the art of prose-writing have been confounded: one, whose words drop
 down hesitatingly and coldly, as from the roof of a damp cave--he counts
 on their dull sound and echo; and another who manipulates his language
 like a flexible sword, and from his arm down into his toes feels the
 dangerous bliss of the quivering, over-sharp blade, which wishes to
 bite, hiss, and cut.
 
 247. How little the German style has to do with harmony and with the
 ear, is shown by the fact that precisely our good musicians themselves
 write badly. The German does not read aloud, he does not read for the
 ear, but only with his eyes; he has put his ears away in the drawer for
 the time. In antiquity when a man read--which was seldom enough--he read
 something to himself, and in a loud voice; they were surprised when
 any one read silently, and sought secretly the reason of it. In a
 loud voice: that is to say, with all the swellings, inflections, and
 variations of key and changes of TEMPO, in which the ancient PUBLIC
 world took delight. The laws of the written style were then the same
 as those of the spoken style; and these laws depended partly on the
 surprising development and refined requirements of the ear and larynx;
 partly on the strength, endurance, and power of the ancient lungs. In
 the ancient sense, a period is above all a physiological whole, inasmuch
 as it is comprised in one breath. Such periods as occur in Demosthenes
 and Cicero, swelling twice and sinking twice, and all in one breath,
 were pleasures to the men of ANTIQUITY, who knew by their own schooling
 how to appreciate the virtue therein, the rareness and the difficulty
 in the deliverance of such a period;--WE have really no right to the
 BIG period, we modern men, who are short of breath in every sense! Those
 ancients, indeed, were all of them dilettanti in speaking, consequently
 connoisseurs, consequently critics--they thus brought their orators to
 the highest pitch; in the same manner as in the last century, when all
 Italian ladies and gentlemen knew how to sing, the virtuosoship of song
 (and with it also the art of melody) reached its elevation. In Germany,
 however (until quite recently when a kind of platform eloquence began
 shyly and awkwardly enough to flutter its young wings), there was
 properly speaking only one kind of public and APPROXIMATELY artistical
 discourse--that delivered from the pulpit. The preacher was the only one
 in Germany who knew the weight of a syllable or a word, in what manner a
 sentence strikes, springs, rushes, flows, and comes to a close; he alone
 had a conscience in his ears, often enough a bad conscience: for reasons
 are not lacking why proficiency in oratory should be especially seldom
 attained by a German, or almost always too late. The masterpiece of
 German prose is therefore with good reason the masterpiece of its
 greatest preacher: the BIBLE has hitherto been the best German
 book. Compared with Luther's Bible, almost everything else is merely
 "literature"--something which has not grown in Germany, and therefore
 has not taken and does not take root in German hearts, as the Bible has
 done.
 
 248. There are two kinds of geniuses: one which above all engenders and
 seeks to engender, and another which willingly lets itself be fructified
 and brings forth. And similarly, among the gifted nations, there are
 those on whom the woman's problem of pregnancy has devolved, and the
 secret task of forming, maturing, and perfecting--the Greeks, for
 instance, were a nation of this kind, and so are the French; and others
 which have to fructify and become the cause of new modes of life--like
 the Jews, the Romans, and, in all modesty be it asked: like the
 Germans?--nations tortured and enraptured by unknown fevers and
 irresistibly forced out of themselves, amorous and longing for
 foreign races (for such as "let themselves be fructified"), and withal
 imperious, like everything conscious of being full of generative force,
 and consequently empowered "by the grace of God." These two kinds of
 geniuses seek each other like man and woman; but they also misunderstand
 each other--like man and woman.
 
 249. Every nation has its own "Tartuffery," and calls that its
 virtue.--One does not know--cannot know, the best that is in one.
 
 250. What Europe owes to the Jews?--Many things, good and bad, and above
 all one thing of the nature both of the best and the worst: the grand
 style in morality, the fearfulness and majesty of infinite demands, of
 infinite significations, the whole Romanticism and sublimity of moral
 questionableness--and consequently just the most attractive, ensnaring,
 and exquisite element in those iridescences and allurements to life,
 in the aftersheen of which the sky of our European culture, its evening
 sky, now glows--perhaps glows out. For this, we artists among the
 spectators and philosophers, are--grateful to the Jews.
 
 251. It must be taken into the bargain, if various clouds and
 disturbances--in short, slight attacks of stupidity--pass over the
 spirit of a people that suffers and WANTS to suffer from national
 nervous fever and political ambition: for instance, among present-day
 Germans there is alternately the anti-French folly, the anti-Semitic
 folly, the anti-Polish folly, the Christian-romantic folly, the
 Wagnerian folly, the Teutonic folly, the Prussian folly (just look at
 those poor historians, the Sybels and Treitschkes, and their closely
 bandaged heads), and whatever else these little obscurations of the
 German spirit and conscience may be called. May it be forgiven me that
 I, too, when on a short daring sojourn on very infected ground, did not
 remain wholly exempt from the disease, but like every one else, began
 to entertain thoughts about matters which did not concern me--the first
 symptom of political infection. About the Jews, for instance, listen
 to the following:--I have never yet met a German who was favourably
 inclined to the Jews; and however decided the repudiation of actual
 anti-Semitism may be on the part of all prudent and political men, this
 prudence and policy is not perhaps directed against the nature of the
 sentiment itself, but only against its dangerous excess, and especially
 against the distasteful and infamous expression of this excess of
 sentiment;--on this point we must not deceive ourselves. That Germany
 has amply SUFFICIENT Jews, that the German stomach, the German blood,
 has difficulty (and will long have difficulty) in disposing only of this
 quantity of "Jew"--as the Italian, the Frenchman, and the Englishman
 have done by means of a stronger digestion:--that is the unmistakable
 declaration and language of a general instinct, to which one must listen
 and according to which one must act. "Let no more Jews come in! And shut
 the doors, especially towards the East (also towards Austria)!"--thus
 commands the instinct of a people whose nature is still feeble and
 uncertain, so that it could be easily wiped out, easily extinguished, by
 a stronger race. The Jews, however, are beyond all doubt the strongest,
 toughest, and purest race at present living in Europe, they know how
 to succeed even under the worst conditions (in fact better than under
 favourable ones), by means of virtues of some sort, which one would like
 nowadays to label as vices--owing above all to a resolute faith which
 does not need to be ashamed before "modern ideas", they alter only,
 WHEN they do alter, in the same way that the Russian Empire makes
 its conquest--as an empire that has plenty of time and is not of
 yesterday--namely, according to the principle, "as slowly as possible"!
 A thinker who has the future of Europe at heart, will, in all his
 perspectives concerning the future, calculate upon the Jews, as he
 will calculate upon the Russians, as above all the surest and likeliest
 factors in the great play and battle of forces. That which is at present
 called a "nation" in Europe, and is really rather a RES FACTA than NATA
 (indeed, sometimes confusingly similar to a RES FICTA ET PICTA), is in
 every case something evolving, young, easily displaced, and not yet
 a race, much less such a race AERE PERENNUS, as the Jews are such
 "nations" should most carefully avoid all hot-headed rivalry and
 hostility! It is certain that the Jews, if they desired--or if they
 were driven to it, as the anti-Semites seem to wish--COULD now have the
 ascendancy, nay, literally the supremacy, over Europe, that they are NOT
 working and planning for that end is equally certain. Meanwhile, they
 rather wish and desire, even somewhat importunely, to be insorbed and
 absorbed by Europe, they long to be finally settled, authorized, and
 respected somewhere, and wish to put an end to the nomadic life, to the
 "wandering Jew",--and one should certainly take account of this impulse
 and tendency, and MAKE ADVANCES to it (it possibly betokens a mitigation
 of the Jewish instincts) for which purpose it would perhaps be useful
 and fair to banish the anti-Semitic bawlers out of the country. One
 should make advances with all prudence, and with selection, pretty much
 as the English nobility do It stands to reason that the more powerful
 and strongly marked types of new Germanism could enter into relation
 with the Jews with the least hesitation, for instance, the nobleman
 officer from the Prussian border it would be interesting in many ways
 to see whether the genius for money and patience (and especially some
 intellect and intellectuality--sadly lacking in the place referred to)
 could not in addition be annexed and trained to the hereditary art of
 commanding and obeying--for both of which the country in question has
 now a classic reputation But here it is expedient to break off my festal
 discourse and my sprightly Teutonomania for I have already reached my
 SERIOUS TOPIC, the "European problem," as I understand it, the rearing
 of a new ruling caste for Europe.
 
 252. They are not a philosophical race--the English: Bacon represents an
 ATTACK on the philosophical spirit generally, Hobbes, Hume, and Locke,
 an abasement, and a depreciation of the idea of a "philosopher" for more
 than a century. It was AGAINST Hume that Kant uprose and raised himself;
 it was Locke of whom Schelling RIGHTLY said, "JE MEPRISE LOCKE"; in the
 struggle against the English mechanical stultification of the world,
 Hegel and Schopenhauer (along with Goethe) were of one accord; the
 two hostile brother-geniuses in philosophy, who pushed in different
 directions towards the opposite poles of German thought, and thereby
 wronged each other as only brothers will do.--What is lacking in
 England, and has always been lacking, that half-actor and rhetorician
 knew well enough, the absurd muddle-head, Carlyle, who sought to conceal
 under passionate grimaces what he knew about himself: namely, what was
 LACKING in Carlyle--real POWER of intellect, real DEPTH of intellectual
 perception, in short, philosophy. It is characteristic of such an
 unphilosophical race to hold on firmly to Christianity--they NEED its
 discipline for "moralizing" and humanizing. The Englishman, more gloomy,
 sensual, headstrong, and brutal than the German--is for that very
 reason, as the baser of the two, also the most pious: he has all the
 MORE NEED of Christianity. To finer nostrils, this English Christianity
 itself has still a characteristic English taint of spleen and alcoholic
 excess, for which, owing to good reasons, it is used as an antidote--the
 finer poison to neutralize the coarser: a finer form of poisoning is
 in fact a step in advance with coarse-mannered people, a step towards
 spiritualization. The English coarseness and rustic demureness is still
 most satisfactorily disguised by Christian pantomime, and by praying
 and psalm-singing (or, more correctly, it is thereby explained and
 differently expressed); and for the herd of drunkards and rakes who
 formerly learned moral grunting under the influence of Methodism (and
 more recently as the "Salvation Army"), a penitential fit may really be
 the relatively highest manifestation of "humanity" to which they can
 be elevated: so much may reasonably be admitted. That, however, which
 offends even in the humanest Englishman is his lack of music, to speak
 figuratively (and also literally): he has neither rhythm nor dance in
 the movements of his soul and body; indeed, not even the desire for
 rhythm and dance, for "music." Listen to him speaking; look at the most
 beautiful Englishwoman WALKING--in no country on earth are there more
 beautiful doves and swans; finally, listen to them singing! But I ask
 too much...
 
 253. There are truths which are best recognized by mediocre minds,
 because they are best adapted for them, there are truths which only
 possess charms and seductive power for mediocre spirits:--one is pushed
 to this probably unpleasant conclusion, now that the influence of
 respectable but mediocre Englishmen--I may mention Darwin, John
 Stuart Mill, and Herbert Spencer--begins to gain the ascendancy in the
 middle-class region of European taste. Indeed, who could doubt that it
 is a useful thing for SUCH minds to have the ascendancy for a time? It
 would be an error to consider the highly developed and independently
 soaring minds as specially qualified for determining and collecting many
 little common facts, and deducing conclusions from them; as exceptions,
 they are rather from the first in no very favourable position towards
 those who are "the rules." After all, they have more to do than merely
 to perceive:--in effect, they have to BE something new, they have to
 SIGNIFY something new, they have to REPRESENT new values! The gulf
 between knowledge and capacity is perhaps greater, and also more
 mysterious, than one thinks: the capable man in the grand style, the
 creator, will possibly have to be an ignorant person;--while on the
 other hand, for scientific discoveries like those of Darwin, a certain
 narrowness, aridity, and industrious carefulness (in short, something
 English) may not be unfavourable for arriving at them.--Finally, let
 it not be forgotten that the English, with their profound mediocrity,
 brought about once before a general depression of European intelligence.
 
 What is called "modern ideas," or "the ideas of the eighteenth century,"
 or "French ideas"--that, consequently, against which the GERMAN mind
 rose up with profound disgust--is of English origin, there is no doubt
 about it. The French were only the apes and actors of these ideas, their
 best soldiers, and likewise, alas! their first and profoundest VICTIMS;
 for owing to the diabolical Anglomania of "modern ideas," the AME
 FRANCAIS has in the end become so thin and emaciated, that at present
 one recalls its sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, its profound,
 passionate strength, its inventive excellency, almost with disbelief.
 One must, however, maintain this verdict of historical justice in
 a determined manner, and defend it against present prejudices and
 appearances: the European NOBLESSE--of sentiment, taste, and manners,
 taking the word in every high sense--is the work and invention of
 FRANCE; the European ignobleness, the plebeianism of modern ideas--is
 ENGLAND'S work and invention.
 
 254. Even at present France is still the seat of the most intellectual
 and refined culture of Europe, it is still the high school of taste; but
 one must know how to find this "France of taste." He who belongs to it
 keeps himself well concealed:--they may be a small number in whom it
 lives and is embodied, besides perhaps being men who do not stand upon
 the strongest legs, in part fatalists, hypochondriacs, invalids, in
 part persons over-indulged, over-refined, such as have the AMBITION to
 conceal themselves.
 
 They have all something in common: they keep their ears closed in
 presence of the delirious folly and noisy spouting of the democratic
 BOURGEOIS. In fact, a besotted and brutalized France at present sprawls
 in the foreground--it recently celebrated a veritable orgy of bad taste,
 and at the same time of self-admiration, at the funeral of Victor Hugo.
 There is also something else common to them: a predilection to resist
 intellectual Germanizing--and a still greater inability to do so!
 In this France of intellect, which is also a France of pessimism,
 Schopenhauer has perhaps become more at home, and more indigenous than
 he has ever been in Germany; not to speak of Heinrich Heine, who has
 long ago been re-incarnated in the more refined and fastidious lyrists
 of Paris; or of Hegel, who at present, in the form of Taine--the FIRST
 of living historians--exercises an almost tyrannical influence. As
 regards Richard Wagner, however, the more French music learns to
 adapt itself to the actual needs of the AME MODERNE, the more will it
 "Wagnerite"; one can safely predict that beforehand,--it is already
 taking place sufficiently! There are, however, three things which the
 French can still boast of with pride as their heritage and possession,
 and as indelible tokens of their ancient intellectual superiority
 in Europe, in spite of all voluntary or involuntary Germanizing and
 vulgarizing of taste. FIRSTLY, the capacity for artistic emotion, for
 devotion to "form," for which the expression, L'ART POUR L'ART, along
 with numerous others, has been invented:--such capacity has not been
 lacking in France for three centuries; and owing to its reverence for
 the "small number," it has again and again made a sort of chamber
 music of literature possible, which is sought for in vain elsewhere
 in Europe.--The SECOND thing whereby the French can lay claim to
 a superiority over Europe is their ancient, many-sided, MORALISTIC
 culture, owing to which one finds on an average, even in the petty
 ROMANCIERS of the newspapers and chance BOULEVARDIERS DE PARIS, a
 psychological sensitiveness and curiosity, of which, for example, one
 has no conception (to say nothing of the thing itself!) in Germany.
 The Germans lack a couple of centuries of the moralistic work requisite
 thereto, which, as we have said, France has not grudged: those who call
 the Germans "naive" on that account give them commendation for a defect.
 (As the opposite of the German inexperience and innocence IN VOLUPTATE
 PSYCHOLOGICA, which is not too remotely associated with the tediousness
 of German intercourse,--and as the most successful expression of
 genuine French curiosity and inventive talent in this domain of delicate
 thrills, Henri Beyle may be noted; that remarkable anticipatory and
 forerunning man, who, with a Napoleonic TEMPO, traversed HIS Europe,
 in fact, several centuries of the European soul, as a surveyor and
 discoverer thereof:--it has required two generations to OVERTAKE him
 one way or other, to divine long afterwards some of the riddles
 that perplexed and enraptured him--this strange Epicurean and man of
 interrogation, the last great psychologist of France).--There is yet
 a THIRD claim to superiority: in the French character there is a
 successful half-way synthesis of the North and South, which makes them
 comprehend many things, and enjoins upon them other things, which an
 Englishman can never comprehend. Their temperament, turned alternately
 to and from the South, in which from time to time the Provencal and
 Ligurian blood froths over, preserves them from the dreadful, northern
 grey-in-grey, from sunless conceptual-spectrism and from poverty of
 blood--our GERMAN infirmity of taste, for the excessive prevalence
 of which at the present moment, blood and iron, that is to say "high
 politics," has with great resolution been prescribed (according to
 a dangerous healing art, which bids me wait and wait, but not yet
 hope).--There is also still in France a pre-understanding and
 ready welcome for those rarer and rarely gratified men, who are too
 comprehensive to find satisfaction in any kind of fatherlandism, and
 know how to love the South when in the North and the North when in the
 South--the born Midlanders, the "good Europeans." For them BIZET
 has made music, this latest genius, who has seen a new beauty and
 seduction,--who has discovered a piece of the SOUTH IN MUSIC.
 
 255. I hold that many precautions should be taken against German music.
 Suppose a person loves the South as I love it--as a great school
 of recovery for the most spiritual and the most sensuous ills, as a
 boundless solar profusion and effulgence which o'erspreads a sovereign
 existence believing in itself--well, such a person will learn to be
 somewhat on his guard against German music, because, in injuring his
 taste anew, it will also injure his health anew. Such a Southerner, a
 Southerner not by origin but by BELIEF, if he should dream of the future
 of music, must also dream of it being freed from the influence of the
 North; and must have in his ears the prelude to a deeper, mightier, and
 perhaps more perverse and mysterious music, a super-German music, which
 does not fade, pale, and die away, as all German music does, at the
 sight of the blue, wanton sea and the Mediterranean clearness of sky--a
 super-European music, which holds its own even in presence of the brown
 sunsets of the desert, whose soul is akin to the palm-tree, and can be
 at home and can roam with big, beautiful, lonely beasts of prey... I
 could imagine a music of which the rarest charm would be that it knew
 nothing more of good and evil; only that here and there perhaps some
 sailor's home-sickness, some golden shadows and tender weaknesses might
 sweep lightly over it; an art which, from the far distance, would see
 the colours of a sinking and almost incomprehensible MORAL world fleeing
 towards it, and would be hospitable enough and profound enough to
 receive such belated fugitives.
 
 256. Owing to the morbid estrangement which the nationality-craze has
 induced and still induces among the nations of Europe, owing also to the
 short-sighted and hasty-handed politicians, who with the help of this
 craze, are at present in power, and do not suspect to what extent the
 disintegrating policy they pursue must necessarily be only an interlude
 policy--owing to all this and much else that is altogether unmentionable
 at present, the most unmistakable signs that EUROPE WISHES TO BE ONE,
 are now overlooked, or arbitrarily and falsely misinterpreted. With all
 the more profound and large-minded men of this century, the real general
 tendency of the mysterious labour of their souls was to prepare the way
 for that new SYNTHESIS, and tentatively to anticipate the European of
 the future; only in their simulations, or in their weaker moments, in
 old age perhaps, did they belong to the "fatherlands"--they only rested
 from themselves when they became "patriots." I think of such men as
 Napoleon, Goethe, Beethoven, Stendhal, Heinrich Heine, Schopenhauer: it
 must not be taken amiss if I also count Richard Wagner among them, about
 whom one must not let oneself be deceived by his own misunderstandings
 (geniuses like him have seldom the right to understand themselves),
 still less, of course, by the unseemly noise with which he is now
 resisted and opposed in France: the fact remains, nevertheless, that
 Richard Wagner and the LATER FRENCH ROMANTICISM of the forties, are
 most closely and intimately related to one another. They are akin,
 fundamentally akin, in all the heights and depths of their requirements;
 it is Europe, the ONE Europe, whose soul presses urgently and longingly,
 outwards and upwards, in their multifarious and boisterous art--whither?
 into a new light? towards a new sun? But who would attempt to express
 accurately what all these masters of new modes of speech could not
 express distinctly? It is certain that the same storm and stress
 tormented them, that they SOUGHT in the same manner, these last great
 seekers! All of them steeped in literature to their eyes and ears--the
 first artists of universal literary culture--for the most part even
 themselves writers, poets, intermediaries and blenders of the arts and
 the senses (Wagner, as musician is reckoned among painters, as poet
 among musicians, as artist generally among actors); all of them fanatics
 for EXPRESSION "at any cost"--I specially mention Delacroix, the nearest
 related to Wagner; all of them great discoverers in the realm of the
 sublime, also of the loathsome and dreadful, still greater discoverers
 in effect, in display, in the art of the show-shop; all of them talented
 far beyond their genius, out and out VIRTUOSI, with mysterious accesses
 to all that seduces, allures, constrains, and upsets; born enemies of
 logic and of the straight line, hankering after the strange, the
 exotic, the monstrous, the crooked, and the self-contradictory; as men,
 Tantaluses of the will, plebeian parvenus, who knew themselves to be
 incapable of a noble TEMPO or of a LENTO in life and action--think
 of Balzac, for instance,--unrestrained workers, almost destroying
 themselves by work; antinomians and rebels in manners, ambitious and
 insatiable, without equilibrium and enjoyment; all of them finally
 shattering and sinking down at the Christian cross (and with right
 and reason, for who of them would have been sufficiently profound and
 sufficiently original for an ANTI-CHRISTIAN philosophy?);--on the
 whole, a boldly daring, splendidly overbearing, high-flying, and
 aloft-up-dragging class of higher men, who had first to teach their
 century--and it is the century of the MASSES--the conception "higher
 man."... Let the German friends of Richard Wagner advise together as to
 whether there is anything purely German in the Wagnerian art, or whether
 its distinction does not consist precisely in coming from SUPER-GERMAN
 sources and impulses: in which connection it may not be underrated
 how indispensable Paris was to the development of his type, which the
 strength of his instincts made him long to visit at the most
 decisive time--and how the whole style of his proceedings, of his
 self-apostolate, could only perfect itself in sight of the French
 socialistic original. On a more subtle comparison it will perhaps be
 found, to the honour of Richard Wagner's German nature, that he has
 acted in everything with more strength, daring, severity, and elevation
 than a nineteenth-century Frenchman could have done--owing to the
 circumstance that we Germans are as yet nearer to barbarism than the
 French;--perhaps even the most remarkable creation of Richard Wagner is
 not only at present, but for ever inaccessible, incomprehensible, and
 inimitable to the whole latter-day Latin race: the figure of Siegfried,
 that VERY FREE man, who is probably far too free, too hard, too
 cheerful, too healthy, too ANTI-CATHOLIC for the taste of old and mellow
 civilized nations. He may even have been a sin against Romanticism, this
 anti-Latin Siegfried: well, Wagner atoned amply for this sin in his old
 sad days, when--anticipating a taste which has meanwhile passed into
 politics--he began, with the religious vehemence peculiar to him, to
 preach, at least, THE WAY TO ROME, if not to walk therein.--That
 these last words may not be misunderstood, I will call to my aid a few
 powerful rhymes, which will even betray to less delicate ears what I
 mean--what I mean COUNTER TO the "last Wagner" and his Parsifal music:--
 
 --Is this our mode?--From German heart came this vexed ululating? From
 German body, this self-lacerating? Is ours this priestly hand-dilation,
 This incense-fuming exaltation? Is ours this faltering, falling,
 shambling, This quite uncertain ding-dong-dangling? This sly
 nun-ogling, Ave-hour-bell ringing, This wholly false enraptured
 heaven-o'erspringing?--Is this our mode?--Think well!--ye still wait for
 admission--For what ye hear is ROME--ROME'S FAITH BY INTUITION!
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX. WHAT IS NOBLE?
 
 
 257. EVERY elevation of the type "man," has hitherto been the work of an
 aristocratic society and so it will always be--a society believing in
 a long scale of gradations of rank and differences of worth among human
 beings, and requiring slavery in some form or other. Without the PATHOS
 OF DISTANCE, such as grows out of the incarnated difference of classes,
 out of the constant out-looking and down-looking of the ruling caste on
 subordinates and instruments, and out of their equally constant
 practice of obeying and commanding, of keeping down and keeping at a
 distance--that other more mysterious pathos could never have arisen, the
 longing for an ever new widening of distance within the soul itself,
 the formation of ever higher, rarer, further, more extended, more
 comprehensive states, in short, just the elevation of the type "man,"
 the continued "self-surmounting of man," to use a moral formula in
 a supermoral sense. To be sure, one must not resign oneself to
 any humanitarian illusions about the history of the origin of an
 aristocratic society (that is to say, of the preliminary condition for
 the elevation of the type "man"): the truth is hard. Let us acknowledge
 unprejudicedly how every higher civilization hitherto has ORIGINATED!
 Men with a still natural nature, barbarians in every terrible sense of
 the word, men of prey, still in possession of unbroken strength of will
 and desire for power, threw themselves upon weaker, more moral, more
 peaceful races (perhaps trading or cattle-rearing communities), or upon
 old mellow civilizations in which the final vital force was flickering
 out in brilliant fireworks of wit and depravity. At the commencement,
 the noble caste was always the barbarian caste: their superiority did
 not consist first of all in their physical, but in their psychical
 power--they were more COMPLETE men (which at every point also implies
 the same as "more complete beasts").
 
 258. Corruption--as the indication that anarchy threatens to break out
 among the instincts, and that the foundation of the emotions, called
 "life," is convulsed--is something radically different according to
 the organization in which it manifests itself. When, for instance, an
 aristocracy like that of France at the beginning of the Revolution,
 flung away its privileges with sublime disgust and sacrificed itself
 to an excess of its moral sentiments, it was corruption:--it was really
 only the closing act of the corruption which had existed for centuries,
 by virtue of which that aristocracy had abdicated step by step its
 lordly prerogatives and lowered itself to a FUNCTION of royalty (in
 the end even to its decoration and parade-dress). The essential thing,
 however, in a good and healthy aristocracy is that it should not regard
 itself as a function either of the kingship or the commonwealth, but
 as the SIGNIFICANCE and highest justification thereof--that it should
 therefore accept with a good conscience the sacrifice of a legion
 of individuals, who, FOR ITS SAKE, must be suppressed and reduced to
 imperfect men, to slaves and instruments. Its fundamental belief must
 be precisely that society is NOT allowed to exist for its own sake, but
 only as a foundation and scaffolding, by means of which a select class
 of beings may be able to elevate themselves to their higher duties, and
 in general to a higher EXISTENCE: like those sun-seeking climbing plants
 in Java--they are called Sipo Matador,--which encircle an oak so
 long and so often with their arms, until at last, high above it, but
 supported by it, they can unfold their tops in the open light, and
 exhibit their happiness.
 
 259. To refrain mutually from injury, from violence, from exploitation,
 and put one's will on a par with that of others: this may result in a
 certain rough sense in good conduct among individuals when the necessary
 conditions are given (namely, the actual similarity of the individuals
 in amount of force and degree of worth, and their co-relation within one
 organization). As soon, however, as one wished to take this principle
 more generally, and if possible even as the FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLE OF
 SOCIETY, it would immediately disclose what it really is--namely, a Will
 to the DENIAL of life, a principle of dissolution and decay. Here one
 must think profoundly to the very basis and resist all sentimental
 weakness: life itself is ESSENTIALLY appropriation, injury, conquest
 of the strange and weak, suppression, severity, obtrusion of
 peculiar forms, incorporation, and at the least, putting it mildest,
 exploitation;--but why should one for ever use precisely these words
 on which for ages a disparaging purpose has been stamped? Even the
 organization within which, as was previously supposed, the
 individuals treat each other as equal--it takes place in every
 healthy aristocracy--must itself, if it be a living and not a dying
 organization, do all that towards other bodies, which the individuals
 within it refrain from doing to each other it will have to be the
 incarnated Will to Power, it will endeavour to grow, to gain ground,
 attract to itself and acquire ascendancy--not owing to any morality or
 immorality, but because it LIVES, and because life IS precisely Will to
 Power. On no point, however, is the ordinary consciousness of Europeans
 more unwilling to be corrected than on this matter, people now rave
 everywhere, even under the guise of science, about coming conditions of
 society in which "the exploiting character" is to be absent--that sounds
 to my ears as if they promised to invent a mode of life which should
 refrain from all organic functions. "Exploitation" does not belong to a
 depraved, or imperfect and primitive society it belongs to the nature of
 the living being as a primary organic function, it is a consequence
 of the intrinsic Will to Power, which is precisely the Will to
 Life--Granting that as a theory this is a novelty--as a reality it is
 the FUNDAMENTAL FACT of all history let us be so far honest towards
 ourselves!
 
 260. In a tour through the many finer and coarser moralities which have
 hitherto prevailed or still prevail on the earth, I found certain traits
 recurring regularly together, and connected with one another, until
 finally two primary types revealed themselves to me, and a radical
 distinction was brought to light. There is MASTER-MORALITY and
 SLAVE-MORALITY,--I would at once add, however, that in all higher and
 mixed civilizations, there are also attempts at the reconciliation of
 the two moralities, but one finds still oftener the confusion and
 mutual misunderstanding of them, indeed sometimes their close
 juxtaposition--even in the same man, within one soul. The distinctions
 of moral values have either originated in a ruling caste, pleasantly
 conscious of being different from the ruled--or among the ruled class,
 the slaves and dependents of all sorts. In the first case, when it is
 the rulers who determine the conception "good," it is the exalted, proud
 disposition which is regarded as the distinguishing feature, and that
 which determines the order of rank. The noble type of man separates
 from himself the beings in whom the opposite of this exalted, proud
 disposition displays itself he despises them. Let it at once be noted
 that in this first kind of morality the antithesis "good" and "bad"
 means practically the same as "noble" and "despicable",--the antithesis
 "good" and "EVIL" is of a different origin. The cowardly, the timid, the
 insignificant, and those thinking merely of narrow utility are despised;
 moreover, also, the distrustful, with their constrained glances, the
 self-abasing, the dog-like kind of men who let themselves be abused,
 the mendicant flatterers, and above all the liars:--it is a fundamental
 belief of all aristocrats that the common people are untruthful. "We
 truthful ones"--the nobility in ancient Greece called themselves. It is
 obvious that everywhere the designations of moral value were at first
 applied to MEN; and were only derivatively and at a later period applied
 to ACTIONS; it is a gross mistake, therefore, when historians of morals
 start with questions like, "Why have sympathetic actions been praised?"
 The noble type of man regards HIMSELF as a determiner of values; he
 does not require to be approved of; he passes the judgment: "What is
 injurious to me is injurious in itself;" he knows that it is he himself
 only who confers honour on things; he is a CREATOR OF VALUES. He
 honours whatever he recognizes in himself: such morality equals
 self-glorification. In the foreground there is the feeling of plenitude,
 of power, which seeks to overflow, the happiness of high tension, the
 consciousness of a wealth which would fain give and bestow:--the noble
 man also helps the unfortunate, but not--or scarcely--out of pity, but
 rather from an impulse generated by the super-abundance of power. The
 noble man honours in himself the powerful one, him also who has power
 over himself, who knows how to speak and how to keep silence, who
 takes pleasure in subjecting himself to severity and hardness, and has
 reverence for all that is severe and hard. "Wotan placed a hard heart in
 my breast," says an old Scandinavian Saga: it is thus rightly expressed
 from the soul of a proud Viking. Such a type of man is even proud of not
 being made for sympathy; the hero of the Saga therefore adds warningly:
 "He who has not a hard heart when young, will never have one." The noble
 and brave who think thus are the furthest removed from the morality
 which sees precisely in sympathy, or in acting for the good of others,
 or in DESINTERESSEMENT, the characteristic of the moral; faith
 in oneself, pride in oneself, a radical enmity and irony towards
 "selflessness," belong as definitely to noble morality, as do a careless
 scorn and precaution in presence of sympathy and the "warm heart."--It
 is the powerful who KNOW how to honour, it is their art, their domain
 for invention. The profound reverence for age and for tradition--all law
 rests on this double reverence,--the belief and prejudice in favour of
 ancestors and unfavourable to newcomers, is typical in the morality of
 the powerful; and if, reversely, men of "modern ideas" believe almost
 instinctively in "progress" and the "future," and are more and more
 lacking in respect for old age, the ignoble origin of these "ideas" has
 complacently betrayed itself thereby. A morality of the ruling class,
 however, is more especially foreign and irritating to present-day taste
 in the sternness of its principle that one has duties only to one's
 equals; that one may act towards beings of a lower rank, towards all
 that is foreign, just as seems good to one, or "as the heart desires,"
 and in any case "beyond good and evil": it is here that sympathy and
 similar sentiments can have a place. The ability and obligation to
 exercise prolonged gratitude and prolonged revenge--both only within the
 circle of equals,--artfulness in retaliation, RAFFINEMENT of the idea
 in friendship, a certain necessity to have enemies (as outlets for the
 emotions of envy, quarrelsomeness, arrogance--in fact, in order to be
 a good FRIEND): all these are typical characteristics of the noble
 morality, which, as has been pointed out, is not the morality of "modern
 ideas," and is therefore at present difficult to realize, and also to
 unearth and disclose.--It is otherwise with the second type of morality,
 SLAVE-MORALITY. Supposing that the abused, the oppressed, the suffering,
 the unemancipated, the weary, and those uncertain of themselves should
 moralize, what will be the common element in their moral estimates?
 Probably a pessimistic suspicion with regard to the entire situation of
 man will find expression, perhaps a condemnation of man, together with
 his situation. The slave has an unfavourable eye for the virtues of the
 powerful; he has a skepticism and distrust, a REFINEMENT of distrust of
 everything "good" that is there honoured--he would fain persuade himself
 that the very happiness there is not genuine. On the other hand, THOSE
 qualities which serve to alleviate the existence of sufferers are
 brought into prominence and flooded with light; it is here that
 sympathy, the kind, helping hand, the warm heart, patience, diligence,
 humility, and friendliness attain to honour; for here these are the most
 useful qualities, and almost the only means of supporting the burden of
 existence. Slave-morality is essentially the morality of utility.
 Here is the seat of the origin of the famous antithesis "good" and
 "evil":--power and dangerousness are assumed to reside in the evil,
 a certain dreadfulness, subtlety, and strength, which do not admit of
 being despised. According to slave-morality, therefore, the "evil" man
 arouses fear; according to master-morality, it is precisely the "good"
 man who arouses fear and seeks to arouse it, while the bad man is
 regarded as the despicable being. The contrast attains its maximum when,
 in accordance with the logical consequences of slave-morality, a shade
 of depreciation--it may be slight and well-intentioned--at last attaches
 itself to the "good" man of this morality; because, according to the
 servile mode of thought, the good man must in any case be the SAFE
 man: he is good-natured, easily deceived, perhaps a little stupid, un
 bonhomme. Everywhere that slave-morality gains the ascendancy, language
 shows a tendency to approximate the significations of the words "good"
 and "stupid."--A last fundamental difference: the desire for FREEDOM,
 the instinct for happiness and the refinements of the feeling of liberty
 belong as necessarily to slave-morals and morality, as artifice and
 enthusiasm in reverence and devotion are the regular symptoms of an
 aristocratic mode of thinking and estimating.--Hence we can understand
 without further detail why love AS A PASSION--it is our European
 specialty--must absolutely be of noble origin; as is well known, its
 invention is due to the Provencal poet-cavaliers, those brilliant,
 ingenious men of the "gai saber," to whom Europe owes so much, and
 almost owes itself.
 
 261. Vanity is one of the things which are perhaps most difficult for
 a noble man to understand: he will be tempted to deny it, where another
 kind of man thinks he sees it self-evidently. The problem for him is
 to represent to his mind beings who seek to arouse a good opinion of
 themselves which they themselves do not possess--and consequently also
 do not "deserve,"--and who yet BELIEVE in this good opinion
 afterwards. This seems to him on the one hand such bad taste and so
 self-disrespectful, and on the other hand so grotesquely unreasonable,
 that he would like to consider vanity an exception, and is doubtful
 about it in most cases when it is spoken of. He will say, for
 instance: "I may be mistaken about my value, and on the other hand
 may nevertheless demand that my value should be acknowledged by others
 precisely as I rate it:--that, however, is not vanity (but self-conceit,
 or, in most cases, that which is called 'humility,' and also
 'modesty')." Or he will even say: "For many reasons I can delight in
 the good opinion of others, perhaps because I love and honour them,
 and rejoice in all their joys, perhaps also because their good opinion
 endorses and strengthens my belief in my own good opinion, perhaps
 because the good opinion of others, even in cases where I do not share
 it, is useful to me, or gives promise of usefulness:--all this, however,
 is not vanity." The man of noble character must first bring it home
 forcibly to his mind, especially with the aid of history, that, from
 time immemorial, in all social strata in any way dependent, the ordinary
 man WAS only that which he PASSED FOR:--not being at all accustomed to
 fix values, he did not assign even to himself any other value than that
 which his master assigned to him (it is the peculiar RIGHT OF MASTERS to
 create values). It may be looked upon as the result of an extraordinary
 atavism, that the ordinary man, even at present, is still always WAITING
 for an opinion about himself, and then instinctively submitting himself
 to it; yet by no means only to a "good" opinion, but also to a bad
 and unjust one (think, for instance, of the greater part of the
 self-appreciations and self-depreciations which believing women learn
 from their confessors, and which in general the believing Christian
 learns from his Church). In fact, conformably to the slow rise of the
 democratic social order (and its cause, the blending of the blood
 of masters and slaves), the originally noble and rare impulse of
 the masters to assign a value to themselves and to "think well" of
 themselves, will now be more and more encouraged and extended; but
 it has at all times an older, ampler, and more radically ingrained
 propensity opposed to it--and in the phenomenon of "vanity" this older
 propensity overmasters the younger. The vain person rejoices over EVERY
 good opinion which he hears about himself (quite apart from the point
 of view of its usefulness, and equally regardless of its truth or
 falsehood), just as he suffers from every bad opinion: for he subjects
 himself to both, he feels himself subjected to both, by that oldest
 instinct of subjection which breaks forth in him.--It is "the slave"
 in the vain man's blood, the remains of the slave's craftiness--and how
 much of the "slave" is still left in woman, for instance!--which
 seeks to SEDUCE to good opinions of itself; it is the slave, too, who
 immediately afterwards falls prostrate himself before these opinions, as
 though he had not called them forth.--And to repeat it again: vanity is
 an atavism.
 
 262. A SPECIES originates, and a type becomes established and strong in
 the long struggle with essentially constant UNFAVOURABLE conditions. On
 the other hand, it is known by the experience of breeders that species
 which receive super-abundant nourishment, and in general a surplus of
 protection and care, immediately tend in the most marked way to develop
 variations, and are fertile in prodigies and monstrosities (also in
 monstrous vices). Now look at an aristocratic commonwealth, say
 an ancient Greek polis, or Venice, as a voluntary or involuntary
 contrivance for the purpose of REARING human beings; there are there men
 beside one another, thrown upon their own resources, who want to make
 their species prevail, chiefly because they MUST prevail, or else
 run the terrible danger of being exterminated. The favour, the
 super-abundance, the protection are there lacking under which variations
 are fostered; the species needs itself as species, as something which,
 precisely by virtue of its hardness, its uniformity, and simplicity of
 structure, can in general prevail and make itself permanent in
 constant struggle with its neighbours, or with rebellious or
 rebellion-threatening vassals. The most varied experience teaches it
 what are the qualities to which it principally owes the fact that
 it still exists, in spite of all Gods and men, and has hitherto been
 victorious: these qualities it calls virtues, and these virtues alone
 it develops to maturity. It does so with severity, indeed it desires
 severity; every aristocratic morality is intolerant in the education
 of youth, in the control of women, in the marriage customs, in the
 relations of old and young, in the penal laws (which have an eye only
 for the degenerating): it counts intolerance itself among the virtues,
 under the name of "justice." A type with few, but very marked features,
 a species of severe, warlike, wisely silent, reserved, and reticent
 men (and as such, with the most delicate sensibility for the charm and
 nuances of society) is thus established, unaffected by the vicissitudes
 of generations; the constant struggle with uniform UNFAVOURABLE
 conditions is, as already remarked, the cause of a type becoming
 stable and hard. Finally, however, a happy state of things results, the
 enormous tension is relaxed; there are perhaps no more enemies among the
 neighbouring peoples, and the means of life, even of the enjoyment
 of life, are present in superabundance. With one stroke the bond and
 constraint of the old discipline severs: it is no longer regarded as
 necessary, as a condition of existence--if it would continue, it can
 only do so as a form of LUXURY, as an archaizing TASTE. Variations,
 whether they be deviations (into the higher, finer, and rarer), or
 deteriorations and monstrosities, appear suddenly on the scene in the
 greatest exuberance and splendour; the individual dares to be individual
 and detach himself. At this turning-point of history there manifest
 themselves, side by side, and often mixed and entangled together, a
 magnificent, manifold, virgin-forest-like up-growth and up-striving, a
 kind of TROPICAL TEMPO in the rivalry of growth, and an extraordinary
 decay and self-destruction, owing to the savagely opposing and seemingly
 exploding egoisms, which strive with one another "for sun and light,"
 and can no longer assign any limit, restraint, or forbearance for
 themselves by means of the hitherto existing morality. It was this
 morality itself which piled up the strength so enormously, which bent
 the bow in so threatening a manner:--it is now "out of date," it is
 getting "out of date." The dangerous and disquieting point has been
 reached when the greater, more manifold, more comprehensive life IS
 LIVED BEYOND the old morality; the "individual" stands out, and is
 obliged to have recourse to his own law-giving, his own arts and
 artifices for self-preservation, self-elevation, and self-deliverance.
 Nothing but new "Whys," nothing but new "Hows," no common formulas any
 longer, misunderstanding and disregard in league with each other, decay,
 deterioration, and the loftiest desires frightfully entangled, the
 genius of the race overflowing from all the cornucopias of good and bad,
 a portentous simultaneousness of Spring and Autumn, full of new charms
 and mysteries peculiar to the fresh, still inexhausted, still unwearied
 corruption. Danger is again present, the mother of morality, great
 danger; this time shifted into the individual, into the neighbour and
 friend, into the street, into their own child, into their own heart,
 into all the most personal and secret recesses of their desires and
 volitions. What will the moral philosophers who appear at this time have
 to preach? They discover, these sharp onlookers and loafers, that the
 end is quickly approaching, that everything around them decays and
 produces decay, that nothing will endure until the day after tomorrow,
 except one species of man, the incurably MEDIOCRE. The mediocre alone
 have a prospect of continuing and propagating themselves--they will
 be the men of the future, the sole survivors; "be like them! become
 mediocre!" is now the only morality which has still a significance,
 which still obtains a hearing.--But it is difficult to preach this
 morality of mediocrity! it can never avow what it is and what it
 desires! it has to talk of moderation and dignity and duty and brotherly
 love--it will have difficulty IN CONCEALING ITS IRONY!
 
 263. There is an INSTINCT FOR RANK, which more than anything else is
 already the sign of a HIGH rank; there is a DELIGHT in the NUANCES
 of reverence which leads one to infer noble origin and habits. The
 refinement, goodness, and loftiness of a soul are put to a perilous test
 when something passes by that is of the highest rank, but is not
 yet protected by the awe of authority from obtrusive touches and
 incivilities: something that goes its way like a living touchstone,
 undistinguished, undiscovered, and tentative, perhaps voluntarily veiled
 and disguised. He whose task and practice it is to investigate souls,
 will avail himself of many varieties of this very art to determine the
 ultimate value of a soul, the unalterable, innate order of rank to which
 it belongs: he will test it by its INSTINCT FOR REVERENCE. DIFFERENCE
 ENGENDRE HAINE: the vulgarity of many a nature spurts up suddenly like
 dirty water, when any holy vessel, any jewel from closed shrines, any
 book bearing the marks of great destiny, is brought before it; while
 on the other hand, there is an involuntary silence, a hesitation of the
 eye, a cessation of all gestures, by which it is indicated that a soul
 FEELS the nearness of what is worthiest of respect. The way in which, on
 the whole, the reverence for the BIBLE has hitherto been maintained
 in Europe, is perhaps the best example of discipline and refinement of
 manners which Europe owes to Christianity: books of such profoundness
 and supreme significance require for their protection an external
 tyranny of authority, in order to acquire the PERIOD of thousands of
 years which is necessary to exhaust and unriddle them. Much has been
 achieved when the sentiment has been at last instilled into the masses
 (the shallow-pates and the boobies of every kind) that they are not
 allowed to touch everything, that there are holy experiences before
 which they must take off their shoes and keep away the unclean hand--it
 is almost their highest advance towards humanity. On the contrary, in
 the so-called cultured classes, the believers in "modern ideas," nothing
 is perhaps so repulsive as their lack of shame, the easy insolence of
 eye and hand with which they touch, taste, and finger everything; and it
 is possible that even yet there is more RELATIVE nobility of taste, and
 more tact for reverence among the people, among the lower classes of
 the people, especially among peasants, than among the newspaper-reading
 DEMIMONDE of intellect, the cultured class.
 
 264. It cannot be effaced from a man's soul what his ancestors have
 preferably and most constantly done: whether they were perhaps diligent
 economizers attached to a desk and a cash-box, modest and citizen-like
 in their desires, modest also in their virtues; or whether they were
 accustomed to commanding from morning till night, fond of rude pleasures
 and probably of still ruder duties and responsibilities; or whether,
 finally, at one time or another, they have sacrificed old privileges of
 birth and possession, in order to live wholly for their faith--for their
 "God,"--as men of an inexorable and sensitive conscience, which blushes
 at every compromise. It is quite impossible for a man NOT to have
 the qualities and predilections of his parents and ancestors in his
 constitution, whatever appearances may suggest to the contrary. This is
 the problem of race. Granted that one knows something of the parents,
 it is admissible to draw a conclusion about the child: any kind
 of offensive incontinence, any kind of sordid envy, or of clumsy
 self-vaunting--the three things which together have constituted the
 genuine plebeian type in all times--such must pass over to the child, as
 surely as bad blood; and with the help of the best education and culture
 one will only succeed in DECEIVING with regard to such heredity.--And
 what else does education and culture try to do nowadays! In our very
 democratic, or rather, very plebeian age, "education" and "culture" MUST
 be essentially the art of deceiving--deceiving with regard to origin,
 with regard to the inherited plebeianism in body and soul. An educator
 who nowadays preached truthfulness above everything else, and called out
 constantly to his pupils: "Be true! Be natural! Show yourselves as you
 are!"--even such a virtuous and sincere ass would learn in a short time
 to have recourse to the FURCA of Horace, NATURAM EXPELLERE: with what
 results? "Plebeianism" USQUE RECURRET. [FOOTNOTE: Horace's "Epistles,"
 I. x. 24.]
 
 265. At the risk of displeasing innocent ears, I submit that egoism
 belongs to the essence of a noble soul, I mean the unalterable belief
 that to a being such as "we," other beings must naturally be in
 subjection, and have to sacrifice themselves. The noble soul accepts the
 fact of his egoism without question, and also without consciousness of
 harshness, constraint, or arbitrariness therein, but rather as something
 that may have its basis in the primary law of things:--if he sought a
 designation for it he would say: "It is justice itself." He acknowledges
 under certain circumstances, which made him hesitate at first, that
 there are other equally privileged ones; as soon as he has settled this
 question of rank, he moves among those equals and equally privileged
 ones with the same assurance, as regards modesty and delicate respect,
 which he enjoys in intercourse with himself--in accordance with an
 innate heavenly mechanism which all the stars understand. It is an
 ADDITIONAL instance of his egoism, this artfulness and self-limitation
 in intercourse with his equals--every star is a similar egoist; he
 honours HIMSELF in them, and in the rights which he concedes to them, he
 has no doubt that the exchange of honours and rights, as the ESSENCE of
 all intercourse, belongs also to the natural condition of things. The
 noble soul gives as he takes, prompted by the passionate and sensitive
 instinct of requital, which is at the root of his nature. The notion of
 "favour" has, INTER PARES, neither significance nor good repute; there
 may be a sublime way of letting gifts as it were light upon one from
 above, and of drinking them thirstily like dew-drops; but for those
 arts and displays the noble soul has no aptitude. His egoism hinders him
 here: in general, he looks "aloft" unwillingly--he looks either FORWARD,
 horizontally and deliberately, or downwards--HE KNOWS THAT HE IS ON A
 HEIGHT.
 
 266. "One can only truly esteem him who does not LOOK OUT FOR
 himself."--Goethe to Rath Schlosser.
 
 267. The Chinese have a proverb which mothers even teach their children:
 "SIAO-SIN" ("MAKE THY HEART SMALL"). This is the essentially fundamental
 tendency in latter-day civilizations. I have no doubt that an ancient
 Greek, also, would first of all remark the self-dwarfing in us Europeans
 of today--in this respect alone we should immediately be "distasteful"
 to him.
 
 268. What, after all, is ignobleness?--Words are vocal symbols for
 ideas; ideas, however, are more or less definite mental symbols
 for frequently returning and concurring sensations, for groups of
 sensations. It is not sufficient to use the same words in order to
 understand one another: we must also employ the same words for the same
 kind of internal experiences, we must in the end have experiences IN
 COMMON. On this account the people of one nation understand one another
 better than those belonging to different nations, even when they use
 the same language; or rather, when people have lived long together under
 similar conditions (of climate, soil, danger, requirement, toil) there
 ORIGINATES therefrom an entity that "understands itself"--namely, a
 nation. In all souls a like number of frequently recurring experiences
 have gained the upper hand over those occurring more rarely: about
 these matters people understand one another rapidly and always more
 rapidly--the history of language is the history of a process of
 abbreviation; on the basis of this quick comprehension people always
 unite closer and closer. The greater the danger, the greater is the
 need of agreeing quickly and readily about what is necessary; not to
 misunderstand one another in danger--that is what cannot at all be
 dispensed with in intercourse. Also in all loves and friendships one has
 the experience that nothing of the kind continues when the discovery
 has been made that in using the same words, one of the two parties has
 feelings, thoughts, intuitions, wishes, or fears different from those of
 the other. (The fear of the "eternal misunderstanding": that is the good
 genius which so often keeps persons of different sexes from too
 hasty attachments, to which sense and heart prompt them--and NOT some
 Schopenhauerian "genius of the species"!) Whichever groups of sensations
 within a soul awaken most readily, begin to speak, and give the word of
 command--these decide as to the general order of rank of its values, and
 determine ultimately its list of desirable things. A man's estimates of
 value betray something of the STRUCTURE of his soul, and wherein it
 sees its conditions of life, its intrinsic needs. Supposing now that
 necessity has from all time drawn together only such men as could
 express similar requirements and similar experiences by similar symbols,
 it results on the whole that the easy COMMUNICABILITY of need,
 which implies ultimately the undergoing only of average and COMMON
 experiences, must have been the most potent of all the forces which
 have hitherto operated upon mankind. The more similar, the more ordinary
 people, have always had and are still having the advantage; the more
 select, more refined, more unique, and difficultly comprehensible, are
 liable to stand alone; they succumb to accidents in their isolation, and
 seldom propagate themselves. One must appeal to immense opposing forces,
 in order to thwart this natural, all-too-natural PROGRESSUS IN SIMILE,
 the evolution of man to the similar, the ordinary, the average, the
 gregarious--to the IGNOBLE--!
 
 269. The more a psychologist--a born, an unavoidable psychologist
 and soul-diviner--turns his attention to the more select cases and
 individuals, the greater is his danger of being suffocated by sympathy:
 he NEEDS sternness and cheerfulness more than any other man. For
 the corruption, the ruination of higher men, of the more unusually
 constituted souls, is in fact, the rule: it is dreadful to have such a
 rule always before one's eyes. The manifold torment of the psychologist
 who has discovered this ruination, who discovers once, and then
 discovers ALMOST repeatedly throughout all history, this universal
 inner "desperateness" of higher men, this eternal "too late!" in every
 sense--may perhaps one day be the cause of his turning with
 bitterness against his own lot, and of his making an attempt at
 self-destruction--of his "going to ruin" himself. One may perceive
 in almost every psychologist a tell-tale inclination for delightful
 intercourse with commonplace and well-ordered men; the fact is thereby
 disclosed that he always requires healing, that he needs a sort
 of flight and forgetfulness, away from what his insight and
 incisiveness--from what his "business"--has laid upon his conscience.
 The fear of his memory is peculiar to him. He is easily silenced by the
 judgment of others; he hears with unmoved countenance how people honour,
 admire, love, and glorify, where he has PERCEIVED--or he even conceals
 his silence by expressly assenting to some plausible opinion. Perhaps
 the paradox of his situation becomes so dreadful that, precisely
 where he has learnt GREAT SYMPATHY, together with great CONTEMPT, the
 multitude, the educated, and the visionaries, have on their part learnt
 great reverence--reverence for "great men" and marvelous animals, for
 the sake of whom one blesses and honours the fatherland, the earth, the
 dignity of mankind, and one's own self, to whom one points the young,
 and in view of whom one educates them. And who knows but in all great
 instances hitherto just the same happened: that the multitude worshipped
 a God, and that the "God" was only a poor sacrificial animal! SUCCESS
 has always been the greatest liar--and the "work" itself is a success;
 the great statesman, the conqueror, the discoverer, are disguised in
 their creations until they are unrecognizable; the "work" of the artist,
 of the philosopher, only invents him who has created it, is REPUTED
 to have created it; the "great men," as they are reverenced, are poor
 little fictions composed afterwards; in the world of historical values
 spurious coinage PREVAILS. Those great poets, for example, such as
 Byron, Musset, Poe, Leopardi, Kleist, Gogol (I do not venture to mention
 much greater names, but I have them in my mind), as they now appear, and
 were perhaps obliged to be: men of the moment, enthusiastic, sensuous,
 and childish, light-minded and impulsive in their trust and distrust;
 with souls in which usually some flaw has to be concealed; often taking
 revenge with their works for an internal defilement, often seeking
 forgetfulness in their soaring from a too true memory, often lost in
 the mud and almost in love with it, until they become like the
 Will-o'-the-Wisps around the swamps, and PRETEND TO BE stars--the people
 then call them idealists,--often struggling with protracted disgust,
 with an ever-reappearing phantom of disbelief, which makes them cold,
 and obliges them to languish for GLORIA and devour "faith as it is"
 out of the hands of intoxicated adulators:--what a TORMENT these great
 artists are and the so-called higher men in general, to him who has once
 found them out! It is thus conceivable that it is just from woman--who
 is clairvoyant in the world of suffering, and also unfortunately eager
 to help and save to an extent far beyond her powers--that THEY have
 learnt so readily those outbreaks of boundless devoted SYMPATHY, which
 the multitude, above all the reverent multitude, do not understand,
 and overwhelm with prying and self-gratifying interpretations. This
 sympathizing invariably deceives itself as to its power; woman would
 like to believe that love can do EVERYTHING--it is the SUPERSTITION
 peculiar to her. Alas, he who knows the heart finds out how poor,
 helpless, pretentious, and blundering even the best and deepest love
 is--he finds that it rather DESTROYS than saves!--It is possible that
 under the holy fable and travesty of the life of Jesus there is hidden
 one of the most painful cases of the martyrdom of KNOWLEDGE ABOUT LOVE:
 the martyrdom of the most innocent and most craving heart, that
 never had enough of any human love, that DEMANDED love, that demanded
 inexorably and frantically to be loved and nothing else, with terrible
 outbursts against those who refused him their love; the story of a poor
 soul insatiated and insatiable in love, that had to invent hell to send
 thither those who WOULD NOT love him--and that at last, enlightened
 about human love, had to invent a God who is entire love, entire
 CAPACITY for love--who takes pity on human love, because it is so
 paltry, so ignorant! He who has such sentiments, he who has such
 KNOWLEDGE about love--SEEKS for death!--But why should one deal with
 such painful matters? Provided, of course, that one is not obliged to do
 so.
 
 270. The intellectual haughtiness and loathing of every man who has
 suffered deeply--it almost determines the order of rank HOW deeply men
 can suffer--the chilling certainty, with which he is thoroughly imbued
 and coloured, that by virtue of his suffering he KNOWS MORE than the
 shrewdest and wisest can ever know, that he has been familiar with,
 and "at home" in, many distant, dreadful worlds of which "YOU know
 nothing"!--this silent intellectual haughtiness of the sufferer, this
 pride of the elect of knowledge, of the "initiated," of the almost
 sacrificed, finds all forms of disguise necessary to protect itself from
 contact with officious and sympathizing hands, and in general from all
 that is not its equal in suffering. Profound suffering makes noble:
 it separates.--One of the most refined forms of disguise is Epicurism,
 along with a certain ostentatious boldness of taste, which takes
 suffering lightly, and puts itself on the defensive against all that
 is sorrowful and profound. They are "gay men" who make use of gaiety,
 because they are misunderstood on account of it--they WISH to be
 misunderstood. There are "scientific minds" who make use of science,
 because it gives a gay appearance, and because scientificness leads to
 the conclusion that a person is superficial--they WISH to mislead to a
 false conclusion. There are free insolent minds which would fain conceal
 and deny that they are broken, proud, incurable hearts (the cynicism of
 Hamlet--the case of Galiani); and occasionally folly itself is the mask
 of an unfortunate OVER-ASSURED knowledge.--From which it follows that it
 is the part of a more refined humanity to have reverence "for the mask,"
 and not to make use of psychology and curiosity in the wrong place.
 
 271. That which separates two men most profoundly is a different sense
 and grade of purity. What does it matter about all their honesty and
 reciprocal usefulness, what does it matter about all their mutual
 good-will: the fact still remains--they "cannot smell each other!" The
 highest instinct for purity places him who is affected with it in the
 most extraordinary and dangerous isolation, as a saint: for it is just
 holiness--the highest spiritualization of the instinct in question. Any
 kind of cognizance of an indescribable excess in the joy of the bath,
 any kind of ardour or thirst which perpetually impels the soul out
 of night into the morning, and out of gloom, out of "affliction" into
 clearness, brightness, depth, and refinement:--just as much as such a
 tendency DISTINGUISHES--it is a noble tendency--it also SEPARATES.--The
 pity of the saint is pity for the FILTH of the human, all-too-human.
 And there are grades and heights where pity itself is regarded by him as
 impurity, as filth.
 
 272. Signs of nobility: never to think of lowering our duties to the
 rank of duties for everybody; to be unwilling to renounce or to share
 our responsibilities; to count our prerogatives, and the exercise of
 them, among our DUTIES.
 
 273. A man who strives after great things, looks upon every one whom
 he encounters on his way either as a means of advance, or a delay and
 hindrance--or as a temporary resting-place. His peculiar lofty BOUNTY
 to his fellow-men is only possible when he attains his elevation and
 dominates. Impatience, and the consciousness of being always condemned
 to comedy up to that time--for even strife is a comedy, and conceals the
 end, as every means does--spoil all intercourse for him; this kind of
 man is acquainted with solitude, and what is most poisonous in it.
 
 274. THE PROBLEM OF THOSE WHO WAIT.--Happy chances are necessary, and
 many incalculable elements, in order that a higher man in whom the
 solution of a problem is dormant, may yet take action, or "break forth,"
 as one might say--at the right moment. On an average it DOES NOT happen;
 and in all corners of the earth there are waiting ones sitting who
 hardly know to what extent they are waiting, and still less that they
 wait in vain. Occasionally, too, the waking call comes too late--the
 chance which gives "permission" to take action--when their best youth,
 and strength for action have been used up in sitting still; and how many
 a one, just as he "sprang up," has found with horror that his limbs are
 benumbed and his spirits are now too heavy! "It is too late," he has
 said to himself--and has become self-distrustful and henceforth for ever
 useless.--In the domain of genius, may not the "Raphael without
 hands" (taking the expression in its widest sense) perhaps not be the
 exception, but the rule?--Perhaps genius is by no means so rare: but
 rather the five hundred HANDS which it requires in order to tyrannize
 over the [GREEK INSERTED HERE], "the right time"--in order to take
 chance by the forelock!
 
 275. He who does not WISH to see the height of a man, looks all the
 more sharply at what is low in him, and in the foreground--and thereby
 betrays himself.
 
 276. In all kinds of injury and loss the lower and coarser soul is
 better off than the nobler soul: the dangers of the latter must be
 greater, the probability that it will come to grief and perish is in
 fact immense, considering the multiplicity of the conditions of its
 existence.--In a lizard a finger grows again which has been lost; not so
 in man.--
 
 277. It is too bad! Always the old story! When a man has finished
 building his house, he finds that he has learnt unawares something
 which he OUGHT absolutely to have known before he--began to build. The
 eternal, fatal "Too late!" The melancholia of everything COMPLETED--!
 
 278.--Wanderer, who art thou? I see thee follow thy path without scorn,
 without love, with unfathomable eyes, wet and sad as a plummet which has
 returned to the light insatiated out of every depth--what did it seek
 down there?--with a bosom that never sighs, with lips that conceal their
 loathing, with a hand which only slowly grasps: who art thou? what
 hast thou done? Rest thee here: this place has hospitality for every
 one--refresh thyself! And whoever thou art, what is it that now pleases
 thee? What will serve to refresh thee? Only name it, whatever I have
 I offer thee! "To refresh me? To refresh me? Oh, thou prying one,
 what sayest thou! But give me, I pray thee---" What? what? Speak out!
 "Another mask! A second mask!"
 
 279. Men of profound sadness betray themselves when they are happy: they
 have a mode of seizing upon happiness as though they would choke and
 strangle it, out of jealousy--ah, they know only too well that it will
 flee from them!
 
 280. "Bad! Bad! What? Does he not--go back?" Yes! But you misunderstand
 him when you complain about it. He goes back like every one who is about
 to make a great spring.
 
 281.--"Will people believe it of me? But I insist that they believe it
 of me: I have always thought very unsatisfactorily of myself and about
 myself, only in very rare cases, only compulsorily, always without
 delight in 'the subject,' ready to digress from 'myself,' and always
 without faith in the result, owing to an unconquerable distrust of the
 POSSIBILITY of self-knowledge, which has led me so far as to feel a
 CONTRADICTIO IN ADJECTO even in the idea of 'direct knowledge' which
 theorists allow themselves:--this matter of fact is almost the most
 certain thing I know about myself. There must be a sort of repugnance
 in me to BELIEVE anything definite about myself.--Is there perhaps
 some enigma therein? Probably; but fortunately nothing for my own
 teeth.--Perhaps it betrays the species to which I belong?--but not to
 myself, as is sufficiently agreeable to me."
 
 282.--"But what has happened to you?"--"I do not know," he said,
 hesitatingly; "perhaps the Harpies have flown over my table."--It
 sometimes happens nowadays that a gentle, sober, retiring man becomes
 suddenly mad, breaks the plates, upsets the table, shrieks, raves,
 and shocks everybody--and finally withdraws, ashamed, and raging at
 himself--whither? for what purpose? To famish apart? To suffocate with
 his memories?--To him who has the desires of a lofty and dainty soul,
 and only seldom finds his table laid and his food prepared, the danger
 will always be great--nowadays, however, it is extraordinarily so.
 Thrown into the midst of a noisy and plebeian age, with which he does
 not like to eat out of the same dish, he may readily perish of hunger
 and thirst--or, should he nevertheless finally "fall to," of sudden
 nausea.--We have probably all sat at tables to which we did not belong;
 and precisely the most spiritual of us, who are most difficult to
 nourish, know the dangerous DYSPEPSIA which originates from a sudden
 insight and disillusionment about our food and our messmates--the
 AFTER-DINNER NAUSEA.
 
 283. If one wishes to praise at all, it is a delicate and at the
 same time a noble self-control, to praise only where one DOES NOT
 agree--otherwise in fact one would praise oneself, which is contrary
 to good taste:--a self-control, to be sure, which offers excellent
 opportunity and provocation to constant MISUNDERSTANDING. To be able to
 allow oneself this veritable luxury of taste and morality, one must
 not live among intellectual imbeciles, but rather among men whose
 misunderstandings and mistakes amuse by their refinement--or one will
 have to pay dearly for it!--"He praises me, THEREFORE he acknowledges me
 to be right"--this asinine method of inference spoils half of the life
 of us recluses, for it brings the asses into our neighbourhood and
 friendship.
 
 284. To live in a vast and proud tranquility; always beyond... To have,
 or not to have, one's emotions, one's For and Against, according to
 choice; to lower oneself to them for hours; to SEAT oneself on them as
 upon horses, and often as upon asses:--for one must know how to make
 use of their stupidity as well as of their fire. To conserve one's
 three hundred foregrounds; also one's black spectacles: for there are
 circumstances when nobody must look into our eyes, still less into our
 "motives." And to choose for company that roguish and cheerful vice,
 politeness. And to remain master of one's four virtues, courage,
 insight, sympathy, and solitude. For solitude is a virtue with us, as
 a sublime bent and bias to purity, which divines that in the contact of
 man and man--"in society"--it must be unavoidably impure. All society
 makes one somehow, somewhere, or sometime--"commonplace."
 
 285. The greatest events and thoughts--the greatest thoughts, however,
 are the greatest events--are longest in being comprehended: the
 generations which are contemporary with them do not EXPERIENCE such
 events--they live past them. Something happens there as in the realm of
 stars. The light of the furthest stars is longest in reaching man; and
 before it has arrived man DENIES--that there are stars there. "How
 many centuries does a mind require to be understood?"--that is also a
 standard, one also makes a gradation of rank and an etiquette therewith,
 such as is necessary for mind and for star.
 
 286. "Here is the prospect free, the mind exalted." [FOOTNOTE: Goethe's
 "Faust," Part II, Act V. The words of Dr. Marianus.]--But there is a
 reverse kind of man, who is also upon a height, and has also a free
 prospect--but looks DOWNWARDS.
 
 287. What is noble? What does the word "noble" still mean for us
 nowadays? How does the noble man betray himself, how is he recognized
 under this heavy overcast sky of the commencing plebeianism, by which
 everything is rendered opaque and leaden?--It is not his actions which
 establish his claim--actions are always ambiguous, always inscrutable;
 neither is it his "works." One finds nowadays among artists and scholars
 plenty of those who betray by their works that a profound longing for
 nobleness impels them; but this very NEED of nobleness is radically
 different from the needs of the noble soul itself, and is in fact the
 eloquent and dangerous sign of the lack thereof. It is not the works,
 but the BELIEF which is here decisive and determines the order of
 rank--to employ once more an old religious formula with a new and deeper
 meaning--it is some fundamental certainty which a noble soul has about
 itself, something which is not to be sought, is not to be found, and
 perhaps, also, is not to be lost.--THE NOBLE SOUL HAS REVERENCE FOR
 ITSELF.--
 
 288. There are men who are unavoidably intellectual, let them turn
 and twist themselves as they will, and hold their hands before their
 treacherous eyes--as though the hand were not a betrayer; it always
 comes out at last that they have something which they hide--namely,
 intellect. One of the subtlest means of deceiving, at least as long as
 possible, and of successfully representing oneself to be stupider
 than one really is--which in everyday life is often as desirable as
 an umbrella,--is called ENTHUSIASM, including what belongs to it, for
 instance, virtue. For as Galiani said, who was obliged to know it: VERTU
 EST ENTHOUSIASME.
 
 289. In the writings of a recluse one always hears something of the echo
 of the wilderness, something of the murmuring tones and timid vigilance
 of solitude; in his strongest words, even in his cry itself, there
 sounds a new and more dangerous kind of silence, of concealment. He who
 has sat day and night, from year's end to year's end, alone with his
 soul in familiar discord and discourse, he who has become a cave-bear,
 or a treasure-seeker, or a treasure-guardian and dragon in his cave--it
 may be a labyrinth, but can also be a gold-mine--his ideas themselves
 eventually acquire a twilight-colour of their own, and an odour, as much
 of the depth as of the mould, something uncommunicative and repulsive,
 which blows chilly upon every passer-by. The recluse does not believe
 that a philosopher--supposing that a philosopher has always in the first
 place been a recluse--ever expressed his actual and ultimate opinions in
 books: are not books written precisely to hide what is in us?--indeed,
 he will doubt whether a philosopher CAN have "ultimate and actual"
 opinions at all; whether behind every cave in him there is not, and must
 necessarily be, a still deeper cave: an ampler, stranger, richer
 world beyond the surface, an abyss behind every bottom, beneath every
 "foundation." Every philosophy is a foreground philosophy--this is a
 recluse's verdict: "There is something arbitrary in the fact that the
 PHILOSOPHER came to a stand here, took a retrospect, and looked around;
 that he HERE laid his spade aside and did not dig any deeper--there
 is also something suspicious in it." Every philosophy also CONCEALS a
 philosophy; every opinion is also a LURKING-PLACE, every word is also a
 MASK.
 
 290. Every deep thinker is more afraid of being understood than of being
 misunderstood. The latter perhaps wounds his vanity; but the former
 wounds his heart, his sympathy, which always says: "Ah, why would you
 also have as hard a time of it as I have?"
 
 291. Man, a COMPLEX, mendacious, artful, and inscrutable animal, uncanny
 to the other animals by his artifice and sagacity, rather than by his
 strength, has invented the good conscience in order finally to enjoy his
 soul as something SIMPLE; and the whole of morality is a long, audacious
 falsification, by virtue of which generally enjoyment at the sight of
 the soul becomes possible. From this point of view there is perhaps much
 more in the conception of "art" than is generally believed.
 
 292. A philosopher: that is a man who constantly experiences, sees,
 hears, suspects, hopes, and dreams extraordinary things; who is struck
 by his own thoughts as if they came from the outside, from above and
 below, as a species of events and lightning-flashes PECULIAR TO HIM; who
 is perhaps himself a storm pregnant with new lightnings; a portentous
 man, around whom there is always rumbling and mumbling and gaping and
 something uncanny going on. A philosopher: alas, a being who often
 runs away from himself, is often afraid of himself--but whose curiosity
 always makes him "come to himself" again.
 
 293. A man who says: "I like that, I take it for my own, and mean to
 guard and protect it from every one"; a man who can conduct a case,
 carry out a resolution, remain true to an opinion, keep hold of a woman,
 punish and overthrow insolence; a man who has his indignation and his
 sword, and to whom the weak, the suffering, the oppressed, and even the
 animals willingly submit and naturally belong; in short, a man who is a
 MASTER by nature--when such a man has sympathy, well! THAT sympathy has
 value! But of what account is the sympathy of those who suffer! Or of
 those even who preach sympathy! There is nowadays, throughout almost the
 whole of Europe, a sickly irritability and sensitiveness towards pain,
 and also a repulsive irrestrainableness in complaining, an effeminizing,
 which, with the aid of religion and philosophical nonsense, seeks
 to deck itself out as something superior--there is a regular cult of
 suffering. The UNMANLINESS of that which is called "sympathy" by such
 groups of visionaries, is always, I believe, the first thing that
 strikes the eye.--One must resolutely and radically taboo this latest
 form of bad taste; and finally I wish people to put the good amulet,
 "GAI SABER" ("gay science," in ordinary language), on heart and neck, as
 a protection against it.
 
 294. THE OLYMPIAN VICE.--Despite the philosopher who, as a genuine
 Englishman, tried to bring laughter into bad repute in all thinking
 minds--"Laughing is a bad infirmity of human nature, which every
 thinking mind will strive to overcome" (Hobbes),--I would even
 allow myself to rank philosophers according to the quality of their
 laughing--up to those who are capable of GOLDEN laughter. And supposing
 that Gods also philosophize, which I am strongly inclined to believe,
 owing to many reasons--I have no doubt that they also know how to laugh
 thereby in an overman-like and new fashion--and at the expense of all
 serious things! Gods are fond of ridicule: it seems that they cannot
 refrain from laughter even in holy matters.
 
 295. The genius of the heart, as that great mysterious one possesses
 it, the tempter-god and born rat-catcher of consciences, whose voice can
 descend into the nether-world of every soul, who neither speaks a word
 nor casts a glance in which there may not be some motive or touch
 of allurement, to whose perfection it pertains that he knows how to
 appear,--not as he is, but in a guise which acts as an ADDITIONAL
 constraint on his followers to press ever closer to him, to follow him
 more cordially and thoroughly;--the genius of the heart, which imposes
 silence and attention on everything loud and self-conceited, which
 smoothes rough souls and makes them taste a new longing--to lie placid
 as a mirror, that the deep heavens may be reflected in them;--the genius
 of the heart, which teaches the clumsy and too hasty hand to hesitate,
 and to grasp more delicately; which scents the hidden and forgotten
 treasure, the drop of goodness and sweet spirituality under thick dark
 ice, and is a divining-rod for every grain of gold, long buried and
 imprisoned in mud and sand; the genius of the heart, from contact with
 which every one goes away richer; not favoured or surprised, not as
 though gratified and oppressed by the good things of others; but richer
 in himself, newer than before, broken up, blown upon, and sounded by a
 thawing wind; more uncertain, perhaps, more delicate, more fragile, more
 bruised, but full of hopes which as yet lack names, full of a new will
 and current, full of a new ill-will and counter-current... but what am I
 doing, my friends? Of whom am I talking to you? Have I forgotten myself
 so far that I have not even told you his name? Unless it be that you
 have already divined of your own accord who this questionable God
 and spirit is, that wishes to be PRAISED in such a manner? For, as it
 happens to every one who from childhood onward has always been on his
 legs, and in foreign lands, I have also encountered on my path many
 strange and dangerous spirits; above all, however, and again and again,
 the one of whom I have just spoken: in fact, no less a personage than
 the God DIONYSUS, the great equivocator and tempter, to whom, as you
 know, I once offered in all secrecy and reverence my first-fruits--the
 last, as it seems to me, who has offered a SACRIFICE to him, for I
 have found no one who could understand what I was then doing. In
 the meantime, however, I have learned much, far too much, about the
 philosophy of this God, and, as I said, from mouth to mouth--I, the last
 disciple and initiate of the God Dionysus: and perhaps I might at last
 begin to give you, my friends, as far as I am allowed, a little taste of
 this philosophy? In a hushed voice, as is but seemly: for it has to do
 with much that is secret, new, strange, wonderful, and uncanny. The
 very fact that Dionysus is a philosopher, and that therefore Gods also
 philosophize, seems to me a novelty which is not unensnaring, and might
 perhaps arouse suspicion precisely among philosophers;--among you, my
 friends, there is less to be said against it, except that it comes too
 late and not at the right time; for, as it has been disclosed to me, you
 are loth nowadays to believe in God and gods. It may happen, too, that
 in the frankness of my story I must go further than is agreeable to the
 strict usages of your ears? Certainly the God in question went further,
 very much further, in such dialogues, and was always many paces ahead of
 me... Indeed, if it were allowed, I should have to give him, according
 to human usage, fine ceremonious tides of lustre and merit, I should
 have to extol his courage as investigator and discoverer, his fearless
 honesty, truthfulness, and love of wisdom. But such a God does not know
 what to do with all that respectable trumpery and pomp. "Keep that," he
 would say, "for thyself and those like thee, and whoever else require
 it! I--have no reason to cover my nakedness!" One suspects that this
 kind of divinity and philosopher perhaps lacks shame?--He once said:
 "Under certain circumstances I love mankind"--and referred thereby to
 Ariadne, who was present; "in my opinion man is an agreeable, brave,
 inventive animal, that has not his equal upon earth, he makes his way
 even through all labyrinths. I like man, and often think how I can
 still further advance him, and make him stronger, more evil, and more
 profound."--"Stronger, more evil, and more profound?" I asked in horror.
 "Yes," he said again, "stronger, more evil, and more profound; also more
 beautiful"--and thereby the tempter-god smiled with his halcyon smile,
 as though he had just paid some charming compliment. One here sees at
 once that it is not only shame that this divinity lacks;--and in general
 there are good grounds for supposing that in some things the Gods could
 all of them come to us men for instruction. We men are--more human.--
 
 296. Alas! what are you, after all, my written and painted thoughts! Not
 long ago you were so variegated, young and malicious, so full of thorns
 and secret spices, that you made me sneeze and laugh--and now? You
 have already doffed your novelty, and some of you, I fear, are ready
 to become truths, so immortal do they look, so pathetically honest, so
 tedious! And was it ever otherwise? What then do we write and paint,
 we mandarins with Chinese brush, we immortalisers of things which LEND
 themselves to writing, what are we alone capable of painting? Alas, only
 that which is just about to fade and begins to lose its odour! Alas,
 only exhausted and departing storms and belated yellow sentiments! Alas,
 only birds strayed and fatigued by flight, which now let themselves be
 captured with the hand--with OUR hand! We immortalize what cannot live
 and fly much longer, things only which are exhausted and mellow! And it
 is only for your AFTERNOON, you, my written and painted thoughts, for
 which alone I have colours, many colours, perhaps, many variegated
 softenings, and fifty yellows and browns and greens and reds;--but
 nobody will divine thereby how ye looked in your morning, you sudden
 sparks and marvels of my solitude, you, my old, beloved--EVIL thoughts!
 
 
 
 
 FROM THE HEIGHTS
 
 By F W Nietzsche
 
 Translated by L. A. Magnus
 
 
                        1.
 
      MIDDAY of Life! Oh, season of delight!
                       My summer's park!
      Uneaseful joy to look, to lurk, to hark--
      I peer for friends, am ready day and night,--
      Where linger ye, my friends? The time is right!
 
                        2.
 
      Is not the glacier's grey today for you
                          Rose-garlanded?
      The brooklet seeks you, wind, cloud, with longing thread
      And thrust themselves yet higher to the blue,
      To spy for you from farthest eagle's view.
 
                        3.
 
      My table was spread out for you on high--
                       Who dwelleth so
      Star-near, so near the grisly pit below?--
      My realm--what realm hath wider boundary?
      My honey--who hath sipped its fragrancy?
 
                        4.
 
      Friends, ye are there! Woe me,--yet I am not
                         He whom ye seek?
      Ye stare and stop--better your wrath could speak!
      I am not I? Hand, gait, face, changed? And what
      I am, to you my friends, now am I not?
 
                        5.
 
      Am I an other? Strange am I to Me?
                       Yet from Me sprung?
      A wrestler, by himself too oft self-wrung?
      Hindering too oft my own self's potency,
      Wounded and hampered by self-victory?
 
                        6.
 
      I sought where-so the wind blows keenest. There
                      I learned to dwell
      Where no man dwells, on lonesome ice-lorn fell,
      And unlearned Man and God and curse and prayer?
      Became a ghost haunting the glaciers bare?
 
                        7.
 
      Ye, my old friends! Look! Ye turn pale, filled o'er
                       With love and fear!
      Go! Yet not in wrath. Ye could ne'er live here.
      Here in the farthest realm of ice and scaur,
      A huntsman must one be, like chamois soar.
 
                        8.
 
      An evil huntsman was I? See how taut
                     My bow was bent!
      Strongest was he by whom such bolt were sent--
      Woe now! That arrow is with peril fraught,
      Perilous as none.--Have yon safe home ye sought!
 
                        9.
 
      Ye go! Thou didst endure enough, oh, heart;--
                      Strong was thy hope;
      Unto new friends thy portals widely ope,
      Let old ones be. Bid memory depart!
      Wast thou young then, now--better young thou art!
 
                        10.
 
      What linked us once together, one hope's tie--
                     (Who now doth con
      Those lines, now fading, Love once wrote thereon?)--
      Is like a parchment, which the hand is shy
      To touch--like crackling leaves, all seared, all dry.
 
                        11.
 
      Oh! Friends no more! They are--what name for those?--
                            Friends' phantom-flight
      Knocking at my heart's window-pane at night,
      Gazing on me, that speaks "We were" and goes,--
      Oh, withered words, once fragrant as the rose!
 
                        12.
 
      Pinings of youth that might not understand!
                        For which I pined,
      Which I deemed changed with me, kin of my kind:
      But they grew old, and thus were doomed and banned:
      None but new kith are native of my land!
 
                        13.
 
      Midday of life! My second youth's delight!
                        My summer's park!
      Unrestful joy to long, to lurk, to hark!
      I peer for friends!--am ready day and night,
      For my new friends. Come! Come! The time is right!
 
                        14.
 
      This song is done,--the sweet sad cry of rue
                        Sang out its end;
      A wizard wrought it, he the timely friend,
      The midday-friend,--no, do not ask me who;
      At midday 'twas, when one became as two.
 
                        15.
 
      We keep our Feast of Feasts, sure of our bourne,
                       Our aims self-same:
      The Guest of Guests, friend Zarathustra, came!
      The world now laughs, the grisly veil was torn,
      And Light and Dark were one that wedding-morn.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Marc D'Hooghe at http://www.freeliterature.org
 (Images generously made available by the Hathi Trust.)
 
 
 
 
 
 FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
 THE
 
 BIRTH OF TRAGEDY
 
 OR
 
 _HELLENISM AND PESSIMISM_
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 WM. A. HAUSSMANN, PH.D.
 
 
 The Complete Works of Friedrich Nietzsche
 
 The First Complete and Authorised English Translation
 
 Edited by Dr Oscar Levy
 
 Volume One
 
 
 T.N. FOULIS
 
 13 & 15 FREDERICK STREET
 
 EDINBURGH: AND LONDON
 
 1910
 
 
 
 
     CONTENTS.
 
     BIOGRAPHICAL INTRODUCTION
     AN ATTEMPT AT SELF-CRITICISM
     FOREWORD TO RICHARD WAGNER
     THE BIRTH OF TRAGEDY
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.[1]
 
 
 Frederick Nietzsche was born at Rcken near Ltzen, in the Prussian
 province of Saxony, on the 15th of October 1844, at 10 a.m. The day
 happened to be the anniversary of the birth of Frederick-William IV.,
 then King of Prussia, and the peal of the local church-bells which was
 intended to celebrate this event, was, by a happy coincidence, just
 timed to greet my brother on his entrance into the world. In 1841,
 at the time when our father was tutor to the Altenburg Princesses,
 Theresa of Saxe-Altenburg, Elizabeth, Grand Duchess of Olden-burg, and
 Alexandra, Grand Duchess Constantine of Russia, he had had the honour
 of being presented to his witty and pious sovereign. The meeting seems
 to have impressed both parties very favourably; for, very shortly
 after it had taken place, our father received his living at Rcken "by
 supreme command." His joy may well be imagined, therefore, when a first
 son was born to him on his beloved and august patron's birthday, and
 at the christening ceremony he spoke as follows:--"Thou blessed month
 of October!--for many years the most decisive events in my life have
 occurred within thy thirty-one days, and now I celebrate the greatest
 and most glorious of them all by baptising my little boy! O blissful
 moment! O exquisite festival! O unspeakably holy duty! In the Lord's
 name I bless thee!--With all my heart I utter these words: Bring me
 this, my beloved child, that I may consecrate it unto the Lord. My son,
 Frederick William, thus shalt thou be named on earth, as a memento of
 my royal benefactor on whose birthday thou wast born!"
 
 Our father was thirty-one years of age, and our mother not quite
 nineteen, when my brother was born. Our mother, who was the daughter
 of a clergyman, was good-looking and healthy, and was one of a very
 large family of sons and daughters. Our paternal grandparents, the
 Rev. Oehler and his wife, in Pobles, were typically healthy people.
 Strength, robustness, lively dispositions, and a cheerful outlook on
 life, were among the qualities which every one was pleased to observe
 in them. Our grandfather Oehler was a bright, clever man, and quite
 the old style of comfortable country parson, who thought it no sin to
 go hunting. He scarcely had a day's illness in his life, and would
 certainly not have met with his end as early as he did--that is to say,
 before his seventieth year--if his careless disregard of all caution,
 where his health was concerned, had not led to his catching a severe
 and fatal cold. In regard to our grand-mother Oehler, who died in her
 eighty-second year, all that can be said is, that if all German women
 were possessed of the health she enjoyed, the German nation would excel
 all others from the standpoint of vitality. She bore our grandfather
 eleven children; gave each of them the breast for nearly the whole of
 its first year, and reared them all It is said that the sight of these
 eleven children, at ages varying from nineteen years to one month, with
 their powerful build, rosy cheeks, beaming eyes, and wealth of curly
 locks, provoked the admiration of all visitors. Of course, despite
 their extraordinarily good health, the life of this family was not
 by any means all sunshine. Each of the children was very spirited,
 wilful, and obstinate, and it was therefore no simple matter to keep
 them in order. Moreover, though they always showed the utmost respect
 and most implicit obedience to their parents--even as middle-aged
 men and women--misunderstandings between themselves were of constant
 occurrence. Our Oehler grandparents were fairly well-to-do; for our
 grandmother hailed from a very old family, who had been extensive
 land-owners in the neighbourhood of Zeitz for centuries, and her father
 owned the baronial estate of Wehlitz and a magnificent seat near Zeitz
 in Pacht. When she married, her father gave her carriages and horses,
 a coachman, a cook, and a kitchenmaid, which for the wife of a German
 minister was then, and is still, something quite exceptional. As a
 result of the wars in the beginning of the nineteenth century, however,
 our great-grandfather lost the greater part of his property.
 
 Our father's family was also in fairly comfortable circumstances,
 and likewise very large. Our grandfather Dr. Nietzsche (D.D. and
 Superintendent) married twice, and had in all twelve children, of whom
 three died young. Our grandfather on this side, whom I never knew,
 must certainly have been a distinguished, dignified, very learned
 and reserved man; his second wife--our beloved grandmother--was an
 active-minded, intelligent, and exceptionally good-natured woman.
 The whole of our father's family, which I only got to know when they
 were very advanced in years, were remarkable for their great power of
 self-control, their lively interest in intellectual matters, and a
 strong sense of family unity, which manifested itself both in their
 splendid readiness to help one another and in their very excellent
 relations with each other. Our father was the youngest son, and, thanks
 to his uncommonly lovable disposition, together with other gifts, which
 only tended to become more marked as he grew older, he was quite the
 favourite of the family. Blessed with a thoroughly sound constitution,
 as all averred who knew him at the convent-school in Rossleben, at
 the University, or later at the ducal court of Altenburg, he was tall
 and slender, possessed an undoubted gift for poetry and real musical
 talent, and was moreover a man of delicate sensibilities, full of
 consideration for his whole family, and distinguished in his manners.
 
 My brother often refers to his Polish descent, and in later years
 he even instituted research-work with the view of establishing it,
 which met with partial success. I know nothing definite concerning
 these investigations, because a large number of valuable documents
 were unfortunately destroyed after his breakdown in Turin. The family
 tradition was that a certain Polish nobleman Nicki (pronounced Nietzky)
 had obtained the special favour of Augustus the Strong, King of
 Poland, and had received the rank of Earl from him. When, however,
 Stanislas Leszcysski the Pole became king, our supposed ancestor became
 involved in a conspiracy in favour of the Saxons and Protestants. He
 was sentenced to death; but, taking flight, according to the evidence
 of the documents, he was ultimately befriended by a certain Earl of
 Brhl, who gave him a small post in an obscure little provincial town.
 Occasionally our aged aunts would speak of our great-grandfather
 Nietzsche, who was said to have died in his ninety-first year, and
 words always seemed to fail them when they attempted to describe his
 handsome appearance, good breeding, and vigour. Our ancestors, both on
 the Nietzsche and the Oehler side, were very long-lived. Of the four
 pairs of great-grandparents, one great-grandfather reached the age of
 ninety, five great-grandmothers and-fathers died between eighty-two and
 eighty-six years of age, and two only failed to reach their seventieth
 year.
 
 The sorrow which hung as a cloud over our branch of the family
 was our father's death, as the result of a heavy fall, at the age
 of thirty-eight. One night, upon leaving some friends whom he had
 accompanied home, he was met at the door of the vicarage by our little
 dog. The little animal must have got between his feet, for he stumbled
 and fell backwards down seven stone steps on to the paving-stones
 of the vicarage courtyard. As a result of this fall, he was laid up
 with concussion of the brain, and, after a lingering illness, which
 lasted eleven months, he died on the 30th of July 1849. The early
 death of our beloved and highly-gifted father spread gloom over
 the whole of our childhood. In 1850 our mother withdrew with us to
 Naumburg on the Saale, where she took up her abode with our widowed
 grandmother Nietzsche; and there she brought us up with Spartan
 severity and simplicity, which, besides being typical of the period,
 was quite _de rigeur_ in her family. Of course, Grand-mamma Nietzsche
 helped somewhat to temper her daughter-in-law's severity, and in this
 respect our Oehler grandparents, who were less rigorous with us,
 their eldest grandchildren, than with their own children, were also
 very influential. Grandfather Oehler was the first who seems to have
 recognised the extraordinary talents of his eldest grandchild.
 
 From his earliest childhood upwards, my brother was always strong
 and healthy; he often declared that he must have been taken for a
 peasant-boy throughout his childhood and youth, as he was so plump,
 brown, and rosy. The thick fair hair which fell picturesquely over his
 shoulders tended somewhat to modify his robust appearance. Had he not
 possessed those wonderfully beautiful, large, and expressive eyes,
 however, and had he not been so very ceremonious in his manner, neither
 his teachers nor his relatives would ever have noticed anything at all
 remarkable about the boy; for he was both modest and reserved.
 
 He received his early schooling at a preparatory school, and later
 at a grammar school in Naumburg. In the autumn of 1858, when he was
 fourteen years of age, he entered the Pforta school, so famous for the
 scholars it has produced. There, too, very severe discipline prevailed,
 and much was exacted from the pupils, with the view of inuring them
 to great mental and physical exertions. Thus, if my brother seems
 to lay particular stress upon the value of rigorous training, free
 from all sentimentality, it should be remembered that he speaks from
 experience in this respect. At Pforta he followed the regular school
 course, and he did not enter a university until the comparatively late
 age of twenty. His extraordinary gifts manifested themselves chiefly
 in his independent and private studies and artistic efforts. As a boy
 his musical talent had already been so noticeable, that he himself
 and other competent judges were doubtful as to whether he ought not
 perhaps to devote himself altogether to music. It is, however, worth
 noting that everything he did in his later years, whether in Latin,
 Greek, or German work, bore the stamp of perfection--subject of course
 to the limitation imposed upon him by his years. His talents came very
 suddenly to the fore, because he had allowed them to grow for such a
 long time in concealment. His very first performance in philology,
 executed while he was a student under Ritschl, the famous philologist,
 was also typical of him in this respect, seeing that it was ordered
 to be printed for the _Rheinische Museum._ Of course this was done
 amid general and grave expressions of doubt; for, as Dr. Ritschl often
 declared, it was an unheard-of occurrence for a student in his third
 term to prepare such an excellent treatise.
 
 Being a great lover of out-door exercise, such as swimming, skating,
 and walking, he developed into a very sturdy lad. Rohde gives the
 following description of him as a student: with his healthy complexion,
 his outward and inner cleanliness, his austere chastity and his solemn
 aspect, he was the image of that delightful youth described by Adalbert
 Stifter.
 
 Though as a child he was always rather serious, as a lad and a man he
 was ever inclined to see the humorous side of things, while his whole
 being, and everything he said or did, was permeated by an extraordinary
 harmony. He belonged to the very few who could control even a bad mood
 and conceal it from others. All his friends are unanimous in their
 praise of his exceptional evenness of temper and behaviour, and his
 warm, hearty, and pleasant laugh that seemed to come from the very
 depths of his benevolent and affectionate nature. In him it might
 therefore be said, nature had produced a being who in body and spirit
 was a harmonious whole: his unusual intellect was fully in keeping with
 his uncommon bodily strength.
 
 The only abnormal thing about him, and something which we both
 inherited from our father, was short-sightedness, and this was
 very much aggravated in my brother's case, even in his earliest
 schooldays, owing to that indescribable anxiety to learn which always
 characterised him. When one listens to accounts given by his friends
 and schoolfellows, one is startled by the multiplicity of his studies
 even in his schooldays.
 
 In the autumn of 1864, he began his university life in Bonn, and
 studied philology and theology; at the end of six months he gave up
 theology, and in the autumn of 1865 followed his famous teacher Ritschl
 to the University of Leipzig. There he became an ardent philologist,
 and diligently sought to acquire a masterly grasp of this branch of
 knowledge. But in this respect it would be unfair to forget that the
 school of Pforta, with its staff of excellent teachers--scholars
 that would have adorned the chairs of any University--had already
 afforded the best of preparatory trainings to any one intending to
 take up philology as a study, more particularly as it gave all pupils
 ample scope to indulge any individual tastes they might have for any
 particular branch of ancient history. The last important Latin thesis
 which my brother wrote for the Landes-Schule, Pforta, dealt with
 the Megarian poet Theognis, and it was in the rle of a lecturer on
 this very subject that, on the 18th January 1866, he made his _first
 appearance in public_ before the philological society he had helped to
 found in Leipzig. The paper he read disclosed his investigations on
 the subject of Theognis the moralist and aristocrat, who, as is well
 known, described and dismissed the plebeians of his time in terms of
 the heartiest contempt The aristocratic ideal, which was always so
 dear to my brother, thus revealed itself for the first time. Moreover,
 curiously enough, it was precisely _this_ scientific thesis which was
 the cause of Ritschl's recognition of my brother and fondness for him.
 
 The whole of his Leipzig days proved of the utmost importance to my
 brother's career. There he was plunged into the very midst of a torrent
 of intellectual influences which found an impressionable medium in
 the fiery youth, and to which he eagerly made himself accessible.
 He did not, however, forget to discriminate among them, but tested
 and criticised the currents of thought he encountered, and selected
 accordingly. It is certainly of great importance to ascertain what
 those influences precisely were to which he yielded, and how long
 they maintained their sway over him, and it is likewise necessary to
 discover exactly when the matured mind threw off these fetters in order
 to work out its own salvation.
 
 The influences that exercised power over him in those days may be
 described in the three following terms: Hellenism, Schopenhauer,
 Wagner. His love of Hellenism certainly led him to philology; but, as
 a matter of fact, what concerned him most was to obtain a wide view
 of things in general, and this he hoped to derive from that science;
 philology in itself, with his splendid method and thorough way of going
 to work, served him only as a means to an end.
 
 If Hellenism was the first strong influence which already in Pforta
 obtained a sway over my brother, in the winter of 1865-66, a completely
 new, and therefore somewhat subversive, influence was introduced into
 his life with Schopenhauer's philosophy. When he reached Leipzig in
 the autumn of 1865, he was very downcast; for the experiences that
 had befallen him during his one year of student life in Bonn had
 deeply depressed him. He had sought at first to adapt himself to his
 surroundings there, with the hope of ultimately elevating them to his
 lofty views on things; but both these efforts proved vain, and now he
 had come to Leipzig with the purpose of framing his own manner of life.
 It can easily be imagined how the first reading of Schopenhauer's _The
 World as Will and Idea_ worked upon this man, still stinging from the
 bitterest experiences and disappointments. He writes: "Here I saw a
 mirror in which I espied the world, life, and my own nature depicted
 with frightful grandeur." As my brother, from his very earliest
 childhood, had always missed both the parent and the educator through
 our father's untimely death, he began to regard Schopenhauer with
 almost filial love and respect. He did not venerate him quite as other
 men did; Schopenhauer's _personality_ was what attracted and enchanted
 him. From the first he was never blind to the faults in his master's
 system, and in proof of this we have only to refer to an essay he
 wrote in the autumn of 1867, which actually contains a criticism of
 Schopenhauer's philosophy.
 
 Now, in the autumn of 1865, to these two influences, Hellenism and
 Schopenhauer, a third influence was added--one which was to prove
 the strongest ever exercised over my brother--and it began with his
 personal introduction to Richard Wagner. He was introduced to Wagner by
 the latter's sister, Frau Professor Brockhaus, and his description of
 their first meeting, contained in a letter to Erwin Rohde, is really
 most affecting. For years, that is to say, from the time Billow's
 arrangement of _Tristan and Isolde_ for the pianoforte, had appeared,
 he had already been a passionate admirer of Wagner's music; but now
 that the artist himself entered upon the scene of his life, with the
 whole fascinating strength of his strong will, my brother felt that he
 was in the presence of a being whom he, of all modern men, resembled
 most in regard to force of character.
 
 Again, in the case of Richard Wagner, my brother, from the first, laid
 the utmost stress upon the man's personality, and could only regard
 his works and views as an expression of the artist's whole being,
 despite the fact that he by no means understood every one of those
 works at that time. My brother was the first who ever manifested such
 enthusiastic affection for Schopenhauer and Wagner, and he was also the
 first of that numerous band of young followers who ultimately inscribed
 the two great names upon their banner. Whether Schopenhauer and Wagner
 ever really corresponded to the glorified pictures my brother painted
 of them, both in his letters and other writings, is a question which we
 can no longer answer in the affirmative. Perhaps what he saw in them
 was only what he himself wished to be some day.
 
 The amount of work my brother succeeded in accomplishing, during his
 student days, really seems almost incredible. When we examine his
 record for the years 1865-67, we can scarcely believe it refers to only
 two years' industry, for at a guess no one would hesitate to suggest
 four years at least. But in those days, as he himself declares, he
 still possessed the constitution of a bear. He knew neither what
 headaches nor indigestion meant, and, despite his short sight, his eyes
 were able to endure the greatest strain without giving him the smallest
 trouble. That is why, regardless of seriously interrupting his studies,
 he was so glad at the thought of becoming a soldier in the forthcoming
 autumn of 1867; for he was particularly anxious to discover some means
 of employing his bodily strength.
 
 He discharged his duties as a soldier with the utmost mental and
 physical freshness, was the crack rider among the recruits of his year,
 and was sincerely sorry when, owing to an accident, he was compelled to
 leave the colours before the completion of his service. As a result of
 this accident he had his first dangerous illness.
 
 While mounting his horse one day, the beast, which was an uncommonly
 restive one, suddenly reared, and, causing him to strike his chest
 sharply against the pommel of the saddle, threw him to the ground. My
 brother then made a second attempt to mount, and succeeded this time,
 notwithstanding the fact that he had severely sprained and torn two
 muscles in his chest, and had seriously bruised the adjacent ribs. For
 a whole day he did his utmost to pay no heed to the injury, and to
 overcome the pain it caused him; but in the end he only swooned, and a
 dangerously acute inflammation of the injured tissues was the result.
 Ultimately he was obliged to consult the famous specialist, Professor
 Volkmann, in Halle, who quickly put him right.
 
 In October 1868, my brother returned to his studies in Leipzig with
 double joy. These were his plans: to get his doctor's degree as soon as
 possible; to proceed to Paris, Italy, and Greece, make a lengthy stay
 in each place, and then to return to Leipzig in order to settle there
 as a privat docent. All these plans were, however, suddenly frustrated
 owing to his premature call to the University of Bale, where he was
 invited to assume the duties of professor. Some of the philological
 essays he had written in his student days, and which were published
 by the _Rheinische Museum,_ had attracted the attention of the
 Educational Board at Bale. Ratsherr Wilhelm Vischer, as representing
 this body, appealed to Ritschl for fuller information. Now Ritschl,
 who had early recognised my brother's extraordinary talents, must have
 written a letter of such enthusiastic praise ("Nietzsche is a genius:
 he can do whatever he chooses to put his mind to"), that one of the
 more cautious members of the council is said to have observed: "If
 the proposed candidate be really such a genius, then it were better
 did we not appoint him; for, in any case, he would only stay a short
 time at the little University of Bale." My brother ultimately accepted
 the appointment, and, in view of his published philological works,
 he was immediately granted the doctor's degree by the University of
 Leipzig. He was twenty-four years and six months old when he took up
 his position as professor in Bale,--and it was with a heavy heart that
 he proceeded there, for he knew "the golden period of untrammelled
 activity" must cease. He was, however, inspired by the deep wish of
 being able "to transfer to his pupils some of that Schopenhauerian
 earnestness which is stamped on the brow of the sublime man." "I
 should like to be something more than a mere trainer of capable
 philologists: the present generation of teachers, the care of the
 growing broods,--all this is in my mind. If we must live, let us at
 least do so in such wise that others may bless our life once we have
 been peacefully delivered from its toils."
 
 When I look back upon that month of May 1869, and ask both of friends
 and of myself, what the figure of this youthful University professor
 of four-and-twenty meant to the world at that time, the reply is
 naturally, in the first place: that he was one of Ritschl's best
 pupils; secondly, that he was an exceptionally capable exponent of
 classical antiquity with a brilliant career before him; and thirdly,
 that he was a passionate adorer of Wagner and Schopenhauer. But no one
 has any idea of my brother's independent attitude to the science he
 had selected, to his teachers and to his ideals, and he deceived both
 himself and us when he passed as a "disciple" who really shared all the
 views of his respected master.
 
 On the 28th May 1869, my brother delivered his inaugural address
 at Bale University, and it is said to have deeply impressed the
 authorities. The subject of the address was "Homer and Classical
 Philology."
 
 Musing deeply, the worthy councillors and professors walked homeward.
 What had they just heard? A young scholar discussing the very
 justification of his own science in a cool and philosophically critical
 spirit! A man able to impart so much artistic glamour to his subject,
 that the once stale and arid study of philology suddenly struck
 them--and they were certainly not impressionable men--as the messenger
 of the gods: "and just as the Muses descended upon the dull and
 tormented Boeotian peasants, so philology comes into a world full of
 gloomy colours and pictures, full of the deepest, most incurable woes,
 and speaks to men comfortingly of the beautiful and brilliant godlike
 figure of a distant, blue, and happy fairyland."
 
 "We have indeed got hold of a rare bird, Herr Ratsherr," said one of
 these gentlemen to his companion, and the latter heartily agreed, for
 my brother's appointment had been chiefly his doing.
 
 Even in Leipzig, it was reported that Jacob Burckhardt had said:
 "Nietzsche is as much an artist as a scholar." Privy-Councillor
 Ritschl told me of this himself, and then he added, with a smile: "I
 always said so; he can make his scientific discourses as palpitatingly
 interesting as a French novelist his novels."
 
 "Homer and Classical Philology"--my brother's inaugural address at
 the University--was by no means the first literary attempt he had
 made; for we have already seen that he had had papers published by the
 _Rheinische Museum_; still, this particular discourse is important,
 seeing that it practically contains the programme of many other
 subsequent essays. I must, however, emphasise this fact here, that
 neither "Homer and Classical Philology," nor _The Birth of Tragedy,_
 represents a beginning in my brother's career. It is really surprising
 to see how very soon he actually began grappling with the questions
 which were to prove the problems of his life. If a beginning to his
 intellectual development be sought at all, then it must be traced
 to the years 1865-67 in Leipzig. _The Birth of Tragedy,_ his maiden
 attempt at book-writing, with which he began his twenty-eighth year,
 is the last link of a long chain of developments, and the first fruit
 that was a long time coming to maturity. Nietzsche's was a polyphonic
 nature, in which the most different and apparently most antagonistic
 talents had come together. Philosophy, art, and science--in the form
 of philology, then--each certainly possessed a part of him. The
 most wonderful feature--perhaps it might even be called the real
 Nietzschean feature--of this versatile creature, was the fact that
 no eternal strife resulted from the juxtaposition of these inimical
 traits, that not one of them strove to dislodge, or to get the upper
 hand of, the others. When Nietzsche renounced the musical career, in
 order to devote himself to philology, and gave himself up to the most
 strenuous study, he did not find it essential completely to suppress
 his other tendencies: as before, he continued both to compose and
 derive pleasure from music, and even studied counterpoint somewhat
 seriously. Moreover, during his years at Leipzig, when he consciously
 gave himself up to philological research, he began to engross himself
 in Schopenhauer, and was thereby won by philosophy for ever. Everything
 that could find room took up its abode in him, and these juxtaposed
 factors, far from interfering with one another's existence, were rather
 mutually fertilising and stimulating. All those who have read the first
 volume of the biography with attention must have been struck with the
 perfect way in which the various impulses in his nature combined in
 the end to form one general torrent, and how this flowed with ever
 greater force in the direction of _a single goal._ Thus science, art,
 and philosophy developed and became ever more closely related in him,
 until, in _The Birth of Tragedy,_ they brought forth a "centaur," that
 is to say, a work which would have been an impossible achievement to
 a man with only a single, special talent. This polyphony of different
 talents, all coming to utterance together and producing the richest
 and boldest of harmonies, is the fundamental feature not only of
 Nietzsche's early days, but of his whole development. It is once again
 the artist, philosopher, and man of science, who as one man in later
 years, after many wanderings, recantations, and revulsions of feeling,
 produces that other and rarer Centaur of highest rank--_Zarathustra_.
 
 _The Birth of Tragedy_ requires perhaps a little explaining--more
 particularly as we have now ceased to use either Schopenhauerian or
 Wagnerian terms of expression. And it was for this reason that five
 years after its appearance, my brother wrote an introduction to it,
 in which he very plainly expresses his doubts concerning the views it
 contains, and the manner in which they are presented. The kernel of its
 thought he always recognised as perfectly correct; and all he deplored
 in later days was that he had spoiled the grand problem of Hellenism,
 as he understood it, by adulterating it with ingredients taken from the
 world of most modern ideas. As time went on, he grew ever more and more
 anxious to define the deep meaning of this book with greater precision
 and clearness. A very good elucidation of its aims, which unfortunately
 was never published, appears among his notes of the year 1886, and is
 as follows:--
 
 "Concerning _The Birth of Tragedy._--A book consisting of mere
 experiences relating to pleasurable and unpleasurable sthetic states,
 with a metaphysico-artistic background. At the same time the confession
 of a romanticist _the sufferer feels the deepest longing for beauty--he
 begets it_; finally, a product of youth, full of youthful courage and
 melancholy.
 
 "Fundamental psychological experiences: the word 'Apollonian' stands
 for that state of rapt repose in the presence of a visionary world,
 in the presence of the world of _beautiful appearance_ designed as a
 deliverance from _becoming_; the word _Dionysos,_ on the other hand,
 stands for strenuous becoming, grown self-conscious, in the form
 of the rampant voluptuousness of the creator, who is also perfectly
 conscious of the violent anger of the destroyer.
 
 "The antagonism of these two attitudes and the _desires_ that underlie
 them. The first-named would have the vision it conjures up _eternal_:
 in its light man must be quiescent, apathetic, peaceful, healed, and
 on friendly terms with himself and all existence; the second strives
 after creation, after the voluptuousness of wilful creation, _i.e._
 constructing and destroying. Creation felt and explained as an instinct
 would be merely the unremitting inventive action of a dissatisfied
 being, overflowing with wealth and living at high tension and high
 pressure,--of a God who would overcome the sorrows of existence by
 means only of continual changes and transformations,--appearance as a
 transient and momentary deliverance; the world as an apparent sequence
 of godlike visions and deliverances.
 
 "This metaphysico-artistic attitude is opposed to Schopenhauer's
 one-sided view which values art, not from the artist's standpoint but
 from the spectator's, because it brings salvation and deliverance
 by means of the joy produced by unreal as opposed to the existing
 or the real (the experience only of him who is suffering and is in
 despair owing to himself and everything existing).--Deliverance in
 the _form_ and its eternity (just as Plato may have pictured it, save
 that he rejoiced in a complete subordination of all too excitable
 sensibilities, even in the idea itself). To this is opposed the second
 point of view--art regarded as a phenomenon of the artist, above all
 of the musician; the torture of being obliged to create, as a Dionysian
 instinct.
 
 "Tragic art, rich in both attitudes, represents the reconciliation of
 Apollo and Dionysos. Appearance is given the greatest importance by
 Dionysos; and yet it will be denied and cheerfully denied. This is
 directed against Schopenhauer's teaching of _Resignation_ as the tragic
 attitude towards the world.
 
 "Against Wagner's theory that music is a means and drama an end.
 
 "A desire for tragic myth (for religion and even pessimistic religion)
 as for a forcing frame in which certain plants flourish.
 
 "Mistrust of science, although its ephemerally soothing optimism be
 strongly felt; the 'serenity' of the theoretical man.
 
 "Deep antagonism to Christianity. Why? The degeneration of the Germanic
 spirit is ascribed to its influence.
 
 "Any justification of the world can only be an _sthetic_ one. Profound
 suspicions about morality (--it is part and parcel of the world of
 appearance).
 
 "The happiness of existence is only possible as the happiness derived
 from appearance. (_'Being' is a fiction invented by those who suffer
 from becoming_.)
 
 "Happiness in becoming is possible only in the _annihilation_ of
 the real, of the 'existing,' of the beautifully visionary,--in the
 pessimistic dissipation of illusions:--with the annihilation of
 the most beautiful phenomena in the world of appearance, Dionysian
 happiness reaches its zenith."
 
 _The Birth of Tragedy_ is really only a portion of a much greater work
 on Hellenism, which my brother had always had in view from the time of
 his student days. But even the portion it represents was originally
 designed upon a much larger scale than the present one; the reason
 probably being, that Nietzsche desired only to be of service to Wagner.
 When a certain portion of the projected work on Hellenism was ready
 and had received the title _Greek Cheerfulness,_ my brother happened
 to call upon Wagner at Tribschen in April 1871, and found him very
 low-spirited in regard to the mission of his life. My brother was very
 anxious to take some decisive step to help him, and, laying the plans
 of his great work on Greece aside, he selected a small portion from
 the already completed manuscript--a portion dealing with one distinct
 side of Hellenism,--to wit, its tragic art. He then associated Wagner's
 music with it and the name Dionysos, and thus took the first step
 towards that world-historical view through which we have since grown
 accustomed to regard Wagner.
 
 From the dates of the various notes relating to it, _The Birth of
 Tragedy_ must have been written between the autumn of 1869 and November
 1871--a period during which "a mass of sthetic questions and answers"
 was fermenting in Nietzsche's mind. It was first published in January
 1872 by E. W. Fritsch, in Leipzig, under the title _The Birth of
 Tragedy out of the Spirit of Music._ Later on the title was changed to
 _The Birth of Tragedy, or Hellenism and Pessimism._
 
                                        ELIZABETH FORSTER-NIETZSCHE.
 
 WEIMAR, _September_ 1905.
 
 
 [1] This Introduction by E. Frster-Nietzsche, which appears
 in the front of the first volume of Naumann's Pocket Edition of
 Nietzsche, has been translated and arranged by Mr. A. M. Ludovici.
 
 
 
 
 AN ATTEMPT AT SELF-CRITICISM.
 
 
 
 I.
 
 
 Whatever may lie at the bottom of this doubtful book must be a
 question of the first rank and attractiveness, moreover a deeply
 personal question,--in proof thereof observe the time in which it
 originated, _in spite_ of which it originated, the exciting period
 of the Franco-German war of 1870-71. While the thunder of the battle
 of Wrth rolled over Europe, the ruminator and riddle-lover, who had
 to be the parent of this book, sat somewhere in a nook of the Alps,
 lost in riddles and ruminations, consequently very much concerned and
 unconcerned at the same time, and wrote down his meditations on the
 _Greeks,_--the kernel of the curious and almost inaccessible book, to
 which this belated prologue (or epilogue) is to be devoted. A few weeks
 later: and he found himself under the walls of Metz, still wrestling
 with the notes of interrogation he had set down concerning the alleged
 "cheerfulness" of the Greeks and of Greek art; till at last, in that
 month of deep suspense, when peace was debated at Versailles, he too
 attained to peace with himself, and, slowly recovering from a disease
 brought home from the field, made up his mind definitely regarding the
 "Birth of Tragedy from the Spirit of _Music."_--From music? Music and
 Tragedy? Greeks and tragic music? Greeks and the Art-work of pessimism?
 A race of men, well-fashioned, beautiful, envied, life-inspiring, like
 no other race hitherto, the Greeks--indeed? The Greeks were _in need_
 of tragedy? Yea--of art? Wherefore--Greek art?...
 
 We can thus guess where the great note of interrogation concerning the
 value of existence had been set. Is pessimism _necessarily_ the sign of
 decline, of decay, of failure, of exhausted and weakened instincts?--as
 was the case with the Indians, as is, to all appearance, the case with
 us "modern" men and Europeans? Is there a pessimism of _strength_? An
 intellectual predilection for what is hard, awful, evil, problematical
 in existence, owing to well-being, to exuberant health, to _fullness_
 of existence? Is there perhaps suffering in overfullness itself? A
 seductive fortitude with the keenest of glances, which _yearns_ for
 the terrible, as for the enemy, the worthy enemy, with whom it may try
 its strength? from whom it is willing to learn what "fear" is? What
 means _tragic_ myth to the Greeks of the best, strongest, bravest era?
 And the prodigious phenomenon of the Dionysian? And that which was
 born thereof, tragedy?--And again: that of which tragedy died, the
 Socratism of morality, the dialectics, contentedness and cheerfulness
 of the theoretical man--indeed? might not this very Socratism
 be a sign of decline, of weariness, of disease, of anarchically
 disintegrating instincts? And the "Hellenic cheerfulness" of the later
 Hellenism merely a glowing sunset? The Epicurean will _counter_ to
 pessimism merely a precaution of the sufferer? And science itself,
 our science--ay, viewed as a symptom of life, what really signifies
 all science? Whither, worse still, _whence_--all science? Well? Is
 scientism perhaps only fear and evasion of pessimism? A subtle defence
 against--_truth!_ Morally speaking, something like falsehood and
 cowardice? And, unmorally speaking, an artifice? O Socrates, Socrates,
 was this perhaps _thy_ secret? Oh mysterious ironist, was this perhaps
 thine--irony?...
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 What I then laid hands on, something terrible and dangerous, a
 problem with horns, not necessarily a bull itself, but at all events
 a _new_ problem: I should say to-day it was the _problem of science_
 itself--science conceived for the first time as problematic, as
 questionable. But the book, in which my youthful ardour and suspicion
 then discharged themselves--what an _impossible_ book must needs
 grow out of a task so disagreeable to youth. Constructed of nought
 but precocious, unripened self-experiences, all of which lay close
 to the threshold of the communicable, based on the groundwork of
 _art_--for the problem of science cannot be discerned on the groundwork
 of science,--a book perhaps for artists, with collateral analytical
 and retrospective aptitudes (that is, an exceptional kind of artists,
 for whom one must seek and does not even care to seek ...), full of
 psychological innovations and artists' secrets, with an artists'
 metaphysics in the background, a work of youth, full of youth's mettle
 and youth's melancholy, independent, defiantly self-sufficient even
 when it seems to bow to some authority and self-veneration; in short,
 a firstling-work, even in every bad sense of the term; in spite of its
 senile problem, affected with every fault of youth, above all with
 youth's prolixity and youth's "storm and stress": on the other hand,
 in view of the success it had (especially with the great artist to
 whom it addressed itself, as it were, in a duologue, Richard Wagner) a
 _demonstrated_ book, I mean a book which, at any rate, sufficed "for
 the best of its time." On this account, if for no other reason, it
 should be treated with some consideration and reserve; yet I shall not
 altogether conceal how disagreeable it now appears to me, how after
 sixteen years it stands a total stranger before me,--before an eye
 which is more mature, and a hundred times more fastidious, but which
 has by no means grown colder nor lost any of its interest in that
 self-same task essayed for the first time by this daring book,--_to
 view science through the optics of the artist, and art moreover through
 the optics of life...._
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 I say again, to-day it is an impossible book to me,--I call it badly
 written, heavy, painful, image-angling and image-entangling, maudlin,
 sugared at times even to femininism, uneven in tempo, void of the will
 to logical cleanliness, very convinced and therefore rising above the
 necessity of demonstration, distrustful even of the _propriety_ of
 demonstration, as being a book for initiates, as "music" for those who
 are baptised with the name of Music, who are united from the beginning
 of things by common ties of rare experiences in art, as a countersign
 for blood-relations _in artibus._--a haughty and fantastic book,
 which from the very first withdraws even more from the _profanum
 vulgus_ of the "cultured" than from the "people," but which also, as
 its effect has shown and still shows, knows very well how to seek
 fellow-enthusiasts and lure them to new by-ways and dancing-grounds.
 Here, at any rate--thus much was acknowledged with curiosity as well
 as with aversion--a _strange_ voice spoke, the disciple of a still
 "unknown God," who for the time being had hidden himself under the
 hood of the scholar, under the German's gravity and disinclination for
 dialectics, even under the bad manners of the Wagnerian; here was a
 spirit with strange and still nameless needs, a memory bristling with
 questions, experiences and obscurities, beside which stood the name
 Dionysos like one more note of interrogation; here spoke--people said
 to themselves with misgivings--something like a mystic and almost
 mnadic soul, which, undecided whether it should disclose or conceal
 itself, stammers with an effort and capriciously as in a strange
 tongue. It should have _sung,_ this "new soul"--and not spoken! What
 a pity, that I did not dare to say what I then had to say, as a poet:
 I could have done so perhaps! Or at least as a philologist:--for even
 at the present day well-nigh everything in this domain remains to be
 discovered and disinterred by the philologist! Above all the problem,
 _that_ here there _is_ a problem before us,--and that, so long as we
 have no answer to the question "what is Dionysian?" the Greeks are now
 as ever wholly unknown and inconceivable....
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 Ay, what is Dionysian?--In this book may be found an answer,--a
 "knowing one" speaks here, the votary and disciple of his god.
 Perhaps I should now speak more guardedly and less eloquently of a
 psychological question so difficult as the origin of tragedy among the
 Greeks. A fundamental question is the relation of the Greek to pain,
 his degree of sensibility,--did this relation remain constant? or did
 it veer about?--the question, whether his ever-increasing _longing
 for beauty,_ for festivals, gaieties, new cults, did really grow out
 of want, privation, melancholy, pain? For suppose even this to be
 true--and Pericles (or Thucydides) intimates as much in the great
 Funeral Speech:--whence then the opposite longing, which appeared
 first in the order of time, the _longing for the ugly_, the good,
 resolute desire of the Old Hellene for pessimism, for tragic myth, for
 the picture of all that is terrible, evil, enigmatical, destructive,
 fatal at the basis of existence,--whence then must tragedy have
 sprung? Perhaps from _joy,_ from strength, from exuberant health, from
 over-fullness. And what then, physiologically speaking, is the meaning
 of that madness, out of which comic as well as tragic art has grown,
 the Dionysian madness? What? perhaps madness is not necessarily the
 symptom of degeneration, of decline, of belated culture? Perhaps there
 are--a question for alienists--neuroses of _health_? of folk-youth
 and youthfulness? What does that synthesis of god and goat in the
 Satyr point to? What self-experience what "stress," made the Greek
 think of the Dionysian reveller and primitive man as a satyr? And as
 regards the origin of the tragic chorus: perhaps there were endemic
 ecstasies in the eras when the Greek body bloomed and the Greek soul
 brimmed over with life? Visions and hallucinations, which took hold
 of entire communities, entire cult-assemblies? What if the Greeks
 in the very wealth of their youth had the will _to be_ tragic and
 were pessimists? What if it was madness itself, to use a word of
 Plato's, which brought the _greatest_ blessings upon Hellas? And
 what if, on the other hand and conversely, at the very time of their
 dissolution and weakness, the Greeks became always more optimistic,
 more superficial, more histrionic, also more ardent for logic and
 the logicising of the world,--consequently at the same time more
 "cheerful" and more "scientific"? Ay, despite all "modern ideas" and
 prejudices of the democratic taste, may not the triumph of _optimism,_
 the _common sense_ that has gained the upper hand, the practical and
 theoretical _utilitarianism,_ like democracy itself, with which it is
 synchronous--be symptomatic of declining vigour, of approaching age,
 of physiological weariness? And _not_ at all--pessimism? Was Epicurus
 an optimist--because a _sufferer_?... We see it is a whole bundle of
 weighty questions which this book has taken upon itself,--let us not
 fail to add its weightiest question! Viewed through the optics of
 _life,_ what is the meaning of--morality?...
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 Already in the foreword to Richard Wagner, art---and _not_ morality--is
 set down as the properly _metaphysical_ activity of man; in the
 book itself the piquant proposition recurs time and again, that the
 existence of the world is _justified_ only as an sthetic phenomenon.
 Indeed, the entire book recognises only an artist-thought and
 artist-after-thought behind all occurrences,--a "God," if you will,
 but certainly only an altogether thoughtless and unmoral artist-God,
 who, in construction as in destruction, in good as in evil, desires
 to become conscious of his own equable joy and sovereign glory; who,
 in creating worlds, frees himself from the _anguish_ of fullness
 and _overfullness,_ from the _suffering_ of the contradictions
 concentrated within him. The world, that is, the redemption of God
 _attained_ at every moment, as the perpetually changing, perpetually
 new vision of the most suffering, most antithetical, most contradictory
 being, who contrives to redeem himself only in _appearance:_ this
 entire artist-metaphysics, call it arbitrary, idle, fantastic, if
 you will,--the point is, that it already betrays a spirit, which is
 determined some day, at all hazards, to make a stand against the
 _moral_ interpretation and significance of life. Here, perhaps for the
 first time, a pessimism "Beyond Good and Evil" announces itself, here
 that "perverseness of disposition" obtains expression and formulation,
 against which Schopenhauer never grew tired of hurling beforehand his
 angriest imprecations and thunderbolts,--a philosophy which dares to
 put, derogatorily put, morality itself in the world of phenomena, and
 not only among "phenomena" (in the sense of the idealistic _terminus
 technicus_), but among the "illusions," as appearance, semblance,
 error, interpretation, accommodation, art. Perhaps the depth of this
 _antimoral_ tendency may be best estimated from the guarded and
 hostile silence with which Christianity is treated throughout this
 book,--Christianity, as being the most extravagant burlesque of the
 moral theme to which mankind has hitherto been obliged to listen. In
 fact, to the purely sthetic world-interpretation and justification
 taught in this book, there is no greater antithesis than the Christian
 dogma, which is _only_ and will be only moral, and which, with
 its absolute standards, for instance, its truthfulness of God,
 relegates--that is, disowns, convicts, condemns--art, _all_ art, to
 the realm of _falsehood._ Behind such a mode of thought and valuation,
 which, if at all genuine, must be hostile to art, I always experienced
 what was _hostile to life,_ the wrathful, vindictive counterwill to
 life itself: for all life rests on appearance, art, illusion, optics,
 necessity of perspective and error. From the very first Christianity
 was, essentially and thoroughly, the nausea and surfeit of Life for
 Life, which only disguised, concealed and decked itself out under the
 belief in "another" or "better" life. The hatred of the "world," the
 curse on the affections, the fear of beauty and sensuality, another
 world, invented for the purpose of slandering this world the more,
 at bottom a longing for. Nothingness, for the end, for rest, for the
 "Sabbath of Sabbaths"--all this, as also the unconditional will of
 Christianity to recognise _only_ moral values, has always appeared to
 me as the most dangerous and ominous of all possible forms of a "will
 to perish"; at the least, as the symptom of a most fatal disease, of
 profoundest weariness, despondency, exhaustion, impoverishment of
 life,--for before the tribunal of morality (especially Christian, that
 is, unconditional morality) life _must_ constantly and inevitably be
 the loser, because life _is_ something essentially unmoral,--indeed,
 oppressed with the weight of contempt and the everlasting No, life
 _must_ finally be regarded as unworthy of desire, as in itself
 unworthy. Morality itself what?--may not morality be a "will to
 disown life," a secret instinct for annihilation, a principle of
 decay, of depreciation, of slander, a beginning of the end? And,
 consequently, the danger of dangers?... It was _against_ morality,
 therefore, that my instinct, as an intercessory-instinct for life,
 turned in this questionable book, inventing for itself a fundamental
 counter--dogma and counter-valuation of life, purely artistic, purely
 _anti-Christian._ What should I call it? As a philologist and man of
 words I baptised it, not without some liberty--for who could be sure
 of the proper name of the Antichrist?--with the name of a Greek god: I
 called it _Dionysian._
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 You see which problem I ventured to touch upon in this early work?...
 How I now regret, that I had not then the courage (or immodesty?) to
 allow myself, in all respects, the use of an _individual language_
 for such _individual_ contemplations and ventures in the field of
 thought--that I laboured to express, in Kantian and Schopenhauerian
 formul, strange and new valuations, which ran fundamentally counter
 to the spirit of Kant and Schopenhauer, as well as to their taste!
 What, forsooth, were Schopenhauer's views on tragedy? "What gives"--he
 says in _Welt als Wille und Vorstellung,_ II. 495--"to all tragedy
 that singular swing towards elevation, is the awakening of the
 knowledge that the world, that life, cannot satisfy us thoroughly,
 and consequently is _not worthy_ of our attachment In this consists
 the tragic spirit: it therefore leads to _resignation_." Oh, how
 differently Dionysos spoke to me! Oh how far from me then was just
 this entire resignationism!--But there is something far worse in this
 book, which I now regret even more than having obscured and spoiled
 Dionysian anticipations with Schopenhauerian formul: to wit, that, in
 general, I _spoiled_ the grand _Hellenic problem,_ as it had opened
 up before me, by the admixture of the most modern things! That I
 entertained hopes, where nothing was to be hoped for, where everything
 pointed all-too-clearly to an approaching end! That, on the basis of
 our latter-day German music, I began to fable about the "spirit of
 Teutonism," as if it were on the point of discovering and returning
 to itself,--ay, at the very time that the German spirit which not so
 very long before had had the will to the lordship over Europe, the
 strength to lead and govern Europe, testamentarily and conclusively
 _resigned_ and, under the pompous pretence of empire-founding,
 effected its transition to mediocritisation, democracy, and "modern
 ideas." In very fact, I have since learned to regard this "spirit of
 Teutonism" as something to be despaired of and unsparingly treated,
 as also our present _German music,_ which is Romanticism through and
 through and the most un-Grecian of all possible forms of art: and
 moreover a first-rate nerve-destroyer, doubly dangerous for a people
 given to drinking and revering the unclear as a virtue, namely, in
 its twofold capacity of an intoxicating and stupefying narcotic. Of
 course, apart from all precipitate hopes and faulty applications to
 matters specially modern, with which I then spoiled my first book, the
 great Dionysian note of interrogation, as set down therein, continues
 standing on and on, even with reference to music: how must we conceive
 of a music, which is no longer of Romantic origin, like the German; but
 of _Dionysian_?...
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 --But, my dear Sir, if _your_ book is not Romanticism, what in
 the world is? Can the deep hatred of the present, of "reality"
 and "modern ideas" be pushed farther than has been done in your
 artist-metaphysics?--which would rather believe in Nothing, or in
 the devil, than in the "Now"? Does not a radical bass of wrath and
 annihilative pleasure growl on beneath all your contrapuntal vocal
 art and aural seduction, a mad determination to oppose all that "now"
 is, a will which is not so very far removed from practical nihilism
 and which seems to say: "rather let nothing be true, than that _you_
 should be in the right, than that _your_ truth should prevail!"
 Hear, yourself, my dear Sir Pessimist and art-deifier, with ever
 so unlocked ears, a single select passage of your own book, that
 not ineloquent dragon-slayer passage, which may sound insidiously
 rat-charming to young ears and hearts. What? is not that the true
 blue romanticist-confession of 1830 under the mask of the pessimism
 of 1850? After which, of course, the usual romanticist finale at once
 strikes up,--rupture, collapse, return and prostration before an old
 belief, before _the_ old God.... What? is not your pessimist book
 itself a piece of anti-Hellenism and Romanticism, something "equally
 intoxicating and befogging," a narcotic at all events, ay, a piece of
 music, of _German_ music? But listen:
 
     Let us imagine a rising generation with this undauntedness
     of vision, with this heroic impulse towards the prodigious,
     let us imagine the bold step of these dragon-slayers,
     the proud daring with which they turn their backs on all
     the effeminate doctrines of optimism, in order "to live
     resolutely" in the Whole and in the Full: _would it not be
     necessary_ for the tragic man of this culture, with his
     self-discipline to earnestness and terror, to desire a new
     art, _the art of metaphysical comfort,_ tragedy as the
     Helena belonging to him, and that he should exclaim with
     Faust:
 
         "Und sollt ich nicht, sehnschtigster Gewalt,
         In's Leben ziehn die einzigste Gestalt?"[1]
 
 
 "Would it not be _necessary_?" ... No, thrice no! ye young
 romanticists: it would _not_ be necessary! But it is very probable,
 that things may _end_ thus, that _ye_ may end thus, namely "comforted,"
 as it is written, in spite of all self-discipline to earnestness and
 terror; metaphysically comforted, in short, as Romanticists are wont to
 end, as _Christians...._ No! ye should first of all learn the art of
 earthly comfort, ye should learn to _laugh,_ my young friends, if ye
 are at all determined to remain pessimists: if so, you will perhaps,
 as laughing ones, eventually send all metaphysical comfortism to the
 devil--and metaphysics first of all! Or, to say it in the language of
 that Dionysian ogre, called _Zarathustra_:
 
     "Lift up your hearts, my brethren, high, higher! And do
     not forget your legs! Lift up also your legs, ye good
     dancers--and better still if ye stand also on your heads!
 
     "This crown of the laughter, this rose-garland crown--I
     myself have put on this crown; I myself have consecrated my
     laughter. No one else have I found to-day strong enough for
     this.
 
     "Zarathustra the dancer, Zarathustra the light one,
     who beckoneth with his pinions, one ready for flight,
     beckoning unto all birds, ready and prepared, a blissfully
     light-spirited one:--
 
     "Zarathustra the soothsayer, Zarathustra the sooth-laugher,
     no impatient one, no absolute one, one who loveth leaps and
     side-leaps: I myself have put on this crown!
 
     "This crown of the laughter, this rose-garland crown--to
     you my brethren do I cast this crown! Laughing have I
     consecrated: ye higher men, _learn,_ I pray you--to laugh!"
 
     _Thus spake Zarathustra_, lxxiii. 17, 18, and 20.
 
 SILS-MARIA, OBERENGADIN, _August_ 1886.
 
 
 [1]
 
     And shall not I, by mightiest desire,
     In living shape that sole fair form acquire?
     SWANWICK, trans. of _Faust._
 
 
 
 
 THE BIRTH OF TRAGEDY
 
 FROM THE SPIRIT OF MUSIC
 
 
 
 
 FOREWORD TO RICHARD WAGNER.
 
 
 In order to keep at a distance all the possible scruples, excitements,
 and misunderstandings to which the thoughts gathered in this essay
 will give occasion, considering the peculiar character of our sthetic
 publicity, and to be able also Co write the introductory remarks
 with the same contemplative delight, the impress of which, as the
 petrifaction of good and elevating hours, it bears on every page, I
 form a conception of the moment when you, my highly honoured friend,
 will receive this essay; how you, say after an evening walk in the
 winter snow, will behold the unbound Prometheus on the title-page,
 read my name, and be forthwith convinced that, whatever this essay may
 contain, the author has something earnest and impressive to say, and,
 moreover, that in all his meditations he communed with you as with one
 present and could thus write only what befitted your presence. You
 will thus remember that it was at the same time as your magnificent
 dissertation on Beethoven originated, viz., amidst the horrors and
 sublimities of the war which had just then broken out, that I collected
 myself for these thoughts. But those persons would err, to whom this
 collection suggests no more perhaps than the antithesis of patriotic
 excitement and sthetic revelry, of gallant earnestness and sportive
 delight. Upon a real perusal of this essay, such readers will, rather
 to their surprise, discover how earnest is the German problem we have
 to deal with, which we properly place, as a vortex and turning-point,
 in the very midst of German hopes. Perhaps, however, this same class
 of readers will be shocked at seeing an sthetic problem taken so
 seriously, especially if they can recognise in art no more than a merry
 diversion, a readily dispensable court-jester to the "earnestness
 of existence": as if no one were aware of the real meaning of this
 confrontation with the "earnestness of existence." These earnest ones
 may be informed that I am convinced that art is the highest task and
 the properly metaphysical activity of this life, as it is understood by
 the man, to whom, as my sublime protagonist on this path, I would now
 dedicate this essay.
 
 BASEL, _end of the year_ 1871.
 
 
 
 
 THE BIRTH OF TRAGEDY.
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 We shall have gained much for the science of sthetics, when once we
 have perceived not only by logical inference, but by the immediate
 certainty of intuition, that the continuous development of art is bound
 up with the duplexity of the _Apollonian_ and the _Dionysian:_ in
 like manner as procreation is dependent on the duality of the sexes,
 involving perpetual conflicts with only periodically intervening
 reconciliations. These names we borrow from the Greeks, who disclose
 to the intelligent observer the profound mysteries of their view of
 art, not indeed in concepts, but in the impressively clear figures of
 their world of deities. It is in connection with Apollo and Dionysus,
 the two art-deities of the Greeks, that we learn that there existed in
 the Grecian world a wide antithesis, in origin and aims, between the
 art of the shaper, the Apollonian, and the non-plastic art of music,
 that of Dionysus: both these so heterogeneous tendencies run parallel
 to each other, for the most part openly at variance, and continually
 inciting each other to new and more powerful births, to perpetuate in
 them the strife of this antithesis, which is but seemingly bridged over
 by their mutual term "Art"; till at last, by a metaphysical miracle
 of the Hellenic will, they appear paired with each other, and through
 this pairing eventually generate the equally Dionysian and Apollonian
 art-work of Attic tragedy.
 
 In order to bring these two tendencies within closer range, let us
 conceive them first of all as the separate art-worlds of _dreamland_
 and _drunkenness;_ between which physiological phenomena a contrast
 may be observed analogous to that existing between the Apollonian and
 the Dionysian. In dreams, according to the conception of Lucretius,
 the glorious divine figures first appeared to the souls of men, in
 dreams the great shaper beheld the charming corporeal structure of
 superhuman beings, and the Hellenic poet, if consulted on the mysteries
 of poetic inspiration, would likewise have suggested dreams and would
 have offered an explanation resembling that of Hans Sachs in the
 Meistersingers:--
 
     Mein Freund, das grad' ist Dichters Werk,
     dass er sein Trumen deut' und merk'.
     Glaubt mir, des Menschen wahrster Wahn
     wird ihm im Traume aufgethan:
     all' Dichtkunst und Poeterei
     ist nichts als Wahrtraum-Deuterei.[1]
 
 
 The beauteous appearance of the dream-worlds, in the production of
 which every man is a perfect artist, is the presupposition of all
 plastic art, and in fact, as we shall see, of an important half of
 poetry also. We take delight in the immediate apprehension of form; all
 forms speak to us; there is nothing indifferent, nothing superfluous.
 But, together with the highest life of this dream-reality we also have,
 glimmering through it, the sensation of its appearance: such at least
 is my experience, as to the frequency, ay, normality of which I could
 adduce many proofs, as also the sayings of the poets. Indeed, the man
 of philosophic turn has a foreboding that underneath this reality in
 which we live and have our being, another and altogether different
 reality lies concealed, and that therefore it is also an appearance;
 and Schopenhauer actually designates the gift of occasionally regarding
 men and things as mere phantoms and dream-pictures as the criterion of
 philosophical ability. Accordingly, the man susceptible to art stands
 in the same relation to the reality of dreams as the philosopher to
 the reality of existence; he is a close and willing observer, for from
 these pictures he reads the meaning of life, and by these processes
 he trains himself for life. And it is perhaps not only the agreeable
 and friendly pictures that he realises in himself with such perfect
 understanding: the earnest, the troubled, the dreary, the gloomy, the
 sudden checks, the tricks of fortune, the uneasy presentiments, in
 short, the whole "Divine Comedy" of life, and the Inferno, also pass
 before him, not merely like pictures on the wall--for he too lives and
 suffers in these scenes,--and yet not without that fleeting sensation
 of appearance. And perhaps many a one will, like myself, recollect
 having sometimes called out cheeringly and not without success amid the
 dangers and terrors of dream-life: "It is a dream! I will dream on!" I
 have likewise been told of persons capable of continuing the causality
 of one and the same dream for three and even more successive nights:
 all of which facts clearly testify that our innermost being, the common
 substratum of all of us, experiences our dreams with deep joy and
 cheerful acquiescence.
 
 This cheerful acquiescence in the dream-experience has likewise been
 embodied by the Greeks in their Apollo: for Apollo, as the god of
 all shaping energies, is also the soothsaying god. He, who (as the
 etymology of the name indicates) is the "shining one," the deity of
 light, also rules over the fair appearance of the inner world of
 fantasies. The higher truth, the perfection of these states in contrast
 to the only partially intelligible everyday world, ay, the deep
 consciousness of nature, healing and helping in sleep and dream, is at
 the same time the symbolical analogue of the faculty of soothsaying
 and, in general, of the arts, through which life is made possible and
 worth living. But also that delicate line, which the dream-picture must
 not overstep--lest it act pathologically (in which case appearance,
 being reality pure and simple, would impose upon us)--must not be
 wanting in the picture of Apollo: that measured limitation, that
 freedom from the wilder emotions, that philosophical calmness of the
 sculptor-god. His eye must be "sunlike," according to his origin; even
 when it is angry and looks displeased, the sacredness of his beauteous
 appearance is still there. And so we might apply to Apollo, in an
 eccentric sense, what Schopenhauer says of the man wrapt in the veil
 of My[2]: _Welt als Wille und Vorstellung,_ I. p. 416: "Just as in
 a stormy sea, unbounded in every direction, rising and falling with
 howling mountainous waves, a sailor sits in a boat and trusts in his
 frail barque: so in the midst of a world of sorrows the individual sits
 quietly supported by and trusting in his _principium individuationis_."
 Indeed, we might say of Apollo, that in him the unshaken faith in
 this _principium_ and the quiet sitting of the man wrapt therein have
 received their sublimest expression; and we might even designate Apollo
 as the glorious divine image of the _principium individuationis,_
 from out of the gestures and looks of which all the joy and wisdom of
 "appearance," together with its beauty, speak to us.
 
 In the same work Schopenhauer has described to us the stupendous _awe_
 which seizes upon man, when of a sudden he is at a loss to account for
 the cognitive forms of a phenomenon, in that the principle of reason,
 in some one of its manifestations, seems to admit of an exception.
 Add to this awe the blissful ecstasy which rises from the innermost
 depths of man, ay, of nature, at this same collapse of the _principium
 individuationis,_ and we shall gain an insight into the being of
 the _Dionysian,_ which is brought within closest ken perhaps by the
 analogy of _drunkenness._ It is either under the influence of the
 narcotic draught, of which the hymns of all primitive men and peoples
 tell us, or by the powerful approach of spring penetrating all nature
 with joy, that those Dionysian emotions awake, in the augmentation of
 which the subjective vanishes to complete self-forgetfulness. So also
 in the German Middle Ages singing and dancing crowds, ever increasing
 in number, were borne from place to place under this same Dionysian
 power. In these St. John's and St. Vitus's dancers we again perceive
 the Bacchic choruses of the Greeks, with their previous history in Asia
 Minor, as far back as Babylon and the orgiastic Saca. There are some,
 who, from lack of experience or obtuseness, will turn away from such
 phenomena as "folk-diseases" with a smile of contempt or pity prompted
 by the consciousness of their own health: of course, the poor wretches
 do not divine what a cadaverous-looking and ghastly aspect this very
 "health" of theirs presents when the glowing life of the Dionysian
 revellers rushes past them.
 
 Under the charm of the Dionysian not only is the covenant between man
 and man again established, but also estranged, hostile or subjugated
 nature again celebrates her reconciliation with her lost son, man. Of
 her own accord earth proffers her gifts, and peacefully the beasts of
 prey approach from the desert and the rocks. The chariot of Dionysus is
 bedecked with flowers and garlands: panthers and tigers pass beneath
 his yoke. Change Beethoven's "jubilee-song" into a painting, and, if
 your imagination be equal to the occasion when the awestruck millions
 sink into the dust, you will then be able to approach the Dionysian.
 Now is the slave a free man, now all the stubborn, hostile barriers,
 which necessity, caprice, or "shameless fashion" has set up between
 man and man, are broken down. Now, at the evangel of cosmic harmony,
 each one feels himself not only united, reconciled, blended with
 his neighbour, but as one with him, as if the veil of My has been
 torn and were now merely fluttering in tatters before the mysterious
 Primordial Unity. In song and in dance man exhibits himself as a member
 of a higher community, has forgotten how to walk and speak, and is on
 the point of taking a dancing flight into the air. His gestures bespeak
 enchantment. Even as the animals now talk, and as the earth yields milk
 and honey, so also something super-natural sounds forth from him: he
 feels himself a god, he himself now walks about enchanted and elated
 even as the gods whom he saw walking about in his dreams. Man is no
 longer an artist, he has become a work of art: the artistic power of
 all nature here reveals itself in the tremors of drunkenness to the
 highest gratification of the Primordial Unity. The noblest clay, the
 costliest marble, namely man, is here kneaded and cut, and the chisel
 strokes of the Dionysian world-artist are accompanied with the cry of
 the Eleusinian mysteries: "Ihr strzt nieder, Millionen? Ahnest du den
 Schpfer, Welt?"[3]
 
 
 [1]
 
     My friend, just this is poet's task:
     His dreams to read and to unmask.
     Trust me, illusion's truths thrice sealed
     In dream to man will be revealed.
     All verse-craft and poetisation
     Is but soothdream interpretation.
 
 [2] Cf. _World and Will as Idea,_ 1. 455 ff., trans, by
 Haldane and Kemp.
 
 [3]
 
     Ye bow in the dust, oh millions?
     Thy maker, mortal, dost divine?
 Cf. Schiller's "Hymn to Joy"; and Beethoven, Ninth Symphony.--TR.
 
 
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 Thus far we have considered the Apollonian and his antithesis,
 the Dionysian, as artistic powers, which burst forth from nature
 herself, _without the mediation of the human artist,_ and in which
 her art-impulses are satisfied in the most immediate and direct way:
 first, as the pictorial world of dreams, the perfection of which
 has no connection whatever with the intellectual height or artistic
 culture of the unit man, and again, as drunken reality, which likewise
 does not heed the unit man, but even seeks to destroy the individual
 and redeem him by a mystic feeling of Oneness. Anent these immediate
 art-states of nature every artist is either an "imitator," to wit,
 either an Apollonian, an artist in dreams, or a Dionysian, an artist
 in ecstasies, or finally--as for instance in Greek tragedy--an artist
 in both dreams and ecstasies: so we may perhaps picture him, as in
 his Dionysian drunkenness and mystical self-abnegation, lonesome and
 apart from the revelling choruses, he sinks down, and how now, through
 Apollonian dream-inspiration, his own state, _i.e._, his oneness
 with the primal source of the universe, reveals itself to him _in a
 symbolical dream-picture_.
 
 After these general premisings and contrastings, let us now approach
 the _Greeks_ in order to learn in what degree and to what height
 these _art-impulses of nature_ were developed in them: whereby
 we shall be enabled to understand and appreciate more deeply the
 relation of the Greek artist to his archetypes, or, according to the
 Aristotelian expression, "the imitation of nature." In spite of all the
 dream-literature and the numerous dream-anecdotes of the Greeks, we can
 speak only conjecturally, though with a fair degree of certainty, of
 their _dreams._ Considering the incredibly precise and unerring plastic
 power of their eyes, as also their manifest and sincere delight in
 colours, we can hardly refrain (to the shame of every one born later)
 from assuming for their very dreams a logical causality of lines and
 contours, colours and groups, a sequence of scenes resembling their
 best reliefs, the perfection of which would certainly justify us, if a
 comparison were possible, in designating the dreaming Greeks as Homers
 and Homer as a dreaming Greek: in a deeper sense than when modern man,
 in respect to his dreams, ventures to compare himself with Shakespeare.
 
 On the other hand, we should not have to speak conjecturally, if asked
 to disclose the immense gap which separated the _Dionysian Greek_ from
 the Dionysian barbarian. From all quarters of the Ancient World--to
 say nothing of the modern--from Rome as far as Babylon, we can prove
 the existence of Dionysian festivals, the type of which bears, at
 best, the same relation to the Greek festivals as the bearded satyr,
 who borrowed his name and attributes from the goat, does to Dionysus
 himself. In nearly every instance the centre of these festivals lay
 in extravagant sexual licentiousness, the waves of which overwhelmed
 all family life and its venerable traditions; the very wildest beasts
 of nature were let loose here, including that detestable mixture of
 lust and cruelty which has always seemed to me the genuine "witches'
 draught." For some time, however, it would seem that the Greeks
 were perfectly secure and guarded against the feverish agitations
 of these festivals (--the knowledge of which entered Greece by all
 the channels of land and sea) by the figure of Apollo himself rising
 here in full pride, who could not have held out the Gorgon's head to
 a more dangerous power than this grotesquely uncouth Dionysian. It
 is in Doric art that this majestically-rejecting attitude of Apollo
 perpetuated itself. This opposition became more precarious and even
 impossible, when, from out of the deepest root of the Hellenic nature,
 similar impulses finally broke forth and made way for themselves:
 the Delphic god, by a seasonably effected reconciliation, was now
 contented with taking the destructive arms from the hands of his
 powerful antagonist. This reconciliation marks the most important
 moment in the history of the Greek cult: wherever we turn our eyes
 we may observe the revolutions resulting from this event. It was
 the reconciliation of two antagonists, with the sharp demarcation
 of the boundary-lines to be thenceforth observed by each, and with
 periodical transmission of testimonials;--in reality, the chasm was
 not bridged over. But if we observe how, under the pressure of this
 conclusion of peace, the Dionysian power manifested itself, we shall
 now recognise in the Dionysian orgies of the Greeks, as compared with
 the Babylonian Saca and their retrogression of man to the tiger and
 the ape, the significance of festivals of world-redemption and days of
 transfiguration. Not till then does nature attain her artistic jubilee;
 not till then does the rupture of the _principium individuationis_
 become an artistic phenomenon. That horrible "witches' draught" of
 sensuality and cruelty was here powerless: only the curious blending
 and duality in the emotions of the Dionysian revellers reminds one of
 it--just as medicines remind one of deadly poisons,--that phenomenon,
 to wit, that pains beget joy, that jubilation wrings painful sounds out
 of the breast. From the highest joy sounds the cry of horror or the
 yearning wail over an irretrievable loss. In these Greek festivals a
 sentimental trait, as it were, breaks forth from nature, as if she must
 sigh over her dismemberment into individuals. The song and pantomime
 of such dually-minded revellers was something new and unheard-of in
 the Homeric-Grecian world; and the Dionysian _music_ in particular
 excited awe and horror. If music, as it would seem, was previously
 known as an Apollonian art, it was, strictly speaking, only as the
 wave-beat of rhythm, the formative power of which was developed to
 the representation of Apollonian conditions. The music of Apollo was
 Doric architectonics in tones, but in merely suggested tones, such
 as those of the cithara. The very element which forms the essence of
 Dionysian music (and hence of music in general) is carefully excluded
 as un-Apollonian; namely, the thrilling power of the tone, the uniform
 stream of the melos, and the thoroughly incomparable world of harmony.
 In the Dionysian dithyramb man is incited to the highest exaltation
 of all his symbolic faculties; something never before experienced
 struggles for utterance--the annihilation of the veil of My, Oneness
 as genius of the race, ay, of nature. The essence of nature is now
 to be expressed symbolically; a new world of symbols is required;
 for once the entire symbolism of the body, not only the symbolism of
 the lips, face, and speech, but the whole pantomime of dancing which
 sets all the members into rhythmical motion. Thereupon the other
 symbolic powers, those of music, in rhythmics, dynamics, and harmony,
 suddenly become impetuous. To comprehend this collective discharge
 of all the symbolic powers, a man must have already attained that
 height of self-abnegation, which wills to express itself symbolically
 through these powers: the Dithyrambic votary of Dionysus is therefore
 understood only by those like himself! With what astonishment must the
 Apollonian Greek have beheld him! With an astonishment, which was all
 the greater the more it was mingled with the shuddering suspicion that
 all this was in reality not so very foreign to him, yea, that, like
 unto a veil, his Apollonian consciousness only hid this Dionysian world
 from his view.
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 In order to comprehend this, we must take down the artistic structure,
 of the _Apollonian culture,_ as it were, stone by stone, till we behold
 the foundations on which it rests. Here we observe first of all the
 glorious _Olympian_ figures of the gods, standing on the gables of this
 structure, whose deeds, represented in far-shining reliefs, adorn its
 friezes. Though Apollo stands among them as an individual deity, side
 by side with others, and without claim to priority of rank, we must not
 suffer this fact to mislead us. The same impulse which embodied itself
 in Apollo has, in general, given birth to this whole Olympian world,
 and in this sense we may regard Apollo as the father thereof. What was
 the enormous need from which proceeded such an illustrious group of
 Olympian beings?
 
 Whosoever, with another religion in his heart, approaches these
 Olympians and seeks among them for moral elevation, even for sanctity,
 for incorporeal spiritualisation, for sympathetic looks of love, will
 soon be obliged to turn his back on them, discouraged and disappointed.
 Here nothing suggests asceticism, spirituality, or duty: here only
 an exuberant, even triumphant life speaks to us, in which everything
 existing is deified, whether good or bad. And so the spectator will
 perhaps stand quite bewildered before this fantastic exuberance of
 life, and ask himself what magic potion these madly merry men could
 have used for enjoying life, so that, wherever they turned their eyes,
 Helena, the ideal image of their own existence "floating in sweet
 sensuality," smiled upon them. But to this spectator, already turning
 backwards, we must call out: "depart not hence, but hear rather what
 Greek folk-wisdom says of this same life, which with such inexplicable
 cheerfulness spreads out before thee." There is an ancient story that
 king Midas hunted in the forest a long time for the wise _Silenus,_
 the companion of Dionysus, without capturing him. When at last he fell
 into his hands, the king asked what was best of all and most desirable
 for man. Fixed and immovable, the demon remained silent; till at last,
 forced by the king, he broke out with shrill laughter into these words:
 "Oh, wretched race of a day, children of chance and misery, why do ye
 compel me to say to you what it were most expedient for you not to
 hear? What is best of all is for ever beyond your reach: not to be
 born, not to _be_, to be _nothing._ The second best for you, however,
 is soon to die."
 
 How is the Olympian world of deities related to this folk-wisdom? Even
 as the rapturous vision of the tortured martyr to his sufferings.
 
 Now the Olympian magic mountain opens, as it were, to our view and
 shows to us its roots. The Greek knew and felt the terrors and horrors
 of existence: to be able to live at all, he had to interpose the
 shining dream-birth of the Olympian world between himself and them.
 The excessive distrust of the titanic powers of nature, the Moira
 throning inexorably over all knowledge, the vulture of the great
 philanthropist Prometheus, the terrible fate of the wise dipus, the
 family curse of the Atrid which drove Orestes to matricide; in short,
 that entire philosophy of the sylvan god, with its mythical exemplars,
 which wrought the ruin of the melancholy Etruscans--was again and again
 surmounted anew by the Greeks through the artistic _middle world_ of
 the Olympians, or at least veiled and withdrawn from sight. To be able
 to live, the Greeks had, from direst necessity, to create these gods:
 which process we may perhaps picture to ourselves in this manner: that
 out of the original Titan thearchy of terror the Olympian thearchy of
 joy was evolved, by slow transitions, through the Apollonian impulse to
 beauty, even as roses break forth from thorny bushes. How else could
 this so sensitive people, so vehement in its desires, so singularly
 qualified for _sufferings_ have endured existence, if it had not been
 exhibited to them in their gods, surrounded with a higher glory?
 The same impulse which calls art into being, as the complement and
 consummation of existence, seducing to a continuation of life, caused
 also the Olympian world to arise, in which the Hellenic "will" held
 up before itself a transfiguring mirror. Thus do the gods justify the
 life of man, in that they themselves live it--the only satisfactory
 Theodicy! Existence under the bright sunshine of such gods is regarded
 as that which is desirable in itself, and the real _grief_ of the
 Homeric men has reference to parting from it, especially to early
 parting: so that we might now say of them, with a reversion of the
 Silenian wisdom, that "to die early is worst of all for them, the
 second worst is--some day to die at all." If once the lamentation is
 heard, it will ring out again, of the short-lived Achilles, of the
 leaf-like change and vicissitude of the human race, of the decay of
 the heroic age. It is not unworthy of the greatest hero to long for a
 continuation of life, ay, even as a day-labourer. So vehemently does
 the "will," at the Apollonian stage of development, long for this
 existence, so completely at one does the Homeric man feel himself with
 it, that the very lamentation becomes its song of praise.
 
 Here we must observe that this harmony which is so eagerly contemplated
 by modern man, in fact, this oneness of man with nature, to express
 which Schiller introduced the technical term "nave," is by no means
 such a simple, naturally resulting and, as it were, inevitable
 condition, which _must_ be found at the gate of every culture leading
 to a paradise of man: this could be believed only by an age which
 sought to picture to itself Rousseau's mile also as an artist,
 and imagined it had found in Homer such an artist mile, reared at
 Nature's bosom. Wherever we meet with the "nave" in art, it behoves
 us to recognise the highest effect of the Apollonian culture, which
 in the first place has always to overthrow some Titanic empire and
 slay monsters, and which, through powerful dazzling representations
 and pleasurable illusions, must have triumphed over a terrible depth
 of world-contemplation and a most keen susceptibility to suffering.
 But how seldom is the nave--that complete absorption, in the beauty
 of appearance--attained! And hence how inexpressibly sublime is
 _Homer,_ who, as unit being, bears the same relation to this Apollonian
 folk-culture as the unit dream-artist does to the dream-faculty of
 the people and of Nature in general. The Homeric "navet" can be
 comprehended only as the complete triumph of the Apollonian illusion:
 it is the same kind of illusion as Nature so frequently employs to
 compass her ends. The true goal is veiled by a phantasm: we stretch out
 our hands for the latter, while Nature attains the former through our
 illusion. In the Greeks the "will" desired to contemplate itself in the
 transfiguration of the genius and the world of art; in order to glorify
 themselves, its creatures had to feel themselves worthy of glory;
 they had to behold themselves again in a higher sphere, without this
 consummate world of contemplation acting as an imperative or reproach.
 Such is the sphere of beauty, in which, as in a mirror, they saw their
 images, the Olympians. With this mirroring of beauty the Hellenic will
 combated its talent--correlative to the artistic--for suffering and for
 the wisdom of suffering: and, as a monument of its victory, Homer, the
 nave artist, stands before us.
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 Concerning this nave artist the analogy of dreams will enlighten us to
 some extent. When we realise to ourselves the dreamer, as, in the midst
 of the illusion of the dream-world and without disturbing it, he calls
 out to himself: "it is a dream, I will dream on"; when we must thence
 infer a deep inner joy in dream-contemplation; when, on the other hand,
 to be at all able to dream with this inner joy in contemplation, we
 must have completely forgotten the day and its terrible obtrusiveness,
 we may, under the direction of the dream-reading Apollo, interpret
 all these phenomena to ourselves somewhat as follows. Though it is
 certain that of the two halves of life, the waking and the dreaming,
 the former appeals to us as by far the more preferred, important,
 excellent and worthy of being lived, indeed, as that which alone is
 lived: yet, with reference to that mysterious ground of our being of
 which we are the phenomenon, I should, paradoxical as it may seem, be
 inclined to maintain the very opposite estimate of the value of dream
 life. For the more clearly I perceive in nature those all-powerful art
 impulses, and in them a fervent longing for appearance, for redemption
 through appearance, the more I feel myself driven to the metaphysical
 assumption that the Verily-Existent and Primordial Unity, as the
 Eternally Suffering and Self-Contradictory, requires the rapturous
 vision, the joyful appearance, for its continuous salvation: which
 appearance we, who are completely wrapt in it and composed of it, must
 regard as the Verily Non-existent,--_i.e.,_ as a perpetual unfolding
 in time, space and causality,--in other words, as empiric reality.
 If we therefore waive the consideration of our own "reality" for the
 present, if we conceive our empiric existence, and that of the world
 generally, as a representation of the Primordial Unity generated every
 moment, we shall then have to regard the dream as an _appearance of
 appearance,_ hence as a still higher gratification of the primordial
 desire for appearance. It is for this same reason that the innermost
 heart of Nature experiences that indescribable joy in the nave artist
 and in the nave work of art, which is likewise only "an appearance of
 appearance." In a symbolic painting, _Raphael_, himself one of these
 immortal "nave" ones, has represented to us this depotentiating of
 appearance to appearance, the primordial process of the nave artist
 and at the same time of Apollonian culture. In his _Transfiguration,_
 the lower half, with the possessed boy, the despairing bearers, the
 helpless, terrified disciples, shows to us the reflection of eternal
 primordial pain, the sole basis of the world: the "appearance" here
 is the counter-appearance of eternal Contradiction, the father of
 things. Out of this appearance then arises, like an ambrosial vapour, a
 visionlike new world of appearances, of which those wrapt in the first
 appearance see nothing--a radiant floating in purest bliss and painless
 Contemplation beaming from wide-open eyes. Here there is presented to
 our view, in the highest symbolism of art, that Apollonian world of
 beauty and its substratum, the terrible wisdom of Silenus, and we
 comprehend, by intuition, their necessary interdependence. Apollo,
 however, again appears to us as the apotheosis of the _principium
 individuationis,_ in which alone the perpetually attained end of the
 Primordial Unity, its redemption through appearance, is consummated: he
 shows us, with sublime attitudes, how the entire world of torment is
 necessary, that thereby the individual may be impelled to realise the
 redeeming vision, and then, sunk in contemplation thereof, quietly sit
 in his fluctuating barque, in the midst of the sea.
 
 This apotheosis of individuation, if it be at all conceived as
 imperative and laying down precepts, knows but one law--the individual,
 _i.e.,_ the observance of the boundaries of the individual,
 _measure_ in the Hellenic sense. Apollo, as ethical deity, demands
 due proportion of his disciples, and, that this may be observed, he
 demands self-knowledge. And thus, parallel to the sthetic necessity
 for beauty, there run the demands "know thyself" and "not too much,"
 while presumption and undueness are regarded as the truly hostile
 demons of the non-Apollonian sphere, hence as characteristics of the
 pre-Apollonian age, that of the Titans, and of the extra-Apollonian
 world, that of the barbarians. Because of his Titan-like love for
 man, Prometheus had to be torn to pieces by vultures; because of his
 excessive wisdom, which solved the riddle of the Sphinx, dipus had
 to plunge into a bewildering vortex of monstrous crimes: thus did the
 Delphic god interpret the Grecian past.
 
 So also the effects wrought by the _Dionysian_ appeared "titanic" and
 "barbaric" to the Apollonian Greek: while at the same time he could
 not conceal from himself that he too was inwardly related to these
 overthrown Titans and heroes. Indeed, he had to recognise still more
 than this: his entire existence, with all its beauty and moderation,
 rested on a hidden substratum of suffering and of knowledge, which
 was again disclosed to him by the Dionysian. And lo! Apollo could not
 live without Dionysus! The "titanic" and the "barbaric" were in the
 end not less necessary than the Apollonian. And now let us imagine to
 ourselves how the ecstatic tone of the Dionysian festival sounded in
 ever more luring and bewitching strains into this artificially confined
 world built on appearance and moderation, how in these strains all
 the _undueness_ of nature, in joy, sorrow, and knowledge, even to
 the transpiercing shriek, became audible: let us ask ourselves what
 meaning could be attached to the psalmodising artist of Apollo, with
 the phantom harp-sound, as compared with this demonic folk-song! The
 muses of the arts of "appearance" paled before an art which, in its
 intoxication, spoke the truth, the wisdom of Silenus cried "woe! woe!"
 against the cheerful Olympians. The individual, with all his boundaries
 and due proportions, went under in the self-oblivion of the Dionysian
 states and forgot the Apollonian precepts. The _Undueness_ revealed
 itself as truth, contradiction, the bliss born of pain, declared itself
 but of the heart of nature. And thus, wherever the Dionysian prevailed,
 the Apollonian was routed and annihilated. But it is quite as certain
 that, where the first assault was successfully withstood, the authority
 and majesty of the Delphic god exhibited itself as more rigid and
 menacing than ever. For I can only explain to myself the _Doric_ state
 and Doric art as a permanent war-camp of the Apollonian: only by
 incessant opposition to the titanic-barbaric nature of the Dionysian
 was it possible for an art so defiantly-prim, so encompassed with
 bulwarks, a training so warlike and rigorous, a constitution so cruel
 and relentless, to last for any length of time.
 
 Up to this point we have enlarged upon the observation made at the
 beginning of this essay: how the Dionysian and the Apollonian, in ever
 new births succeeding and mutually augmenting one another, controlled
 the Hellenic genius: how from out the age of "bronze," with its Titan
 struggles and rigorous folk-philosophy, the Homeric world develops
 under the fostering sway of the Apollonian impulse to beauty, how this
 "nave" splendour is again overwhelmed by the inbursting flood of the
 Dionysian, and how against this new power the Apollonian rises to the
 austere majesty of Doric art and the Doric view of things. If, then,
 in this way, in the strife of these two hostile principles, the older
 Hellenic history falls into four great periods of art, we are now
 driven to inquire after the ulterior purpose of these unfoldings and
 processes, unless perchance we should regard the last-attained period,
 the period of Doric art, as the end and aim of these artistic impulses:
 and here the sublime and highly celebrated art-work of _Attic tragedy_
 and dramatic dithyramb presents itself to our view as the common
 goal of both these impulses, whose mysterious union, after many and
 long precursory struggles, found its glorious consummation in such a
 child,--which is at once Antigone and Cassandra.
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 We now approach the real purpose of our investigation, which aims
 at acquiring a knowledge of the Dionyso-Apollonian genius and his
 art-work, or at least an anticipatory understanding of the mystery of
 the aforesaid union. Here we shall ask first of all where that new
 germ which subsequently developed into tragedy and dramatic dithyramb
 first makes itself perceptible in the Hellenic world. The ancients
 themselves supply the answer in symbolic form, when they place _Homer_
 and _Archilochus_ as the forefathers and torch-bearers of Greek poetry
 side by side on gems, sculptures, etc., in the sure conviction that
 only these two thoroughly original compeers, from whom a stream of
 fire flows over the whole of Greek posterity, should be taken into
 consideration. Homer, the aged dreamer sunk in himself, the type
 of the Apollonian nave artist, beholds now with astonishment the
 impassioned genius of the warlike votary of the muses, Archilochus,
 violently tossed to and fro on the billows of existence: and modern
 sthetics could only add by way of interpretation, that here the
 "objective" artist is confronted by the first "subjective" artist.
 But this interpretation is of little service to us, because we know
 the subjective artist only as the poor artist, and in every type and
 elevation of art we demand specially and first of all the conquest
 of the Subjective, the redemption from the "ego" and the cessation
 of every individual will and desire; indeed, we find it impossible
 to believe in any truly artistic production, however insignificant,
 without objectivity, without pure, interestless contemplation. Hence
 our sthetics must first solve the problem as to how the "lyrist" is
 possible as an artist: he who according to the experience of all ages
 continually says "I" and sings off to us the entire chromatic scale of
 his passions and desires. This very Archilochus appals us, alongside
 of Homer, by his cries of hatred and scorn, by the drunken outbursts
 of his desire. Is not just he then, who has been called the first
 subjective artist, the non-artist proper? But whence then the reverence
 which was shown to him--the poet--in very remarkable utterances by the
 Delphic oracle itself, the focus of "objective" art?
 
 _Schiller_ has enlightened us concerning his poetic procedure by a
 psychological observation, inexplicable to himself, yet not apparently
 open to any objection. He acknowledges that as the preparatory state
 to the act of poetising he had not perhaps before him or within him a
 series of pictures with co-ordinate causality of thoughts, but rather
 a _musical mood_ ("The perception with me is at first without a clear
 and definite object; this forms itself later. A certain musical mood
 of mind precedes, and only after this does the poetical idea follow
 with me.") Add to this the most important phenomenon of all ancient
 lyric poetry, _the union,_ regarded everywhere as natural, _of the
 lyrist with the musician,_ their very identity, indeed,--compared
 with which our modern lyric poetry is like the statue of a god without
 a head,--and we may now, on the basis of our metaphysics of sthetics
 set forth above, interpret the lyrist to ourselves as follows. As
 Dionysian artist he is in the first place become altogether one with
 the Primordial Unity, its pain and contradiction, and he produces the
 copy of this Primordial Unity as music, granting that music has been
 correctly termed a repetition and a recast of the world; but now, under
 the Apollonian dream-inspiration, this music again becomes visible
 to him as in a _symbolic dream-picture._ The formless and intangible
 reflection of the primordial pain in music, with its redemption in
 appearance, then generates a second mirroring as a concrete symbol or
 example. The artist has already surrendered his subjectivity in the
 Dionysian process: the picture which now shows to him his oneness with
 the heart of the world, is a dream-scene, which embodies the primordial
 contradiction and primordial pain, together with the primordial joy, of
 appearance. The "I" of the lyrist sounds therefore from the abyss of
 being: its "subjectivity," in the sense of the modern sthetes, is a
 fiction. When Archilochus, the first lyrist of the Greeks, makes known
 both his mad love and his contempt to the daughters of Lycambes, it is
 not his passion which dances before us in orgiastic frenzy: we see
 Dionysus and the Mnads, we see the drunken reveller Archilochus sunk
 down to sleep--as Euripides depicts it in the Bacch, the sleep on the
 high Alpine pasture, in the noonday sun:--and now Apollo approaches and
 touches him with the laurel. The Dionyso-musical enchantment of the
 sleeper now emits, as it were, picture sparks, lyrical poems, which in
 their highest development are called tragedies and dramatic dithyrambs.
 
 The plastic artist, as also the epic poet, who is related to him, is
 sunk in the pure contemplation of pictures. The Dionysian musician
 is, without any picture, himself just primordial pain and the
 primordial re-echoing thereof. The lyric genius is conscious of a
 world of pictures and symbols--growing out of the state of mystical
 self-abnegation and oneness,--which has a colouring causality and
 velocity quite different from that of the world of the plastic artist
 and epic poet. While the latter lives in these pictures, and only in
 them, with joyful satisfaction, and never grows tired of contemplating
 them with love, even in their minutest characters, while even the
 picture of the angry Achilles is to him but a picture, the angry
 expression of which he enjoys with the dream-joy in appearance--so
 that, by this mirror of appearance, he is guarded against being unified
 and blending with his figures;--the pictures of the lyrist on the other
 hand are nothing but _his very_ self and, as it were, only different
 projections of himself, on account of which he as the moving centre
 of this world is entitled to say "I": only of course this self is
 not the same as that of the waking, empirically real man, but the
 only verily existent and eternal self resting at the basis of things,
 by means of the images whereof the lyric genius sees through even to
 this basis of things. Now let us suppose that he beholds _himself_
 also among these images as non-genius, _i.e.,_ his subject, the whole
 throng of subjective passions and impulses of the will directed to a
 definite object which appears real to him; if now it seems as if the
 lyric genius and the allied non-genius were one, and as if the former
 spoke that little word "I" of his own accord, this appearance will no
 longer be able to lead us astray, as it certainly led those astray who
 designated the lyrist as the subjective poet. In truth, Archilochus,
 the passionately inflamed, loving and hating man, is but a vision of
 the genius, who by this time is no longer Archilochus, but a genius
 of the world, who expresses his primordial pain symbolically in the
 figure of the man Archilochus: while the subjectively willing and
 desiring man, Archilochus, can never at any time be a poet. It is by no
 means necessary, however, that the lyrist should see nothing but the
 phenomenon of the man Archilochus before him as a reflection of eternal
 being; and tragedy shows how far the visionary world of the lyrist may
 depart from this phenomenon, to which, of course, it is most intimately
 related.
 
 _Schopenhauer,_ who did not shut his eyes to the difficulty presented
 by the lyrist in the philosophical contemplation of art, thought he
 had found a way out of it, on which, however, I cannot accompany him;
 while he alone, in his profound metaphysics of music, held in his
 hands the means whereby this difficulty could be definitely removed:
 as I believe I have removed it here in his spirit and to his honour.
 In contrast to our view, he describes the peculiar nature of song
 as follows[4] (_Welt als Wille und Vorstellung,_ I. 295):--"It is
 the subject of the will, _i.e.,_ his own volition, which fills the
 consciousness of the singer; often as an unbound and satisfied desire
 (joy), but still more often as a restricted desire (grief), always as
 an emotion, a passion, or an agitated frame of mind. Besides this,
 however, and along with it, by the sight of surrounding nature, the
 singer becomes conscious of himself as the subject of pure will-less
 knowing, the unbroken, blissful peace of which now appears, in contrast
 to the stress of desire, which is always restricted and always needy.
 The feeling of this contrast, this alternation, is really what the
 song as a whole expresses and what principally constitutes the lyrical
 state of mind. In it pure knowing comes to us as it were to deliver us
 from desire and the stress thereof: we follow, but only for an instant;
 for desire, the remembrance of our personal ends, tears us anew from
 peaceful contemplation; yet ever again the next beautiful surrounding
 in which the pure will-less knowledge presents itself to us, allures
 us away from desire. Therefore, in song and in the lyrical mood,
 desire (the personal interest of the ends) and the pure perception of
 the surrounding which presents itself, are wonderfully mingled with
 each other; connections between them are sought for and imagined; the
 subjective disposition, the affection of the will, imparts its own
 hue to the contemplated surrounding, and conversely, the surroundings
 communicate the reflex of their colour to the will. The true song is
 the expression of the whole of this mingled and divided state of mind."
 
 Who could fail to see in this description that lyric poetry is here
 characterised as an imperfectly attained art, which seldom and only
 as it were in leaps arrives at its goal, indeed, as a semi-art, the
 essence of which is said to consist in this, that desire and pure
 contemplation, _i.e.,_ the unsthetic and the sthetic condition, are
 wonderfully mingled with each other? We maintain rather, that this
 entire antithesis, according to which, as according to some standard
 of value, Schopenhauer, too, still classifies the arts, the antithesis
 between the subjective and the objective, is quite out of place in
 sthetics, inasmuch as the subject _i.e.,_ the desiring individual who
 furthers his own egoistic ends, can be conceived only as the adversary,
 not as the origin of art. In so far as the subject is the artist,
 however, he has already been released from his individual will, and has
 become as it were the medium, through which the one verily existent
 Subject celebrates his redemption in appearance. For this one thing
 must above all be clear to us, to our humiliation _and_ exaltation,
 that the entire comedy of art is not at all performed, say, for our
 betterment and culture, and that we are just as little the true authors
 of this art-world: rather we may assume with regard to ourselves, that
 its true author uses us as pictures and artistic projections, and that
 we have our highest dignity in our significance as works of art--for
 only as an _sthetic phenomenon_ is existence and the world eternally
 _justified:_--while of course our consciousness of this our specific
 significance hardly differs from the kind of consciousness which the
 soldiers painted on canvas have of the battle represented thereon.
 Hence all our knowledge of art is at bottom quite illusory, because, as
 knowing persons we are not one and identical with the Being who, as the
 sole author and spectator of this comedy of art, prepares a perpetual
 entertainment for himself. Only in so far as the genius in the act of
 artistic production coalesces with this primordial artist of the world,
 does he get a glimpse of the eternal essence of art, for in this state
 he is, in a marvellous manner, like the weird picture of the fairy-tale
 which can at will turn its eyes and behold itself; he is now at once
 subject and object, at once poet, actor, and spectator.
 
 
 [4] _World as Will and Idea,_ I. 323, 4th ed. of Haldane and
 Kemp's translation. Quoted with a few changes.
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 With reference to Archilochus, it has been established by critical
 research that he introduced the _folk-song_ into literature, and,
 on account thereof, deserved, according to the general estimate of
 the Greeks, his unique position alongside of Homer. But what is this
 popular folk-song in contrast to the wholly Apollonian epos? What
 else but the _perpetuum vestigium_ of a union of the Apollonian and
 the Dionysian? Its enormous diffusion among all peoples, still further
 enhanced by ever new births, testifies to the power of this artistic
 double impulse of nature: which leaves its vestiges in the popular
 song in like manner as the orgiastic movements of a people perpetuate
 themselves in its music. Indeed, one might also furnish historical
 proofs, that every period which is highly productive in popular songs
 has been most violently stirred by Dionysian currents, which we must
 always regard as the substratum and prerequisite of the popular song.
 
 First of all, however, we regard the popular song as the musical mirror
 of the world, as the Original melody, which now seeks for itself a
 parallel dream-phenomenon and expresses it in poetry. _Melody is
 therefore primary and universal,_ and as such may admit of several
 objectivations, in several texts. Likewise, in the nave estimation of
 the people, it is regarded as by far the more important and necessary.
 Melody generates the poem out of itself by an ever-recurring process.
 _The strophic form of the popular song_ points to the same phenomenon,
 which I always beheld with astonishment, till at last I found this
 explanation. Any one who in accordance with this theory examines a
 collection of popular songs, such as "Des Knaben Wunderhorn," will find
 innumerable instances of the perpetually productive melody scattering
 picture sparks all around: which in their variegation, their abrupt
 change, their mad precipitance, manifest a power quite unknown to the
 epic appearance and its steady flow. From the point of view of the
 epos, this unequal and irregular pictorial world of lyric poetry must
 be simply condemned: and the solemn epic rhapsodists of the Apollonian
 festivals in the age of Terpander have certainly done so.
 
 Accordingly, we observe that in the poetising of the popular song,
 language is strained to its utmost _to imitate music;_ and hence a
 new world of poetry begins with Archilochus, which is fundamentally
 opposed to the Homeric. And in saying this we have pointed out the
 only possible relation between poetry and music, between word and
 tone: the word, the picture, the concept here seeks an expression
 analogous to music and now experiences in itself the power of music.
 In this sense we may discriminate between two main currents in the
 history of the language of the Greek people, according as their
 language imitated either the world of phenomena and of pictures, or the
 world of music. One has only to reflect seriously on the linguistic
 difference with regard to colour, syntactical structure, and vocabulary
 in Homer and Pindar, in order to comprehend the significance of this
 contrast; indeed, it becomes palpably clear to us that in the period
 between Homer and Pindar the _orgiastic flute tones of Olympus_ must
 have sounded forth, which, in an age as late as Aristotle's, when
 music was infinitely more developed, transported people to drunken
 enthusiasm, and which, when their influence was first felt, undoubtedly
 incited all the poetic means of expression of contemporaneous man
 to imitation. I here call attention to a familiar phenomenon of our
 own times, against which our sthetics raises many objections. We
 again and again have occasion to observe how a symphony of Beethoven
 compels the individual hearers to use figurative speech, though the
 appearance presented by a collocation of the different pictorial
 world generated by a piece of music may be never so fantastically
 diversified and even contradictory. To practise its small wit on such
 compositions, and to overlook a phenomenon which is certainly worth
 explaining, is quite in keeping with this sthetics. Indeed, even if
 the tone-poet has spoken in pictures concerning a composition, when for
 instance he designates a certain symphony as the "pastoral" symphony,
 or a passage therein as "the scene by the brook," or another as the
 "merry gathering of rustics," these are likewise only symbolical
 representations born out of music--and not perhaps the imitated objects
 of music--representations which can give us no information whatever
 concerning the _Dionysian_ content of music, and which in fact have
 no distinctive value of their own alongside of other pictorical
 expressions. This process of a discharge of music in pictures we have
 now to transfer to some youthful, linguistically productive people, to
 get a notion as to how the strophic popular song originates, and how
 the entire faculty of speech is stimulated by this new principle of
 imitation of music.
 
 If, therefore, we may regard lyric poetry as the effulguration of
 music in pictures and concepts, we can now ask: "how does music
 _appear_ in the mirror of symbolism and conception?" _It appears as
 will,_ taking the word in the Schopenhauerian sense, _i.e.,_ as the
 antithesis of the sthetic, purely contemplative, and passive frame
 of mind. Here, however, we must discriminate as sharply as possible
 between the concept of essentiality and the concept of phenominality;
 for music, according to its essence, cannot be will, because as such it
 would have to be wholly banished from the domain of art--for the will
 is the unsthetic-in-itself;--yet it appears as will. For in order to
 express the phenomenon of music in pictures, the lyrist requires all
 the stirrings of passion, from the whispering of infant desire to the
 roaring of madness. Under the impulse to speak of music in Apollonian
 symbols, he conceives of all nature, and himself therein, only as the
 eternally willing, desiring, longing existence. But in so far as he
 interprets music by means of pictures, he himself rests in the quiet
 calm of Apollonian contemplation, however much all around him which
 he beholds through the medium of music is in a state of confused and
 violent motion. Indeed, when he beholds himself through this same
 medium, his own image appears to him in a state of unsatisfied feeling:
 his own willing, longing, moaning and rejoicing are to him symbols by
 which he interprets music. Such is the phenomenon of the lyrist: as
 Apollonian genius he interprets music through the image of the will,
 while he himself, completely released from the avidity of the will, is
 the pure, undimmed eye of day.
 
 Our whole disquisition insists on this, that lyric poetry is dependent
 on the spirit of music just as music itself in its absolute sovereignty
 does not _require_ the picture and the concept, but only _endures_
 them as accompaniments. The poems of the lyrist can express nothing
 which has not already been contained in the vast universality and
 absoluteness of the music which compelled him to use figurative
 speech. By no means is it possible for language adequately to render
 the cosmic symbolism of music, for the very reason that music stands
 in symbolic relation to the primordial contradiction and primordial
 pain in the heart of the Primordial Unity, and therefore symbolises a
 sphere which is above all appearance and before all phenomena. Rather
 should we say that all phenomena, compared with it, are but symbols:
 hence _language,_ as the organ and symbol of phenomena, cannot at all
 disclose the innermost essence, of music; language can only be in
 superficial contact with music when it attempts to imitate music; while
 the profoundest significance of the latter cannot be brought one step
 nearer to us by all the eloquence of lyric poetry.
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 We shall now have to avail ourselves of all the principles of art
 hitherto considered, in order to find our way through the labyrinth,
 as we must designate _the origin of Greek tragedy._ I shall not be
 charged with absurdity in saying that the problem of this origin has
 as yet not even been seriously stated, not to say solved, however
 often the fluttering tatters of ancient tradition have been sewed
 together in sundry combinations and torn asunder again. This tradition
 tells us in the most unequivocal terms, _that tragedy sprang from the
 tragic chorus,_ and was originally only chorus and nothing but chorus:
 and hence we feel it our duty to look into the heart of this tragic
 chorus as being the real proto-drama, without in the least contenting
 ourselves with current art-phraseology--according to which the chorus
 is the ideal spectator, or represents the people in contrast to the
 regal side of the scene. The latter explanatory notion, which sounds
 sublime to many a politician--that the immutable moral law was embodied
 by the democratic Athenians in the popular chorus, which always carries
 its point over the passionate excesses and extravagances of kings--may
 be ever so forcibly suggested by an observation of Aristotle: still
 it has no bearing on the original formation of tragedy, inasmuch
 as the entire antithesis of king and people, and, in general, the
 whole politico-social sphere, is excluded from the purely religious
 beginnings of tragedy; but, considering the well-known classical
 form of the chorus in schylus and Sophocles, we should even deem
 it blasphemy to speak here of the anticipation of a "constitutional
 representation of the people," from which blasphemy others have not
 shrunk, however. The ancient governments knew of no constitutional
 representation of the people _in praxi,_ and it is to be hoped that
 they did not even so much as "anticipate" it in tragedy.
 
 Much more celebrated than this political explanation of the chorus is
 the notion of A. W. Schlegel, who advises us to regard the chorus, in
 a manner, as the essence and extract of the crowd of spectators,--as
 the "ideal spectator." This view when compared with the historical
 tradition that tragedy was originally only chorus, reveals itself
 in its true character, as a crude, unscientific, yet brilliant
 assertion, which, however, has acquired its brilliancy only through
 its concentrated form of expression, through the truly Germanic bias
 in favour of whatever is called "ideal," and through our momentary
 astonishment. For we are indeed astonished the moment we compare our
 well-known theatrical public with this chorus, and ask ourselves if it
 could ever be possible to idealise something analogous to the Greek
 chorus out of such a public. We tacitly deny this, and now wonder
 as much at the boldness of Schlegel's assertion as at the totally
 different nature of the Greek public. For hitherto we always believed
 that the true spectator, be he who he may, had always to remain
 conscious of having before him a work of art, and not an empiric
 reality: whereas the tragic chorus of the Greeks is compelled to
 recognise real beings in the figures of the stage. The chorus of the
 Oceanides really believes that it sees before it the Titan Prometheus,
 and considers itself as real as the god of the scene. And are we to
 own that he is the highest and purest type of spectator, who, like the
 Oceanides, regards Prometheus as real and present in body? And is it
 characteristic of the ideal spectator that he should run on the stage
 and free the god from his torments? We had believed in an sthetic
 public, and considered the individual spectator the better qualified
 the more he was capable of viewing a work of art as art, that is,
 sthetically; but now the Schlegelian expression has intimated to us,
 that the perfect ideal spectator does not at all suffer the world of
 the scenes to act sthetically on him, but corporeo-empirically. Oh,
 these Greeks! we have sighed; they will upset our sthetics! But once
 accustomed to it, we have reiterated the saying of Schlegel, as often
 as the subject of the chorus has been broached.
 
 But the tradition which is so explicit here speaks against Schlegel:
 the chorus as such, without the stage,--the primitive form of
 tragedy,--and the chorus of ideal spectators do not harmonise. What
 kind of art would that be which was extracted from the concept of the
 spectator, and whereof we are to regard the "spectator as such" as the
 true form? The spectator without the play is something absurd. We fear
 that the birth of tragedy can be explained neither by the high esteem
 for the moral intelligence of the multitude nor by the concept of the
 spectator without the play; and we regard the problem as too deep to be
 even so much as touched by such superficial modes of contemplation.
 
 An infinitely more valuable insight into the signification of the
 chorus had already been displayed by Schiller in the celebrated Preface
 to his Bride of Messina, where he regarded the chorus as a living wall
 which tragedy draws round herself to guard her from contact with the
 world of reality, and to preserve her ideal domain and poetical freedom.
 
 It is with this, his chief weapon, that Schiller combats the ordinary
 conception of the natural, the illusion ordinarily required in
 dramatic poetry. He contends that while indeed the day on the stage is
 merely artificial, the architecture only symbolical, and the metrical
 dialogue purely ideal in character, nevertheless an erroneous view
 still prevails in the main: that it is not enough to tolerate merely
 as a poetical license _that_ which is in reality the essence of all
 poetry. The introduction of the chorus is, he says, the decisive step
 by which war is declared openly and honestly against all naturalism
 in art.--It is, methinks, for disparaging this mode of contemplation
 that our would-be superior age has coined the disdainful catchword
 "pseudo-idealism." I fear, however, that we on the other hand with our
 present worship of the natural and the real have landed at the nadir
 of all idealism, namely in the region of cabinets of wax-figures. An
 art indeed exists also here, as in certain novels much in vogue at
 present: but let no one pester us with the claim that by this art the
 Schiller-Goethian "Pseudo-idealism" has been vanquished.
 
 It is indeed an "ideal" domain, as Schiller rightly perceived,
 upon--which the Greek satyric chorus, the chorus of primitive tragedy,
 was wont to walk, a domain raised far above the actual path of
 mortals. The Greek framed for this chorus the suspended scaffolding of
 a fictitious _natural state_ and placed thereon fictitious _natural
 beings._ It is on this foundation that tragedy grew up, and so it
 could of course dispense from the very first with a painful portrayal
 of reality. Yet it is, not an arbitrary world placed by fancy betwixt
 heaven and earth; rather is it a world possessing the same reality
 and trustworthiness that Olympus with its dwellers possessed for the
 believing Hellene. The satyr, as being the Dionysian chorist, lives
 in a religiously acknowledged reality under the sanction of the myth
 and cult. That tragedy begins with him, that the Dionysian wisdom of
 tragedy speaks through him, is just as surprising a phenomenon to us
 as, in general, the derivation of tragedy from the chorus. Perhaps
 we shall get a starting-point for our inquiry, if I put forward the
 proposition that the satyr, the fictitious natural being, is to the
 man of culture what Dionysian music is to civilisation. Concerning
 this latter, Richard Wagner says that it is neutralised by music even
 as lamplight by daylight. In like manner, I believe, the Greek man of
 culture felt himself neutralised in the presence of the satyric chorus:
 and this is the most immediate effect of the Dionysian tragedy, that
 the state and society, and, in general, the gaps between man and man
 give way to an overwhelming feeling of oneness, which leads back to
 the heart of nature. The metaphysical comfort,--with which, as I have
 here intimated, every true tragedy dismisses us--that, in spite of
 the perpetual change of phenomena, life at bottom is indestructibly
 powerful and pleasurable, this comfort appears with corporeal lucidity
 as the satyric chorus, as the chorus of natural beings, who live
 ineradicable as it were behind all civilisation, and who, in spite of
 the ceaseless change of generations and the history of nations, remain
 for ever the same.
 
 With this chorus the deep-minded Hellene, who is so singularly
 qualified for the most delicate and severe suffering, consoles
 himself:--he who has glanced with piercing eye into the very heart of
 the terrible destructive processes of so-called universal history, as
 also into the cruelty of nature, and is in danger of longing for a
 Buddhistic negation of the will. Art saves him, and through art life
 saves him--for herself.
 
 For we must know that in the rapture of the Dionysian state, with its
 annihilation of the ordinary bounds and limits of existence, there is
 a _lethargic_ element, wherein all personal experiences of the past
 are submerged. It is by this gulf of oblivion that the everyday world
 and the world of Dionysian reality are separated from each other. But
 as soon as this everyday reality rises again in consciousness, it is
 felt as such, and nauseates us; an ascetic will-paralysing mood is
 the fruit of these states. In this sense the Dionysian man may be
 said to resemble Hamlet: both have for once seen into the true nature
 of things,--they have _perceived,_ but they are loath to act; for
 their action cannot change the eternal nature of things; they regard
 it as shameful or ridiculous that one should require of them to set
 aright the time which is out of joint. Knowledge kills action, action
 requires the veil of illusion--it is this lesson which Hamlet teaches,
 and not the cheap wisdom of John-a-Dreams who from too much reflection,
 as it were from a surplus of possibilities, does not arrive at action
 at all. Not reflection, no!--true knowledge, insight into appalling
 truth, preponderates over all motives inciting to action, in Hamlet as
 well as in the Dionysian man. No comfort avails any longer; his longing
 goes beyond a world after death, beyond the gods themselves; existence
 with its glittering reflection in the gods, or in an immortal other
 world is abjured. In the consciousness of the truth he has perceived,
 man now sees everywhere only the awfulness or the absurdity of
 existence, he now understands the symbolism in the fate of Ophelia, he
 now discerns the wisdom of the sylvan god Silenus: and loathing seizes
 him.
 
 Here, in this extremest danger of the will, _art_ approaches, as a
 saving and healing enchantress; she alone is able to transform these
 nauseating reflections on the awfulness or absurdity of existence
 into representations wherewith it is possible to live: these are the
 representations of the _sublime_ as the artistic subjugation of the
 awful, and the _comic_ as the artistic delivery from the nausea of
 the absurd. The satyric chorus of dithyramb is the saving deed of
 Greek art; the paroxysms described above spent their force in the
 intermediary world of these Dionysian followers.
 
 
 
 8.
 
 
 The satyr, like the idyllic shepherd of our more recent time, is the
 offspring of a longing after the Primitive and the Natural; but mark
 with what firmness and fearlessness the Greek embraced the man of
 the woods, and again, how coyly and mawkishly the modern man dallied
 with the flattering picture of a tender, flute-playing, soft-natured
 shepherd! Nature, on which as yet no knowledge has been at work,
 which maintains unbroken barriers to culture--this is what the Greek
 saw in his satyr, which still was not on this account supposed to
 coincide with the ape. On the contrary: it was the archetype of
 man, the embodiment of his highest and strongest emotions, as the
 enthusiastic reveller enraptured By the proximity of his god, as the
 fellow-suffering companion in whom the suffering of the god repeats
 itself, as the herald of wisdom speaking from the very depths of
 nature, as the emblem of the sexual omnipotence of nature, which the
 Greek was wont to contemplate with reverential awe. The satyr was
 something sublime and godlike: he could not but appear so, especially
 to the sad and wearied eye of the Dionysian man. He would have been
 offended by our spurious tricked-up shepherd, while his eye dwelt
 with sublime satisfaction on the naked and unstuntedly magnificent
 characters of nature: here the illusion of culture was brushed away
 from the archetype of man; here the true man, the bearded satyr,
 revealed himself, who shouts joyfully to his god. Before him the
 cultured man shrank to a lying caricature. Schiller is right also
 with reference to these beginnings of tragic art: the chorus is a
 living bulwark against the onsets of reality, because it--the satyric
 chorus--portrays existence more truthfully, more realistically, more
 perfectly than the cultured man who ordinarily considers himself as the
 only reality. The sphere of poetry does not lie outside the world, like
 some fantastic impossibility of a poet's imagination: it seeks to be
 the very opposite, the unvarnished expression of truth, and must for
 this very reason cast aside the false finery of that supposed reality
 of the cultured man. The contrast between this intrinsic truth of
 nature and the falsehood of culture, which poses as the only reality,
 is similar to that existing between the eternal kernel of things, the
 thing in itself, and the collective world of phenomena. And even as
 tragedy, with its metaphysical comfort, points to the eternal life of
 this kernel of existence, notwithstanding the perpetual dissolution of
 phenomena, so the symbolism of the satyric chorus already expresses
 figuratively this primordial relation between the thing in itself and
 phenomenon. The idyllic shepherd of the modern man is but a copy of the
 sum of the illusions of culture which he calls nature; the Dionysian
 Greek desires truth and nature in their most potent form;--he sees
 himself metamorphosed into the satyr.
 
 The revelling crowd of the votaries of Dionysus rejoices, swayed by
 such moods and perceptions, the power of which transforms them before
 their own eyes, so that they imagine they behold themselves as
 reconstituted genii of nature, as satyrs. The later constitution of the
 tragic chorus is the artistic imitation of this natural phenomenon,
 which of course required a separation of the Dionysian spectators from
 the enchanted Dionysians. However, we must never lose sight of the fact
 that the public of the Attic tragedy rediscovered itself in the chorus
 of the orchestra, that there was in reality no antithesis of public
 and chorus: for all was but one great sublime chorus of dancing and
 singing satyrs, or of such as allowed themselves to be represented by
 the satyrs. The Schlegelian observation must here reveal itself to us
 in a deeper sense. The chorus is the "ideal spectator"[5] in so far as
 it is the only _beholder,_[6] the beholder of the visionary world of
 the scene. A public of spectators, as known to us, was unknown to the
 Greeks. In their theatres the terraced structure of the spectators'
 space rising in concentric arcs enabled every one, in the strictest
 sense, to _overlook_ the entire world of culture around him, and in
 surfeited contemplation to imagine himself a chorist. According to
 this view, then, we may call the chorus in its primitive stage in
 proto-tragedy, a self-mirroring of the Dionysian man: a phenomenon
 which may be best exemplified by the process of the actor, who, if he
 be truly gifted, sees hovering before his eyes with almost tangible
 perceptibility the character he is to represent. The satyric chorus
 is first of all a vision of the Dionysian throng, just as the world
 of the stage is, in turn, a vision of the satyric chorus: the power
 of this vision is great enough to render the eye dull and insensible
 to the impression of "reality," to the presence of the cultured men
 occupying the tiers of seats on every side. The form of the Greek
 theatre reminds one of a lonesome mountain-valley: the architecture of
 the scene appears like a luminous cloud-picture which the Bacchants
 swarming on the mountains behold from the heights, as the splendid
 encirclement in the midst of which the image of Dionysus is revealed to
 them.
 
 Owing to our learned conception of the elementary artistic processes,
 this artistic proto-phenomenon, which is here introduced to explain
 the tragic chorus, is almost shocking: while nothing can be more
 certain than that the poet is a poet only in that he beholds himself
 surrounded by forms which live and act before him, into the innermost
 being of which his glance penetrates. By reason of a strange defeat in
 our capacities, we modern men are apt to represent to ourselves the
 sthetic proto-phenomenon as too complex and abstract. For the true
 poet the metaphor is not a rhetorical figure, but a vicarious image
 which actually hovers before him in place of a concept. The character
 is not for him an aggregate composed of a studied collection of
 particular traits, but an irrepressibly live person appearing before
 his eyes, and differing only from the corresponding vision of the
 painter by its ever continued life and action. Why is it that Homer
 sketches much more vividly[7] than all the other poets? Because he
 contemplates[8] much more. We talk so abstractly about poetry, because
 we are all wont to be bad poets. At bottom the sthetic phenomenon is
 simple: let a man but have the faculty of perpetually seeing a lively
 play and of constantly living surrounded by hosts of spirits, then he
 is a poet: let him but feel the impulse to transform himself and to
 talk from out the bodies and souls of others, then he is a dramatist.
 
 The Dionysian excitement is able to impart to a whole mass of men
 this artistic faculty of seeing themselves surrounded by such a host
 of spirits, with whom they know themselves to be inwardly one. This
 function of the tragic chorus is the _dramatic_ proto-phenomenon: to
 see one's self transformed before one's self, and then to act as if
 one had really entered into another body, into another character. This
 function stands at the beginning of the development of the drama.
 Here we have something different from the rhapsodist, who does not
 blend with his pictures, but only sees them, like the painter, with
 contemplative eye outside of him; here we actually have a surrender
 of the individual by his entering into another nature. Moreover this
 phenomenon appears in the form of an epidemic: a whole throng feels
 itself metamorphosed in this wise. Hence it is that the dithyramb is
 essentially different from every other variety of the choric song. The
 virgins, who with laurel twigs in their hands solemnly proceed to
 the temple of Apollo and sing a processional hymn, remain what they
 are and retain their civic names: the dithyrambic chorus is a chorus
 of transformed beings, whose civic past and social rank are totally
 forgotten: they have become the timeless servants of their god that
 live aloof from all the spheres of society. Every other variety of
 the choric lyric of the Hellenes is but an enormous enhancement of
 the Apollonian unit-singer: while in the dithyramb we have before us
 a community of unconscious actors, who mutually regard themselves as
 transformed among one another.
 
 This enchantment is the prerequisite of all dramatic art. In this
 enchantment the Dionysian reveller sees himself as a satyr, _and as
 satyr he in turn beholds the god,_ that is, in his transformation he
 sees a new vision outside him as the Apollonian consummation of his
 state. With this new vision the drama is complete.
 
 According to this view, we must understand Greek tragedy as the
 Dionysian chorus, which always disburdens itself anew in an Apollonian
 world of pictures. The choric parts, therefore, with which tragedy is
 interlaced, are in a manner the mother-womb of the entire so-called
 dialogue, that is, of the whole stage-world, of the drama proper. In
 several successive outbursts does this primordial basis of tragedy beam
 forth the vision of the drama, which is a dream-phenomenon throughout,
 and, as such, epic in character: on the other hand, however, as
 objectivation of a Dionysian state, it does not represent the
 Apollonian redemption in appearance, but, conversely, the dissolution
 of the individual and his unification with primordial existence.
 Accordingly, the drama is the Apollonian embodiment of Dionysian
 perceptions and influences, and is thereby separated from the epic as
 by an immense gap.
 
 The _chorus_ of Greek tragedy, the symbol of the mass of the people
 moved by Dionysian excitement, is thus fully explained by our
 conception of it as here set forth. Whereas, being accustomed to the
 position of a chorus on the modern stage, especially an operatic
 chorus, we could never comprehend why the tragic chorus of the Greeks
 should be older, more primitive, indeed, more important than the
 "action" proper,--as has been so plainly declared by the voice of
 tradition; whereas, furthermore, we could not reconcile with this
 traditional paramount importance and primitiveness the fact of the
 chorus' being composed only of humble, ministering beings; indeed, at
 first only of goatlike satyrs; whereas, finally, the orchestra before
 the scene was always a riddle to us; we have learned to comprehend at
 length that the scene, together with the action, was fundamentally
 and originally conceived only as a _vision,_ that the only reality
 is just the chorus, which of itself generates the vision and speaks
 thereof with the entire symbolism of dancing, tone, and word. This
 chorus beholds in the vision its lord and master Dionysus, and is thus
 for ever the _serving_ chorus: it sees how he, the god, suffers and
 glorifies himself, and therefore does not itself _act_. But though its
 attitude towards the god is throughout the attitude of ministration,
 this is nevertheless the highest expression, the Dionysian expression
 of _Nature,_ and therefore, like Nature herself, the chorus utters
 oracles and wise sayings when transported with enthusiasm: as
 _fellow-sufferer_ it is also the _sage_ proclaiming truth from out the
 heart of Nature. Thus, then, originates the fantastic figure, which
 seems so shocking, of the wise and enthusiastic satyr, who is at the
 same time "the dumb man" in contrast to the god: the image of Nature
 and her strongest impulses, yea, the symbol of Nature, and at the same
 time the herald of her art and wisdom: musician, poet, dancer, and
 visionary in one person.
 
 Agreeably to this view, and agreeably to tradition, _Dionysus,_ the
 proper stage-hero and focus of vision, is not at first actually present
 in the oldest period of tragedy, but is only imagined as present:
 _i.e.,_ tragedy is originally only "chorus" and not "drama." Later
 on the attempt is made to exhibit the god as real and to display the
 visionary figure together with its glorifying encirclement before the
 eyes of all; it is here that the "drama" in the narrow sense of the
 term begins. To the dithyrambic chorus is now assigned the task of
 exciting the minds of the hearers to such a pitch of Dionysian frenzy,
 that, when the tragic hero appears on the stage, they do not behold
 in him, say, the unshapely masked man, but a visionary figure, born
 as it were of their own ecstasy. Let us picture Admetes thinking in
 profound meditation of his lately departed wife Alcestis, and quite
 consuming himself in spiritual contemplation thereof--when suddenly
 the veiled figure of a woman resembling her in form and gait is led
 towards him: let us picture his sudden trembling anxiety, his agitated
 comparisons, his instinctive conviction--and we shall have an analogon
 to the sensation with which the spectator, excited to Dionysian frenzy,
 saw the god approaching on the stage, a god with whose sufferings he
 had already become identified. He involuntarily transferred the entire
 picture of the god, fluttering magically before his soul, to this
 masked figure and resolved its reality as it were into a phantasmal
 unreality. This is the Apollonian dream-state, in which the world
 of day is veiled, and a new world, clearer, more intelligible, more
 striking than the former, and nevertheless more shadowy, is ever born
 anew in perpetual change before our eyes. We accordingly recognise in
 tragedy a thorough-going stylistic contrast: the language, colour,
 flexibility and dynamics of the dialogue fall apart in the Dionysian
 lyrics of the chorus on the one hand, and in the Apollonian dream-world
 of the scene on the other, into entirely separate spheres of
 expression. The Apollonian appearances, in which Dionysus objectifies
 himself, are no longer "ein ewiges Meer, ein wechselnd Weben, ein
 glhend Leben,"[9] as is the music of the chorus, they are no longer
 the forces merely felt, but not condensed into a picture, by which
 the inspired votary of Dionysus divines the proximity of his god: the
 clearness and firmness of epic form now speak to him from the scene,
 Dionysus now no longer speaks through forces, but as an epic hero,
 almost in the language of Homer.
 
 
 [5] Zuschauer.
 
 [6] Schauer.
 
 [7] Anschaulicher.
 
 [8] Anschaut.
 
 [9] An eternal sea, A weaving, flowing, Life, all glowing.
 _Faust,_ trans. of Bayard Taylor.--TR.
 
 
 
 9.
 
 
 Whatever rises to the surface in the dialogue of the Apollonian part
 of Greek tragedy, appears simple, transparent, beautiful. In this
 sense the dialogue is a copy of the Hellene, whose nature reveals
 itself in the dance, because in the dance the greatest energy is merely
 potential, but betrays itself nevertheless in flexible and vivacious
 movements. The language of the Sophoclean heroes, for instance,
 surprises us by its Apollonian precision and clearness, so that we at
 once imagine we see into the innermost recesses of their being, and
 marvel not a little that the way to these recesses is so short. But
 if for the moment we disregard the character of the hero which rises
 to the surface and grows visible--and which at bottom is nothing but
 the light-picture cast on a dark wall, that is, appearance through and
 through,--if rather we enter into the myth which projects itself in
 these bright mirrorings, we shall of a sudden experience a phenomenon
 which bears a reverse relation to one familiar in optics. When, after
 a vigorous effort to gaze into the sun, we turn away blinded, we have
 dark-coloured spots before our eyes as restoratives, so to speak;
 while, on the contrary, those light-picture phenomena of the Sophoclean
 hero,--in short, the Apollonian of the mask,--are the necessary
 productions of a glance into the secret and terrible things of nature,
 as it were shining spots to heal the eye which dire night has seared.
 Only in this sense can we hope to be able to grasp the true meaning of
 the serious and significant notion of "Greek cheerfulness"; while of
 course we encounter the misunderstood notion of this cheerfulness, as
 resulting from a state of unendangered comfort, on all the ways and
 paths of the present time.
 
 The most sorrowful figure of the Greek stage, the hapless _dipus,_
 was understood by Sophocles as the noble man, who in spite of his
 wisdom was destined to error and misery, but nevertheless through
 his extraordinary sufferings ultimately exerted a magical, wholesome
 influence on all around him, which continues effective even after
 his death. The noble man does not sin; this is what the thoughtful
 poet wishes to tell us: all laws, all natural order, yea, the moral
 world itself, may be destroyed through his action, but through this
 very action a higher magic circle of influences is brought into play,
 which establish a new world on the ruins of the old that has been
 overthrown. This is what the poet, in so far as he is at the same time
 a religious thinker, wishes to tell us: as poet, he shows us first of
 all a wonderfully complicated legal mystery, which the judge slowly
 unravels, link by link, to his own destruction. The truly Hellenic
 delight at this dialectical loosening is so great, that a touch of
 surpassing cheerfulness is thereby communicated to the entire play,
 which everywhere blunts the edge of the horrible presuppositions of the
 procedure. In the "dipus at Colonus" we find the same cheerfulness,
 elevated, however, to an infinite transfiguration: in contrast to
 the aged king, subjected to an excess of misery, and exposed solely
 as a _sufferer_ to all that befalls him, we have here a supermundane
 cheerfulness, which descends from a divine sphere and intimates to
 us that in his purely passive attitude the hero attains his highest
 activity, the influence of which extends far beyond his life, while
 his earlier conscious musing and striving led him only to passivity.
 Thus, then, the legal knot of the fable of dipus, which to mortal
 eyes appears indissolubly entangled, is slowly unravelled--and the
 profoundest human joy comes upon us in the presence of this divine
 counterpart of dialectics. If this explanation does justice to the
 poet, it may still be asked whether the substance of the myth is
 thereby exhausted; and here it turns out that the entire conception
 of the poet is nothing but the light-picture which healing nature
 holds up to us after a glance into the abyss. dipus, the murderer of
 his father, the husband of his mother, dipus, the interpreter of the
 riddle of the Sphinx! What does the mysterious triad of these deeds
 of destiny tell us? There is a primitive popular belief, especially
 in Persia, that a wise Magian can be born only of incest: which
 we have forthwith to interpret to ourselves with reference to the
 riddle-solving and mother-marrying dipus, to the effect that when
 the boundary of the present and future, the rigid law of individuation
 and, in general, the intrinsic spell of nature, are broken by prophetic
 and magical powers, an extraordinary counter-naturalness--as, in this
 case, incest--must have preceded as a cause; for how else could one
 force nature to surrender her secrets but by victoriously opposing her,
 _i.e.,_ by means of the Unnatural? It is this intuition which I see
 imprinted in the awful triad of the destiny of dipus: the very man
 who solves the riddle of nature--that double-constituted Sphinx--must
 also, as the murderer of his father and husband of his mother, break
 the holiest laws of nature. Indeed, it seems as if the myth sought to
 whisper into our ears that wisdom, especially Dionysian wisdom, is
 an unnatural abomination, and that whoever, through his knowledge,
 plunges nature into an abyss of annihilation, must also experience
 the dissolution of nature in himself. "The sharpness of wisdom turns
 round upon the sage: wisdom is a crime against nature": such terrible
 expressions does the myth call out to us: but the Hellenic poet touches
 like a sunbeam the sublime and formidable Memnonian statue of the myth,
 so that it suddenly begins to sound--in Sophoclean melodies.
 
 With the glory of passivity I now contrast the glory of activity which
 illuminates the _Prometheus_ of schylus. That which schylus the
 thinker had to tell us here, but which as a poet he only allows us to
 surmise by his symbolic picture, the youthful Goethe succeeded in
 disclosing to us in the daring words of his Prometheus:--
 
     "Hier sitz' ich, forme Menschen
     Nach meinem Bilde,
     Ein Geschlecht, das mir gleich sei,
     Zu leiden, zu weinen,
     Zu geniessen und zu freuen sich,
     Und dein nicht zu achten,
     Wie ich!"[10]
 
 Man, elevating himself to the rank of the Titans, acquires his culture
 by his own efforts, and compels the gods to unite with him, because
 in his self-sufficient wisdom he has their existence and their limits
 in his hand. What is most wonderful, however, in this Promethean
 form, which according to its fundamental conception is the specific
 hymn of impiety, is the profound schylean yearning for _justice_:
 the untold sorrow of the bold "single-handed being" on the one hand,
 and the divine need, ay, the foreboding of a twilight of the gods, on
 the other, the power of these two worlds of suffering constraining
 to reconciliation, to metaphysical oneness--all this suggests most
 forcibly the central and main position of the schylean view of
 things, which sees Moira as eternal justice enthroned above gods and
 men. In view of the astonishing boldness with which schylus places the
 Olympian world on his scales of justice, it must be remembered that
 the deep-minded Greek had an immovably firm substratum of metaphysical
 thought in his mysteries, and that all his sceptical paroxysms could
 be discharged upon the Olympians. With reference to these deities,
 the Greek artist, in particular, had an obscure feeling as to mutual
 dependency: and it is just in the Prometheus of schylus that this
 feeling is symbolised. The Titanic artist found in himself the
 daring belief that he could create men and at least destroy Olympian
 deities: namely, by his superior wisdom, for which, to be sure, he had
 to atone by eternal suffering. The splendid "can-ing" of the great
 genius, bought too cheaply even at the price of eternal suffering,
 the stern pride of the _artist_: this is the essence and soul of
 schylean poetry, while Sophocles in his dipus preludingly strikes up
 the victory-song of the _saint_. But even this interpretation which
 schylus has given to the myth does not fathom its astounding depth of
 terror; the fact is rather that the artist's delight in unfolding, the
 cheerfulness of artistic creating bidding defiance to all calamity,
 is but a shining stellar and nebular image reflected in a black sea
 of sadness. The tale of Prometheus is an original possession of the
 entire Aryan family of races, and documentary evidence of their
 capacity for the profoundly tragic; indeed, it is not improbable that
 this myth has the same characteristic significance for the Aryan
 race that the myth of the fall of man has for the Semitic, and that
 there is a relationship between the two myths like that of brother and
 sister. The presupposition of the Promethean myth is the transcendent
 value which a nave humanity attach to _fire_ as the true palladium
 of every ascending culture: that man, however, should dispose at will
 of this fire, and should not receive it only as a gift from heaven,
 as the igniting lightning or the warming solar flame, appeared to the
 contemplative primordial men as crime and robbery of the divine nature.
 And thus the first philosophical problem at once causes a painful,
 irreconcilable antagonism between man and God, and puts as it were
 a mass of rock at the gate of every culture. The best and highest
 that men can acquire they obtain by a crime, and must now in their
 turn take upon themselves its consequences, namely the whole flood of
 sufferings and sorrows with which the offended celestials _must_ visit
 the nobly aspiring race of man: a bitter reflection, which, by the
 _dignity_ it confers on crime, contrasts strangely with the Semitic
 myth of the fall of man, in which curiosity, beguilement, seducibility,
 wantonness,--in short, a whole series of pre-eminently feminine
 passions,--were regarded as the origin of evil. What distinguishes
 the Aryan representation is the sublime view of _active sin_ as the
 properly Promethean virtue, which suggests at the same time the ethical
 basis of pessimistic tragedy as the _justification_ of human evil--of
 human guilt as well as of the suffering incurred thereby. The misery in
 the essence of things--which the contemplative Aryan is not disposed
 to explain away--the antagonism in the heart of the world, manifests
 itself to him as a medley of different worlds, for instance, a Divine
 and a human world, each of which is in the right individually, but
 as a separate existence alongside of another has to suffer for its
 individuation. With the heroic effort made by the individual for
 universality, in his attempt to pass beyond the bounds of individuation
 and become the _one_ universal being, he experiences in himself the
 primordial contradiction concealed in the essence of things, _i.e.,_
 he trespasses and suffers. Accordingly crime[11] is understood by
 the Aryans to be a man, sin[12] by the Semites a woman; as also, the
 original crime is committed by man, the original sin by woman. Besides,
 the witches' chorus says:
 
     "Wir nehmen das nicht so genau:
     Mit tausend Schritten macht's die Frau;
     Doch wie sie auch sich eilen kann
     Mit einem Sprunge macht's der Mann."[13]
 
 He who understands this innermost core of the tale of
 Prometheus--namely the necessity of crime imposed on the titanically
 striving individual--will at once be conscious of the un-Apollonian
 nature of this pessimistic representation: for Apollo seeks to pacify
 individual beings precisely by drawing boundary lines between them,
 and by again and again calling attention thereto, with his requirements
 of self-knowledge and due proportion, as the holiest laws of the
 universe. In order, however, to prevent the form from congealing to
 Egyptian rigidity and coldness in consequence of this Apollonian
 tendency, in order to prevent the extinction of the motion of the
 entire lake in the effort to prescribe to the individual wave its path
 and compass, the high tide of the Dionysian tendency destroyed from
 time to time all the little circles in which the one-sided Apollonian
 "will" sought to confine the Hellenic world. The suddenly swelling
 tide of the Dionysian then takes the separate little wave-mountains of
 individuals on its back, just as the brother of Prometheus, the Titan
 Atlas, does with the earth. This Titanic impulse, to become as it were
 the Atlas of all individuals, and to carry them on broad shoulders
 higher and higher, farther and farther, is what the Promethean and the
 Dionysian have in common. In this respect the schylean Prometheus is
 a Dionysian mask, while, in the afore-mentioned profound yearning for
 justice, schylus betrays to the intelligent observer his paternal
 descent from Apollo, the god of individuation and of the boundaries
 of justice. And so the double-being of the schylean Prometheus, his
 conjoint Dionysian and Apollonian nature, might be thus expressed in
 an abstract formula: "Whatever exists is alike just and unjust, and
 equally justified in both."
 
     Das ist deine Welt! Das heisst eine Welt![14]
 
 
 [10]
 
     "Here sit I, forming mankind
     In my image,
     A race resembling me,--
     To sorrow and to weep,
     To taste, to hold, to enjoy,
     And not have need of thee,
     As I!"
 
 (Translation in Hckel's _History of the Evolution of Man._)
 
 [11] _Der_ Frevel.]
 
 [12] _Die_ Snde.
 
 [13]
 
     We do not measure with such care:
     Woman in thousand steps is there,
     But howsoe'er she hasten may.
     Man in one leap has cleared the way.
     _Faust,_ trans. of Bayard Taylor.--TR.
 
 
 [14] This is thy world, and what a world!--_Faust._
 
 
 
 10.
 
 
 It is an indisputable tradition that Greek tragedy in its earliest
 form had for its theme only the sufferings of Dionysus, and that for
 some time the only stage-hero therein was simply Dionysus himself.
 With the same confidence, however, we can maintain that not until
 Euripides did Dionysus cease to be the tragic hero, and that in fact
 all the celebrated figures of the Greek stage--Prometheus, dipus,
 etc.--are but masks of this original hero, Dionysus. The presence of a
 god behind all these masks is the one essential cause of the typical
 "ideality," so oft exciting wonder, of these celebrated figures. Some
 one, I know not whom, has maintained that all individuals are comic as
 individuals and are consequently un-tragic: from whence it might be
 inferred that the Greeks in general _could_ not endure individuals on
 the tragic stage. And they really seem to have had these sentiments:
 as, in general, it is to be observed that the Platonic discrimination
 and valuation of the "idea" in contrast to the "eidolon," the image,
 is deeply rooted in the Hellenic being. Availing ourselves of Plato's
 terminology, however, we should have to speak of the tragic figures of
 the Hellenic stage somewhat as follows. The one truly real Dionysus
 appears in a multiplicity of forms, in the mask of a fighting hero
 and entangled, as it were, in the net of an individual will. As the
 visibly appearing god now talks and acts, he resembles an erring,
 striving, suffering individual: and that, in general, he _appears_
 with such epic precision and clearness, is due to the dream-reading
 Apollo, who reads to the chorus its Dionysian state through this
 symbolic appearance. In reality, however, this hero is the suffering
 Dionysus of the mysteries, a god experiencing in himself the sufferings
 of individuation, of whom wonderful myths tell that as a boy he was
 dismembered by the Titans and has been worshipped in this state
 as Zagreus:[15] whereby is intimated that this dismemberment, the
 properly Dionysian _suffering,_ is like a transformation into air,
 water, earth, and fire, that we must therefore regard the state of
 individuation as the source and primal cause of all suffering, as
 something objectionable in itself. From the smile of this Dionysus
 sprang the Olympian gods, from his tears sprang man. In his existence
 as a dismembered god, Dionysus has the dual nature of a cruel
 barbarised demon, and a mild pacific ruler. But the hope of the epopts
 looked for a new birth of Dionysus, which we have now to conceive of in
 anticipation as the end of individuation: it was for this coming third
 Dionysus that the stormy jubilation-hymns of the epopts resounded. And
 it is only this hope that sheds a ray of joy upon the features of a
 world torn asunder and shattered into individuals: as is symbolised in
 the myth by Demeter sunk in eternal sadness, who _rejoices_ again only
 when told that she may _once more_ give birth to Dionysus In the views
 of things here given we already have all the elements of a profound and
 pessimistic contemplation of the world, and along with these we have
 the _mystery doctrine of tragedy_: the fundamental knowledge of the
 oneness of all existing things, the consideration of individuation as
 the primal cause of evil, and art as the joyous hope that the spell of
 individuation may be broken, as the augury of a restored oneness.
 
 It has already been intimated that the Homeric epos is the poem
 of Olympian culture, wherewith this culture has sung its own song
 of triumph over the terrors of the war of the Titans. Under the
 predominating influence of tragic poetry, these Homeric myths are now
 reproduced anew, and show by this metempsychosis that meantime the
 Olympian culture also has been vanquished by a still deeper view of
 things. The haughty Titan Prometheus has announced to his Olympian
 tormentor that the extremest danger will one day menace his rule,
 unless he ally with him betimes. In schylus we perceive the terrified
 Zeus, apprehensive of his end, in alliance with the Titan. Thus, the
 former age of the Titans is subsequently brought from Tartarus once
 more to the light of day. The philosophy of wild and naked nature
 beholds with the undissembled mien of truth the myths of the Homeric
 world as they dance past: they turn pale, they tremble before the
 lightning glance of this goddess--till the powerful fist[16] of
 the Dionysian artist forces them into the service of the new deity.
 Dionysian truth takes over the entire domain of myth as symbolism of
 _its_ knowledge, which it makes known partly in the public cult of
 tragedy and partly in the secret celebration of the dramatic mysteries,
 always, however, in the old mythical garb. What was the power, which
 freed Prometheus from his vultures and transformed the myth into a
 vehicle of Dionysian wisdom? It is the Heracleian power of music:
 which, having reached its highest manifestness in tragedy, can invest
 myths with a new and most profound significance, which we have already
 had occasion to characterise as the most powerful faculty of music. For
 it is the fate of every myth to insinuate itself into the narrow limits
 of some alleged historical reality, and to be treated by some later
 generation as a solitary fact with historical claims: and the Greeks
 were already fairly on the way to restamp the whole of their mythical
 juvenile dream sagaciously and arbitrarily into a historico-pragmatical
 _juvenile history._ For this is the manner in which religions are
 wont to die out: when of course under the stern, intelligent eyes of
 an orthodox dogmatism, the mythical presuppositions of a religion are
 systematised as a completed sum of historical events, and when one
 begins apprehensively to defend the credibility of the myth, while at
 the same time opposing all continuation of their natural vitality and
 luxuriance; when, accordingly, the feeling for myth dies out, and its
 place is taken by the claim of religion to historical foundations.
 This dying myth was now seized by the new-born genius of Dionysian
 music, in whose hands it bloomed once more, with such colours as it
 had never yet displayed, with a fragrance that awakened a longing
 anticipation of a metaphysical world. After this final effulgence
 it collapses, its leaves wither, and soon the scoffing Lucians of
 antiquity catch at the discoloured and faded flowers which the winds
 carry off in every direction. Through tragedy the myth attains its
 profoundest significance, its most expressive form; it rises once more
 like a wounded hero, and the whole surplus of vitality, together with
 the philosophical calmness of the Dying, burns in its eyes with a last
 powerful gleam.
 
 What meantest thou, oh impious Euripides, in seeking once more to
 enthral this dying one? It died under thy ruthless hands: and then
 thou madest use of counterfeit, masked myth, which like the ape of
 Heracles could only trick itself out in the old finery. And as myth
 died in thy hands, so also died the genius of music; though thou
 couldst covetously plunder all the gardens of music--thou didst only
 realise a counterfeit, masked music. And because thou hast forsaken
 Dionysus. Apollo hath also forsaken thee; rout up all the passions from
 their haunts and conjure them into thy sphere, sharpen and polish a
 sophistical dialectics for the speeches of thy heroes--thy very heroes
 have only counterfeit, masked passions, and speak only counterfeit,
 masked music.
 
 
 [15] See article by Mr. Arthur Symons in _The Academy,_ 30th
 August 1902.
 
 [16] Die mchtige Faust.--Cf. _Faust,_ Chorus of
 Spirits.--TR.
 
 
 
 11.
 
 
 Greek tragedy had a fate different from that of all her older sister
 arts: she died by suicide, in consequence of an irreconcilable
 conflict; accordingly she died tragically, while they all passed away
 very calmly and beautifully in ripe old age. For if it be in accordance
 with a happy state of things to depart this life without a struggle,
 leaving behind a fair posterity, the closing period of these older
 arts exhibits such a happy state of things: slowly they sink out of
 sight, and before their dying eyes already stand their fairer progeny,
 who impatiently lift up their heads with courageous mien. The death of
 Greek tragedy, on the other hand, left an immense void, deeply felt
 everywhere. Even as certain Greek sailors in the time of Tiberius once
 heard upon a lonesome island the thrilling cry, "great Pan is dead": so
 now as it were sorrowful wailing sounded through the Hellenic world:
 "Tragedy is dead! Poetry itself has perished with her! Begone, begone,
 ye stunted, emaciated epigones! Begone to Hades, that ye may for once
 eat your fill of the crumbs of your former masters!"
 
 But when after all a new Art blossomed forth which revered tragedy as
 her ancestress and mistress, it was observed with horror that she did
 indeed bear the features of her mother, but those very features the
 latter had exhibited in her long death-struggle. It was _Euripides_ who
 fought this death-struggle of tragedy; the later art is known as the
 _New Attic Comedy._ In it the degenerate form of tragedy lived on as a
 monument of the most painful and violent death of tragedy proper.
 
 This connection between the two serves to explain the passionate
 attachment to Euripides evinced by the poets of the New Comedy, and
 hence we are no longer surprised at the wish of Philemon, who would
 have got himself hanged at once, with the sole design of being able
 to visit Euripides in the lower regions: if only he could be assured
 generally that the deceased still had his wits. But if we desire, as
 briefly as possible, and without professing to say aught exhaustive on
 the subject, to characterise what Euripides has in common with Menander
 and Philemon, and what appealed to them so strongly as worthy of
 imitation: it will suffice to say that the _spectator_ was brought upon
 the stage by Euripides. He who has perceived the material of which the
 Promethean tragic writers prior to Euripides formed their heroes, and
 how remote from their purpose it was to bring the true mask of reality
 on the stage, will also know what to make of the wholly divergent
 tendency of Euripides. Through him the commonplace individual forced
 his way from the spectators' benches to the stage itself; the mirror in
 which formerly only great and bold traits found expression now showed
 the painful exactness that conscientiously reproduces even the abortive
 lines of nature. Odysseus, the typical Hellene of the Old Art, sank,
 in the hands of the new poets, to the figure of the Grculus, who, as
 the good-naturedly cunning domestic slave, stands henceforth in the
 centre of dramatic interest. What Euripides takes credit for in the
 Aristophanean "Frogs," namely, that by his household remedies he freed
 tragic art from its pompous corpulency, is apparent above all in his
 tragic heroes. The spectator now virtually saw and heard his double on
 the Euripidean stage, and rejoiced that he could talk so well. But this
 joy was not all: one even learned of Euripides how to speak: he prides
 himself upon this in his contest with schylus: how the people have
 learned from him how to observe, debate, and draw conclusions according
 to the rules of art and with the cleverest sophistications. In general
 it may be said that through this revolution of the popular language he
 made the New Comedy possible. For it was henceforth no longer a secret,
 how--and with what saws--the commonplace could represent and express
 itself on the stage. Civic mediocrity, on which Euripides built all
 his political hopes, was now suffered to speak, while heretofore the
 demigod in tragedy and the drunken satyr, or demiman, in comedy, had
 determined the character of the language. And so the Aristophanean
 Euripides prides himself on having portrayed the common, familiar,
 everyday life and dealings of the people, concerning which all are
 qualified to pass judgment. If now the entire populace philosophises,
 manages land and goods with unheard-of circumspection, and conducts
 law-suits, he takes all the credit to himself, and glories in the
 splendid results of the wisdom with which he inoculated the rabble.
 
 It was to a populace prepared and enlightened in this manner that the
 New Comedy could now address itself, of which Euripides had become
 as it were the chorus-master; only that in this case the chorus of
 spectators had to be trained. As soon as this chorus was trained to
 sing in the Euripidean key, there arose that chesslike variety of the
 drama, the New Comedy, with its perpetual triumphs of cunning and
 artfulness. But Euripides--the chorus-master--was praised incessantly:
 indeed, people would have killed themselves in order to learn yet more
 from him, had they not known that tragic poets were quite as dead as
 tragedy. But with it the Hellene had surrendered the belief in his
 immortality; not only the belief in an ideal past, but also the belief
 in an ideal future. The saying taken from the well-known epitaph, "as
 an old man, frivolous and capricious," applies also to aged Hellenism.
 The passing moment, wit, levity, and caprice, are its highest deities;
 the fifth class, that of the slaves, now attains to power, at least in
 sentiment: and if we can still speak at all of "Greek cheerfulness,"
 it is the cheerfulness of the slave who has nothing of consequence to
 answer for, nothing great to strive for, and cannot value anything of
 the past or future higher than the present. It was this semblance of
 "Greek cheerfulness" which so revolted the deep-minded and formidable
 natures of the first four centuries of Christianity: this womanish
 flight from earnestness and terror, this cowardly contentedness with
 easy pleasure, was not only contemptible to them, but seemed to be a
 specifically anti-Christian sentiment. And we must ascribe it to its
 influence that the conception of Greek antiquity, which lived on for
 centuries, preserved with almost enduring persistency that peculiar
 hectic colour of cheerfulness--as if there had never been a Sixth
 Century with its birth of tragedy, its Mysteries, its Pythagoras and
 Heraclitus, indeed as if the art-works of that great period did not at
 all exist, which in fact--each by itself--can in no wise be explained
 as having sprung from the soil of such a decrepit and slavish love
 of existence and cheerfulness, and point to an altogether different
 conception of things as their source.
 
 The assertion made a moment ago, that Euripides introduced the
 spectator on the stage to qualify him the better to pass judgment on
 the drama, will make it appear as if the old tragic art was always
 in a false relation to the spectator: and one would be tempted to
 extol the radical tendency of Euripides to bring about an adequate
 relation between art-work and public as an advance on Sophocles. But,
 as things are, "public" is merely a word, and not at all a homogeneous
 and constant quantity. Why should the artist be under obligations to
 accommodate himself to a power whose strength is merely in numbers?
 And if by virtue of his endowments and aspirations he feels himself
 superior to every one of these spectators, how could he feel greater
 respect for the collective expression of all these subordinate
 capacities than for the relatively highest-endowed individual
 spectator? In truth, if ever a Greek artist treated his public
 throughout a long life with presumptuousness and self-sufficiency,
 it was Euripides, who, even when the masses threw themselves at his
 feet, with sublime defiance made an open assault on his own tendency,
 the very tendency with which he had triumphed over the masses. If this
 genius had had the slightest reverence for the pandemonium of the
 public, he would have broken down long before the middle of his career
 beneath the weighty blows of his own failures. These considerations
 here make it obvious that our formula--namely, that Euripides brought
 the spectator upon the stage, in order to make him truly competent to
 pass judgment--was but a provisional one, and that we must seek for a
 deeper understanding of his tendency. Conversely, it is undoubtedly
 well known that schylus and Sophocles, during all their lives, indeed,
 far beyond their lives, enjoyed the full favour of the people, and that
 therefore in the case of these predecessors of Euripides the idea of
 a false relation between art-work and public was altogether excluded.
 What was it that thus forcibly diverted this highly gifted artist, so
 incessantly impelled to production, from the path over which shone the
 sun of the greatest names in poetry and the cloudless heaven of popular
 favour? What strange consideration for the spectator led him to defy,
 the spectator? How could he, owing to too much respect for the public
 --dis-respect the public?
 
 Euripides--and this is the solution of the riddle just propounded--felt
 himself, as a poet, undoubtedly superior to the masses, but not to
 two of his spectators: he brought the masses upon the stage; these
 two spectators he revered as the only competent judges and masters
 of his art: in compliance with their directions and admonitions, he
 transferred the entire world of sentiments, passions, and experiences,
 hitherto present at every festival representation as the invisible
 chorus on the spectators' benches, into the souls of his stage-heroes;
 he yielded to their demands when he also sought for these new
 characters the new word and the new tone; in their voices alone he
 heard the conclusive verdict on his work, as also the cheering promise
 of triumph when he found himself condemned as usual by the justice of
 the public.
 
 Of these two, spectators the one is--Euripides himself, Euripides _as
 thinker,_ not as poet. It might be said of him, that his unusually
 large fund of critical ability, as in the case of Lessing, if it did
 not create, at least constantly fructified a productively artistic
 collateral impulse. With this faculty, with all the clearness and
 dexterity of his critical thought, Euripides had sat in the theatre and
 striven to recognise in the masterpieces of his great predecessors, as
 in faded paintings, feature and feature, line and line. And here had
 happened to him what one initiated in the deeper arcana of schylean
 tragedy must needs have expected: he observed something incommensurable
 in every feature and in every line, a certain deceptive distinctness
 and at the same time an enigmatic profundity, yea an infinitude, of
 background. Even the clearest figure had always a comet's tail attached
 to it, which seemed to suggest the uncertain and the inexplicable.
 The same twilight shrouded the structure of the drama, especially the
 significance of the chorus. And how doubtful seemed the solution of
 the ethical problems to his mind! How questionable the treatment of
 the myths! How unequal the distribution of happiness and misfortune!
 Even in the language of the Old Tragedy there was much that was
 objectionable to him, or at least enigmatical; he found especially
 too much pomp for simple affairs, too many tropes and immense things
 for the plainness of the characters. Thus he sat restlessly pondering
 in the theatre, and as a spectator he acknowledged to himself that he
 did not understand his great predecessors. If, however, he thought the
 understanding the root proper of all enjoyment and productivity, he had
 to inquire and look about to see whether any one else thought as he
 did, and also acknowledged this incommensurability. But most people,
 and among them the best individuals, had only a distrustful smile for
 him, while none could explain why the great masters were still in the
 right in face of his scruples and objections. And in this painful
 condition he found _that other spectator,_ who did not comprehend,
 and therefore did not esteem, tragedy. In alliance with him he could
 venture, from amid his lonesomeness, to begin the prodigious struggle
 against the art of schylus and Sophocles--not with polemic writings,
 but as a dramatic poet, who opposed _his own_ conception of tragedy to
 the traditional one.
 
 
 
 12.
 
 
 Before we name this other spectator, let us pause here a moment in
 order to recall our own impression, as previously described, of the
 discordant and incommensurable elements in the nature of schylean
 tragedy. Let us think of our own astonishment at the _chorus_ and
 the _tragic hero_ of that type of tragedy, neither of which we could
 reconcile with our practices any more than with tradition--till we
 rediscovered this duplexity itself as the origin and essence of Greek
 tragedy, as the expression of two interwoven artistic impulses, _the
 Apollonian and the Dionysian_.
 
 To separate this primitive and all-powerful Dionysian element from
 tragedy, and to build up a new and purified form of tragedy on the
 basis of a non-Dionysian art, morality, and conception of things--such
 is the tendency of Euripides which now reveals itself to us in a clear
 light.
 
 In a myth composed in the eve of his life, Euripides himself most
 urgently propounded to his contemporaries the question as to the
 value and signification of this tendency. Is the Dionysian entitled
 to exist at all? Should it not be forcibly rooted out of the Hellenic
 soil? Certainly, the poet tells us, if only it were possible: but the
 god Dionysus is too powerful; his most intelligent adversary--like
 Pentheus in the "Bacch"--is unwittingly enchanted by him, and
 in this enchantment meets his fate. The judgment of the two old
 sages, Cadmus and Tiresias, seems to be also the judgment of the
 aged poet: that the reflection of the wisest individuals does not
 overthrow old popular traditions, nor the perpetually propagating
 worship of Dionysus, that in fact it behoves us to display at least a
 diplomatically cautious concern in the presence of such strange forces:
 where however it is always possible that the god may take offence
 at such lukewarm participation, and finally change the diplomat--in
 this case Cadmus--into a dragon. This is what a poet tells us, who
 opposed Dionysus with heroic valour throughout a long life--in order
 finally to wind up his career with a glorification of his adversary,
 and with suicide, like one staggering from giddiness, who, in order
 to escape the horrible vertigo he can no longer endure, casts himself
 from a tower. This tragedy--the Bacch--is a protest against the
 practicability of his own tendency; alas, and it has already been
 put into practice! The surprising thing had happened: when the poet
 recanted, his tendency had already conquered. Dionysus had already
 been scared from the tragic stage, and in fact by a demonic power
 which spoke through Euripides. Even Euripides was, in a certain sense,
 only a mask: the deity that spoke through him was neither Dionysus nor
 Apollo, but an altogether new-born demon, called _Socrates._ This is
 the new antithesis: the Dionysian and the Socratic, and the art-work of
 Greek tragedy was wrecked on it. What if even Euripides now seeks to
 comfort us by his recantation? It is of no avail: the most magnificent
 temple lies in ruins. What avails the lamentation of the destroyer,
 and his confession that it was the most beautiful of all temples? And
 even that Euripides has been changed into a dragon as a punishment by
 the art-critics of all ages--who could be content with this wretched
 compensation?
 
 Let us now approach this _Socratic_ tendency with which Euripides
 combated and vanquished schylean tragedy.
 
 We must now ask ourselves, what could be the ulterior aim of the
 Euripidean design, which, in the highest ideality of its execution,
 would found drama exclusively on the non-Dionysian? What other form of
 drama could there be, if it was not to be born of the womb of music, in
 the mysterious twilight of the Dionysian? Only _the dramatised epos:_
 in which Apollonian domain of art the _tragic_ effect is of course
 unattainable. It does not depend on the subject-matter of the events
 here represented; indeed, I venture to assert that it would have been
 impossible for Goethe in his projected "Nausikaa" to have rendered
 tragically effective the suicide of the idyllic being with which he
 intended to complete the fifth act; so extraordinary is the power of
 the epic-Apollonian representation, that it charms, before our eyes,
 the most terrible things by the joy in appearance and in redemption
 through appearance. The poet of the dramatised epos cannot completely
 blend with his pictures any more than the epic rhapsodist. He is still
 just the calm, unmoved embodiment of Contemplation whose wide eyes see
 the picture _before_ them. The actor in this dramatised epos still
 remains intrinsically rhapsodist: the consecration of inner dreaming
 is on all his actions, so that he is never wholly an actor.
 
 How, then, is the Euripidean play related to this ideal of the
 Apollonian drama? Just as the younger rhapsodist is related to the
 solemn rhapsodist of the old time. The former describes his own
 character in the Platonic "Ion" as follows: "When I am saying anything
 sad, my eyes fill with tears; when, however, what I am saying is awful
 and terrible, then my hair stands on end through fear, and my heart
 leaps." Here we no longer observe anything of the epic absorption
 in appearance, or of the unemotional coolness of the true actor,
 who precisely in his highest activity is wholly appearance and joy
 in appearance. Euripides is the actor with leaping heart, with hair
 standing on end; as Socratic thinker he designs the plan, as passionate
 actor he executes it. Neither in the designing nor in the execution is
 he an artist pure and simple. And so the Euripidean drama is a thing
 both cool and fiery, equally capable of freezing and burning; it is
 impossible for it to attain the Apollonian, effect of the epos, while,
 on the other hand, it has severed itself as much as possible from
 Dionysian elements, and now, in order to act at all, it requires new
 stimulants, which can no longer lie within the sphere of the two unique
 art-impulses, the Apollonian and the Dionysian. The stimulants are
 cool, paradoxical _thoughts_, in place of Apollonian intuitions--and
 fiery _passions_--in place Dionysean ecstasies; and in fact, thoughts
 and passions very realistically copied, and not at all steeped in the
 ether of art.
 
 Accordingly, if we have perceived this much, that Euripides did not
 succeed in establishing the drama exclusively on the Apollonian, but
 that rather his non-Dionysian inclinations deviated into a naturalistic
 and inartistic tendency, we shall now be able to approach nearer to
 the character _sthetic Socratism._ supreme law of which reads about
 as follows: "to be beautiful everything must be intelligible," as
 the parallel to the Socratic proposition, "only the knowing is one
 virtuous." With this canon in his hands Euripides measured all the
 separate elements of the drama, and rectified them according to his
 principle: the language, the characters, the dramaturgic structure, and
 the choric music. The poetic deficiency and retrogression, which we
 are so often wont to impute to Euripides in comparison with Sophoclean
 tragedy, is for the most part the product of this penetrating critical
 process, this daring intelligibility. The Euripidian _prologue_ may
 serve us as an example of the productivity of this, rationalistic
 method. Nothing could be more opposed to the technique of our stage
 than the prologue in the drama of Euripides. For a single person to
 appear at the outset of the play telling us who he is, what precedes
 the action, what has happened thus far, yea, what will happen in
 the course of the play, would be designated by a modern playwright
 as a wanton and unpardonable abandonment of the effect of suspense.
 Everything that is about to happen is known beforehand; who then
 cares to wait for it actually to happen?--considering, moreover, that
 here there is not by any means the exciting relation of a predicting
 dream to a reality taking place later on. Euripides speculated quite
 differently. The effect of tragedy never depended on epic suspense, on
 the fascinating uncertainty as to what is to happen now and afterwards:
 but rather on the great rhetoro-lyric scenes in which the passion and
 dialectics of the chief hero swelled to a broad and mighty stream.
 Everything was arranged for pathos, not for action: and whatever
 was not arranged for pathos was regarded as objectionable. But what
 interferes most with the hearer's pleasurable satisfaction in such
 scenes is a missing link, a gap in the texture of the previous history.
 So long as the spectator has to divine the meaning of this or that
 person, or the presuppositions of this or that conflict of inclinations
 and intentions, his complete absorption in the doings and sufferings
 of the chief persons is impossible, as is likewise breathless
 fellow-feeling and fellow-fearing. The schyleo-Sophoclean tragedy
 employed the most ingenious devices in the first scenes to place in
 the hands of the spectator as if by chance all the threads requisite
 for understanding the whole: a trait in which that noble artistry is
 approved, which as it were masks the _inevitably_ formal, and causes
 it to appear as something accidental. But nevertheless Euripides
 thought he observed that during these first scenes the spectator was
 in a strange state of anxiety to make out the problem of the previous
 history, so that the poetic beauties and pathos of the exposition
 were lost to him. Accordingly he placed the prologue even before the
 exposition, and put it in the mouth of a person who could be trusted:
 some deity had often as it were to guarantee the particulars of the
 tragedy to the public and remove every doubt as to the reality of the
 myth: as in the case of Descartes, who could only prove the reality
 of the empiric world by an appeal to the truthfulness of God and His
 inability to utter falsehood. Euripides makes use of the same divine
 truthfulness once more at the close of his drama, in order to ensure to
 the public the future of his heroes; this is the task of the notorious
 _deus ex machina._ Between the preliminary and the additional epic
 spectacle there is the dramatico-lyric present, the "drama" proper.
 
 Thus Euripides as a poet echoes above all his own conscious
 knowledge; and it is precisely on this account that he occupies such
 a notable position in the history of Greek art. With reference to his
 critico-productive activity, he must often have felt that he ought
 to actualise in the drama the words at the beginning of the essay of
 Anaxagoras: "In the beginning all things were mixed together; then
 came the understanding and created order." And if Anaxagoras with his
 "" seemed like the first sober person among nothing but drunken
 philosophers, Euripides may also have conceived his relation to
 the other tragic poets under a similar figure. As long as the sole
 ruler and disposer of the universe, the , was still excluded
 from artistic activity, things were all mixed together in a chaotic,
 primitive mess;--it is thus Euripides was obliged to think, it is thus
 he was obliged to condemn the "drunken" poets as the first "sober" one
 among them. What Sophocles said of schylus, that he did what was
 right, though unconsciously, was surely not in the mind of Euripides:
 who would have admitted only thus much, that schylus, _because_ he
 wrought unconsciously, did what was wrong. So also the divine Plato
 speaks for the most part only ironically of the creative faculty of the
 poet, in so far as it is not conscious insight, and places it on a par
 with the gift of the soothsayer and dream-interpreter; insinuating that
 the poet is incapable of composing until he has become unconscious and
 reason has deserted him. Like Plato, Euripides undertook to show to the
 world the reverse of the "unintelligent" poet; his sthetic principle
 that "to be beautiful everything must be known" is, as I have said,
 the parallel to the Socratic "to be good everything must be known."
 Accordingly we may regard Euripides as the poet of sthetic Socratism.
 Socrates, however, was that _second spectator_ who did not comprehend
 and therefore did not esteem the Old Tragedy; in alliance with him
 Euripides ventured to be the herald of a new artistic activity. If,
 then, the Old Tragedy was here destroyed, it follows that sthetic
 Socratism was the murderous principle; but in so far as the struggle is
 directed against the Dionysian element in the old art, we recognise in
 Socrates the opponent of Dionysus, the new Orpheus who rebels against
 Dionysus; and although destined to be torn to pieces by the Mnads of
 the Athenian court, yet puts to flight the overpowerful god himself,
 who, when he fled from Lycurgus, the king of Edoni, sought refuge in
 the depths of the ocean--namely, in the mystical flood of a secret
 cult which gradually overspread the earth.
 
 
 
 13.
 
 
 That Socrates stood in close relationship to Euripides in the tendency
 of his teaching, did not escape the notice of contemporaneous
 antiquity; the most eloquent expression of this felicitous insight
 being the tale current in Athens, that Socrates was accustomed to help
 Euripides in poetising. Both names were mentioned in one breath by the
 adherents of the "good old time," whenever they came to enumerating the
 popular agitators of the day: to whose influence they attributed the
 fact that the old Marathonian stalwart capacity of body and soul was
 more and more being sacrificed to a dubious enlightenment, involving
 progressive degeneration of the physical and mental powers. It is in
 this tone, half indignantly and half contemptuously, that Aristophanic
 comedy is wont to speak of both of them--to the consternation of
 modern men, who would indeed be willing enough to give up Euripides,
 but cannot suppress their amazement that Socrates should appear in
 Aristophanes as the first and head _sophist,_ as the mirror and epitome
 of all sophistical tendencies; in connection with which it offers the
 single consolation of putting Aristophanes himself in the pillory, as a
 rakish, lying Alcibiades of poetry. Without here defending the profound
 instincts of Aristophanes against such attacks, I shall now indicate,
 by means of the sentiments of the time, the close connection between
 Socrates and Euripides. With this purpose in view, it is especially to
 be remembered that Socrates, as an opponent of tragic art, did not
 ordinarily patronise tragedy, but only appeared among the spectators
 when a new play of Euripides was performed. The most noted thing,
 however, is the close juxtaposition of the two names in the Delphic
 oracle, which designated Socrates as the wisest of men, but at the same
 time decided that the second prize in the contest of wisdom was due to
 Euripides.
 
 Sophocles was designated as the third in this scale of rank; he who
 could pride himself that, in comparison with schylus, he did what
 was right, and did it, moreover, because he _knew_ what was right. It
 is evidently just the degree of clearness of this _knowledge,_ which
 distinguishes these three men in common as the three "knowing ones" of
 their age.
 
 The most decisive word, however, for this new and unprecedented
 esteem of knowledge and insight was spoken by Socrates when he
 found that he was the only one who acknowledged to himself that he
 _knew nothing_ while in his critical pilgrimage through Athens, and
 calling on the greatest statesmen, orators, poets, and artists, he
 discovered everywhere the conceit of knowledge. He perceived, to his
 astonishment, that all these celebrities were without a proper and
 accurate insight, even with regard to their own callings, and practised
 them only by instinct. "Only by instinct": with this phrase we touch
 upon the heart and core of the Socratic tendency. Socratism condemns
 therewith existing art as well as existing ethics; wherever Socratism
 turns its searching eyes it beholds the lack of insight and the
 power of illusion; and from this lack infers the inner perversity and
 objectionableness of existing conditions. From this point onwards,
 Socrates believed that he was called upon to, correct existence;
 and, with an air of disregard and superiority, as the precursor
 of an altogether different culture, art, and morality, he enters
 single-handed into a world, of which, if we reverently touched the hem,
 we should count it our greatest happiness.
 
 Here is the extraordinary hesitancy which always seizes upon us with
 regard to Socrates, and again and again invites us to ascertain the
 sense and purpose of this most questionable phenomenon of antiquity.
 Who is it that ventures single-handed to disown the Greek character,
 which, as Homer, Pindar, and schylus, as Phidias, as Pericles, as
 Pythia and Dionysus, as the deepest abyss and the highest height, is
 sure of our wondering admiration? What demoniac power is it which would
 presume to spill this magic draught in the dust? What demigod is it to
 whom the chorus of spirits of the noblest of mankind must call out:
 "Weh! Weh! Du hast sie zerstrt, die schne Welt, mit mchtiger Faust;
 sie strzt, sie zerfllt!"[17]
 
 A key to the character of Socrates is presented to us by the surprising
 phenomenon designated as the "daimonion" of Socrates. In special
 circumstances, when his gigantic intellect began to stagger, he got
 a secure support in the utterances of a divine voice which then
 spake to him. This voice, whenever it comes, always _dissuades._
 In this totally abnormal nature instinctive wisdom only appears in
 order to hinder the progress of conscious perception here and there.
 While in all productive men it is instinct which is the creatively
 affirmative force, consciousness only comporting itself critically
 and dissuasively; with Socrates it is instinct which becomes critic;
 it is consciousness which becomes creator--a perfect monstrosity
 _per defectum!_ And we do indeed observe here a monstrous _defectus_
 of all mystical aptitude, so that Socrates might be designated as
 the specific _non-mystic,_ in whom the logical nature is developed,
 through a superfoetation, to the same excess as instinctive wisdom
 is developed in the mystic. On the other hand, however, the logical
 instinct which appeared in Socrates was absolutely prohibited from
 turning against itself; in its unchecked flow it manifests a native
 power such as we meet with, to our shocking surprise, only among the
 very greatest instinctive forces. He who has experienced even a breath
 of the divine navet and security of the Socratic course of life in
 the Platonic writings, will also feel that the enormous driving-wheel
 of logical Socratism is in motion, as it were, _behind_ Socrates, and
 that it must be viewed through Socrates as through a shadow. And
 that he himself had a boding of this relation is apparent from the
 dignified earnestness with which he everywhere, and even before his
 judges, insisted on his divine calling. To refute him here was really
 as impossible as to approve of his instinct-disintegrating influence.
 In view of this indissoluble conflict, when he had at last been brought
 before the forum of the Greek state, there was only one punishment
 demanded, namely exile; he might have been sped across the borders as
 something thoroughly enigmatical, irrubricable and inexplicable, and so
 posterity would have been quite unjustified in charging the Athenians
 with a deed of ignominy. But that the sentence of death, and not mere
 exile, was pronounced upon him, seems to have been brought about by
 Socrates himself, with perfect knowledge of the circumstances, and
 without the natural fear of death: he met his death with the calmness
 with which, according to the description of Plato, he leaves the
 symposium at break of day, as the last of the revellers, to begin a new
 day; while the sleepy companions remain behind on the benches and the
 floor, to dream of Socrates, the true eroticist. _The dying Socrates_
 became the new ideal of the noble Greek youths,--an ideal they had
 never yet beheld,--and above all, the typical Hellenic youth, Plato,
 prostrated himself before this scene with all the fervent devotion of
 his visionary soul.
 
 
 [17]
 
     Woe! Woe!
     Thou hast it destroyed,
     The beautiful world;
     With powerful fist;
     In ruin 'tis hurled!
     _Faust,_ trans. of Bayard Taylor.--TR.
 
 
 
 14.
 
 
 Let us now imagine the one great Cyclopean eye of Socrates fixed on
 tragedy, that eye in which the fine frenzy of artistic enthusiasm had
 never glowed--let us think how it was denied to this eye to gaze with
 pleasure into the Dionysian abysses--what could it not but see in the
 "sublime and greatly lauded" tragic art, as Plato called it? Something
 very absurd, with causes that seemed to be without effects, and
 effects apparently without causes; the whole, moreover, so motley and
 diversified that it could not but be repugnant to a thoughtful mind, a
 dangerous incentive, however, to sensitive and irritable souls. We know
 what was the sole kind of poetry which he comprehended: the _sopian
 fable_: and he did this no doubt with that smiling complaisance with
 which the good honest Gellert sings the praise of poetry in the fable
 of the bee and the hen:--
 
     "Du siehst an mir, wozu sie ntzt,
     Dem, der nicht viel Verstand besitzt,
     Die Wahrheit durch ein Bild zu sagen."[18]
 
 But then it seemed to Socrates that tragic art did not even "tell the
 truth": not to mention the fact that it addresses itself to him who
 "hath but little wit"; consequently not to the philosopher: a twofold
 reason why it should be avoided. Like Plato, he reckoned it among the
 seductive arts which only represent the agreeable, not the useful, and
 hence he required of his disciples abstinence and strict separation
 from such unphilosophical allurements; with such success that the
 youthful tragic poet Plato first of all burned his poems to be able to
 become a scholar of Socrates. But where unconquerable native capacities
 bore up against the Socratic maxims, their power, together with the
 momentum of his mighty character, still sufficed to force poetry itself
 into new and hitherto unknown channels.
 
 An instance of this is the aforesaid Plato: he, who in the condemnation
 of tragedy and of art in general certainly did not fall short of
 the nave cynicism of his master, was nevertheless constrained by
 sheer artistic necessity to create a form of art which is inwardly
 related even to the then existing forms of art which he repudiated.
 Plato's main objection to the old art--that it is the imitation of
 a phantom,[19] and hence belongs to a sphere still lower than the
 empiric world--could not at all apply to the new art: and so we find
 Plato endeavouring to go beyond reality and attempting to represent
 the idea which underlies this pseudo-reality. But Plato, the thinker,
 thereby arrived by a roundabout road just at the point where he had
 always been at home as poet, and from which Sophocles and all the old
 artists had solemnly protested against that objection. If tragedy
 absorbed into itself all the earlier varieties of art, the same
 could again be said in an unusual sense of Platonic dialogue, which,
 engendered by a mixture of all the then existing forms and styles,
 hovers midway between narrative, lyric and drama, between prose and
 poetry, and has also thereby broken loose from the older strict law
 of unity of linguistic form; a movement which was carried still
 farther by the _cynic_ writers, who in the most promiscuous style,
 oscillating to and fro betwixt prose and metrical forms, realised also
 the literary picture of the "raving Socrates" whom they were wont to
 represent in life. Platonic dialogue was as it were the boat in which
 the shipwrecked ancient poetry saved herself together with all her
 children: crowded into a narrow space and timidly obsequious to the
 one steersman, Socrates, they now launched into a new world, which
 never tired of looking at the fantastic spectacle of this procession.
 In very truth, Plato has given to all posterity the prototype of a new
 form of art, the prototype of the _novel_ which must be designated as
 the infinitely evolved sopian fable, in which poetry holds the same
 rank with reference to dialectic philosophy as this same philosophy
 held for many centuries with reference to theology: namely, the rank of
 _ancilla._ This was the new position of poetry into which Plato forced
 it under the pressure of the demon-inspired Socrates.
 
 Here _philosophic thought_ overgrows art and compels it to cling close
 to the trunk of dialectics. The _Apollonian_ tendency has chrysalised
 in the logical schematism; just as something analogous in the case
 of Euripides (and moreover a translation of the _Dionysian_ into the
 naturalistic emotion) was forced upon our attention. Socrates, the
 dialectical hero in Platonic drama, reminds us of the kindred nature
 of the Euripidean hero, who has to defend his actions by arguments and
 counter-arguments, and thereby so often runs the risk of forfeiting
 our tragic pity; for who could mistake the _optimistic_ element
 in the essence of dialectics, which celebrates a jubilee in every
 conclusion, and can breathe only in cool clearness and consciousness:
 the optimistic element, which, having once forced its way into tragedy,
 must gradually overgrow its Dionysian regions, and necessarily impel it
 to self-destruction--even to the death-leap into the bourgeois drama.
 Let us but realise the consequences of the Socratic maxims: "Virtue is
 knowledge; man only sins from ignorance; he who is virtuous is happy":
 these three fundamental forms of optimism involve the death of tragedy.
 For the virtuous hero must now be a dialectician; there must now be a
 necessary, visible connection between virtue and knowledge, between
 belief and morality; the transcendental justice of the plot in schylus
 is now degraded to the superficial and audacious principle of poetic
 justice with its usual _deus ex machina_.
 
 How does the _chorus,_ and, in general, the entire Dionyso-musical
 substratum of tragedy, now appear in the light of this new
 Socrato-optimistic stage-world? As something accidental, as a readily
 dispensable reminiscence of the origin of tragedy; while we have
 in fact seen that the chorus can be understood only as the cause of
 tragedy, and of the tragic generally. This perplexity with respect to
 the chorus first manifests itself in Sophocles--an important sign that
 the Dionysian basis of tragedy already begins to disintegrate with
 him. He no longer ventures to entrust to the chorus the main share
 of the effect, but limits its sphere to such an extent that it now
 appears almost co-ordinate with the actors, just as if it were elevated
 from the orchestra into the scene: whereby of course its character
 is completely destroyed, notwithstanding that Aristotle countenances
 this very theory of the chorus. This alteration of the position of
 the chorus, which Sophocles at any rate recommended by his practice,
 and, according to tradition, even by a treatise, is the first step
 towards the _annihilation_ of the chorus, the phases of which follow
 one another with alarming rapidity in Euripides, Agathon, and the New
 Comedy. Optimistic dialectics drives, _music_ out of tragedy with the
 scourge of its syllogisms: that is, it destroys the essence of tragedy,
 which can be explained only as a manifestation and illustration of
 Dionysian states, as the visible symbolisation of music, as the
 dream-world of Dionysian ecstasy.
 
 If, therefore, we are to assume an anti-Dionysian tendency operating
 even before Socrates, which received in him only an unprecedentedly
 grand expression, we must not shrink from the question as to what
 a phenomenon like that of Socrates indicates: whom in view of the
 Platonic dialogues we are certainly not entitled to regard as a purely
 disintegrating, negative power. And though there can be no doubt
 whatever that the most immediate effect of the Socratic impulse tended
 to the dissolution of Dionysian tragedy, yet a profound experience of
 Socrates' own life compels us to ask whether there is _necessarily_
 only an antipodal relation between Socratism and art, and whether the
 birth of an "artistic Socrates" is in general something contradictory
 in itself.
 
 For that despotic logician had now and then the feeling of a gap, or
 void, a sentiment of semi-reproach, as of a possibly neglected duty
 with respect to art. There often came to him, as he tells his friends
 in prison, one and the same dream-apparition, which kept constantly
 repeating to him: "Socrates, practise music." Up to his very last days
 he solaces himself with the opinion that his philosophising is the
 highest form of poetry, and finds it hard to believe that a deity will
 remind him of the "common, popular music." Finally, when in prison,
 he consents to practise also this despised music, in order thoroughly
 to unburden his conscience. And in this frame of mind he composes
 a poem on Apollo and turns a few sopian fables into verse. It was
 something similar to the demonian warning voice which urged him to
 these practices; it was because of his Apollonian insight that, like a
 barbaric king, he did not understand the noble image of a god and was
 in danger of sinning against a deity--through ignorance. The prompting
 voice of the Socratic dream-vision is the only sign of doubtfulness
 as to the limits of logical nature. "Perhaps "--thus he had to ask
 himself--"what is not intelligible to me is not therefore unreasonable?
 Perhaps there is a realm of wisdom from which the logician is banished?
 Perhaps art is even a necessary correlative of and supplement to
 science?"
 
 
 [18]
 
     In me thou seest its benefit,--
     To him who hath but little wit,
     Through parables to tell the truth.
 
 [19] Scheinbild = .--TR.
 
 
 
 15.
 
 
 In the sense of these last portentous questions it must now be
 indicated how the influence of Socrates (extending to the present
 moment, indeed, to all futurity) has spread over posterity like an
 ever-increasing shadow in the evening sun, and how this influence
 again and again necessitates a regeneration of _art,_--yea, of art
 already with metaphysical, broadest and profoundest sense,--and its own
 eternity guarantees also the eternity of art.
 
 Before this could be perceived, before the intrinsic dependence of
 every art on the Greeks, the Greeks from Homer to Socrates, was
 conclusively demonstrated, it had to happen to us with regard to these
 Greeks as it happened to the Athenians with regard to Socrates. Nearly
 every age and stage of culture has at some time or other sought with
 deep displeasure to free itself from the Greeks, because in their
 presence everything self-achieved, sincerely admired and apparently
 quite original, seemed all of a sudden to lose life and colour
 and shrink to an abortive copy, even to caricature. And so hearty
 indignation breaks forth time after time against this presumptuous
 little nation, which dared to designate as "barbaric" for all time
 everything not native: who are they, one asks one's self, who, though
 they possessed only an ephemeral historical splendour, ridiculously
 restricted institutions, a dubious excellence in their customs, and
 were even branded with ugly vices, yet lay claim to the dignity and
 singular position among the peoples to which genius is entitled among
 the masses. What a pity one has not been so fortunate as to find the
 cup of hemlock with which such an affair could be disposed of without
 ado: for all the poison which envy, calumny, and rankling resentment
 engendered within themselves have not sufficed to destroy that
 self-sufficient grandeur! And so one feels ashamed and afraid in the
 presence of the Greeks: unless one prize truth above all things, and
 dare also to acknowledge to one's self this truth, that the Greeks,
 as charioteers, hold in their hands the reins of our own and of
 every culture, but that almost always chariot and horses are of too
 poor material and incommensurate with the glory of their guides, who
 then will deem it sport to run such a team into an abyss: which they
 themselves clear with the leap of Achilles.
 
 In order to assign also to Socrates the dignity of such a leading
 position, it will suffice to recognise in him the type of an unheard-of
 form of existence, the type of the _theoretical man,_ with regard
 to whose meaning and purpose it will be our next task to attain
 an insight. Like the artist, the theorist also finds an infinite
 satisfaction in what _is_ and, like the former, he is shielded by this
 satisfaction from the practical ethics of pessimism with its lynx eyes
 which shine only in the dark. For if the artist in every unveiling
 of truth always cleaves with raptured eyes only to that which still
 remains veiled after the unveiling, the theoretical man, on the other
 hand, enjoys and contents himself with the cast-off veil, and finds
 the consummation of his pleasure in the process of a continuously
 successful unveiling through his own unaided efforts. There would
 have been no science if it had only been concerned about that _one_
 naked goddess and nothing else. For then its disciples would have been
 obliged to feel like those who purposed to dig a hole straight through
 the earth: each one of whom perceives that with the utmost lifelong
 exertion he is able to excavate only a very little of the enormous
 depth, which is again filled up before his eyes by the labours of his
 successor, so that a third man seems to do well when on his own account
 he selects a new spot for his attempts at tunnelling. If now some one
 proves conclusively that the antipodal goal cannot be attained in this
 direct way, who will still care to toil on in the old depths, unless he
 has learned to content himself in the meantime with finding precious
 stones or discovering natural laws? For that reason Lessing, the most
 honest theoretical man, ventured to say that he cared more for the
 search after truth than for truth itself: in saying which he revealed
 the fundamental secret of science, to the astonishment, and indeed,
 to the vexation of scientific men. Well, to be sure, there stands
 alongside of this detached perception, as an excess of honesty, if not
 of presumption, a profound _illusion_ which first came to the world
 in the person of Socrates, the imperturbable belief that, by means
 of the clue of causality, thinking reaches to the deepest abysses of
 being, and that thinking is able not only to perceive being but even
 to _correct_ it. This sublime metaphysical illusion is added as an
 instinct to science and again and again leads the latter to its limits,
 where it must change into _art; which is really the end, to be attained
 by this mechanism_.
 
 If we now look at Socrates in the light of this thought, he appears to
 us as the first who could not only live, but--what is far more--also
 die under the guidance of this instinct of science: and hence the
 picture of the _dying, Socrates_, as the man delivered from the fear of
 death by knowledge and argument, is the escutcheon, above the entrance
 to science which reminds every one of its mission, namely, to make
 existence appear to be comprehensible, and therefore to be justified:
 for which purpose, if arguments do not suffice, _myth_ also must be
 used, which I just now designated even as the necessary consequence,
 yea, as the end of science.
 
 He who once makes intelligible to himself how, after the death of
 Socrates, the mystagogue of science, one philosophical school succeeds
 another, like wave upon wave,--how an entirely unfore-shadowed
 universal development of the thirst for knowledge in the widest
 compass of the cultured world (and as the specific task for every
 one highly gifted) led science on to the high sea from which since
 then it has never again been able to be completely ousted; how
 through the universality of this movement a common net of thought
 was first stretched over the entire globe, with prospects, moreover,
 of conformity to law in an entire solar system;--he who realises all
 this, together with the amazingly high pyramid of our present-day
 knowledge, cannot fail to see in Socrates the turning-point and vortex
 of so-called universal history. For if one were to imagine the whole
 incalculable sum of energy which has been used up by that universal
 tendency,--employed, _not_ in the service of knowledge, but for the
 practical, _i.e.,_ egoistical ends of individuals and peoples,--then
 probably the instinctive love of life would be so much weakened in
 universal wars of destruction and incessant migrations of peoples,
 that, owing to the practice of suicide, the individual would perhaps
 feel the last remnant of a sense of duty, when, like the native of
 the Fiji Islands, as son he strangles his parents and, as friend, his
 friend: a practical pessimism which might even give rise to a horrible
 ethics of general slaughter out of pity--which, for the rest, exists
 and has existed wherever art in one form or another, especially as
 science and religion, has not appeared as a remedy and preventive of
 that pestilential breath.
 
 In view of this practical pessimism, Socrates is the archetype of
 the theoretical optimist, who in the above-indicated belief in the
 fathomableness of the nature of things, attributes to knowledge and
 perception the power of a universal medicine, and sees in error and
 evil. To penetrate into the depths of the nature of things, and to
 separate true perception from error and illusion, appeared to the
 Socratic man the noblest and even the only truly human calling: just as
 from the time of Socrates onwards the mechanism of concepts, judgments,
 and inferences was prized above all other capacities as the highest
 activity and the most admirable gift of nature. Even the sublimest
 moral acts, the stirrings of pity, of self-sacrifice, of heroism,
 and that tranquillity of soul, so difficult of attainment, which the
 Apollonian Greek called Sophrosyne, were derived by Socrates, and his
 like-minded successors up to the present day, from the dialectics of
 knowledge, and were accordingly designated as teachable. He who has
 experienced in himself the joy of a Socratic perception, and felt how
 it seeks to embrace, in constantly widening circles, the entire world
 of phenomena, will thenceforth find no stimulus which could urge him
 to existence more forcible than the desire to complete that conquest
 and to knit the net impenetrably close. To a person thus minded the
 Platonic Socrates then appears as the teacher of an entirely new form
 of "Greek cheerfulness" and felicity of existence, which seeks to
 discharge itself in actions, and will find its discharge for the most
 part in maieutic and pedagogic influences on noble youths, with a view
 to the ultimate production of genius.
 
 But now science, spurred on by its powerful illusion, hastens
 irresistibly to its limits, on which its optimism, hidden in the
 essence of logic, is wrecked. For the periphery of the circle of
 science has an infinite number of points, and while there is still no
 telling how this circle can ever be completely measured, yet the noble
 and gifted man, even before the middle of his career, inevitably comes
 into contact with those extreme points of the periphery where he stares
 at the inexplicable. When he here sees to his dismay how logic coils
 round itself at these limits and finally bites its own tail--then the
 new form of perception discloses itself, namely _tragic perception,_
 which, in order even to be endured, requires art as a safeguard and
 remedy.
 
 If, with eyes strengthened and refreshed at the sight of the Greeks, we
 look upon the highest spheres of the world that surrounds us, we behold
 the avidity of the insatiate optimistic knowledge, of which Socrates is
 the typical representative, transformed into tragic resignation and the
 need of art: while, to be sure, this same avidity, in its lower stages,
 has to exhibit itself as antagonistic to art, and must especially have
 an inward detestation of Dionyso-tragic art, as was exemplified in the
 opposition of Socratism to schylean tragedy.
 
 Here then with agitated spirit we knock at the gates of the present and
 the future: will that "transforming" lead to ever new configurations
 of genius, and especially of the _music-practising Socrates_? Will the
 net of art which is spread over existence, whether under the name of
 religion or of science, be knit always more closely and delicately,
 or is it destined to be torn to shreds under the restlessly barbaric
 activity and whirl which is called "the present day"?--Anxious, yet
 not disconsolate, we stand aloof for a little while, as the spectators
 who are permitted to be witnesses of these tremendous struggles and
 transitions. Alas! It is the charm of these struggles that he who
 beholds them must also fight them!
 
 
 
 16.
 
 
 By this elaborate historical example we have endeavoured to make it
 clear that tragedy perishes as surely by evanescence of the spirit of
 music as it can be born only out of this spirit. In order to qualify
 the singularity of this assertion, and, on the other hand, to disclose
 the source of this insight of ours, we must now confront with clear
 vision the analogous phenomena of the present time; we must enter
 into the midst of these struggles, which, as I said just now, are
 being carried on in the highest spheres of our present world between
 the insatiate optimistic perception and the tragic need of art. In
 so doing I shall leave out of consideration all other antagonistic
 tendencies which at all times oppose art, especially tragedy, and which
 at present again extend their sway triumphantly, to such an extent that
 of the theatrical arts only the farce and the ballet, for example, put
 forth their blossoms, which perhaps not every one cares to smell, in
 tolerably rich luxuriance. I will speak only of the _Most Illustrious
 Opposition_ to the tragic conception of things--and by this I mean
 essentially optimistic science, with its ancestor Socrates at the head
 of it. Presently also the forces will be designated which seem to me
 to guarantee _a re-birth of tragedy_--and who knows what other blessed
 hopes for the German genius!
 
 Before we plunge into the midst of these struggles, let us array
 ourselves in the armour of our hitherto acquired knowledge. In
 contrast to all those who are intent on deriving the arts from one
 exclusive principle, as the necessary vital source of every work of
 art, I keep my eyes fixed on the two artistic deities of the Greeks,
 Apollo and Dionysus, and recognise in them the living and conspicuous
 representatives of _two_ worlds of art which differ in their intrinsic
 essence and in their highest aims. Apollo stands before me as the
 transfiguring genius of the _principium individuationis_ through
 which alone the redemption in appearance is to be truly attained,
 while by the mystical cheer of Dionysus the spell of individuation
 is broken, and the way lies open to the Mothers of Being,[20] to the
 innermost heart of things. This extraordinary antithesis, which opens
 up yawningly between plastic art as the Apollonian and music as the
 Dionysian art, has become manifest to only one of the great thinkers,
 to such an extent that, even without this key to the symbolism of the
 Hellenic divinities, he allowed to music a different character and
 origin in advance of all the other arts, because, unlike them, it is
 not a copy of the phenomenon, but a direct copy of the will itself, and
 therefore represents _the metaphysical of everything physical in the
 world_, the thing-in-itself of every phenomenon. (Schopenhauer, _Welt
 als Wille und Vorstellung,_ I. 310.) To this most important perception
 of sthetics (with which, taken in a serious sense, sthetics properly
 commences), Richard Wagner, by way of confirmation of its eternal
 truth, affixed his seal, when he asserted in his _Beethoven_ that
 music must be judged according to sthetic principles quite different
 from those which apply to the plastic arts, and not, in general,
 according to the category of beauty: although an erroneous sthetics,
 inspired by a misled and degenerate art, has by virtue of the concept
 of beauty prevailing in the plastic domain accustomed itself to demand
 of music an effect analogous to that of the works of plastic art,
 namely the suscitating _delight in beautiful forms._ Upon perceiving
 this extraordinary antithesis, I felt a strong inducement to approach
 the essence of Greek tragedy, and, by means of it, the profoundest
 revelation of Hellenic genius: for I at last thought myself to be in
 possession of a charm to enable me--far beyond the phraseology of our
 usual sthetics--to represent vividly to my mind the primitive problem
 of tragedy: whereby such an astounding insight into the Hellenic
 character was afforded me that it necessarily seemed as if our proudly
 comporting classico-Hellenic science had thus far contrived to subsist
 almost exclusively on phantasmagoria and externalities.
 
 Perhaps we may lead up to this primitive problem with the question:
 what sthetic effect results when the intrinsically separate
 art-powers, the Apollonian and the Dionysian, enter into concurrent
 actions? Or, in briefer form: how is music related to image and
 concept?--Schopenhauer, whom Richard Wagner, with especial reference to
 this point, accredits with an unsurpassable clearness and perspicuity
 of exposition, expresses himself most copiously on the subject in
 the following passage which I shall cite here at full length[21]
 (_Welt als Wille und Vorstellung,_ I. p. 309): "According to all
 this, we may regard the phenomenal world, or nature, and music as
 two different expressions of the same thing,[20] which is therefore
 itself the only medium of the analogy between these two expressions,
 so that a knowledge of this medium is required in order to understand
 that analogy. Music, therefore, if regarded as an expression of the
 world, is in the highest degree a universal language, which is related
 indeed to the universality of concepts, much as these are related to
 the particular things. Its universality, however, is by no means the
 empty universality of abstraction, but of quite a different kind, and
 is united with thorough and distinct definiteness. In this respect it
 resembles geometrical figures and numbers, which are the universal
 forms of all possible objects of experience and applicable to them all
 _a priori_, and yet are not abstract but perceptiple and thoroughly
 determinate. All possible efforts, excitements and manifestations of
 will, all that goes on in the heart of man and that reason includes in
 the wide, negative concept of feeling, may be expressed by the infinite
 number of possible melodies, but always in the universality of mere
 form, without the material, always according to the thing-in-itself,
 not the phenomenon,--of which they reproduce the very soul and essence
 as it were, without the body. This deep relation which music bears to
 the true nature of all things also explains the fact that suitable
 music played to any scene, action, event, or surrounding seems to
 disclose to us its most secret meaning, and appears as the most
 accurate and distinct commentary upon it; as also the fact that whoever
 gives himself up entirely to the impression of a symphony seems to see
 all the possible events of life and the world take place in himself:
 nevertheless upon reflection he can find no likeness between the music
 and the things that passed before his mind. For, as we have said, music
 is distinguished from all the other arts by the fact that it is not a
 copy of the phenomenon, or, more accurately, the adequate objectivity
 of the will, but the direct copy of the will itself, and therefore
 represents the metaphysical of everything physical in the world, and
 the thing-in-itself of every phenomenon. We might, therefore, just as
 well call the world embodied music as embodied will: and this is the
 reason why music makes every picture, and indeed every scene of real
 life and of the world, at once appear with higher significance; all the
 more so, to be sure, in proportion as its melody is analogous to the
 inner spirit of the given phenomenon. It rests upon this that we are
 able to set a poem to music as a song, or a perceptible representation
 as a pantomime, or both as an opera. Such particular pictures of human
 life, set to the universal language of music, are never bound to it
 or correspond to it with stringent necessity, but stand to it only
 in the relation of an example chosen at will to a general concept.
 In the determinateness of the real they represent that which music
 expresses in the universality of mere form. For melodies are to a
 certain extent, like general concepts, an abstraction from the actual.
 This actual world, then, the world of particular things, affords the
 object of perception, the special and the individual, the particular
 case, both to the universality of concepts and to the universality of
 the melodies. But these two universalities are in a certain respect
 opposed to each other; for the concepts contain only the forms, which
 are first of all abstracted from perception,--the separated outward
 shell of things, as it were,--and hence they are, in the strictest
 sense of the term, _abstracta_; music, on the other hand, gives the
 inmost kernel which precedes all forms, or the heart of things. This
 relation may be very well expressed in the language of the schoolmen,
 by saying: the concepts are the _universalia post rem,_ but music gives
 the _universalia ante rem,_ and the real world the _universalia in
 re._--But that in general a relation is possible between a composition
 and a perceptible representation rests, as we have said, upon the
 fact that both are simply different expressions of the same inner
 being of the world. When now, in the particular case, such a relation
 is actually given, that is to say, when the composer has been able to
 express in the universal language of music the emotions of will which
 constitute the heart of an event, then the melody of the song, the
 music of the opera, is expressive. But the analogy discovered by the
 composer between the two must have proceeded from the direct knowledge
 of the nature of the world unknown to his reason, and must not be an
 imitation produced with conscious intention by means of conceptions;
 otherwise the music does not express the inner nature of the will
 itself, but merely gives an inadequate imitation of its phenomenon: all
 specially imitative music does this."
 
 We have therefore, according to the doctrine of Schopenhauer, an
 immediate understanding of music as the language of the will, and
 feel our imagination stimulated to give form to this invisible and
 yet so actively stirred spirit-world which speaks to us, and prompted
 to embody it in an analogous example. On the other hand, image and
 concept, under the influence of a truly conformable music, acquire a
 higher significance. Dionysian art therefore is wont to exercise--two
 kinds of influences, on the Apollonian art-faculty: music firstly
 incites to the _symbolic intuition_ of Dionysian universality, and,
 secondly, it causes the symbolic image to stand forth _in its fullest
 significance._ From these facts, intelligible in themselves and not
 inaccessible to profounder observation, I infer the capacity of music
 to give birth to _myth,_ that is to say, the most significant exemplar,
 and precisely _tragic_ myth: the myth which speaks of Dionysian
 knowledge in symbols. In the phenomenon of the lyrist, I have set forth
 that in him music strives to express itself with regard to its nature
 in Apollonian images. If now we reflect that music in its highest
 potency must seek to attain also to its highest symbolisation, we must
 deem it possible that it also knows how to find the symbolic expression
 of its inherent Dionysian wisdom; and where shall we have to seek for
 this expression if not in tragedy and, in general, in the conception of
 the _tragic_?
 
 From the nature of art, as it is ordinarily conceived according to
 the single category of appearance and beauty, the tragic cannot be
 honestly deduced at all; it is only through the spirit of music that
 we understand the joy in the annihilation of the individual. For in
 the particular examples of such annihilation only is the eternal
 phenomenon of Dionysian art made clear to us, which gives expression
 to the will in its omnipotence, as it were, behind the _principium
 individuationis,_ the eternal life beyond all phenomena, and in
 spite of all annihilation. The metaphysical delight in the tragic
 is a translation of the instinctively unconscious Dionysian wisdom
 into the language of the scene: the hero, the highest manifestation
 of the will, is disavowed for our pleasure, because he is only
 phenomenon, and because the eternal life of the will is not affected
 by his annihilation. "We believe in eternal life," tragedy exclaims;
 while music is the proximate idea of this life. Plastic art has an
 altogether different object: here Apollo vanquishes the suffering of
 the individual by the radiant glorification of the _eternity of the
 phenomenon_; here beauty triumphs over the suffering inherent in life;
 pain is in a manner surreptitiously obliterated from the features of
 nature. In Dionysian art and its tragic symbolism the same nature
 speaks to us with its true undissembled voice: "Be as I am! Amidst the
 ceaseless change of phenomena the eternally creative primordial mother,
 eternally impelling to existence, self-satisfying eternally with this
 change of phenomena!"
 
 
 [20] Cf. _World and Will as Idea,_ I. p. 339, trans. by
 Haldane and Kemp.
 
 [21] That is "the will" as understood by Schopenhauer.--TR.
 
 
 
 17.
 
 
 Dionysian art, too, seeks to convince us of the eternal joy of
 existence: only we are to seek this joy not in phenomena, but behind
 phenomena. We are to perceive how all that comes into being must be
 ready for a sorrowful end; we are compelled to look into the terrors of
 individual existence--yet we are not to become torpid: a metaphysical
 comfort tears us momentarily from the bustle of the transforming
 figures. We are really for brief moments Primordial Being itself,
 and feel its indomitable desire for being and joy in existence; the
 struggle, the pain, the destruction of phenomena, now appear to us as
 something necessary, considering the surplus of innumerable forms of
 existence which throng and push one another into life, considering
 the exuberant fertility of the universal will. We are pierced by the
 maddening sting of these pains at the very moment when we have become,
 as it were, one with the immeasurable primordial joy in existence,
 and when we anticipate, in Dionysian ecstasy, the indestructibility
 and eternity of this joy. In spite of fear and pity, we are the happy
 living beings, not as individuals, but as the _one_ living being, with
 whose procreative joy we are blended.
 
 The history of the rise of Greek tragedy now tells us with luminous
 precision that the tragic art of the Greeks was really born of the
 spirit of music: with which conception we believe we have done justice
 for the first time to the original and most astonishing significance of
 the chorus. At the same time, however, we must admit that the import of
 tragic myth as set forth above never became transparent with sufficient
 lucidity to the Greek poets, let alone the Greek philosophers; their
 heroes speak, as it were, more superficially than they act; the myth
 does not at all find its adequate objectification in the spoken word.
 The structure of the scenes and the conspicuous images reveal a deeper
 wisdom than the poet himself can put into words and concepts: the same
 being also observed in Shakespeare, whose Hamlet, for instance, in an
 analogous manner talks more superficially than he acts, so that the
 previously mentioned lesson of Hamlet is to be gathered not from his
 words, but from a more profound contemplation and survey of the whole.
 With respect to Greek tragedy, which of course presents itself to us
 only as word-drama, I have even intimated that the incongruence between
 myth and expression might easily tempt us to regard it as shallower
 and less significant than it really is, and accordingly to postulate
 for it a more superficial effect than it must have had according to
 the testimony of the ancients: for how easily one forgets that what
 the word-poet did not succeed in doing, namely realising the highest
 spiritualisation and ideality of myth, he might succeed in doing
 every moment as creative musician! We require, to be sure, almost by
 philological method to reconstruct for ourselves the ascendency of
 musical influence in order to receive something of the incomparable
 comfort which must be characteristic of true tragedy. Even this musical
 ascendency, however, would only have been felt by us as such had
 we been Greeks: while in the entire development of Greek music--as
 compared with the infinitely richer music known and familiar to us--we
 imagine we hear only the youthful song of the musical genius intoned
 with a feeling of diffidence. The Greeks are, as the Egyptian priests
 say, eternal children, and in tragic art also they are only children
 who do not know what a sublime play-thing has originated under their
 hands and--is being demolished.
 
 That striving of the spirit of music for symbolic and mythical
 manifestation, which increases from the beginnings of lyric poetry to
 Attic tragedy, breaks off all of a sudden immediately after attaining
 luxuriant development, and disappears, as it were, from the surface
 of Hellenic art: while the Dionysian view of things born of this
 striving lives on in Mysteries and, in its strangest metamorphoses and
 debasements, does not cease to attract earnest natures. Will it not one
 day rise again as art out of its mystic depth?
 
 Here the question occupies us, whether the power by the counteracting
 influence of which tragedy perished, has for all time strength enough
 to prevent the artistic reawaking of tragedy and of the tragic view
 of things. If ancient tragedy was driven from its course by the
 dialectical desire for knowledge and the optimism of science, it might
 be inferred that there is an eternal conflict between _the theoretic_
 and _the tragic view of things,_ and only after the spirit of science
 has been led to its boundaries, and its claim to universal validity
 has been destroyed by the evidence of these boundaries, can we hope
 for a re-birth of tragedy: for which form of culture we should have to
 use the symbol _of the music-practising Socrates_ in the sense spoken
 of above. In this contrast, I understand by the spirit of science the
 belief which first came to light in the person of Socrates,--the belief
 in the fathomableness of nature and in knowledge as a panacea.
 
 He who recalls the immediate consequences of this restlessly
 onward-pressing spirit of science will realise at once that _myth_
 was annihilated by it, and that, in consequence of this annihilation,
 poetry was driven as a homeless being from her natural ideal soil.
 If we have rightly assigned to music the capacity to reproduce myth
 from itself, we may in turn expect to find the spirit of science on
 the path where it inimically opposes this mythopoeic power of music.
 This takes place in the development of the _New Attic Dithyramb,_ the
 music of which no longer expressed the inner essence, the will itself,
 but only rendered the phenomenon insufficiently, in an imitation by
 means of concepts; from which intrinsically degenerate music the truly
 musical natures turned away with the same repugnance that they felt
 for the art-destroying tendency of Socrates. The unerring instinct of
 Aristophanes surely did the proper thing when it comprised Socrates
 himself, the tragedy of Euripides, and the music of the new Dithyrambic
 poets in the same feeling of hatred, and perceived in all three
 phenomena the symptoms of a degenerate culture. By this New Dithyramb,
 music has in an outrageous manner been made the imitative portrait of
 phenomena, for instance, of a battle or a storm at sea, and has thus,
 of course, been entirely deprived of its mythopoeic power. For if it
 endeavours to excite our delight only by compelling us to seek external
 analogies between a vital or natural process and certain rhythmical
 figures and characteristic sounds of music; if our understanding is
 expected to satisfy itself with the perception of these analogies, we
 are reduced to a frame of mind in which the reception of the mythical
 is impossible; for the myth as a unique exemplar of generality
 and truth towering into the infinite, desires to be conspicuously
 perceived. The truly Dionysean music presents itself to us as such
 a general mirror of the universal will: the conspicuous event which
 is refracted in this mirror expands at once for our consciousness to
 the copy of an eternal truth. Conversely, such a conspicious event is
 at once divested of every mythical character by the tone-painting
 of the New Dithyramb; music has here become a wretched copy of the
 phenomenon, and therefore infinitely poorer than the phenomenon itself:
 through which poverty it still further reduces even the phenomenon for
 our consciousness, so that now, for instance, a musically imitated
 battle of this sort exhausts itself in marches, signal-sounds, etc.,
 and our imagination is arrested precisely by these superficialities.
 Tone-painting is therefore in every respect the counterpart of true
 music with its mythopoeic power: through it the phenomenon, poor in
 itself, is made still poorer, while through an isolated Dionysian music
 the phenomenon is evolved and expanded into a picture of the world.
 It was an immense triumph of the non-Dionysian spirit, when, in the
 development of the New Dithyramb, it had estranged music from itself
 and reduced it to be the slave of phenomena. Euripides, who, albeit in
 a higher sense, must be designated as a thoroughly unmusical nature,
 is for this very reason a passionate adherent of the New Dithyrambic
 Music, and with the liberality of a freebooter employs all its
 effective turns and mannerisms.
 
 In another direction also we see at work the power of this
 un-Dionysian, myth-opposing spirit, when we turn our eyes to the
 prevalence of _character representation_ and psychological refinement
 from Sophocles onwards. The character must no longer be expanded into
 an eternal type, but, on the contrary, must operate individually
 through artistic by-traits and shadings, through the nicest precision
 of all lines, in such a manner that the spectator is in general no
 longer conscious of the myth, but of the mighty nature-myth and the
 imitative power of the artist. Here also we observe the victory of
 the phenomenon over the Universal, and the delight in the particular
 quasi-anatomical preparation; we actually breathe the air of a
 theoretical world, in which scientific knowledge is valued more highly
 than the artistic reflection of a universal law. The movement along
 the line of the representation of character proceeds rapidly: while
 Sophocles still delineates complete characters and employs myth for
 their refined development, Euripides already delineates only prominent
 individual traits of character, which can express themselves in violent
 bursts of passion; in the New Attic Comedy, however, there are only
 masks with _one_ expression: frivolous old men, duped panders, and
 cunning slaves in untiring repetition. Where now is the mythopoeic
 spirit of music? What is still left now of music is either excitatory
 music or souvenir music, that is, either a stimulant for dull and
 used-up nerves, or tone-painting. As regards the former, it hardly
 matters about the text set to it: the heroes and choruses of Euripides
 are already dissolute enough when once they begin to sing; to what pass
 must things have come with his brazen successors?
 
 The new un-Dionysian spirit, however, manifests itself most clearly in
 the _dnouements_ of the new dramas. In the Old Tragedy one could feel
 at the close the metaphysical comfort, without which the delight in
 tragedy cannot be explained at all; the conciliating tones from another
 world sound purest, perhaps, in the dipus at Colonus. Now that the
 genius of music has fled from tragedy, tragedy is, strictly speaking,
 dead: for from whence could one now draw the metaphysical comfort? One
 sought, therefore, for an earthly unravelment of the tragic dissonance;
 the hero, after he had been sufficiently tortured by fate, reaped a
 well-deserved reward through a superb marriage or divine tokens of
 favour. The hero had turned gladiator, on whom, after being liberally
 battered about and covered with wounds, freedom was occasionally
 bestowed. The _deus ex machina_ took the place of metaphysical comfort.
 I will not say that the tragic view of things was everywhere completely
 destroyed by the intruding spirit of the un-Dionysian: we only know
 that it was compelled to flee from art into the under-world as it were,
 in the degenerate form of a secret cult. Over the widest extent of the
 Hellenic character, however, there raged the consuming blast of this
 spirit, which manifests itself in the form of "Greek cheerfulness,"
 which we have already spoken of as a senile, unproductive love of
 existence; this cheerfulness is the counterpart of the splendid
 "navet" of the earlier Greeks, which, according to the characteristic
 indicated above, must be conceived as the blossom of the Apollonian
 culture growing out of a dark abyss, as the victory which the Hellenic
 will, through its mirroring of beauty, obtains over suffering and the
 wisdom of suffering. The noblest manifestation of that other form of
 "Greek cheerfulness," the Alexandrine, is the cheerfulness of the
 _theoretical man_: it exhibits the same symptomatic characteristics as
 I have just inferred concerning the spirit of the un-Dionysian:--it
 combats Dionysian wisdom and art, it seeks to dissolve myth, it
 substitutes for metaphysical comfort an earthly consonance, in fact, a
 _deus ex machina_ of its own, namely the god of machines and crucibles,
 that is, the powers of the genii of nature recognised and employed in
 the service of higher egoism; it believes in amending the world by
 knowledge, in guiding life by science, and that it can really confine
 the individual within a narrow sphere of solvable problems, where he
 cheerfully says to life: "I desire thee: it is worth while to know
 thee."
 
 
 
 18.
 
 
 It is an eternal phenomenon: the avidious will can always, by means
 of an illusion spread over things, detain its creatures in life
 and compel them to live on. One is chained by the Socratic love of
 knowledge and the vain hope of being able thereby to heal the eternal
 wound of existence; another is ensnared by art's seductive veil of
 beauty fluttering before his eyes; still another by the metaphysical
 comfort that eternal life flows on indestructibly beneath the whirl of
 phenomena: to say nothing of the more ordinary and almost more powerful
 illusions which the will has always at hand. These three specimens of
 illusion are on the whole designed only for the more nobly endowed
 natures, who in general feel profoundly the weight and burden of
 existence, and must be deluded into forgetfulness of their displeasure
 by exquisite stimulants. All that we call culture is made up of these
 stimulants; and, according to the proportion of the ingredients, we
 have either a specially _Socratic_ or _artistic_ or _tragic culture_:
 or, if historical exemplifications are wanted, there is either an
 Alexandrine or a Hellenic or a Buddhistic culture.
 
 Our whole modern world is entangled in the meshes of Alexandrine
 culture, and recognises as its ideal the _theorist_ equipped with
 the most potent means of knowledge, and labouring in the service of
 science, of whom the archetype and progenitor is Socrates. All our
 educational methods have originally this ideal in view: every other
 form of existence must struggle onwards wearisomely beside it, as
 something tolerated, but not intended. In an almost alarming manner the
 cultured man was here found for a long time only in the form of the
 scholar: even our poetical arts have been forced to evolve from learned
 imitations, and in the main effect of the rhyme we still recognise the
 origin of our poetic form from artistic experiments with a non-native
 and thoroughly learned language. How unintelligible must _Faust,_ the
 modern cultured man, who is in himself intelligible, have appeared to a
 true Greek,--Faust, storming discontentedly through all the faculties,
 devoted to magic and the devil from a desire for knowledge, whom we
 have only to place alongside of Socrates for the purpose of comparison,
 in order to see that modern man begins to divine the boundaries of
 this Socratic love of perception and longs for a coast in the wide
 waste of the ocean of knowledge. When Goethe on one occasion said to
 Eckermann with reference to Napoleon: "Yes, my good friend, there is
 also a productiveness of deeds," he reminded us in a charmingly nave
 manner that the non-theorist is something incredible and astounding to
 modern man; so that the wisdom of Goethe is needed once more in order
 to discover that such a surprising form of existence is comprehensible,
 nay even pardonable.
 
 Now, we must not hide from ourselves what is concealed in the heart
 of this Socratic culture: Optimism, deeming itself absolute! Well, we
 must not be alarmed if the fruits of this optimism ripen,--if society,
 leavened to the very lowest strata by this kind of culture, gradually
 begins to tremble through wanton agitations and desires, if the belief
 in the earthly happiness of all, if the belief in the possibility of
 such a general intellectual culture is gradually transformed into the
 threatening demand for such an Alexandrine earthly happiness, into
 the conjuring of a Euripidean _deus ex machina._ Let us mark this
 well: the Alexandrine culture requires a slave class, to be able to
 exist permanently: but, in its optimistic view of life, it denies the
 necessity of such a class, and consequently, when the effect of its
 beautifully seductive and tranquillising utterances about the "dignity
 of man" and the "dignity of labour" is spent, it gradually drifts
 towards a dreadful destination. There is nothing more terrible than
 a barbaric slave class, who have learned to regard their existence
 as an injustice, and now prepare to take vengeance, not only for
 themselves, but for all generations. In the face of such threatening
 storms, who dares to appeal with confident spirit to our pale and
 exhausted religions, which even in their foundations have degenerated
 into scholastic religions?--so that myth, the necessary prerequisite
 of every religion, is already paralysed everywhere, and even in this
 domain the optimistic spirit--which we have just designated as the
 annihilating germ of society--has attained the mastery.
 
 While the evil slumbering in the heart of theoretical culture gradually
 begins to disquiet modern man, and makes him anxiously ransack the
 stores of his experience for means to avert the danger, though not
 believing very much in these means; while he, therefore, begins to
 divine the consequences his position involves: great, universally
 gifted natures have contrived, with an incredible amount of thought, to
 make use of the apparatus of science itself, in order to point out the
 limits and the relativity of knowledge generally, and thus definitely
 to deny the claim of science to universal validity and universal ends:
 with which demonstration the illusory notion was for the first time
 recognised as such, which pretends, with the aid of causality, to be
 able to fathom the innermost essence of things. The extraordinary
 courage and wisdom of _Kant_ and _Schopenhauer_ have succeeded in
 gaining the most, difficult, victory, the victory over the optimism
 hidden in the essence of logic, which optimism in turn is the basis of
 our culture. While this optimism, resting on apparently unobjectionable
 _terna veritates,_ believed in the intelligibility and solvability of
 all the riddles of the world, and treated space, time, and causality
 as totally unconditioned laws of the most universal validity, Kant, on
 the other hand, showed that these served in reality only to elevate the
 mere phenomenon, the work of My, to the sole and highest reality,
 putting it in place of the innermost and true essence of things, thus
 making the actual knowledge of this essence impossible, that is,
 according to the expression of Schopenhauer, to lull the dreamer still
 more soundly asleep (_Welt als Wille und Vorstellung,_ I. 498). With
 this knowledge a culture is inaugurated which I venture to designate as
 a tragic culture; the most important characteristic of which is that
 wisdom takes the place of science as the highest end,--wisdom, which,
 uninfluenced by the seductive distractions of the sciences, turns
 with unmoved eye to the comprehensive view of the world, and seeks to
 apprehend therein the eternal suffering as its own with sympathetic
 feelings of love. Let us imagine a rising generation with this
 undauntedness of vision, with this heroic desire for the prodigious,
 let us imagine the bold step of these dragon-slayers, the proud and
 daring spirit with which they turn their backs on all the effeminate
 doctrines of optimism in order "to live resolutely" in the Whole and in
 the Full: would it not be necessary for the tragic man of this culture,
 with his self-discipline to earnestness and terror, to desire a new
 art, the art of metaphysical comfort,--namely, tragedy, as the Hellena
 belonging to him, and that he should exclaim with Faust:
 
     Und sollt' ich nicht, sehnschtigster Gewalt,
     In's Leben ziehn die einzigste Gestalt?[21]
 
 But now that the Socratic culture has been shaken from two directions,
 and is only able to hold the sceptre of its infallibility with
 trembling hands,--once by the fear of its own conclusions which it at
 length begins to surmise, and again, because it is no longer convinced
 with its former nave trust of the eternal validity of its foundation,
 --it is a sad spectacle to behold how the dance of its thought always
 rushes longingly on new forms, to embrace them, and then, shuddering,
 lets them go of a sudden, as Mephistopheles does the seductive Lami.
 It is certainly the symptom of the "breach" which all are wont to speak
 of as the primordial suffering of modern culture that the theoretical
 man, alarmed and dissatisfied at his own conclusions, no longer dares
 to entrust himself to the terrible ice-stream of existence: he runs
 timidly up and down the bank. He no longer wants to have anything
 entire, with all the natural cruelty of things, so thoroughly has he
 been spoiled by his optimistic contemplation. Besides, he feels that
 a culture built up on the principles of science must perish when it
 begins to grow _illogical,_ that is, to avoid its own conclusions.
 Our art reveals this universal trouble: in vain does one seek help by
 imitating all the great productive periods and natures, in vain does
 one accumulate the entire "world-literature" around modern man for
 his comfort, in vain does one place one's self in the midst of the
 art-styles and artists of all ages, so that one may give names to them
 as Adam did to the beasts: one still continues the eternal hungerer,
 the "critic" without joy and energy, the Alexandrine man, who is in
 the main a librarian and corrector of proofs, and who, pitiable wretch
 goes blind from the dust of books and printers' errors.
 
 
 [21] Cf. Introduction, p. 14.
 
 
 
 19.
 
 
 We cannot designate the intrinsic substance of Socratic culture more
 distinctly than by calling it _the culture of the opera_: for it is in
 this department that culture has expressed itself with special navet
 concerning its aims and perceptions, which is sufficiently surprising
 when we compare the genesis of the opera and the facts of operatic
 development with the eternal truths of the Apollonian and Dionysian.
 I call to mind first of all the origin of the _stilo rappresentativo_
 and the recitative. Is it credible that this thoroughly externalised
 operatic music, incapable of devotion, could be received and cherished
 with enthusiastic favour, as a re-birth, as it were, of all true music,
 by the very age in which the ineffably sublime and sacred music of
 Palestrina had originated? And who, on the other hand, would think of
 making only the diversion-craving luxuriousness of those Florentine
 circles and the vanity of their dramatic singers responsible for the
 love of the opera which spread with such rapidity? That in the same
 age, even among the same people, this passion for a half-musical
 mode of speech should awaken alongside of the vaulted structure
 of Palestrine harmonies which the entire Christian Middle Age had
 been building up, I can explain to myself only by a co-operating
 _extra-artistic tendency_ in the essence of the recitative.
 
 The listener, who insists on distinctly hearing the words under the
 music, has his wishes met by the singer in that he speaks rather than
 sings, and intensifies the pathetic expression of the words in this
 half-song: by this intensification of the pathos he facilitates the
 understanding of the words and surmounts the remaining half of the
 music. The specific danger which now threatens him is that in some
 unguarded moment he may give undue importance to music, which would
 forthwith result in the destruction of the pathos of the speech and
 the distinctness of the words: while, on the other hand, he always
 feels himself impelled to musical delivery and to virtuose exhibition
 of vocal talent. Here the "poet" comes to his aid, who knows how to
 provide him with abundant opportunities for lyrical interjections,
 repetitions of words and sentences, etc.,--at which places the singer,
 now in the purely musical element, can rest himself without minding the
 words. This alternation of emotionally impressive, yet only half-sung
 speech and wholly sung interjections, which is characteristic of the
 _stilo rappresentativo,_ this rapidly changing endeavour to operate
 now on the conceptional and representative faculty of the hearer, now
 on his musical sense, is something so thoroughly unnatural and withal
 so intrinsically contradictory both to the Apollonian and Dionysian
 artistic impulses, that one has to infer an origin of the recitative
 foreign to all artistic instincts. The recitative must be defined,
 according to this description, as the combination of epic and lyric
 delivery, not indeed as an intrinsically stable combination which
 could not be attained in the case of such totally disparate elements,
 but an entirely superficial mosaic conglutination, such as is totally
 unprecedented in the domain of nature and experience. _But this was
 not the opinion of the inventors of the recitative:_ they themselves,
 and their age with them, believed rather that the mystery of antique
 music had been solved by this _stilo rappresentativo,_ in which, as
 they thought, the only explanation of the enormous influence of an
 Orpheus, an Amphion, and even of Greek tragedy was to be found. The new
 style was regarded by them as the re-awakening of the most effective
 music, the Old Greek music: indeed, with the universal and popular
 conception of the Homeric world _as the primitive world,_ they could
 abandon themselves to the dream of having descended once more into the
 paradisiac beginnings of mankind, wherein music also must needs have
 had the unsurpassed purity, power, and innocence of which the poets
 could give such touching accounts in their pastoral plays. Here we see
 into the internal process of development of this thoroughly modern
 variety of art, the opera: a powerful need here acquires an art, but
 it is a need of an unsthetic kind: the yearning for the idyll, the
 belief in the prehistoric existence of the artistic, good man. The
 recitative was regarded as the rediscovered language of this primitive
 man; the opera as the recovered land of this idyllically or heroically
 good creature, who in every action follows at the same time a natural
 artistic impulse, who sings a little along with all he has to say, in
 order to sing immediately with full voice on the slightest emotional
 excitement. It is now a matter of indifference to us that the humanists
 of those days combated the old ecclesiastical representation of man
 as naturally corrupt and lost, with this new-created picture of the
 paradisiac artist: so that opera may be understood as the oppositional
 dogma of the good man, whereby however a solace was at the same time
 found for the pessimism to which precisely the seriously-disposed
 men of that time were most strongly incited, owing to the frightful
 uncertainty of all conditions of life. It is enough to have perceived
 that the intrinsic charm, and therefore the genesis, of this new form
 of art lies in the gratification of an altogether unsthetic need, in
 the optimistic glorification of man as such, in the conception of the
 primitive man as the man naturally good and artistic: a principle of
 the opera which has gradually changed into a threatening and terrible
 _demand,_ which, in face of the socialistic movements of the present
 time, we can no longer ignore. The "good primitive man" wants his
 rights: what paradisiac prospects!
 
 I here place by way of parallel still another equally obvious
 confirmation of my view that opera is built up on the same principles
 as our Alexandrine culture. Opera is the birth of the theoretical man,
 of the critical layman, not of the artist: one of the most surprising
 facts in the whole history of art. It was the demand of thoroughly
 unmusical hearers that the words must above all be understood, so
 that according to them a re-birth of music is only to be expected
 when some mode of singing has been discovered in which the text-word
 lords over the counterpoint as the master over the servant. For the
 words, it is argued, are as much nobler than the accompanying harmonic
 system as the soul is nobler than the body. It was in accordance with
 the laically unmusical crudeness of these views that the combination
 of music, picture and expression was effected in the beginnings of
 the opera: in the spirit of this sthetics the first experiments
 were also made in the leading laic circles of Florence by the poets
 and singers patronised there. The man incapable of art creates for
 himself a species of art precisely because he is the inartistic man
 as such. Because he does not divine the Dionysian depth of music, he
 changes his musical taste into appreciation of the understandable
 word-and-tone-rhetoric of the passions in the _stilo rappresentativo,_
 and into the voluptuousness of the arts of song; because he is unable
 to behold a vision, he forces the machinist and the decorative artist
 into his service; because he cannot apprehend the true nature of the
 artist, he conjures up the "artistic primitive man" to suit his taste,
 that is, the man who sings and recites verses under the influence
 of passion. He dreams himself into a time when passion suffices to
 generate songs and poems: as if emotion had ever been able to create
 anything artistic. The postulate of the opera is a false belief
 concerning the artistic process, in fact, the idyllic belief that every
 sentient man is an artist. In the sense of this belief, opera is the
 expression of the taste of the laity in art, who dictate their laws
 with the cheerful optimism of the theorist.
 
 Should we desire to unite in one the two conceptions just set forth
 as influential in the origin of opera, it would only remain for us to
 speak of an _idyllic tendency of the opera_: in which connection we
 may avail ourselves exclusively of the phraseology and illustration of
 Schiller.[22] "Nature and the ideal," he says, "are either objects of
 grief, when the former is represented as lost, the latter unattained;
 or both are objects of joy, in that they are represented as real.
 The first case furnishes the elegy in its narrower signification,
 the second the idyll in its widest sense." Here we must at once call
 attention to the common characteristic of these two conceptions in
 operatic genesis, namely, that in them the ideal is not regarded as
 unattained or nature as lost Agreeably to this sentiment, there was
 a primitive age of man when he lay close to the heart of nature,
 and, owing to this naturalness, had attained the ideal of mankind in
 a paradisiac goodness and artist-organisation: from which perfect
 primitive man all of us were supposed to be descended; whose faithful
 copy we were in fact still said to be: only we had to cast off some
 few things in order to recognise ourselves once more as this primitive
 man, on the strength of a voluntary renunciation of superfluous
 learnedness, of super-abundant culture. It was to such a concord of
 nature and the ideal, to an idyllic reality, that the cultured man
 of the Renaissance suffered himself to be led back by his operatic
 imitation of Greek tragedy; he made use of this tragedy, as Dante made
 use of Vergil, in order to be led up to the gates of paradise: while
 from this point he went on without assistance and passed over from an
 imitation of the highest form of Greek art to a "restoration of all
 things," to an imitation of man's original art-world. What delightfully
 nave hopefulness of these daring endeavours, in the very heart of
 theoretical culture!--solely to be explained by the comforting belief,
 that "man-in-himself" is the eternally virtuous hero of the opera,
 the eternally fluting or singing shepherd, who must always in the end
 rediscover himself as such, if he has at any time really lost himself;
 solely the fruit of the optimism, which here rises like a sweetishly
 seductive column of vapour out of the depth of the Socratic conception
 of the world.
 
 The features of the opera therefore do not by any means exhibit the
 elegiac sorrow of an eternal loss, but rather the cheerfulness of
 eternal rediscovery, the indolent delight in an idyllic reality which
 one can at least represent to one's self each moment as real: and in
 so doing one will perhaps surmise some day that this supposed reality
 is nothing but a fantastically silly dawdling, concerning which every
 one, who could judge it by the terrible earnestness of true nature
 and compare it with the actual primitive scenes of the beginnings of
 mankind, would have to call out with loathing: Away with the phantom!
 Nevertheless one would err if one thought it possible to frighten
 away merely by a vigorous shout such a dawdling thing as the opera,
 as if it were a spectre. He who would destroy the opera must join
 issue with Alexandrine cheerfulness, which expresses itself so navely
 therein concerning its favourite representation; of which in fact
 it is the specific form of art. But what is to be expected for art
 itself from the operation of a form of art, the beginnings of which
 do not at all lie in the sthetic province; which has rather stolen
 over from a half-moral sphere into the artistic domain, and has been
 able only now and then to delude us concerning this hybrid origin? By
 what sap is this parasitic opera-concern nourished, if not by that
 of true art? Must we not suppose that the highest and indeed the
 truly serious task of art--to free the eye from its glance into the
 horrors of night and to deliver the "subject" by the healing balm of
 appearance from the spasms of volitional agitations--will degenerate
 under the influence of its idyllic seductions and Alexandrine
 adulation to an empty dissipating tendency, to pastime? What will
 become of the eternal truths of the Dionysian and Apollonian in such
 an amalgamation of styles as I have exhibited in the character of the
 _stilo rappresentativo_? where music is regarded as the servant, the
 text as the master, where music is compared with the body, the text
 with the soul? where at best the highest aim will be the realisation
 of a paraphrastic tone-painting, just as formerly in the New Attic
 Dithyramb? where music is completely alienated from its true dignity
 of being, the Dionysian mirror of the world, so that the only thing
 left to it is, as a slave of phenomena, to imitate the formal character
 thereof, and to excite an external pleasure in the play of lines and
 proportions. On close observation, this fatal influence of the opera
 on music is seen to coincide absolutely with the universal development
 of modern music; the optimism lurking in the genesis of the opera and
 in the essence of culture represented thereby, has, with alarming
 rapidity, succeeded in divesting music of its Dionyso-cosmic mission
 and in impressing on it a playfully formal and pleasurable character: a
 change with which perhaps only the metamorphosis of the schylean man
 into the cheerful Alexandrine man could be compared.
 
 If, however, in the exemplification herewith indicated we have rightly
 associated the evanescence of the Dionysian spirit with a most
 striking, but hitherto unexplained transformation and degeneration of
 the Hellene--what hopes must revive in us when the most trustworthy
 auspices guarantee _the reverse process, the gradual awakening of
 the Dionysian spirit_ in our modern world! It is impossible for the
 divine strength of Herakles to languish for ever in voluptuous bondage
 to Omphale. Out of the Dionysian root of the German spirit a power
 has arisen which has nothing in common with the primitive conditions
 of Socratic culture, and can neither be explained nor excused
 thereby, but is rather regarded by this culture as something terribly
 inexplicable and overwhelmingly hostile,--namely, _German music_ as
 we have to understand it, especially in its vast solar orbit from
 Bach to Beethoven, from Beethoven to Wagner. What even under the most
 favourable circumstances can the knowledge-craving Socratism of our
 days do with this demon rising from unfathomable depths? Neither by
 means of the zig-zag and arabesque work of operatic melody, nor with
 the aid of the arithmetical counting board of fugue and contrapuntal
 dialectics is the formula to be found, in the trebly powerful light[23]
 of which one could subdue this demon and compel it to speak. What
 a spectacle, when our sthetes, with a net of "beauty" peculiar to
 themselves, now pursue and clutch at the genius of music romping
 about before them with incomprehensible life, and in so doing display
 activities which are not to be judged by the standard of eternal beauty
 any more than by the standard of the sublime. Let us but observe these
 patrons of music as they are, at close range, when they call out so
 indefatigably "beauty! beauty!" to discover whether they have the marks
 of nature's darling children who are fostered and fondled in the lap
 of the beautiful, or whether they do not rather seek a disguise for
 their own rudeness, an sthetical pretext for their own unemotional
 insipidity: I am thinking here, for instance, of Otto Jahn. But let the
 liar and the hypocrite beware of our German music: for in the midst
 of all our culture it is really the only genuine, pure and purifying
 fire-spirit from which and towards which, as in the teaching of the
 great Heraclitus of Ephesus, all things move in a double orbit-all
 that we now call culture, education, civilisation, must appear some day
 before the unerring judge, Dionysus.
 
 Let us recollect furthermore how Kant and Schopenhauer made it
 possible for the spirit of _German philosophy_ streaming from the
 same sources to annihilate the satisfied delight in existence of
 scientific Socratism by the delimitation of the boundaries thereof; how
 through this delimitation an infinitely profounder and more serious
 view of ethical problems and of art was inaugurated, which we may
 unhesitatingly designate as _Dionysian_ wisdom comprised in concepts.
 To what then does the mystery of this oneness of German music and
 philosophy point, if not to a new form of existence, concerning the
 substance of which we can only inform ourselves presentiently from
 Hellenic analogies? For to us who stand on the boundary line between
 two different forms of existence, the Hellenic prototype retains the
 immeasurable value, that therein all these transitions and struggles
 are imprinted in a classically instructive form: except that we, as
 it were, experience analogically in _reverse_ order the chief epochs
 of the Hellenic genius, and seem now, for instance, to pass backwards
 from the Alexandrine age to the period of tragedy. At the same time
 we have the feeling that the birth of a tragic age betokens only a
 return to itself of the German spirit, a blessed self-rediscovering
 after excessive and urgent external influences have for a long time
 compelled it, living as it did in helpless barbaric formlessness, to
 servitude under their form. It may at last, after returning to the
 primitive source of its being, venture to stalk along boldly and freely
 before all nations without hugging the leading-strings of a Romanic
 civilisation: if only it can learn implicitly of one people--the
 Greeks, of whom to learn at all is itself a high honour and a rare
 distinction. And when did we require these highest of all teachers more
 than at present, when we experience _a re-birth of tragedy_ and are in
 danger alike of not knowing whence it comes, and of being unable to
 make clear to ourselves whither it tends.
 
 
 [22] Essay on Elegiac Poetry.--TR.
 
 [23] See _Faust,_ Part 1.1. 965--TR.
 
 
 
 20.
 
 
 It may be weighed some day before an impartial judge, in what time and
 in what men the German spirit has thus far striven most resolutely to
 learn of the Greeks: and if we confidently assume that this unique
 praise must be accorded to the noblest intellectual efforts of Goethe,
 Schiller, and Winkelmann, it will certainly have to be added that
 since their time, and subsequently to the more immediate influences of
 these efforts, the endeavour to attain to culture and to the Greeks by
 this path has in an incomprehensible manner grown feebler and feebler.
 In order not to despair altogether of the German spirit, must we not
 infer therefrom that possibly, in some essential matter, even these
 champions could not penetrate into the core of the Hellenic nature,
 and were unable to establish a permanent friendly alliance between
 German and Greek culture? So that perhaps an unconscious perception
 of this shortcoming might raise also in more serious minds the
 disheartening doubt as to whether after such predecessors they could
 advance still farther on this path of culture, or could reach the goal
 at all. Accordingly, we see the opinions concerning the value of Greek
 contribution to culture degenerate since that time in the most alarming
 manner; the expression of compassionate superiority may be heard
 in the most heterogeneous intellectual and non-intellectual camps,
 and elsewhere a totally ineffective declamation dallies with "Greek
 harmony," "Greek beauty," "Greek cheerfulness." And in the very circles
 whose dignity it might be to draw indefatigably from the Greek channel
 for the good of German culture, in the circles of the teachers in the
 higher educational institutions, they have learned best to compromise
 with the Greeks in good time and on easy terms, to the extent often of
 a sceptical abandonment of the Hellenic ideal and a total perversion of
 the true purpose of antiquarian studies. If there be any one at all in
 these circles who has not completely exhausted himself in the endeavour
 to be a trustworthy corrector of old texts or a natural-history
 microscopist of language, he perhaps seeks also to appropriate Grecian
 antiquity "historically" along with other antiquities, and in any case
 according to the method and with the supercilious air of our present
 cultured historiography. When, therefore, the intrinsic efficiency
 of the higher educational institutions has never perhaps been lower
 or feebler than at present, when the "journalist," the paper slave
 of the day, has triumphed over the academic teacher in all matters
 pertaining to culture, and there only remains to the latter the often
 previously experienced metamorphosis of now fluttering also, as a
 cheerful cultured butterfly, in the idiom of the journalist, with the
 "light elegance" peculiar thereto--with what painful confusion must the
 cultured persons of a period like the present gaze at the phenomenon
 (which can perhaps be comprehended analogically only by means of the
 profoundest principle of the hitherto unintelligible Hellenic genius)
 of the reawakening of the Dionysian spirit and the re-birth of tragedy?
 Never has there been another art-period in which so-called culture
 and true art have been so estranged and opposed, as is so obviously
 the case at present. We understand why so feeble a culture hates true
 art; it fears destruction thereby. But must not an entire domain of
 culture, namely the Socratic-Alexandrine, have exhausted its powers
 after contriving to culminate in such a daintily-tapering point as our
 present culture? When it was not permitted to heroes like Goethe and
 Schiller to break open the enchanted gate which leads into the Hellenic
 magic mountain, when with their most dauntless striving they did not
 get beyond the longing gaze which the Goethean Iphigenia cast from
 barbaric Tauris to her home across the ocean, what could the epigones
 of such heroes hope for, if the gate should not open to them suddenly
 of its own accord, in an entirely different position, quite overlooked
 in all endeavours of culture hitherto--amidst the mystic tones of
 reawakened tragic music.
 
 Let no one attempt to weaken our faith in an impending re-birth of
 Hellenic antiquity; for in it alone we find our hope of a renovation
 and purification of the German spirit through the fire-magic of music.
 What else do we know of amidst the present desolation and languor
 of culture, which could awaken any comforting expectation for the
 future? We look in vain for one single vigorously-branching root, for
 a speck of fertile and healthy soil: there is dust, sand, torpidness
 and languishing everywhere! Under such circumstances a cheerless
 solitary wanderer could choose for himself no better symbol than the
 Knight with Death and the Devil, as Drer has sketched him for us, the
 mail-clad knight, grim and stern of visage, who is able, unperturbed
 by his gruesome companions, and yet hopelessly, to pursue his terrible
 path with horse and hound alone. Our Schopenhauer was such a Drerian
 knight: he was destitute of all hope, but he sought the truth. There is
 not his equal.
 
 But how suddenly this gloomily depicted wilderness of our exhausted
 culture changes when the Dionysian magic touches it! A hurricane
 seizes everything decrepit, decaying, collapsed, and stunted; wraps
 it whirlingly into a red cloud of dust; and carries it like a vulture
 into the air. Confused thereby, our glances seek for what has vanished:
 for what they see is something risen to the golden light as from
 a depression, so full and green, so luxuriantly alive, so ardently
 infinite. Tragedy sits in the midst of this exuberance of life,
 sorrow and joy, in sublime ecstasy; she listens to a distant doleful
 song--it tells of the Mothers of Being, whose names are: _Wahn, Wille,
 Wehe_[21]--Yes, my friends, believe with me in Dionysian life and
 in the re-birth of tragedy. The time of the Socratic man is past:
 crown yourselves with ivy, take in your hands the thyrsus, and do not
 marvel if tigers and panthers lie down fawning at your feet. Dare now
 to be tragic men, for ye are to be redeemed! Ye are to accompany the
 Dionysian festive procession from India to Greece! Equip yourselves for
 severe conflict, but believe in the wonders of your god!
 
 
 
 21.
 
 
 Gliding back from these hortative tones into the mood which befits
 the contemplative man, I repeat that it can only be learnt from the
 Greeks what such a sudden and miraculous awakening of tragedy must
 signify for the essential basis of a people's life. It is the people
 of the tragic mysteries who fight the battles with the Persians: and
 again, the people who waged such wars required tragedy as a necessary
 healing potion. Who would have imagined that there was still such a
 uniformly powerful effusion of the simplest political sentiments, the
 most natural domestic instincts and the primitive manly delight in
 strife in this very people after it had been shaken to its foundations
 for several generations by the most violent convulsions of the
 Dionysian demon? If at every considerable spreading of the Dionysian
 commotion one always perceives that the Dionysian loosing from the
 shackles of the individual makes itself felt first of all in an
 increased encroachment on the political instincts, to the extent of
 indifference, yea even hostility, it is certain, on the other hand,
 that the state-forming Apollo is also the genius of the _principium
 individuationis,_ and that the state and domestic sentiment cannot live
 without an assertion of individual personality. There is only one way
 from orgasm for a people,--the way to Indian Buddhism, which, in order
 to be at all endured with its longing for nothingness, requires the
 rare ecstatic states with their elevation above space, time, and the
 individual; just as these in turn demand a philosophy which teaches how
 to overcome the indescribable depression of the intermediate states by
 means of a fancy. With the same necessity, owing to the unconditional
 dominance of political impulses, a people drifts into a path of
 extremest secularisation, the most magnificent, but also the most
 terrible expression of which is the Roman _imperium_.
 
 Placed between India and Rome, and constrained to a seductive choice,
 the Greeks succeeded in devising in classical purity still a third form
 of life, not indeed for long private use, but just on that account for
 immortality. For it holds true in all things that those whom the gods
 love die young, but, on the other hand, it holds equally true that they
 then live eternally with the gods. One must not demand of what is most
 noble that it should possess the durable toughness of leather; the
 staunch durability, which, for instance, was inherent in the national
 character of the Romans, does not probably belong to the indispensable
 predicates of perfection. But if we ask by what physic it was possible
 for the Greeks, in their best period, notwithstanding the extraordinary
 strength of their Dionysian and political impulses, neither to exhaust
 themselves by ecstatic brooding, nor by a consuming scramble for empire
 and worldly honour, but to attain the splendid mixture which we find
 in a noble, inflaming, and contemplatively disposing wine, we must
 remember the enormous power of _tragedy,_ exciting, purifying, and
 disburdening the entire life of a people; the highest value of which
 we shall divine only when, as in the case of the Greeks, it appears
 to us as the essence of all the prophylactic healing forces, as the
 mediator arbitrating between the strongest and most inherently fateful
 characteristics of a people.
 
 Tragedy absorbs the highest musical orgasm into itself, so that it
 absolutely brings music to perfection among the Greeks, as among
 ourselves; but it then places alongside thereof tragic myth and the
 tragic hero, who, like a mighty Titan, takes the entire Dionysian world
 on his shoulders and disburdens us thereof; while, on the other hand,
 it is able by means of this same tragic myth, in the person of the
 tragic hero, to deliver us from the intense longing for this existence,
 and reminds us with warning hand of another existence and a higher
 joy, for which the struggling hero prepares himself presentiently by
 his destruction, not by his victories. Tragedy sets a sublime symbol,
 namely the myth between the universal authority of its music and the
 receptive Dionysian hearer, and produces in him the illusion that music
 is only the most effective means for the animation of the plastic world
 of myth. Relying upon this noble illusion, she can now move her limbs
 for the dithyrambic dance, and abandon herself unhesitatingly to an
 orgiastic feeling of freedom, in which she could not venture to indulge
 as music itself, without this illusion. The myth protects us from the
 music, while, on the other hand, it alone gives the highest freedom
 thereto. By way of return for this service, music imparts to tragic
 myth such an impressive and convincing metaphysical significance as
 could never be attained by word and image, without this unique aid;
 and the tragic spectator in particular experiences thereby the sure
 presentiment of supreme joy to which the path through destruction and
 negation leads; so that he thinks he hears, as it were, the innermost
 abyss of things speaking audibly to him.
 
 If in these last propositions I have succeeded in giving perhaps only a
 preliminary expression, intelligible to few at first, to this difficult
 representation, I must not here desist from stimulating my friends to a
 further attempt, or cease from beseeching them to prepare themselves,
 by a detached example of our common experience, for the perception of
 the universal proposition. In this example I must not appeal to those
 who make use of the pictures of the scenic processes, the words and the
 emotions of the performers, in order to approximate thereby to musical
 perception; for none of these speak music as their mother-tongue,
 and, in spite of the aids in question, do not get farther than the
 precincts of musical perception, without ever being allowed to touch
 its innermost shrines; some of them, like Gervinus, do not even reach
 the precincts by this path. I have only to address myself to those
 who, being immediately allied to music, have it as it were for their
 mother's lap, and are connected with things almost exclusively by
 unconscious musical relations. I ask the question of these genuine
 musicians: whether they can imagine a man capable of hearing the third
 act of _Tristan und Isolde_ without any aid of word or scenery, purely
 as a vast symphonic period, without expiring by a spasmodic distention
 of all the wings of the soul? A man who has thus, so to speak, put his
 ear to the heart-chamber of the cosmic will, who feels the furious
 desire for existence issuing therefrom as a thundering stream or most
 gently dispersed brook, into all the veins of the world, would he not
 collapse all at once? Could he endure, in the wretched fragile tenement
 of the human individual, to hear the re-echo of countless cries of
 joy and sorrow from the "vast void of cosmic night," without flying
 irresistibly towards his primitive home at the sound of this pastoral
 dance-song of metaphysics? But if, nevertheless, such a work can be
 heard as a whole, without a renunciation of individual existence, if
 such a creation could be created without demolishing its creator--where
 are we to get the solution of this contradiction?
 
 Here there interpose between our highest musical excitement and the
 music in question the tragic myth and the tragic hero--in reality only
 as symbols of the most universal facts, of which music alone can speak
 directly. If, however, we felt as purely Dionysian beings, myth as a
 symbol would stand by us absolutely ineffective and unnoticed, and
 would never for a moment prevent us from giving ear to the re-echo of
 the _universalia ante rem._ Here, however, the _Apollonian_ power, with
 a view to the restoration of the well-nigh shattered individual, bursts
 forth with the healing balm of a blissful illusion: all of a sudden
 we imagine we see only Tristan, motionless, with hushed voice saying
 to himself: "the old tune, why does it wake me?" And what formerly
 interested us like a hollow sigh from the heart of being, seems now
 only to tell us how "waste and void is the sea." And when, breathless,
 we thought to expire by a convulsive distention of all our feelings,
 and only a slender tie bound us to our present existence, we now hear
 and see only the hero wounded to death and still not dying, with his
 despairing cry: "Longing! Longing! In dying still longing! for longing
 not dying!" And if formerly, after such a surplus and superabundance of
 consuming agonies, the jubilation of the born rent our hearts almost
 like the very acme of agony, the rejoicing Kurwenal now stands between
 us and the "jubilation as such," with face turned toward the ship which
 carries Isolde. However powerfully fellow-suffering encroaches upon us,
 it nevertheless delivers us in a manner from the primordial suffering
 of the world, just as the symbol-image of the myth delivers us from the
 immediate perception of the highest cosmic idea, just as the thought
 and word deliver us from the unchecked effusion of the unconscious
 will. The glorious Apollonian illusion makes it appear as if the very
 realm of tones presented itself to us as a plastic cosmos, as if even
 the fate of Tristan and Isolde had been merely formed and moulded
 therein as out of some most delicate and impressible material.
 
 Thus does the Apollonian wrest us from Dionysian universality and fill
 us with rapture for individuals; to these it rivets our sympathetic
 emotion, through these it satisfies the sense of beauty which longs for
 great and sublime forms; it brings before us biographical portraits,
 and incites us to a thoughtful apprehension of the essence of life
 contained therein. With the immense potency of the image, the concept,
 the ethical teaching and the sympathetic emotion--the Apollonian
 influence uplifts man from his orgiastic self-annihilation, and
 beguiles him concerning the universality of the Dionysian process
 into the belief that he is seeing a detached picture of the world,
 for instance, Tristan and Isolde, and that, _through music,_ he will
 be enabled to _see_ it still more clearly and intrinsically. What can
 the healing magic of Apollo not accomplish when it can even excite in
 us the illusion that the Dionysian is actually in the service of the
 Apollonian, the effects of which it is capable of enhancing; yea, that
 music is essentially the representative art for an Apollonian substance?
 
 With the pre-established harmony which obtains between perfect drama
 and its music, the drama attains the highest degree of conspicuousness,
 such as is usually unattainable in mere spoken drama. As all the
 animated figures of the scene in the independently evolved lines
 of melody simplify themselves before us to the distinctness of the
 catenary curve, the coexistence of these lines is also audible in the
 harmonic change which sympathises in a most delicate manner with the
 evolved process: through which change the relations of things become
 immediately perceptible to us in a sensible and not at all abstract
 manner, as we likewise perceive thereby that it is only in these
 relations that the essence of a character and of a line of melody
 manifests itself clearly. And while music thus compels us to see more
 extensively and more intrinsically than usual, and makes us spread out
 the curtain of the scene before ourselves like some delicate texture,
 the world of the stage is as infinitely expanded for our spiritualised,
 introspective eye as it is illumined outwardly from within. How can
 the word-poet furnish anything analogous, who strives to attain this
 internal expansion and illumination of the visible stage-world by a
 much more imperfect mechanism and an indirect path, proceeding as he
 does from word and concept? Albeit musical tragedy likewise avails
 itself of the word, it is at the same time able to place alongside
 thereof its basis and source, and can make the unfolding of the word,
 from within outwards, obvious to us.
 
 Of the process just set forth, however, it could still be said
 as decidedly that it is only a glorious appearance, namely the
 afore-mentioned Apollonian _illusion,_ through the influence of which
 we are to be delivered from the Dionysian obtrusion and excess.
 In point of fact, the relation of music to drama is precisely the
 reverse; music is the adequate idea of the world, drama is but the
 reflex of this idea, a detached umbrage thereof. The identity between
 the line of melody and the lining form, between the harmony and the
 character-relations of this form, is true in a sense antithetical to
 what one would suppose on the contemplation of musical tragedy. We
 may agitate and enliven the form in the most conspicuous manner, and
 enlighten it from within, but it still continues merely phenomenon,
 from which there is no bridge to lead us into the true reality, into
 the heart of the world. Music, however, speaks out of this heart; and
 though countless phenomena of the kind might be passing manifestations
 of this music, they could never exhaust its essence, but would always
 be merely its externalised copies. Of course, as regards the intricate
 relation of music and drama, nothing can be explained, while all may
 be confused by the popular and thoroughly false antithesis of soul and
 body; but the unphilosophical crudeness of this antithesis seems to
 have become--who knows for what reasons--a readily accepted Article of
 Faith with our stheticians, while they have learned nothing concerning
 an antithesis of phenomenon and thing-in-itself, or perhaps, for
 reasons equally unknown, have not cared to learn anything thereof.
 
 Should it have been established by our analysis that the Apollonian
 element in tragedy has by means of its illusion gained a complete
 victory over the Dionysian primordial element of music, and has made
 music itself subservient to its end, namely, the highest and clearest
 elucidation of the drama, it would certainly be necessary to add the
 very important restriction: that at the most essential point this
 Apollonian illusion is dissolved and annihilated. The drama, which, by
 the aid of music, spreads out before us with such inwardly illumined
 distinctness in all its movements and figures, that we imagine we
 see the texture unfolding on the loom as the shuttle flies to and
 fro,--attains as a whole an effect which _transcends all Apollonian
 artistic effects._ In the collective effect of tragedy, the Dionysian
 gets the upper hand once more; tragedy ends with a sound which could
 never emanate from the realm of Apollonian art. And the Apollonian
 illusion is thereby found to be what it is,--the assiduous veiling
 during the performance of tragedy of the intrinsically Dionysian
 effect: which, however, is so powerful, that it finally forces
 the Apollonian drama itself into a sphere where it begins to talk
 with Dionysian wisdom, and even denies itself and its Apollonian
 conspicuousness. Thus then the intricate relation of the Apollonian and
 the Dionysian in tragedy must really be symbolised by a fraternal union
 of the two deities: Dionysus speaks the language of Apollo; Apollo,
 however, finally speaks the language of Dionysus; and so the highest
 goal of tragedy and of art in general is attained.
 
 
 
 22.
 
 
 Let the attentive friend picture to himself purely and simply,
 according to his experiences, the effect of a true musical tragedy. I
 think I have so portrayed the phenomenon of this effect in both its
 phases that he will now be able to interpret his own experiences. For
 he will recollect that with regard to the myth which passed before
 him he felt himself exalted to a kind of omniscience, as if his
 visual faculty were no longer merely a surface faculty, but capable
 of penetrating into the interior, and as if he now saw before him,
 with the aid of music, the ebullitions of the will, the conflict of
 motives, and the swelling stream of the passions, almost sensibly
 visible, like a plenitude of actively moving lines and figures, and
 could thereby dip into the most tender secrets of unconscious emotions.
 While he thus becomes conscious of the highest exaltation of his
 instincts for conspicuousness and transfiguration, he nevertheless
 feels with equal definitiveness that this long series of Apollonian
 artistic effects still does _not_ generate the blissful continuance in
 will-less contemplation which the plasticist and the epic poet, that
 is to say, the strictly Apollonian artists, produce in him by their
 artistic productions: to wit, the justification of the world of the
 _individuatio_ attained in this contemplation,--which is the object
 and essence of Apollonian art. He beholds the transfigured world of
 the stage and nevertheless denies it. He sees before him the tragic
 hero in epic clearness and beauty, and nevertheless delights in his
 annihilation. He comprehends the incidents of the scene in all their
 details, and yet loves to flee into the incomprehensible. He feels the
 actions of the hero to be justified, and is nevertheless still more
 elated when these actions annihilate their originator. He shudders at
 the sufferings which will befall the hero, and yet anticipates therein
 a higher and much more overpowering joy. He sees more extensively and
 profoundly than ever, and yet wishes to be blind. Whence must we derive
 this curious internal dissension, this collapse of the Apollonian apex,
 if not from the _Dionysian_ spell, which, though apparently stimulating
 the Apollonian emotions to their highest pitch, can nevertheless force
 this superabundance of Apollonian power into its service? _Tragic
 myth_ is to be understood only as a symbolisation of Dionysian wisdom
 by means of the expedients of Apollonian art: the mythus conducts the
 world of phenomena to its boundaries, where it denies itself, and seeks
 to flee back again into the bosom of the true and only reality; where
 it then, like Isolde, seems to strike up its metaphysical swan-song:--
 
     In des Wonnemeeres
     wogendem Schwall,
     in der Duft-Wellen
     tnendem Schall,
     in des Weltathems
     wehendem All--
     ertrinken--versinken
     unbewusst--hchste Lust![24]
 
 We thus realise to ourselves in the experiences of the truly sthetic
 hearer the tragic artist himself when he proceeds like a luxuriously
 fertile divinity of individuation to create his figures (in which sense
 his work can hardly be understood as an "imitation of nature")--and
 when, on the other hand, his vast Dionysian impulse then absorbs the
 entire world of phenomena, in order to anticipate beyond it, and
 through its annihilation, the highest artistic primal joy, in the bosom
 of the Primordial Unity. Of course, our sthetes have nothing to say
 about this return in fraternal union of the two art-deities to the
 original home, nor of either the Apollonian or Dionysian excitement
 of the hearer, while they are indefatigable in characterising the
 struggle of the hero with fate, the triumph of the moral order of the
 world, or the disburdenment of the emotions through tragedy, as the
 properly Tragic: an indefatigableness which makes me think that they
 are perhaps not sthetically excitable men at all, but only to be
 regarded as moral beings when hearing tragedy. Never since Aristotle
 has an explanation of the tragic effect been proposed, by which an
 sthetic activity of the hearer could be inferred from artistic
 circumstances. At one time fear and pity are supposed to be forced to
 an alleviating discharge through the serious procedure, at another time
 we are expected to feel elevated and inspired at the triumph of good
 and noble principles, at the sacrifice of the hero in the interest of
 a moral conception of things; and however certainly I believe that for
 countless men precisely this, and only this, is the effect of tragedy,
 it as obviously follows therefrom that all these, together with their
 interpreting sthetes, have had no experience of tragedy as the highest
 _art._ The pathological discharge, the catharsis of Aristotle, which
 philologists are at a loss whether to include under medicinal or moral
 phenomena, recalls a remarkable anticipation of Goethe. "Without a
 lively pathological interest," he says, "I too have never yet succeeded
 in elaborating a tragic situation of any kind, and hence I have rather
 avoided than sought it. Can it perhaps have been still another of the
 merits of the ancients that the deepest pathos was with them merely
 sthetic play, whereas with us the truth of nature must co-operate in
 order to produce such a work?" We can now answer in the affirmative
 this latter profound question after our glorious experiences, in which
 we have found to our astonishment in the case of musical tragedy
 itself, that the deepest pathos can in reality be merely sthetic play:
 and therefore we are justified in believing that now for the first time
 the proto-phenomenon of the tragic can be portrayed with some degree
 of success. He who now will still persist in talking only of those
 vicarious effects proceeding from ultra-sthetic spheres, and does not
 feel himself raised above the pathologically-moral process, may be left
 to despair of his sthetic nature: for which we recommend to him, by
 way of innocent equivalent, the interpretation of Shakespeare after the
 fashion of Gervinus, and the diligent search for poetic justice.
 
 Thus with the re-birth of tragedy the _sthetic hearer_ is also
 born anew, in whose place in the theatre a curious _quid pro quo_
 was wont to sit with half-moral and half-learned pretensions,--the
 "critic." In his sphere hitherto everything has been artificial and
 merely glossed over with a semblance of life. The performing artist
 was in fact at a loss what to do with such a critically comporting
 hearer, and hence he, as well as the dramatist or operatic composer
 who inspired him, searched anxiously for the last remains of life
 in a being so pretentiously barren and incapable of enjoyment. Such
 "critics," however, have hitherto constituted the public; the student,
 the school-boy, yea, even the most harmless womanly creature, were
 already unwittingly prepared by education and by journals for a similar
 perception of works of art. The nobler natures among the artists
 counted upon exciting the moral-religious forces in such a public,
 and the appeal to a moral order of the world operated vicariously,
 when in reality some powerful artistic spell should have enraptured
 the true hearer. Or again, some imposing or at all events exciting
 tendency of the contemporary political and social world was presented
 by the dramatist with such vividness that the hearer could forget his
 critical exhaustion and abandon himself to similar emotions, as, in
 patriotic or warlike moments, before the tribune of parliament, or
 at the condemnation of crime and vice:--an estrangement of the true
 aims of art which could not but lead directly now and then to a cult
 of tendency. But here there took place what has always taken place
 in the case of factitious arts, an extraordinary rapid depravation
 of these tendencies, so that for instance the tendency to employ the
 theatre as a means for the moral education of the people, which in
 Schiller's time was taken seriously, is already reckoned among the
 incredible antiquities of a surmounted culture. While the critic got
 the upper hand in the theatre and concert-hall, the journalist in the
 school, and the press in society, art degenerated into a topic of
 conversation of the most trivial kind, and sthetic criticism was used
 as the cement of a vain, distracted, selfish and moreover piteously
 unoriginal sociality, the significance of which is suggested by the
 Schopenhauerian parable of the porcupines, so that there has never
 been so much gossip about art and so little esteem for it. But is it
 still possible to have intercourse with a man capable of conversing on
 Beethoven or Shakespeare? Let each answer this question according to
 his sentiments: he will at any rate show by his answer his conception
 of "culture," provided he tries at least to answer the question, and
 has not already grown mute with astonishment.
 
 On the other hand, many a one more nobly and delicately endowed by
 nature, though he may have gradually become a critical barbarian
 in the manner described, could tell of the unexpected as well as
 totally unintelligible effect which a successful performance of
 _Lohengrin,_ for example, exerted on him: except that perhaps every
 warning and interpreting hand was lacking to guide him; so that the
 incomprehensibly heterogeneous and altogether incomparable sensation
 which then affected him also remained isolated and became extinct, like
 a mysterious star after a brief brilliancy. He then divined what the
 sthetic hearer is.
 
 
 [24]
 
     In the sea of pleasure's
     Billowing roll,
     In the ether-waves
     Knelling and toll,
     In the world-breath's
     Wavering whole--
     To drown in, go down in--
     Lost in swoon--greatest boon!
 
 
 
 23.
 
 
 He who wishes to test himself rigorously as to how he is related to the
 true sthetic hearer, or whether he belongs rather to the community
 of the Socrato-critical man, has only to enquire sincerely concerning
 the sentiment with which he accepts the _wonder_ represented on the
 stage: whether he feels his historical sense, which insists on strict
 psychological causality, insulted by it, whether with benevolent
 concession he as it were admits the wonder as a phenomenon intelligible
 to childhood, but relinquished by him, or whether he experiences
 anything else thereby. For he will thus be enabled to determine how
 far he is on the whole capable of understanding _myth,_ that is to
 say, the concentrated picture of the world, which, as abbreviature of
 phenomena, cannot dispense with wonder. It is probable, however, that
 nearly every one, upon close examination, feels so disintegrated by
 the critico-historical spirit of our culture, that he can only perhaps
 make the former existence of myth credible to himself by learned
 means through intermediary abstractions. Without myth, however, every
 culture loses its healthy, creative natural power: it is only a horizon
 encompassed with myths which rounds off to unity a social movement.
 It is only by myth that all the powers of the imagination and of the
 Apollonian dream are freed from their random rovings. The mythical
 figures have to be the invisibly omnipresent genii, under the care of
 which the young soul grows to maturity, by the signs of which the man
 gives a meaning to his life and struggles: and the state itself knows
 no more powerful unwritten law than the mythical foundation which
 vouches for its connection with religion and its growth from mythical
 ideas.
 
 Let us now place alongside thereof the abstract man proceeding
 independently of myth, the abstract education, the abstract usage,
 the abstract right, the abstract state: let us picture to ourselves
 the lawless roving of the artistic imagination, not bridled by any
 native myth: let us imagine a culture which has no fixed and sacred
 primitive seat, but is doomed to exhaust all its possibilities, and
 has to nourish itself wretchedly from the other cultures--such is the
 Present, as the result of Socratism, which is bent on the destruction
 of myth. And now the myth-less man remains eternally hungering among
 all the bygones, and digs and grubs for roots, though he have to dig
 for them even among the remotest antiquities. The stupendous historical
 exigency of the unsatisfied modern culture, the gathering around one of
 countless other cultures, the consuming desire for knowledge--what does
 all this point to, if not to the loss of myth, the loss of the mythical
 home, the mythical source? Let us ask ourselves whether the feverish
 and so uncanny stirring of this culture is aught but the eager seizing
 and snatching at food of the hungerer--and who would care to contribute
 anything more to a culture which cannot be appeased by all it devours,
 and in contact with which the most vigorous and wholesome nourishment
 is wont to change into "history and criticism"?
 
 We should also have to regard our German character with despair and
 sorrow, if it had already become inextricably entangled in, or even
 identical with this culture, in a similar manner as we can observe it
 to our horror to be the case in civilised France; and that which for
 a long time was the great advantage of France and the cause of her
 vast preponderance, to wit, this very identity of people and culture,
 might compel us at the sight thereof to congratulate ourselves that
 this culture of ours, which is so questionable, has hitherto had
 nothing in common with the noble kernel of the character of our people.
 All our hopes, on the contrary, stretch out longingly towards the
 perception that beneath this restlessly palpitating civilised life and
 educational convulsion there is concealed a glorious, intrinsically
 healthy, primeval power, which, to be sure, stirs vigorously only at
 intervals in stupendous moments, and then dreams on again in view of
 a future awakening. It is from this abyss that the German Reformation
 came forth: in the choral-hymn of which the future melody of German
 music first resounded. So deep, courageous, and soul-breathing, so
 exuberantly good and tender did this chorale of Luther sound,--as the
 first Dionysian-luring call which breaks forth from dense thickets
 at the approach of spring. To it responded with emulative echo the
 solemnly wanton procession of Dionysian revellers, to whom we are
 indebted for German music--and to whom we shall be indebted for _the
 re-birth of German myth._
 
 I know that I must now lead the sympathising and attentive friend to
 an elevated position of lonesome contemplation, where he will have
 but few companions, and I call out encouragingly to him that we must
 hold fast to our shining guides, the Greeks. For the rectification
 of our sthetic knowledge we previously borrowed from them the two
 divine figures, each of which sways a separate realm of art, and
 concerning whose mutual contact and exaltation we have acquired a
 notion through Greek tragedy. Through a remarkable disruption of both
 these primitive artistic impulses, the ruin of Greek tragedy seemed
 to be necessarily brought about: with which process a degeneration
 and a transmutation of the Greek national character was strictly in
 keeping, summoning us to earnest reflection as to how closely and
 necessarily art and the people, myth and custom, tragedy and the state,
 have coalesced in their bases. The ruin of tragedy was at the same
 time the ruin of myth. Until then the Greeks had been involuntarily
 compelled immediately to associate all experiences with their myths,
 indeed they had to comprehend them only through this association:
 whereby even the most immediate present necessarily appeared to them
 _sub specie terni_ and in a certain sense as timeless. Into this
 current of the timeless, however, the state as well as art plunged
 in order to find repose from the burden and eagerness of the moment.
 And a people--for the rest, also a man--is worth just as much only as
 its ability to impress on its experiences the seal of eternity: for
 it is thus, as it were, desecularised, and reveals its unconscious
 inner conviction of the relativity of time and of the true, that is,
 the metaphysical significance of life. The contrary happens when a
 people begins to comprehend itself historically and to demolish the
 mythical bulwarks around it: with which there is usually connected
 a marked secularisation, a breach with the unconscious metaphysics
 of its earlier existence, in all ethical consequences. Greek art and
 especially Greek tragedy delayed above all the annihilation of myth:
 it was necessary to annihilate these also to be able to live detached
 from the native soil, unbridled in the wilderness of thought, custom,
 and action. Even in such circumstances this metaphysical impulse still
 endeavours to create for itself a form of apotheosis (weakened, no
 doubt) in the Socratism of science urging to life: but on its lower
 stage this same impulse led only to a feverish search, which gradually
 merged into a pandemonium of myths and superstitions accumulated from
 all quarters: in the midst of which, nevertheless, the Hellene sat with
 a yearning heart till he contrived, as Grculus, to mask his fever with
 Greek cheerfulness and Greek levity, or to narcotise himself completely
 with some gloomy Oriental superstition.
 
 We have approached this condition in the most striking manner since the
 reawakening of the Alexandro--Roman antiquity in the fifteenth century,
 after a long, not easily describable, interlude. On the heights there
 is the same exuberant love of knowledge, the same insatiate happiness
 of the discoverer, the same stupendous secularisation, and, together
 with these, a homeless roving about, an eager intrusion at foreign
 tables, a frivolous deification of the present or a dull senseless
 estrangement, all _sub speci sculi,_ of the present time: which
 same symptoms lead one to infer the same defect at the heart of
 this culture, the annihilation of myth. It seems hardly possible to
 transplant a foreign myth with permanent success, without dreadfully
 injuring the tree through this transplantation: which is perhaps
 occasionally strong enough and sound enough to eliminate the foreign
 element after a terrible struggle; but must ordinarily consume itself
 in a languishing and stunted condition or in sickly luxuriance. Our
 opinion of the pure and vigorous kernel of the German being is such
 that we venture to expect of it, and only of it, this elimination of
 forcibly ingrafted foreign elements, and we deem it possible that
 the German spirit will reflect anew on itself. Perhaps many a one
 will be of opinion that this spirit must begin its struggle with the
 elimination of the Romanic element: for which it might recognise an
 external preparation and encouragement in the victorious bravery and
 bloody glory of the late war, but must seek the inner constraint in the
 emulative zeal to be for ever worthy of the sublime protagonists on
 this path, of Luther as well as our great artists and poets. But let
 him never think he can fight such battles without his household gods,
 without his mythical home, without a "restoration" of all German things
 I And if the German should look timidly around for a guide to lead
 him back to his long-lost home, the ways and paths of which he knows
 no longer--let him but listen to the delightfully luring call of the
 Dionysian bird, which hovers above him, and would fain point out to him
 the way thither.
 
 
 
 24.
 
 
 Among the peculiar artistic effects of musical tragedy we had to
 emphasise an Apollonian _illusion,_ through which we are to be saved
 from immediate oneness with the Dionysian music, while our musical
 excitement is able to discharge itself on an Apollonian domain and
 in an interposed visible middle world. It thereby seemed to us that
 precisely through this discharge the middle world of theatrical
 procedure, the drama generally, became visible and intelligible from
 within in a degree unattainable in the other forms of Apollonian art:
 so that here, where this art was as it were winged and borne aloft by
 the spirit of music, we had to recognise the highest exaltation of its
 powers, and consequently in the fraternal union of Apollo and Dionysus
 the climax of the Apollonian as well as of the Dionysian artistic aims.
 
 Of course, the Apollonian light-picture did not, precisely with this
 inner illumination through music, attain the peculiar effect of the
 weaker grades of Apollonian art. What the epos and the animated stone
 can do--constrain the contemplating eye to calm delight in the world
 of the _individuatio_--could not be realised here, notwithstanding
 the greater animation and distinctness. We contemplated the drama
 and penetrated with piercing glance into its inner agitated world of
 motives--and yet it seemed as if only a symbolic picture passed before
 us, the profoundest significance of which we almost believed we had
 divined, and which we desired to put aside like a curtain in order to
 behold the original behind it. The greatest distinctness of the picture
 did not suffice us: for it seemed to reveal as well as veil something;
 and while it seemed, with its symbolic revelation, to invite the
 rending of the veil for the disclosure of the mysterious background,
 this illumined all-conspicuousness itself enthralled the eye and
 prevented it from penetrating more deeply He who has not experienced
 this,--to have to view, and at the same time to have a longing
 beyond the viewing,--will hardly be able to conceive how clearly and
 definitely these two processes coexist in the contemplation of tragic
 myth and are felt to be conjoined; while the truly sthetic spectators
 will confirm my assertion that among the peculiar effects of tragedy
 this conjunction is the most noteworthy. Now let this phenomenon of the
 sthetic spectator be transferred to an analogous process in the tragic
 artist, and the genesis of _tragic myth_ will have been understood. It
 shares with the Apollonian sphere of art the full delight in appearance
 and contemplation, and at the same time it denies this delight and
 finds a still higher satisfaction in the annihilation of the visible
 world of appearance. The substance of tragic myth is first of all an
 epic event involving the glorification of the fighting hero: but whence
 originates the essentially enigmatical trait, that the suffering in
 the fate of the hero, the most painful victories, the most agonising
 contrasts of motives, in short, the exemplification of the wisdom of
 Silenus, or, sthetically expressed, the Ugly and Discordant, is always
 represented anew in such countless forms with such predilection, and
 precisely in the most youthful and exuberant age of a people, unless
 there is really a higher delight experienced in all this?
 
 For the fact that things actually take such a tragic course would
 least of all explain the origin of a form of art; provided that art
 is not merely an imitation of the reality of nature, but in truth a
 metaphysical supplement to the reality of nature, placed alongside
 thereof for its conquest. Tragic myth, in so far as it really belongs
 to art, also fully participates in this transfiguring metaphysical
 purpose of art in general: What does it transfigure, however, when it
 presents the phenomenal world in the guise of the suffering hero? Least
 of all the "reality" of this phenomenal world, for it says to us: "Look
 at this! Look carefully! It is your life! It is the hour-hand of your
 clock of existence!"
 
 And myth has displayed this life, in order thereby to transfigure it
 to us? If not, how shall we account for the sthetic pleasure with
 which we make even these representations pass before us? I am inquiring
 concerning the sthetic pleasure, and am well aware that many of
 these representations may moreover occasionally create even a moral
 delectation, say under the form of pity or of a moral triumph. But he
 who would derive the effect of the tragic exclusively from these moral
 sources, as was usually the case far too long in sthetics, let him not
 think that he has done anything for Art thereby; for Art must above all
 insist on purity in her domain. For the explanation of tragic myth the
 very first requirement is that the pleasure which characterises it must
 be sought in the purely sthetic sphere, without encroaching on the
 domain of pity, fear, or the morally-sublime. How can the ugly and the
 discordant, the substance of tragic myth, excite an sthetic pleasure?
 
 Here it is necessary to raise ourselves with a daring bound into a
 metaphysics of Art. I repeat, therefore, my former proposition, that
 it is only as an sthetic phenomenon that existence and the world,
 appear justified: and in this sense it is precisely the function of
 tragic myth to convince us that even the Ugly and Discordant is an
 artistic game which the will, in the eternal fulness of its joy, plays
 with itself. But this not easily comprehensible proto-phenomenon of
 Dionysian Art becomes, in a direct way, singularly intelligible, and
 is immediately apprehended in the wonderful significance of _musical
 dissonance:_ just as in general it is music alone, placed in contrast
 to the world, which can give us an idea as to what is meant by the
 justification of the world as an sthetic phenomenon. The joy that the
 tragic myth excites has the same origin as the joyful sensation of
 dissonance in music. The Dionysian, with its primitive joy experienced
 in pain itself, is the common source of music and tragic myth.
 
 Is it not possible that by calling to our aid the musical relation of
 dissonance, the difficult problem of tragic effect may have meanwhile
 been materially facilitated? For we now understand what it means to
 wish to view tragedy and at the same time to have a longing beyond the
 viewing: a frame of mind, which, as regards the artistically employed
 dissonance, we should simply have to characterise by saying that we
 desire to hear and at the same time have a longing beyond the hearing.
 That striving for the infinite, the pinion-flapping of longing,
 accompanying the highest delight in the clearly-perceived reality,
 remind one that in both states we have to recognise a Dionysian
 phenomenon, which again and again reveals to us anew the playful
 up-building and demolishing of the world of individuals as the efflux
 of a primitive delight, in like manner as when Heraclitus the Obscure
 compares the world-building power to a playing child which places
 stones here and there and builds sandhills only to overthrow them again.
 
 Hence, in order to form a true estimate of the Dionysian capacity of
 a people, it would seem that we must think not only of their music,
 but just as much of their tragic myth, the second witness of this
 capacity. Considering this most intimate relationship between music
 and myth, we may now in like manner suppose that a degeneration and
 depravation of the one involves a deterioration of the other: if it be
 true at all that the weakening of the myth is generally expressive of
 a debilitation of the Dionysian capacity. Concerning both, however,
 a glance at the development of the German genius should not leave
 us in any doubt; in the opera just as in the abstract character of
 our myth-less existence, in an art sunk to pastime just as in a life
 guided by concepts, the inartistic as well as life-consuming nature
 of Socratic optimism had revealed itself to us. Yet there have been
 indications to console us that nevertheless in some inaccessible abyss
 the German spirit still rests and dreams, undestroyed, in glorious
 health, profundity, and Dionysian strength, like a knight sunk in
 slumber: from which abyss the Dionysian song rises to us to let us
 know that this German knight even still dreams his primitive Dionysian
 myth in blissfully earnest visions. Let no one believe that the German
 spirit has for ever lost its mythical home when it still understands so
 obviously the voices of the birds which tell of that home. Some day it
 will find itself awake in all the morning freshness of a deep sleep:
 then it will slay the dragons, destroy the malignant dwarfs, and waken
 Brnnhilde--and Wotan's spear itself will be unable to obstruct its
 course!
 
 My friends, ye who believe in Dionysian music, ye know also what
 tragedy means to us. There we have tragic myth, born anew from
 music,--and in this latest birth ye can hope for everything and forget
 what is most afflicting. What is most afflicting to all of us, however,
 is--the prolonged degradation in which the German genius has lived
 estranged from house and home in the service of malignant dwarfs. Ye
 understand my allusion--as ye will also, in conclusion, understand my
 hopes.
 
 
 
 25.
 
 
 Music and tragic myth are equally the expression of the Dionysian
 capacity of a people, and are inseparable from each other. Both
 originate in an ultra Apollonian sphere of art; both transfigure a
 region in the delightful accords of which all dissonance, just like
 the terrible picture of the world, dies charmingly away; both play
 with the sting of displeasure, trusting to their most potent magic;
 both justify thereby the existence even of the "worst world." Here
 the Dionysian, as compared with the Apollonian, exhibits itself as
 the eternal and original artistic force, which in general calls into
 existence the entire world of phenomena: in the midst of which a new
 transfiguring appearance becomes necessary, in order to keep alive the
 animated world of individuation. If we could conceive an incarnation
 of dissonance--and what is man but that?--then, to be able to live
 this dissonance would require a glorious illusion which would spread
 a veil of beauty over its peculiar nature. This is the true function
 of Apollo as deity of art: in whose name we comprise all the countless
 manifestations of the fair realm of illusion, which each moment render
 life in general worth living and make one impatient for the experience
 of the next moment.
 
 At the same time, just as much of this basis of all existence--the
 Dionysian substratum of the world--is allowed to enter into the
 consciousness of human beings, as can be surmounted again by the
 Apollonian transfiguring power, so that these two art-impulses are
 constrained to develop their powers in strictly mutual proportion,
 according to the law of eternal justice. When the Dionysian powers rise
 with such vehemence as we experience at present, there can be no doubt
 that, veiled in a cloud, Apollo has already descended to us; whose
 grandest beautifying influences a coming generation will perhaps behold.
 
 That this effect is necessary, however, each one would most surely
 perceive by intuition, if once he found himself carried back--even in
 a dream--into an Old-Hellenic existence. In walking under high Ionic
 colonnades, looking upwards to a horizon defined by clear and noble
 lines, with reflections of his transfigured form by his side in shining
 marble, and around him solemnly marching or quietly moving men, with
 harmoniously sounding voices and rhythmical pantomime, would he not in
 the presence of this perpetual influx of beauty have to raise his hand
 to Apollo and exclaim: "Blessed race of Hellenes! How great Dionysus
 must be among you, when the Delian god deems such charms necessary
 to cure you of your dithyrambic madness!"--To one in this frame of
 mind, however, an aged Athenian, looking up to him with the sublime
 eye of schylus, might answer: "Say also this, thou curious stranger:
 what sufferings this people must have undergone, in order to be able
 to become thus beautiful! But now follow me to a tragic play, and
 sacrifice with me in the temple of both the deities!"
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX.
 
 
 [Late in the year 1888, not long before he was overcome by his sudden
 attack of insanity, Nietzsche wrote down a few notes concerning
 his early work, the _Birth of Tragedy._ These were printed in his
 sister's biography (_Das Leben Friedrich Nietzsches,_ vol. ii. pt.
 i. pp. 102 ff.), and are here translated as likely to be of interest
 to readers of this remarkable work. They also appear in the _Ecce
 Homo._--TRANSLATOR'S NOTE.]
 
 "To be just to the _Birth of Tragedy_(1872), one will have to forget
 some few things. It has _wrought effects,_ it even fascinated through
 that wherein it was amiss--through its application to _Wagnerism,_
 just as if this Wagnerism were symptomatic of _a rise and going up._
 And just on that account was the book an event in Wagner's life: from
 thence and only from thence were great hopes linked to the name of
 Wagner. Even to-day people remind me, sometimes right in the midst of
 a talk on _Parsifal,_ that _I_ and none other have it on my conscience
 that such a high opinion of the _cultural value_ of this movement came
 to the top. More than once have I found the book referred to as 'the
 _Re_-birth of Tragedy out of the Spirit of Music': one only had an ear
 for a new formula of _Wagner's_ art, aim, task,--and failed to hear
 withal what was at bottom valuable therein. 'Hellenism and Pessimism'
 had been a more unequivocal title: namely, as a first lesson on the
 way in which the Greeks got the better of pessimism,--on the means
 whereby they _overcame_ it. Tragedy simply proves that the Greeks were
 _no_ pessimists: Schopenhauer was mistaken here as he was mistaken
 in all other things. Considered with some neutrality, the _Birth of
 Tragedy_ appears very unseasonable: one would not even dream that
 it was _begun_ amid the thunders of the battle of Wrth. I thought
 these problems through and through before the walls of Metz in cold
 September nights, in the midst of the work of nursing the sick; one
 might even believe the book to be fifty years older. It is politically
 indifferent--un-German one will say to-day,--it smells shockingly
 Hegelian, in but a few formul does it scent of Schopenhauer's
 funereal perfume. An 'idea'--the antithesis of 'Dionysian _versus_
 Apollonian'--translated into metaphysics; history itself as the
 evolution of this 'idea'; the antithesis dissolved into oneness
 in Tragedy; through this optics things that had never yet looked
 into one another's face, confronted of a sudden, and illumined and
 _comprehended_ through one another: for instance, Opera and Revolution.
 The two decisive _innovations_ of the book are, on the one hand, the
 comprehension of the _Dionysian_ phenomenon among the Greeks (it gives
 the first psychology thereof, it sees therein the One root of all
 Grecian art); on the other, the comprehension of Socratism: Socrates
 diagnosed for the first time as the tool of Grecian dissolution, as
 a typical decadent. 'Rationality' _against_ instinct! 'Rationality'
 at any price as a dangerous, as a life-undermining force! Throughout
 the whole book a deep hostile silence on Christianity: it is neither
 Apollonian nor Dionysian; it _negatives_ all _sthetic_ values (the
 only values recognised by the _Birth of Tragedy),_ it is in the widest
 sense nihilistic, whereas in the Dionysian symbol the utmost limit
 of _affirmation_ is reached. Once or twice the Christian priests are
 alluded to as a 'malignant kind of dwarfs,' as 'subterraneans.'"
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 "This beginning is singular beyond measure. I had for my own inmost
 experience _discovered_ the only symbol and counterpart of history,--I
 had just thereby been the first to grasp the wonderful phenomenon
 of the Dionysian. And again, through my diagnosing Socrates as a
 decadent, I had given a wholly unequivocal proof of how little risk
 the trustworthiness of my psychological grasp would run of being
 weakened by some moralistic idiosyncrasy--to view morality itself as a
 symptom of decadence is an innovation, a novelty of the first rank in
 the history of knowledge. How far I had leaped in either case beyond
 the smug shallow-pate-gossip of optimism _contra_ pessimism! I was
 the first to see the intrinsic antithesis: here, the _degenerating_
 instinct which, with subterranean vindictiveness, turns against life
 (Christianity, the philosophy of Schopenhauer, in a certain sense
 already the philosophy of Plato, all idealistic systems as typical
 forms), and there, a formula of _highest affirmation,_ born of fullness
 and overfullness, a yea-saying without reserve to suffering's self,
 to guilt's self, to all that is questionable and strange in existence
 itself. This final, cheerfullest, exuberantly mad-and-merriest Yea to
 life is not only the highest insight, it is also the _deepest,_ it
 is that which is most rigorously confirmed and upheld by truth and
 science. Naught that is, is to be deducted, naught is dispensable; the
 phases of existence rejected by the Christians and other nihilists are
 even of an infinitely higher order in the hierarchy of values than
 that which the instinct of decadence sanctions, yea durst _sanction._
 To comprehend this _courage_ is needed, and, as a condition thereof, a
 surplus of _strength_: for precisely in degree as courage _dares_ to
 thrust forward, precisely according to the measure of strength, does
 one approach truth. Perception, the yea-saying to reality, is as much
 a necessity to the strong as to the weak, under the inspiration of
 weakness, cowardly shrinking, and _flight_ from reality--the 'ideal.'
 ... They are not free to perceive: the decadents have _need_ of the
 lie,--it is one of their conditions of self-preservation. Whoso not
 only comprehends the word Dionysian, but also grasps his _self_ in
 this word, requires no refutation of Plato or of Christianity or of
 Schopenhauer--_he smells the putrefaction._"
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 "To what extent I had just thereby found the concept 'tragic,' the
 definitive perception of the psychology of tragedy, I have but lately
 stated in the _Twilight of the Idols,_ page 139 (1st edit.): 'The
 affirmation of life, even in its most unfamiliar and severe problems,
 the will to life, enjoying its own inexhaustibility in the sacrifice
 of its highest types,--_that_ is what I called Dionysian, that is
 what I divined as the bridge to a psychology of the _tragic_ poet.
 Not in order to get rid of terror and pity, not to purify from a
 dangerous passion by its vehement discharge (it was thus that Aristotle
 misunderstood it); but, beyond terror and pity, _to realise in fact_
 the eternal delight of becoming, that delight which even involves in
 itself the _joy of annihilating!_[1] In this sense I have the right
 to understand myself to be the first _tragic philosopher_--that is,
 the utmost antithesis and antipode to a pessimistic philosopher. Prior
 to myself there is no such translation of the Dionysian into the
 philosophic pathos: there lacks the _tragic wisdom,_--I have sought
 in vain for an indication thereof even among the _great_ Greeks of
 philosophy, the thinkers of the two centuries _before_ Socrates. A
 doubt still possessed me as touching _Heraclitus,_ in whose proximity
 I in general begin to feel warmer and better than anywhere else. The
 affirmation of transiency _and annihilation,_ to wit the decisive
 factor in a Dionysian _philosophy,_ the yea-saying to antithesis
 and war, to _becoming,_ with radical rejection even of the concept
 '_being,_'--that I must directly acknowledge as, of all thinking
 hitherto, the nearest to my own. The doctrine of 'eternal recurrence,'
 that is, of the unconditioned and infinitely repeated cycle of all
 things--this doctrine of Zarathustra's _might_ after all have been
 already taught by Heraclitus. At any rate the portico[2] which
 inherited well-nigh all its fundamental conceptions from Heraclitus,
 shows traces thereof."
 
 [Illustration: _Facsimile of Nietzsches handwriting._]
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 "In this book speaks a prodigious hope. In fine, I see no reason
 whatever for taking back my hope of a Dionysian future for music. Let
 us cast a glance a century ahead, let us suppose my assault upon two
 millenniums of anti-nature and man-vilification succeeds! That new
 party of life which will take in hand the greatest of all tasks, the
 upbreeding of mankind to something higher,--add thereto the relentless
 annihilation of all things degenerating and parasitic, will again make
 possible on earth that _too-much of life,_ from which there also must
 needs grow again the Dionysian state. I promise a _tragic_ age: the
 highest art in the yea-saying to life, tragedy, will be born anew, when
 mankind have behind them the consciousness of the hardest but most
 necessary wars, _without suffering therefrom._ A psychologist might
 still add that what I heard in my younger years in Wagnerian music had
 in general naught to do with Wagner; that when I described Wagnerian
 music I described what _I_ had heard, that I had instinctively to
 translate and transfigure all into the new spirit which I bore within
 myself...."
 
 
 [1] Mr. Common's translation, pp. 227-28.
 
 [2] Greek: .
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S NOTE.
 
 
 While the translator flatters himself that this version of Nietzsche's
 early work--having been submitted to unsparingly scrutinising eyes--is
 not altogether unworthy of the original, he begs to state that he
 holds twentieth-century English to be a rather unsatisfactory vehicle
 for philosophical thought. Accordingly, in conjunction with his
 friend Dr. Ernest Lacy, he has prepared a second, more unconventional
 translation,--in brief, a translation which will enable one whose
 knowledge of English extends to, say, the period of Elizabeth, to
 appreciate Nietzsche in more forcible language, because the language of
 a stronger age. It is proposed to provide this second translation with
 an appendix, containing many references to the translated writings of
 Wagner and Schopenhauer; to the works of Pater, Browning, Burckhardt,
 Rohde, and others, and a summmary and index.
 
 For help in preparing the present translation, the translator wishes
 to express his thanks to his friends Dr. Ernest Lacy, Litt.D.; Dr.
 James Waddell Tupper, Ph.D.; Prof. Harry Max Ferren; Mr. James M'Kirdy,
 Pittsburg; and Mr. Thomas Common, Edinburgh.
 
                                  WILLIAM AUGUST HAUSSMANN, A.B., Ph.D.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Marc D'Hooghe at http://www.freeliterature.org
 (Images generously made available by the Hathi Trust.)
 
 
 
 
 
 EARLY GREEK PHILOSOPHY & OTHER ESSAYS
 
 By
 
 FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 MAXIMILIAN A. MGGE
 
 AUTHOR OF "FR. NIETZSCHE, HIS LIFE AND WORK," ETC.
 
 
 The Complete Works of Friedrich Nietzsche
 
 The First Complete and Authorised English Translation
 
 Edited by Dr Oscar Levy
 
 Volume Two
 
 T.N. FOULIS
 
 13 & 15 FREDERICK STREET
 
 EDINBURGH: AND LONDON
 
 1911
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE
 
 1. THE GREEK STATE--Preface to an unwritten book (1871)
 
 2. THE GREEK WOMAN--Fragment (1871)
 
 3. ON MUSIC AND WORDS--Fragment (1871)
 
 4. HOMER'S CONTEST--Preface to an unwritten book (1872)
 
 5. THE RELATION OF SCHOPENHAUER'S PHILOSOPHY TO A GERMAN CULTURE
 --Preface to an unwritten book (1872)
 
 6. PHILOSOPHY DURING THE TRAGIC AGE OF THE GREEKS (1873)
 
 7. ON TRUTH AND FALSITY IN THEIR ULTRAMORAL SENSE (1873)
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE
 
 
 The essays contained in this volume treat of various subjects. With
 the exception of perhaps one we must consider all these papers as
 fragments. Written during the early Seventies, and intended mostly as
 prefaces, they are extremely interesting, since traces of Nietzsche's
 later tenets--like Slave and Master morality, the Superman--can be
 found everywhere. But they are also very valuable on account of the
 young philosopher's daring and able handling of difficult and abstruse
 subjects. "Truth and Falsity," and "The Greek Woman" are probably the
 two essays which will prove most attractive to the average reader.
 
 In the essay on THE GREEK STATE the two tenets mentioned above
 are clearly discernible, though the Superman still goes by the
 Schopenhauerian label "genius." Our philosopher attacks the modern
 ideas of the "dignity of man" and of the "dignity of labour," because
 Existence seems to be without worth and dignity. The preponderance
 of such illusory ideas is due to the political power nowadays vested
 in the "slaves." The Greeks saw no dignity in labour. They saw the
 necessity of it, and the necessity of slavery, but felt ashamed of
 both. Not even the labour of the artist did they admire, although they
 praised his completed work.
 
 If the Greeks perished through their slavery, one thing is still more
 certain: we shall perish through the lack of slavery. To the essence
 of Culture slavery is innate. It is part of it. A vast multitude must
 labour and "slave" in order that a few may lead an existence devoted to
 beauty and art.
 
 Strife and war are necessary for the welfare of the State. War
 consecrates and purines the State. The purpose of the military State
 is the creating of the military genius, the ruthless conqueror, the
 War-lord. There also exists a mysterious connection between the State
 in general and the creating of the genius.
 
 In THE GREEK WOMAN, Nietzsche, the man who said, "One cannot think
 highly enough of women," delineates his ideal of woman. Penelope,
 Antigone, Electra are his ideal types.
 
 Plato's dictum that in the perfect State the family would cease to
 exist, belongs to the most intimate things uttered about the relation
 between women and the State. The Greek woman as mother had to vegetate
 in obscurity, to lead a kind of Cranfordian existence for the greater
 welfare of the body politic. Only in Greek antiquity did woman occupy
 her proper position, and for this reason she was more honoured than she
 has ever been since. Pythia was the mouthpiece, the symbol of Greek
 unity.
 
 ON MUSIC AND WORDS. Music is older, more fundamental than language.
 Music is an expression of cosmic consciousness. Language is only a
 gesture-symbolism.
 
 It is true the music of every people was at first allied to lyric
 poetry; "absolute music" always appeared much later. But that is due
 to the double nature in the essence of language. The _tone_ of the
 speaker expresses the basic pleasure- and displeasure-sensations of the
 individual. These form the tonal subsoil common to all languages; they
 are comprehensible everywhere. Language itself is a super-structure on
 that subsoil; it is a gesture-symbolism for all the other conceptions
 which man adds to that subsoil.
 
 The endeavour to illustrate a poem by music is futile. The text of
 an opera is therefore quite negligible. Modern opera in its music is
 therefore often only a stimulant or a remembrancer for set, stereotyped
 feelings. Great music, _i.e.,_ Dionysean music, makes us forget to
 listen to the words.
 
 HOMER'S CONTEST. The Greek genius acknowledged strife, struggle,
 contest to be necessary in this life. Only through competition and
 emulation will the Common-Wealth thrive. Yet there was no unbridled
 ambition. Everyone's individual endeavours were subordinated to the
 welfare of the community. The curse of present-day contest is that it
 does not do the same.
 
 In THE RELATION OF SCHOPENHAUER'S PHILOSOPHY TO A GERMAN CULTURE an
 amusing and yet serious attack is made on the hollow would-be culture
 of the German Philistines who after the Franco-Prussian war were
 swollen with self-conceit, self-sufficiency, and were a great danger to
 real Culture. Nietzsche points out Schopenhauer's great philosophy as
 the only possible means of escaping the humdrum of Philistia with its
 hypocrisy and intellectual ostrichisation.
 
 The essay on GREEK PHILOSOPHY DURING THE TRAGIC AGE is a performance
 of great interest to the scholar. It brims with ideas. The Hegelian
 School, especially Zeller, has shown what an important place is held by
 the earlier thinkers in the history of Greek thought and how necessary
 a knowledge of their work is for all who wish to understand Plato and
 Aristotle. _Diels'_ great book: "Die Fragmente der Vorsokratiker",
 _Benn's, Burnet's_ and _Fairbanks'_ books we may regard as the
 peristyle through which we enter the temple of Early Greek Philosophy.
 Nietzsche's essay then is like a beautiful festoon swinging between the
 columns erected by Diels and the others out of the marble of facts.
 
 Beauty and the personal equation are the two "leitmotive" of
 Nietzsche's history of the pre-Socratian philosophers. Especially
 does he lay stress upon the personal equation, since that is the
 only permanent item of interest, considering that every "System"
 crumbles into nothing with the appearance of a new thinker. In this
 way Nietzsche treats of _Thales, Anaximander, Heraclitus, Parmenides,
 Xenophanes, Anaxagoras._ There are also some sketches of a draft for
 an intended but never accomplished continuation, in which Empedocles,
 Democritus and Plato were to be dealt with.
 
 Probably the most popular of the Essays in this book will prove to be
 the one on TRUTH AND FALSITY. It is an epistemological rhapsody on the
 relativity of truth, on "Appearance and Reality," on "perceptual flux"
 versus--"conceptual conceit."
 
 Man's intellect is only a means in the struggle for existence, a means
 taking the place of the animal's horns and teeth. It adapts itself
 especially to deception and dissimulation.
 
 There are no absolute truths. Truth is relative and always imperfect.
 Yet fictitious values fixed by convention and utility are set down as
 truth. The liar does not use these standard coins of the realm. He is
 hated; not out of love for truth, no, but because he is dangerous.
 
 Our words never hit the essence, the "X" of a thing, but indicate only
 external characteristics. Language is the columbarium of the ideas, the
 cemetery of perceptions.
 
 Truths are metaphors, illusions, anthropomorph isms about which one has
 forgotten that they are such. There are different truths to different
 beings. Like a spider man sits in the web of his truths and ideas. He
 wants to be deceived. By means of error he mostly lives; truth is often
 fatal. When the liar, the story-teller, the poet, the rhapsodist lie to
 him without hurting him he--loves them!--
 
 The text underlying this translation is that of Vol. I. of the
 "Taschenausgabe." One or two obscure passages I hope my conjectures may
 have elucidated. The dates following the titles indicate the year when
 these essays were written.
 
 In no other work have I felt so deeply the great need of the science of
 Signifies with its ultimate international standardisation of terms, as
 attempted by Eisler and Baldwin. I hope, however, I have succeeded in
 conveying accurately the meaning of the author in spite of a certain
 _looseness_ in his philosophical terminology.
 
 The English language is somewhat at a disadvantage through its lack
 of a Noun-Infinitive. I can best illustrate this by a passage from
 _Parmenides_:
 
      '     ,  ' 
   '   .
 
 In his usual masterly manner _Diels_ translates these lines with: "Das
 Sagen und Denken musz ein Seiendes sein. Denn das Sein existiert, das
 Nichts existiert nicht; das heisz ich dich wohl zu beherzigen." On
 the other hand in _Fairbanks'_ "version" we read: "It is necessary
 both to say and to think that being is; for it is possible that being
 is, and it is impossible that not being is; this is what I bid thee
 ponder." In order to avoid a similar obscurity, throughout the paper on
 "EARLY GREEK PHILOSOPHY" I have rendered "das Seiende" ( ) with
 "Existent", "das Nicht-Seiende" with "Non-Existent"; "das Sein" ()
 with "Being" and "das Nicht-Sein" with "Not-Being."
 
 I am directly or indirectly indebted for many suggestions to several
 friends of mine, especially to two of my colleagues, J. Charlton
 Hipkins, M.A., and R. Miller, B.A., for their patient revision of the
 whole of the proofs.
 
 M. A. MGGE.
 
 LONDON, _July_ 1911.
 
 
 
 
 THE GREEK STATE
 
 
 Preface to an Unwritten Book (1871)
 
 
 We moderns have an advantage over the Greeks in two ideas, which are
 given as it were as a compensation to a world behaving thoroughly
 slavishly and yet at the same time anxiously eschewing the word
 "slave": we talk of the "dignity of man" and of the "dignity of
 labour." Everybody worries in order miserably to perpetuate a miserable
 existence; this awful need compels him to consuming labour; man
 (or, more exactly, the human intellect) seduced by the "Will" now
 occasionally marvels at labour as something dignified. However in
 order that labour might have a claim on titles of honour, it would be
 necessary above all, that Existence itself, to which labour after all
 is only a painful means, should have more dignity and value than it
 appears to have had, up to the present, to serious philosophies and
 religions. What else may we find in the labour-need of all the millions
 but the impulse to exist at any price, the same all-powerful impulse by
 which stunted plants stretch their roots through earthless rocks!
 
 Out of this awful struggle for existence only individuals can emerge,
 and they are at once occupied with the noble phantoms of artistic
 culture, lest they should arrive at practical pessimism, which Nature
 abhors as her exact opposite. In the modern world, which, compared
 with the Greek, usually produces only abnormalities and centaurs, in
 which the individual, like that fabulous creature in the beginning of
 the Horatian Art of Poetry, is jumbled together out of pieces, here in
 the modern world in one and the same man the greed of the struggle for
 existence and the need for art show themselves at the same time: out of
 this unnatural amalgamation has originated the dilemma, to excuse and
 to consecrate that first greed before this need for art. Therefore; we
 believe in the "Dignity of man" and the "Dignity of labour."
 
 The Greeks did not require such conceptual hallucinations, for among
 them the idea that labour is a disgrace is expressed with startling
 frankness; and another piece of wisdom, more hidden and less
 articulate, but everywhere alive, added that the human thing also was
 an ignominious and piteous nothing and the "dream of a shadow." Labour
 is a disgrace, because existence has no value in itself; but even
 though this very existence in the alluring embellishment of artistic
 illusions shines forth and really seems to have a value in itself, then
 that proposition is still valid that labour is a disgrace--a disgrace
 indeed by the fact that it is impossible for man, fighting for the
 continuance of bare existence, to become an _artist._ In modern times
 it is not the art-needing man but the slave who determines the general
 conceptions, the slave who according to his nature must give deceptive
 names to all conditions in order to be able to live. Such phantoms as
 the dignity of man, the dignity of labour, are the needy products of
 slavedom hiding itself from itself. Woful time, in which the slave
 requires such conceptions, in which he is incited to think about and
 beyond himself! Cursed seducers, who have destroyed the slave's state
 of innocence by the fruit of the tree of knowledge! Now the slave must
 vainly scrape through from one day to another with transparent lies
 recognisable to every one of deeper insight, such as the alleged "equal
 rights of all" or the so-called "fundamental rights of man," of man as
 such, or the "dignity of labour." Indeed he is not to understand at
 what stage and at what height dignity can first be mentioned--namely,
 at the point, where the individual goes wholly beyond himself and no
 longer has to work and to produce in order to preserve his individual
 existence.
 
 And even on this height of "labour" the Greek at times is overcome by
 a feeling, that looks like shame. In one place Plutarch with earlier
 Greek instinct says that no nobly born youth on beholding the Zeus in
 Pisa would have the desire to become himself a Phidias, or on seeing
 the Hera in Argos, to become himself a Polyklet; and just as little
 would he wish to be Anacreon, Philetas or Archilochus, however much he
 might revel in their poetry. To the Greek the work of the artist falls
 just as much under the undignified conception of labour as any ignoble
 craft. But if the compelling force of the artistic impulse operates in
 him, then he _must_ produce and submit himself to that need of labour.
 And as a father admires the beauty and the gift of his child but thinks
 of the act of procreation with shamefaced dislike, so it was with the
 Greek. The joyful astonishment at the beautiful has not blinded him
 as to its origin which appeared to him, like all "Becoming" in nature,
 to be a powerful necessity, a forcing of itself into existence. That
 feeling by which the process of procreation is considered as something
 shamefacedly to be hidden, although by it man serves a higher purpose
 than his individual preservation, the same feeling veiled also the
 origin of the great works of art, in spite of the fact that through
 them a higher form of existence is inaugurated, just as through
 that other act comes a new generation. The feeling of _shame_ seems
 therefore to occur where man is merely a tool of manifestations of will
 infinitely greater than he is permitted to consider himself in the
 isolated shape of the individual.
 
 Now we have the general idea to which are to be subordinated the
 feelings which the Greek had with regard to labour and slavery. Both
 were considered by them as a necessary disgrace, of which one feels
 _ashamed,_ as a disgrace and as a necessity at the same time. In this
 feeling of shame is hidden the unconscious discernment that the real
 aim _needs_ those conditional factors, but that in that _need_ lies the
 fearful and beast-of-prey-like quality of the Sphinx Nature, who in
 the glorification of the artistically free culture-life so beautifully
 stretches forth her virgin-body. Culture, which is chiefly a real need
 for art, rests upon a terrible basis: the latter however makes itself
 known in the twilight sensation of shame. In order that there may be a
 broad, deep, and fruitful soil for the development of art, the enormous
 majority must, in the service of a minority, be slavishly subjected
 to life's struggle, to a _greater_ degree than their own wants
 necessitate. At their cost, through the surplus of their labour, that
 privileged class is to be relieved from the struggle for existence, in
 order to create and to satisfy a new world of want.
 
 Accordingly we must accept this cruel sounding truth, that _slavery
 is of the essence of Culture;_ a truth of course, which leaves no
 doubt as to the absolute value of Existence. _This truth_ is the
 vulture, that gnaws at the liver of the Promethean promoter of Culture.
 The misery of toiling men must still increase in order to make the
 production of the world of art possible to a small number of Olympian
 men. Here is to be found the source of that secret wrath nourished
 by Communists and Socialists of all times, and also by their feebler
 descendants, the white race of the "Liberals," not only against
 the arts, but also against classical antiquity. If Culture really
 rested upon the will of a people, if here inexorable powers did not
 rule, powers which are law and barrier to the individual, then the
 contempt for Culture, the glorification of a "poorness in spirit," the
 iconoclastic annihilation of artistic claims would be _more than_ an
 insurrection of the suppressed masses against drone-like individuals;
 it would be the cry of compassion tearing down the walls of Culture;
 the desire for justice, for the equalization of suffering, would
 swamp all other ideas. In fact here and there sometimes an exuberant
 degree of compassion has for a short time opened all the flood gates
 of Culture-life; a rainbow of compassionate love and of peace appeared
 with the first radiant rise of Christianity and under it was born
 Christianity's most beautiful fruit, the gospel according to St John.
 But there are also instances to show that powerful religions for long
 periods petrify a given degree of Culture, and cut off with inexorable
 sickle everything that still grows on strongly and luxuriantly. For it
 is not to be forgotten that the same cruelty, which we found in the
 essence of every Culture, lies also in the essence of every powerful
 religion and in general in the essence of _power,_ which is always
 evil; so that we shall understand it just as well, when a Culture is
 shattering, with a cry for liberty or at least justice, a too highly
 piled bulwark of religious claims. That which in this "sorry scheme" of
 things will live (_i.e.,_ must live), is at the bottom of its nature a
 reflex of the primal-pain and primal-contradiction, and must therefore
 strike our eyes--"an organ fashioned for this world and earth"--as
 an insatiable greed for existence and an eternal self-contradiction,
 within the form of time, therefore as Becoming. Every moment devours
 the preceding one, every birth is the death of innumerable beings;
 begetting, living, murdering, all is one. Therefore we may compare
 this grand Culture with a blood-stained victor, who in his triumphal
 procession carries the defeated along as slaves chained to his chariot,
 slaves whom a beneficent power has so blinded that, almost crushed by
 the wheels of the chariot, they nevertheless still exclaim: "Dignity of
 labour!" "Dignity of Man!" The voluptuous Cleopatra-Culture throws ever
 again the most priceless pearls, the tears of compassion for the misery
 of slaves, into her golden goblet. Out of the emasculation of modern
 man has been born the enormous social distress of the present time,
 not out of the true and deep commiseration for that misery; and if it
 should be true that the Greeks perished through their slavedom then
 another fact is much more certain, that we shall perish through the
 _lack_ of slavery. Slavedom did not appear in any way objectionable,
 much less abominable, either to early Christianity or to the Germanic
 race. What an uplifting effect on us has the contemplation of the
 medival bondman, with his legal and moral relations,--relations that
 were inwardly strong and tender,--towards the man of higher rank, with
 the profound fencing-in of his narrow existence--how uplifting!--and
 how reproachful!
 
 He who cannot reflect upon the position of affairs in Society without
 melancholy, who has learnt to conceive of it as the continual painful
 birth of those privileged Culture-men, in whose service everything
 else must be devoured--he will no longer be deceived by that false
 glamour, which the moderns have spread over the origin and meaning
 of the State. For what can the State mean to us, if not the means by
 which that social-process described just now is to be fused and to
 be guaranteed in its unimpeded continuance? Be the sociable instinct
 in individual man as strong as it may, it is only the iron clamp of
 the State that constrains the large masses upon one another in such a
 fashion that a chemical decomposition of Society, with its pyramid-like
 super-structure, is _bound_ to take place. Whence however originates
 this sudden power of the State, whose aim lies much beyond the insight
 and beyond the egoism of the individual? How did the slave, the blind
 mole of Culture, _originate_? The Greeks in their instinct relating
 to the law of nations have betrayed it to us, in an instinct, which
 even in the ripest fulness of their civilisation and humanity never
 ceased to utter as out of a brazen mouth such words as: "to the victor
 belongs the vanquished, with wife and child, life and property. Power
 gives the first _right_ and there is no right, which at bottom is not
 presumption, usurpation, violence."
 
 Here again we see with what pitiless inflexibility Nature, in order
 to arrive at Society, forges for herself the cruel tool of the
 State--namely, that _conqueror_ with the iron hand, who is nothing else
 than the objectivation of the instinct indicated. By the indefinable
 greatness and power of such conquerors the spectator feels, that they
 are only the means of an intention manifesting itself through them
 and yet hiding itself from them. The weaker forces attach themselves
 to them with such mysterious speed, and transform themselves so
 wonderfully, in the sudden swelling of that violent avalanche, under
 the charm of that creative kernel, into an affinity hitherto not
 existing, that it seems as if a magic will were emanating from them.
 
 Now when we see how little the vanquished trouble themselves after a
 short time about the horrible origin of the State, so that history
 informs us of no class of events worse than the origins of those
 sudden, violent, bloody and, at least in _one_ point, inexplicable
 usurpations: when hearts involuntarily go out towards the magic of
 the growing State with the presentiment of an invisible deep purpose,
 where the calculating intellect is enabled to see an addition of forces
 only; when now the State is even contemplated with fervour as the
 goal and ultimate aim of the sacrifices and duties of the individual:
 then out of all that speaks the enormous necessity of the State,
 without which Nature might not succeed in coming, through Society,
 to her deliverance in semblance, in the mirror of the genius. What
 discernments does the instinctive pleasure in the State not overcome!
 One would indeed feel inclined to think that a man who looks into the
 origin of the State will henceforth seek his salvation at an awful
 distance from it; and where can one not see the monuments of its
 origin--devastated lands, destroyed cities, brutalised men, devouring
 hatred of nations! The State, of ignominiously low birth, for the
 majority of men a continually flowing source of hardship, at frequently
 recurring periods the consuming torch of mankind--and yet a word, at
 which we forget ourselves, a battle cry, which has filled men with
 enthusiasm for innumerable really heroic deeds, perhaps the highest and
 most venerable object for the blind and egoistic multitude which only
 in the tremendous moments of State-life has the strange expression of
 greatness on its face!
 
 We have, however, to consider the Greeks, with regard to the unique
 sun-height of their art, as the "political men in themselves," and
 certainly history knows of no second instance of such an awful
 unchaining of the political passion, such an unconditional immolation
 of all other interests in the service of this State-instinct; at the
 best one might distinguish the men of the Renascence in Italy with a
 similar title for like reasons and by way of comparison. So overloaded
 is that passion among the Greeks that it begins ever anew to rage
 against itself and to strike its teeth into its own flesh. This bloody
 jealousy of city against city, of party against party, this murderous
 greed of those little wars, the tiger-like triumph over the corpse
 of the slain enemy, in short, the incessant renewal of those Trojan
 scenes of struggle and horror, in the spectacle of which, as a genuine
 Hellene, Homer stands before us absorbed with _delight_--whither does
 this nave barbarism of the Greek State point? What is its excuse
 before the tribunal of eternal justice? Proud and calm, the State steps
 before this tribunal and by the hand it leads the flower of blossoming
 womanhood: Greek society. For this Helena the State waged those
 wars--and what grey-bearded judge could here condemn?--
 
 Under this mysterious connection, which we here divine between State
 and art, political greed and artistic creation, battlefield and work
 of art, we understand by the State, as already remarked, only the
 cramp-iron, which compels the Social process; whereas without the
 State, in the natural _bellum omnium contra omnes_ Society cannot
 strike root at all on a larger scale and beyond the reach of the
 family. Now, after States have been established almost everywhere, that
 bent of the _bellum omnium contra omnes_ concentrates itself from time
 to time into a terrible gathering of war-clouds and discharges itself
 as it were in rare but so much the more violent shocks and lightning
 flashes. But in consequence of the effect of that _bellum,_--an effect
 which is turned inwards and compressed,--Society is given time during
 the intervals to germinate and burst into leaf, in order, as soon as
 warmer days come, to let the shining blossoms of genius sprout forth.
 
 In face of the political world of the Hellenes, I will not hide those
 phenomena of the present in which I believe I discern dangerous
 atrophies of the political sphere equally critical for art and society.
 If there should exist men, who as it were through birth are placed
 outside the national-and State-instincts, who consequently have to
 esteem the State only in so far as they conceive that it coincides
 with their own interest, then such men will necessarily imagine as the
 ultimate political aim the most undisturbed collateral existence of
 great political communities possible, which _they_ might be permitted
 to pursue their own purposes without restriction. With this idea in
 their heads they will promote _that_ policy which will offer the
 greatest security to these purposes; whereas it is unthinkable, that
 they, against their intentions, guided perhaps by an unconscious
 instinct, should sacrifice themselves for the State-tendency,
 unthinkable because they lack that very instinct. All other citizens
 of the State are in the dark about what Nature intends with her
 State-instinct within them, and they follow blindly; only those who
 stand outside this instinct know what _they_ want from the State and
 what the State is to grant them. Therefore it is almost unavoidable
 that such men should gain great influence in the State because they
 are allowed to consider it as a _means,_ whereas all the others under
 the sway of those unconscious purposes of the State are themselves
 only means for the fulfilment of the State-purpose. In order now to
 attain, through the medium of the State, the highest furtherance
 of their selfish aims, it is above all necessary, that the State be
 wholly freed from those awfully incalculable war-convulsions so that
 it may be used rationally; and thereby they strive with all their
 might for a condition of things in which war is an impossibility. For
 that purpose the thing to do is first to curtail and to enfeeble the
 political separatisms and factions and through the establishment of
 large _equipoised_ State-bodies and the mutual safeguarding of them
 to make the successful result of an aggressive war and consequently
 war itself the greatest improbability; as on the other hand they will
 endeavour to wrest the question of war and peace from the decision of
 individual lords, in order to be able rather to appeal to the egoism
 of the masses or their representatives; for which purpose they again
 need slowly to dissolve the monarchic instincts of the nations. This
 purpose they attain best through the most general promulgation of
 the liberal optimistic view of the world, which has its roots in the
 doctrines of French Rationalism and the French Revolution, _i.e.,_ in
 a wholly un-Germanic, genuinely neo-Latin shallow and unmetaphysical
 philosophy. I cannot help seeing in the prevailing international
 movements of the present day, and the simultaneous promulgation of
 universal suffrage, the effects of the _fear of war_ above everything
 else, yea I behold behind these movements, those truly international
 homeless money-hermits, as the really alarmed, who, with their
 natural lack of the State-instinct, have learnt to abuse politics as
 a means of the Exchange, and State and Society as an apparatus for
 their own enrichment. Against the deviation of the State-tendency
 into a money-tendency, to be feared from this side, the only remedy
 is war and once again war, in the emotions of which this at least
 becomes obvious, that the State is not founded upon the fear of the
 war-demon, as a protective institution for egoistic individuals, but
 in love to fatherland and prince, it produces an ethical impulse,
 indicative of a much higher destiny. If I therefore designate as a
 dangerous and characteristic sign of the present political situation
 the application of revolutionary thought in the service of a selfish
 State-less money-aristocracy, if at the same time I conceive of the
 enormous dissemination of liberal optimism as the result of modern
 financial affairs fallen into strange hands, and if I imagine all evils
 of social conditions together with the necessary decay of the arts to
 have either germinated from that root or grown together with it, one
 will have to pardon my occasionally chanting a Pan on war. Horribly
 clangs its silvery bow; and although it comes along like the night,
 war is nevertheless Apollo, the true divinity for consecrating and
 purifying the State. First of all, however, as is said in the beginning
 of the "Iliad," he lets fly his arrow on the mules and dogs. Then he
 strikes the men themselves, and everywhere pyres break into flames.
 Be it then pronounced that war is just as much a necessity for the
 State as the slave is for society, and who can avoid this verdict if
 he honestly asks himself about the causes of the never-equalled Greek
 art-perfection?
 
 He who contemplates war and its uniformed possibility, the _soldier's
 profession,_ with respect to the hitherto described nature of the
 State, must arrive at the conviction, that through war and in the
 profession of arms is placed before our eyes an image, or even perhaps
 the _prototype of the State._ Here we see as the most general effect of
 the war-tendency an immediate decomposition and division of the chaotic
 mass into _military castes,_ out of which rises, pyramid-shaped,
 on an exceedingly broad base of slaves the edifice of the "martial
 society." The unconscious purpose of the whole movement constrains
 every individual under its yoke, and produces also in heterogeneous
 natures as it were a chemical transformation of their qualities until
 they are brought into affinity with that purpose. In the highest
 castes one perceives already a little more of what in this internal
 process is involved at the bottom, namely the creation of the _military
 genius_--with whom we have become acquainted as the original founder of
 states. In the case of many States, as, for example, in the Lycurgian
 constitution of Sparta, one can distinctly perceive the impress of that
 fundamental idea of the State, that of the creation of the military
 genius. If we now imagine the military primal State in its greatest
 activity, at its proper "labour," and if we fix our glance upon the
 whole technique of war, we cannot avoid correcting our notions picked
 up from everywhere, as to the "dignity of man" and the "dignity of
 labour" by the question, whether the idea of dignity is applicable
 also to that labour, which has as its purpose the destruction of the
 "dignified" man, as well as to the man who is entrusted with that
 "dignified labour," or whether in this warlike task of the State those
 mutually contradictory ideas do not neutralise one another. I should
 like to think the warlike man to be a _means_ of the military genius
 and his labour again only a tool in the hands of that same genius; and
 not to him, as absolute man and non-genius, but to him as a means of
 the genius--whose pleasure also can be to choose his tool's destruction
 as a mere pawn sacrificed on the strategist's chessboard--is due a
 degree of dignity, of that dignity namely, _to have been deemed worthy
 of being a means of the genius._ But what is shown here in a single
 instance is valid in the most general sense; every human being, with
 his total activity, only has dignity in so far as he is a tool of _the_
 genius, consciously or unconsciously; from this we may immediately
 deduce the ethical conclusion, that "man in himself," the absolute man
 possesses neither dignity, nor rights, nor duties; only as a wholly
 determined being serving unconscious purposes can man excuse his
 existence.
 
 _Plato's perfect State_ is according to these considerations certainly
 something still greater than even the warm-blooded among his admirers
 believe, not to mention the smiling mien of superiority with which
 our "historically" educated refuse such a fruit of antiquity. The
 proper aim of the State, the Olympian existence and ever-renewed
 procreation and preparation of the genius,--compared with which
 all other things are only tools, expedients and factors towards
 realisation--is here discovered with a poetic intuition and painted
 with firmness. Plato saw through the awfully devastated Herma of the
 then-existing State-life and perceived even then something divine in
 its interior. He _believed_ that one might be able to take out this
 divine image and that the grim and barbarically distorted outside and
 shell did not belong to the essence of the State: the whole fervour
 and sublimity of his political passion threw itself upon this belief,
 upon that desire--and in the flames of this fire he perished. That in
 his perfect State he did not place at the head _the_ genius in its
 general meaning, but only the genius of wisdom and of knowledge, that
 he altogether excluded the inspired artist from his State, that was
 a rigid consequence of the Socratian judgment on art, which Plato,
 struggling against himself, had made his own. This more external,
 almost incidental gap must not prevent our recognising in the total
 conception of the Platonic State the wonderfully great hieroglyph of
 a profound and eternally to be interpreted _esoteric doctrine of the
 connection between State and Genius._ What we believed we could divine
 of this cryptograph we have said in this preface.
 
 
 
 
 THE GREEK WOMAN
 
 
 (Fragment, 1871)
 
 
 Just as Plato from disguises and obscurities brought to light the
 innermost purpose of the State, so also he conceived the chief cause
 of the position of the _Hellenic Woman_ with regard to the State; in
 both cases he saw in what existed around him the image of the ideas
 manifested to him, and of these ideas of course the actual was only a
 hazy picture and phantasmagoria. He who according to the usual custom
 considers the position of the Hellenic Woman to be altogether unworthy
 and repugnant to humanity, must also turn with this reproach against
 the Platonic conception of this position; for, as it were, the existing
 forms were only precisely set forth in this latter conception. Here
 therefore our question repeats itself: should not the nature and the
 position of the Hellenic Woman have a _necessary_ relation to the goals
 of the Hellenic Will?
 
 Of course there is one side of the Platonic conception of woman, which
 stands in abrupt contrast with Hellenic custom: Plato gives to woman a
 full share in the rights, knowledge and duties of man, and considers
 woman only as the weaker sex, in that she will not achieve remarkable
 success in all things, without however disputing this sex's title to
 all those things. We must not attach more value to; this strange notion
 than to the expulsion of the artist out of the ideal State; these are
 side-lines daringly mis-drawn, aberrations as it were of the hand
 otherwise so sure and of the so calmly contemplating eye which at times
 under the influence of the deceased master becomes dim and dejected; in
 this mood he exaggerates the master's paradoxes and in the abundance of
 his love gives himself satisfaction by very eccentrically intensifying
 the latter's doctrines even to foolhardiness.
 
 The most significant word however that Plato as a Greek could say on
 the relation of woman to the State, was that so objectionable demand,
 that in the perfect State, the _Family was to cease._ At present let us
 take no account of his abolishing even marriage, in order to carry out
 this demand fully, and of his substituting solemn nuptials arranged by
 order of the State, between the bravest men and the noblest women, for
 the attainment of beautiful offspring. In that principal proposition
 however he has indicated most distinctly--indeed too distinctly,
 offensively distinctly--an important preparatory step of the Hellenic
 Will towards the procreation of the genius. But in the customs of the
 Hellenic people the claim of the family on man and child was extremely
 limited: the man lived in the State, the child grew up for the State
 and was guided by the hand of the State. The Greek Will took care that
 the need of culture could not be satisfied in the seclusion of a small
 circle. From the State the individual has to receive everything in
 order to return everything to the State. Woman accordingly means to the
 State, what _sleep_ does to man. In her nature lies the healing power,
 which replaces that which has been used up, the beneficial rest in
 which everything immoderate confines itself, the eternal Same, by which
 the excessive and the surplus regulate themselves. In her the future
 generation dreams. Woman is more closely related to Nature than man and
 in all her essentials she remains ever herself. Culture is with her
 always something external, a something which does not touch the kernel
 that is eternally faithful to Nature, therefore the culture of woman
 might well appear to the Athenian as something indifferent, yea--if one
 only wanted to conjure it up in one's mind, as something ridiculous.
 He who at once feels himself compelled from that to infer the position
 of women among the Greeks as unworthy and all too cruel, should not
 indeed take as his criterion the "culture" of modern woman and her
 claims, against which it is sufficient just to point out the Olympian
 women together with Penelope, Antigone, Elektra. Of course it is true
 that these are ideal figures, but who would be able to create such
 ideals out of the present world?--Further indeed is to be considered
 _what sons_ these women have borne, and what women they must have been
 to have given birth to such sons! The Hellenic woman as _mother_ had
 to live in obscurity, because the political instinct together with
 its highest aim demanded it. She had to vegetate like a plant, in
 the narrow circle, as a symbol of the Epicurean wisdom  .
 Again, in more recent times, with the complete disintegration of the
 principle of the State, she had to step in as helper; the family as a
 makeshift for the State is her work; and in this sense the _artistic
 aim_ of the State had to abase itself to the level of a _domestic_ art.
 Thereby it has been brought about, that the passion of love, as the
 one realm wholly accessible to women, regulates our art to the very
 core. Similarly, home-education considers itself so to speak as the
 only natural one and suffers State-education only as a questionable
 infringement upon the right of home-education: all this is right as
 far as the modern State only is concerned.--With that the nature of
 woman withal remains unaltered, but her _power_ is, according to the
 position which the State takes up with regard to women, a different
 one. Women have indeed really the power to make good to a certain
 extent the deficiencies of the State--ever faithful to their nature,
 which I have compared to sleep. In Greek antiquity they held that
 position, which the most supreme will of the State assigned to them:
 for that reason they have been glorified as never since. The goddesses
 of Greek mythology are their images: the Pythia and the Sibyl, as well
 as the Socratic Diotima are the priestesses out of whom divine wisdom
 speaks. Now one understands why the proud resignation of the Spartan
 woman at the news of her son's death in battle can be no fable. Woman
 in relation to the State felt herself in her proper position, therefore
 she had more _dignity_ than woman has ever had since. Plato who through
 abolishing family and marriage still intensifies the position of woman,
 feels now so much _reverence_ towards them, that oddly enough he is
 misled by a subsequent statement of their equality with man, to abolish
 again the order of rank which is their due: the highest triumph of the
 woman of antiquity, to have seduced even the wisest!
 
 As long as the State is still in an embryonic condition woman as
 _mother_ preponderates and determines the grade and the manifestations
 of Culture: in the same way as woman is destined to complement the
 disorganised State. What Tacitus says of German women: _inesse
 quin etiam sanctum aliquid et providum putant, nec aut consilia
 earum aspernantur aut responsa neglegunt,_ applies on the whole to
 all nations not yet arrived at the real State. In such stages one
 feels only the more strongly that which at all times becomes again
 manifest, that the instincts of woman as the bulwark of the future
 generation are invincible and that in her care for the preservation
 of the species Nature speaks out of these instincts very distinctly.
 How far this divining power reaches is determined, it seems, by the
 greater or lesser consolidation of the State: in disorderly and more
 arbitrary conditions, where the whim or the passion of the individual
 man carries along with itself whole tribes, then woman suddenly comes
 forward as the warning prophetess. But in Greece too there was a never
 slumbering care that the terribly overcharged political instinct might
 splinter into dust and atoms the little political organisms before
 they attained their goals in any way. Here the Hellenic Will created
 for itself ever new implements by means of which it spoke, adjusting,
 moderating, warning: above all it is in the _Pythia,_ that the power
 of woman to compensate the State manifested itself so clearly, as it
 has never done since. That a people split up thus into small tribes
 and municipalities, was yet at bottom _whole_ and was performing the
 task of its nature within its faction, was assured by that wonderful
 phenomenon the Pythia and the Delphian oracle: for always, as long as
 Hellenism created its great works of art, it spoke out of _one_ mouth
 and as _one_ Pythia. We cannot hold back the portentous discernment
 that to the Will individuation means much suffering, and that in order
 to reach those _individuals_ It _needs_ an enormous step-ladder of
 individuals. It is true our brains reel with the consideration whether
 the Will in order to arrive at _Art,_ has perhaps effused Itself out
 into these worlds, stars, bodies, and atoms: at least it ought to
 become clear to us then, that Art is not necessary for the individuals,
 but for the Will itself: a sublime outlook at which we shall be
 permitted to glance once more from another position.
 
 
 
 
 ON MUSIC AND WORDS
 
 
 (Fragment, 1871)
 
 
 What we here have asserted of the relationship between language and
 music must be valid too, for equal reasons concerning the relationship
 of _Mime_ to _Music._ The Mime too, as the intensified symbolism of
 man's gestures, is, measured by the eternal significance of music,
 only a simile, which brings into expression the innermost secret
 of music but very superficially, namely on the substratum of the
 passionately moved human body. But if we include language also in the
 category of bodily symbolism, and compare the _drama,_ according to
 the canon advanced, with music, then I venture to think, a proposition
 of Schopenhauer will come into the clearest light, to which reference
 must be made again later on. "It might be admissible, although a purely
 musical mind does not demand it, to join and adapt words or even a
 clearly represented action to the pure language of tones, although the
 latter, being self-sufficient, needs no help; so that our perceiving
 and reflecting intellect, which does not like to be quite idle, may
 meanwhile have light and analogous occupation also. By this concession
 to the intellect man's attention adheres even more closely to music,
 by this at the same time, too, is placed underneath that which the
 tones indicate in their general metaphorless language of the heart,
 a visible picture, as it were a schema, as an example illustrating a
 general idea ... indeed such things will even heighten the effect
 of music." (Schopenhauer, Parerga, II., "On the Metaphysics of the
 Beautiful and sthetics,"  224.) If we disregard the naturalistic
 external motivation according to which our perceiving and reflecting
 intellect does not like to be quite idle when listening to music, and
 attention led by the hand of an obvious action follows better--then
 the drama in relation to music has been characterised by Schopenhauer
 for the best reasons as a schema, as an example illustrating a general
 idea: and when he adds "indeed such things will even heighten the
 effect of music" then the enormous universality and originality of
 vocal music, of the connection of tone with metaphor and idea guarantee
 the correctness of this utterance. The music of every people begins in
 closest connection with lyricism and long before absolute music can be
 thought of, the music of a people in that connection passes through
 the most important stages of development. If we understand this primal
 lyricism of a people, as indeed we must, to be an imitation of the
 artistic typifying Nature, then as the original prototype of that union
 of music and lyricism must be regarded: _the duality in the essence
 of language,_ already typified by Nature. Now, after discussing the
 relation of music to metaphor we will fathom deeper this essence of
 language.
 
 In the multiplicity of languages the fact at once manifests itself,
 that word and thing do not necessarily coincide with one another
 completely, but that the word is a symbol. But what does the word
 symbolise? Most certainly only conceptions, be these now conscious
 ones or as in the greater number of cases, unconscious; for how
 should a word-symbol correspond to that innermost nature of which we
 and the world are images? Only as conceptions we know that kernel,
 only in its metaphorical expressions are we familiar with it; beyond
 that point there is nowhere a direct bridge which could lead us to it.
 The whole life of impulses, too, the play of feelings, sensations,
 emotions, volitions, is known to us--as I am forced to insert here in
 opposition to Schopenhauer--after a most rigid self-examination, not
 according to its essence but merely as conception; and we may well be
 permitted to say, that even Schopenhauer's "Will" is nothing else but
 the most general phenomenal form of a Something otherwise absolutely
 indecipherable. If therefore we must acquiesce in the rigid necessity
 of getting nowhere beyond the conceptions we can nevertheless again
 distinguish two main species within their realm. The one species
 manifest themselves to us as pleasure-and-displeasure-sensations and
 accompany all other conceptions as a never-lacking fundamental basis.
 This most general manifestation, out of which and by which alone we
 understand all Becoming and all Willing and for which we will retain
 the name "Will" has now too in language its own symbolic sphere:
 and in truth this sphere is equally fundamental to the language,
 as that manifestation is fundamental to all other conceptions. All
 degrees of pleasure and displeasure--expressions of _one_ primal
 cause unfathomable to us--symbolise themselves in _the tone of the
 speaker:_ whereas all the other conceptions are indicated by the
 _gesture-symbolism_ of the speaker. In so far as that primal cause
 is the same in all men, the _tonal subsoil_ is also the common
 one, comprehensible beyond the difference of language. Out of it
 now develops the more arbitrary gesture-symbolism which is not
 wholly adequate for its basis: and with which begins the diversity
 of languages, whose multiplicity we are permitted to consider--to
 use a simile--as a strophic text to that primal melody of the
 pleasure-and-displeasure-language. The whole realm of the consonantal
 and vocal we believe we may reckon only under gesture-symbolism:
 consonants _and_ vowels without that fundamental tone which is
 necessary above all else, are nothing but _positions_ of the organs
 of speech, in short, gestures--; as soon as we imagine the _word_
 proceeding out of the mouth of man, then first of all the root of the
 word, and the basis of that gesture-symbolism, the _tonal subsoil,_
 the echo of the pleasure-and-displeasure-sensations originate. As our
 whole corporeality stands in relation to that original phenomenon, the
 "Will," so the word built out of its consonants and vowels stands in
 relation to its tonal basis.
 
 This original phenomenon, the "Will," with its scale of
 pleasure-and-displeasure-sensations attains in the development of music
 an ever more adequate symbolic expression: and to this historical
 process the continuous effort of lyric poetry runs parallel, the effort
 to transcribe music into metaphors: exactly as this double-phenomenon,
 according to the just completed disquisition, lies typified in language.
 
 He who has followed us into these difficult contemplations readily,
 attentively, and with some imagination--and with kind indulgence where
 the expression has been too scanty or too unconditional--will now
 have the advantage with us, of laying before himself more seriously and
 answering more deeply than is usually the case some stirring points of
 controversy of present-day sthetics and still more of contemporary
 artists. Let us think now, after all our assumptions, what an
 undertaking it must be, to set music to a poem; _i.e.,_ to illustrate
 a poem by music, in order to help music thereby to obtain a language
 of ideas. What a perverted world! A task that appears to my mind like
 that of a son wanting to create his father! Music can create metaphors
 out of itself, which will always however be but schemata, instances as
 it were of her intrinsic general contents. But how should the metaphor,
 the conception, create music out of itself! Much less could the idea,
 or, as one has said, the "poetical idea" do this. As certainly as a
 bridge leads out of the mysterious castle of the musician into the free
 land of the metaphors--and the lyric poet steps across it--as certainly
 is it impossible to go the contrary way, although some are said to
 exist who fancy they have done so. One might people the air with the
 phantasy of a Raphael, one might see St. Cecilia, as he does, listening
 enraptured to the harmonies of the choirs of angels--no tone issues
 from this world apparently lost in music: even if we imagined that that
 harmony in reality, as by a miracle, began to sound for us, whither
 would Cecilia, Paul and Magdalena disappear from us, whither even
 the singing choir of angels! We should at once cease to be Raphael:
 and as in that picture the earthly instruments lie shattered on the
 ground, so our painter's vision, defeated by the higher, would fade
 and die away.--How nevertheless could the miracle happen? How should
 the Apollonian world of the eye quite engrossed in contemplation be
 able to create out of itself the tone, which on the contrary symbolises
 a sphere which is excluded and conquered just by that very Apollonian
 absorption in Appearance? The delight at Appearance cannot raise out
 of itself the pleasure at Non-appearance; the delight of perceiving is
 delight only by the fact that nothing reminds us of a sphere in which
 individuation is broken and abolished. If we have characterised at
 all correctly the Apollonian in opposition to the Dionysean, then the
 thought which attributes to the metaphor, the idea, the appearance,
 in some way the power of producing out of itself the tone, must
 appear to us strangely wrong. We will not be referred, in order to be
 refuted, to the musician who writes music to existing lyric poems; for
 after all that has been said we shall be compelled to assert that the
 relationship between the lyric poem and its setting must in any case
 be a different one from that between a father and his child. Then what
 exactly?
 
 Here now we may be met on the ground of a favourite sthetic notion
 with the proposition, "It is not the poem which gives birth to
 the setting but the _sentiment_ created by the poem." I do not
 agree with that; the more subtle or powerful stirring-up of that
 pleasure-and-displeasure-subsoil is in the realm of productive art
 _the_ element which is inartistic in itself; indeed only its total
 exclusion makes the complete self-absorption and disinterested
 perception of the artist possible. Here perhaps one might retaliate
 that I myself just now predicated about the "Will," that in music
 "Will" came to an ever more adequate symbolic expression. My answer,
 condensed into an sthetic axiom, is this: _the Will is the object of
 music but not the origin of it,_ that is the Will in its very greatest
 universality, as the most original manifestation, under which is to
 be understood all Becoming. That, which we call _feeling,_ is with
 regard to this Will already permeated and saturated with conscious and
 unconscious conceptions and is therefore no longer directly the object
 of music; it is unthinkable then that these feelings should be able
 to create music out of themselves. Take for instance the feelings of
 love, fear and hope: music can no longer do anything with them in a
 direct way, every one of them is already so filled with conceptions.
 On the contrary these feelings can serve to symbolise music, as the
 lyric poet does who translates for himself into the simile-world of
 feelings that conceptually and metaphorically unapproachable realm
 of the Will, the proper content and object of music. The lyric poet
 resembles all those hearers of music who are conscious of an _effect
 of music on their emotions;_ the distant and removed power of music
 appeals, with them, to an _intermediate realm_ which gives to them
 as it were a foretaste, a symbolic preliminary conception of music
 proper, it appeals to the intermediate realm of the emotions. One might
 be permitted to say about them, with respect to the Will, the only
 object of music, that they bear the same relation to this Will, as the
 analogous morning-dream, according to Schopenhauer's theory, bears to
 the dream proper. To all those, however, who are unable to get at music
 except with their emotions, is to be said, that they will ever remain
 in the entrance-hall, and will never have access to the sanctuary of
 music: which, as I said, emotion cannot show but only symbolise.
 
 With regard however to the origin of music, I have already explained
 that that can never lie in the Will, but must rather rest in the lap of
 that force, which under the form of the "Will" creates out of itself a
 visionary world: _the origin of music lies beyond all individuation,_ a
 proposition, which after our discussion on the Dionysean self-evident.
 At this point I take the liberty of setting forth again comprehensively
 side by side those decisive propositions which the antithesis of the
 Dionysean and Apollonian dealt with has compelled us to enunciate:
 
 The "Will," as the most original manifestation, is the object of music:
 in this sense music can be called imitation of Nature, but of Nature in
 its most general form.--
 
 The "Will" itself and the feelings--manifestations of the Will already
 permeated with conceptions--are wholly incapable of creating music out
 of themselves, just as on the other hand it is utterly denied to music
 to represent feelings, or to have feelings as its object, while Will is
 its only object.--
 
 He who carries away feelings as effects of music has within them as
 it were a symbolic intermediate realm, which can give him a foretaste
 of music, but excludes him at the same time from her innermost
 sanctuaries.--
 
 The lyric poet interprets music to himself through the symbolic
 world of emotions, whereas he himself, in the calm of the Apollonian
 contemplation, is exempted from those emotions.--
 
 When, therefore, the musician writes a setting to a lyric poem he is
 moved as musician neither through the images nor through the emotional
 language in the text; but a musical inspiration coming from quite a
 different sphere _chooses_ for itself that song-text as allegorical
 expression. There cannot therefore be any question as to a necessary
 relation between poem and music; for the two worlds brought here into
 connection are too strange to one another to enter into more than a
 superficial alliance; the song-text is just a symbol and stands to
 music in the same relation as the Egyptian hieroglyph of bravery did to
 the brave warrior himself. During the highest revelations of music we
 even feel involuntarily the _crudeness_ of every figurative effort and
 of every emotion dragged in for purposes of analogy; for example, the
 last quartets of Beethoven quite put to shame all illustration and the
 entire realm of empiric reality. The symbol, in face of the god really
 revealing himself, has no longer any meaning; moreover it appears as an
 offensive superficiality.
 
 One must not think any the worse of us for considering from this point
 of view one item so that we may speak about it without reserve, namely
 the _last movement of Beethoven's Ninth Symphony,_ a movement which
 is unprecedented and unanalysable in its charms. To the dithyrambic
 world-redeeming exultation of this music Schiller's poem "To Joy,"
 is wholly incongruous, yea, like cold moon-light, pales beside that
 sea of flame. Who would rob me of this sure feeling? Yea, who would
 be able to dispute that that feeling during the hearing of this music
 does not find expression in a scream only because we, wholly impotent
 through music for metaphor and word, already _hear nothing at all
 from Schiller's poem._ All that noble sublimity, yea the grandeur of
 Schiller's verses has, beside the truly nave-innocent folk-melody of
 joy, a disturbing, troubling, even crude and offensive effect; only
 the ever fuller development of the choir's song and the masses of the
 orchestra preventing us from hearing them, keep from us that sensation
 of incongruity. What therefore shall we think of that awful sthetic
 superstition that Beethoven himself made a solemn statement as to his
 belief in the limits of absolute music, in that fourth movement of the
 Ninth Symphony, yea that he as it were with it unlocked the portals
 of a new art, within which music had been enabled to represent even
 metaphor and idea and whereby music had been opened to the "conscious
 mind." And what does Beethoven himself tell us when he has choir-song
 introduced by a recitative? "Alas friends, let us intonate not these
 tones but more pleasing and joyous ones!" More pleasing and joyous
 ones! For that he needed the convincing tone of the human voice, for
 that he needed the music of innocence in the folk-song. Not the word,
 but the "more pleasing" sound, not the idea but the most heartfelt
 joyful tone was chosen by the sublime master in his longing for the
 most soul-thrilling ensemble of his orchestra. And how could one
 misunderstand him! Rather may the same be said of this movement as
 _Richard Wagner_ says of the great "_Missa Solemnis_" which he calls "a
 pure symphonic work of the most genuine Beethoven-spirit" (Beethoven,
 p. 42). "The voices are treated here quite in the sense of human
 instruments, in which sense Schopenhauer quite rightly wanted these
 human voices to be considered; the text underlying them is understood
 by us in these great Church compositions, not in its conceptual
 meaning, but it serves in the sense of the musical work of art, merely
 as material for vocal music and does not stand to our musically
 determined sensation in a disturbing position simply because it does
 not incite in us any rational conceptions but, as its ecclesiastical
 character conditions too, only touches us with the impression of
 well-known symbolic creeds." Besides I do not doubt that Beethoven, had
 he written the Tenth Symphony--of which drafts are still extant--would
 have composed just the _Tenth_ Symphony.
 
 Let us now approach, after these preparations, the discussion of the
 _opera,_ so as to be able to proceed afterwards from the opera to
 its counterpart in the Greek tragedy. What we had to observe in the
 last movement of the Ninth, _i.e.,_ on the highest level of modern
 music-development, viz., that the word-content goes down unheard in
 the general sea of sound, is nothing isolated and peculiar, but the
 general and eternally valid norm in the vocal music of all times, the
 norm which alone is adequate to the origin of lyric song. The man in
 a state of Dionysean excitement has a _listener_ just as little as
 the orgiastic crowd, a listener to whom he might have something to
 communicate, a listener as the epic narrator and generally speaking the
 Apollonian artist, to be sure, presupposes. It is rather in the nature
 of the Dionysean art, that it has no consideration for the listener:
 the inspired servant of Dionysos is, as I said in a former place,
 understood only by his compeers. But if we now imagine a listener at
 those endemic outbursts of Dionysean excitement then we shall have to
 prophesy for him a fate similar to that which Pentheus the discovered
 eavesdropper suffered, namely, to be torn to pieces by the Mnads. The
 lyric musician sings "as the bird sings,"[1] alone, out of innermost
 compulsion; when the listener comes to him with a demand he must
 become dumb. Therefore it would be altogether unnatural to ask from
 the lyric musician that one should also understand the text-words of
 his song, unnatural because here a demand is made by the listener, who
 has no right at all during the lyric outburst to claim anything. Now
 with the poetry of the great ancient lyric poets in your hand, put
 the question honestly to yourself whether they can have even thought
 of making themselves clear to the mass of the people standing around
 and listening, clear with their world of metaphors and thoughts;
 answer this serious question with a look at Pindar and the schylian
 choir songs. These most daring and obscure intricacies of thought,
 this whirl of metaphors, ever impetuously reproducing itself, this
 oracular tone of the whole, which we, _without_ the diversion of music
 and orchestration, so often cannot penetrate even with the closest
 attention--was this whole world of miracles transparent as glass to
 the Greek crowd, yea, a metaphorical-conceptual interpretation of
 music? And with such mysteries of thought as are to be found in Pindar
 do you think the wonderful poet could have wished to elucidate the
 music already strikingly distinct? Should we here not be forced to an
 insight into the very nature of the lyricist--the artistic man, who
 to _himself_ must interpret music through the symbolism of metaphors
 and emotions, but who has nothing to communicate to the listener; an
 artist who, in complete aloofness, even forgets those who stand eagerly
 listening near him. And as the lyricist his hymns, so the people sing
 the folk-song, for themselves, out of in-most impulse, unconcerned
 whether the word is comprehensible to him who does not join in the
 song. Let us think of our own experiences in the realm of higher
 art-music: what did we understand of the text of a Mass of Palestrina,
 of a Cantata of Bach, of an Oratorio of Hndel, if we ourselves perhaps
 did not join in singing? Only for _him who joins_ in singing do lyric
 poetry and vocal music exist; the listener stands before it as before
 absolute music.
 
 But now the _opera_ begins, according to the clearest testimonies, with
 the _demand of the listener to understand the word._
 
 What? The listener _demands?_ The word is to be understood?
 
 But to bring music into the service of a series of metaphors and
 conceptions, to use it as a means to an end, to the strengthening
 and elucidation of such conceptions and metaphors--such a peculiar
 presumption as is found in the concept of an "opera," reminds me of
 that ridiculous person who endeavours to lift himself up into the air
 with his own arms; that which this fool and which the opera according
 to that idea attempt are absolute impossibilities. That idea of the
 opera does not demand perhaps an abuse from music but--as I said--an
 impossibility. Music never _can_ become a means; one may push,
 screw, torture it; as tone, as roll of the drum, in its crudest and
 simplest stages, it still defeats poetry and abases the latter to its
 reflection. The opera as a species of art according to that concept is
 therefore not only an aberration of music, but an erroneous conception
 of sthetics. If I herewith, after all, justify the nature of the opera
 for sthetics, I am of course far from justifying at the same time bad
 opera music or bad opera-verses. The worst music can still mean, as
 compared with the best poetry, the Dionysean world-subsoil, and the
 worst poetry can be mirror, image and reflection of this subsoil, if
 together with the best music: as certainly, namely, as the single tone
 against the metaphor is already Dionysean, and the single metaphor
 together with idea and word against music is already Apollonian. Yea,
 even bad music together with bad poetry can still inform as to the
 nature of music and poesy.
 
 When therefore Schopenhauer felt Bellini's "Norma," for example, as the
 fulfilment of tragedy, with regard to that opera's music and poetry,
 then he, in Dionysean-Apollonian emotion and self-forgetfulness, was
 quite entitled to do so, because he perceived music and poetry in
 their most general, as it were, philosophical value, _as_ music and
 poetry: but with that judgment he showed a poorly educated taste,--for
 good taste always has historical perspective. To us, who intentionally
 in this investigation avoid any question of the historic value of an
 art-phenomenon and endeavour to focus only the phenomenon itself,
 in its unaltered eternal meaning, and consequently in its _highest_
 type, too,--to us the art-species of the "opera" seems to be justified
 as much as the folk-song, in so far as we find in both that union
 of the Dionysean and Apollonian and are permitted to assume for the
 opera--namely for the highest type of the opera--an origin analogous to
 that of the folk-song. Only in so far as the opera historically known
 to us has a completely different origin from that of the folk-song
 do we reject this "opera," which stands in the same relation to that
 generic notion just defended by us, as the marionette does to a living
 human being. It is certain, music never can become a means in the
 service of the text, but must always defeat the text, yet music must
 become bad when the composer interrupts every Dionysean force rising
 within himself by an anxious regard for the words and gestures of his
 marionettes. If the poet of the opera-text has offered him nothing more
 than the usual schematised figures with their Egyptian regularity, then
 the freer, more unconditional, more Dionysean is the development of the
 music; and the more she despises all dramatic requirements, so much
 the higher will be the value of the opera. In this sense it is true the
 opera is, at its best, good music, and nothing but music: whereas the
 jugglery performed at the same time is, as it were, only a fantastic
 disguise of the orchestra, above all, of the most important instruments
 the orchestra has: the singers; and from this jugglery the judicious
 listener turns away laughing. If the mass is diverted by _this very
 jugglery_ and only _permits_ the music with it, then the mob fares as
 all those do who value the frame of a good picture higher than the
 picture itself. Who treats such nave aberrations with a serious or
 even pathetic reproach?
 
 But what will the opera mean as "dramatic" music, in its possibly
 farthest distance from pure music, efficient in itself, and purely
 Dionysean? Let us imagine a passionate drama full of incidents which
 carries away the spectator, and which is already sure of success
 by its plot: what will "dramatic" music be able to add, if it does
 not take away something? Firstly, it _will_ take away much: for in
 every moment where for once the Dionysean power of music strikes
 the listener, the eye is dimmed that sees the action, the eye that
 became absorbed in the individuals appearing before it: the listener
 now _forgets_ the drama and becomes alive again to it only when the
 Dionysean spell over him has been broken. In so far, however, as music
 makes the listener forget the drama, it is not yet "dramatic" music:
 but what kind of music is that which is not _allowed_ to exercise
 any Dionysean power over the listener? And how is it possible? It is
 possible as _purely conventional symbolism,_ out of which convention
 has sucked all natural strength: as music which has diminished to
 symbols of remembrance: and its effect aims at reminding the spectator
 of something, which at the sight of the drama must not escape him lest
 he should misunderstand it: as a trumpet signal is an invitation for
 the horse to trot. Lastly, before the drama commenced and in interludes
 or during tedious passages, doubtful as to dramatic effect, yea,
 even in its highest moments, there would still be permitted another
 species of remembrance-music, no longer purely conventional, namely
 _emotional-music,_ music, as a stimulant to dull or wearied nerves.
 I am able to distinguish in the so-called dramatic music these two
 elements only: a conventional rhetoric and remembrance-music, and a
 sensational music with an effect essentially physical: and thus it
 vacillates between the noise of the drum and the signal-horn, like
 the mood of the warrior who goes into the battle. But now the mind,
 regaling itself on pure music and educated through comparison, demands
 a _masquerade_ for those two wrong tendencies of music; "Remembrance"
 and "Emotion" are to be played, but in good music, which must be
 in itself enjoyable, yea, valuable; what despair for the dramatic
 musician, who must mask the big drum by good music, which, however,
 must nevertheless have no purely musical, but only a stimulating
 effect! And now comes the great Philistine public nodding its thousand
 heads and enjoys this "dramatic music" which is ever ashamed of itself,
 enjoys it to the very last morsel, without perceiving anything of its
 shame and embarrassment. Rather the public feels its skin agreeably
 tickled, for indeed homage is being rendered in all forms and ways to
 the public! To the pleasure-hunting, dull-eyed sensualist, who needs
 excitement, to the conceited "educated person" who has accustomed
 himself to good drama and good music as to good food, without after all
 making much out of it, to the forgetful and absent-minded egoist, who
 must be led back to the work of art with force and with signal-horns
 because selfish plans continually pass through his mind aiming at
 gain or pleasure. Woe-begone dramatic musicians! "Draw near and view
 your Patrons' faces! The half are coarse, the half are cold." "Why
 should you rack, poor foolish Bards, for ends like these the gracious
 Muses?"[2] And that the muses are tormented, even tortured and flayed,
 these veracious miserable ones do not themselves deny!
 
 We had assumed a passionate drama, carrying away the spectator, which
 even without music would be sure of its effect. I fear that that in
 it which is "poetry" and _not_ action proper will stand in relation
 to true poetry as dramatic music to music in general: it will be
 remembrance-and emotional-poetry. Poetry will serve as a means, in
 order to recall in a conventional fashion feelings and passions,
 the expression of which has been found by real poets and has become
 celebrated, yea, normal with them. Further, this poetry will be
 expected in dangerous moments to assist the proper "action,"--whether
 a criminalistic horror-story or an exhibition of witchery mad with
 shifting the scenes,--and to spread a covering veil over the crudeness
 of the action itself. Shamefully conscious, that the poetry is only
 masquerade which cannot bear the light of day, such a "dramatic"
 rime-jingle clamours now for "dramatic" music, as on the other hand
 again the poetaster of such dramas is met after one-fourth of the
 way by the dramatic musician with his talent for the drum and the
 signal-horn and his shyness of genuine music, trusting in itself and
 self-sufficient. And now they see one another; and these Apollonian and
 Dionysean caricatures, this _par nobile fratrum,_ embrace one another!
 
 
 [1] A reference to Goethe's ballad, The Minstrel, st. 5:
 
 "I sing as sings the bird, whose note The leafy bough is heard on. The
 song that falters from my throat For me is ample guerdon." TR.
 
 
 [2] A quotation from Goethe's "Faust": Part I., lines 91, 92, and 95,
 96.--TR.
 
 
 
 
 HOMER'S CONTEST
 
 
 Preface to an Unwritten Book (1872)
 
 
 When one speaks of "_humanity_" the notion lies at the bottom,
 that humanity is that which _separates_ and distinguishes man from
 Nature. But such a distinction does not in reality exist: the
 "natural" qualities and the properly called "human" ones have grown
 up inseparably together. Man in his highest and noblest capacities
 _is_ Nature and bears in himself her awful twofold character. His
 abilities generally considered dreadful and inhuman are perhaps indeed
 the fertile soil, out of which alone can grow forth all humanity in
 emotions, actions and works.
 
 Thus the Greeks, the most humane men of ancient times, have in
 themselves a trait of cruelty, of tiger-like pleasure in destruction:
 a trait, which in the grotesquely magnified image of the Hellene, in
 Alexander the Great, is very plainly visible, which, however, in their
 whole history, as well as in their mythology, must terrify us who
 meet them with the emasculate idea of modern humanity. When Alexander
 has the feet of Batis, the brave defender of Gaza, bored through,
 and binds the living body to his chariot in order to drag him about
 exposed to the scorn of his soldiers, that is a sickening caricature of
 Achilles, who at night ill-uses Hector's corpse by a similar trailing;
 but even this trait has for us something offensive, something which
 inspires horror. It gives us a peep into the abysses of hatred. With
 the same sensation perhaps we stand before the bloody and insatiable
 self-laceration of two Greek parties, as for example in the Corcyrean
 revolution. When the victor, in a fight of the cities, according to
 the _law_ of warfare, executes the whole male population and sells all
 the women and children into slavery, we see, in the sanction of such a
 law, that the Greek deemed it a positive necessity to allow his hatred
 to break forth unimpeded; in such moments the compressed and swollen
 feeling relieved itself; the tiger bounded forth, a voluptuous cruelty
 shone out of his fearful eye. Why had the Greek sculptor to represent
 again and again war and fights in innumerable repetitions, extended
 human bodies whose sinews are tightened through hatred or through the
 recklessness of triumph, fighters wounded and writhing with pain, or
 the dying with the last rattle in their throat? Why did the whole Greek
 world exult in the fighting scenes of the "Iliad"? I am afraid, we do
 not understand them enough in "Greek fashion," and that we should even
 shudder, if for once we _did_ understand them thus.
 
 But what lies, as the mother-womb of the Hellenic, _behind_ the Homeric
 world? In the _latter,_ by the extremely artistic definiteness, and the
 calm and purity of the lines we are already lifted far above the purely
 material amalgamation: its colours, by an artistic deception, appear
 lighter, milder, warmer; its men, in this coloured, warm illumination,
 appear better and more sympathetic--but where do we look, if, no
 longer guided and protected by Homer's hand, we step backwards into
 the pre-Homeric world? Only into night and horror, into the products
 of a fancy accustomed to the horrible. What earthly existence is
 reflected in the loathsome-awful theogonian lore: a life swayed only
 by the _children of the night,_ strife, amorous desires, deception,
 age and death. Let us imagine the suffocating atmosphere of Hesiod's
 poem, still thickened and darkened and without all the mitigations and
 purifications, which poured over Hellas from Delphi and the numerous
 seats of the gods! If we mix this thickened Boeotian air with the grim
 voluptuousness of the Etruscans, then such a reality would _extort_
 from us a world of myths within which Uranos, Kronos and Zeus and
 the struggles of the Titans would appear as a relief. Combat in this
 brooding atmosphere is salvation and safety; the cruelty of victory is
 the summit of life's glories. And just as in truth the idea of Greek
 law has developed from _murder_ and expiation of murder, so also nobler
 Civilisation takes her first wreath of victory from the altar of the
 expiation of murder. Behind that bloody age stretches a wave-furrow
 deep into Hellenic history. The names of Orpheus, of Musus, and
 their cults indicate to what consequences the uninterrupted sight of
 a world of warfare and cruelty led--to the loathing of existence, to
 the conception of this existence as a punishment to be borne to the
 end, to the belief in the identity of existence and indebtedness. But
 these particular conclusions are not specifically Hellenic; through
 them Greece comes into contact with India and the Orient generally. The
 Hellenic genius had ready yet another answer to the question: what does
 a life of fighting and of victory mean? and gives this answer in the
 whole breadth of Greek history.
 
 In order to understand the latter we must start from the fact that
 the Greek genius admitted the existing fearful impulse, and deemed it
 _justified;_ whereas in the Orphic phase of thought was contained the
 belief that life with such an impulse as its root would not be worth
 living. Strife and the pleasure of victory were acknowledged; and
 nothing separates the Greek world more from ours than the _colouring,_
 derived hence, of some ethical ideas, _e.g.,_ of _Eris_ and of _Envy_.
 
 When the traveller Pausanius during his wanderings through Greece
 visited the Helicon, a very old copy of the first didactic poem of the
 Greeks, "The Works and Days" of Hesiod, was shown to him, inscribed
 upon plates of lead and severely damaged by time and weather. However
 he recognised this much, that, unlike the usual copies, it had _not_
 at its head that little hymnus on Zeus, but began at once with the
 declaration: "_Two_ Eris-goddesses are on earth." This is one of the
 most noteworthy Hellenic thoughts and worthy to be impressed on the
 new-comer immediately at the entrance-gate of Greek ethics. "One would
 like to praise the one Eris, just as much as to blame the other, if
 one uses one's reason. For these two goddesses have quite different
 dispositions. For the one, the cruel one, furthers the evil war and
 feud! No mortal likes her, but under the yoke of need one pays honour
 to the burdensome Eris, according to the decree of the immortals. She,
 as the elder, gave birth to black night. Zeus the high-ruling one,
 however, placed the other Eris upon the roots of the earth and among
 men as a much better one. She urges even the unskilled man to work, and
 if one who lacks property beholds another who is rich, then he hastens
 to sow in similar fashion and to plant and to put his house in order;
 the neighbour vies with the neighbour who strives after fortune. Good
 is this Eris to men. The potter also has a grudge against the potter,
 and the carpenter against the carpenter; the beggar envies the beggar,
 and the singer the singer."
 
 The two last verses which treat of the _odium figulinum_ appear to
 our scholars to be incomprehensible in this place. According to their
 judgment the predicates: "grudge" and "envy" fit only the nature of
 the evil Eris, and for this reason they do not hesitate to designate
 these verses as spurious or thrown by chance into this place. For
 that judgment however a system of Ethics other than the Hellenic must
 have inspired these scholars unawares; for in these verses to the
 good Eris Aristotle finds no offence. And not only Aristotle but the
 whole Greek antiquity thinks of spite and envy otherwise than we do
 and agrees with Hesiod, who first designates as an evil one that Eris
 who leads men against one another to a hostile war of extermination,
 and secondly praises another Eris as the good one, who as jealousy,
 spite, envy, incites men to activity but not to the action of war to
 the knife but to the action of _contest._ The Greek is _envious_ and
 conceives of this quality not as a blemish, but as the effect of a
 _beneficent_ deity. What a gulf of ethical judgment between us and him?
 Because he is envious he also feels, with every superfluity of honour,
 riches, splendour and fortune, the envious eye of a god resting on
 himself, and he fears this envy; in this case the latter reminds him
 of the transitoriness of every human lot; he dreads his very happiness
 and, sacrificing the best of it, he bows before the divine envy.
 This conception does not perhaps estrange him from his gods; their
 significance on the contrary is expressed by the thought that with them
 man in whose soul jealousy is enkindled against every other living
 being, is _never_ allowed to venture into contest. In the fight of
 Thamyris with the Muses, of Marsyas with Apollo, in the heart-moving
 fate of Niobe appears the horrible opposition of the two powers, who
 must never fight with one another, man and god.
 
 The greater and more sublime however a Greek is, the brighter in him
 appears the ambitious flame, devouring everybody who runs with him on
 the same track. Aristotle once made a list of such contests on a large
 scale; among them is the most striking instance how even a dead person
 can still incite a living one to consuming jealousy; thus for example
 Aristotle designates the relation between the Kolophonian Xenophanes
 and Homer. We do not understand this attack on the national hero of
 poetry in all its strength, if we do not imagine, as later on also with
 Plato, the root of this attack to be the ardent desire to step into
 the place of the overthrown poet and to inherit his fame. Every great
 Hellene hands on the torch of the contest; at every great virtue a new
 light is kindled. If the young Themistocles could not sleep at the
 thought of the laurels of Miltiades so his early awakened bent released
 itself only in the long emulation with Aristides in that uniquely
 noteworthy, purely instinctive genius of his political activity, which
 Thucydides describes. How characteristic are both question and answer,
 when a notable opponent of Pericles is asked, whether he or Pericles
 was the better wrestler in the city, and he gives the answer: "Even if
 I throw him down he denies that he has fallen, attains his purpose and
 convinces those who saw him fall."
 
 If one wants to see that sentiment unashamed in its nave expressions,
 the sentiment as to the necessity of contest lest the State's welfare
 be threatened, one should think of the original meaning of _Ostracism,_
 as for example the Ephesians pronounced it at the banishment of
 Hermodor. "Among us nobody shall be the best; if however someone is the
 best, then let him be so elsewhere and among others." Why should not
 someone be the best? Because with that the contest would fail, and the
 eternal life-basis of the Hellenic State would be endangered. Later on
 Ostracism receives quite another position with regard to the contest;
 it is applied, when the danger becomes obvious that one of the great
 contesting politicians and party-leaders feels himself urged on in
 the heat of the conflict towards harmful and destructive measures and
 dubious _coups d'tat._ The original sense of this peculiar institution
 however is not that of a safety-valve but that of a stimulant.
 The all-excelling individual was to be removed in order that the
 contest of forces might re-awaken, a thought which is hostile to the
 "exclusiveness" of genius in the modern sense but which assumes that in
 the natural order of things there are always _several_ geniuses which
 incite one another to action, as much also as they hold one another
 within the bounds of moderation. That is the kernel of the Hellenic
 contest-conception: it abominates autocracy, and fears its dangers; it
 desires as a _preventive_ against the genius--a second genius.
 
 Every natural gift must develop itself by contest. Thus the Hellenic
 national pedagogy demands, whereas modern educators fear nothing as
 much as, the unchaining of the so-called ambition. Here one fears
 selfishness as the "evil in itself"--with the exception of the
 Jesuits, who agree with the Ancients and who, possibly, for that
 reason, are the most efficient educators of our time. They seem to
 believe that Selfishness, _i.e.,_ the individual element is only the
 most powerful _agens_ but that it obtains its character as "good" and
 "evil" essentially from the aims towards which it strives. To the
 Ancients however the aim of the agonistic education was the welfare of
 the whole, of the civic society. Every Athenian for instance was to
 cultivate his Ego in contest, so far that it should be of the highest
 service to Athens and should do the least harm. It was not unmeasured
 and immeasurable as modern ambition generally is; the youth thought of
 the welfare of his native town when he vied with others in running,
 throwing or singing; it was her glory that he wanted to increase with
 his own; it was to his town's gods that he dedicated the wreaths which
 the umpires as a mark of honour set upon his head. Every Greek from
 childhood felt within himself the burning wish to be in the contest
 of the towns an instrument for the welfare of his own town; in this
 his selfishness was kindled into flame, by this his selfishness was
 bridled and restricted. Therefore the individuals in antiquity were
 freer, because their aims were nearer and more tangible. Modern man, on
 the contrary, is everywhere hampered by infinity, like the fleet-footed
 Achilles in the allegory of the Eleate Zeno: infinity impedes him, he
 does not even overtake the tortoise.
 
 But as the youths to be educated were brought up struggling against
 one another, so their educators were in turn in emulation amongst
 themselves. Distrustfully jealous, the great musical masters, Pindar
 and Simonides, stepped side by side; in rivalry the sophist, the higher
 teacher of antiquity meets his fellow-sophist; even the most universal
 kind of instruction, through the drama, was imparted to the people
 only under the form of an enormous wrestling of the great musical and
 dramatic artists. How wonderful! "And even the artist has a grudge
 against the artist!" And the modern man dislikes in an artist nothing
 so much as the personal battle-feeling, whereas the Greek recognises
 the artist _only in such a personal struggle._ There where the modern
 suspects weakness of the work of art, the Hellene seeks the source of
 his highest strength! That, which by way of example in Plato is of
 special artistic importance in his dialogues, is usually the result
 of an emulation with the art of the orators, of the sophists, of the
 dramatists of his time, invented deliberately in order that at the end
 he could say: "Behold, I can also do what my great rivals can; yea
 I can do it even better than they. No Protagoras has composed such
 beautiful myths as I, no dramatist such a spirited and fascinating
 whole as the Symposion, no orator penned such an oration as I put
 up in the Georgias--and now I reject all that together and condemn
 all imitative art! Only the contest made me a poet, a sophist, an
 orator!" What a problem unfolds itself there before us, if we ask
 about the relationship between the contest and the conception of the
 work of art!--If on the other hand we remove the contest from Greek
 life, then we look at once into the pre-Homeric abyss of horrible
 savagery, hatred, and pleasure in destruction. This phenomenon alas!
 shows itself frequently when a great personality was, owing to an
 enormously brilliant deed, suddenly withdrawn from the contest and
 became _hors de concours_ according to his, and his fellow-citizens'
 judgment. Almost without exception the effect is awful; and if one
 usually draws from these consequences the conclusion that the Greek was
 unable to bear glory and fortune, one should say more exactly that he
 was unable to bear fame without further struggle, and fortune at the
 end of the contest. There is no more distinct instance than the fate
 of Miltiades. Placed upon a solitary height and lifted far above every
 fellow-combatant through his incomparable success at Marathon, he feels
 a low thirsting for revenge awakened within himself against a citizen
 of Para, with whom he had been at enmity long ago. To satisfy his
 desire he misuses reputation, the public exchequer and civic honour and
 disgraces himself. Conscious of his ill-success he falls into unworthy
 machinations. He forms a clandestine and godless connection with Timo
 a priestess of Demeter, and enters at night the sacred temple, from
 which every man was excluded. After he has leapt over the wall and
 comes ever nearer the shrine of the goddess, the dreadful horror of a
 panic-like terror suddenly seizes him; almost prostrate and unconscious
 he feels himself driven back and leaping the wall once more, he falls
 down paralysed and severely injured. The siege must be raised and a
 disgraceful death impresses its seal upon a brilliant heroic career,
 in order to darken it for all posterity. After the battle at Marathon
 the envy of the celestials has caught him. And this divine envy breaks
 into flames when it beholds man without rival, without opponent, on
 the solitary height of glory. He now has beside him only the gods--and
 therefore he has them against him. These however betray him into a deed
 of the Hybris, and under it he collapses.
 
 Let us well observe that just as Miltiades perishes so the noblest
 Greek States perish when they, by merit and fortune, have arrived from
 the racecourse at the temple of Nike. Athens, which had destroyed the
 independence of her allies and avenged with severity the rebellions
 of her subjected foes, Sparta, which after the battle of gospotamoi
 used her preponderance over Hellas in a still harsher and more cruel
 fashion, both these, as in the case of Miltiades, brought about their
 ruin through deeds of the Hybris, as a proof that without envy,
 jealousy, and contesting ambition the Hellenic State like the Hellenic
 man degenerates. He becomes bad and cruel, thirsting for revenge, and
 godless; in short, he becomes "pre-Homeric"--and then it needs only a
 panic in order to bring about his fall and to crush him. Sparta and
 Athens surrender to Persia, as Themistocles and Alcibiades have done;
 they betray Hellenism after they have given up the noblest Hellenic
 fundamental thought, the contest, and Alexander, the coarsened copy and
 abbreviation of Greek history, now invents the cosmopolitan Hellene,
 and the so-called "Hellenism."
 
 
 
 
 THE RELATION OF SCHOPENHAUER'S PHILOSOPHY TO A GERMAN CULTURE
 
 
 Preface to an Unwritten Book (1872)
 
 
 In dear vile Germany culture now lies so decayed in the streets,
 jealousy of all that is great rules so shamelessly, and the general
 tumult of those who race for "Fortune" resounds so deafeningly, that
 one must have a strong faith, almost in the sense of _credo quia
 absurdum est,_ in order to hope still for a growing Culture, and above
 all--in opposition to the press with her "public opinion"--to be able
 to work by public teaching. With violence must those, in whose hearts
 lies the immortal care for the people, free themselves from all the
 inrushing impressions of that which is just now actual and valid, and
 evoke the appearance of reckoning them indifferent things. They must
 appear so, because they want to think, and because a loathsome sight
 and a confused noise, perhaps even mixed with the trumpet-flourishes
 of war-glory, disturb their thinking, and above all, because they want
 to _believe_ in the German character and because with this faith they
 would lose their strength. Do not find fault with these believers if
 they look from their distant aloofness and from the heights towards
 their Promised Land! They fear those experiences, to which the kindly
 disposed foreigner surrenders himself, when he lives among the Germans,
 and must be surprised how little German life corresponds to those great
 individuals, works and actions, which, in his kind disposition he
 has learned to revere as the true German character. Where the German
 cannot lift himself into the sublime he makes an impression less than
 the mediocre. Even the celebrated German scholarship, in which a number
 of the most useful domestic and homely virtues such as faithfulness,
 self-restriction, industry, moderation, cleanliness appear transposed
 into a purer atmosphere and, as it were, transfigured, is by no means
 the result of these virtues; looked at closely, the motive urging to
 unlimited knowledge appears in Germany much more like a defect, a gap,
 than an abundance of forces, it looks almost like the consequence
 of a needy formless atrophied life and even like a flight from the
 moral narrow-mindedness and malice to which the German without such
 diversions is subjected, and which also in spite of that scholarship,
 yea still within scholarship itself, often break forth. As the true
 virtuosi of philistinism the Germans are at home in narrowness of life,
 discerning and judging; if any one will carry them above themselves
 into the sublime, then they make themselves heavy as lead, and as such
 lead-weights they hang to their truly great men, in order to pull them
 down out of the ether to the level of their own necessitous indigence.
 Perhaps this Philistine homeliness may be only the degeneration of
 a genuine German virtue--a profound submersion into the detail, the
 minute, the nearest and into the mysteries of the individual--but this
 virtue grown mouldy is now worse than the most open vice, especially
 since one has now become conscious, with gladness of the heart, of this
 quality, even to literary self-glorification. Now the _"Educated"_
 among the proverbially so cultured Germans and the _"Philistines"_
 among the, as everybody knows, so uncultured Germans shake hands
 in public and agree with one another concerning the way in which
 henceforth one will have to write, compose poetry, paint, make music
 and even philosophise, yea--rule, so as neither to stand too much aloof
 from the culture of the one, nor to give offence to the "homeliness"
 of the other. This they call now "The German Culture of our times."
 Well, it is only necessary to inquire after the characteristic by which
 that "educated" person is to be recognised; now that we know that his
 foster-brother, the German Philistine, makes himself known as such to
 all the world, without bashfulness, as it were, after innocence is lost.
 
 The educated person nowadays is educated above all _"historically,"_ by
 his historic consciousness he saves himself from the sublime in which
 the Philistine succeeds by his "homeliness." No longer that enthusiasm
 which history inspires--as Goethe was allowed to suppose--but just the
 blunting of all enthusiasm is now the goal of these admirers of the
 _nil admirari,_ when they try to conceive everything historically; to
 them however we should exclaim: Ye are the fools of all centuries!
 History will make to you only those confessions, which you are worthy
 to receive. The world has been at all times full of trivialities and
 nonentities; to your historic hankering just these and only these
 unveil themselves. By your thousands you may pounce upon an epoch--you
 will afterwards hunger as before and be allowed to boast of your sort
 of starved soundness. _Illam ipsam quam iactant sanitatem non firmitate
 sed iciunio consequuntur. (Dialogus de oratoribus, cap._ 25.) History
 has not thought fit to tell you anything that is essential, but
 scorning and invisible she stood by your side, slipping into this one's
 hand some state proceedings, into that one's an ambassadorial report,
 into another's a date or an etymology or a pragmatic cobweb. Do you
 really believe yourself able to reckon up history like an addition
 sum, and do you consider your common intellect and your mathematical
 education good enough for that? How it must vex you to hear, that
 others narrate things, out of the best known periods, which you will
 never conceive, never!
 
 If now to this "education," calling itself historic but destitute of
 enthusiasm, and to the hostile Philistine activity, foaming with rage
 against all that is great, is added that third brutal and excited
 company of those who race after "Fortune"--then that in _summa_ results
 in such a confused shrieking and such a limb-dislocating turmoil that
 the thinker with stopped-up ears and blindfolded eyes flees into the
 most solitary wilderness,--where he may see, what those never will
 see, where he must hear sounds which rise to him out of all the depths
 of nature and come down to him from the stars. Here he confers with
 the great problems floating towards him, whose voices of course sound
 just as comfortless-awful, as unhistoric-eternal. The feeble person
 flees back from their cold breath, and the calculating one runs right
 through them without perceiving them. They deal worst, however, with
 the "educated man" who at times bestows great pains upon them. To him
 these phantoms transform themselves into conceptual cobwebs and hollow
 sound-figures. Grasping after them he imagines he has philosophy; in
 order to search for them he climbs about in the so-called history
 of philosophy--and when at last he has collected and piled up quite
 a cloud of such abstractions and stereotyped patterns, then it may
 happen to him that a real thinker crosses his path and--puffs them
 away. What a desperate annoyance indeed to meddle with philosophy as
 an "educated person"! From time to time it is true it appears to him
 as if the impossible connection of philosophy with that which nowadays
 gives itself airs as "German Culture" has become possible; some mongrel
 dallies and ogles between the two spheres and confuses fantasy on
 this side and on the other. Meanwhile however _one_ piece of advice
 is to be given to the Germans, if they do not wish to let themselves
 be confused. They may put to themselves the question about everything
 that they now call Culture: is _this_ the hoped-for German Culture, so
 serious and creative, so redeeming for the German mind, so purifying
 for the German virtues that their only philosopher in this century,
 Arthur _Schopenhauer,_ should have to espouse its cause?
 
 Here you have the philosopher--now search for the Culture proper to
 him! And if you are able to divine what kind of culture that would have
 to be, which would correspond to such a philosopher, then you have, in
 this divination, already _passed sentence_ on all your culture and on
 yourselves!
 
 
 
 
 PHILOSOPHY DURING THE TRAGIC AGE OF THE GREEKS
 
 
 (1873)
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 (_Probably_ 1874)
 
 
 If we know the aims of men who are strangers to us, it is sufficient
 for us to approve of or condemn them as wholes. Those who stand nearer
 to us we judge according to the means by which they further their
 aims; we often disapprove of their aims, but love them for the sake of
 their means and the style of their volition. Now philosophical systems
 are absolutely true only to their founders, to all later philosophers
 they are usually _one_ big mistake, and to feebler minds a sum of
 mistakes and truths; at any rate if regarded as highest aim they are
 an error, and in so far reprehensible. Therefore many disapprove of
 every philosopher, because his aim is not theirs; they are those whom I
 called "strangers to us." Whoever on the contrary finds any pleasure at
 all in great men finds pleasure also in such systems, be they ever so
 erroneous, for they all have in them one point which is irrefutable, a
 personal touch, and colour; one can use them in order to form a picture
 of the philosopher, just as from a plant growing in a certain place one
 can form conclusions as to the soil. _That_ mode of life, of viewing
 human affairs at any rate, has existed once and is therefore possible;
 the "system" is the growth in this soil or at least a part of this
 system....
 
 I narrate the history of those philosophers simplified: I shall bring
 into relief only _that_ point in every system which is a little bit
 of _personality,_ and belongs to that which is irrefutable, and
 indiscussable, which history has to preserve: it is a first attempt
 to regain and recreate those natures by comparison, and to let the
 polyphony of Greek nature at least resound once again: the task is, to
 bring to light that which we must _always love and revere_ and of which
 no later knowledge can rob us: the great man.
 
 
 
 LATER PREFACE
 
 
 (_Towards the end of_ 1879)
 
 
 This attempt to relate the history of the earlier Greek philosophers
 distinguishes itself from similar attempts by its brevity. This has
 been accomplished by mentioning but a small number of the doctrines of
 every philosopher, _i.e.,_ by incompleteness. Those doctrines, however,
 have been selected in which the personal element of the philosopher
 re-echoes most strongly; whereas a complete enumeration of all possible
 propositions handed down to us--as is the custom in text-books--merely
 brings about one thing, the absolute silencing of the personal element.
 It is through this that those records become so tedious; for in systems
 which have been refuted it is only this personal element that can still
 interest us, for this alone is eternally irrefutable. It is possible
 to shape the picture of a man out of three anecdotes. I endeavour to
 bring into relief three anecdotes out of every system and abandon the
 remainder.
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 There are opponents of philosophy, and one does well to listen to them;
 especially if they dissuade the distempered heads of Germans from
 metaphysics and on the other hand preach to them purification through
 the Physis, as Goethe did, or healing through Music, as Wagner. The
 physicians of the people condemn philosophy; he, therefore, who wants
 to justify it, must show to what purpose healthy nations use and have
 used philosophy. If he can show that, perhaps even the sick people
 will benefit by learning why philosophy is harmful just to them. There
 are indeed good instances of a health which can exist without any
 philosophy or with quite a moderate, almost a toying use of it; thus
 the Romans at their best period lived without philosophy. But where is
 to be found the instance of a nation becoming diseased whom philosophy
 had restored to health? Whenever philosophy showed itself helping,
 saving, prophylactic, it was with healthy people; it made sick people
 still more ill. If ever a nation was disintegrated and but loosely
 connected with the individuals, never has philosophy bound these
 individuals closer to the whole. If ever an individual was willing to
 stand aside and plant around himself the hedge of self-sufficiency,
 philosophy was always ready to isolate him still more and to destroy
 him through isolation. She is dangerous where she is not in her full
 right, and it is only the health of a nation but not that of every
 nation which gives her this right.
 
 Let us now look around for the highest authority as to what
 constitutes the health of a nation. I he Greeks, as _the_ truly
 healthy nation, have _justified_ philosophy once for all by having
 philosophised; and that indeed more than all other nations. They could
 not even stop at the right time, for still in their withered age
 they comported themselves as heated notaries of philosophy, although
 they understood by it only the pious sophistries and the sacrosanct
 hair-splittings of Christian dogmatics. They themselves have much
 lessened their merit for barbarian posterity by not being able to stop
 at the right time, because that posterity in its uninstructed and
 impetuous youth necessarily became entangled in those artfully woven
 nets and ropes.
 
 On the contrary, the Greek knew how to begin at the right time, and
 this lesson, when one ought to begin philosophising, they teach more
 distinctly than any other nation. For it should not be begun when
 trouble comes as perhaps some presume who derive philosophy from
 moroseness; no, but in good fortune, in mature manhood, out of the
 midst of the fervent serenity of a brave and victorious man's estate.
 The fact that the Greeks philosophised at that time throws light on
 the nature of philosophy and her task as well as on the nature of the
 Greeks themselves. Had they at that time been such commonsense and
 precocious experts and gayards as the learned Philistine of our days
 perhaps imagines, or had their life been only a state of voluptuous
 soaring, chiming, breathing and feeling, as the unlearned visionary is
 pleased to assume, then the spring of philosophy would not have come to
 light among them. At the best there would have come forth a brook soon
 trickling away in the sand or evaporating into fogs, but never that
 broad river flowing forth with the proud beat of its waves, the river
 which we know as Greek Philosophy.
 
 True, it has been eagerly pointed out how much the Greeks could
 find and learn abroad, in the Orient, and how many different things
 they may easily have brought from there. Of course an odd spectacle
 resulted, when certain scholars brought together the alleged masters
 from the Orient and the possible disciples from Greece, and exhibited
 Zarathustra near Heraclitus, the Hindoos near the Eleates, the
 Egyptians near Empedocles, or even Anaxagoras among the Jews and
 Pythagoras among the Chinese. In detail little has been determined;
 but we should in no way object to the general idea, if people did not
 burden us with the conclusion that therefore Philosophy had only been
 imported into Greece and was not indigenous to the soil, yea, that
 she, as something foreign, had possibly ruined rather than improved
 the Greek. Nothing is more foolish than to swear by the fact that the
 Greeks had an aboriginal culture; no, they rather absorbed all the
 culture flourishing among other nations, and they advanced so far,
 just because they understood how to hurl the spear further from the
 very spot where another nation had let it rest. They were admirable
 in the art of learning productively, and so, like them, we _ought_
 to learn from our neighbours, with a view to Life not to pedantic
 knowledge, using everything learnt as a foothold whence to leap
 high and still higher than our neighbour. The questions as to the
 beginning of philosophy are quite negligible, for everywhere in the
 beginning there is the crude, the unformed, the empty and the ugly;
 and in all things only the higher stages come into consideration.
 He who in the place of Greek philosophy prefers to concern himself
 with that of Egypt and Persia, because the latter are perhaps more
 "original" and certainly older, proceeds just as ill-advisedly as
 those who cannot be at ease before they have traced back the Greek
 mythology, so grand and profound, to such physical trivialities as
 sun, lightning, weather and fog, as its prime origins, and who fondly
 imagine they have rediscovered for instance in the restricted worship
 of the one celestial vault among the other Indo-Germans a purer form
 of religion than the poly-theistic worship of the Greek had been. The
 road towards the beginning always leads into barbarism, and he who is
 concerned with the Greeks ought always to keep in mind the fact that
 the unsubdued thirst for knowledge in itself always barbarises just as
 much as the hatred of knowledge, and that the Greeks have subdued their
 inherently insatiable thirst for knowledge by their regard for Life,
 by an ideal need of Life,--since they wished to live immediately that
 which they learnt. The Greeks also philosophised as men of culture and
 with the aims of culture, and therefore saved themselves the trouble
 of inventing once again the elements of philosophy and knowledge
 out of some autochthonous conceit, and with a will they at once set
 themselves to fill out, enhance, raise and purify these elements they
 had taken over in such a way, that only now in a higher sense and in a
 purer sphere they became inventors. For they discovered the _typical
 philosopher's genius,_ and the inventions of all posterity have added
 nothing essential.
 
 Every nation is put to shame if one points out such a wonderfully
 idealised company of philosophers as that of the early Greek masters,
 Thales, Anaximander, Heraclitus, Parmenides, Anaxagoras, Empedocles,
 Democritus and Socrates. All those men are integral, entire and
 self-contained,[1] and hewn out of one stone. Severe necessity exists
 between their thinking and their character. They are not bound by any
 convention, because at that time no professional class of philosophers
 and scholars existed. They all stand before us in magnificent solitude
 as the only ones who then devoted their life exclusively to knowledge.
 They all possess the virtuous energy of the Ancients, whereby they
 excel all the later philosophers in finding their own form and in
 perfecting it by metamorphosis in its most minute details and general
 aspect. For they were met by no helpful and facilitating fashion. Thus
 together they form what Schopenhauer, in opposition to the Republic of
 Scholars, has called a Republic of Geniuses; one giant calls to another
 across the arid intervals of ages, and, undisturbed by a wanton, noisy
 race of dwarfs, creeping about beneath them, the sublime intercourse of
 spirits continues.
 
 Of this sublime intercourse of spirits I have resolved to relate those
 items which our modern hardness of hearing might perhaps hear and
 understand; that means certainly the least of all. It seems to me
 that those old sages from Thales to Socrates have discussed in that
 intercourse, although in its most general aspect, everything that
 constitutes for our contemplation the peculiarly Hellenic. In their
 intercourse, as already in their personalities, they express distinctly
 the great features of Greek genius of which the whole of Greek history
 is a shadowy impression, a hazy copy, which consequently speaks less
 clearly. If we could rightly interpret the total life of the Greek
 nation, we should ever find reflected only that picture which in her
 highest geniuses shines with more resplendent colours. Even the first
 experience of philosophy on Greek soil, the sanction of the Seven Sages
 is a distinct and unforgettable line in the picture of the Hellenic.
 Other nations have their Saints, the Greeks have Sages. Rightly it has
 been said that a nation is characterised not only by her great men
 but rather by the manner in which she recognises and honours them. In
 other ages the philosopher is an accidental solitary wanderer in the
 most hostile environment, either slinking through or pushing himself
 through with clenched fists. With the Greek however the philosopher is
 not accidental; when in the Sixth and Fifth centuries amidst the most
 frightful dangers and seductions of secularisation he appears and as
 it were steps forth from the cave of Trophonios into the very midst of
 luxuriance, the discoverers' happiness, the wealth and the sensuousness
 of the Greek colonies, then we divine that he comes as a noble warner
 for the same purpose for which in those centuries Tragedy was born
 and which the Orphic mysteries in their grotesque hieroglyphics give
 us to understand. The opinion of those philosophers on Life and
 Existence altogether means so much more than a modern opinion because
 they had before themselves Life in a luxuriant perfection, and because
 with them, unlike us, the sense of the thinker was not muddled by
 the disunion engendered by the wish for freedom, beauty, fulness of
 life and the love for truth that only asks: What is the good of Life
 at all? The mission which the philosopher has to discharge within a
 real Culture, fashioned in a homogeneous style, cannot be clearly
 conjectured out of our circumstances and experiences for the simple
 reason that we have no such culture. No, it is only a Culture like the
 Greek which can answer the question as to that task of the philosopher,
 only such a Culture can, as I said before, justify philosophy at all;
 because such a Culture alone knows and can demonstrate why and how the
 philosopher is _not_ an accidental, chance wanderer driven now hither,
 now thither. There is a steely necessity which fetters the philosopher
 to a true Culture: but what if this Culture does not exist? Then the
 philosopher is an incalculable and therefore terror-inspiring comet,
 whereas in the favourable case, he shines as the central star in the
 solar-system of culture. It is for this reason that the Greeks justify
 the philosopher, because with them he is no comet.
 
 
 [1] _Cf._ Napoleon's word about Goethe: "Voil un homme!"--TR.
 
 
 
 2
 
 
 After such contemplations it will be accepted without offence if I
 speak of the pre-Platonic philosophers as of a homogeneous company, and
 devote this paper to them exclusively. Something quite new begins with
 Plato; or it might be said with equal justice that in comparison with
 that Republic of Geniuses from Thales to Socrates, the philosophers
 since Plato lack something essential.
 
 Whoever wants to express himself unfavourably about those older masters
 may call them one-sided, and their _Epigones,_ with Plato as head,
 many-sided. Yet it would be more just and unbiassed to conceive of
 the latter as philosophic hybrid-characters, of the former as the
 pure types. Plato himself is the first magnificent hybrid-character,
 and as such finds expression as well in his philosophy as in his
 personality. In his ideology are united Socratian, Pythagorean, and
 Heraclitean elements, and for this reason it is no typically pure
 phenomenon. As man, too, Plato mingles the features of the royally
 secluded, all-sufficing Heraclitus, of the melancholy-compassionate and
 legislatory Pythagoras and of the psycho-expert dialectician Socrates.
 All later philosophers are such hybrid-characters; wherever something
 one-sided does come into prominence with them as in the case of the
 Cynics, it is not type but caricature. Much more important however is
 the fact that they are founders of sects and that the sects founded
 by them are all institutions in direct opposition to the Hellenic
 culture and the unity of its style prevailing up to that time. In
 their way they seek a redemption, but only for the individuals or at
 the best for groups of friends and disciples closely connected with
 them. The activity of the older philosophers tends, although they were
 unconscious of it, towards a cure and purification on a large scale;
 the mighty course of Greek culture is not to be stopped; awful dangers
 are to be removed out of the way of its current; the philosopher
 protects and defends his native country. Now, since Plato, he is in
 exile and conspires against his fatherland.
 
 It is a real misfortune that so very little of those older philosophic
 masters has come down to us and that all complete works of theirs are
 withheld from us. Involuntarily, on account of that loss, we measure
 them according to wrong standards and allow ourselves to be influenced
 unfavourably towards them by the mere accidental fact that Plato
 and Aristotle never lacked appreciators and copyists. Some people
 presuppose a special providence for books, a _fatum libellorum;_ such
 a providence however would at any rate be a very malicious one if it
 deemed it wise to withhold from us the works of Heraclitus, Empedocles'
 wonderful poem, and the writings of Democritus, whom the ancients put
 on a par with Plato, whom he even excels as far as ingenuity goes,
 and as a substitute put into our hand Stoics, Epicureans and Cicero.
 Probably the most sublime part of Greek thought and its expression
 in words is lost to us; a fate which will not surprise the man who
 remembers the misfortunes of Scotus Erigena or of Pascal, and who
 considers that even in this enlightened century the first edition of
 Schopenhauer's "_The World As Will And Idea_" became waste-paper. If
 somebody will presuppose a special fatalistic power with respect to
 such things he may do so and say with Goethe: "Let no one complain
 about and grumble at things vile and mean, they _are_ the real
 rulers,--however much this be gainsaid!" In particular they are more
 powerful than the power of truth. Mankind very rarely produces a good
 book in which with daring freedom is intonated the battle-song of
 truth, the song of philosophic heroism; and yet whether it is to live a
 century longer or to crumble and moulder into dust and ashes, depends
 on the most miserable accidents, on the sudden mental eclipse of men's
 heads, on superstitious convulsions and antipathies, finally on fingers
 not too fond of writing or even on eroding bookworms and rainy weather.
 But we will not lament but rather take the advice of the reproving and
 consolatory words which Hamann addresses to scholars who lament over
 lost works. "Would not the artist who succeeded in throwing a lentil
 through the eye of a needle have sufficient, with a bushel of lentils,
 to practise his acquired skill? One would like to put this question to
 all scholars who do not know how to use the works of the Ancients any
 better than that man used his lentils." It might be added in our case
 that not one more word, anecdote, or date needed to be transmitted to
 us than has been transmitted, indeed that even much less might have
 been preserved for us and yet we should have been able to establish the
 general doctrine that the Greeks justify philosophy.
 
 A time which suffers from the so-called "general education" but has
 no culture and no unity of style in her life hardly knows what to
 do with philosophy, even if the latter were proclaimed by the very
 Genius of Truth in the streets and market-places. She rather remains
 at such a time the learned monologue of the solitary rambler, the
 accidental booty of the individual, the hidden closet-secret or the
 innocuous chatter between academic senility and childhood. Nobody
 dare venture to fulfil in himself the law of philosophy, nobody
 lives philosophically, with that simple manly faith which compelled
 an Ancient, wherever he was, whatever he did, to deport himself as
 a Stoic, when he had once pledged his faith to the Stoa. All modern
 philosophising is limited politically and regulated by the police to
 learned semblance. Thanks to governments, churches, academies, customs,
 fashions, and the cowardice of man, it never gets beyond the sigh: "If
 only!..." or beyond the knowledge: "Once upon a time there was..."
 Philosophy is without rights; therefore modern man, if he were at all
 courageous and conscientious, ought to condemn her and perhaps banish
 her with words similar to those by which Plato banished the tragic
 poets from his State. Of course there would be left a reply for her, as
 there remained to those poets against Plato. If one once compelled her
 to speak out she might say perhaps: "Miserable Nation! Is it my fault
 if among you I am on the tramp, like a fortune teller through the land,
 and must hide and disguise myself, as if I were a great sinner and ye
 my judges? Just look at my sister, Art! It is with her as with me; we
 have been cast adrift among the Barbarians and no longer know how to
 save ourselves. Here we are lacking, it is true, every good right; but
 the judges before whom we find justice judge you also and will tell
 you: First acquire a culture; then you shall experience what Philosophy
 can and will do."--
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 Greek philosophy seems to begin with a preposterous fancy, with the
 proposition that _water_ is the origin and mother-womb of all things.
 Is it really necessary to stop there and become serious? Yes, and
 for three reasons: Firstly, because the proposition does enunciate
 something about the origin of things; secondly, because it does
 so without figure and fable; thirdly and lastly, because in it is
 contained, although only in the chrysalis state, the idea: Everything
 is one. The first mentioned reason leaves Thales still in the company
 of religious and superstitious people, the second however takes him
 out of this company and shows him to us as a natural philosopher, but
 by virtue of the third, Thales becomes the first Greek philosopher.
 If he had said: "Out of water earth is evolved," we should only have
 a scientific hypothesis; a false one, though nevertheless difficult
 to refute. But he went beyond the scientific. In his presentation of
 this concept of unity through the hypothesis of water, Thales has not
 surmounted the low level of the physical discernments of his time, but
 at the best overleapt them. The deficient and unorganised observations
 of an empiric nature which Thales had made as to the occurrence and
 transformations of water, or to be more exact, of the Moist, would
 not in the least have made possible or even suggested such an immense
 generalisation. That which drove him to this generalisation was a
 metaphysical dogma, which had its origin in a mystic intuition and
 which together with the ever renewed endeavours to express it better,
 we find in all philosophies,--the proposition: _Everything is one!_
 
 How despotically such a faith deals with all empiricism is worthy of
 note; with Thales especially one can learn how Philosophy has behaved
 at all times, when she wanted to get beyond the hedges of experience
 to her magically attracting goal. On light supports she leaps in
 advance; hope and divination wing her feet. Calculating reason too,
 clumsily pants after her and seeks better supports in its attempt to
 reach that alluring goal, at which its divine companion has already
 arrived. One sees in imagination two wanderers by a wild forest-stream
 which carries with it rolling stones; the one, light-footed, leaps
 over it using the stones and swinging himself upon them ever further
 and further, though they precipitously sink into the depths behind
 him. The other stands helpless there most of the time; he has first
 to build a pathway which will bear his heavy, weary step; sometimes
 that cannot be done and then no god will help him across the stream.
 What therefore carries philosophical thinking so quickly to its goal?
 Does it distinguish itself from calculating and measuring thought
 only by its more rapid flight through large spaces? No, for a strange
 illogical power wings the foot of philosophical thinking; and this
 power is Fancy. Lifted by the latter, philosophical thinking leaps
 from possibility to possibility, and these for the time being are
 taken as certainties; and now and then even whilst on the wing it
 gets hold of certainties. An ingenious presentiment shows them to
 the flier; demonstrable certainties are divined at a distance to be
 at this point. Especially powerful is the strength of Fancy in the
 lightning-like seizing and illuminating of similarities; afterwards
 reflection applies its standards and models and seeks to substitute
 the similarities by equalities, that which was seen side by side by
 causalities. But though this should never be possible, even in the case
 of Thales the indemonstrable philosophising has yet its value; although
 all supports are broken when Logic and the rigidity of Empiricism want
 to get across to the proposition: Everything is water; yet still there
 is always, after the demolition of the scientific edifice, a remainder,
 and in this very remainder lies a moving force and as it were the hope
 of future fertility.
 
 Of course I do not mean that the thought in any restriction or
 attenuation, or as allegory, still retains some kind of "truth"; as
 if, for instance, one might imagine the creating artist standing
 near a waterfall, and seeing in the forms which leap towards him,
 an artistically prefiguring game of the water with human and animal
 bodies, masks, plants, rocks, nymphs, griffins, and with all existing
 types in general, so that to him the proposition: Everything is water,
 is confirmed. The thought of Thales has rather its value--even after
 the perception of its indemonstrableness--in the very fact, that it was
 meant unmythically and unallegorically. The Greeks among whom Thales
 became so suddenly conspicuous were the anti-type of all realists
 by only believing essentially in the reality of men and gods, and
 by contemplating the whole of nature as if it were only a disguise,
 masquerade and metamorphosis of these god-men. Man was to them the
 truth, and essence of things; everything else mere phenomenon and
 deceiving play. For that very reason they experienced incredible
 difficulty in conceiving of ideas as ideas. Whilst with the moderns
 the most personal item sublimates itself into abstractions, with
 them the most abstract notions became personified. Thales, however,
 said, "Not man but water is the reality of things "; he began to
 believe in nature, in so far that he at least believed in water. As
 a mathematician and astronomer he had grown cold towards everything
 mythical and allegorical, and even if he did not succeed in becoming
 disillusioned as to the pure abstraction, Everything is one, and
 although he left off at a physical expression he was nevertheless among
 the Greeks of his time a surprising rarity. Perhaps the exceedingly
 conspicuous _Orpheans_ possessed in a still higher degree than he the
 faculty of conceiving abstractions and of thinking unplastically; only
 they did not succeed in expressing these abstractions except in the
 form of the allegory. Also Pherecydes of Syrus who is a contemporary
 of Thales and akin to him in many physical conceptions hovers with
 the expression of the latter in that middle region where Allegory is
 wedded to Mythos, so that he dares, for example, to compare the earth
 with a winged oak, which hangs in the air with spread pinions and which
 Zeus bedecks, after the defeat of Kronos, with a magnificent robe of
 honour, into which with his own hands Zeus embroiders lands, water
 and rivers. In contrast with such gloomy allegorical philosophising
 scarcely to be translated into the realm of the comprehensible, Thales'
 are the works of a creative master who began to look into Nature's
 depths without fantastic fabling. If as it is true he used Science
 and the demonstrable but soon out-leapt them, then this likewise
 is a typical characteristic of the philosophical genius. The Greek
 word which designates the Sage belongs etymologically to _sapio,_ I
 taste, _sapiens,_ the tasting one, _sisyphos,_ the man of the most
 delicate taste; the peculiar art of the philosopher therefore consists,
 according to the opinion of the people, in a delicate selective
 judgment by taste, by discernment, by significant differentiation. He
 is not prudent, if one calls _him_ prudent, who in his own affairs
 finds out the good; Aristotle rightly says: "That which Thales and
 Anaxagoras know, people will call unusual, astounding, difficult,
 divine but--useless, since human possessions were of no concern to
 those two." Through thus selecting and precipitating the unusual,
 astounding, difficult, and divine, Philosophy marks the boundary-lines
 dividing her from Science in the same way as she does it from Prudence
 by the emphasising of the useless. Science without thus selecting,
 without such delicate taste, pounces upon everything knowable, in the
 blind covetousness to know all at any price; philosophical thinking
 however is always on the track of the things worth knowing, on the
 track of the great and most important discernments. Now the idea of
 greatness is changeable, as well in the moral as in the sthetic
 realm, thus Philosophy begins with a legislation with respect to
 greatness, she becomes a Nomenclator. "That is great," she says,
 and therewith she raises man above the blind, untamed covetousness
 of his thirst for knowledge. By the idea of greatness she assuages
 this thirst: and it is chiefly by this, that she contemplates the
 greatest discernment, that of the essence and kernel of things, as
 attainable and attained. When Thales says, "Everything is water," man
 is startled up out of his worm-like mauling of and crawling about among
 the individual sciences; he divines the last solution of things and
 masters through this divination the common perplexity of the lower
 grades of knowledge. The philosopher tries to make the total-chord of
 the universe re-echo within himself and then to project it into ideas
 outside himself: whilst he is contemplative like the creating artist,
 sympathetic like the religionist, looking out for ends and causalities
 like the scientific man, whilst he feels himself swell up to the
 macrocosm, he still retains the circumspection to contemplate himself
 coldly as the reflex of the world; he retains that cool-headedness,
 which the dramatic artist possesses, when he transforms himself into
 other bodies, speaks out of them, and yet knows how to project this
 transformation outside himself into written verses. What the verse is
 to the poet, dialectic thinking is to the philosopher; he snatches
 at it in order to hold fast his enchantment, in order to petrify it.
 And just as words and verse to the dramatist are only stammerings in
 a foreign language, to tell in it what he lived, what he saw, and
 what he can directly promulgate by gesture and music only, thus the
 expression of every deep philosophical intuition by means of dialectics
 and scientific reflection is, it is true, on the one hand the only
 means to communicate what has been seen, but on the other hand it is
 a paltry means, and at the bottom a metaphorical, absolutely inexact
 translation into a different sphere and language. Thus Thales saw the
 Unity of the "Existent," and when he wanted to communicate this idea he
 talked of water.
 
 
 
 4
 
 
 Whilst the general type of the philosopher in the picture of Thales
 is set off rather hazily, the picture of his great successor already
 speaks much more distinctly to us. _Anaximander_ of Milet, the
 first philosophical author of the Ancients, writes in the very way
 that the typical philosopher will always write as long as he is
 not alienated from ingenuousness and _navet_ by odd claims: in
 a grand lapidarian style of writing, sentence for sentence ... a
 witness of a new inspiration, and an expression of the sojourning in
 sublime contemplations. The thought and its form are milestones on
 the path towards the highest wisdom. With such a lapidarian emphasis
 Anaximander once said: "Whence things originated, thither, according
 to necessity, they must return and perish; for they must pay penalty
 and be judged for their injustices according to the order of time."
 Enigmatical utterance of a true pessimist, oracular inscription on the
 boundary-stone of Greek philosophy, how shall we explain thee?
 
 The only serious moralist of our century in the Parergis (Vol. ii.,
 chap. 12, "Additional Remarks on The Doctrine about the Suffering in
 the World, Appendix of Corresponding Passages") urges on us a similar
 contemplation: "The right standard by which to judge every human
 being is that he really is a being who ought not to exist at all,
 but who is expiating his existence by manifold forms of suffering
 and death:--What can one expect from such a being? Are we not all
 sinners condemned to death? We expiate our birth firstly by our
 life and secondly by our death." He who in the physiognomy of our
 universal human lot reads this doctrine and already recognises the
 fundamental bad quality of every human life, in the fact that none
 can stand a very close and careful contemplation--although our time,
 accustomed to the biographical epidemic, seems to think otherwise and
 more loftily about the dignity of man; he who, like Schopenhauer, on
 "the heights of the Indian breezes" has heard the sacred word about
 the moral value of existence, will be kept with difficulty from
 making an extremely anthropomorphic metaphor and from generalizing
 that melancholy doctrine--at first only limited to human life--and
 applying it by transmission to the general character of all existence.
 It may not be very logical, it is however at any rate very human and
 moreover quite in harmony with the philosophical leaping described
 above, now with Anaximander to consider all Becoming as a punishable
 emancipation from eternal "Being," as a wrong that is to be atoned
 for by destruction. Everything that has once come into existence also
 perishes, whether we think of human life or of water or of heat and
 cold; everywhere where definite qualities are to be noticed, we are
 allowed to prophesy the extinction of these qualities--according to
 the all-embracing proof of experience. Thus a being that possesses
 definite qualities and consists of them, can never be the origin and
 principle of things; the veritable _ens,_ the "Existent," Anaximander
 concluded, cannot possess any definite qualities, otherwise, like
 all other things, it would necessarily have originated and perished.
 In order that Becoming may not cease, the Primordial-being must be
 indefinite. The immortality and eternity of the Primordial-being lies
 not in an infiniteness and inexhaustibility--as usually the expounders
 of Anaximander presuppose--but in this, that it lacks the definite
 qualities which lead to destruction, for which reason it bears also its
 name: The Indefinite. The thus labelled Primordial-being is superior
 to all Becoming and for this very reason it guarantees the eternity
 and unimpeded course of Becoming. This last unity in that Indefinite,
 the mother-womb of all things, can, it is true, be designated only
 negatively by man, as something to which no predicate out of the
 existing world of Becoming can be allotted, and might be considered a
 peer to the Kantian "Thing-in-itself."
 
 Of course he who is able to wrangle persistently with others as to what
 kind of thing that primordial substance really was, whether perhaps an
 intermediate thing between air and water, or perhaps between air and
 fire, has not understood our philosopher at all; this is likewise to
 be said about those, who seriously ask themselves, whether Anaximander
 had thought of his primordial substance as a mixture of all existing
 substances. Rather we must direct our gaze to the place where we can
 learn that Anaximander no longer treated the question of the origin
 of the world as purely physical; we must direct our gaze towards that
 first stated lapidarian proposition. When on the contrary he saw a sum
 of wrongs to be expiated in the plurality of things that have become,
 then he, as the first Greek, with daring grasp caught up the tangle of
 the most profound ethical problem. How can anything perish that has a
 right to exist? Whence that restless Becoming and giving-birth, whence
 that expression of painful distortion on the face of Nature, whence the
 never-ending dirge in all realms of existence? Out of this world of
 injustice, of audacious apostasy from the primordial-unity of things
 Anaximander flees into a metaphysical castle, leaning out of which he
 turns his gaze far and wide in order at last, after a pensive silence,
 to address to all beings this question: "What is your existence worth?
 And if it is worth nothing why are you there? By your guilt, I observe,
 you sojourn in this world. You will have to expiate it by death. Look
 how your earth fades; the seas decrease and dry up, the marine-shell
 on the mountain shows you how much already they have dried up; fire
 destroys your world even now, finally it will end in smoke and ashes.
 But again and again such a world of transitoriness will ever build
 itself up; who shall redeem you from the curse of Becoming?"
 
 Not every kind of life may have been welcome to a man who put such
 questions, whose upward-soaring thinking continually broke the empiric
 ropes, in order to take at once to the highest, superlunary flight.
 Willingly we believe tradition, that he walked along in especially
 dignified attire and showed a truly tragic hauteur in his gestures
 and habits of life. He lived as he wrote; he spoke as solemnly as he
 dressed himself, he raised his hand and placed his foot as if this
 existence was a tragedy, and he had been born in order to co-operate
 in that tragedy by playing the _rle_ of hero. In all that he was the
 great model of Empedocles. His fellow-citizens elected him the leader
 of an emigrating colony--perhaps they were pleased at being able to
 honour him and at the same time to get rid of him. His thought also
 emigrated and founded colonies; in Ephesus and in Elea they could not
 get rid of him; and if they could not resolve upon staying at the spot
 where he stood, they nevertheless knew that they had been led there by
 him, whence they now prepared to proceed without him.
 
 Thales shows the need of simplifying the empire of plurality, and
 of reducing it to a mere expansion or disguise of the _one single_
 existing quality, water. Anaximander goes beyond him with two steps.
 Firstly he puts the question to himself: How, if there exists an
 eternal Unity at all, is that Plurality possible? and he takes the
 answer out of the contradictory, self-devouring and denying character
 of this Plurality. The existence of this Plurality becomes a moral
 phenomenon to him; it is not justified, it expiates itself continually
 through destruction. But then the questions occur to him: Yet why has
 not everything that has become perished long ago, since, indeed, quite
 an eternity of time has already gone by? Whence the ceaseless current
 of the River of Becoming? He can save himself from these questions
 only by mystic possibilities: the eternal Becoming can have its origin
 only in the eternal "Being," the conditions for that apostasy from
 that eternal "Being" to a Becoming in injustice are ever the same, the
 constellation of things cannot help itself being thus fashioned, that
 no end is to be seen of that stepping forth of the individual being out
 of the lap of the "Indefinite." At this Anaximander stayed; that is,
 he remained within the deep shadows which like gigantic spectres were
 lying on the mountain range of such a world-perception. The more one
 wanted to approach the problem of solving how out of the Indefinite the
 Definite, out of the Eternal the Temporal, out of the Just the Unjust
 could by secession ever originate, the darker the night became.----
 
 
 
 5
 
 
 Towards the midst of this mystic night, in which Anaximander's problem
 of the Becoming was wrapped up, Heraclitus of Ephesus approached and
 illuminated it by a divine flash of lightning. "I contemplate the
 Becoming," he exclaimed,--"and nobody has so attentively watched this
 eternal wave-surging and rhythm of things. And what do I behold?
 Lawfulness, infallible certainty, ever equal paths of Justice,
 condemning Erinyes behind all transgressions of the laws, the whole
 world the spectacle of a governing justice and of demoniacally
 omnipresent natural forces subject to justice's sway. I do not behold
 the punishment of that which has become, but the justification of
 Becoming. When has sacrilege, when has apostasy manifested itself in
 inviolable forms, in laws esteemed sacred? Where injustice sways, there
 is caprice, disorder, irregularity, contradiction; where however Law
 and Zeus' daughter, Dike, rule alone, as in this world, how could the
 sphere of guilt, of expiation, of judgment, and as it were the place of
 execution of all condemned ones be there?"
 
 From this intuition Heraclitus took two coherent negations, which are
 put into the right light only by a comparison with the propositions of
 his predecessor. Firstly, he denied the duality of two quite diverse
 worlds, into the assumption of which Anaximander had been pushed; he
 no longer distinguished a physical world from a metaphysical, a realm
 of definite qualities from a realm of indefinable indefiniteness. Now
 after this first step he could neither be kept back any longer from
 a still greater audacity of denying: he denied "Being" altogether.
 For this one world which was left to him,--shielded all round by
 eternal, unwritten laws, flowing up and down in the brazen beat of
 rhythm,--shows nowhere persistence, indestructibility, a bulwark in the
 stream. Louder than Anaximander, Heraclitus exclaimed: "I see nothing
 but Becoming. Be not deceived! It is the fault of your limited outlook
 and not the fault of the essence of things if you believe that you see
 firm land anywhere in the ocean of Becoming and Passing. You need names
 for things, just as if they had a rigid permanence, but the very river
 in which you bathe a second time is no longer the same one which you
 entered before."
 
 Heraclitus has as his royal property the highest power of intuitive
 conception, whereas towards the other mode of conception which is
 consummated by ideas and logical combinations, that is towards reason,
 he shows himself cool, apathetic, even hostile, and he seems to
 derive a pleasure when he is able to contradict reason by means of a
 truth gained intuitively, and this he does in such propositions as:
 "Everything has always its opposite within itself," so fearlessly
 that Aristotle before the tribunal of Reason accuses him of the
 highest crime, of having sinned against the law of opposition.
 Intuitive representation however embraces two things: firstly, the
 present, motley, changing world, pressing on us in all experiences,
 secondly, the conditions by means of which alone any experience of
 this world becomes possible: time and space. For these are able to be
 intuitively apprehended, purely in themselves and independent of any
 experience; _i.e.,_ they can be perceived, although they are without
 definite contents. If now Heraclitus considered time in this fashion,
 dissociated from all experiences, he had in it the most instructive
 monogram of all that which falls within the realm of intuitive
 conception. Just as he conceived of time, so also for instance did
 Schopenhauer, who repeatedly says of it: that in it every instant
 exists only in so far as it has annihilated the preceding one, its
 father, in order to be itself effaced equally quickly; that past
 and future are as unreal as any dream; that the present is only the
 dimensionless and unstable boundary between the two; that however, like
 time, so space, and again like the latter, so also everything that
 is simultaneously in space and time, has only a relative existence,
 only through and for the sake of a something else, of the same kind
 as itself, _i.e.,_ existing only under the same limitations. This
 truth is in the highest degree self-evident, accessible to everyone,
 and just for that very reason, abstractly and rationally, it is only
 attained with great difficulty. Whoever has this truth before his eyes
 must however also proceed at once to the next Heraclitean consequence
 and say that the whole essence of actuality is in fact activity, and
 that for actuality there is no other kind of existence and reality,
 as Schopenhauer has likewise expounded ("The World As Will And Idea,"
 Vol. I., Bk. I, sec. 4): "Only as active does it fill space and time:
 its action upon the immediate object determines the perception in
 which alone it exists: the effect of the action of any material object
 upon any other, is known only in so far as the latter acts upon the
 immediate object in a different way from that in which it acted before;
 it consists in this alone. Cause and effect thus constitute the whole
 nature of matter; its true being _is_ its action. The totality of
 everything material is therefore very appropriately called in German
 _Wirklichkeit_ (actuality)--a word which is far more expressive than
 _Realitt_ (reality).[2] That upon which actuality acts is always
 matter; actuality's whole 'Being' and essence therefore consist only in
 the orderly change, which _one_ part of it causes in another, and is
 therefore wholly relative, according to a relation which is valid only
 within the boundary of actuality, as in the case of time and space."
 
 The eternal and exclusive Becoming, the total instability of all
 reality and actuality, which continually works and becomes and never
 _is,_ as Heraclitus teaches--is an awful and appalling conception,
 and in its effects most nearly related to that sensation, by which
 during an earthquake one loses confidence in the firmly-grounded earth.
 It required an astonishing strength to translate this effect into
 its opposite, into the sublime, into happy astonishment. Heraclitus
 accomplished this through an observation of the proper course of all
 Becoming and Passing, which he conceived of under the form of polarity,
 as the divergence of a force into two qualitatively different, opposite
 actions, striving after reunion. A quality is set continually at
 variance with itself and separates itself into its opposites: these
 opposites continually strive again one towards another. The common
 people of course think to recognise something rigid, completed,
 consistent; but the fact of the matter is that at any instant, bright
 and dark, sour and sweet are side by side and attached to one another
 like two wrestlers of whom sometimes the one succeeds, sometimes the
 other. According to Heraclitus honey is at the same time sweet and
 bitter, and the world itself an amphora whose contents constantly need
 stirring up. Out of the war of the opposites all Becoming originates;
 the definite and to us seemingly persistent qualities express only the
 momentary predominance of the one fighter, but with that the war is not
 at an end; the wrestling continues to all eternity. Everything happens
 according to this struggle, and this very struggle manifests eternal
 justice. It is a wonderful conception, drawn from the purest source
 of Hellenism, which considers the struggle as the continual sway of a
 homogeneous, severe justice bound by eternal laws. Only a Greek was
 able to consider this conception as the fundament of a _Cosmodicy;_ it
 is Hesiod's good Eris transfigured into the cosmic principle, it is
 the idea of a contest, an idea held by individual Greeks and by their
 State, and translated out of the gymnasia and palstra, out of the
 artistic agonistics, out of the struggle of the political parties and
 of the towns into the most general principle, so that the machinery of
 the universe is regulated by it. Just as every Greek fought as though
 he alone were in the right, and as though an absolutely sure standard
 of judicial opinion could at any instant decide whither victory is
 inclining, thus the qualities wrestle one with another, according to
 inviolable laws and standards which are inherent in the struggle. The
 Things themselves in the permanency of which the limited intellect of
 man and animal believes, do not "exist" at all; they are as the fierce
 flashing and fiery sparkling of drawn swords, as the stars of Victory
 rising with a radiant resplendence in the battle of the opposite
 qualities.
 
 That struggle which is peculiar to all Becoming, that eternal
 interchange of victory is again described by Schopenhauer: ("The World
 As Will And Idea," Vol. I., Bk. 2, sec. 27) "The permanent matter
 must constantly change its form; for under the guidance of causality,
 mechanical, physical, chemical, and organic phenomena, eagerly striving
 to appear, wrest the matter from each other, for each desires to
 reveal its own Idea. This strife may be followed up through the whole
 of nature; indeed nature exists only through it." The following pages
 give the most noteworthy illustrations of this struggle, only that
 the prevailing tone of this description ever remains other than that
 of Heraclitus in so far as to Schopenhauer the struggle is a proof of
 the Will to Life falling out with itself; it is to him a feasting
 on itself on the part of this dismal, dull impulse, as a phenomenon
 on the whole horrible and not at all making for happiness. The arena
 and the object of this struggle is Matter,--which some natural forces
 alternately endeavour to disintegrate and build up again at the expense
 of other natural forces,--as also Space and Time, the union of which
 through causality _is_ this very matter.
 
 
 [2] Mira in quibusdam rebus verborum proprietas est, et consuetudo
 sermonis antiqui qudam efficacissimis notis signat (Seneca, Epist.
 81).--TR.
 
 
 
 6
 
 
 Whilst the imagination of Heraclitus measured the restlessly moving
 universe, the "actuality" (_Wirklichkeit_), with the eye of the happy
 spectator, who sees innumerable pairs wrestling in joyous combat
 entrusted to the superintendence of severe umpires, a still higher
 presentiment seized him, he no longer could contemplate the wrestling
 pairs and the umpires, separated one from another; the very umpires
 seemed to fight, and the fighters seemed to be their own judges--yea,
 since at the bottom he conceived only of the one Justice eternally
 swaying, he dared to exclaim: "The contest of The Many is itself pure
 justice. And after all: The One is The Many. For what are all those
 qualities according to their nature? Are they immortal gods? Are they
 separate beings working for themselves from the beginning and without
 end? And if the world which we see knows only Becoming and Passing but
 no Permanence, should perhaps those qualities constitute a differently
 fashioned metaphysical world, true, not a world of unity as Anaximander
 sought behind the fluttering veil of plurality, but a world of eternal
 and essential pluralities?" Is it possible that however violently he
 had denied such duality, Heraclitus has after all by a round-about way
 accidentally got into the dual cosmic order, an order with an Olympus
 of numerous immortal gods and demons,--viz., _many_ realities,--and
 with a human world, which sees only the dust-cloud of the Olympic
 struggle and the flashing of divine spears,--_i.e.,_ only a Becoming?
 Anaximander had fled just from these definite qualities into the lap of
 the metaphysical "Indefinite"; because the former _became_ and passed,
 he had denied them a true and essential existence; however should it
 not seem now as if the Becoming is only the looming-into-view of a
 struggle of eternal qualities? When we speak of the Becoming, should
 not the original cause of this be sought in the peculiar feebleness of
 human cognition--whereas in the nature of things there is perhaps no
 Becoming, but only a co-existing of many true increate indestructible
 realities?
 
 These are Heraclitean loop-holes and labyrinths; he exclaims once
 again: "The 'One' is the 'Many'." The many perceptible qualities are
 neither eternal entities, nor phantasmata of our senses (Anaxagoras
 conceives them later on as the former, Parmenides as the latter),
 they are neither rigid, sovereign "Being" nor fleeting Appearance
 hovering in human minds. The third possibility which alone was left
 to Heraclitus nobody will be able to divine with dialectic sagacity
 and as it were by calculation, for what he invented here is a rarity
 even in the realm of mystic incredibilities and unexpected cosmic
 metaphors.--The world is the _Game_ of Zeus, or expressed more
 physically, the game of fire with itself, the "One" is only in this
 sense at the same time the "Many."--
 
 In order to elucidate in the first place the introduction of fire as
 a world-shaping force, I recall how Anaximander had further developed
 the theory of water as the origin of things. Placing confidence in the
 essential part of Thales' theory, and strengthening and adding to the
 latter's observations, Anaximander however was not to be convinced
 that before the water and, as it were, after the water there was no
 further stage of quality: no, to him out of the Warm and the Cold
 the Moist seemed to form itself, and the Warm and the Cold therefore
 were supposed to be the preliminary stages, the still more original
 qualities. With their issuing forth from the primordial existence
 of the "Indefinite," Becoming begins. Heraclitus who as physicist
 subordinated himself to the importance of Anaximander, explains to
 himself this Anaximandrian "Warm" as the respiration, the warm breath,
 the dry vapours, in short as the fiery element: about this fire he now
 enunciates the same as Thales and Anaximander had enunciated about
 the water: that in innumerable metamorphoses it was passing along the
 path of Becoming, especially in the three chief aggregate stages as
 something Warm, Moist, and Firm. For water in descending is transformed
 into earth, in ascending into fire: or as Heraclitus appears to have
 expressed himself more exactly: from the sea ascend only the pure
 vapours which serve as food to the divine fire of the stars, from the
 earth only the dark, foggy ones, from which the Moist derives its
 nourishment. The pure vapours are the transitional stage in the passing
 of sea into fire, the impure the transitional stage in the passing
 of earth into water. Thus the two paths of metamorphosis of the fire
 run continuously side by side, upwards and downwards, to and fro, from
 fire to water, from water to earth, from earth back again to water,
 from water to fire. Whereas Heraclitus is a follower of Anaximander in
 the most important of these conceptions, _e.g.,_ that the fire is kept
 up by the evaporations, or herein, that out of the water is dissolved
 partly earth, partly fire; he is on the other hand quite independent
 and in opposition to Anaximander in excluding the "Cold" from the
 physical process, whilst Anaximander had put it side by side with the
 "Warm" as having the same rights, so as to let the "Moist" originate
 out of both. To do so, was of course a necessity to Heraclitus, for
 if everything is to be fire, then, however many possibilities of its
 transformation might be assumed, nothing can exist that would be the
 absolute antithesis to fire; he has, therefore, probably interpreted
 only as a degree of the "Warm" that which is called the "Cold," and
 he could justify this interpretation without difficulty. Much more
 important than this deviation from the doctrine of Anaximander is a
 further agreement; he, like the latter, believes in an end of the
 world periodically repeating itself and in an ever-renewed emerging of
 another world out of the all-destroying world-fire. The period during
 which the world hastens towards that world-fire and the dissolution
 into pure fire is characterised by him most strikingly as a demand
 and a need; the state of being completely swallowed up by the fire as
 satiety; and now to us remains the question as to how he understood
 and named the newly awakening impulse for world-creation, the
 pouring-out-of-itself into the forms of plurality. The Greek proverb
 seems to come to our assistance with the thought that "satiety gives
 birth to crime" (the Hybris) and one may indeed ask oneself for a
 minute whether perhaps Heraclitus has derived that return to plurality
 out of the Hybris. Let us just take this thought seriously: in its
 light the face of Heraclitus changes before our eyes, the proud gleam
 of his eyes dies out, a wrinkled expression of painful resignation, of
 impotence becomes distinct, it seems that we know why later antiquity
 called him the "weeping philosopher." Is not the whole world-process
 now an act of punishment of the Hybris? The plurality the result of a
 crime? The transformation of the pure into the impure, the consequence
 of injustice? Is not the guilt now shifted into the essence of the
 things and indeed, the world of Becoming and of individuals accordingly
 exonerated from guilt; yet at the same time are they not condemned for
 ever and ever to bear the consequences of guilt?
 
 
 
 7
 
 
 That dangerous word, Hybris, is indeed the touchstone for every
 Heraclitean; here he may show whether he has understood or mistaken
 his master. Is there in this world: Guilt, injustice, contradiction,
 suffering?
 
 Yes, exclaims Heraclitus, but only for the limited human being, who
 sees divergently and not convergently, not for the contuitive god;
 to him everything opposing converges into one harmony, invisible it
 is true to the common human eye, yet comprehensible to him who like
 Heraclitus resembles the contemplative god. Before his fiery eye no
 drop of injustice is left in the world poured out around him, and even
 that cardinal obstacle--how pure fire can take up its quarters in
 forms so impure--he masters by means of a sublime simile. A Becoming
 and Passing, a building and destroying, without any moral bias, in
 perpetual innocence is in this world only the play of the artist and of
 the child. And similarly, just as the child and the artist play, the
 eternally living fire plays, builds up and destroys, in innocence--and
 this game the _on_ plays with himself. Transforming himself into water
 and earth, like a child he piles heaps of sand by the sea, piles up
 and demolishes; from time to time he recommences the game. A moment of
 satiety, then again desire seizes him, as desire compels the artist to
 create. Not wantonness, but the ever newly awakening impulse to play,
 calls into life other worlds. The child throws away his toys; but soon
 he starts again in an innocent frame of mind. As soon however as the
 child builds he connects, joins and forms lawfully and according to an
 innate sense of order.
 
 Thus only is the world contemplated by the sthetic man, who has
 learned from the artist and the genesis of the latter's work, how the
 struggle of plurality can yet bear within itself law and justice,
 how the artist stands contemplative above, and working within the
 work of art, how necessity and play, antagonism and harmony must pair
 themselves for the procreation of the work of art.
 
 Who now will still demand from such a philosophy a system of Ethics
 with the necessary imperatives--Thou Shalt,--or even reproach
 Heraclitus with such a deficiency. Man down to his last fibre is
 Necessity and absolutely "unfree "--if by freedom one understands the
 foolish claim to be able to change at will one's _essentia_ like a
 garment, a claim, which up to the present every serious philosophy
 has rejected with due scorn. That so few human beings live with
 consciousness in the _Logos_ and in accordance with the all-overlooking
 artist's eye originates from their souls being wet and from the fact
 that men's eyes and ears, their intellect in general is a bad witness
 when "moist ooze fills their souls." Why that is so, is not questioned
 any more than why fire becomes water and earth. Heraclitus is not
 _compelled_ to prove (as Leibnitz was) that this world was even the
 best of all; it was sufficient for him that the world is the beautiful,
 innocent play of the _on._ Man on the whole is to him even an
 irrational being, with which the fact that in all his essence the law
 of all-ruling reason is fulfilled does lot clash. He does not occupy
 a specially favoured position in nature, whose highest phenomenon is
 not simple-minded man, but fire, for instance, as stars. In so far as
 man has through necessity received a share of fire, he is a little
 more rational; as far as he consists of earth and water it stands
 badly with his reason. He is not compelled to take cognisance of the
 _Logos_ simply because he is a human being. Why is there water, why
 earth? This to Heraclitus is a much more serious problem than to ask,
 why men are so stupid and bad. In the highest and the most perverted
 men the same inherent lawfulness and justice manifest themselves.
 If however one would ask Heraclitus the question "Why is fire not
 always fire, why is it now water, now earth?" then he would only just
 answer: "It is a game, don't take it too pathetically and still less,
 morally." Heraclitus describes only the existing world and has the same
 contemplative pleasure in it which the artist experiences when looking
 at his growing work. Only those who have cause to be discontented
 with his natural history of man find him gloomy, melancholy, tearful,
 sombre, atrabilarious, pessimistic and altogether hateful. He however
 would take these discontented people, together with their antipathies
 and sympathies, their hatred und their love, as negligible and perhaps
 answer them with some such comment as: "Dogs bark at anything they do
 not know," or, "To the ass chaff is preferable to gold."
 
 With such discontented persons also originate the numerous complaints
 as to the obscurity of the Heraclitean style; probably no man has ever
 written clearer and more illuminatingly; of course, very abruptly,
 and therefore naturally obscure to the racing readers. But why a
 philosopher should intentionally write obscurely--a thing habitually
 said about Heraclitus--is absolutely inexplicable; unless he has some
 cause to hide his thoughts or is sufficiently a rogue to conceal his
 thoughtlessness underneath words. One is, as Schopenhauer says, indeed
 compelled by lucid expression to prevent misunderstandings even in
 affairs of practical every-day life, how then should one be allowed to
 express oneself indistinctly, indeed puzzlingly in the most difficult,
 most abstruse, scarcely attainable object of thinking, the tasks of
 philosophy? With respect to brevity however Jean Paul gives a good
 precept: "On the whole it is right that everything great--of deep
 meaning to a rare mind--should be uttered with brevity and (therefore)
 obscurely so that the paltry mind would rather proclaim it to be
 nonsense than translate it into the realm of his empty-headedness.
 For common minds have an ugly ability to perceive in the deepest and
 richest saying nothing but their own every-day opinion." Moreover and
 in spite of it Heraclitus has not escaped the "paltry minds"; already
 the Stoics have "re-expounded" him into the shallow and dragged down
 his sthetic fundamental-perception as to the play of the world to the
 miserable level of the common regard for the practical ends of the
 world and more explicitly for the advantages of man, so that out of his
 Physics has arisen in those heads a crude optimism, with the continual
 invitation to Dick, Tom, and Harry, "_Plaudite amici!_"
 
 
 
 8
 
 
 Heraclitus was proud; and if it comes to pride with a philosopher then
 it is a great pride. His work never refers him to a "public," the
 applause of the masses and the hailing chorus of contemporaries. To
 wander lonely along his path belongs to the nature of the philosopher.
 His talents are the most rare, in a certain sense the most unnatural
 and at the same time exclusive and hostile even toward kindred talents.
 The wall of his self-sufficiency must be of diamond, if it is not to
 be demolished and broken, for everything is in motion against him. His
 journey to immortality is more cumbersome and impeded than any other
 and yet nobody can believe more firmly than the philosopher that he
 will attain the goal by that journey--because he does not know where
 he is to stand if not on the widely spread wings of all time; for the
 disregard of everything present and momentary lies in the essence of
 the great philosophic nature. He has truth; the wheel of time may roll
 whither it pleases, never can it escape from truth. It is important
 to hear that such men have lived. Never for example would one be able
 to imagine the pride of Heraclitus as an idle possibility. In itself
 every endeavour after knowledge seems by its nature to be eternally
 unsatisfied and unsatisfactory. Therefore nobody unless instructed
 by history will like to believe in such a royal self-esteem and
 conviction of being the only wooer of truth. Such men live in their
 own solar-system--one has to look for them there. A Pythagoras, an
 Empedocles treated themselves too with a super-human esteem, yea, with
 almost religious awe; but the tie of sympathy united with the great
 conviction of the metempsychosis and the unity of everything living,
 led them back to other men, for their welfare and salvation. Of that
 feeling of solitude, however, which permeated the Ephesian recluse
 of the Artemis Temple, one can only divine something, when growing
 benumbed in the wildest mountain desert. No paramount feeling of
 compassionate agitation, no desire to help, heal and save emanates from
 him. He is a star without an atmosphere. His eye, directed blazingly
 inwards, looks outward, for appearance's sake only, extinct and icy.
 All around him, immediately upon the citadel of his pride beat the
 waves of folly and perversity: with loathing he turns away from them.
 But men with a feeling heart would also shun such a Gorgon monster
 as cast out of brass; within an out-of-the-way sanctuary, among the
 statues of gods, by the side of cold composedly-sublime architecture
 such a being may appear more comprehensible. As man among men
 Heraclitus was incredible; and though he was seen paying attention to
 the play of noisy children, even then he was reflecting upon what never
 man thought of on such an occasion: the play of the great world-child,
 Zeus. He had no need of men, not even for his discernments. He was
 not interested in all that which one might perhaps ascertain from
 them, and in what the other sages before him had been endeavouring to
 ascertain. He spoke with disdain of such questioning, collecting, in
 short "historic" men. "I sought and investigated myself," he said, with
 a word by which one designates the investigation of an oracle; as if
 he and no one else were the true fulfiller and achiever of the Delphic
 precept: "Know thyself."
 
 What he learned from this oracle, he deemed immortal wisdom, and
 eternally worthy of explanation, of unlimited effect even in the
 distance, after the model of the prophetic speeches of the Sibyl.
 It is sufficient for the latest mankind: let the latter have that
 expounded to her, as oracular sayings, which he like the Delphic god
 "neither enunciates nor conceals." Although it is proclaimed by him,
 "without smiles, finery and the scent of ointments," but rather as with
 "foaming mouth," it _must_ force its way through the millenniums of
 the future. For the world needs truth eternally, therefore she needs
 also Heraclitus eternally; although he has no need of her. What does
 his fame matter to _him?_--fame with "mortals ever flowing on!" as he
 exclaims scornfully. His fame is of concern to man, not to himself;
 the immortality of mankind needs him, not he the immortality of the
 man Heraclitus. That which he beheld, _the doctrine of the Law in the
 Becoming, and of the Play in the Necessity,_ must henceforth be beheld
 eternally; he has raised the curtain of this greatest stage-play.
 
 
 
 9
 
 
 Whereas in every word of Heraclitus are expressed the pride and the
 majesty of truth, but of truth caught by intuitions, not scaled by
 the rope-ladder of Logic, whereas in sublime ecstasy he beholds but
 does not espy, discerns but does not reckon, he is contrasted with his
 contemporary _Parmenides,_ a man likewise with the type of a prophet
 of truth, but formed as it were out of ice and not out of fire, and
 shedding around himself cold, piercing light.
 
 Parmenides once had, probably in his later years, a moment of the
 very purest abstraction, undimmed by any reality, perfectly lifeless;
 this moment--un-Greek, like no other in the two centuries of the
 Tragic Age--the product of which is the doctrine of "Being," became a
 boundary-stone for his own life, which divided it into two periods; at
 the same time however the same moment divides the pre-Socratic thinking
 into two halves, of which the first might be called the Anaximandrian,
 the second the Parmenidean. The first period in Parmenides' own
 philosophising bears still the signature of Anaximander; this
 period produced a detailed philosophic-physical system as answer to
 Anaximander's questions. When later that icy abstraction-horror caught
 him, and the simplest proposition treating of "Being" and "Not-Being"
 was advanced by him, then among the many older doctrines thrown by him
 upon the scrap heap was also his own system. However he does not appear
 to have lost all paternal piety towards the strong and well-shapen
 child of his youth, and he saved himself therefore by saying: "It is
 true there is only one right way; if one however wants at any time to
 betake oneself to another, then my earlier opinion according to its
 purity and consequence alone is right." Sheltering himself with this
 phrase he has allowed his former physical system a worthy and extensive
 space in his great poem on Nature, which really was to proclaim the
 new discernment as the only signpost to truth. This fatherly regard,
 even though an error should have crept in through it, is a remainder
 of human feeling, in a nature quite petrified by logical rigidity and
 almost changed into a thinking-machine.
 
 Parmenides, whose personal intercourse with Anaximander does not seem
 incredible to me, and whose starting from Anaximander's doctrine is
 not only credible but evident, had the same distrust for the complete
 separation of a world which only is, and a world which only becomes, as
 had also caught Heraclitus and led to a denying of "Being" altogether.
 Both sought a way out from that contrast and divergence of a dual order
 of the world. That leap into the Indefinite, Indefinable, by which
 once for all Anaximander had escaped from the realm of Becoming and
 from the empirically given qualities of such realm, that leap did not
 become an easy matter to minds so independently fashioned as those of
 Heraclitus and Parmenides; first they endeavoured to walk as far as
 they could and reserved to themselves the leap for that place, where
 the foot finds no more hold and one has to leap, in order not to fall.
 Both looked repeatedly at that very world, which Anaximander had
 condemned in so melancholy a way and declared to be the place of wanton
 crime and at the same time the penitentiary cell for the injustice of
 Becoming. Contemplating this world Heraclitus, as we know already, had
 discovered what a wonderful order, regularity and security manifest
 themselves in every Becoming; from that he concluded that the Becoming
 could not be anything evil and unjust. Quite a different outlook had
 Parmenides; he compared the qualities one with another, and believed
 that they were not all of the same kind, but ought to be classified
 under two headings. If for example he compared bright and dark, then
 the second quality was obviously only the _negation_ of the first;
 and thus he distinguished positive and negative qualities, seriously
 endeavouring to rediscover and register that fundamental antithesis
 in the whole realm of Nature. His method was the following: He took a
 few antitheses, _e.g.,_ light and heavy, rare and dense, active and
 passive, and compared them with that typical antithesis of bright and
 dark: that which corresponded with the bright was the positive, that
 which corresponded with the dark the negative quality. If he took
 perhaps the heavy and light, the light fell to the side of the bright,
 the heavy to the side of the dark; and thus "heavy" was to him only
 the negation of "light," but the "light" a positive quality. This
 method alone shows that he had a defiant aptitude for abstract logical
 procedure, closed against the suggestions of the senses. The "heavy"
 seems indeed to offer itself very forcibly to the senses as a positive
 quality; that did not keep Parmenides from stamping it as a negation.
 Similarly he placed the earth in opposition to the fire, the "cold"
 in opposition to the "warm," the "dense" in opposition to the "rare,"
 the "female" in opposition to the "male," the "passive" in opposition
 to the "active," merely as negations: so that before his gaze our
 empiric world divided itself into two separate spheres, into that
 of the positive qualities--with a bright, fiery, warm, light, rare,
 active-masculine character--and into that of the negative qualities.
 The latter express really only the lack, the absence of the others, the
 positive ones. He therefore described the sphere in which the positive
 qualities are absent as dark, earthy, cold, heavy, dense and altogether
 as of feminine-passive character. Instead of the expressions "positive"
 and "negative" he used the standing term "existent" and "non-existent"
 and had arrived with this at the proposition, that, in contradiction to
 Anaximander, this our world itself contains something "existent," and
 of course something "non-existent." One is not to seek that "existent"
 outside the world and as it were above our horizon; but before us,
 and everywhere in every Becoming, something "existent" and active is
 contained.
 
 With that however still remained to him the task of giving the more
 exact answer to the question: What is the Becoming? and here was the
 moment where he had to leap, in order not to fall, although perhaps to
 such natures as that of Parmenides, even any leaping means a falling.
 Enough! we get into fog, into the mysticism of _qualitates occult,_
 and even a little into mythology. Parmenides, like Heraclitus, looks
 at the general Becoming and Not-remaining and explains to himself a
 Passing only thus, that the "Non-Existent" bore the guilt. For how
 should the "Existent" bear the guilt of Passing? Likewise, however,
 the Originating, i.e., the Becoming, must come about through the
 assistance of the "Non-Existent"; for the "Existent" is always there
 and could not of itself first originate and it could not explain any
 Originating, any Becoming. Therefore the Originating, the Becoming
 as well as the Passing and Perishing have been brought about by the
 negative qualities. But that the originating "thing" has a content,
 and the passing "thing" loses a content, presupposes that the positive
 qualities--and that just means that very content--participate
 likewise in both processes. In short the proposition results: "For the
 Becoming the 'Existent' as well as the 'Non-Existent' is necessary;
 when they co-operate then a Becoming results." But how come the
 "positive" and the "negative" to one another? Should they not on the
 contrary eternally flee one another as antitheses and thereby make
 every Becoming impossible? Here Parmenides appeals to a _qualitas
 occulta,_ to a mystic tendency of the antithetical pairs to approach
 and attract one another, and he allegorises that peculiar contrariety
 by the name of Aphrodite, and by the empirically known relation of
 the male and female principle. It is the power of Aphrodite which
 plays the matchmaker between the antithetical pair, the "Existent"
 and the "Non-Existent." Passion brings together the antagonistic and
 antipathetic elements: the result is a Becoming. When Desire has become
 satiated, Hatred and the innate antagonism again drive asunder the
 "Existent" and the "Non-Existent"--then man says: the thing perishes,
 passes.
 
 
 
 10
 
 
 But no one with impunity lays his profane hands on such awful
 abstractions as the "Existent" and the "Non-Existent"; the blood
 freezes slowly as one touches them. There was a day upon which an odd
 idea suddenly occurred to Parmenides, an idea which seemed to take
 all value away from his former combinations, so that he felt inclined
 to throw them aside, like a money bag with old worn-out coins. It is
 commonly believed that an external impression, in addition to the
 centrifugal consequence of such ideas as "existent" and "non-existent,"
 has also been co-active in the invention of that day; this impression
 was an acquaintance with the theology of the old roamer and rhapsodist,
 the singer of a mystic deification of Nature, the Kolophonian
 _Xenophanes._ Throughout an extraordinary life Xenophanes lived as
 a wandering poet and became through his travels a well-informed and
 most instructive man who knew how to question and how to narrate, for
 which reason Heraclitus reckoned him amongst the polyhistorians and
 above all amongst the "historic" natures, in the sense mentioned.
 Whence and when came to him the mystic bent into the One and the
 eternally Resting, nobody will be able to compute; perhaps it is only
 the conception of the finally settled old man, to whom, after the
 agitation of his erratic wanderings, and after the restless learning
 and searching for truth, the vision of a divine rest, the permanence of
 all things within a pantheistic primal peace appears as _the_ highest
 and greatest ideal. After all it seems to me quite accidental that in
 the same place in Elea two men lived together for a time, each of whom
 carried in his head a conception of unity; they formed no school and
 had nothing in common which perhaps the one might have learned from
 the other and then might have handed on. For, in the case of these two
 men, the origin of that conception of unity is quite different, yea
 opposite; and if either of them has become at all acquainted with the
 doctrine of the other then, in order to understand it at all, he had to
 translate it first into his own language. With this translation however
 the very specific element of the other doctrine was lost. Whereas
 Parmenides arrived at the unity of the "Existent" purely through an
 alleged logical consequence and whereas he span that unity out of the
 ideas "Being" and "Not-Being," Xenophanes was a religious mystic and
 belonged, with that mystic unity, very properly to the Sixth Century.
 Although he was no such revolutionising personality as Pythagoras
 he had nevertheless in his wanderings the same bent and impulse to
 improve, purify, and cure men. He was the ethical teacher, but still
 in the stage of the rhapsodist; in a later time he would have been
 a sophist. In the daring disapproval of the existing customs and
 valuations he had not his equal in Greece; moreover he did not, like
 Heraclitus and Plato, retire into solitude but placed himself before
 the very public, whose exulting admiration of Homer, whose passionate
 propensity for the honours of the gymnastic festivals, whose adoration
 of stones in human shape, he criticised severely with wrath and scorn,
 yet not as a brawling Thersites. The freedom of the individual was with
 him on its zenith; and by this almost limitless stepping free from all
 conventions he was more closely related to Parmenides than by that last
 divine unity, which once he had beheld, in a visionary state worthy of
 that century. His unity scarcely had expression and word in common with
 the one "Being" of Parmenides, and certainly had not the same origin.
 
 It was rather an opposite state of mind in which Parmenides found his
 doctrine of "Being," On that day and in that state he examined his
 two co-operating antitheses, the "Existent" and the "Non-Existent,"
 the positive and the negative qualities, of which Desire and Hatred
 constitute the world and the Becoming. He was suddenly caught up,
 mistrusting, by the idea of negative quality, of the "Non-Existent."
 For can something which does not exist be a quality? or to put the
 question in a broader sense: can anything indeed which does not exist,
 exist? The only form of knowledge in which we at once put unconditional
 trust and the disapproval of which amounts to madness, is the tautology
 A = A. But this very tautological knowledge called inexorably to him:
 what does not exist, exists not! What is, is! Suddenly he feels
 upon his life the load of an enormous logical sin; for had he not
 always without hesitation assumed that _there were existing_ negative
 qualities, in short a "Non-Existent," that therefore, to express it by
 a formula, A = Not-A, which indeed could only be advanced by the most
 out and out perversity of thinking. It is true, as he recollected, the
 whole great mass of men judge with the same perversity; he himself
 has only participated in the general crime against logic. But the
 same moment which charges him with this crime surrounds him with the
 light of the glory of an invention, he has found, apart from all human
 illusion, a principle, the key to the world-secret, he now descends
 into the abyss of things, guided by the firm and fearful hand of the
 tautological truth as to "Being."
 
 On the way thither he meets Heraclitus--an unfortunate encounter! Just
 now Heraclitus' play with antinomies was bound to be very hateful to
 him, who placed the utmost importance upon the severest separation of
 "Being" and "Not-Being"; propositions like this: "We are and at the
 same time we are not" --"'Being' and 'Not-Being' is at the same time
 the same thing and again not the same thing," propositions through
 which all that he had just elucidated and disentangled became again
 dim and inextricable, incited him to wrath. "Away with the men," he
 exclaimed, "who seem to have two heads and yet know nothing! With them
 truly everything is in flux, even their thinking! They stare at things
 stupidly, but they must be deaf as well as blind so to mix up the
 opposites"! The want of judgment on the part of the masses, glorified
 by playful antinomies and praised as the acme of all knowledge was to
 him a painful and incomprehensible experience.
 
 Now he dived into the cold bath of his awful abstractions. That which
 is true must exist in eternal presence, about it cannot be said "it
 was," "it will be." The "Existent" cannot have become; for out of what
 should it have become? Out of the "Non-Existent"? But that does not
 exist and can produce nothing. Out of the "Existent"? This would not
 produce anything but itself. The same applies to the Passing, it is
 just as impossible as the Becoming, as any change, any increase, any
 decrease. On the whole the proposition is valid: Everything about which
 it can be said: "it has been" or "it will be" does not exist; about
 the "Existent" however it can never be said "it does not exist." The
 "Existent" is indivisible, for where is the second power, which should
 divide it? It is immovable, for whither should it move itself? It
 cannot be infinitely great nor infinitely small, for it is perfect and
 a perfectly given infinitude is a contradiction. Thus the "Existent"
 is suspended, delimited, perfect, immovable, everywhere equally
 balanced and such equilibrium equally perfect at any point, like a
 globe, but not in a space, for otherwise this space would be a second
 "Existent." But there cannot exist several "Existents," for in order to
 separate them, something would have to exist which was not existing, an
 assumption which neutralises itself. Thus there exists only the eternal
 Unity.
 
 If now, however, Parmenides turned back his gaze to the world of
 Becoming, the existence of which he had formerly tried to understand
 by such ingenious conjectures, he was wroth at his eye seeing the
 Becoming at all, his ear hearing it. "Do not follow the dim-sighted
 eyes," now his command runs, "not the resounding ear nor the
 tongue, but examine only by the power of the thought." Therewith he
 accomplished the extremely important first critique of the apparatus
 of knowledge, although this critique was still inadequate and proved
 disastrous in its consequences. By tearing entirely asunder the
 senses and the ability to think in abstractions, _i.e._ reason, just
 as if they were two thoroughly separate capacities, he demolished
 the intellect itself, and incited people to that wholly erroneous
 separation of "mind" and "body" which, especially since Plato, lies
 like a curse on philosophy. All sense perceptions, Parmenides judges,
 cause only illusions and their chief illusion is their deluding us to
 believe that even the "Non-Existent" exists, that even the Becoming has
 a "Being." All that plurality, diversity and variety of the empirically
 known world, the change of its qualities, the order in its ups and
 downs, is thrown aside mercilessly as mere appearance and delusion;
 from there nothing is to be learnt, therefore all labour is wasted
 which one bestows upon this false, through-and-through futile world,
 the conception of which has been obtained by being hum-bugged by the
 senses. He who judges in such generalisations as Parmenides did, ceases
 therewith to be an investigator of natural philosophy in detail; his
 interest in phenomena withers away; there develops even a hatred of
 being unable to get rid of this eternal fraud of the senses. Truth is
 now to dwell only in the most faded, most abstract generalities, in the
 empty husks of the most indefinite words, as in a maze of cobwebs; and
 by such a "truth" now the philosopher sits, bloodless as an abstraction
 and surrounded by a web of formul. The spider undoubtedly wants the
 blood of its victims; but the Parmenidean philosopher hates the very
 blood of his victims, the blood of Empiricism sacrificed by him.
 
 
 
 11
 
 
 And that was a Greek who "flourished" about the time of the outbreak
 of the Ionic Revolution. At that time it was possible for a Greek
 to flee out of the superabundant reality, as out of a mere delusive
 schematism of the imaginative faculties--not perhaps like Plato into
 the land of the eternal ideas, into the workshop of the world-creator,
 in order to feast the eyes on unblemished, unbreakable primal-forms of
 things--but into the rigid death-like rest of the coldest and emptiest
 conception, that of the "Being." We will indeed beware of interpreting
 such a remarkable fact by false analogies. That flight was not a
 world-flight in the sense of Indian philosophers; no deep religious
 conviction as to the depravity, transitoriness and accursedness of
 Existence demanded that flight--that ultimate goal, the rest in the
 "Being," was not striven after as the mystic absorption in _one_
 all-sufficing enrapturing conception which is a puzzle and a scandal
 to common men. The thought of Parmenides bears in itself not the
 slightest trace of the intoxicating mystical Indian fragrance, which
 is perhaps not wholly imperceptible in Pythagoras and Empedocles; the
 strange thing in that fact, at this period, is rather the very absence
 of fragrance, colour, soul, form, the total lack of blood, religiosity
 and ethical warmth, the abstract-schematic--in a Greek!--above all
 however our philosopher's awful energy of striving after _Certainty,_
 in a mythically thinking and highly emotional--fantastic age is quite
 remarkable. "Grant me but a certainty, ye gods!"is the prayer of
 Parmenides, "and be it, in the ocean of Uncertainty, only a board,
 broad enough to lie on! Everything becoming, everything luxuriant,
 varied, blossoming, deceiving, stimulating, living, take all that for
 yourselves, and give to me but the single poor empty Certainty!"
 
 In the philosophy of Parmenides the theme of ontology forms the
 prelude. Experience offered him nowhere a "Being" as he imagined it to
 himself, but from the fact that he could conceive of it he concluded
 that it must exist; a conclusion which rests upon the supposition
 that we have an organ of knowledge which reaches into the nature of
 things and is independent of experience. The material of our thinking
 according to Parmenides does not exist in perception at all but is
 brought in from somewhere else, from an extra-material world to which
 by thinking we have a direct access. Against all similar chains of
 reasoning Aristotle has already asserted that existence never belongs
 to the essence, never belongs to the nature of a thing. For that very
 reason from the idea of "Being"--of which the _essentia_ precisely is
 only the "Being"--cannot be inferred an _existentia_ of the "Being" at
 all. The logical content of that antithesis "Being" and "Not-Being"
 is perfectly nil, if the object lying at the bottom of it, if the
 precept cannot be given from which this antithesis has been deduced
 by abstraction; without this going back to the precept the antithesis
 is only a play with conceptions, through which indeed nothing is
 discerned. For the merely logical criterion of truth, as Kant teaches,
 namely the agreement of a discernment with the general and the formal
 laws of intellect and reason is, it is true, the _conditio sine qua
 non,_ consequently the negative condition of all truth; further however
 logic cannot go, and logic cannot discover by any touchstone the error
 which pertains not to the form but to the contents. As soon, however,
 as one seeks the content for the logical truth of the antithesis:
 "That which is, is; that which is not, is not," one will find indeed
 not a simple reality, which is fashioned rigidly according to that
 antithesis: about a tree I can say as well "it is" in comparison with
 all the other things, as well "it becomes" in comparison with itself
 at another moment of time as finally also "it is not," _e.g._," it is
 not yet tree," as long as I perhaps look at the shrub. Words are only
 symbols for the relations of things among themselves and to us, and
 nowhere touch absolute truth; and now to crown all, the word "Being"
 designates only the most general relation, which connects all things,
 and so does the word "Not-Being." If however the Existence of the
 things themselves be unprovable, then the relation of the things among
 themselves, the so-called "Being" and "Not-Being," will not bring us
 any nearer to the land of truth. By means of words and ideas we shall
 never get behind the wall of the relations, let us say into some
 fabulous primal cause of things, and even in the pure forms of the
 sensitive faculty and of the intellect, in space, time and causality
 we gain nothing, which might resemble a "_Veritas terna?_" It is
 absolutely impossible for the subject to see and discern something
 beyond himself, so impossible that Cognition and "Being" are the most
 contradictory of all spheres. And if in the uninstructed _navet_
 of the then critique of the intellect Parmenides was permitted to
 fancy that out of the eternally subjective idea he had come to a
 "Being-In-itself," then it is to-day, after Kant, a daring ignorance,
 if here and there, especially among badly informed theologians who
 want to play the philosopher, is proposed as the task of philosophy:
 "to conceive the Absolute by means of consciousness," perhaps even
 in the form: "the Absolute is already extant, else how could it be
 sought?" as Hegel has expressed himself, or with the saying of Beneke:
 "that the 'Being' must be given somehow, must be attainable for us
 somehow, since otherwise we could not even have the idea of 'Being.'"
 The idea of "Being"! As though that idea did not indicate the most
 miserable empiric origin already in the etymology of the word. For
 _esse_ means at the bottom: "to breathe," if man uses it of all other
 things, then he transmits the conviction that he himself breathes and
 lives by means of a metaphor, _i.e.,_ by means of something illogical
 to the other things and conceives of their Existence as a Breathing
 according to human analogy. Now the original meaning of the word soon
 becomes effaced; so much however still remains that man conceives of
 the existence of other things according to the analogy of his own
 existence, therefore anthropomorphically, and at any rate by means
 of an illogical transmission. Even to man, therefore apart from that
 transmission, the proposition: "I breathe, therefore a 'Being' exists"
 is quite insufficient since against it the same objection must be made,
 as against the _ambulo, ergo sum,_ or _ergo est_.
 
 
 
 12
 
 
 The other idea, of greater import than that of the "Existent," and
 likewise invented already by Parmenides, although not yet so clearly
 applied as by his disciple Zeno is the idea of the Infinite. Nothing
 Infinite can exist; for from such an assumption the contradictory
 idea of a perfect Infinitude would result. Since now our actuality,
 our existing world everywhere shows the character of that perfect
 Infinitude, our world signifies in its nature a contradiction against
 logic and therewith also against reality and is deception, lie,
 fantasma. Zeno especially applied the method of indirect proof; he
 said for example, "There can be no motion from one place to another;
 for if there were such a motion, then an Infinitude would be given as
 perfect, this however is an impossibility." Achilles cannot catch up
 the tortoise which has a small start in a race, for in order to reach
 only the point from which the tortoise began, he would have had to run
 through innumerable, infinitely many spaces, viz., first half of that
 space, then the fourth, then the sixteenth, and so on _ad infinitum._
 If he does in fact overtake the tortoise then this is an illogical
 phenomenon, and therefore at any rate not a truth, not a reality, not
 real "Being," but only a delusion. For it is never possible to finish
 the infinite. Another popular expression of this doctrine is the
 flying and yet resting arrow. At any instant of its flight it has a
 position; in this position it rests. Now would the sum of the infinite
 positions of rest be identical with motion? Would now the Resting,
 infinitely often repeated, be Motion, therefore its own opposite?
 The Infinite is here used as the _aqua fortis_ of reality, through
 it the latter is dissolved. If however the Ideas are fixed, eternal
 and entitative--and for Parmenides "Being" and Thinking coincide--if
 therefore the Infinite can never be perfect, if Rest can never become
 Motion, then in fact the arrow has not flown at all; it never left its
 place and resting position; no moment of time has passed. Or expressed
 in another way: in this so-called yet only alleged Actuality there
 exists neither time, nor space, nor motion. Finally the arrow itself is
 only an illusion; for it originates out of the Plurality, out of the
 phantasmagoria of the "Non-One" produced by the senses. Suppose the
 arrow had a "Being," then it would be immovable, timeless, increate,
 rigid and eternal--an impossible conception! Supposing that Motion was
 truly real, then there would be no rest, therefore no position for the
 arrow, therefore no space--an impossible conception! Supposing that
 time were real, then it could not be of an infinite divisibility; the
 time which the arrow needed, would have to consist of a limited number
 of time-moments, each of these moments would have to be an _Atomon_--an
 impossible conception! All our conceptions, as soon as their
 empirically-given content, drawn out of this concrete world, is taken
 as a _Veritas terna,_ lead to contradictions. If there is absolute
 motion, then there is no space; if there is absolute space then there
 is no motion; if there is absolute "Being," then there is no Plurality;
 if there is an absolute Plurality, then there is no Unity. It should
 at least become clear to _us_ how little we touch the heart of things
 or untie the knot of reality with such ideas, whereas Parmenides and
 Zeno inversely hold fast to the truth and omnivalidity of ideas and
 condemn the perceptible world as the opposite of the true and omnivalid
 ideas, as an objectivation of the illogical and contradictory. With all
 their proofs they start from the wholly undemonstrable, yea improbable
 assumption that in that apprehensive faculty we possess the decisive,
 highest criterion of "Being" and "Not-Being," _i.e.,_ of objective
 reality and its opposite; those ideas are not to prove themselves
 true, to correct themselves by Actuality, as they are after all really
 derived from it, but on the contrary they are to measure and to judge
 Actuality, and in case of a contradiction with logic, even to condemn.
 In order to concede to them this judicial competence Parmenides had to
 ascribe to them the same "Being," which alone he allowed in general
 as _the_ "Being"; Thinking and that one increate perfect ball of the
 "Existent" were now no longer to be conceived as two different kinds
 of "Being," since there was not permitted a duality of "Being." Thus
 the over-risky flash of fancy had become necessary to declare Thinking
 and "Being" identical. No form of perceptibility, no symbol, no simile
 could possibly be of any help here; the fancy was wholly inconceivable,
 but it was necessary, yea in the lack of every possibility of
 illustration it celebrated the highest triumph over the world and
 the claims of the senses. Thinking and that clod-like, ball-shaped,
 through-and-through dead-massive, and rigid-immovable "Being," must,
 according to the Parmenidean imperative, dissolve into one another and
 be the same in every respect, to the horror of fantasy. What does it
 matter that this identity contradicts the senses! This contradiction
 is just the guarantee that such an identity is not borrowed from the
 senses.
 
 
 
 13
 
 
 Moreover against Parmenides could be produced a strong couple of
 _argumenta ad hominem_ or _ex concessis,_ by which, it is true, truth
 itself could not be brought to light, but at any rate the untruth of
 that absolute separation of the world of the senses and the world of
 the ideas, and the untruth of the identity of "Being" and Thinking
 could be demonstrated. Firstly, if the Thinking of Reason in ideas is
 real, then also Plurality and Motion must have reality, for rational
 Thinking is mobile; and more precisely, it is a motion from idea to
 idea, therefore within a plurality of realities. There is no subterfuge
 against that; it is quite impossible to designate Thinking as a rigid
 Permanence, as an eternally immobile, intellectual Introspection of
 Unity. Secondly, if only fraud and illusion come from the senses,
 and if in reality there exists only the real identity of "Being" and
 Thinking, what then are the senses themselves? They too are certainly
 Appearance only since they do not coincide with the Thinking, and
 their product, the world of senses, does not coincide with "Being."
 If however the senses themselves are Appearance to whom then are
 they Appearance? How can they, being unreal, still deceive? The
 "Non-Existent" cannot even deceive. Therefore the Whence? of deception
 and Appearance remains an enigma, yea, a contradiction. We call these
 _argumenta ad hominem:_ The Objection Of The Mobile Reason and that
 of The Origin Of Appearance. From the first would result the reality
 of Motion and of Plurality, from the second the impossibility of the
 Parmenidean Appearance, assuming that the chief-doctrine of Parmenides
 on the "Being" were accepted as true. This chief-doctrine however only
 says: The "Existent" only has a "Being," the "Non-Existent" does not
 exist. If Motion however has such a "Being," then to Motion applies
 what applies to the "Existent" in general: it is increate, eternal,
 indestructible, without increase or decrease. But if the "Appearance"
 is denied and a belief in it made untenable, by means of that question
 as to the Whence? of the "Appearance," if the stage of the so-called
 Becoming, of change, our many-shaped, restless, coloured and rich
 Existence is protected from the Parmenidean rejection, then it is
 necessary to characterise this world of change and alteration as a
 _sum_ of such really existing Essentials, existing simultaneously
 into all eternity. Of a change in the strict sense, of a Becoming
 there cannot naturally be any question even with this assumption. But
 now Plurality has a real "Being," all qualities have a real "Being"
 and motion not less; and of any moment of this world--although these
 moments chosen at random lie at a distance of millenniums from one
 another--it would have to be possible to say: all real Essentials
 extant in this world are without exception co-existent, unaltered,
 undiminished, without increase, without decrease. A millennium later
 the world is exactly the same. Nothing has altered. If in spite of
 that the appearance of the world at the one time is quite different
 from that at the other time, then that is no deception, nothing merely
 apparent, but the effect of eternal motion. The real "Existent" is
 moved sometimes thus, sometimes thus: together, asunder, upwards,
 downwards, into one another, pell-mell.
 
 
 
 14
 
 
 With this conception we have already taken a step into the realm
 of the doctrine of _Anaxagoras._ By him both objections against
 Parmenides are raised in full strength; that of the mobile Thinking
 and that of the Whence? of "Appearance"; but in the chief proposition
 Parmenides has subjugated him as well as all the younger philosophers
 and nature-explorers. They all deny the possibility of Becoming and
 Passing, as the mind of the people conceives them and as Anaximander
 and Heraclitus had assumed with greater circumspection and yet still
 heedlessly. Such a mythological Originating out of the Nothing, such
 a Disappearing into the Nothing, such an arbitrary Changing of the
 Nothing into the Something, such a random exchanging, putting on and
 putting off of the qualities was henceforth considered senseless; but
 so was, and for the same reasons, an originating of the Many out of the
 One, of the manifold qualities out of the one primal-quality, in short
 the derivation of the world out of a primary substance, as argued by
 Thales and Heraclitus. Rather was now the real problem advanced of
 applying the doctrine of increate imperishable "Being" to this existing
 world, without taking one's refuge in the theory of appearance and
 deception. But if the empiric world is not to be Appearance, if the
 things are not to be derived out of Nothing and just as little out of
 the one Something, then these things must contain in themselves a real
 "Being," their matter and content must be unconditionally real, and
 all change can refer only to the form, _i.e.,_ to the position, order,
 grouping, mixing, separation of these eternally co-existing Essentials.
 It is just as in a game of dice; they are ever the same dice; but
 falling sometimes thus, sometimes thus, they mean to us something
 different. All older theories had gone back to a primal element, as
 womb and cause of Becoming, be this water, air, fire or the Indefinite
 of Anaximander. Against that Anaxagoras now asserts that out of the
 Equal the Unequal could never come forth, and that out of the one
 "Existent" the change could never be explained. Whether now one were
 to imagine that assumed matter to be rarefied or condensed, one would
 never succeed by such a condensation or rarefaction in explaining the
 problem one would like to explain: the plurality of qualities. But if
 the world in fact is full of the most different qualities then these
 must, in case they are not appearance, have a "Being," _i.e.,_ must
 be eternal, increate, imperishable and ever co-existing. Appearance,
 however, they cannot be, since the question as to the Whence? of
 Appearance remains unanswered, yea answers itself in the negative! The
 earlier seekers after Truth had intended to simplify the problem of
 Becoming by advancing only one substance, which bore in its bosom the
 possibilities of all Becoming; now on the contrary it is asserted:
 there are innumerable substances, but never more, never less, and never
 new ones. Only Motion, playing dice with them throws them into ever
 new combinations. That Motion however is a truth and not Appearance,
 Anaxagoras proved in opposition to Parmenides by the indisputable
 succession of our conceptions in thinking. We have therefore in the
 most direct fashion the insight into the truth of motion and succession
 in the fact that we think and have conceptions. Therefore at any rate
 the _one_ rigid, resting, dead "Being" of Parmenides has been removed
 out of the way, there are many "Existents" just as surely as all
 these many "Existents" (existing things, substances) are in motion.
 Change is motion--but whence originates motion? Does this motion leave
 perhaps wholly untouched the proper essence of those many independent,
 isolated substances, and, according to the most severe idea of the
 "Existent," _must_ not motion in itself be foreign to them? Or does
 it after all belong to the things themselves? We stand here at an
 important decision; according to which way we turn, we shall step into
 the realm either of Anaxagoras or of Empedocles or of Democritus. The
 delicate question must be raised: if there are many substances, and if
 these many move, what moves them? Do they move one another? Or is it
 perhaps only gravitation? Or are there magic forces of attraction and
 repulsion within the things themselves? Or does the cause of motion
 lie outside these many real substances? Or putting the question
 more pointedly: if two things show a succession, a mutual change of
 position, does that originate from themselves? And is this to be
 explained mechanically or magically? Or if this should not be the case
 is it a third something which moves them? It is a sorry problem, for
 Parmenides would still have been able to prove against Anaxagoras the
 impossibility of motion, even granted that there are many substances.
 For he could say: Take two Substances existing of themselves, each with
 quite differently fashioned, autonomous, unconditioned "Being"--and
 of such kind are the Anaxagorean substances--they can never clash
 together, never move, never attract one another, there exists between
 them no causality, no bridge, they do not come into contact with one
 another, do not disturb one another, they do not interest one another,
 they are utterly indifferent. The impact then is just as inexplicable
 as the magic attraction: that which is utterly foreign cannot exercise
 any effect upon another, therefore cannot move itself nor allow
 itself to be moved. Parmenides would even have added: the only way of
 escape which is left to you is this, to ascribe motion to the things
 themselves; then however all that you know and see as motion is indeed
 only a deception and not true motion, for the only kind of motion which
 could belong to those absolutely original substances, would be merely
 an autogenous motion limited to themselves without any effect. But
 you _assume_ motion in order to explain those effects of change, of
 the disarrangement in space, of alteration, in short the causalities
 and relations of the things among themselves. But these very effects
 would not be explained and would remain as problematic as ever; for
 this reason one cannot conceive why it should be necessary to assume a
 motion since it does not perform that which you demand from it. Motion
 does not belong to the nature of things and is eternally foreign to
 them.
 
 Those opponents of the Eleatean unmoved Unity were induced to make
 light of such an argument by prejudices of a perceptual character. It
 seems so irrefutable that each veritable "Existent" is a space-filling
 body, a lump of matter, large or small but in any case spacially
 dimensioned; so that two or more such lumps cannot be in one space.
 Under this hypothesis Anaxagoras, as later on Democritus, assumed that
 they must knock against each other; if in their motions they came by
 chance upon one another, that they would dispute the same space with
 each other, and that this struggle was the very cause of all Change.
 In other words: those wholly isolated, thoroughly heterogeneous and
 eternally unalterable substances were after all not conceived as
 being absolutely heterogeneous but all had in addition to a specific,
 wholly peculiar quality, also one absolutely homogeneous substratum: a
 piece of space-filling matter. In their participation in matter they
 all stood equal and therefore could act upon one another, _i.e.,_
 knock one another. Moreover all Change did not in the least depend on
 the heterogeneity of those substances but on their homogeneity, as
 matter. At the bottom of the assumption of Anaxagoras is a logical
 oversight; for that which is _the_ "Existent-In-Itself" must be wholly
 unconditional and coherent, is therefore not allowed to assume as its
 cause anything,--whereas all those Anaxagorean substances have still
 a conditioning Something: matter, and already assume its existence;
 the substance "Red" for example was to Anaxagoras not just merely red
 in itself but also in a reserved or suppressed way a piece of matter
 without any qualities. Only with this matter the "Red-In-Itself" acted
 upon other substances, not with the "Red," but with that which is
 not red, not coloured, nor in any way qualitatively definite. If the
 "Red" had been taken strictly as "Red," as the real substance itself,
 therefore without that substratum, then Anaxagoras would certainly not
 have dared to speak of an effect of the "Red" upon other substances,
 perhaps even with the phrase that the "Red-In-Itself" was transmitting
 the impact received from the "Fleshy-In-Itself." Then it would be clear
 that such an "Existent" _par excellence_ could never be moved.
 
 
 
 15
 
 
 One has to glance at the opponents of the Eleates, in order to
 appreciate the extraordinary advantages in the assumption of
 Parmenides. What embarrassments,--from which Parmenides had
 escaped,--awaited Anaxagoras and all who believed in a plurality of
 substances, with the question, How many substances? Anaxagoras made the
 leap, closed his eyes and said, "Infinitely many"; thus he had flown
 at least beyond the incredibly laborious proof of a definite number
 of elementary substances. Since these "Infinitely Many" had to exist
 without increase and unaltered for eternities, in that assumption was
 given the contradiction of an infinity to be conceived as completed
 and perfect. In short, Plurality, Motion, Infinity driven into flight
 by Parmenides with the amazing proposition of the one "Being," returned
 from their exile and hurled their projectiles at the opponents of
 Parmenides, causing them wounds for which there is no cure. Obviously
 those opponents have no real consciousness and knowledge as to the
 awful force of those Eleatean thoughts, "There can be no time, no
 motion, no space; for all these we can only think of as infinite,
 and to be more explicit, firstly infinitely large, then infinitely
 divisible; but everything infinite has no 'Being,' does not exist," and
 this nobody doubts, who takes the meaning of the word "Being" severely
 and considers the existence of something contradictory impossible,
 _e.g.,_ the existence of a completed infinity. If however the very
 Actuality shows us everything under the form of the completed infinity
 then it becomes evident that it contradicts itself and therefore has no
 true reality. If those opponents however should object: "but in your
 thinking itself there does exist succession, therefore neither could
 your thinking be real and consequently could not prove anything," then
 Parmenides perhaps like Kant in a similar case of an equal objection
 would have answered: "I can, it is true, say my conceptions follow upon
 one another, but that means only that we are not conscious of them
 unless within a chronological order, _i.e.,_ according to the form of
 the inner sense. For that reason time is not a something in itself
 nor any order or quality objectively adherent to things." We should
 therefore have to distinguish between the Pure Thinking, that would
 be timeless like the one Parmenidean "Being," and the consciousness
 of this thinking, and the latter would already translate the thinking
 into the form of appearance, _i.e.,_ of succession, plurality and
 motion. It is probable that Parmenides would have availed himself
 of this loophole; however, the same objection would then have to be
 raised against him which is raised against Kant by A. Spir ("Thinking
 And Reality," 2nd ed., vol. i., pp. 209, &c). "Now, in the first place
 however it is clear, that I cannot know anything of a succession as
 such, unless I have the successive members of the same simultaneously
 in my consciousness. Thus the conception of a succession itself is
 not at all successive, hence also quite different from the succession
 of our conceptions. Secondly Kant's assumption implies such obvious
 absurdities that one is surprised that he could leave them unnoticed.
 Csar and Socrates according to this assumption are not really dead,
 they still live exactly as they did two thousand years ago and only
 seem to be dead, as a consequence of an organisation of my inner
 sense." Future men already live and if they do not now step forward as
 living that organisation of the "inner sense" is likewise the cause
 of it. Here above all other things the question is to be put: How can
 the beginning and the end of conscious life itself, together with
 all its internal and external senses, exist merely in the conception
 of the inner sense? _The_ fact is indeed this, that one certainly
 cannot deny the reality of Change. If it is thrown out through the
 window it slips in again through the keyhole. If one says: "It merely
 seems to me, that conditions and conceptions change,"--then this very
 semblance and appearance itself is something objectively existing and
 within it without doubt the succession has objective reality, some
 things in it really do succeed one another.--Besides one must observe
 that indeed the whole critique of reason only has cause and right of
 existence under the assumption that to us our _conceptions_ themselves
 appear exactly as they are. For if the conceptions also appeared to us
 otherwise than they really are, then one would not be able to advance
 any solid proposition about them, and therefore would not be able to
 accomplish any gnosiology or any "transcendental" investigation of
 objective validity. Now it remains however beyond all doubt that our
 conceptions themselves appear to us as successive."
 
 The contemplation of this undoubted succession and agitation has now
 urged Anaxagoras to a memorable hypothesis. Obviously the conceptions
 themselves moved themselves, were not pushed and had no cause of
 motion outside themselves. Therefore he said to himself, there exists
 a something which bears in itself the origin and the commencement
 of motion; secondly, however, he notices that this conception was
 moving not only itself but also something quite different, the body.
 He discovers therefore, in the most immediate experience an effect
 of conceptions upon expansive matter, which makes itself known as
 motion in the latter. That was to him a fact; and only incidentally
 it stimulated him to explain this fact. Let it suffice that he had a
 regulative schema for the motion in the world,--this motion he now
 understood either as a motion of the true isolated essences through
 the Conceptual Principle, the Nous, or as a motion through a something
 already moved. That with his fundamental assumption the latter kind,
 the mechanical transmission of motions and impacts likewise contained
 in itself a problem, probably escaped him; the commonness and every-day
 occurrence of the effect through impact most probably dulled his eye to
 the mysteriousness of impact. On the other hand he certainly felt the
 problematic, even contradictory nature of an effect of conceptions upon
 substances existing in themselves and he also tried therefore to trace
 this effect back to a mechanical push and impact which were considered
 by him as quite comprehensible. For the Nous too was without doubt such
 a substance existing in itself and was characterised by him as a very
 delicate and subtle matter, with the specific quality of thinking.
 With a character assumed in this way, the effect of this matter upon
 other matter had of course to be of exactly the same kind as that
 which another substance exercises upon a third, _i.e.,_ a mechanical
 effect, moving by pressure and impact. Still the philosopher had now a
 substance which moves itself and other things, a substance of which the
 motion did not come from outside and depended on no one else: whereas
 it seemed almost a matter of indifference how this automobilism was
 to be conceived of, perhaps similar to that pushing themselves hither
 and thither of very fragile and small globules of quicksilver. Among
 all questions which concern motion there is none more troublesome than
 the question as to the beginning of motion. For if one may be allowed
 to conceive of all remaining motions as effect and consequences, then
 nevertheless the first primal motion is still to be explained; for the
 mechanical motions, the first link of the chain certainly cannot lie in
 a mechanical motion, since that would be as good as recurring to the
 nonsensical idea of the _causa sui._ But likewise it is not feasible
 to attribute to the eternal, unconditional things a motion of their
 own, as it were from the beginning, as dowry of their existence. For
 motion cannot be conceived without a direction whither and whereupon,
 therefore only as relation and condition; but a thing is no longer
 "entitative-in-itself" and "unconditional," if according to its nature
 it refers necessarily to something existing outside of it. In this
 embarrassment Anaxagoras thought he had found an extraordinary help
 and salvation in that Nous, automobile and otherwise independent; the
 nature of that Nous being just obscure and veiled enough to produce the
 deception about it, that its assumption also involves that forbidden
 _causa sui._ To empiric observation it is even an established fact that
 Conception is not a _causa sui_ but the effect of the brain, yea, it
 must appear to that observation as an odd eccentricity to separate the
 "mind," the product of the brain, from its _causa_ and still to deem it
 existing after this severing. This Anaxagoras did; he forgot the brain,
 its marvellous design, the delicacy and intricacy of its convolutions
 and passages and he decreed the "Mind-In-Itself." This "Mind-In-Itself"
 alone among all substances had Free-will,--a grand discernment! This
 Mind was able at any odd time to begin with the motion of the things
 outside it; on the other hand for ages and ages it could occupy itself
 with itself--in short Anaxagoras was allowed to assume a _first_ moment
 of motion in some primeval age, as the _Chalaza_ of all so-called
 Becoming; _i.e.,_ of all Change, namely of all shifting and rearranging
 of the eternal substances and their particles, Although the Mind itself
 is eternal, it is in no way compelled to torment itself for eternities
 with the shifting about of grains of matter; and certainly there was a
 time and a state of those matters--it is quite indifferent whether that
 time was of long or short duration--during which the Nous had not acted
 upon them, during which they were still unmoved. That is the period of
 the Anaxagorean chaos.
 
 
 
 16
 
 
 The Anaxagorean chaos is not an immediately evident conception; in
 order to grasp it one must have understood the conception which our
 philosopher had with respect to the so-called "Becoming." For in
 itself the state of all heterogeneous "Elementary-existences" before
 all motion would by no means necessarily result in an absolute mixture
 of all "seeds of things," as the expression of Anaxagoras runs, an
 intermixture, which he imagined as a complete pell-mell, disordered
 in its smallest parts, after all these "Elementary-existences" had
 been, as in a mortar, pounded and resolved into atoms of dust, so that
 now in that chaos, as in an amphora, they could be whirled into a
 medley. One might say that this conception of the chaos did not contain
 anything inevitable, that one merely needed rather to assume any chance
 position of all those "existences," but not an infinite decomposition
 of them; an irregular side-by-side arrangement was already sufficient;
 there was no need of a pell-mell, let alone such a total pell-mell.
 What therefore put into Anaxagoras' head that difficult and complex
 conception? As already said: his conception of the empirically given
 Becoming. From his experience he drew first a most extraordinary
 proposition on the Becoming, and this proposition necessarily resulted
 in that doctrine of the chaos, as its consequence.
 
 The observation of the processes of evolution in nature, not a
 consideration of an earlier philosophical system, suggested to
 Anaxagoras the doctrine, that _All originated from All;_ this was the
 conviction of the natural philosopher based upon a manifold, and at the
 bottom, of course, excessively inadequate induction. He proved it thus:
 if even the contrary could originate out of the contrary, _e.g.,_ the
 Black out of the White, everything is possible; that however did happen
 with the dissolution of white snow into black water. The nourishment of
 the body he explained to himself in this way: that in the articles of
 food there must be invisibly small constituents of flesh or blood or
 bone which during alimentation became disengaged and united with the
 homogeneous in the body. But if All can become out of All, the Firm out
 of the Liquid, the Hard out of the Soft, the Black out of the White,
 the Fleshy out of Bread, then also All must be contained in All. The
 names of things in that case express only the preponderance of the one
 substance over the other substances to be met with in smaller, often
 imperceptible quantities. In gold, that is to say, in that which one
 designates _a potiore_ by the name "gold," there must be also contained
 silver, snow, bread, and flesh, but in very small quantities; the
 whole is called after the preponderating item, the gold-substance.
 
 But how is it possible, that one substance preponderates and fills a
 thing in greater mass than the others present? Experience shows, that
 this preponderance is gradually produced only through Motion, that
 the preponderance is the result of a process, which we commonly call
 Becoming. On the other hand, that "All is in All" is not the result
 of a process, but, on the contrary, the preliminary condition of all
 Becoming and all Motion, and is consequently previous to all Becoming.
 In other words: experience teaches, that continually the like is
 added to the like, _e.g.,_ through nourishment, therefore originally
 those homogeneous substances were not together and agglomerated, but
 they were separate. Rather, in all empiric processes coming before
 our eyes, the homogeneous is always segregated from the heterogeneous
 and transmitted (_e.g.,_ during nourishment, the particles of flesh
 out of the bread, &c), consequently the pell-mell of the different
 substances is the older form of the constitution of things and in point
 of time previous to all Becoming and Moving. If all so-called Becoming
 is a segregating and presupposes a mixture, the question arises,
 what degree of intermixture this pell-mell must have had originally.
 Although the process of a moving on the part of the homogeneous to
 the homogeneous--_i.e.,_ Becoming--has already lasted an immense
 time, one recognises in spite of that, that even yet in all things
 remainders and seed-grains of all other things are enclosed, waiting
 for their segregation, and one recognises further that only here and
 there a preponderance has been brought about; the primal mixture
 must have been a complete one, _i.e.,_ going down to the infinitely
 small, since the separation and unmixing takes up an infinite length of
 time. Thereby strict adherence is paid to the thought: that everything
 which possesses an essential "Being" is infinitely divisible, without
 forfeiting its specificum.
 
 According to these hypotheses Anaxagoras conceives of the world's
 primal existence: perhaps as similar to a dust-like mass of infinitely
 small, concrete particles of which every one is specifically simple
 and possesses one quality only, yet so arranged that every specific
 quality is represented in an infinite number of individual particles.
 Such particles Aristotle has called _Homoiomere_ in consideration of
 the fact that they are the Parts, all equal one to another, of a Whole
 which is homogeneous with its Parts. One would however commit a serious
 mistake to equate this primal pell-mell of all such particles, such
 "seed-grains of things" to the one primal matter of Anaximander; for
 the latter's primal matter called the "Indefinite" is a thoroughly
 coherent and peculiar mass, the former's primal pell-mell is an
 aggregate of substances. It is true one can assert about this Aggregate
 of Substances exactly the same as about the Indefinite of Anaximander,
 as Aristotle does: it could be neither white nor grey, nor black, nor
 of any other colour; it was tasteless, scentless, and altogether as a
 Whole defined neither quantitatively nor qualitatively: so far goes the
 similarity of the Anaximandrian Indefinite and the Anaxagorean Primal
 Mixture. But disregarding this negative equality they distinguish
 themselves one from another positively by the latter being a compound,
 the former a unity. Anaxagoras had by the assumption of his Chaos at
 least so much to his advantage, that he was not compelled to deduce the
 Many from the One, the Becoming out of the "Existent."
 
 Of course with his complete intermixture of the "seeds" he had to
 admit one exception: the Nous was not then, nor is It now admixed with
 any thing. For if It were admixed with only one "Existent," It would
 have, in infinite divisions, to dwell in all things. This exception
 is logically very dubious, especially considering the previously
 described material nature of the Nous, it has something mythological in
 itself and seems arbitrary, but was however, according to Anaxagorean
 _prmissa,_ a strict necessity. The Mind, which is moreover infinitely
 divisible like any other matter, only not through other matters but
 through Itself, has, if It divides Itself, in dividing and conglobating
 sometimes in large, sometimes in small masses, Its equal mass and
 quality from all eternity; and that which at this minute exists as Mind
 in animals, plants, men, was also Mind without a more or less, although
 distributed in another way a thousand years ago. But wherever It had a
 relation to another substance, there It never was admixed with it, but
 voluntarily seized it, moved and pushed it arbitrarily--in short, ruled
 it. Mind, which alone has motion in Itself, alone possesses ruling
 power in this world and shows it through moving the grains of matter.
 But whither does It move them? Or is a motion conceivable, without
 direction, without path? Is Mind in Its impacts just as arbitrary
 as it is, with regard to the time when It pushes, and when It does
 not push? In short, does Chance, _i.e.,_ the blindest option, rule
 within Motion? At this boundary we step into the Most Holy within the
 conceptual realm of Anaxagoras.
 
 
 
 17
 
 
 What had to be done with that chaotic pell-mell of the primal state
 previous to all motion, so that out of it, without any increase of
 new substances and forces, the existing world might originate, with
 its regular stellar orbits, with its regulated forms of seasons and
 days, with its manifold beauty and order,--in short, so that out of
 the Chaos might come a Cosmos? This can be only the effect of Motion,
 and of a definite and well-organised motion. This Motion itself is
 the means of the Nous, Its goal would be the perfect segregation of
 the homogeneous, a goal up to the present not yet attained, because
 the disorder and the mixture in the beginning was infinite. This
 goal is to be striven after only by an enormous process, not to be
 realized suddenly by a mythological stroke of the wand. If ever, at
 an infinitely distant point of time, it is achieved that everything
 homogeneous is brought together and the "primal-existences" undivided
 are encamped side by side in beautiful order, and every particle has
 found its comrades and its home, and the great peace comes about after
 the great division and splitting up of the substances, and there will
 be no longer anything that is divided ind split up, then the Nous will
 again return into Its automobilism and, no longer Itself divided,
 roam through the world, sometimes in larger, sometimes in smaller
 masses, as plant-mind or animal-mind, and no longer will It take up Its
 new dwelling-place in other matter. Meanwhile the task has not been
 completed; but the kind of motion which the Nous has thought out, in
 order to solve the task, shows a marvellous suitableness, for by this
 motion the task is further solved in each new moment. For this motion
 has the character of concentrically progressive circular motion; it
 began at some one point of the chaotic mixture, in the form of a little
 gyration, and in ever larger paths this circular movement traverses
 all existing "Being," jerking forth everywhere the homogeneous to
 the homogeneous. At first this revolution brings everything Dense
 to the Dense, everything Rare to the Rare, and likewise all that is
 Dark, Bright, Moist, Dry to their kind; above these general groups or
 classifications there are again two still more comprehensive, namely
 _Ether,_ that is to say everything that is Warm, Bright, Rare, and
 _Ar,_ that is to say everything that is Dark, Cold, Heavy, Firm.
 Through the segregation of the ethereal masses from the arial,
 there is formed, as the most immediate effect of that epicycle whose
 centre moves along in the circumference of ever greater circles, a
 something as in an eddy made in standing water; heavy compounds are
 led towards the middle and compressed. Just in the same way that
 travelling waterspout in chaos forms itself on the outer side out of
 the Ethereal, Rare, Bright Constituents, on the inner side out of the
 Cloudy, Heavy, Moist Constituents. Then in the course of this process
 out of that Arial mass, conglomerating in its interior, water is
 separated, and again out of the water the earthy element, and then
 out of the earthy element, under the effect of the awful cold are
 separated the stones. Again at some juncture masses of stone, through
 the momentum of the rotation, are torn away sideways from the earth and
 thrown into the realm of the hot light Ether; there in the latter's
 fiery element they are made to glow and, carried along in the ethereal
 rotation, they irradiate light, and as sun and stars illuminate and
 warm the earth, in herself dark and cold. The whole conception is of
 a wonderful daring and simplicity and has nothing of that clumsy and
 anthropomorphical teleology, which has been frequently connected with
 the name of Anaxagoras. That conception has its greatness just in this,
 that it derives the whole Cosmos of Becoming out of the moved circle,
 whereas Parmenides contemplated the true "Existent" as a resting, dead
 ball. Once that circle is put into motion and caused to roll by the
 Nous, then all the order, law and beauty of the world is the natural
 consequence of that first impetus. How very much one wrongs Anaxagoras
 if one reproaches him for the wise abstention from teleology which
 shows itself in this conception and talks scornfully of his Nous as
 of a _deus ex machina._ Rather, on account of the elimination of
 mythological and theistic miracle-working and anthropomorphic ends and
 utilities, Anaxagoras might have made use of proud words similar to
 those which Kant used in his Natural History of the Heavens. For it is
 indeed a sublime thought, to retrace that grandeur of the cosmos and
 the marvellous arrangement of the orbits of the stars, to retrace all
 that, in all forms to a simple, purely mechanical motion and, as it
 were, to a moved mathematical figure, and therefore not to reduce all
 that to purposes and intervening hands of a machine-god, but only to
 a kind of oscillation, which, having once begun, is in its progress
 necessary and definite, and effects result which resemble the wisest
 computation of sagacity and extremely well thought-out fitness without
 being anything of the sort. "I enjoy the pleasure," says Kant, of
 seeing how a well-ordered whole produces itself without the assistance
 of arbitrary fabrications, under the impulse of fixed laws of motion--a
 well-ordered whole which looks so similar to that world-system which
 is ours, that I cannot abstain from considering it to be the same.
 It seems to me that one might say here, in a certain sense without
 presumption: 'Give me matter and I will build a world out of it.'"
 
 
 
 18
 
 
 Suppose now, that for once we allow that primal mixture as rightly
 concluded, some considerations especially from Mechanics seem to oppose
 the grand plan of the world edifice. For even though the Mind at a
 point causes a circular movement its continuation is only conceivable
 with great difficulty, especially since it is to be infinite and
 gradually to make all existing masses rotate. As a matter of course one
 would assume that the pressure of all the remaining matter would have
 crushed out this small circular movement when it had scarcely begun;
 that this does not happen presupposes on the part of the stimulating
 Nous, that the latter began to work suddenly with awful force, or at
 any rate so quickly, that we must call the motion a whirl: such a
 whirl as Democritus himself imagined. And since this whirl must be
 infinitely strong in order not to be checked through the whole world of
 the Infinite weighing heavily upon it, it will be infinitely quick, for
 strength can manifest itself originally only in speed. On the contrary
 the broader the concentric rings are, the slower will be this motion;
 if once the motion could reach the end of the infinitely extended
 world, then this motion would have already infinitely little speed of
 rotation. _Vice versa,_ if we conceive of the motion as infinitely
 great, _i.e.,_ infinitely quick, at the moment of the very first
 beginning of motion, then the original circle must have been infinitely
 small; we get therefore as the beginning a particle rotated round
 itself, a particle with an infinitely small material content. This
 however would not at all explain the further motion; one might imagine
 even all particles of the primal mass to rotate round themselves and
 yet the whole mass would remain unmoved and unseparated. If, however,
 that material particle of infinite smallness, caught and swung by the
 Nous, was not turned round itself but described a circle somewhat
 larger than a point, this would cause it to knock against other
 material particles, to move them on, to hurl them, to make them rebound
 and thus gradually to stir up a great and spreading tumult within
 which, as the next result, that separation of the arial masses from
 the ethereal had to take place. Just as the commencement of the motion
 itself is an arbitrary act of the Nous, arbitrary also is the manner of
 this commencement in so far as the first motion circumscribes a circle
 of which the radius is chosen somewhat larger than a point.
 
 
 
 19
 
 
 Here of course one might ask, what fancy had at that time so suddenly
 occurred to the Nous, to knock against some chance material particle
 out of that number of particles and to turn it around in whirling dance
 and why that did not occur to It earlier. Whereupon Anaxagoras would
 answer: "The Nous has the privilege of arbitrary action; It may begin
 at any chance time, It depends on Itself, whereas everything else is
 determined from outside. It has no duty, and no end which It might
 be compelled to pursue; if It did once begin with that motion and
 set Itself an end, this after all was only--the answer is difficult,
 Heraclitus would say--_play!_"
 
 That seems always to have been the last solution or answer hovering on
 the lips of the Greek. The Anaxagorean Mind is an artist and in truth
 the most powerful genius of mechanics and architecture, creating with
 the simplest means the most magnificent forms and tracks and as it were
 a mobile architecture, but always out of that irrational arbitrariness
 which lies in the soul of the artist. It is as though Anaxagoras was
 pointing at Phidias and in face of the immense work of art, the Cosmos,
 was calling out to us as he would do in front of the Parthenon: "The
 Becoming is no moral, but only an artistic phenomenon." Aristotle
 relates that, to the question what made life worth living, Anaxagoras
 had answered: "Contemplating the heavens and the total order of the
 Cosmos." He treated physical things so devotionally, and with that
 same mysterious awe, which we feel when standing in front of an antique
 temple; his doctrine became a species of free-thinking religious
 exercise, protecting itself through the _odi profanum vulgus et arceo_
 and choosing its adherents with precaution out of the highest and
 noblest society of Athens. In the exclusive community of the Athenian
 Anaxagoreans the mythology of the people was allowed only as a symbolic
 language; all myths, all gods, all heroes were considered here only as
 hieroglyphics of the interpretation of nature, and even the Homeric
 epic was said to be the canonic song of the sway of the Nous and the
 struggles and laws of Nature. Here and there a note from this society
 of sublime free-thinkers penetrated to the people; and especially
 Euripides, the great and at all times daring Euripides, ever thinking
 of something new, dared to let many things become known by means of the
 tragic mask, many things which pierced like an arrow through the senses
 of the masses and from which the latter freed themselves only by means
 of ludicrous caricatures and ridiculous re-interpretations.
 
 The greatest of all Anaxagoreans however is Pericles, the mightiest and
 worthiest man of the world; and Plato bears witness that the philosophy
 of Anaxagoras alone had given that sublime flight to the genius of
 Pericles. When as a public orator he stood before his people, in the
 beautiful rigidity and immobility of a marble Olympian and now, calm,
 wrapped in his mantle, with unruffled drapery, without any change of
 facial expression, without smile, with a voice the strong tone of
 which remained ever the same, and when he now spoke in an absolutely
 un-Demosthenic but merely Periclean fashion, when he thundered, struck
 with lightnings, annihilated and redeemed--then he was the epitome
 of the Anaxagorean Cosmos, the image of the Nous, who has built for
 Itself the most beautiful and dignified receptacle, then Pericles was
 as it were the visible human incarnation of the building, moving,
 eliminating, ordering, reviewing, artistically-undetermined force of
 the Mind. Anaxagoras himself said man was the most rational being or
 he must necessarily shelter the Nous within himself in greater fulness
 than all other beings, because he had such admirable organs as his
 hands; Anaxagoras concluded therefore, that that Nous, according to
 the extent to which It made Itself master of a material body, was
 always forming for Itself out of this material the tools corresponding
 to Its degree of power, consequently the Nous made the most beautiful
 and appropriate tools, when It was appearing in his greatest fulness.
 And as the most wondrous and appropriate action of the Nous was that
 circular primal-motion, since at that time the Mind was still together,
 undivided, in Itself, thus to the listening Anaxagoras the effect
 of the Periclean speech often appeared perhaps as a simile of that
 circular primal-motion; for here too he perceived a whirl of thoughts
 moving itself at first with awful force but in an orderly manner, which
 in concentric circles gradually caught and carried away the nearest and
 farthest and which, when it reached its end, had reshaped--organising
 and segregating--the whole nation.
 
 To the later philosophers of antiquity the way in which Anaxagoras
 made use of his Nous for the interpretation of the world was strange,
 indeed scarcely pardonable; to them it seemed as though he had found a
 grand tool but had not well understood it and they tried to retrieve
 what the finder had neglected. They therefore did not recognise what
 meaning the abstention of Anaxagoras, inspired by the purest spirit
 of the method of natural science, had, and that this abstention first
 of all in every case puts to itself the question: "What is the cause
 of Something"? (_causa efficiens_)--and not "What is the purpose of
 Something"? (_causa finalis_). The Nous has not been dragged in by
 Anaxagoras for the purpose of answering the special question: "What
 is the cause of motion and what causes regular motions?"; Plato
 however reproaches him, that he ought to have, but had not shown that
 everything was in its own fashion and its own place the most beautiful,
 the best and the most appropriate. But this Anaxagoras would not have
 dared to assert in any individual case, to him the existing world was
 not even the most conceivably perfect world, for he saw everything
 originate out of everything, and he found the segregation of the
 substances through the Nous complete and done with, neither at the
 end of the filled space of the world nor in the individual beings.
 For his understanding it was sufficient that he had found a motion,
 which, by simple continued action could create the visible order out
 of a chaos mixed through and through; and he took good care not to put
 the question as to the Why? of the motion, as to the rational purpose
 of motion. For if the Nous had to fulfil by means of motion a purpose
 innate in the noumenal essence, then it was no longer in Its free will
 to commence the motion at any chance time; in so far as the Nous is
 eternal, It had also to be determined eternally by this purpose, and
 then no point of time could have been allowed to exist in which motion
 was still lacking, indeed it would have been logically forbidden to
 assume a starting point for motion: whereby again the conception of
 original chaos, the basis of the whole Anaxagorean interpretation of
 the world would likewise have become logically impossible. In order
 to escape such difficulties, which teleology creates, Anaxagoras had
 always to emphasise and asseverate that the Mind has free will; all
 Its actions, including that of the primal motion, were actions of the
 "free will," whereas on the contrary after that primeval moment the
 whole remaining world was shaping itself in a strictly determined, and
 more precisely, mechanically determined form. That absolutely free
 will however can be conceived only as purposeless, somewhat after the
 fashion of children's play or the artist's bent for play. It is an
 error to ascribe to Anaxagoras the common confusion of the teleologist,
 who, marvelling at the extraordinary appropriateness, at the agreement
 of the parts with the whole, especially in the realm of the organic,
 assumes that that which exists for the intellect had also come into
 existence through intellect, and that that which man brings about only
 under the guidance of the idea of purpose, must have been brought about
 by Nature through reflection and ideas of purpose. (Schopenhauer, "The
 World As Will And Idea," vol. ii., Second Book, chap. 26: On Teleology).
 Conceived in the manner of Anaxagoras, however, the order and
 appropriateness of things on the contrary is nothing but the immediate
 result of a blind mechanical motion; and only in order to cause this
 motion, in order to get for once out of the dead-rest of the Chaos,
 Anaxagoras assumed the free-willed Nous who depends only on Itself.
 He appreciated in the Nous just the very quality of being a thing of
 chance, a chance agent, therefore of being able to act unconditioned,
 undetermined, guided neither by causes nor by purposes.
 
 
 
 
 Notes for a Continuation
 
 
 (Early Part of 1873)
 
 
 1
 
 
 That this total conception of the Anaxagorean doctrine must be
 right, is proved most clearly by the way in which the successors
 of Anaxagoras, the Agrigentine Empedocles and the atomic teacher
 Democritus in their counter-systems actually criticised and improved
 that doctrine. The method of this critique is more than anything a
 continued renunciation in that spirit of natural science mentioned
 above, the law of economy applied to the interpretation of nature.
 That hypothesis, which explains the existing world with the smallest
 expenditure of assumptions and means is to have preference: for in such
 a hypothesis is to be found the least amount of arbitrariness, and in
 it free play with possibilities is prohibited. Should there be two
 hypotheses which both explain the world, then a strict test must be
 applied as to which of the two better satisfies that demand of economy.
 He who can manage this explanation with the simpler and more known
 forces, especially the mechanical ones, he who deduces the existing
 edifice of the world out of the smallest possible number of forces,
 will always be preferred to him who allows the more complicated and
 less-known forces, and these moreover in greater number, to carry on a
 world-creating play. So then we see Empedocles endeavouring to remove
 the _superfluity_ of hypotheses from the doctrine of Anaxagoras.
 
 The first hypothesis which falls as unnecessary is that of the
 Anaxagorean Nous, for its assumption is much too complex to explain
 anything so simple as motion. After all it is only necessary to explain
 the two kinds of motion: the motion of a body towards another, and the
 motion away from another.
 
 
 
 2
 
 
 If our present Becoming is a segregating, although not a complete one,
 then Empedocles asks: what prevents complete segregation? Evidently a
 force works against it, _i.e.,_ a latent motion of attraction.
 
 Further: in order to explain that Chaos, a force must already have
 been at work; a movement is necessary to bring about this complicated
 entanglement.
 
 Therefore periodical preponderance of the one and the other force is
 certain. They are opposites.
 
 The force of attraction is still at work; for otherwise there would be
 no Things at all, everything would be segregated.
 
 This is the actual fact: two kinds of motion. The Nous does not explain
 them. On the contrary, Love and Hatred; indeed we certainly see that
 these move as well as that the Nous moves.
 
 Now the conception of the primal state undergoes a change: it is
 the most _blessed._ With Anaxagoras it was the chaos before the
 architectural work, the heap of stones as it were upon the building
 site.
 
 
 
 3
 
 
 Empedocles had conceived the thought of a tangential force originated
 by revolution and working against gravity ("de coelo," i., p. 284),
 Schopenhauer, "W. A. W.," ii. 390.
 
 He considered the continuation of the circular movement according
 to Anaxagoras _impossible._ It would result in a _whirl, i.e.,_ the
 contrary of ordered motion.
 
 If the particles were infinitely mixed, pell-mell, then one would be
 able to break asunder the bodies without any exertion of power, they
 would not cohere or hold together, they would be as dust.
 
 The forces, which press the atoms against one another, and which give
 stability to the mass, Empedocles calls "Love." It is a molecular
 force, a constitutive force of the bodies.
 
 
 
 4
 
 
 Against Anaxagoras.
 
 1. The Chaos already presupposes motion.
 
 2. Nothing prevented the complete segregation.
 
 3. Our bodies would be dust-forms. How can motion exist, if there are
 not counter-motions in all bodies?
 
 4. An ordered permanent circular motion impossible; only a whirl. He
 assumes the whirl itself to be an effect of the .--. How
 do distant things operate on one another, sun upon earth? If everything
 were still in a whirl, that would be impossible. Therefore at least two
 moving powers: which must be inherent in Things.
 
 5. Why infinite ? Transgression of experience. Anaxagoras meant
 the chemical atoms. Empedocles tried the assumption of four kinds of
 chemical atoms. He took the aggregate states to be essential, and heat
 to be co-ordinated. Therefore the aggregate states through repulsion
 and attraction; matter in four forms.
 
 6. The periodical principle is necessary.
 
 7. With the living beings Empedocles will also deal still on the same
 principle. Here also he denies purposiveness. His greatest deed. With
 Anaxagoras a dualism.
 
 
 
 5
 
 
 The symbolism of _sexual love._ Here as in the Platonic fable the
 longing after Oneness shows itself, and here, likewise, is shown
 that once a greater unity already existed; were this greater unity
 established, then this would again strive after a still greater one.
 The conviction of the unity of everything living guarantees that once
 there was an _immense Living Something,_ of which we are pieces;
 that is probably the Sphairos itself. He is the most blessed deity.
 Everything was connected only through love, therefore in the highest
 degree appropriate. Love has been torn to pieces and splintered by
 hatred, love has been divided into her elements and killed--bereft
 of life. In the whirl no living individuals originate. Eventually
 everything is segregated and now our period begins. (He opposes the
 Anaxagorean Primal Mixture by a Primal Discord.) Love, blind as she
 is, with furious haste again throws the elements one against another
 endeavouring to see whether she can bring them back to life again or
 not. Here and there she is successful. It continues. A presentiment
 originates in the living beings, that they are to strive after still
 higher unions than home and the primal state. Eros. It is a terrible
 crime to kill life, for thereby one works back to the Primal Discord.
 Some day everything will be again one _single life,_ the most blissful
 state.
 
 The Pythagorean-orphean doctrine re-interpreted in the manner of
 natural science. Empedocles consciously masters both means of
 expression, therefore he is the first rhetor. Political aims.
 
 The double-nature--the agonal and the loving, the compassionate.
 
 Attempt of the _Hellenic total reform_.
 
 All inorganic matter has originated out of organic, it is dead organic
 matter. Corpse and man.
 
 
 
 6
 
 
 DEMOCRITUS
 
 The greatest possible simplification of the hypotheses.
 
 1. There is motion, therefore vacuum, therefore a "Non-Existent."
 Thinking is motion.
 
 2. If there is a "Non-Existent" it must be indivisible, _i.e.,_
 absolutely filled. Division is only explicable in case of empty spaces
 and pores. The "Non-Existent" alone is an absolutely porous thing.
 
 3. The secondary qualities of matter, , not of Matter-In-Itself.
 
 4. Establishment of the primary qualities of the . Wherein
 homogeneous, wherein heterogeneous?
 
 5. The aggregate-states of Empedocles (four elements) presuppose only
 the homogeneous atoms, they themselves cannot therefore be .
 
 6. Motion is connected indissolubly with the atoms, effect of gravity.
 Epicur. Critique: what does gravity signify in an infinite vacuum?
 
 7. Thinking is the motion of the fire-atoms. Soul, life, perceptions of
 the senses.
     .    .    .    .    .    .    .    .
 Value of materialism and its embarrassment.
 
 Plato and Democritus.
 
 The hermit-like homeless noble searcher for truth. Democritus and the
 Pythagoreans together find the basis of natural sciences.
     .    .    .    .    .    .    .    .
 What are the causes which have interrupted a flourishing science of
 experimental physics in antiquity after Democritus?
 
 
 
 7
 
 
 Anaxagoras has taken from Heraclitus the idea that in every Becoming
 and in every Being the opposites are together.
 
 He felt strongly the contradiction that a body has many qualities and
 he _pulverised_ it in the belief that he had now dissolved it into
 its true qualities.
     .    .    .    .    .    .    .
 _Plato:_ first Heraclitean, later Sceptic: Everything, even Thinking,
 is in a state of flux.
 
 Brought through Socrates to the permanence of the good, the beautiful.
 
 These assumed as entitative.
 
 All generic ideals partake of the idea of the good, the beautiful, and
 they too are therefore _entitative_, _being_ (as the soul partakes of
 the idea of Life). The idea is _formless_.
 
 Through Pythagoras' metempsychosis has been answered the question: how
 we can know anything about the ideas.
 
 Plato's end: scepticism in Parmenides. Refutation of ideology.
 
 
 
 8
 
 CONCLUSION
 
 
 Greek thought during the _tragic age is pessimistic_ or _artistically
 optimistic_.
 
 Their judgment about _life_ implies more.
 
 The One, flight from the Becoming. _Aut_ unity, _aut_ artistic play.
 
 Deep distrust of reality: nobody assumes a good god, who has made
 everything _optime_.
 
     {Pythagoreans, religious sect.
     {Anaximander.
     {Empedocles.
      Eleates.
     {Anaxagoras.
     {Heraclitus.
      Democritus: the world without moral
        and sthetic meaning, pessimism of
        chance.
 
 If one placed a tragedy before all these, the three former would see
 in it the mirror of the fatality of existence, Parmenides a transitory
 appearance, Heraclitus and Anaxagoras an artistic edifice and image of
 the world-laws, Democritus the result of machines.
     .    .    .    .    .    .    .
 
 With Socrates _Optimism_ begins, an optimism no longer artistic, with
 teleology and faith in the good god; faith in the enlightened good
 man. Dissolution of the instincts, Socrates breaks with the hitherto
 prevailing _knowledge_ and _culture;_ he intends returning to the old
 citizen-virtue and to the State.
 
 Plato dissociates himself from the State, when he observes that the
 State has become identical with the new Culture.
 
 The Socratic scepticism is a weapon against the hitherto prevailing
 culture and knowledge.
 
 
 
 
 ON TRUTH AND FALSITY IN THEIR ULTRAMORAL SENSE
 
 
 (1873)
 
 
 In some remote corner of the universe, effused into innumerable
 solar-systems, there was once a star upon which clever animals invented
 cognition. It was the haughtiest, most mendacious moment in the history
 of this world, but yet only a moment. After Nature had taken breath
 awhile the star congealed and the clever animals had to die.--Someone
 might write a fable after this style, and yet he would not have
 illustrated sufficiently, how wretched,; shadow-like, transitory,
 purposeless and fanciful the human intellect appears in Nature. There
 were eternities during which this intellect did not exist, and when it
 has once more passed away there will be nothing to show that it has
 existed. For this intellect is not concerned with any further mission
 transcending the sphere of human life. No, it is purely human and none
 but its owner and procreator regards it so pathetically as to suppose
 that the world revolves around it. If, however, we and the gnat could
 understand each other we should learn that even the gnat swims through
 the air with the same pathos, and feels within itself the flying centre
 of the world. Nothing in Nature is so bad or so insignificant that it
 will not, at the smallest puff of that force cognition, immediately
 swell up like a balloon, and just as a mere porter wants to have his
 admirer, so the very proudest man, the philosopher, imagines he sees
 from all sides the eyes of the universe telescopically directed upon
 his actions and thoughts.
 
 It is remarkable that this is accomplished by the intellect, which
 after all has been given to the most unfortunate, the most delicate,
 the most transient beings only as an expedient, in order to detain them
 for a moment in existence, from which without that extra-gift they
 would have every cause to flee as swiftly as Lessing's son.[1] That
 haughtiness connected with cognition and sensation, spreading blinding
 fogs before the eyes and over the senses of men, deceives itself
 therefore as to the value of existence owing to the fact that it bears
 within itself the most flattering evaluation of cognition. Its most
 general effect is deception; but even its most particular effects have
 something of deception in their nature.
 
 The intellect, as a means for the preservation of the individual,
 develops its chief power in dissimulation; for it is by dissimulation
 that the feebler, and less robust individuals preserve themselves,
 since it has been denied them to fight the battle of existence
 with horns or the sharp teeth of beasts of prey. In man this art
 of dissimulation reaches its acme of perfection: in him deception,
 flattery, falsehood and fraud, slander, display, pretentiousness,
 disguise, cloaking convention, and acting to others and to himself
 in short, the continual fluttering to and fro around the _one_
 flame--Vanity: all these things are so much the rule, and the law,
 that few things are more incomprehensible than the way in which an
 honest and pure impulse to truth could have arisen among men. They
 are deeply immersed in illusions and dream-fancies; their eyes glance
 only over the surface of things and see "forms"; their sensation
 nowhere leads to truth, but contents itself with receiving stimuli
 and, so to say, with playing hide-and-seek on the back of things.
 In addition to that, at night man allows his dreams to lie to him a
 whole life-time long, without his moral sense ever trying to prevent
 them; whereas men are said to exist who by the exercise of a strong
 will have overcome the habit of snoring. What indeed _does_ man know
 about himself? Oh! that he could but once see himself complete, placed
 as it were in an illuminated glass-case! Does not nature keep secret
 from him most things, even about his body, _e.g.,_ the convolutions of
 the intestines, the quick flow of the blood-currents, the intricate
 vibrations of the fibres, so as to banish and lock him up in proud,
 delusive knowledge? Nature threw away the key; and woe co the fateful
 curiosity which might be able for a moment to look out and down through
 a crevice in the chamber of consciousness, and discover that man,
 indifferent to his own ignorance, is resting on the pitiless, the
 greedy, the insatiable, the murderous, and, as it were, hanging in
 dreams on the back of a tiger. Whence, in the wide world, with this
 state of affairs, arises the impulse to truth?
 
 As far as the individual tries to preserve himself against other
 individuals, in the natural state of things he uses the intellect
 in most cases only for dissimulation; since, however, man both from
 necessity and boredom wants to exist socially and gregariously, he
 must needs make peace and at least endeavour to cause the greatest
 _bellum omnium contra omnes_ to disappear from his world. This first
 conclusion of peace brings with it a something which looks like the
 first step towards the attainment of that enigmatical bent for truth.
 For that which henceforth is to be "truth" is now fixed; that is to
 say, a uniformly valid and binding designation of things is invented
 and the legislature of language also gives the first laws of truth:
 since here, for the first time, originates the contrast between truth
 and falsity. The liar uses the valid designations, the words, in order
 to make the unreal appear as real; _e.g.,_ he says, "I am rich,"
 whereas the right designation for his state would be "poor." He abuses
 the fixed conventions by convenient substitution or even inversion
 of terms. If he does this in a selfish and moreover harmful fashion,
 society will no longer trust him but will even exclude him. In this way
 men avoid not so much being defrauded, but being injured by fraud. At
 bottom, at this juncture too, they hate not deception, but the evil,
 hostile consequences of certain species of deception. And it is in
 a similarly limited sense only that man desires truth: he covets the
 agreeable, life-preserving consequences of truth; he is indifferent
 towards pure, ineffective knowledge; he is even inimical towards truths
 which possibly might prove harmful or destroying. And, moreover, what
 after all are those conventions op language? Are they possibly products
 of knowledge, of the love of truth; do the designations and the things
 coincide? Is language the adequate expression of all realities?
 
 Only by means of forgetfulness can man ever arrive at imagining that he
 possesses "truth" in that degree just indicated. If he does not mean
 to content himself with truth in the shape of tautology, that is, with
 empty husks, he will always obtain illusions instead of truth. What
 is a word? The expression of a nerve-stimulus in sounds. But to infer
 a cause outside us from the nerve-stimulus is already the result of a
 wrong and unjustifiable application of the proposition of causality.
 How should we dare, if truth with the genesis of language, if the point
 of view of certainty with the designations had alone been decisive; how
 indeed should we dare to say: the stone is hard; as if "hard" was known
 to us otherwise; and not merely as an entirely subjective stimulus!
 We divide things according to genders; we designate the tree as
 masculine,[2] the plant as feminine:[3] what arbitrary metaphors! How
 far flown beyond the canon of certainty! We speak of a "serpent";[4]
 the designation fits nothing but the sinuosity, and could therefore
 also appertain to the worm. What arbitrary demarcations! what one-sided
 preferences given sometimes to this, sometimes to that quality of a
 thing! The different languages placed side by side show that with words
 truth or adequate expression matters little: for otherwise there would
 not be so many languages. The "Thing-in-itself" (it is just this which
 would be the pure ineffective truth) is also quite incomprehensible
 to the creator of language and not worth making any great endeavour
 to obtain. He designates only the relations of things to men and for
 their expression he calls to his help the most daring metaphors. A
 nerve-stimulus, first transformed into a percept! First metaphor! The
 percept again copied into a sound! Second metaphor! And each time he
 leaps completely out of one sphere right into the midst of an entirely
 different one. One can imagine a man who is quite deaf and has never
 had a sensation of tone and of music; just as this man will possibly
 marvel at Chladni's sound figures in the sand, will discover their
 cause in the vibrations of the string, and will then proclaim that
 now he knows what man calls "tone"; even so does it happen to us all
 with language. When we talk about trees, colours, snow and flowers,
 we believe we know something about the things themselves, and yet we
 only possess metaphors of the things, and these metaphors do not in the
 least correspond to the original essentials. Just as the sound shows
 itself as a sand-figure, in the same way the enigmatical _x_ of the
 Thing-in-itself is seen first as nerve-stimulus, then as percept, and
 finally as sound. At any rate the genesis of language did not therefore
 proceed on logical lines, and the whole material in which and with
 which the man of truth, the investigator, the philosopher works and
 builds, originates, if not from Nephelococcygia, cloud-land, at any
 rate not from the essence of things.
 
 Let us especially think about the formation of ideas. Every word
 becomes at once an idea not by having, as one might presume, to serve
 as a reminder for the original experience happening but once and
 absolutely individualised, to which experience such word owes its
 origin, no, but by having simultaneously to fit innumerable, more or
 less similar (which really means never equal, therefore altogether
 unequal) cases. Every idea originates through equating the unequal. As
 certainly as no one leaf is exactly similar to any other, so certain
 is it that the idea "leaf" has been formed through an arbitrary
 omission of these individual differences, through a forgetting of the
 differentiating qualities, and this idea now awakens the notion that in
 nature there is, besides the leaves, a something called _the_ "leaf,"
 perhaps a primal form according to which all leaves were woven, drawn,
 accurately measured, coloured, crinkled, painted, but by unskilled
 hands, so that no copy had turned out correct and trustworthy as a
 true copy of the primal form. We call a man "honest"; we ask, why has
 he acted so honestly to-day? Our customary answer runs, "On account of
 his honesty." _The_ Honesty! That means again: the "leaf" is the
 cause of the leaves. We really and truly do not know anything at all
 about an essential quality which might be called _the_ honesty, but we
 do know about numerous individualised, and therefore unequal actions,
 which we equate by omission of the unequal, and now designate as honest
 actions; finally out of them we formulate a _qualitas occulta_ with the
 name "Honesty." The disregarding of the individual and real furnishes
 us with the idea, as it likewise also gives us the form; whereas nature
 knows of no forms and ideas, and therefore knows no species but only
 an _x,_ to us inaccessible and indefinable. For our antithesis of
 individual and species is anthropomorphic too and does not come from
 the essence of things, although on the other hand we do not dare to
 say that it does not correspond to it; for that would be a dogmatic
 assertion and as such just as undemonstrable as its contrary.
 
 What therefore is truth? A mobile army of metaphors, metonymies,
 anthropomorphisms: in short a sum of human relations which became
 poetically and rhetorically intensified, metamorphosed, adorned, and
 after long usage seem to a nation fixed, canonic and binding; truths
 are illusions of which one has forgotten that they _are_ illusions;
 worn-out metaphors which have become powerless to affect the senses;
 coins which have their obverse effaced and now are no longer of account
 as coins but merely as metal.
 
 Still we do not yet know whence the impulse to truth comes, for up to
 now we have heard only about the obligation which society imposes in
 order to exist: to be truthful, that is, to use the usual metaphors,
 therefore expressed morally: we have heard only about the obligation
 to lie according to a fixed convention, to lie gregariously in a style
 binding for all. Now man of course forgets that matters are going thus
 with him; he therefore lies in that fashion pointed out unconsciously
 and according to habits of centuries' standing--and by _this very
 unconsciousness,_ by this very forgetting, he arrives at a sense for
 truth. Through this feeling of being obliged to designate one thing as
 "red," another as "cold," a third one as "dumb," awakes a moral emotion
 relating to truth. Out of the antithesis "liar" whom nobody trusts,
 whom all exclude, man demonstrates to himself the venerableness,
 reliability, usefulness of truth. Now as a "_rational_" being he
 submits his actions to the sway of abstractions; he no longer suffers
 himself to be carried away by sudden impressions, by sensations, he
 first generalises all these impressions into paler, cooler ideas, in
 order to attach to them the ship of his life and actions. Everything
 which makes man stand out in bold relief against the animal depends on
 this faculty of volatilising the concrete metaphors into a schema, and
 therefore resolving a perception into an idea. For within the range of
 those schemata a something becomes possible that never could succeed
 under the first perceptual impressions: to build up a pyramidal order
 with castes and grades, to create a new world of laws, privileges,
 sub-orders, delimitations, which now stands opposite the other
 perceptual world of first impressions and assumes the appearance of
 being the more fixed, general, known, human of the two and therefore
 the regulating and imperative one. Whereas every metaphor of perception
 is individual and without its equal and therefore knows how to escape
 all attempts to classify it, the great "edifice of ideas shows the
 rigid regularity of a Roman Columbarium and in logic breathes forth the
 sternness and coolness which we find in mathematics. He who has been
 breathed upon by this coolness will scarcely believe, that the idea
 too, bony and hexa-hedral, and permutable as a die, remains however
 only as the _residuum of a metaphor,_ and that the illusion of the
 artistic metamorphosis of a nerve-stimulus into percepts is, if not
 the mother, then the grand-mother of every idea. Now in this game of
 dice, "Truth" means to use every die as it is designated, to count its
 points carefully, to form exact classifications, and never lo violate
 the order of castes and the sequences of rank. Just as the Romans
 and Etruscans for their benefit cut up the sky by means of strong
 mathematical lines and banned a god as it were into a _templum,_ into a
 space limited in this fashion, so every nation has above its head such
 a sky of ideas divided up mathematically, and it understands the demand
 for truth to mean that every conceptual god is to be looked for only
 in _his_ own sphere. One may here well admire man, who succeeded in
 piling up an infinitely complex dome of ideas on a movable foundation
 and as it were on running water, as a powerful genius of architecture.
 Of course in order to obtain hold on such a foundation it must be as
 an edifice piled up out of cobwebs, so fragile, as to be carried away
 by the waves: so firm, as not to be blown asunder by every wind. In
 this way man as an architectural genius rises high above the bee;
 she builds with wax, which she brings together out of nature; he
 with the much more delicate material of ideas, which he must first
 manufacture within himself. He is very much to be admired here--but
 not on account of his impulse for truth, his bent for pure cognition
 of things. If somebody hides a thing behind a bush, seeks it again and
 finds it in the self-same place, then there is not much to boast of,
 respecting this seeking and finding; thus, however, matters stand with
 the seeking and finding of "truth" within the realm of reason. If I
 make the definition of the mammal and then declare after inspecting a
 camel, "Behold a mammal," then no doubt a truth is brought to light
 thereby, but it is of very limited value, I mean it is anthropomorphic
 through and through, and does not contain one single point which is
 "true-in-itself," real and universally valid, apart from man. The
 seeker after such truths seeks at the bottom only the metamorphosis
 of the world in man, he strives for an understanding of the world as
 a human-like thing and by his battling gains at best the feeling of
 an assimilation. Similarly, as the astrologer contemplated the stars
 in the service of man and in connection with their happiness and
 unhappiness, such a seeker contemplates the whole world as related to
 man, as the infinitely protracted echo of an original sound: man; as
 the multiplied copy of the one arch-type: man. His procedure is to
 apply man as the measure of all things, whereby he starts from the
 error of believing that he has these things immediately before him
 as pure objects. He therefore forgets that the original metaphors of
 perception _are_ metaphors, and takes them for the things themselves.
 
 Only by forgetting that primitive world of metaphors, only by the
 congelation and coagulation of an original mass of similes and percepts
 pouring forth as a fiery liquid out of the primal faculty of human
 fancy, only by the invincible faith, that _this_ sun, _this_ window,
 _this_ table is a truth in itself: in short only by the fact that
 man forgets himself as subject, and what is more as an _artistically
 creating_ subject: only by all this does he live with some repose,
 safety and consequence. If he were able to get out of the prison walls
 of this faith, even for an instant only, his "self-consciousness would
 be destroyed at once. Already it costs him some trouble to admit to
 himself that the insect and the bird perceive a world different from
 his own, and that the question, which of the two world-perceptions is
 more accurate, is quite a senseless one, since to decide this question
 it would be necessary to apply the standard of _right perception,_
 i.e., to apply a standard which _does not exist._ On the whole it
 seems to me that the "right perception"--which would mean the adequate
 expression of an object in the subject--is a nonentity full of
 contradictions: for between two utterly different spheres, as between
 subject and object, there is no causality, no accuracy, no expression,
 but at the utmost an _sthetical_ relation, I mean a suggestive
 metamorphosis, a stammering translation into quite a distinct foreign
 language, for which purpose however there is needed at any rate an
 intermediate sphere, an intermediate force, freely composing and
 freely inventing. The word "phenomenon" contains many seductions, and
 on that account I avoid it as much as possible, for it is not true
 that the essence of things appears in the empiric world. A painter
 who had no hands and wanted to express the picture distinctly present
 to his mind by the agency of song, would still reveal much more with
 this permutation of spheres, than the empiric world reveals about
 the essence of things. The very relation of a nerve-stimulus to the
 produced percept is in itself no necessary one; but if the same percept
 has been reproduced millions of times and has been the inheritance of
 many successive generations of man, and in the end appears each time to
 all mankind as the result of the same cause, then it attains finally
 for man the same importance as if it were _the_ unique, necessary
 percept and as if that relation between the original nerve-stimulus
 and the percept produced were a close relation of causality: just as
 a dream eternally repeated, would be perceived and judged as though
 real. But the congelation and coagulation of a metaphor does not at all
 guarantee the necessity and exclusive justification of that metaphor.
 
 Surely every human being who is at home with such contemplations has
 felt a deep distrust against any idealism of that kind, as often
 as he has distinctly convinced himself of the eternal rigidity,
 omni-presence, and infallibility of nature's laws: he has arrived at
 the conclusion that as far as we can penetrate the heights of the
 telescopic and the depths of the microscopic world, everything is quite
 secure, complete, infinite, determined, and continuous. Science will
 have to dig in these shafts eternally and successfully and all things
 found are sure to have to harmonise and not to contradict one another.
 How little does this resemble a product of fancy, for if it were one
 it would necessarily betray somewhere its nature of appearance and
 unreality. Against this it may be objected in the first place that if
 each of us had for himself a different sensibility, if we ourselves
 were only able to perceive sometimes as a bird, sometimes as a worm,
 sometimes as a plant, or if one of us saw the same stimulus as red,
 another as blue, if a third person even perceived it as a tone, then
 nobody would talk of such an orderliness of nature, but would conceive
 of her only as an extremely subjective structure. Secondly, what is,
 for us in general, a law of nature? It is not known in itself but
 only in its effects, that is to say in its relations to other laws
 of nature, which again are known to us only as sums of relations.
 Therefore all these relations refer only one to another and are
 absolutely incomprehensible to us in their essence; only that which we
 add: time, space, _i.e.,_ relations of sequence and numbers, are really
 known to us in them. Everything wonderful, however, that we marvel
 at in the laws of nature, everything that demands an explanation and
 might seduce us into distrusting idealism, lies really and solely in
 the mathematical rigour and inviolability of the conceptions of time
 and space. These however we produce within ourselves and throw them
 forth with that necessity with which the spider spins; since we are
 compelled to conceive all things under these forms only, then it is no
 longer wonderful that in all things we actually conceive none but these
 forms: for they all must bear within themselves the laws of number,
 and this very idea of number is the most marvellous in all things. All
 obedience to law which impresses us so forcibly in the orbits of stars
 and in chemical processes coincides at the bottom with those qualities
 which we ourselves attach to those things, so that it is we who
 thereby make the impression upon ourselves. Whence it clearly follows
 that that artistic formation of metaphors, with which every sensation
 in us begins, already presupposes those forms, and is therefore only
 consummated within them; only out of the persistency of these primal
 forms the possibility explains itself, how afterwards--out of the
 metaphors themselves a structure of ideas, could again be compiled. For
 the latter is an imitation of the relations of time, space and number
 in the realm of metaphors.
 
 
 [1] The German poet, Lessing, had been married for just a little over
 one year to Eva Knig. A son was born and died the same day, and the
 mother's life was despaired of. In a letter to his friend Eschenburg
 the poet wrote: "... and I lost him so unwillingly, this son! For he
 had so much understanding! so much understanding! Do not suppose that
 the few hours of fatherhood have made me an ape of a father! I know
 what I say. Was it not understanding, that they had to drag him into
 the world with a pair of forceps? that he so soon suspected the evil
 of this world? Was it not understanding, that he seized the first
 opportunity to get away from it?..."
 
 Eva Knig died a week later.--TR.
 
 [2] In German _the tree--der Baum_--is masculine.--TR.
 
 [3] In German _the plant--die Pflanze--_-is feminine--TR.
 
 [4] _Cf._ the German _die Schlange_ and _schlingen,_ the English
 _serpent_ from the Latin _serpere._--TR.
 
 
 
 2
 
 
 As we saw, it is _language_ which has worked originally at the
 construction of ideas; in later times it is _science._ Just as the
 bee works at the same time at the cells and fills them with honey,
 thus science works irresistibly at that great columbarium of ideas,
 the cemetery of perceptions, builds ever newer and higher storeys;
 supports, purifies, renews the old cells, and endeavours above all to
 fill that gigantic framework and to arrange within it the whole of the
 empiric world, _i.e.,_ the anthropomorphic world. And as the man of
 action binds his life to reason and its ideas, in order to avoid being
 swept away and losing himself, so the seeker after truth builds his hut
 close to the towering edifice of science in order to collaborate with
 it and to find protection. And he needs protection. For there are awful
 powers which continually press upon him, and which hold out against the
 "truth" of science "truths" fashioned in quite another way, bearing
 devices of the most heterogeneous character.
 
 That impulse towards the formation of metaphors, mat fundamental
 impulse of man, which we cannot reason away for one moment--for thereby
 we should reason away man himself--is in truth not defeated nor even
 subdued by the fact that out of its evaporated products, the ideas, a
 regular and rigid new world has been built as a stronghold for it. This
 impulse seeks for itself a new realm of action and another river-bed,
 and finds it in _Mythos_ and more generally in _Art._ This impulse
 constantly confuses the rubrics and cells of the ideas, by putting
 up new figures of speech, metaphors, metonymies; it constantly shows
 its passionate longing for shaping the existing world of waking man
 as motley, irregular, inconsequentially incoherent, attractive, and
 eternally new as the world of dreams is. For indeed, waking man _per
 se_ is only clear about his being awake through the rigid and orderly
 woof of ideas, and it is for this very reason that he sometimes comes
 to believe that he was dreaming when that woof of ideas has for a
 moment been torn by Art. Pascal is quite right, when he asserts, that
 if the same dream came to us every night we should be just as much
 occupied by it as by the things which we see every day; to quote his
 words, "If an artisan were certain that he would dream every night
 for fully twelve hours that he was a king, I believe that he would
 be just as happy as a king who dreams every night for twelve hours
 that he is an artisan." The wide-awake day of a people mystically
 excitable, let us say of the earlier Greeks, is in fact through the
 continually-working wonder, which the mythos presupposes, more akin to
 the dream than to the day of the thinker sobered by science. If every
 tree may at some time talk as a nymph, or a god under the disguise of
 a bull, carry away virgins, if the goddess Athene herself be suddenly
 seen as, with a beautiful team, she drives, accompanied by Pisistratus,
 through the markets of Athens--and every honest Athenian did believe
 this--at any moment, as in a dream, everything is possible; and all
 nature swarms around man as if she were nothing but the masquerade
 of the gods, who found it a huge joke to deceive man by assuming all
 possible forms.
 
 Man himself, however, has an invincible tendency to let himself
 be deceived, and he is like one enchanted with happiness when the
 rhapsodist narrates to him epic romances in such a way that they appear
 real or when the actor on the stage makes the king appear more kingly
 than reality shows him. Intellect, that master of dissimulation, is
 free and dismissed from his service as slave, so long as It is able
 to deceive without _injuring,_ and then It celebrates Its Saturnalia.
 Never is It richer, prouder, more luxuriant, more skilful and daring;
 with a creator's delight It throws metaphors into confusion, shifts the
 boundary-stones of the abstractions, so that for instance It designates
 the stream as the mobile way which carries man to that place whither
 he would otherwise go. Now It has thrown off Its shoulders the emblem
 of servitude. Usually with gloomy officiousness It endeavours to point
 out the way to a poor individual coveting existence, and It fares forth
 for plunder and booty like a servant for his master, but now It Itself
 has become a master and may wipe from Its countenance the expression
 of indigence. Whatever It now does, compared with Its former doings,
 bears within itself dissimulation, just as Its former doings bore the
 character of distortion. It copies human life, but takes it for a
 good thing and seems to rest quite satisfied with it. That enormous
 framework and hoarding of ideas, by clinging to which needy man saves
 himself through life, is to the freed intellect only a scaffolding and
 a toy for Its most daring feats, and when It smashes it to pieces,
 throws it into confusion, and then puts it together ironically, pairing
 the strangest, separating the nearest items, then It manifests that It
 has no use for those makeshifts of misery, and that It is now no longer
 led by ideas but by intuitions. From these intuitions no regular road
 leads into the land of the spectral schemata, the abstractions; for
 them the word is not made, when man sees them he is dumb, or speaks in
 forbidden metaphors and in unheard-of combinations of ideas, in order
 to correspond creatively with the impression of the powerful present
 intuition at least by destroying and jeering at the old barriers of
 ideas.
 
 There are ages, when the rational and the intuitive man stand side by
 side, the one full of fear of the intuition, the other full of scorn
 for the abstraction; the latter just as irrational as the former is
 inartistic. Both desire to rule over life; the one by knowing how to
 meet the most important needs with foresight, prudence, regularity;
 the other as an "over-joyous" hero by ignoring those needs and taking
 that life only as real which simulates appearance and beauty. Wherever
 intuitive man, as for instance in the earlier history of Greece,
 brandishes his weapons more powerfully and victoriously than his
 opponent, there under favourable conditions, a culture can develop and
 art can establish her rule over life. That dissembling, that denying of
 neediness, that splendour of metaphorical notions and especially that
 directness of dissimulation accompany all utterances of such a life.
 Neither the house of man, nor his way of walking, nor his clothing, nor
 his earthen jug suggest that necessity invented them; it seems as if
 they all were intended as the expressions of a sublime happiness, an
 Olympic cloudlessness, and as it were a playing at seriousness. Whereas
 the man guided by ideas and abstractions only wards off misfortune by
 means of them, without even enforcing for himself happiness out of the
 abstractions; whereas he strives after the greatest possible freedom
 from pains, the intuitive man dwelling in the midst of culture has from
 his intuitions a harvest: besides the warding off of evil, he attains a
 continuous in-pouring of enlightenment, enlivenment and redemption. Of
 course when he _does_ suffer, he suffers more: and he even suffers more
 frequently since he cannot learn from experience, but again and again
 falls into the same ditch into which he has fallen before. In suffering
 he is just as irrational as in happiness; he cries aloud and finds no
 consolation. How different matters are in the same misfortune with
 the Stoic, taught by experience and ruling himself by ideas! He who
 otherwise only looks for uprightness, truth, freedom from deceptions
 and shelter from ensnaring and sudden attack, in his misfortune
 performs the masterpiece of dissimulation, just as the other did in
 his happiness; he shows no twitching mobile human face but as it were a
 mask with dignified, harmonious features; he does not cry out and does
 not even alter his voice; when a heavy thundercloud bursts upon him,
 he wraps himself up in his cloak and with slow and measured step walks
 away from beneath it.
 
 
 THE END.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Early Greek Philosophy & Other Essays, by 

 
 
 
 This eBook was produced by Holden McGroin.
 
 
                   Thoughts Out Of Season - Part One
                         by Friedrich Nietzsche
 
 
 
                           THE COMPLETE WORKS
 
                                   OF
 
                          FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
         The First Complete and Authorised English Translation
 
                               EDITED BY
 
                             DR. OSCAR LEVY
 
                               VOLUME ONE
 
                         THOUGHTS OUT OF SEASON
 
                                PART ONE
   _________________________________________________________________
 
                       Of the First Impression of
                          One Thousand Copies
                                this is
 
                                 No. 1
 
                          FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE
 
                                THOUGHTS
                             OUT OF SEASON
 
                                 PART I
 
                      DAVID STRAUSS, THE CONFESSOR
                             AND THE WRITER
 
                       RICHARD WAGNER IN BAYREUTH
 
                             TRANSLATED BY
 
                          ANTHONY M. LUDOVICI
   _________________________________________________________________
 
                               CONTENTS.
 
   EDITORIAL NOTE
 
   NIETZSCHE IN ENGLAND (BY THE EDITOR)
 
   TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE TO DAVID STRAUSS AND RICHARD WAGNER IN
   REUTH
 
   DAVID STRAUSS, THE CONFESSOR AND THE WRITER
 
   RICHARD WAGNER IN BAYREUTH
   _________________________________________________________________
 
                            EDITORIAL NOTE.
                                _______
 
 THE Editor begs to call attention to some of the difficulties he had
 to encounter in preparing this edition of the complete works of
 Friedrich Nietzsche. Not being English himself, he had to rely upon
 the help of collaborators, who were somewhat slow in coming forward.
 They were also few in number; for, in addition to an exact knowledge
 of the German language, there was also required sympathy and a certain
 enthusiasm for the startling ideas of the original, as well as a
 considerable feeling for poetry, and that highest form of it,
 religious poetry.
 
 Such a combination--a biblical mind, yet one open to new thoughts--was
 not easily found. And yet it was necessary to find translators with
 such a mind, and not be satisfied, as the French are and must be, with
 a free though elegant version of Nietzsche. What is impossible and
 unnecessary in French--a faithful and powerful rendering of the
 psalmistic grandeur of Nietzsche --is possible and necessary in
 English, which is a rougher tongue of the Teutonic stamp, and
 moreover, like German, a tongue influenced and formed by an excellent
 version of the Bible. The English would never be satisfied, as
 Bible-ignorant France is, with a Nietzsche  l'Eau de Cologne--they
 would require the natural, strong, real Teacher, and would prefer his
 outspoken words to the finely-chiselled sentences of the raconteur. It
 may indeed be safely predicted that once the English people have
 recovered from the first shock of Nietzsche's thoughts, their biblical
 training will enable them, more than any other nation, to appreciate
 the deep piety underlying Nietzsche's Cause.
 
 As this Cause is a somewhat holy one to the Editor himself, he is
 ready to listen to any suggestions as to improvements of style or
 sense coming from qualified sources. The Editor, during a recent visit
 to Mrs. Foerster-Nietzsche at Weimar, acquired the rights of
 translation by pointing out to her that in this way her brother's
 works would not fall into the hands of an ordinary publisher and his
 staff of translators: he has not, therefore, entered into any
 engagement with publishers, not even with the present one, which could
 hinder his task, bind him down to any text found faulty, or make him
 consent to omissions or the falsification or "sugaring" of the
 original text to further the sale of the books. He is therefore in a
 position to give every attention to a work which he considers as of no
 less importance for the country of his residence than for the country
 of his birth, as well as for the rest of Europe.
 
 It is the consciousness of the importance of this work which makes the
 Editor anxious to point out several difficulties to the younger
 student of Nietzsche. The first is, of course, not to begin reading
 Nietzsche at too early an age. While fully admitting that others may
 be more gifted than himself, the Editor begs to state that he began to
 study Nietzsche at the age of twenty-six, and would not have been able
 to endure the weight of such teaching before that time. Secondly, the
 Editor wishes to dissuade the student from beginning the study of
 Nietzsche by reading first of all his most complicated works. Not
 having been properly prepared for them, he will find the Zarathustra
 abstruse, the Ecce Homo conceited, and the Antichrist violent. He
 should rather begin with the little pamphlet on Education, the
 Thoughts out of Season, Beyond Good and Evil, or the Genealogy of
 Morals. Thirdly, the Editor wishes to remind students of Nietzsche's
 own advice to them, namely: to read him slowly, to think over what
 they have read, and not to accept too readily a teaching which they
 have only half understood. By a too ready acceptance of Nietzsche it
 has come to pass that his enemies are, as a rule, a far superior body
 of men to those who call themselves his eager and enthusiastic
 followers. Surely it is not every one who is chosen to combat a
 religion or a morality of two thousand years' standing, first within
 and then without himself; and whoever feels inclined to do so ought at
 least to allow his attention to be drawn to the magnitude of his task.
   _________________________________________________________________
 
                         NIETZSCHE IN ENGLAND:
 
                  AN INTRODUCTORY ESSAY BY THE EDITOR.
 
 DEAR ENGLISHMEN,--In one of my former writings I have made the remark
 that the world would have seen neither the great Jewish prophets nor
 the great German thinkers, if the people from among whom these eminent
 men sprang had not been on the whole such a misguided, and, in their
 misguidedness, such a tough and stubborn race. The arrow that is to
 fly far must be discharged from a well distended bow: if, therefore,
 anything is necessary for greatness, it is a fierce and tenacious
 opposition, an opposition either of open contempt, or of malicious
 irony, or of sly silence, or of gross stupidity, an opposition
 regardless of the wounds it inflicts and of the precious lives it
 sacrifices, an opposition that nobody would dare to attack who was not
 prepared, like the Spartan of old, to return either with his shield or
 on it.
 
 An opposition so devoid of pity is not as a rule found amongst you,
 dear and fair-minded Englishmen, which may account for the fact that
 you have neither produced the greatest prophets nor the greatest
 thinkers in this world. You would never have crucified Christ, as did
 the Jews, or driven Nietzsche into madness, as did the Germans--you
 would have made Nietzsche, on account of his literary faculties,
 Minister of State in a Whig Ministry, you would have invited Jesus
 Christ to your country houses, where he would have been worshipped by
 all the ladies on account of his long hair and interesting looks, and
 tolerated by all men as an amusing, if somewhat romantic, foreigner. I
 know that the current opinion is to the contrary, and that your
 country is constantly accused, even by yourselves, of its insularity;
 but I, for my part, have found an almost feminine receptivity amongst
 you in my endeavour to bring you into contact with some ideas of my
 native country--a receptivity which, however, has also this in common
 with that of the female mind, that evidently nothing sticks deeply,
 but is quickly wiped out by what any other lecturer, or writer, or
 politician has to tell you. I was prepared for indifference--I was not
 prepared for receptivity and that benign lady's smile, behind which
 ladies, like all people who are only clever, usually hide their inward
 contempt for the foolishness of mere men! I was prepared for abuse,
 and even a good fight--I was not prepared for an extremely
 faint-hearted criticism; I did not expect that some of my opponents
 would be so utterly inexperienced in that most necessary work of
 literary execution. No, no: give me the Germans or the Jews for
 executioners: they can do the hanging properly, while the English
 hangman is like the Russian, to whom, when the rope broke, the
 half-hanged revolutionary said: "What a country, where they cannot
 hang a man properly!" What a country, where they do not hang
 philosophers properly--which would be the proper thing to do to
 them--but smile at them, drink tea with them, discuss with them, and
 ask them to contribute to their newspapers!
 
 To get to the root of the matter: in spite of many encouraging signs,
 remarks and criticisms, adverse or benevolent, I do not think I have
 been very successful in my crusade for that European thought which
 began with Goethe and has found so fine a development in Nietzsche.
 True, I have made many a convert, but amongst them are very
 undesirable ones, as, for instance, some enterprising publishers, who
 used to be the toughest disbelievers in England, but who have now come
 to understand the "value" of the new gospel--but as neither this
 gospel is exactly Christian, nor I, the importer of it, I am not
 allowed to count my success by the conversion of publishers and
 sinners, but have to judge it by the more spiritual standard of the
 quality of the converted. In this respect, I am sorry to say, my
 success has been a very poor one.
 
 As an eager missionary, I have naturally asked myself the reason of my
 failure. Why is there no male audience in England willing to listen to
 a manly and daring philosophy? Why are there no eyes to see, no ears
 to hear, no hearts to feel, no brains to understand? Why is my
 trumpet, which after all I know how to blow pretty well, unable to
 shatter the walls of English prejudice against a teacher whose school
 cannot possibly be avoided by any European with a higher purpose in
 his breast?... There is plenty of time for thought nowadays for a man
 who does not allow himself to be drawn into that aimless bustle of
 pleasure business or politics, which is called modern life because
 outside that life there is--just as outside those noisy Oriental
 cities-a desert, a calmness, a true and almost majestic leisure, a
 leisure unprecedented in any age, a leisure in which one may arrive at
 several conclusions concerning English indifference towards the new
 thought.
 
 First of all, of course, there stands in the way the terrible abuse
 which Nietzsche has poured upon the heads of the innocent Britishers.
 While France and the Latin countries, while the Orient and India, are
 within the range of his sympathies, this most outspoken of all
 philosophers, this prophet and poet-philosopher, cannot find words
 enough to express his disgust at the illogical, plebeian, shallow,
 utilitarian Englishman. It must certainly be disagreeable to be
 treated like this, especially when one has a fairly good opinion of
 one's self; but why do you take it so very, very seriously? Did
 Nietzsche, perchance, spare the Germans? And aren't you accustomed to
 criticism on the part of German philosophers? Is it not the ancient
 and time-honoured privilege of the whole range of them from Leibnitz
 to Hegel -- even of German poets, like Goethe and Heine -- to call you
 bad names and to use unkind language towards you? Has there not always
 been among the few thinking heads in Germany a silent consent and an
 open contempt for you and your ways; the sort of contempt you
 yourselves have for the even more Anglo-Saxon culture of the
 Americans? I candidly confess that in my more German moments I have
 felt and still feel as the German philosophers do; but I have also my
 European turns and moods, and then I try to understand you and even
 excuse you, and take your part against earnest and thinking Germany.
 Then I feel like telling the German philosophers that if you, poor
 fellows, had practised everything they preached, they would have had
 to renounce the pleasure of abusing you long ago, for there would now
 be no more Englishmen left to abuse! As it is, you have suffered
 enough on account of the wild German ideals you luckily only partly
 believed in: for what the German thinker wrote on patient paper in his
 study, you always had to write the whole world over on tender human
 skins, black and yellow skins, enveloping ungrateful beings who
 sometimes had no very high esteem for the depth and beauty of German
 philosophy. And you have never taken revenge upon the inspired masters
 of the European thinking-shop, you have never reabused them, you have
 never complained of their want of worldly wisdom: you have invariably
 suffered in silence and agony, just as brave and staunch Sancho Panza
 used to do. For this is what you are, dear Englishmen, and however
 well you brave, practical, materialistic John Bulls and Sancho Panzas
 may know this world, however much better you may be able to perceive,
 to count, to judge, and to weigh things than your ideal German Knight:
 there is an eternal law in this world that the Sancho Panzas have to
 follow the Don Quixotes; for matter has to follow the spirit, even the
 poor spirit of a German philosopher! So it has been in the past, so it
 is at present, and so it will be in the future; and you had better
 prepare yourselves in time for the eventuality. For if Nietzsche were
 nothing else but this customary type of German philosopher, you would
 again have to pay the bill largely; and it would be very wise on your
 part to study him: Sancho Panza may escape a good many sad experiences
 by knowing his master's weaknesses. But as Nietzsche no longer belongs
 to the Quixotic class, as Germany seems to emerge with him from her
 youthful and cranky nebulosity, you will not even have the pleasure of
 being thrashed in the company of your Master: no, you will be thrashed
 all alone, which is an abominable thing for any right-minded human
 being. "Solamen miseris socios habuisse malorum."[6]*
 
 [Footnote * : It is a comfort to the afflicted to have companions in
 their distress.]
 
 The second reason for the neglect of Nietzsche in this country is that
 you do not need him yet. And you do not need him yet because you have
 always possessed the British virtue of not carrying things to
 extremes, which, according to the German version, is an euphemism for
 the British want of logic and critical capacity. You have, for
 instance, never let your religion have any great influence upon your
 politics, which is something quite abhorrent to the moral German, and
 makes him so angry about you. For the German sees you acting as a
 moral and law-abiding Christian at home, and as an unscrupulous and
 Machiavellian conqueror abroad; and if he refrains from the reproach
 of hypocrisy, with which the more stupid continentals invariably
 charge you, he will certainly call you a "British muddlehead." Well, I
 myself do not take things so seriously as that, for I know that men of
 action have seldom time to think. It is probably for this reason also
 that liberty of thought and speech has been granted to you, the
 law-giver knowing very well all the time that you would be much too
 busy to use and abuse such extraordinary freedom. Anyhow, it might now
 be time to abuse it just a little bit, and to consider what an
 extraordinary amalgamation is a Christian Power with imperialistic
 ideas. True, there has once before been another Christian conquering
 and colonising empire like yours, that of Venice--but these Venetians
 were thinkers compared with you, and smuggled their gospel into the
 paw of their lion.... Why don't you follow their example, in order not
 to be unnecessarily embarrassed by it in your enterprises abroad? In
 this manner you could also reconcile the proper Germans, who
 invariably act up to their theories, their Christianity, their
 democratic principles, although, on the other hand, in so doing you
 would, I quite agree, be most unfaithful to your own traditions, which
 are of a more democratic character than those of any other European
 nation.
 
 For Democracy, as every schoolboy knows, was born in an English
 cradle: individual liberty, parliamentary institutions, the sovereign
 rights of the people, are ideas of British origin, and have been
 propagated from this island over the whole of Europe. But as the
 prophet and his words are very often not honoured in his own country,
 those ideas have been embraced with much more fervour by other nations
 than by that in which they originated. The Continent of Europe has
 taken the desire for liberty and equality much more seriously than
 their levelling but also level-headed inventors, and the fervent
 imagination of France has tried to put into practice all that was
 quite hidden to the more sober English eye. Every one nowadays knows
 the good and the evil consequences of the French Revolution, which
 swept over the whole of Europe, throwing it into a state of unrest,
 shattering thrones and empires, and everywhere undermining authority
 and traditional institutions. While this was going on in Europe, the
 originator of the merry game was quietly sitting upon his island
 smiling broadly at the excitable foreigners across the Channel,
 fishing as much as he could out of the water he himself had so
 cleverly disturbed, and thus in every way reaping the benefit from the
 mighty fight for the apple of Eros which he himself had thrown amongst
 them. As I have endeavoured above to draw a parallel between the
 Germans and the Jews, I may now be allowed to follow this up with one
 between the Jews and the English. It is a striking parallel, which
 will specially appeal to those religious souls amongst you who
 consider themselves the lost tribes of our race (and who are perhaps
 even more lost than they think),--and it is this: Just as the Jews
 have brought Christianity into the world, but never accepted it
 themselves, just as they, in spite of their democratic offspring, have
 always remained the most conservative, exclusive, aristocratic, and
 religious people, so have the English never allowed themselves to be
 intoxicated by the strong drink of the natural equality of men, which
 they once kindly offered to all Europe to quaff; but have, on the
 contrary, remained the most sober, the most exclusive, the most
 feudal, the most conservative people of our continent.
 
 But because the ravages of Democracy have been less felt here than
 abroad, because there is a good deal of the mediaeval building left
 standing over here, because things have never been carried to that
 excess which invariably brings a reaction with it--this reaction has
 not set in in this country, and no strong desire for the necessity of
 it, no craving for the counterbalancing influence of a Nietzsche, has
 arisen yet in the British mind. I cannot help pointing out the grave
 consequences of this backwardness of England, which has arisen from
 the fact that you have never taken any ideas or theories, not even
 your own, seriously. Democracy, dear Englishmen, is like a stream,
 which all the peoples of Europe will have to cross: they will come out
 of it cleaner, healthier, and stronger, but while the others are
 already in the water, plunging, puffing, paddling, losing their
 ground, trying to swim, and even half-drowned, you are still standing
 on the other side of it, roaring unmercifully about the poor swimmers,
 screamers, and fighters below,--but one day you will have to cross
 this same river too, and when you enter it the others will just be out
 of it, and will laugh at the poor English straggler in their turn!
 
 The third and last reason for the icy silence which has greeted
 Nietzsche in this country is due to the fact that he has--as far as I
 know--no literary ancestor over here whose teachings could have
 prepared you for him. Germany has had her Goethe to do this; France
 her Stendhal; in Russia we find that fearless curiosity for all
 problems, which is the sign of a youthful, perhaps too youthful
 nation; while in Spain, on the other hand, we have an old and
 experienced people, with a long training away from Christianity under
 the dominion of the Semitic Arabs, who undoubtedly left some of their
 blood behind,--but I find great difficulty in pointing out any man
 over here who could serve as a useful guide to the heights of the
 Nietzschean thought, except one, who was not a Britisher. I am
 alluding to a man whose politics you used to consider and whose
 writings you even now consider as fantastic, but who, like another
 fantast of his race, may possess the wonderful gift of resurrection,
 and come again to life amongst you--to Benjamin Disraeli.
 
 The Disraelian Novels are in my opinion the best and only preparation
 for those amongst you who wish gradually to become acquainted with the
 Nietzschean spirit. There, and nowhere else, will you find the true
 heroes of coming times, men of moral courage, men whose failures and
 successes are alike admirable, men whose noble passions have
 altogether superseded the ordinary vulgarities and moralities of lower
 beings, men endowed with an extraordinary imagination, which, however,
 is balanced by an equal power of reason, men already anointed with a
 drop of that sacred and noble oil, without which the High
 Priest-Philosopher of Modern Germany would not have crowned his Royal
 Race of the Future.
 
 Both Disraeli and Nietzsche you perceive starting from the same
 pessimistic diagnosis of the wild anarchy, the growing melancholy, the
 threatening Nihilism of Modern Europe, for both recognised the danger
 of the age behind its loud and forced "shipwreck gaiety," behind its
 big-mouthed talk about progress and evolution, behind that veil of
 business-bustle, which hides its fear and utter despair--but for all
 that black outlook they are not weaklings enough to mourn and let
 things go, nor do they belong to that cheap class of society doctors
 who mistake the present wretchedness of Humanity for sinfulness, and
 wish to make their patient less sinful and still more wretched. Both
 Nietzsche and Disraeli have clearly recognised that this patient of
 theirs is suffering from weakness and not from sinfulness, for which
 latter some kind of strength may still be required; both are therefore
 entirely opposed to a further dieting him down to complete moral
 emaciation, but are, on the contrary, prescribing a tonic, a
 roborating, a natural regime for him --advice for which both doctors
 have been reproached with Immorality by their contemporaries as well
 as by posterity. But the younger doctor has turned the tables upon
 their accusers, and has openly reproached his Nazarene colleagues with
 the Immorality of endangering life itself, he has clearly demonstrated
 to the world that their trustful and believing patient was shrinking
 beneath their very fingers, he has candidly foretold these Christian
 quacks that one day they would be in the position of the quack
 skin-specialist at the fair, who, as a proof of his medical skill,
 used to show to the peasants around him the skin of a completly cured
 patient of his. Both Nietzsche and Disraeli know the way to health,
 for they have had the disease of the age themselves, but they
 have--the one partly, the other entirely-- cured themselves of it,
 they have resisted the spirit of their time, they have escaped the
 fate of their contemporaries; they therefore, and they alone, know
 their danger. This is the reason why they both speak so violently, why
 they both attack with such bitter fervour the utilitarian and
 materialistic attitude of English Science, why they both so ironically
 brush aside the airy and fantastic ideals of German Philosophy--this
 is why they both loudly declare (to use Disraeli's words) "that we are
 the slaves of false knowledge; that our memories are filled with ideas
 that have no origin in truth; that we believe what our fathers
 credited, who were convinced without a cause; that we study human
 nature in a charnel house, and, like the nations of the East, pay
 divine honours to the maniac and the fool." But if these two great men
 cannot refrain from such outspoken vituperation--they also lead the
 way: they both teach the divinity of ideas and the vileness of action
 without principle; they both exalt the value of personality and
 character; they both deprecate the influence of society and
 socialisation; they both intensely praise and love life, but they both
 pour contempt and irony upon the shallow optimist, who thinks it
 delightful, and the quietist, who wishes it to be calm, sweet, and
 peaceful. They thus both preach a life of danger, in opposition to
 that of pleasure, of comfort, of happiness, and they do not only
 preach this noble life, they also act it: for both have with equal
 determination staked even their lives on the fulfilment of their
 ideal.
 
 It is astonishing--but only astonishing to your superficial student of
 the Jewish character--that in Disraeli also we find an almost
 Nietzschean appreciation of that eternal foe of the Jewish race, the
 Hellenist, which makes Disraeli, just like Nietzsche, confess that the
 Greek and the Hebrew are both amongst the highest types of the human
 kind. It is not less astonishing--but likewise easily intelligible for
 one who knows something of the great Jews of the Middle Ages--that in
 Disraeli we discover that furious enmity against the doctrine of the
 natural equality of men which Nietzsche combated all his life. It was
 certainly the great Maimonides himself, that spiritual father of
 Spinoza, who guided the pen of his Sephardic descendant, when he thus
 wrote in his Tancred: "It is to be noted, although the Omnipotent
 Creator might have formed, had it pleased him, in the humblest of his
 creations, an efficient agent for his purpose that Divine Majesty has
 never thought fit to communicate except with human beings of the very
 highest order."
 
 But what about Christianity, to which Disraeli was sincerely attached,
 and whose creation he always considered as one of the eternal glories
 of his race? Did not the Divine Majesty think it fit then to
 communicate with the most humble of its creatures, with the fishermen
 of Galilee, with the rabble of Corinth, with the slaves, the women,
 the criminals of the Roman Empire? As I wish to be honest about
 Disraeli, I must point out here, that his genius, although the most
 prominent in England during his lifetime, and although violently
 opposed to its current superstitions, still partly belongs to his
 age--and for this very pardonable reason, that in his Jewish pride he
 overrated and even misunderstood Christianity. He all but overlooked
 the narrow connection between Christianity and Democracy. He did not
 see that in fighting Liberalism and Nonconformity all his life, he was
 really fighting Christianity, the Protestant Form of which is at the
 root of British Liberalism and Individualism to this very day. And
 when later in his life Disraeli complained that the disturbance in the
 mind of nations has been occasioned by "the powerful assault on the
 Divinity of the Semitic Literature by the Germans," he overlooked
 likewise the connection of this German movement with the same
 Protestantism, from the narrow and vulgar middle-class of which have
 sprung all those rationalising, unimaginative, and merely clever
 professors, who have so successfully undermined the ancient and
 venerable lore. And thirdly, and worst of all, Disraeli never
 suspected that the French Revolution, which in the same breath he once
 contemptuously denounced as "the Celtic Rebellion against Semitic
 laws," was, in spite of its professed attack against religion, really
 a profoundly Christian, because a democratic and revolutionary
 movement. What a pity he did not know all this! What a shower of
 splendid additional sarcasms he would have poured over those
 flat-nosed Franks, had he known what I know now, that it is the
 eternal way of the Christian to be a rebel, and that just as he has
 once rebelled against us, he has never ceased pestering and rebelling
 against any one else either of his own or any other creed.
 
 But it is so easy for me to be carried away by that favourite sport of
 mine, of which I am the first inventor among the Jews--Christian
 baiting. You must forgive this, however, in a Jew, who, while he has
 been baited for two thousand years by you, likes to turn round now
 that the opportunity has come, and tries to indulge on his part also
 in a little bit of that genial pastime. I candidly confess it is
 delightful, and I now quite understand your ancestors hunting mine as
 much as they could--had I been a Christian, I would, probably, have
 done the same; perhaps have done it even better, for no one would now
 be left to write any such impudent truisms against me-- rest assured
 of that! But as I am a Jew, and have had too much experience of the
 other side of the question, I must try to control myself in the midst
 of victory; I must judge things calmly; I must state fact honestly; I
 must not allow myself to be unjust towards you. First of all, then,
 this rebelling faculty of yours is a Jewish inheritance, an
 inheritance, however, of which you have made a more than generous, a
 truly Christian use, because you did not keep it niggardly for
 yourselves, but have distributed it all over the earth, from Nazareth
 to Nishni-Novgorod, from Jerusalem to Jamaica, from Palestine to
 Pimlico, so that every one is a rebel and an anarchist nowadays. But,
 secondly, I must not forget that in every Anarchist, and therefore in
 every Christian, there is also, or may be, an aristocrat--a man who,
 just like the anarchist, but with a perfectly holy right, wishes to
 obey no laws but those of his own conscience; a man who thinks too
 highly of his own faith and persuasion, to convert other people to it;
 a man who, therefore, would never carry it to Caffres and Coolis; a
 man, in short, with whom even the noblest and exclusive Hebrew could
 shake hands. In Friedrich Nietzsche this aristocratic element which
 may be hidden in a Christian has been brought to light, in him the
 Christian's eternal claim for freedom of conscience, for his own
 priesthood, for justification by his own faith, is no longer used for
 purposes of destruction and rebellion, but for those of command and
 creation; in him--and this is the key to the character of this
 extraordinary man, who both on his father's and mother's side was the
 descendant of a long line of Protestant Parsons--the Christian and
 Protestant spirit of anarchy became so strong that he rebelled even
 against his own fellow-Anarchists, and told them that Anarchy was a
 low and contemptible thing, and that Revolution was an occupation fit
 only for superior slaves. But with this event the circle of
 Christianity has become closed, and the exclusive House of Israel is
 now under the delightful obligation to make its peace with its once
 lost and now reforming son.
 
 The venerable Owner of this old house is still standing on its
 threshold: his face is pale, his expression careworn, his eyes
 apparently scanning something far in the distance. The wind--for there
 is a terrible wind blowing just now--is playing havoc with his long
 white Jew-beard, but this white Jew-beard of his is growing black
 again at the end, and even the sad eyes are still capable of quite
 youthful flashes, as may be noticed at this very moment. For the eyes
 of the old Jew, apparently so dreamy and so far away, have suddenly
 become fixed upon something in the distance yonder. The old Jew looks
 and looks-- and then he rubs his eyes--and then he eagerly looks
 again. And now he is sure of himself. His old and haggard face is
 lighting up, his stooped figure suddenly becomes more erect, and a
 tear of joy is seen running over his pale cheek into that long beard
 of his. For the old Jew has recognised some one coming from afar--some
 one whom he had missed, but never mentioned, for his Law forbade him
 to do this--some one, however, for whom he had secretly always
 mourned, as only the race of the psalmists and the prophets can
 mourn--and he rushes toward him, and he falls on his neck and he
 kisses him, and he says to his servants: "Bring forth the best robe
 and put it on him, and put a ring on his hand and shoes on his feet.
 And bring hither the fatted calf, and kill it and let us eat and be
 merry!" AMEN.
 
 OSCAR LEVY.
 
 LONDON, January 1909.
   _________________________________________________________________
 
                         TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE.
 
 To the reader who knows Nietzsche, who has studied his Zarathustra and
 understood it, and who, in addition, has digested the works entitled
 Beyond Good and Evil, The Genealogy of Morals, The Twilight of the
 Idols, and The Antichrist,-- to such a reader everything in this
 volume will be perfectly clear and comprehensible. In the attack on
 Strauss he will immediately detect the germ of the whole of
 Nietzsche's subsequent attitude towards too hasty contentment and the
 foolish beatitude of the "easily pleased"; in the paper on Wagner he
 will recognise Nietzsche the indefatigable borer, miner and
 underminer, seeking to define his ideals, striving after
 self-knowledge above all, and availing himself of any contemporary
 approximation to his ideal man, in order to press it forward as the
 incarnation of his thoughts. Wagner the reformer of mankind! Wagner
 the dithyrambic dramatist!--The reader who knows Nietzsche will not be
 misled by these expressions.
 
 To the uninitiated reader, however, some words of explanation are due,
 not only in regard to the two papers before us, but in regard to
 Nietzsche himself. So much in our time is learnt from hearsay
 concerning prominent figures in science, art, religion, or philosophy,
 that it is hardly possible for anybody to-day, however badly informed
 he may be, to begin the study of any great writer or scientist with a
 perfectly open mind. It were well, therefore, to begin the study of
 Nietzsche with some definite idea as to his unaltered purpose, if he
 ever possessed such a thing; as to his lifelong ideal, if he ever kept
 one so long; and as to the one direction in which he always travelled,
 despite apparent deviations and windings. Had he such a purpose, such
 an ideal, such a direction? We have no wish to open a controversy
 here, neither do we think that in replying to this question in the
 affirmative we shall give rise to one; for every careful student of
 Nietzsche, we know, will uphold us in our view. Nietzsche had one very
 definite and unaltered purpose, ideal and direction, and this was "the
 elevation of the type man." He tells us in The Will to Power: "All is
 truth to me that tends to elevate man!" To this principle he was
 already pledged as a student at Leipzig; we owe every line that he
 ever wrote to his devotion to it, and it is the key to all his
 complexities, blasphemies, prolixities, and terrible earnestness. All
 was good to Nietzsche that tended to elevate man; all was bad that
 kept man stationary or sent him backwards. Hence he wrote David
 Strauss, the Confessor and Writer (1873).
 
 The Franco-German War had only just come to an end, and the keynote of
 this polemical pamphlet is, "Beware of the intoxication of success."
 When the whole of Germany was delirious with joy over her victory, at
 a time when the unquestioned triumph of her arms tended rather to
 reflect unearned glory upon every department of her social
 organisation, it required both courage and discernment to raise the
 warning voice and to apply the wet blanket. But Nietzsche did both,
 and with spirit, because his worst fears were aroused. Smug content
 (erbrmliches Behagen) was threatening to thwart his one purpose--the
 elevation of man; smug content personified in the German scholar was
 giving itself airs of omniscience, omnipotence, and ubiquity, and all
 the while it was a mere cover for hidden rottenness and jejune
 pedantry.
 
 Nietzsche's attack on Hegelian optimism alone (pp. 46, 53-54), in the
 first paper, fully reveals the fundamental idea underlying this essay;
 and if the personal attack on Strauss seems sometimes to throw the
 main theme into the background, we must remember the author's own
 attitude towards this aspect of the case. Nietzsche, as a matter of
 fact, had neither the spite nor the meanness requisite for the purely
 personal attack. In his Ecce Homo, he tells us most emphatically: "I
 have no desire to attack particular persons--I do but use a
 personality as a magnifying glass; I place it over the subject to
 which I wish to call attention, merely that the appeal may be
 stronger." David Strauss, in a letter to a friend, soon after the
 publication of the first Thought out of Season, expresses his utter
 astonishment that a total stranger should have made such a dead set at
 him. The same problem may possibly face the reader on every page of
 this fssay: if, however, we realise Nietzsche's purpose, if we
 understand his struggle to be one against "Culture-Philistinism" in
 general, as a stemming, stultifying and therefore degenerate factor,
 and regard David Strauss--as the author himself did, that is to say,
 simply as a glass, focusing the whole light of our understanding upon
 the main theme-- then the Strauss paper is seen to be one of such
 enormous power, and its aim appears to us so lofty, that, whatever our
 views may be concerning the nature of the person assailed, we are
 forced to conclude that, to Nietzsche at least, he was but the
 incarnation and concrete example of the evil and danger then
 threatening to overtake his country, which it was the object of this
 essay to expose.
 
 When we read that at the time of Strauss's death (February 7th, 1874)
 Nietzsche was greatly tormented by the fear that the old scholar might
 have been hastened to his end by the use that had been made of his
 personality in the first Unzeitgemsse Betrachtung; when we remember
 that in the midst of this torment he ejaculated, "I was indeed not
 made to hate and have enemies!"--we are then in a better position to
 judge of the motives which, throughout his life, led him to engage
 such formidable opponents and to undertake such relentless attacks. It
 was merely his ruling principle that, all is true and good that tends
 to elevate man; everything is bad and false that keeps man stationary
 or sends him backwards.
 
 Those who may think that his attacks were often unwarrantable and
 ill-judged will do well, therefore, to bear this in mind, that
 whatever his value or merits may have been as an iconoclast, at least
 the aim he had was sufficiently lofty and honourable, and that he
 never shirked the duties which he rightly or wrongly imagined would
 help him to
 
 Wagner paper (1875-1876) we are faced by a somewhat different problem.
 Most readers who will have heard of Nietzsche's subsequent
 denunciation of Wagner's music will probably stand aghast before this
 panegyric of him; those who, like Professor Saintsbury, will fail to
 discover the internal evidence in this essay which points so
 infallibly to Nietzsche's real but still subconscious opinion of his
 hero, may even be content to regard his later attitude as the result
 of a complete volte-face, and at any rate a flat contradiction of the
 one revealed in this paper. Let us, however, examine the internal
 evidence we speak of, and let us also discuss the purpose and spirit
 of the essay.
 
 We have said that Nietzsche was a man with a very fixed and powerful
 ideal, and we have heard what this ideal was. Can we picture him,
 then,--a young and enthusiastic scholar with a cultured love of music,
 and particularly of Wagner's music, eagerly scanning all his circle,
 the whole city and country in which he lived--yea, even the whole
 continent on which he lived--for something or some one that would set
 his doubts at rest concerning the feasibility of his ideal? Can we now
 picture this young man coming face to face with probably one of the
 greatest geniuses of his age--with a man whose very presence must have
 been electric, whose every word or movement must have imparted some
 power to his surroundings--with Richard Wagner?
 
 If we can conceive of what the mere attention, even, of a man like
 Wagner must have meant to Nietzsche in his twenties, if we can form
 any idea of the intoxicating effect produced upon him when this
 attention developed into friendship, we almost refuse to believe that
 Nietzsche could have been critical at all at first. In Wagner, as was
 but natural, he soon began to see the ideal, or at least the means to
 the ideal, which was his one obsession. All his hope for the future of
 Germany and Europe cleaved, as it were, to this highest manifestation
 of their people's life, and gradually he began to invest his already
 great friend with all the extra greatness which he himself drew from
 the depths of his own soul.
 
 The friendship which grew between them was of that rare order in which
 neither can tell who influences the other more. Wagner would often
 declare that the beautiful music in the third act of Siegfried was to
 be ascribed to Nietzsche's influence over him; he also adopted the
 young man's terminology in art matters, and the concepts implied by
 the words "Dionysian" and "Apollonian" were borrowed by him from his
 friend's discourses. How much Nietzsche owed to Wagner may perhaps
 never be definitely known; to those who are sufficiently interested to
 undertake the investigation of this matter, we would recommend Hans
 Belart's book, Nietzsche's Ethik; in it references will be found which
 give some clue as to the probable sources from which the necessary
 information may be derived. In any case, however, the reciprocal
 effects of their conversations will never be exactly known; and
 although it would be ridiculous to assume that Nietzsche was
 essentially the same when he left as when he met him, what the real
 nature of the change was it is now difficult to say.
 
 For some years their friendship continued firm, and grew ever more and
 more intimate. The Birth Of Tragedy was one of the first public
 declarations of it, and after its publication many were led to
 consider that Wagner's art was a sort of resurrection of the Dionysian
 Grecian art. Enemies of Nietzsche began to whisper that he was merely
 Wagner's "literary lackey"; many friends frowned upon the promising
 young philologist, and questioned the exaggerated importance he was
 beginning to ascribe to the art of music and to art in general, in
 their influence upon the world; and all the while Nietzsche's one
 thought and one aim was to help the cause and further the prospects of
 the man who he earnestly believed was destined to be the salvation of
 European culture.
 
 Every great ideal coined in his own brain he imagined to be the ideal
 of his hero; all his sublimest hopes for society were presented
 gratis, in his writings, to Wagner, as though products of the latter's
 own mind; and just as the prophet of old never possessed the requisite
 assurance to suppose that his noblest ideas were his own, but
 attributed them to some higher and supernatural power, whom he thereby
 learnt to worship for its fancied nobility of sentiment, so Nietzsche,
 still doubting his own powers, created a fetich out of nis most
 distinguished friend, and was ultimately wounded and well-nigh wrecked
 with disappointment when he found that the Wagner of the
 Gotterdammerung and Parsifal was not the Wagner of his own mind.
 
 While writing Ecce Homo, he was so well aware of the extent to which
 he had gone in idealising his friend, that he even felt able to say:
 "Wagner in Bayreuth is a vision of my own future.... Now that I can
 look back upon this work, I would not like to deny that, at bottom, it
 speaks only of myself" (p. 74). And on another page of the same book
 we read: "... What I heard, as a young man, in Wagnerian music, had
 absolutely nothing to do with Wagner: when I described Dionysian
 music, I only described what I had heard, and I thus translated and
 transfigured all that I bore in my own soul into the spirit of the new
 art. The strongest proof of this is my essay, Wagner in Bayreuth: in
 all decidedly psychological passages of this book the reader may
 simply read my name, or the name 'Zarathustra,' wherever the text
 contains the name 'Wagner'" (p. 68).
 
 As we have already hinted, there are evidences of his having
 subconsciously discerned the REAL Wagner, even in the heyday of their
 friendship, behind the ideal he had formed of him; for his eyes were
 too intelligent to be deceived, even though his understanding refused
 at first to heed the messages they sent it: both the Birth of Tragedy
 and Wagner in Bayreuth are with us to prove this, and not merely when
 we read these works between the lines, but when we take such passages
 as those found on pp. 115, 149, 150, 151, 156, 158, 159 of this book
 quite literally.
 
 Nietzsche's infatuation we have explained; the consequent idealisation
 of the object of his infatuation he himself has confessed; we have
 also pointed certain passages which we believe show beyond a doubt
 that almost everything to be found in The Case of Wagner and Nietzsche
 contra Wagner was already subconscious in our author, long before he
 had begun to feel even a coolness towards his hero: let those who
 think our interpretation of the said passages is either strained or
 unjustified turn to the literature to which we have referred and judge
 for themselves. It seems to us that those distinguished critics who
 complain of Nietzsche's complete volte-face and his uncontrollable
 recantations and revulsions of feeling have completely overlooked this
 aspect of the question.
 
 It were well for us to bear in mind that we are not altogether free to
 dispose of Nietzsche's attitude to Wagner, at any given period in
 their relationship, with a single sentence of praise or of blame.
 After all, we are faced by a problem which no objectivity or
 dispassionate detachment on our parts can solve. Nietzsche endowed
 both Schopenhauer and Wagner with qualities and aspirations so utterly
 foreign to them both, that neither of them would have recognised
 himself in the images he painted of them. His love for them was
 unusual; perhaps it can only be fully understood emotionally by us:
 like all men who are capable of very great love, Nietzsche lent the
 objects of his affection anything they might happen to lack in the way
 of greatness, and when at last his eyes were opened, genuine pain, not
 malice, was the motive of even the most bitter of his diatribes.
 
 Finally, we should just like to give one more passage from Ecce Homo
 bearing upon the subject under discussion. It is particularly
 interesting from an autobiographical standpoint, and will perhaps
 afford the best possible conclusion to this preface.
 
 Nietzsche is writing about Wagner's music, and he says: "The world
 must indeed be empty for him who has never been unhealthy enough for
 this 'infernal voluptuousness'; it is allowable and yet almost
 forbidden to use a mystical expression in this behalf. I suppose I
 know better than any one the prodigies Wagner was capable of, the
 fifty worlds of strange raptures to which no one save him could soar;
 and as I stand to-day--strong enough to convert even the most
 suspicious and dangerous phenomenon to my own use and be the stronger
 for it--I declare Wagner to be the great benefactor of my life.
 Something will always keep our names associated in the minds of men,
 and that is, that we are two who have suffered more
 excruciatingly--even at each other's hands--than most men are able to
 suffer nowadays. And just as Wagner is merely a misunderstanding among
 Germans, so am I and ever will be. You lack two centuries of
 psychological and artistic discipline, my dear countrymen!... But it
 will be impossible for you ever to recover the time now lost" (p. 43).
 
                                                   ANTHONY M. LUDOVICI.
   _________________________________________________________________
 
                             DAVID STRAUSS,
 
                     THE CONFESSOR AND THE WRITER.
 
                             DAVID STRAUSS
                                _______
 
                                   I.
 
 Public opinion in Germany seems strictly to forbid any allusion to the
 evil and dangeious consequences of a war, more particularly when the
 war in question has been a victorious one. Those writers, therefore,
 command a more ready attention who, regarding this public opinion as
 final, proceed to vie with each other in their jubilant praise of the
 war, and of the powerful influences it has brought to bear upon
 morality, culture, and art. Yet it must be confessed that a gieat
 victory is a great danger. Human nature bears a triumph less easily
 than a defeat; indeed, it might even be urged that it is simpler to
 gain a victory of this sort than to turn it to such account that it
 may not ultimately proxe a seiious rout.
 
 But of all evil results due to the last contest with France, the most
 deplorable, peihaps, is that widespread and even universal error of
 public opinion and of all who think publicly, that German culture was
 also victorious in the struggle, and that it should now, therefore, be
 decked with garlands, as a fit recognition of such extraordinary
 events and successes. This error is in the highest degree pernicious:
 not because it is an error,--for there are illusions which are both
 salutary and blessed,--but because it threatens to convert our victory
 into a signal defeat. A defeat? --I should say rather, into the
 uprooting of the "German Mind" for the benefit of the "German Empire."
 
 Even supposing that the fight had been between the two cultures, the
 standard for the value of the victor would still be a very relative
 one, and, in any case, would certainly not justify such exaggerated
 triumph or self-glorification. For, in the first place, it would be
 necessary to ascertain the worth of the conquered culture. This might
 be very little; in which case, even if the victory had involved the
 most glorious display of arms, it would still offer no warrant for
 inordinate rapture.
 
 Even so, however, there can be no question, in our case, of the
 victory of German culture; and for the simple reason, that French
 culture remains as heretofore, and that we depend upon it as
 heretofore. It did not even help towards the success of our arms.
 Severe military discipline, natural bravery and sustaining power, the
 superior generalship, unity and obedience in the rank and file--in
 short, factors which have nothing to do with culture, were
 instrumental in making us conquer an opponent in whom the most
 essential of these factors were absent. The only wonder is, that
 precisely what is now called "culture" in Germany did not prove an
 obstacle to the military operations which seemed vitally necessary to
 a great victory. Perhaps, though, this was only owing to the fact that
 this "thing" which dubs itself "culture" saw its advantage, for once,
 in keeping in the background.
 
 If however, it be permitted to grow and to spread, if it be spoilt by
 the flattering and nonsensical assurance that it has been
 victorious,--then, as I have said, it will have the power to extirpate
 German mind, and, when that is done, who knows whether there will
 still be anything to be made out of the surviving German body!
 
 Provided it were possible to direct that calm and tenacious bravery
 which the German opposed to the pathetic and spontaneous fury of the
 Frenchman, against the inward enemy, against the highly suspicious
 and, at all events, unnative "cultivation" which, owing to a dangerous
 misunderstanding, is called "culture" in Germany, then all hope of a
 really genuine German "culture"--the reverse of that
 "cultivation"--would not be entirely lost. For the Germans have never
 known any lack of clear-sighted and heroic leaders, though these,
 often enough, probably, have lacked Germans. But whether it be
 possible to turn German bravery into a new direction seems to me to
 become ever more and more doubtful; for I realise how fully convinced
 every one is that such a struggle and such bravery are no longer
 requisite; on the contrary, that most things are regulated as
 satisactorily as they possibly can be--or, at all events, that
 everything of moment has long ago been discovered and accomplished: in
 a word, that the seed of culture is already sown everywhere, and is
 now either shooting up its fresh green blades, or, here and there,
 even bursting forth into luxuriant blossom. In this sphere, not only
 happiness but ecstasy reigns supreme. I am conscious of this ecstasy
 and happiness, in the ineffable, truculent assurance of German
 journalists and manufacturers of novels, tragedies, poems, and
 histories (for it must be clear that these people belong to one
 category), who seem to have conspired to improve the leisure and
 ruminative hours--that is to say, "the intellectual lapses"--of the
 modern man, by bewildering him with their printed paper. Since the
 war, all is gladness, dignity, and self-consciousness in this merry
 throng. After the startling successes of German culture, it regards
 itself, not only as approved and sanctioned, but almost as sanctified.
 It therefore speaks with gravity, affects to apostrophise the German
 People, and issues complete works, after the manner of the classics;
 nor does it shrink from proclaiming in those journals which are open
 to it some few of its adherents as new German classical writers and
 model authors. It might be supposed that the dangers of such an abuse
 of success would be recognised by the more thoughtful and enlightened
 among cultivated Germans; or, at least, that these would feel how
 painful is the comedy that is being enacted around them: for what in
 truth could more readily inspire pity than the sight of a cripple
 strutting like a cock before a mirror, and exchanging complacent
 glances with his reflection! But the "scholar" caste willingly allow
 things to remain as they are, and re too much concerned with their own
 affairs to busy themselves with the care of the German mind. Moreover,
 the units of this caste are too thoroughly convinced that their own
 scholarship is the ripest and most perfect fruit of the age--in fact,
 of all ages--to see any necessity for a care of German culture in
 general; since, in so far as they and the legion of their brethren are
 concerned, preoccupations of this order have everywhere been, so to
 speak, surpassed. The more conscientious observer, more particularly
 if he be a foreigner, cannot help noticing withal that no great
 disparity exists between that which the German scholar regards as his
 culture and that other triumphant culture of the new German classics,
 save in respect of the quantum of knowledge. Everywhere, where
 knowledge and not ability, where information and not art, hold the
 first rank,--everywhere, therefore, where life bears testimony to the
 kind of culture extant, there is now only one specific German
 culture--and this is the culture that is supposed to have conquered
 France?
 
 The contention appears to be altogether too preposterous. It was
 solely to the more extensive knowledge of German officers, to the
 superior training of their soldiers, and to their more scientific
 military strategy, that all impartial Judges, and even the French
 nation, in the end, ascribed the victory. Hence, if it be intended to
 regard German erudition as a thing apart, in what sense can German
 culture be said to have conquered? In none whatsoever; for the moral
 qualities of severe discipline, of more placid obedience, have nothing
 in common with culture: these were characteristic of the Macedonian
 army, for instance, despite the fact that the Greek soldiers were
 infinitely more cultivated. To speak of German scholarship and culture
 as having conquered, therefore, can only be the outcome of a
 misapprehension, probably resulting from the circumstance that every
 precise notion of culture has now vanished from Germany.
 
 Culture is, before all things, the unity of artistic style, in every
 expression of the life of a people. Abundant knowledge and learning,
 however, are not essential to it, nor are they a sign of its
 existence; and, at a pinch, they might coexist much more harmoniously
 with the very opposite of culture--with barbarity: that is to say,
 with a complete lack of style, or with a riotous jumble of all styles.
 But it is precisely amid this riotous jumble that the German of to-day
 subsists; and the serious problem to be solved is: how, with all his
 learning, he can possibly avoid noticing it; how, into the bargain, he
 can rejoice with all his heart in his present "culture"? For
 everything conduces to open his eyes for him--every glance he casts at
 his clothes, his room, his house; every walk he takes through the
 streets of his town; every visit he pays to his art-dealers and to his
 trader in the articles of fashion. In his social intercourse he ought
 to realise the origin of his manners and movements; in the heart of
 our art-institutions, the pleasures of our concerts, theatres, and
 museums, he ought to become apprised of the super- and juxta-position
 of all imaginable styles. The German heaps up around him the forms,
 colours, products, and curiosities of all ages and zones, and thereby
 succeeds in producing that garish newness, as of a country fair, which
 his scholars then proceed to contemplate and to define as "Modernism
 per se"; and there he remains, squatting peacefully, in the midst of
 this conflict of styles. But with this kind of culture, which is, at
 bottom, nothing more nor less than a phlegmatic insensibility to real
 culture, men cannot vanquish an enemy, least of all an enemy like the
 French, who, whatever their worth may be, do actually possess a
 genuine and productive culture, and whom, up to the present, we have
 systematically copied, though in the majority of cases without skill.
 
 Even supposing we had really ceased copying them, it would still not
 mean that we had overcome them, but merely that we had lifted their
 yoke from our necks. Not before we have succeeded in forcing an
 original German culture upon them can there be any question of the
 triumph of German culture. Meanwhile, let us not forget that in all
 matters of form we are, and must be, just as dependent upon Paris now
 as we were before the war; for up to the present there has been no
 such thing as a original German culture.
 
 We all ought to have become aware of this, of our own accord. Besides,
 one of the few who had he right to speak to Germans in terms of
 reproach Publicly drew attention to the fact. "We Germans are of
 yesterday," Goethe once said to Eckermann. "True, for the last hundred
 years we have diligently cultivated ourselves, but a few centuries may
 yet have to run their course before our fellow-countrymen become
 permeated with sufficient intellectuality and higher culture to have
 it said of them, it is a long time since they were barbarians."
 
                                  II.
 
 If, however, our public and private life is so manifestly devoid of
 all signs of a productive and characteristic culture; if, moreover,
 our great artists, with that earnest vehemence and honesty which is
 peculiar to greatness admit, and have admitted, this monstrous
 fact--so very humiliating to a gifted nation; how can it still be
 possible for contentment to reign to such an astonishing extent among
 German scholars? And since the last war this complacent spirit has
 seemed ever more and morerready to break forth into exultant cries and
 demonstrations of triumph. At all events, the belief seems to be rife
 that we are in possession of a genuine culture, and the enormous
 incongruity of this triumphant satisfaction in the face of the
 inferiority which should be patent to all, seems only to be noticed by
 the few and the select. For all those who think with the public mind
 have blindfolded their eyes and closed their ears. The incongruity is
 not even acknowledged to exist. How is this possible? What power is
 sufficiently influential to deny this existence? What species of men
 must have attained to supremacy in Germany that feelings which are so
 strong and simple should he denied or prevented from obtaining
 expression? This power, this species of men, I will name--they are the
 Philistines of Culture.
 
 As every one knows, the word "Philistine" is borrowed from the
 vernacular of student-life, and, in its widest and most popular sense,
 it signifies the reverse of a son of the Muses, of an artist, and of
 the genuine man of culture. The Philistine of culture, however, the
 study of whose type and the hearing of whose confessions (when he
 makes them) have now become tiresome duties, distinguishes himself
 from the general notion of the order "Philistine" by means of a
 superstition: he fancies that he is himself a son of the Muses and a
 man of culture. This incomprehensible error clearly shows that he does
 not even know the difference between a Philistine and his opposite. We
 must not be surprised, therefore, if we find him, for the most part,
 solemnly protesting that he is no Philistine. Owing to this lack of
 self-knowledge, he is convinced that his "culture" is the consummate
 manifestation of real German culture; and, since he everywhere meets
 with scholars of his own type, since all public institutions, whether
 schools, universities, or academies, are so organised as to be in
 complete harmony with his education and needs, wherever he goes he
 bears with him the triumphant feeling that he is the worthy champion
 of prevailing German culture, and he frames his pretensions and claims
 accordingly.
 
 If, however, real culture takes unity of style for granted (and even
 an inferior and degenerate culture cannot be imagined in which a
 certain coalescence of the profusion of forms has not taken place), it
 is just possible that the confusion underlying the
 Culture-Philistine's error may arise from the fact that, since he
 comes into contact everywhere with creatures cast in the same mould as
 himself, he concludes that this uniformity among all "scholars" must
 point to a certain uniformity in German education--hence to culture.
 All round him, he sees only needs and views similar to his own;
 wherever he goes, he finds himself embraced by a ring of tacit
 conventions concerning almost everything, but more especially matters
 of religion and art. This imposing sameness, this tutti unisono which,
 though it responds to no word of command, is yet ever ready to burst
 forth, cozens him into the belief that here a culture must be
 established and flourishing. But Philistinism, despite its systematic
 organisation and power, does not constitute a culture by virtue of its
 system alone; it does not even constitute an inferior culture, but
 invariably the reverse--namely, firmly established barbarity. For the
 uniformity of character which is so apparent in the German scholars of
 to-day is only the result of a conscious or unconscious exclusion and
 negation of all the artistically productive forms and requirements of
 a genuine style. The mind of the cultured Philistine must have become
 sadly unhinged; for precisely what culture repudiates he regards as
 culture itself; and, since he proceeds logically, he succeeds in
 creating a connected group of these repudiations--a system of
 non-culture, to which one might at a pinch grant a certain "unity of
 style," provided of course it were Ot nonsense to attribute style to
 barbarity. If he have to choose between a stylish act and its
 opposite, he will invariably adopt the latter, and, since this rule
 holds good throughout, every one of his acts bears the same negative
 stamp. Now, it is by means of this stamp that he is able to identify
 the character of the "German culture," which is his own patent; and
 all things that do not bear it are so many enemies and obstacles drawn
 up against him. In the presence of these arrayed forces the
 Culture-Philistine either does no more than ward off the blows, or
 else he denies, holds his tongue, stops his ears, and refuses to face
 facts. He is a negative creature--even in his hatred and animosity.
 Nobody, however, is more disliked by him than the man who regards him
 as a Philistine, and tells him what he is--namely, the barrier in the
 way of all powerful men and creators, the labyrinth for all who doubt
 and go astray, the swamp for all the weak and the weary, the fetters
 of those who would run towards lofty goals, the poisonous mist that
 chokes all germinating hopes, the scorching sand to all those German
 thinkers who seek for, and thirst after, a new life. For the mind of
 Germany is seeking; and ye hate it because it is seeking, and because
 it will not accept your word, when ye declare that ye have found what
 it is seeking. How could it have been possible for a type like that of
 the Culture-Philistine to develop? and even granting its development,
 how was it able to rise to the powerful Position of supreme judge
 concerning all questions of German culture? How could this have been
 possible, seeing that a whole procession of grand and heroic figures
 has already filed past us, whose every movement, the expression of
 whose every feature, whose questioning voice and burning eye betrayed
 the one fact, that they were seekers, and that they sought that which
 the Culture-Philistine had long fancied he had found--to wit, a
 genuine original German culture? Is there a soil--thus they seemed to
 ask--a soil that is pure enough, unhandselled enough, of sufficient
 virgin sanctity, to allow the mind of Germany to build its house upon
 it? Questioning thus, they wandered through the wilderness, and the
 woods of wretched ages and narrow conditions, and as seekers they
 disappeared from our vision; one of them, at an advanced age, was even
 able to say, in the name of all: "For half a century my life has been
 hard and bitter enough; I have allowed myself no rest, but have ever
 striven, sought and done, to the best and to the utmost of my
 ability."
 
 What does our Culture-Philistinism say of these seekers? It regards
 them simply as discoverers, and seems to forget that they themselves
 only claimed to be seekers. We have our culture, say her sons; for
 have we not our "classics"? Not only is the foundation there, but the
 building already stands upon it--we ourselves constitute that
 building. And, so saying, the Philistine raises his hand to his brow.
 
 But, in order to be able thus to misjudge, and thus to grant
 left-handed veneration to our classics, people must have ceased to
 know them. This, generally speaking, is precisely what has happened.
 For, otherwise, one ought to know that there is only one way of
 honouring them, and that is to continue seeking with the same spirit
 and with the same courage, and not to weary of the search. But to
 foist the doubtful title of "classics" upon them, and to "edify"
 oneself from time to time by reading their works, means to yield to
 those feeble and selfish emotions which all the paying public may
 purchase at concert-halls and theatres. Even the raising of monuments
 to their memory, and the christening of feasts and societies with
 their names--all these things are but so many ringing cash payments by
 means of which the Culture-Philistine discharges his indebtedness to
 them, so that in all other respects he may be rid of them, and, above
 all, not bound to follow in their wake and prosecute his search
 further. For henceforth inquiry is to cease: that is the Philistine
 watchword.
 
 This watchword once had some meaning. In Germany, during the first
 decade of the nineteenth century, for instance, when the heyday and
 confusion of seeking, experimenting, destroying, promising, surmising,
 and hoping was sweeping in currents and cross-currents over the land,
 the thinking middle-classes were right in their concern for their own
 security. It was then quite right of them to dismiss from their minds
 with a shrug of their shoulders the omnium gatherum of fantastic and
 language-maiming philosophies, and of rabid special-pleading
 historical studies, the carnival of all gods and myths, and the
 poetical affectations and fooleries which a drunken spirit may be
 responsible for. In this respect they were quite right; for the
 Philistine has not even the privilege of licence. With the cunning
 proper to base natures, however, he availed himself of the
 opportunity, in order to throw suspicion even upon the seeking spirit,
 and to invite people to join in the more comfortable pastime of
 finding. His eye opened to the joy of Philistinism; he saved himself
 from wild experimenting by clinging to the idyllic, and opposed the
 restless creative spirit that animates the artist, by means of a
 certain smug ease--the ease of self-conscious narrowness,
 tranquillity, and self-sufficiency. His tapering finger pointed,
 without any affectation of modesty, to all the hidden and intimate
 incidents of his life, to the many touching and ingenuous joys which
 sprang into existence in the wretched depths of his uncultivated
 existence, and which modestly blossomed forth on the bog-land of
 Philistinism.
 
 There were, naturally, a few gifted narrators who, with a nice touch,
 drew vivid pictures of the happiness, the prosaic simplicity, the
 bucolic robustness, and all the well-being which floods the quarters
 of children, scholars, and peasants. With picture-books of this class
 in their hands, these smug ones now once and for all sought to escape
 from the yoke of these dubious classics and the command which they
 contained--to seek further and to find. They only started the notion
 of an epigone-age in order to secure peace for themselves, and to be
 able to reject all the efforts of disturbing innovators summarily as
 the work of epigones. With the view of ensuring their own
 tranquillity, these smug ones even appropriated history, and sought to
 transform all sciences that threatened to disturb their wretched ease
 into branches of history--more particularly philosophy and classical
 philology. Through historical consciousness, they saved themselves
 from enthusiasm; for, in opposition to Goethe, it was maintained that
 history would no longer kindle enthusiasm. No, in their desire to
 acquire an historical grasp of everything, stultification became the
 sole aim of these philosophical admirers of "nil admirari." While
 professing to hate every form of fanaticism and intolerance, what they
 really hated, at bottom, was the dominating genius and the tyranny of
 the real claims of culture. They therefore concentrated and utilised
 all their forces in those quarters where a fresh and vigorous movement
 was to be expected, and then paralysed, stupefied, and tore it to
 shreds. In this way, a philosophy which veiled the Philistine
 confessions of its founder beneath neat twists and flourishes of
 language proceeded further to discover a formula for the canonisation
 of the commonplace. It expatiated upon the rationalism of all reality,
 and thus ingratiated itself with the Culture-Philistine, who also
 loves neat twists and flourishes, and who, above all, considers
 himself real, and regards his reality as the standard of reason for
 the world. From this time forward he began to allow every one, and
 even himself, to reflect, to investigate, to astheticise, and, more
 particularly, to make poetry, rnusic, and even pictures--not to
 mention systems philosophy; provided, of course, that everything were
 done according to the old pattern, and that no assault were made upon
 the "reasonable" and the "real"--that is to say, upon the Philistine.
 The latter really does not at all mind giving himself up, from time to
 time, to the delightful and daring transgressions of art or of
 sceptical historical studies, and he does not underestimate the charm
 of such recreations and entertainments; but he strictly separates "the
 earnestness of life" (under which term he understands his calling, his
 business, and his wife and child) from such trivialities, and among
 the latter he includes all things which have any relation to culture.
 Therefore, woe to the art that takes itself seriously, that has a
 notion of what it may exact, and that dares to endanger his income,
 his business, and his habits! Upon such an art he turns his back, as
 though it were something dissolute; and, affecting the attitude of a.
 guardian of chastity, he cautions every unprotected virtue on no
 account to look.
 
 Being such an adept at cautioning people, he is always grateful to any
 artist who heeds him and listens to caution. He then assures his
 protege that things are to be made more easy for him; that, as a
 kindred spirit, he will no longer be expected to make sublime
 masterpieces, but that his work must be one of two kinds--either the
 imitation of reality to the point of simian mimicry, in idylls or
 gentle and humorous satires, or the free copying of the best-known and
 most famous classical works, albeit with shamefast concessions to the
 taste of the age. For, although he may only be able to appreciate
 slavish copying or accurate portraiture of the present, still he knows
 that the latter will but glorify him, and increase the well-being of
 "reality"; while the former, far from doing him any harm, rather helps
 to establish his reputation as a classical judge of taste, and is not
 otherwise troublesome; for he has, once and for all, come to terms
 with the classics. Finally, he discovers the general and effective
 formula "Health" for his habits, methods of observation, judgments,
 and the objects of his patronage; while he dismisses the importunate
 disturber of the peace with the epithets "hysterical" and "morbid." It
 is thus that David Strauss--a genuine example of the satisfait in
 regard to our scholastic institutions, and a typical Philistine--it is
 thus that he speaks of "the philosophy of Schopenhauer" as being
 "thoroughly intellectual, yet often unhealthy and unprofitable." It is
 indeed a deplorable fact that intellect should show such a decided
 preference for the "unhealthy" and the "unprofitable"; and even the
 Philistine, if he be true to himself, will admit that, in regard to
 the philosophies which men of his stamp produce, he is conscious of a
 frequent lack of intellectuality, although of course they are always
 thoroughly healthy and profitable.
 
 Now and again, the Philistines, provided they are by themselves,
 indulge in a bottle of wine, and then they grow reminiscent, and speak
 of the great deeds of the war, honestly and ingenuously. On such
 occasions it often happens that a great deal comes to light which
 would otherwise have been most stead-fastly concealed, and one of them
 may even be heard to blurt out the most precious secrets of the whole
 brotherhood. Indeed, a lapse of this sort occurred but a short while
 ago, to a well-known aesthete of the Hegelian school of reasoning. It
 must, however, be admitted that the provocation thereto was of an
 unusual character. A company of Philistines were feasting together, in
 celebration of the memory of a genuine anti-Philistine--one who,
 moreover, had been, in the strictest sense of the words, wrecked by
 Philistinism. This man was Holderlin, and the afore-mentioned aesthete
 was therefore justified, under the circumstances, in speaking of the
 tragic souls who had foundered on "reality"--reality being understood,
 here, to mean Philistine reason. But the "reality" is now different,
 and it might well be asked whether Holderlin would be able to find his
 way at all in the present great age. "I doubt," says Dr. Vischer,
 "whether his delicate soul could have borne all the roughness which is
 inseparable from war, and whether it had survived the amount of
 perversity which, since the war, we now see flourishing in every
 quarter. Perhaps he would have succumbed to despair. His was one of
 the unarmed souls; he was the Werther of Greece, a hopeless lover; his
 life was full of softness and yearning, but there was strength and
 substance in his will, and in his style, greatness, riches and life;
 here and there it is even reminiscent of AEschylus. His spirit,
 however, lacked hardness. He lacked the weapon humour; he could not
 grant that one may be a Philistine and still be no barbarian." Not the
 sugary condolence of the post-prandial speaker, but this last sentence
 concerns us. Yes, it is admitted that one is a Philistine; but, a
 barbarian?--No, not at any price! Unfortunately, poor Holderlin could
 not make such flne distinctions. If one reads the reverse of
 civilisation, or perhaps sea-pirating, or cannibalism, into the word
 "barbarian," then the distinction is justifiable enough. But what the
 aesthete obviously wishes to prove to us is, that we may be
 Philistines and at the same time men of culture. Therein lies the
 humour which poor Holderlin lacked and the need of which ultimately
 wrecked him.[7]*
 
 [Footnote * : Nietzsche's allusion to Holderlin here is full of tragic
 significance; for, like Holderlin, he too was ultimately wrecked and
 driven insane by the Philistinism of his age. --Translator's note.]
 
 On this occasion a second admission was made by the speaker: "It is
 not always strength of will, but weakness, which makes us superior to
 those tragic souls which are so passionately responsive to the
 attractions of beauty," or words to this effect. And this was said in
 the name of the assembled "We"; that is to say, the "superiors," the
 "superiors through weakness." Let us content ourselves with these
 admissions. We are now in possession of information concerning two
 matters from one of the initiated: first, that these "We" stand beyond
 the passion for beauty; secondly, that their position was reached by
 means of weakness. In less confidential moments, however, it was just
 this weakness which masqueraded in the guise of a much more beautiful
 name: it was the famous "healthiness" of the Culture-Philistine. In
 view of this very recent restatement of the case, however, it would be
 as well not to speak of them any longer as the "healthy ones," but as
 the "weakly," or, still better, as the "feeble." Oh, if only these
 feeble ones were not in power! How is it that they concern themselves
 at all about what we call them! They are the rulers, and he is a poor
 ruler who cannot endure to be called by a nickname. Yes, if one only
 have power, one soon learns to poke fun--even at oneself. It cannot
 matter so very much, therefore, even if one do give oneself away; for
 what could not the purple mantle of triumph conceal? The strength of
 the Culture-Philistine steps into the broad light of day when he
 acknowledges his weakness; and the more he acknowledges it-- the more
 cynically he acknowledges it--the more completely he betrays his
 consciousness of his own importance and superiority. We are living in
 a period of cynical Philistine confessions. Just as Friedrich Vischer
 gave us his in a word, so has David Strauss handed us his in a book;
 and both that word and that book are cynical.
 
                                  III.
 
 Concerning Culture-Philistinism, David Strauss makes a double
 confession, by word and by deed; that is to say, by the word of the
 confessor, and the act of the writer. His book entitled The Old Faith
 and the New is, first in regard to its contents, and secondly in
 regard to its being a book and a literary production, an uninterrupted
 confession; while, in the very fact that he allows himself to write
 confessions at all about his faith, there already lies a confession.
 Presumably, every one seems to have the right to compile an
 autobiography after his fortieth year; for the humblest amongst us may
 have experienced things, and may have seen them at such close
 quarters, that the recording of them may prove of use and value to the
 thinker. But to write a confession of one's faith cannot but be
 regarded as a thousand times more pretentious, since it takes for
 granted that the writer attaches worth, not only to the experiences
 and investigations of his life, but also to his beliefs. Now, what the
 nice thinker will require to know, above all else, is the kind of
 faith which happens to be compatible with natures of the Straussian
 order, and what it is they have "half dreamily conjured up" (p. 10)
 concerning matters of which those alone have the right to speak who
 are acquainted with them at first hand. Whoever would have desired to
 possess the confessions, say, of a Ranke or a Mommsen? And these men
 were scholars and historians of a very different stamp from David
 Strauss. If, however, they had ever ventured to interest us in their
 faith instead of in their scientific investigations, we should have
 felt that they were overstepping their limits in a most irritating
 fashion. Yet Strauss does this when he discusses his faith. Nobody
 wants to know anything about it, save, perhaps, a few bigoted
 opponents of the Straussian doctrines, who, suspecting, as they do, a
 substratum of satanic principles beneath these doctrines, hope that he
 may compromise his learned utterances by revealing the nature of those
 principles. These clumsy creatures may, perhaps, have found what they
 sought in the last book; but we, who had no occasion to suspect a
 satanic substratum, discovered nothing of the sort, and would have
 felt rather pleased than not had we been able to discern even a dash
 of the diabolical in any part of the volume. But surely no evil spirit
 could speak as Strauss speaks of his new faith. In fact, spirit in
 general seems to be altogether foreign to the book-- more particularly
 the spirit of genius. Only those whom Strauss designates as his "We,"
 speak as he does, and then, when they expatiate upon their faith to
 us, they bore us even more than when they relate their dreams; be they
 "scholars, artists, military men, civil employes, merchants, or landed
 proprietors; come they in their thousands, and not the worst people in
 the land either!" If they do not wish to remain the peaceful ones in
 town or county, but threaten to wax noisy, then let not the din of
 their unisono deceive us concerning the poverty and vulgarity of the
 melody they sing. How can it dispose us more favourably towards a
 profession of faith to hear that it is approved by a crowd, when it is
 of such an order that if any individual of that crowd attempted to
 make it known to us, we should not only fail to hear him out, but
 should interrupt him with a yawn? If thou sharest such a belief, we
 should say unto him, in Heaven's name, keep it to thyself! Maybe, in
 the past, some few harmless types looked for the thinker in David
 Strauss; now they have discovered the "believer" in him, and are
 disappointed. Had he kept silent, he would have remained, for these,
 at least, the philosopher; whereas, now, no one regards him as such.
 He no longer craved the honours of the thinker, however; all he wanted
 to be was a new believer, and he is proud of his new belief. In making
 a written declaration of it, he fancied he was writing the catechism
 of "modern thought," and building the "broad highway of the world's
 future." Indeed, our Philistines have ceased to be faint-hearted and
 bashful, and have acquired almost cynical assurance. There was a time,
 long, long ago, when the Philistine was only tolerated as something
 that did not speak, and about which no one spoke; then a period ensued
 during which his roughness was smoothed, during which he was found
 amusing, and people talked about him. Under this treatment he
 gradually became a prig, rejoiced with all his heart over his rough
 places and his wrongheaded and candid singularities, and began to
 talk, on his own account, after the style of Riehl's music for the
 home.
 
 "But what do I see? Is it a shadow? Is it reality? How long and broad
 my poodle grows!"
 
 For now he is already rolling like a hippopotamus along "the broad
 highway of the world's future," and his growling and barking have
 become transformed into the proud incantations of a religious founder.
 And is it your own sweet wish, Great Master, to found the religion of
 the future? "The times seem to us not yet ripe (p. 7). It does not
 occur to us to wish to destroy a church." But why not, Great Master?
 One but needs the ability. Besides, to speak quite openly in the
 latter, you yourself are convinced that you Possess this ability. Look
 at the last page of your book. There you actually state, forsooth,
 that your new way "alone is the future highway of the world, which now
 only requires partial completion, and especially general use, in order
 also to become easy and pleasant."
 
 Make no further denials, then. The religious founder is unmasked, the
 convenient and agreeable highway leading to the Straussian Paradise is
 built. It is only the coach in which you wish to convey us that does
 not altogether satisfy you, unpretentious man that you are! You tell
 us in your concluding remarks: "Nor will I pretend that the coach to
 which my esteemed readers have been obliged to trust themselves with
 me fulfils every requirement,... all through one is much jolted" (p.
 438). Ah! you are casting about for a compliment, you gallant old
 religious founder! But let us be straightforward with you. If your
 reader so regulates the perusal of the 368 pages of your religious
 catechism as to read only one page a day--that is to say, if he take
 it in the smallest possible doses-then, perhaps, we should be able to
 believe that he might suffer some evil effect from the book--if only
 as the outcome of his vexation when the results he expected fail to
 make themselves felt. Gulped down more heartily, however, and as much
 as possible being taken at each draught, according to the prescription
 to be recommended in the case of all modern books, the drink can work
 no mischief; and, after taking it, the reader will not necessarily be
 either out of sorts or out of temper, but rather merry and
 well-disposed, as though nothing had happened; as though no religion
 had been assailed, no world's highway been built, and no profession of
 faith been made. And I do indeed call this a result! The doctor, the
 drug, and the disease--everything forgotten! And the joyous laughter!
 The continual provocation to hilarity! You are to be envied, Sir; for
 you have founded the most attractive of all religions --one whose
 followers do honour to its founder by laughing at him.
 
                                  IV.
 
 The Philistine as founder of the religion of the future--that is the
 new belief in its most emphatic form of expression. The Philistine
 becomes a dreamer--that is the unheard-of occurrence which
 distinguishes the German nation of to-day. But for the present, in any
 case, let us maintain an attitude of caution towards this fantastic
 exaltation. For does not David Strauss himself advise us to exercise
 such caution, in the following profound passage, the general tone of
 which leads us to think of the Founder of Christianity rather than of
 our particular author? (p. 92): "We know there have been noble
 enthusiasts--enthusiasts of genius; the influence of an enthusiast can
 rouse, exalt, and produce prolonged historic effects; but we do not
 wish to choose him as the guide of our life. He will be sure to
 mislead us, if we do not subject his influence to the control of
 reason." But we know something more: we know that there are
 enthusiasts who are not intellectual, who do not rouse or exalt, and
 who, nevertheless, not only expect to be the guides of our lives, but,
 as such, to exercise a very lasting historical influence into the
 bargain, and to rule the future;--all the more reason why we should
 place their influence under the control of reason. Lichtenberg even
 said: "There are enthusiasts quite devoid of ability, and these are
 really dangerous people." In the first place, as regards the
 above-mentioned control of reason, we should like to have candid
 answers to the three following questions: First, how does the new
 believer picture his heaven? Secondly, how far does the courage lent
 him by the new faith extend? And, thirdly, how does he write his
 books? Strauss the Confessor must answer the first and second
 questions; Strauss the Writer must answer the third.
 
 The heaven of the new believer must, perforce, be a heaven upon earth;
 for the Christian "prospect of an immortal life in heaven," together
 with the other consolations, "must irretrievably vanish" for him who
 has but "one foot" on the Straussian platform. The way in which a
 religion represents its heaven is significant, and if it be true that
 Christianity knows no other heavenly occupations than singing and
 making music, the prospect of the Philistine,  la Strauss, is truly
 not a very comforting one. In the book of confessions, however, there
 is a page which treats of Paradise (p. 342). Happiest of Philistines,
 unroll this parchment scroll before anything else, and the whole of
 heaven will seem to clamber down to thee! "We would but indicate how
 we act, how we have acted these many years. Besides our
 profession--for we are members of the most various professions, and by
 no means exclusively consist of scholars or artists, but of military
 men and civil employes, of merchants and landed proprietors;... and
 again, as I have said already, there are not a few of us, but many
 thousands, and not the worst people in the country;--besides our
 profession, then, I say, we are eagerly accessible to all the higher
 interests of humanity; we have taken a vivid interest, during late
 years, and each after his manner has participated in the great
 national war, and the reconstruction of the German State; and we have
 been profoundly exalted by the turn events have taken, as unexpected
 as glorious, for our much tried nation. To the end of forming just
 conclusions in these things, we study history, which has now been made
 easy, even to the unlearned, by a series of attractively and popularly
 written works; at the same time, we endeavour to enlarge our knowledge
 of the natural sciences, where also there is no lack of sources of
 information; and lastly, in the writings of our great poets, in the
 performances of our great musicians, we find a stimulus for the
 intellect and heart, for wit and imagination, which leaves nothing to
 be desired. Thus we live, and hold on our way in joy."
 
 "Here is our man!" cries the Philistine exultingly, who reads this:
 "for this is exactly how we live; it is indeed our daily life."[8]*
 And how perfectly he understands the euphemism! When, for example, he
 refers to the historical studies by means of which we help ourselves
 in forming just conclusions regarding the political situation, what
 can he be thinking of, if it be not our newspaper-reading? When he
 speaks of the active part we take in the reconstruction of the German
 State, he surely has only our daily visits to the beer-garden in his
 mind; and is not a walk in the Zoological Gardens implied by 'the
 sources of information through which we endeavour to enlarge our
 knowledge of the natural sciences'? Finally, the theatres and
 concert-halls are referred to as places from which we take home 'a
 stimulus for wit and imagination which leaves nothing to be
 desired.'--With what dignity and wit he describes even the most
 suspicious of our doings! Here indeed is our man; for his heaven is
 our heaven!"
 
 [Footnote * : This alludes to a German student-song.]
 
 Thus cries the Philistine; and if we are not quite so satisfied as he,
 it is merely owing to the fact that we wanted to know more. Scaliger
 used to say: "What does it matter to us whether Montaigne drank red or
 white wine?" But, in this more important case, how greatly ought we to
 value definite particulars of this sort! If we could but learn how
 many pipes the Philistine smokes daily, according to the prescriptions
 of the new faith, and whether it is the Spener or the National Gazette
 that appeals to him over his coffee! But our curiosity is not
 satisfied. With regard to one point only do we receive more exhaustive
 information, and fortunately this point relates to the heaven in
 heaven--the private little art-rooms which will be consecrated to the
 use of great poets and musicians, and to which the Philistine will go
 to edify himself; in which, moreover, according to his own showing, he
 will even get "all his stains removed and wiped away" (p. 433); so
 that we are led to regard these private little art-rooms as a kind of
 bath-rooms. "But this is only effected for some fleeting moments; it
 happens and counts only in the realms of phantasy; as soon as we
 return to rude reality, and the cramping confines of actual life, we
 are again on all sides assailed by the old cares,"--thus our Master
 sighs. Let us, however, avail ourselves of the fleeting moments during
 which we remain in those little rooms; there is just sufficient time
 to get a glimpse of the apotheosis of the Philistine-- that is to say,
 the Philistine whose stains have been removed and wiped away, and who
 is now an absolutely pure sample of his type. In truth, the
 opportunity we have here may prove instructive: let no one who happens
 to have fallen a victim to the confession-book lay it aside before
 having read the two appendices, "Of our Great Poets" and "Of our Great
 Musicians." Here the rainbow of the new brotherhood is set, and he who
 can find no pleasure in it "for such an one there is no help," as
 Strauss says on another occasion; and, as he might well say here, "he
 is not yet ripe for our point of view." For are we not in the heaven
 of heavens? The enthusiastic explorer undertakes to lead us about, and
 begs us to excuse him if, in the excess of his joy at all the beauties
 to be seen, he should by any chance be tempted to talk too much. "If I
 should, perhaps, become more garrulous than may seem warranted in this
 place, let the reader be indulgent to me; for out of the abundance of
 the heart the mouth speaketh. Let him only be assured that what he is
 now about to read does not consist of older materials, which I take
 the opportunity of inserting here, but that these remarks have been
 written for their present place and purpose" (pp. 345-46). This
 confession surprises us somewhat for the moment. What can it matter to
 us whether or not the little chapters were freshly written? As if it
 were a matter of writing! Between ourselves, I should have been glad
 if they had been written a quarter of a century earlier; then, at
 least, I should have understood why the thoughts seem to be so
 bleached, and why they are so redolent of resuscitated antiquities.
 But that a thing should have been written in 1872 and already smell of
 decay in 1872 strikes me as suspicious. Let us imagine some one's
 falling asleep while reading these chapters--what would he most
 probably dream about? A friend answered this question for me, because
 he happened to have had the experience himself. He dreamt of a
 wax-work show. The classical writers stood there, elegantly
 represented in wax and beads. Their arms and eyes moved, and a screw
 inside them creaked an accompaniment to their movements. He saw
 something gruesome among them--a misshapen figure, decked with tapes
 and jaundiced paper, out of whose mouth a ticket hung, on which
 "Lessing" was written. My friend went close up to it and learned the
 worst: it was the Homeric Chimera; in front it was Strauss, behind it
 was Gervinus, and in the middle Chimera. The tout-ensemble was
 Lessing. This discovery caused him to shriek with terror: he waked,
 and read no more. In sooth, Great Master, why have you written such
 fusty little chapters?
 
 We do, indeed, learn something new from them; for instance, that
 Gervinus made it known to the world how and why Goethe was no dramatic
 genius; that, in the second part of Faust, he had only produced a
 world of phantoms and of symbols; that Wallenstein is a Macbeth as
 well as a Hamlet; that the Straussian reader extracts the short
 stories out of the Wanderjahre "much as naughty children pick the
 raisins and almonds out of a tough plum-cake"; that no complete effect
 can be produced on the stage without the forcible element, and that
 Schiller emerged from Kant as from a cold-water cure. All this is
 certainly new and striking; but, even so, it does not strike us with
 wonder, and so sure as it is new, it will never grow old, for it never
 was young; it was senile at birth. What extraordinary ideas seem to
 occur to these Blessed Ones, after the New Style, in their aesthetic
 heaven! And why can they not manage to forget a few of them, more
 particularly when they are of that unaesthetic, earthly, and ephemeral
 order to which the scholarly thoughts of Gervinus belong, and when
 they so obviously bear the stamp of puerility? But it almost seems as
 though the modest greatness of a Strauss and the vain insignificance
 of a Gervinus were only too well able to harmonise: then long live all
 those Blessed Ones! may we, the rejected, also live long, if this
 unchallenged judge of art continues any longer to teach his borrowed
 enthusiasm, and the gallop of that hired steed of which the honest
 Grillparzer speaks with such delightful clearness, until the whole of
 heaven rings beneath the hoof of that galumphing enthusiasm. Then, at
 least, things will be livelier and noisier than they are at the
 present moment, in which the carpet-slippered rapture of our heavenly
 leader and the lukewarm eloquence of his lips only succeed in the end
 in making us sick and tired. I should like to know how a Hallelujah
 sung by Strauss would sound: I believe one would have to listen very
 carefully, lest it should seem no more than a courteous apology or a
 lisped compliment. Apropos of this, I might adduce an instructive and
 somewhat forbidding example. Strauss strongly resented the action of
 one of his opponents who happened to refer to his reverence for
 Lessing. The unfortunate man had misunderstood;--true, Strauss did
 declare that one must be of a very obtuse mind not to recognise that
 the simple words of paragraph 86 come from the writer's heart. Now, I
 do not question this warmth in the very least; on the contrary, the
 fact that Strauss fosters these feelings towards Lessing has always
 excited my suspicion; I find the same warmth for Lessing raised almost
 to heat in Gervinus--yea, on the whole, no great German writer is so
 popular among little German writers as Lessing is; but for all that,
 they deserve no thanks for their predilection; for what is it, in
 sooth, that they praise in Lessing? At one moment it is his
 catholicity-- the fact that he was critic and poet, archaeologist and
 philosopher, dramatist and theologian. Anon, "it is the unity in him
 of the writer and the man, of the head and the heart." The last
 quality, as a rule, is just as characteristic of the great writer as
 of the little one; as a rule, a narrow head agrees only too fatally
 with a narrow heart. And as to the catholicity; this is no
 distinction, more especially when, as in Lessing's case, it was a dire
 necessity. What astonishes one in regard to Lessing-enthusiasts is
 rather that they have no conception of the devouring necessity which
 drove him on through life and to this catholicity; no feeling for the
 fact that such a man is too prone to consume himself rapidly, like a
 flame; nor any indignation at the thought that the vulgar narrowness
 and pusillanimity of his whole environment, especially of his learned
 contemporaries, so saddened, tormented, and stifled the tender and
 ardent creature that he was, that the very universality for which he
 is praised should give rise to feelings of the deepest compassion.
 "Have pity on the exceptional man!" Goethe cries to us; "for it was
 his lot to live in such a wretched age that his life was one long
 polemical effort." How can ye, my worthy Philistines, think of Lessing
 without shame? He who was ruined precisely on account of your
 stupidity, while struggling with your ludicrous fetiches and idols,
 with the defects of your theatres, scholars, and theologists, without
 once daring to attempt that eternal flight for which he had been born.
 And what are your feelings when ye think of Winckelman, who, in order
 to turn his eyes from your grotesque puerilities, went begging to the
 Jesuits for help, and whose ignominious conversion dishonours not him,
 but you? Dare ye mention Schiller's name without blushing? Look at his
 portrait. See the flashing eyes that glance contemptuously over your
 heads, the deadly red cheek--do these things mean nothing to you? In
 him ye had such a magnificent and divine toy that ye shattered it.
 Suppose, for a moment, it had been possible to deprive this harassed
 and hunted life of Goethe's friendship, ye would then have been
 reponsible for its still earlier end. Ye have had no finger in any one
 of the life-works of your great geniuses, and yet ye would make a
 dogma to the effect that no one is to be helped in the future. But for
 every one of them, ye were "the resistance of the obtuse world," which
 Goethe calls by its name in his epilogue to the Bell; for all of them
 ye were the grumbling imbeciles, or the envious bigots, or the
 malicious egoists: in spite of you each of them created his works,
 against you each directed his attacks, and thanks to you each
 prematurely sank, while his work was still unfinished, broken and
 bewildered by the stress of the battle. And now ye presume that ye are
 going to be permitted, tamquam re bene gesta, to praise such men! and
 with words which leave no one in any doubt as to whom ye have in your
 minds when ye utter your encomiums, which therefore "spring forth with
 such hearty warmth" that one must be blind not to see to whom ye are
 really bowing. Even Goethe in his day had to cry: "Upon my honour, we
 are in need of a Lessing, and woe unto all vain masters and to the
 whole aesthetic kingdom of heaven, when the young tiger, whose
 restless strength will be visible in his every distended muscle and
 his every glance, shall sally forth to seek his prey!"
 
                                   V.
 
 How clever it was of my friend to read no further, once he had been
 enlightened (thanks to that chimerical vision) concerning the
 Straussian Lessing and Strauss himself. We, however, read on further,
 and even craved admission of the Doorkeeper of the New Faith to the
 sanctum of music. The Master threw the door open for us, accompanied
 us, and began quoting certain names, until, at last, overcome with
 mistrust, we stood still and looked at him. Was it possible that we
 were the victims of the same hallucination as that to which our friend
 had been subjected in his dream? The musicians to whom Strauss
 referred seemed to us to be wrongly designated as long as he spoke
 about them, and we began to think that the talk must certainly be
 about somebody else, even admitting that it did not relate to
 incongruous phantoms. When, for instance, he mentioned Haydn with that
 same warmth which made us so suspicious when he praised Lessing, and
 when he posed as the epopt and priest of a mysterious Haydn cult;
 when, in a discussion upon quartette-music, if you please, he even
 likened Haydn to a "good unpretending soup" and Beethoven to
 "sweetmeats" (p. 432); then, to our minds, one thing, and one thing
 alone, became certain--namely, that his Sweetmeat-Beethoven is not our
 Beethoven, and his Soup-Haydn is not our Haydn. The Master was
 moreover of the opinion that our orchestra is too good to perform
 Haydn, and that only the most unpretentious amateurs can do justice to
 that music--a further proof that he was referring to some other artist
 and some other work, possibly to Riehl's music for the home.
 
 But whoever can this Sweetmeat-Beethoven of Strauss's be? He is said
 to have composed nine symphonies, of which the Pastoral is "the least
 remarkable"; we are told that "each time in composing the third, he
 seemed impelled to exceed his bounds, and depart on an adventurous
 quest," from which we might infer that we are here concerned with a
 sort of double monster, half horse and half cavalier. With regard to a
 certain Eroica, this Centaur is very hard pressed, because he did not
 succeed in making it clear "whether it is a question of a conflict on
 the open field or in the deep heart of man." In the Pastoral there is
 said to be "a furiously raging storm," for which it is "almost too
 insignificant" to interrupt a dance of country-folk, and which, owing
 to "its arbitrary connection with a trivial motive," as Strauss so
 adroitly and correctly puts it, renders this symphony "the least
 remarkable." A more drastic expression appears to have occurred to the
 Master; but he prefers to speak here, as he says, "with becoming
 modesty." But no, for once our Master is wrong; in this case he is
 really a little too modest. Who, indeed, will enlighten us concerning
 this Sweetmeat-Beethoven, if not Strauss himself--the only person who
 seems to know anything about him? But, immediately below, a strong
 judgment is uttered with becoming non-modesty, and precisely in regard
 to the Ninth Symphony. It is said, for instance, that this symphony
 "is naturally the favourite of a prevalent taste, which in art, and
 music especially, mistakes the grotesque for the genial, and the
 formless for the sublime" (p. 428). It is true that a critic as severe
 as Gervinus was gave this work a hearty welcome, because it happened
 to confirm one of his doctrines; but Strauss is "far from going to
 these problematic productions" in search of the merits of his
 Beethoven. "It is a pity," cries our Master, with a convulsive sigh,
 "that one is compelled, by such reservations, to mar one's enjoyment
 of Beethoven, as well as the admiration gladly accorded to him." For
 our Master is a favourite of the Graces, and these have informed him
 that they only accompanied Beethoven part of the way, and that he then
 lost sight of them. "This is a defect," he cries, "but can you believe
 that it may also appear as an advantage?" "He who is painfully and
 breathlessly rolling the musical idea along will seem to be moving the
 weightier one, and thus appear to be the stronger" (pp. 423-24). This
 is a confession, and not necessarily one concerning Beethoven alone,
 but concerning "the classical prose-writer" himself. He, the
 celebrated author, is not abandoned by the Graces. From the play of
 airy jests--that is to say, Straussian jests-- to the heights of
 solemn earnestness--that is to say, Straussian earnestness--they
 remain stolidly at his elbow. He, the classical prose-writer, slides
 his burden along playfully and with a light heart, whereas Beethoven
 rolls his painfully and breathlessly. He seems merely to dandle his
 load; this is indeed an advantage. But would anybody believe that it
 might equally be a sign of something wanting? In any case, only those
 could believe this who mistake the grotesque for the genial, and the
 formless for the sublime--is not that so, you dandling favourite of
 the Graces? We envy no one the edifying moments he may have, either in
 the stillness of his little private room or in a new heaven specially
 fitted out for him; but of all possible pleasures of this order, that
 of Strauss's is surely one of the most wonderful, for he is even
 edified by a little holocaust. He calmly throws the sublimest works of
 the German nation into the flames, in order to cense his idols with
 their smoke. Suppose, for a moment, that by some accident, the Eroica,
 the Pastoral, and the Ninth Symphony had fallen into the hands of our
 priest of the Graces, and that it had been in his power to suppress
 such problematic productions, in order to keep the image of the Master
 pure, who doubts but what he would have burned them? And it is
 precisely in this way that the Strausses of our time demean
 themselves: they only wish to know so much of an artist as is
 compatible with the service of their rooms; they know only the
 extremes-- censing or burning. To all this they are heartily welcome;
 the one surprising feature of the whole case is that public opinion,
 in matters artistic, should be so feeble, vacillating, and corruptible
 as contentedly to allow these exhibitions of indigent Philistinism to
 go by without raising an objection; yea, that it does not even possess
 sufficient sense of humour to feel tickled at the sight of an
 unaesthetic little master's sitting in judgment upon Beethoven. As to
 Mozart, what Aristotle says of Plato ought really to be applied here:
 "Insignificant people ought not to be permitted even to praise him."
 In this respect, however, all shame has vanished--from the public as
 well as from the Master's mind: he is allowed, not merely to cross
 himself before the greatest and purest creations of German genius, as
 though he had perceived something godless and immoral in them, but
 people actually rejoice over his candid confessions and admission of
 sins--more particularly as he makes no mention of his own, but only of
 those which great men are said to have committed. Oh, if only our
 Master be in the right! his readers sometimes think, when attacked by
 a paroxysm of doubt; he himself, however, stands there, smiling and
 convinced, perorating, condemning, blessing, raising his hat to
 himself, and is at any minute capable of saying what the Duchesse
 Delaforte said to Madame de Stal, to wit: "My dear, I must confess
 that I find no one but myself invariably right."
 
                                  VI.
 
 A corpse is a pleasant thought for a worm, and a worm is a dreadful
 thought for every living creature. Worms fancy their kingdom of heaven
 in a fat body; professors of philosophy seek theirs in rummaging among
 Schopenhauer's entrails, and as long as rodents exist, there will
 exist a heaven for rodents. In this, we have the answer to our first
 question: How does the believer in the new faith picture his heaven?
 The Straussian Philistine harbours in the works of our great poets and
 musicians like a parasitic worm whose life is destruction, whose
 admiration is devouring, and whose worship is digesting.
 
 Now, however, our second question must be answered: How far does the
 courage lent to its adherents by this new faith extend? Even this
 question would already have been answered, if courage and
 pretentiousness had been one; for then Strauss would not be lacking
 even in the just and veritable courage of a Mameluke. At all events,
 the "becoming modesty" of which Strauss speaks in the above-mentioned
 passage, where he is referring to Beethoven, can only be a stylistic
 and not a moral manner of speech. Strauss has his full share of the
 temerity to which every successful hero assumes the right: all flowers
 grow only for him--the conqueror; and he praises the sun because it
 shines in at his window just at the right time. He does not even spare
 the venerable old universe in his eulogies--as though it were only now
 and henceforward sufficiently sanctified by praise to revolve around
 the central monad David Strauss. The universe, he is happy to inform
 us, is, it is true, a machine with jagged iron wheels, stamping and
 hammering ponderously, but: "We do not only find the revolution of
 pitiless wheels in our world-machine, but also the shedding of
 soothing oil" (p. 435). The universe, provided it submit to Strauss's
 encomiums, is not likely to overflow with gratitude towards this
 master of weird metaphors, who was unable to discover better similes
 in its praise. But what is the oil called which trickles down upon the
 hammers and stampers? And how would it console a workman who chanced
 to get one of his limbs caught in the mechanism to know that this oil
 was trickling over him? Passing over this simile as bad, let us turn
 our attention to another of Strauss's artifices, whereby he tries to
 ascertain how he feels disposed towards the universe; this question of
 Marguerite's, "He loves me--loves me not--loves me?" hanging on his
 lips the while. Now, although Strauss is not telling flower-petals or
 the buttons on his waistcoat, still what he does is not less harmless,
 despite the fact that it needs perhaps a little more courage. Strauss
 wishes to make certain whether his feeling for the "All" is either
 paralysed or withered, and he pricks himself; for he knows that one
 can prick a limb that is either paralysed or withered without causing
 any pain. As a matter of fact, he does not really prick himself, but
 selects another more violent method, which he describes thus: "We open
 Schopenhauer, who takes every occasion of slapping our idea in the
 face" (p. 167). Now, as an idea--even that of Strauss's concerning the
 universe--has no face, if there be any face in the question at all it
 must be that of the idealist, and the procedure may be subdivided into
 the following separate actions:--Strauss, in any case, throws
 Schopenhauer open, whereupon the latter slaps Strauss in the face.
 Strauss then reacts religiously; that is to say, he again begins to
 belabour Schopenhauer, to abuse him, to speak of absurdities,
 blasphemies, dissipations, and even to allege that Schopenhauer could
 not have been in his right senses. Result of the dispute: "We demand
 the same piety for our Cosmos that the devout of old demanded for his
 God"; or, briefly, "He loves me." Our favourite of the Graces makes
 his life a hard one, but he is as brave as a Mameluke, and fears
 neither the Devil nor Schopenhauer. How much "soothing oil" must he
 use if such incidents are of frequent occurrence!
 
 On the other hand, we readily understand Strauss's gratitude to this
 tickling, pricking, and slapping Schopenhauer; hence we are not so
 very much surprised when we find him expressing himself in the
 following kind way about him: "We need only turn over the leaves of
 Arthur Schopenhauer's works (although we shall on many other accounts
 do well not only to glance over but to study them), etc." (p. 166).
 Now, to whom does this captain of Philistines address these words? To
 him who has clearly never even studied Schopenhauer, the latter might
 well have retorted, "This is an author who does not even deserve to be
 scanned, much less to be studied." Obviously, he gulped Schopenhauer
 down "the wrong way," and this hoarse coughing is merely his attempt
 to clear his throat. But, in order to fill the measure of his
 ingenuous encomiums, Strauss even arrogates to himself the right of
 commending old Kant: he speaks of the latter's General History of the
 Heavens of the Year 1755 as of "a work which has always appeared to me
 not less important than his later Critique of Pure Reason. If in the
 latter we admire the depth of insight, the breadth of observation
 strikes us in the former. If in the latter we can trace the old man's
 anxiety to secure even a limited possession of knowledge--so it be but
 on a firm basis--in the former we encounter the mature man, full of
 the daring of the discoverer and conqueror in the realm of thought."
 This judgment of Strauss's concerning Kant did not strike me as being
 more modest than the one concerning Schopenhauer. In the one case, we
 have the little captain, who is above all anxious to express even the
 most insignificant opinion with certainty, and in the other we have
 the famous prose-writer, who, with all the courage of ignorance,
 exudes his eulogistic secretions over Kant. It is almost incredible
 that Strauss availed himself of nothing in Kant's Critique of Pure
 Reason while compiling his Testament of modern ideas, and that he knew
 only how to appeal to the coarsest realistic taste must also be
 numbered among the more striking characteristics of this new gospel,
 the which professes to be but the result of the laborious and
 continuous study of history and science, and therefore tacitly
 repudiates all connection with philosophy. For the Philistine captain
 and his "We," Kantian philosophy does not exist. He does not dream of
 the fundamental antinomy of idealism and of the highly relative sense
 of all science and reason. And it is precisely reason that ought to
 tell him how little it is possible to know of things in themselves. It
 is true, however, that people of a certain age cannot possibly
 understand Kant, especially when, in their youth, they understood or
 fancied they understood that "gigantic mind," Hegel, as Strauss did;
 and had moreover concerned themselves with Schleiermacher, who,
 according to Strauss, "was gifted with perhaps too much acumen." It
 will sound odd to our author when I tell him that, even now, he stands
 absolutely dependent upon Hegel and Schleiermacher, and that his
 teaching of the Cosmos, his way of regarding things sub specie
 biennii, his salaams to the state of affairs now existing in Germany,
 and, above all, his shameless Philistine optimism, can only be
 explained by an appeal to certain impressions of youth, early habits,
 and disorders; for he who has once sickened on Hegel and
 Schleiermacher never completely recovers.
 
 There is one passage in the confession-book where the incurable
 optimism referred to above bursts forth with the full joyousness of
 holiday spirits (pp. 166-67). "If the universe is a thing which had
 better not have existed," says Strauss, "then surely the speculation
 of the philosopher, as forming part of this universe, is a speculation
 which had better not have speculated. The pessimist philosopher fails
 to perceive that he, above all, declares his own thought, which
 declares the world to be bad, as bad also; but if the thought which
 declares the world to be bad is a bad thought, then it follows
 naturally that the world is good. As a rule, optimism may take things
 too easily. Schopenhauer's references to the colossal part which
 sorrow and evil play in the world are quite in their right place as a
 counterpoise; but every true philosophy is necessarily optimistic, as
 otherwise she hews down the branch on which she herself is sitting."
 If this refutation of Schopenhauer is not the same as that to which
 Strauss refers somewhere else as "the refutation loudly and jubilantly
 acclaimed in higher spheres," then I quite fail to understand the
 dramatic phraseology used by him elsewhere to strike an opponent. Here
 optimism has for once intentionally simplified her task. But the
 master-stroke lay in thus pretending that the refutation of
 Schopenhauer was not such a very difficult task after all, and in
 playfully wielding the burden in such a manner that the three Graces
 attendant on the dandling optimist might constantly be delighted by
 his methods. The whole purpose of the deed was to demonstrate this one
 truth, that it is quite unnecessary to take a pessimist seriously; the
 most vapid sophisms become justified, provided they show that, in
 regard to a philosophy as "unhealthy and unprofitable" as
 Schopenhauer's, not proofs but quips and sallies alone are suitable.
 While perusing such passages, the reader will grasp the full meaning
 of Schopenhauer's solemn utterance to the effect that, where optimism
 is not merely the idle prattle of those beneath whose flat brows words
 and only words are stored, it seemed to him not merely an absurd but a
 vicious attitude of mind, and one full of scornful irony towards the
 indescribable sufferings of humanity. When a philosopher like Strauss
 is able to frame it into a system, it becomes more than a vicious
 attitude of mind--it is then an imbecile gospel of comfort for the "I"
 or for the "We," and can only provoke indignation.
 
 Who could read the following psychological avowal, for instance,
 without indignation, seeing that it is obviously but an offshoot from
 this vicious gospel of comfort?--"Beethoven remarked that he could
 never have composed a text like Figaro or Don Juan. Life had not been
 so profuse of its snubs to him that he could treat it so gaily, or
 deal so lightly with the foibles of men" (p. 430). In order, however,
 to adduce the most striking instance of this dissolute vulgarity of
 sentiment, let it suffice, here, to observe that Strauss knows no
 other means of accounting for the terribly serious negative instinct
 and the movement of ascetic sanctification which characterised the
 first century of the Christian era, than by supposing the existence of
 a previous period of surfeit in the matter of all kinds of sexual
 indulgence, which of itself brought about a state of revulsion and
 disgust.
 
 "The Persians call it bidamag buden, The Germans say
 'Katzenjammer.'"[9]*
 
 [Footnote * : Remorse for the previous night's excesses.--Translator's
 note.]
 
 Strauss quotes this himself, and is not ashamed. As for us, we turn
 aside for a moment, that we may overcome our loathing.
 
                                  VII.
 
 As a matter of fact, our Philistine captain is brave, even audacious,
 in words; particularly when he hopes by such bravery to delight his
 noble colleagues--the "We," as he calls them. So the asceticism and
 self-denial of the ancient anchorite and saint was merely a form of
 Katzenjammer? Jesus may be described as an enthusiast who nowadays
 would scarcely have escaped the madhouse, and the story of the
 Resurrection may be termed a "world-wide deception." For once we will
 allow these views to pass without raising any objection, seeing that
 they may help us to gauge the amount of courage which our "classical
 Philistine" Strauss is capable of. Let us first hear his confession:
 "It is certainly an unpleasant and a thankless task to tell the world
 those truths which it is least desirous of hearing. It prefers, in
 fact, to manage its affairs on a profuse scale, receiving and spending
 after the magnificent fashion of the great, as long as there is
 anything left; should any person, however, add up the various items of
 its liabilities, and anxiously call its attention to the sum-total, he
 is certain to be regarded as an importunate meddler. And yet this has
 always been the bent of my moral and intellectual nature." A moral and
 intellectual nature of this sort might possibly be regarded as
 courageous; but what still remains to be proved is, whether this
 courage is natural and inborn, or whether it is not rather acquired
 and artificial. Perhaps Strauss only accustomed himself by degrees to
 the rle of an importunate meddler, until he gradually acquired the
 courage of his calling. Innate cowardice, which is the Philistine's
 birthright, would not be incompatible with this mode of development,
 and it is precisely this cowardice which is perceptible in the want of
 logic of those sentences of Strauss's which it needed courage to
 pronounce. They sound like thunder, but they do not clear the air. No
 aggressive action is performed: aggressive words alone are used, and
 these he selects from among the most insulting he can find. He
 moreover exhausts all his accumulated strength and energy in coarse
 and noisy expression, and when once his utterances have died away he
 is more of a coward even than he who has always held his tongue. The
 very shadow of his deeds--his morality--shows us that he is a
 word-hero, and that he avoids everything which might induce him to
 transfer his energies from mere verbosity to really serious things.
 With admirable frankness, he announces that he is no longer a
 Christian, but disclaims all idea of wishing to disturb the
 contentment of any one: he seems to recognise a contradiction in the
 notion of abolishing one society by instituting another--whereas there
 is nothing contradictory in it at all. With a certain rude
 self-satisfaction, he swathes himself in the hirsute garment of our
 Simian genealogists, and extols Darwin as one of mankind's greatest
 benefactors; but our perplexity is great when we find him constructing
 his ethics quite independently of the question, "What is our
 conception of the universe?" In this department he had an opportunity
 of exhibiting native pluck; for he ought to have turned his back on
 his "We," and have established a moral code for life out of bellum
 omnium contra omnes and the privileges of the strong. But it is to be
 feared that such a code could only have emanated from a bold spirit
 like that of Hobbes', and must have taken its root in a love of truth
 quite different from that which was only able to vent itself in
 explosive outbursts against parsons, miracles, and the "world-wide
 humbug" of the Resurrection. For, whereas the Philistine remained on
 Strauss's side in regard to these explosive outbursts, he would have
 been against him had he been confronted with a genuine and seriously
 constructed ethical system, based upon Darwin's teaching.
 
 Says Strauss: "I should say that all moral action arises from the
 individual's acting in consonance with the idea of kind" (p. 274). Put
 quite clearly and comprehensively, this means: "Live as a man, and not
 as an ape or a seal." Unfortunately, this imperative is both useless
 and feeble; for in the class Man what a multitude of different types
 are included--to mention only the Patagonian and the Master, Strauss;
 and no one would ever dare to say with any right, "Live like a
 Patagonian," and "Live like the Master Strauss"! Should any one,
 however, make it his rule to live like a genius--that is to say, like
 the ideal type of the genus Man--and should he perchance at the same
 time be either a Patagonian or Strauss himself, what should we then
 not have to suffer from the importunities of genius-mad eccentrics
 (concerning whose mushroom growth in Germany even Lichtenberg had
 already spoken), who with savage cries would compel us to listen to
 the confession of their most recent belief! Strauss has not yet
 learned that no "idea" can ever make man better or more moral, and
 that the preaching of a morality is as easy as the establishment of it
 is difficult. His business ought rather to have been, to take the
 phenomena of human goodness, such--for instance--as pity, love, and
 self-abnegation, which are already to hand, and seriously to explain
 them and show their relation to his Darwinian first principle. But no;
 he preferred to soar into the imperative, and thus escape the task of
 explaining. But even in his flight he was irresponsible enough to soar
 beyond the very first principles of which we speak.
 
 "Ever remember," says Strauss, "that thou art human, not merely a
 natural production; ever remember that all others are human also, and,
 with all individual differences, the same as thou, having the same
 needs and claims as thyself: this is the sum and the substance of
 morality" (p. 277). But where does this imperative hail from? How can
 it be intuitive in man, seeing that, according to Darwin, man is
 indeed a creature of nature, and that his ascent to his present stage
 of development has been conditioned by quite different laws--by the
 very fact that be was continually forgetting that others were
 constituted like him and shared the same rights with him; by the very
 fact that he regarded himself as the stronger, and thus brought about
 the gradual suppression of weaker types. Though Strauss is bound to
 admit that no two creatures have ever been quite alike, and that the
 ascent of man from the lowest species of animals to the exalted height
 of the Culture--Philistine depended upon the law of individual
 distinctness, he still sees no difficulty in declaring exactly the
 reverse in his law: "Behave thyself as though there were no such
 things as individual distinctions." Where is the Strauss-Darwin
 morality here? Whither, above all, has the courage gone?
 
 In the very next paragraph we find further evidence tending to show us
 the point at which this courage veers round to its opposite; for
 Strauss continues: "Ever remember that thou, and all that thou
 beholdest within and around thee, all that befalls thee and others, is
 no disjointed fragment, no wild chaos of atoms or casualties, but
 that, following eternal law, it springs from the one primal source of
 all life, all reason, and all good: this is the essence of religion"
 (pp. 277-78). Out of that "one primal source," however, all ruin and
 irrationality, all evil flows as well, and its name, according to
 Strauss, is Cosmos.
 
 Now, how can this Cosmos, with all the contradictions and the
 self-annihilating characteristics which Strauss gives it, be worthy of
 religious veneration and be addressed by the name "God," as Strauss
 addresses it?--"Our God does not, indeed, take us into His arms from
 the outside (here one expects, as an antithesis, a somewhat miraculous
 process of being "taken into His arms from the inside"), but He
 unseals the well-springs of consolation within our own bosoms. He
 shows us that although Chance would be an unreasonable ruler, yet
 necessity, or the enchainment of causes in the world, is Reason
 itself." (A misapprehension of which only the "We" can fail to
 perceive the folly; because they were brought up in the Hegelian
 worship of Reality as the Reasonable--that is to say, in the
 canonisation of success.) "He teaches us to perceive that to demand an
 exception in the accomplishment of a single natural law would be to
 demand the destruction of the universe" (pp. 435-36). On the contrary,
 Great Master: an honest natural scientist believes in the
 unconditional rule of natural laws in the world, without, however,
 taking up any position in regard to the ethical or intellectual value
 of these laws. Wherever neutrality is abandoned in this respect, it is
 owing to an anthropomorphic attitude of mind which allows reason to
 exceed its proper bounds. But it is just at the point where the
 natural scientist resigns that Strauss, to put it in his own words,
 "reacts religiously," and leaves the scientific and scholarly
 standpoint in order to proceed along less honest lines of his own.
 Without any further warrant, he assumes that all that has happened
 possesses the highest intellectual value; that it was therefore
 absolutely reasonably and intentionally so arranged, and that it even
 contained a revelation of eternal goodness. He therefore has to appeal
 to a complete cosmodicy, and finds himself at a disadvantage in regard
 to him who is contented with a theodicy, and who, for instance,
 regards the whole of man's existence as a punishment for sin or a
 process of purification. At this stage, and in this embarrassing
 position, Strauss even suggests a metaphysical hypothesis--the driest
 and most palsied ever conceived--and, in reality, but an unconscious
 parody of one of Lessing's sayings. We read on page 255: "And that
 other saying of Lessing's-- 'If God, holding truth in His right hand,
 and in His left only the ever-living desire for it, although on
 condition of perpetual error, left him the choice of the two, he
 would, considering that truth belongs to God alone, humbly seize His
 left hand, and beg its contents for Himself'-- this saying of
 Lessing's has always been accounted one of the most magnificent which
 he has left us. It has been found to contain the general expression of
 his restless love of inquiry and activity. The saying has always made
 a special impression upon me; because, behind its subjective meaning,
 I still seemed to hear the faint ring of an objective one of infinite
 import. For does it not contain the best possible answer to the rude
 speech of Schopenhauer, respecting the ill-advised God who had nothing
 better to do than to transform Himself into this miserable world? if,
 for example, the Creator Himself had shared Lessing's conviction of
 the superiority of struggle to tranquil possession?" What!--a God who
 would choose perpetual error, together with a striving after truth,
 and who would, perhaps, fall humbly at Strauss's feet and cry to
 him,"Take thou all Truth, it is thine!"? If ever a God and a man were
 ill-advised, they are this Straussian God, whose hobby is to err and
 to fail, and this Straussian man, who must atone for this erring and
 failing. Here, indeed, one hears "a faint ring of infinite import";
 here flows Strauss's cosmic soothing oil; here one has a notion of the
 rationale of all becoming and all natural laws. Really? Is not our
 universe rather the work of an inferior being, as Lichtenberg
 suggests?--of an inferior being who did not quite understand his
 business; therefore an experiment, an attempt, upon which work is
 still proceeding? Strauss himself, then, would be compelled to admit
 that our universe is by no means the theatre of reason, but of error,
 and that no conformity to law can contain anything consoling, since
 all laws have been promulgated by an erratic God who even finds
 pleasure in blundering. It really is a most amusing spectacle to watch
 Strauss as a metaphysical architect, building castles in the air. But
 for whose benefit is this entertainment given? For the smug and noble
 "We," that they may not lose conceit with themselves: they may
 possibly have taken sudden fright, in the midst of the inflexible and
 pitiless wheel-works of the world-machine, and are tremulously
 imploring their leader to come to their aid. That is why Strauss pours
 forth the "soothing oil," that is why he leads forth on a leash a God
 whose passion it is to err; it is for the same reason, too, that he
 assumes for once the utterly unsuitable rle of a metaphysical
 architect. He does all this, because the noble souls already referred
 to are frightened, and because he is too. And it is here that we reach
 the limit of his courage, even in the presence of his "We." He does
 not dare to be honest, and to tell them, for instance: "I have
 liberated you from a helping and pitiful God: the Cosmos is no more
 than an inflexible machine; beware of its wheels, that they do not
 crush you." He dare not do this. Consequently, he must enlist the help
 of a witch, and he turns to metaphysics. To the Philistine, however,
 even Strauss's metaphysics is preferable to Christianity's, and the
 notion of an erratic God more congenial than that of one who works
 miracles. For the Philistine himself errs, but has never yet performed
 a miracle. Hence his hatred of the genius; for the latter is justly
 famous for the working of miracles. It is therefore highly instructive
 to ascertain why Strauss, in one passage alone, suddenly takes up the
 cudgels for genius and the aristocracy of intellect in general.
 Whatever does he do it for? He does it out of fear--fear of the social
 democrat. He refers to Bismarck and Moltke, "whose greatness is the
 less open to controversy as it manifests itself in the domain of
 tangible external facts. No help for it, therefore; even the most
 stiff-necked and obdurate of these fellows must condescend to look up
 a little, if only to get a sight, be it no farther than the knees, of
 those august figures" (p.327). Do you, Master Metaphysician, perhaps
 intend to instruct the social democrats in the art of getting kicks?
 The willingness to bestow them may be met with everywhere, and you are
 perfectly justified in promising to those who happen to be kicked a
 sight of those sublime beings as far as the knee. "Also in the domain
 of art and science," Strauss continues, "there will never be a dearth
 of kings whose architectural undertakings will find employment for a
 multitude of carters." Granted; but what if the carters should begin
 building? It does happen at times, Great Master, as you know, and then
 the kings must grin and bear it.
 
 As a matter of fact, this union of impudence and weakness, of daring
 words and cowardly concessions, this cautious deliberation as to which
 sentences will or will not impress the Philistine or smooth him down
 the right way, this lack of character and power masquerading as
 character and power, this meagre wisdom in the guise of
 omniscience,--these are the features in this book which I detest. If I
 could conceive of young men having patience to read it and to value
 it, I should sorrowfully renounce all hope for their future. And is
 this confession of wretched, hopeless, and really despicable
 Philistinism supposed to be the expression of the thousands
 constituting the "We" of whom Strauss speaks, and who are to be the
 fathers of the coming generation? Unto him who would fain help this
 coming generation to acquire what the present one does not yet
 possess, namely, a genuine German culture, the prospect is a horrible
 one. To such a man, the ground seems strewn with ashes, and all stars
 are obscured; while every withered tree and field laid waste seems to
 cry to him: Barren! Forsaken! Springtime is no longer possible here!
 He must feel as young Goethe felt when he first peered into the
 melancholy atheistic twilight of the Systme de la Nature; to him this
 book seemed so grey, so Cimmerian and deadly, that he could only
 endure its presence with difficulty, and shuddered at it as one
 shudders at a spectre.
 
                                 VIII.
 
 We ought now to be sufficiently informed concerning the heaven and the
 courage of our new believer to be able to turn to the last question:
 How does he write his books? and of what order are his religious
 documents?
 
 He who can answer this question uprightly and without prejudice will
 be confronted by yet another serious problem, and that is: How this
 Straussian pocket-oracle of the German Philistine was able to pass
 through six editions? And he will grow more than ever suspicious when
 he hears that it was actually welcomed as a pocket-oracle, not only in
 scholastic circles, but even in German universities as well. Students
 are said to have greeted it as a canon for strong intellects, and,
 from all accounts, the professors raised no objections to this view;
 while here and there people have declared it to be a religions book
 for scholars. Strauss himself gave out that he did not intend his
 profession of faith to be merely a reference-book for learned and
 cultured people; but here let us abide by the fact that it was first
 and foremost a work appealing to his colleagues, and was ostensibly a
 mirror in which they were to see their own way of living faithfully
 reflected. For therein lay the feat. The Master feigned to have
 presented us with a new ideal conception of the universe, and now
 adulation is being paid him out of every mouth; because each is in a
 position to suppose that he too regards the universe and life in the
 same way. Thus Strauss has seen fulfilled in each of his readers what
 he only demanded of the future. In this way, the extraordinary success
 of his book is partly explained: "Thus we live and hold on our way in
 joy," the scholar cries in his book, and delights to see others
 rejoicing over the announcement. If the reader happen to think
 differently from the Master in regard to Darwin or to capital
 punishment, it is of very little consequence; for he is too conscious
 throughout of breathing an atmosphere that is familiar to him, and of
 hearing but the echoes of his own voice and wants. However painfully
 this unanimity may strike the true friend of German culture, it is his
 duty to be unrelenting in his explanation of it as a phenomenon, and
 not to shrink from making this explanation public.
 
 We all know the peculiar methods adopted in our own time of
 cultivating the sciences: we all know them, because they form a part
 of our lives. And, for this very reason, scarcely anybody seems to ask
 himself what the result of such a cultivation of the sciences will
 mean to culture in general, even supposing that everywhere the highest
 abilities and the most earnest will be available for the promotion of
 culture. In the heart of the average scientific type (quite
 irrespective of the examples thereof with which we meet to-day) there
 lies a pure paradox: he behaves like the veriest idler of independent
 means, to whom life is not a dreadful and serious business, but a
 sound piece of property, settled upon him for all eternity; and it
 seems to him justifiable to spend his whole life in answering
 questions which, after all is said and done, can only be of interest
 to that person who believes in eternal life as an absolute certainty.
 The heir of but a few hours, he sees himself encompassed by yawning
 abysses, terrible to behold; and every step he takes should recall the
 questions, Wherefore? Whither? and Whence? to his mind. But his soul
 rather warms to his work, and, be this the counting of a floweret's
 petals or the breaking of stones by the roadside, he spends his whole
 fund of interest, pleasure, strength, and aspirations upon it. This
 paradox--the scientific man--has lately dashed ahead at such a frantic
 speed in Germany, that one would almost think the scientific world
 were a factory, in which every minute wasted meant a fine. To-day the
 man of science works as arduously as the fourth or slave caste: his
 study has ceased to be an occupation, it is a necessity; he looks
 neither to the right nor to the left, but rushes through all
 things--even through the serious matters which life bears in its
 train--with that semi-listlessness and repulsive need of rest so
 characteristic of the exhausted labourer. This is also his attitude
 towards culture. He behaves as if life to him were not only otium but
 sine dignitate: even in his sleep he does not throw off the yoke, but
 like an emancipated slave still dreams of his misery, his forced haste
 and his floggings. Our scholars can scarcely be distinguished--and,
 even then, not to their advantage--from agricultural labourers, who in
 order to increase a small patrimony, assiduously strive, day and
 night, to cultivate their fields, drive their ploughs, and urge on
 their oxen. Now, Pascal suggests that men only endeavour to work hard
 at their business and sciences with the view of escaping those
 questions of greatest import which every moment of loneliness or
 leisure presses upon them--the questions relating to the wherefore,
 the whence, and the whither of life. Curiously enough, our scholars
 never think of the most vital question of all--the wherefore of their
 work, their haste, and their painful ecstasies. Surely their object is
 not the earning of bread or the acquiring of posts of honour? No,
 certainly not. But ye take as much pains as the famishing and
 breadless; and, with that eagerness and lack of discernment which
 characterises the starving, ye even snatch the dishes from the
 sideboard of science. If, however, as scientific men, ye proceed with
 science as the labourers with the tasks which the exigencies of life
 impose upon them, what will become of a culture which must await the
 hour of its birth and its salvation in the very midst of all this
 agitated and breathless running to and fro--this sprawling
 scientifically?
 
 For it no one has time--and yet for what shall science have time if
 not for culture? Answer us here, then, at least: whence, whither,
 wherefore all science, if it do not lead to culture? Belike to
 barbarity? And in this direction we already see the scholar caste
 ominously advanced, if we are to believe that such superficial books
 as this one of Strauss's meet the demand of their present degree of
 culture. For precisely in him do we find that repulsive need of rest
 and that incidental semi-listless attention to, and coming to terms
 with, philosophy, culture, and every serious thing on earth. It will
 be remembered that, at the meetings held by scholars, as soon as each
 individual has had his say in his own particular department of
 knowledge, signs of fatigue, of a desire for distraction at any price,
 of waning memory, and of incoherent experiences of life, begin to be
 noticeable. While listening to Strauss discussing any worldly
 question, be it marriage, the war, or capital punishment, we are
 startled by his complete lack of anything like first-hand experience,
 or of any original thought on human nature. All his judgments are so
 redolent of books, yea even of newspapers. Literary reminiscences do
 duty for genuine ideas and views, and the assumption of a moderate and
 grandfatherly tone take the place of wisdom and mature thought. How
 perfectly in keeping all this is with the fulsome spirit animating the
 holders of the highest places in German science in large cities! How
 thoroughly this spirit must appeal to that other! for it is precisely
 in those quarters that culture is in the saddest plight; it is
 precisely there that its fresh growth is made impossible--so
 boisterous are the preparations made by science, so sheepishly are
 favourite subjects of knowledge allowed to oust questions of much
 greater import. What kind of lantern would be needed here, in order to
 find men capable of a complete surrender to genius, and of an intimate
 knowledge of its depths--men possessed of sufficient courage and
 strength to exorcise the demons that have forsaken our age? Viewed
 from the outside, such quarters certainly do appear to possess the
 whole pomp of culture; with their imposing apparatus they resemble
 great arsenals fitted with huge guns and other machinery of war; we
 see preparations in progress and the most strenuous activity, as
 though the heavens themselves were to be stormed, and truth were to be
 drawn out of the deepest of all wells; and yet, in war, the largest
 machines are the most unwieldy. Genuine culture therefore leaves such
 places as these religiously alone, for its best instincts warn it that
 in their midst it has nothing to hope for, and very much to fear. For
 the only kind of culture with which the inflamed eye and obtuse brain
 of the scholar working-classes concern themselves is of that
 Philistine order of which Strauss has announced the gospel. If we
 consider for a moment the fundamental causes underlying the sympathy
 which binds the learned working-classes to Culture-Philistinism, we
 shall discover the road leading to Strauss the Writer, who has been
 acknowledged classical, and tihence to our last and principal theme.
 
 To begin with, that culture has contentment written in its every
 feature, and will allow of no important changes being introduced into
 the present state of German education. It is above all convinced of
 the originality of all German educational institutions, more
 particularly the public schools and universities; it does not cease
 recommending these to foreigners, and never doubts that if the Germans
 have become the most cultivated and discriminating people on earth, it
 is owing to such institutions. Culture-Philistinism believes in
 itself, consequently it also believes in the methods and means at its
 disposal. Secondly, however, it leaves the highest judgment concerning
 all questions of taste and culture to the scholar, and even regards
 itself as the ever-increasing compendium of scholarly opinions
 regarding art, literature, and philosophy. Its first care is to urge
 the scholar to express his opinions; these it proceeds to mix, dilute,
 and systematise, and then it administers them to the German people in
 the form of a bottle of medicine. What conies to life outside this
 circle is either not heard or attended at all, or if heard, is heeded
 half-heartedly; until, at last, a voice (it does not matter whose,
 provided it belong to some one who is strictly typical of the scholar
 tribe) is heard to issue from the temple in which traditional
 infallibility of taste is said to reside; and from that time forward
 public opinion has one conviction more, which it echoes and re-echoes
 hundreds and hundreds of times. As a matter of fact, though, the
 aesthetic infallibility of any utterance emanating from the temple is
 the more doubtful, seeing that the lack of taste, thought, and
 artistic feeling in any scholar can be taken for granted, unless it
 has previously been proved that, in his particular case, the reverse
 is true. And only a few can prove this. For how many who have had a
 share in the breathless and unending scurry of modern science have
 preserved that quiet and courageous gaze of the struggling man of
 culture--if they ever possessed it--that gaze which condemns even the
 scurry we speak of as a barbarous state of affairs? That is why these
 few are forced to live in an almost perpetual contradiction. What
 could they do against the uniform belief of the thousands who have
 enlisted public opinion in their cause, and who mutually defend each
 other in this belief? What purpose can it serve when one individual
 openly declares war against Strauss, seeing that a crowd have decided
 in his favour, and that the masses led by this crowd have learned to
 ask six consecutive times for the Master's Philistine
 sleeping-mixture?
 
 If, without further ado, we here assumed that the Straussian
 confession-book had triumphed over public opinion and had been
 acclaimed and welcomed as conqueror, its author might call our
 attention to the fact that the multitudinous criticisms of his work in
 the various public organs are not of an altogether unanimous or even
 favourable character, and that he therefore felt it incumbent upon him
 to defend himself against some of the more malicious, impudent, and
 provoking of these newspaper pugilists by means of a postscript. How
 can there be a public opinion concerning my book, he cries to us, if
 every journalist is to regard me as an outlaw, and to mishandle me as
 much as he likes? This contradiction is easily explained, as soon as
 one considers the two aspects of the Straussian book--the theological
 and the literary, and it is only the latter that has anything to do
 with German culture. Thanks to its theological colouring, it stands
 beyond the pale of our German culture, and provokes the animosity of
 the various theological groups--yea, even of every individual German,
 in so far as he is a theological sectarian from birth, and only
 invents his own peculiar private belief in order to be able to dissent
 from every other form of belief. But when the question arises of
 talking about Strauss THE WRITER, pray listen to what the theological
 sectarians have to say about him. As soon as his literary side comes
 under notice, all theological objections immediately subside, and the
 dictum comes plain and clear, as if from the lips of one congregation:
 In spite of it all, he is still a classical writer!
 
 Everybody--even the most bigoted, orthodox Churchman--pays the writer
 the most gratifying compliments, while there is always a word or two
 thrown in as a tribute to his almost Lessingesque language, his
 delicacy of touch, or the beauty and accuracy of his aesthetic views.
 As a book, therefore, the Straussian performance appears to meet all
 the demands of an ideal example of its kind. The theological
 opponents, despite the fact that their voices were the loudest of all,
 nevertheless constitute but an infinitesimal portion of the great
 public; and even with regard to them, Strauss still maintains that he
 is right when he says: "Compared with my thousands of readers, a few
 dozen public cavillers form but an insignificant minority, and they
 can hardly prove that they are their faithful interpreters. It was
 obviously in the nature of things that opposition should be clamorous
 and assent tacit." Thus, apart from the angry bitterness which
 Strauss's profession of faith may have provoked here and there, even
 the most fanatical of his opponents, to whom his voice seems to rise
 out of an abyss, like the voice of a beast, are agreed as to his
 merits as a writer; and that is why the treatment which Strauss has
 received at the hands of the literary lackeys of the theological
 groups proves nothing against our contention that Culture-Philistinism
 celebrated its triumph in this book. It must be admitted that the
 average educated Philistine is a degree less honest than Strauss, or
 is at least more reserved in his public utterances. But this fact only
 tends to increase his admiration for honesty in another. At home, or
 in the company of his equals, he may applaud with wild enthusiasm, but
 takes care not to put on paper how entirely Strauss's words are in
 harmony with his own innermost feelings. For, as we have already
 maintained, our Culture-Philistine is somewhat of a coward, even in
 his strongest sympathies; hence Strauss, who can boast of a trifle
 more courage than he, becomes his leader, notwithstanding the fact
 that even Straussian pluck has its very definite limits. If he
 overstepped these limits, as Schopenhauer does in almost every
 sentence, he would then forfeit his position at the head of the
 Philistines, and everybody would flee from him as precipitately as
 they are now following in his wake. He who would regard this artful if
 not sagacious moderation and this mediocre valour as an Aristotelian
 virtue, would certainly be wrong; for the valour in question is not
 the golden mean between two faults, but between a virtue and a
 fault--and in this mean, between virtue and fault, all Philistine
 qualities are to be found.
 
                                  IX.
 
 "In spite of it all, he is still a classical writer." Well, let us
 see! Perhaps we may now be allowed to discuss Strauss the stylist and
 master of language; but in the first place let us inquire whether, as
 a literary man, he is equal to the task of building his house, and
 whether he really understands the architecture of a book. From this
 inquiry we shall be able to conclude whether he is a respectable,
 thoughtful, and experienced author; and even should we be forced to
 answer "No" to these questions, he may still, as a last shift, take
 refuge in his fame as a classical prose-writer. This last-mentioned
 talent alone, it is true, would not suffice to class him with the
 classical authors, but at most with the classical improvisers and
 virtuosos of style, who, however, in regard to power of expression and
 the whole planning and framing of the work, reveal the awkward hand
 and the embarrassed eye of the bungler. We therefore put the question,
 whether Strauss really possesses the artistic strength necessary for
 the purpose of presenting us with a thing that is a whole, totum
 ponere?
 
 As a rule, it ought to be possible to tell from the first rough sketch
 of a work whether the author conceived the thing as a whole, and
 whether, in view of this original conception, he has discovered the
 correct way of proceeding with his task and of fixing its proportions.
 Should this most important Part of the problem be solved, and should
 the framework of the building have been given its most favourable
 proportions, even then there remains enough to be done: how many
 smaller faults have to be corrected, how many gaps require filling in!
 Here and there a temporary partition or floor was found to answer the
 requirements; everywhere dust and fragments litter the ground, and no
 matter where we look, we see the signs of work done and work still to
 be done. The house, as a whole, is still uninhabitable and gloomy, its
 walls are bare, and the wind blows in through the open windows. Now,
 whether this remaining, necessary, and very irksome work has been
 satisfactorily accomplished by Strauss does not concern us at present;
 our question is, whether the building itself has been conceived as a
 whole, and whether its proportions are good? The reverse of this, of
 course, would be a compilation of fragments--a method generally
 adopted by scholars. They rely upon it that these fragments are
 related among themselves, and thus confound the logical and the
 artistic relation between them. Now, the relation between the four
 questions which provide the chapter-headings of Strauss's book cannot
 be called a logical one. Are we still Christians? Have we still a
 religion? What is our conception of the universe? What is our rule of
 life? And it is by no means contended that the relation is illogical
 simply because the third question has nothing to do with the second,
 nor the fourth with the third, nor all three with the first. The
 natural scientist who puts the third question, for instance, shows his
 unsullied love of truth by the simple fact that he tacitly passes over
 the second. And with regard to the subject of the fourth
 chapter--marriage, republicanism, and capital punishment--Strauss
 himself seems to have been aware that they could only have been
 muddled and obscured by being associated with the Darwinian theory
 expounded in the third chapter; for he carefully avoids all reference
 to this theory when discussing them. But the question, "Are we still
 Christians?" destroys the freedom of the philosophical standpoint at
 one stroke, by lending it an unpleasant theological colouring.
 Moreover, in this matter, he quite forgot that the majority of men
 to-day are not Christians at all, but Buddhists. Why should one,
 without further ceremony, immediately think of Christianity at the
 sound of the words "old faith"? Is this a sign that Strauss has never
 ceased to be a Christian theologian, and that he has therefore never
 learned to be a philosopher? For we find still greater cause for
 surprise in the fact that he quite fails to distinguish between belief
 and knowledge, and continually mentions his "new belief" and the still
 newer science in one breath. Or is "new belief" merely an ironical
 concession to ordinary parlance? This almost seems to be the case; for
 here and there he actually allows "new belief" and "newer science" to
 be interchangeable terms, as for instance on page II, where he asks on
 which side, whether on that of the ancient orthodoxy or of modern
 science, "exist more of the obscurities and insufficiencies
 unavoidable in human speculation."
 
 Moreover, according to the scheme laid down in the Introduction, his
 desire is to disclose those proofs upon which the modern view of life
 is based; but he derives all these proofs from science, and in this
 respect assumes far more the attitude of a scientist than of a
 believer.
 
 At bottom, therefore, the religion is not a new belief, but, being of
 a piece with modern science, it has nothing to do with religion at
 all. If Strauss, however, persists in his claims to be religious, the
 grounds for these claims must be beyond the pale of recent science.
 Only the smallest portion of the Straussian book--that is to say, but
 a few isolated pages--refer to what Strauss in all justice might call
 a belief, namely, that feeling for the "All" for which he demands the
 piety that the old believer demanded for his God. On the pages in
 question, however, he cannot claim to be altogether scientific; but if
 only he could lay claim to being a little stronger, more natural, more
 outspoken, more pious, we should be content. Indeed, what perhaps
 strikes us most forcibly about him is the multitude of artificial
 procedures of which he avails himself before he ultimately gets the
 feeling that he still possesses a belief and a religion; he reaches it
 by means of stings and blows, as we have already seen. How indigently
 and feebly this emergency-belief presents itself to us! We shiver at
 the sight of it.
 
 Although Strauss, in the plan laid down in his Introduction, promises
 to compare the two faiths, the old and the new, and to show that the
 latter will answer the same purpose as the former, even he begins to
 feel, in the end, that he has promised too much. For the question
 whether the new belief answers the same purpose as the old, or is
 better or worse, is disposed of incidentally, so to speak, and with
 uncomfortable haste, in two or three pages (p. 436 et seq.-), and is
 actually bolstered up by the following subterfuge: "He who cannot help
 himself in this matter is beyond help, is not yet ripe for our
 standpoint" (p. 436). How differently, and with what intensity of
 conviction, did the ancient Stoic believe in the All and the
 rationality of the All! And, viewed in this light, how does Strauss's
 claim to originality appear? But, as we have already observed, it
 would be a matter of indifference to us whether it were new, old,
 original, or imitated, so that it were only more powerful, more
 healthy, and more natural. Even Strauss himself leaves this
 double-distilled emergency-belief to take care of itself as often as
 he can do so, in order to protect himself and us from danger, and to
 present his recently acquired biological knowledge to his "We" with a
 clear conscience. The more embarrassed he may happen to be when he
 speaks of faith, the rounder and fuller his mouth becomes when he
 quotes the greatest benefactor to modern men-Darwin. Then he not only
 exacts belief for the new Messiah, but also for himself--the new
 apostle. For instance, while discussing one of the most intricate
 questions in natural history, he declares with true ancient pride: "I
 shall be told that I am here speaking of things about which I
 understand nothing. Very well; but others will come who will
 understand them, and who will also have understood me" (p. 241).
 
 According to this, it would almost seem as though the famous "We" were
 not only in duty bound to believe in the "All," but also in the
 naturalist Strauss; in this case we can only hope that in order to
 acquire the feeling for this last belief, other processes are
 requisite than the painful and cruel ones demanded by the first
 belief. Or is it perhaps sufficient in this case that the subject of
 belief himself be tormented and stabbed with the view of bringing the
 believers to that "religious reaction" which is the distinguishing
 sign of the "new faith." What merit should we then discover in the
 piety of those whom Strauss calls "We"?
 
 Otherwise, it is almost to be feared that modern men will pass on in
 pursuit of their business without troubling themselves overmuch
 concerning the new furniture of faith offered them by the apostle:
 just as they have done heretofore, without the doctrine of the
 rationality of the All. The whole of modern biological and historical
 research has nothing to do with the Straussian belief in the All, and
 the fact that the modern Philistine does not require the belief is
 proved by the description of his life given by Strauss in the
 chapter,"What is our Rule of Life?" He is therefore quite right in
 doubting whether the coach to which his esteemed readers have been
 obliged to trust themselves "with him, fulfils every requirement." It
 certainly does not; for the modern man makes more rapid progress when
 he does not take his place in the Straussian coach, or rather, he got
 ahead much more quickly long before the Straussian coach ever existed.
 Now, if it be true that the famous "minority" which is "not to be
 overlooked," and of which, and in whose name, Strauss speaks,
 "attaches great importance to consistency," it must be just as
 dissatisfied with Strauss the Coachbuilder as we are with Strauss the
 Logician.
 
 Let us, however, drop the question of the logician. Perhaps, from the
 artistic point of view, the book really is an example of a.
 well-conceived plan, and does, after all, answer to the requirements
 of the laws of beauty, despite the fact that it fails to meet with the
 demands of a well-conducted argument. And now, having shown that he is
 neither a scientist nor a strictly correct and systematic scholar, for
 the first time we approach the question: Is Strauss a capable writer?
 Perhaps the task he set himself was not so much to scare people away
 from the old faith as to captivate them by a picturesque and graceful
 description of what life would be with the new. If he regarded
 scholars and educated men as his most probable audience, experience
 ought certainly to have told him that whereas one can shoot such men
 down with the heavy guns of scientific proof, but cannot make them
 surrender, they may be got to capitulate all the more quickly before
 "lightly equipped" measures of seduction. "Lightly equipped," and
 "intentionally so," thus Strauss himself speaks of his own book. Nor
 do his public eulogisers refrain from using the same expression in
 reference to the work, as the following passage, quoted from one of
 the least remarkable among them, and in which the same expression is
 merely paraphrased, will go to prove:--
 
 "The discourse flows on with delightful harmony: wherever it directs
 its criticism against old ideas it wields the art of demonstration,
 almost playfully; and it is with some spirit that it prepares the new
 ideas it brings so enticingly, and presents them to the simple as well
 as to the fastidious taste. The arrangement of such diverse and
 conflicting material is well thought out for every portion of it
 required to be touched upon, without being made too prominent; at
 times the transitions leading from one subject to another are
 artistically managed, and one hardly knows what to admire most--the
 skill with which unpleasant questions are shelved, or the discretion
 with which they are hushed up."
 
 The spirit of such eulogies, as the above clearly shows, is not quite
 so subtle in regard to judging of what an author is able to do as in
 regard to what he wishes. What Strauss wishes, however, is best
 revealed by his own emphatic and not quite harmless commendation of
 Voltaire's charms, in whose service he might have learned precisely
 those "lightly equipped" arts of which his admirer speaks--granting,
 of course, that virtue may be acquired and a pedagogue can ever be a
 dancer.
 
 Who could help having a suspicion or two, when reading the following
 passage, for instance, in which Strauss says of Voltaire, "As a
 philosopher [he] is certainly not original, but in the main a mere
 exponent of English investigations: in this respect, however, he shows
 himself to be completely master of his subject, which he presents with
 incomparable skill, in all possible lights and from all possible
 sides, and is able withal to meet the demands of thoroughness,
 without, however, being over-severe in his method"? Now, all the
 negative traits mentioned in this passage might be applied to Strauss.
 No one would contend, I suppose, that Strauss is original, or that he
 is over-severe in his method; but the question is whether we can
 regard him as "master of his subject," and grant him "incomparable
 skill"? The confession to the effect that the treatise was
 intentionally "lightly equipped" leads us to think that it at least
 aimed at incomparable skill.
 
 It was not the dream of our architect to build a temple, nor yet a
 house, but a sort of summer-pavilion, surrounded by everything that
 the art of gardening can provide. Yea, it even seems as if that
 mysterious feeling for the All were only calculated to produce an
 aesthetic effect, to be, so to speak, a view of an irrational element,
 such as the sea, looked at from the most charming and rational of
 terraces. The walk through the first chapters-- that is to say,
 through the theological catacombs with all their gloominess and their
 involved and baroque embellishments--was also no more than an
 aesthetic expedient in order to throw into greater relief the purity,
 clearness, and common sense of the chapter "What is our Conception of
 the Universe?" For, immediately after that walk in the gloaming and
 that peep into the wilderness of Irrationalism, we step into a hall
 with a skylight to it. Soberly and limpidly it welcomes us: its mural
 decorations consist of astronomical charts and mathematical figures;
 it is filled with scientific apparatus, and its cupboards contain
 skeletons, stuffed apes, and anatomical specimens. But now, really
 rejoicing for the first time, we direct our steps into the innermost
 chamber of bliss belonging to our pavilion-dwellers; there we find
 them with their wives, children, and newspapers, occupied in the
 commonplace discussion of politics; we listen for a moment to their
 conversation on marriage, universal suffrage, capital punishment, and
 workmen's strikes, and we can scarcely believe it to be possible that
 the rosary of public opinions can be told off so quickly. At length an
 attempt is made to convince us of the classical taste of the inmates.
 A moment's halt in the library, and the music-room suffices to show us
 what we had expected all along, namely, that the best books lay on the
 shelves, and that the most famous musical compositions were in the
 music-cabinets. Some one actually played something to us, and even if
 it were Haydn's music, Haydn could not be blamed because it sounded
 like Riehl's music for the home. Meanwhile the host had found occasion
 to announce to us his complete agreement with Lessing and Goethe,
 although with the latter only up to the second part of Faust. At last
 our pavilion-owner began to praise himself, and assured us that he who
 could not be happy under his roof was beyond help and could not be
 ripe for his standpoint, whereupon he offered us his coach, but with
 the polite reservation that he could not assert that it would fulfil
 every requirement, and that, owing to the stones on his road having
 been newly laid down, we were not to mind if we were very much jolted.
 Our Epicurean garden-god then took leave of us with the incomparable
 skill which he praised in Voltaire.
 
 Who could now persist in doubting the existence of this incomparable
 skill? The complete master of his subject is revealed; the lightly
 equipped artist-gardener is exposed, and still we hear the voice of
 the classical author saying, "As a writer I shall for once cease to be
 a Philistine: I will not be one; I refuse to be one! But a
 Voltaire--the German Voltaire--or at least the French Lessing."
 
 With this we have betrayed a secret. Our Master does not always know
 which he prefers to be--Voltaire or Lessing; but on no account will he
 be a Philistine. At a pinch he would not object to being both Lessing
 and Voltaire--that the word might be fulfilled that is written, "He
 had no character, but when he wished to appear as if he had, he
 assumed one."
 
                                   X.
 
 If we have understood Strauss the Confessor correctly, he must be a
 genuine Philistine, with a narrow, parched soul and scholarly and
 common-place needs; albeit no one would be more indignant at the title
 than David Strauss the Writer. He would be quite happy to be regarded
 as mischievous, bold, malicious, daring; but his ideal of bliss would
 consist in finding himself compared with either Lessing or
 Voltaire--because these men were undoubtedly anything but Philistines.
 In striving after this state of bliss, he often seems to waver between
 two alternatives--either to mimic the brave and dialectical petulance
 of Lessing, or to affect the manner of the faun-like and free-spirited
 man of antiquity that Voltaire was. When taking up his pen to write,
 he seems to be continually posing for his portrait; and whereas at
 times his features are drawn to look like Lessing's, anon they are
 made to assume the Voltairean mould. While reading his praise of
 Voltaire's manner, we almost seem to see him abjuring the consciences
 of his contemporaries for not having learned long ago what the modern
 Voltaire had to offer them. "Even his excellences are wonderfully
 uniform," he says: "simple naturalness, transparent clearness,
 vivacious mobility, seductive charm. Warmth and emphasis are also not
 wanting where they are needed, and Voltaire's innermost nature always
 revolted against stiltedness and affectation; while, on the other
 hand, if at times wantonness or passion descend to an unpleasantly low
 level, the fault does not rest so much with the stylist as with the
 man." According to this, Strauss seems only too well aware of the
 importance of simplicity in style; it is ever the sign of genius,
 which alone has the privilege to express itself naturally and
 guilelessly. When, therefore, an author selects a simple mode of
 expression, this is no sign whatever of vulgar ambition; for although
 many are aware of what such an author would fain be taken for, they
 are yet kind enough to take him precisely for that. The genial writer,
 however, not only reveals his true nature in the plain and
 unmistakable form of his utterance, but his super-abundant strength
 actually dallies with the material he treats, even when it is
 dangerous and difficult. Nobody treads stiffly along unknown paths,
 especially when these are broken throughout their course by thousands
 of crevices and furrows; but the genius speeds nimbly over them, and,
 leaping with grace and daring, scorns the wistful and timorous step of
 caution.
 
 Even Strauss knows that the problems he prances over are dreadfully
 serious, and have ever been regarded as such by the philosophers who
 have grappled with them; yet he calls his book lightly equipped! But
 of this dreadfulness and of the usual dark nature of our meditations
 when considering such questions as the worth of existence and the
 duties of man, we entirely cease to be conscious when the genial
 Master plays his antics before us, "lightly equipped, and
 intentionally so." Yes, even more lightly equipped than his Rousseau,
 of whom he tells us it was said that he stripped himself below and
 adorned himself on top, whereas Goethe did precisely the reverse.
 Perfectly guileless geniuses do not, it appears, adorn themselves at
 all; possibly the words "lightly equipped" may simply be a euphemism
 for "naked." The few who happen to have seen the Goddess of Truth
 declare that she is naked, and perhaps, in the minds of those who have
 never seen her, but who implicitly believe those few, nakedness or
 light equipment is actually a proof, or at least a feature, of truthi
 Even this vulgar superstition turns to the advantage of the author's
 ambition. Some one sees something naked, and he exclaims: "What if
 this were the truth!" Whereupon he grows more solemn than is his wont.
 By this means, however, the author scores a tremendous advantage; for
 he compels his reader to approach him with greater solemnity than
 another and perhaps more heavily equipped writer. This is
 unquestionably the best way to become a classical author; hence
 Strauss himself is able to tell us: "I even enjoy the unsought honour
 of being, in the opinion of many, a classical writer of prose. "He has
 therefore achieved his aim. Strauss the Genius goes gadding about the
 streets in the garb of lightly equipped goddesses as a classic, while
 Strauss the Philistine, to use an original expression of this
 genius's, must, at all costs, be "declared to be on the decline," or
 "irrevocably dismissed."
 
 But, alas! in spite of all declarations of decline and dismissal, the
 Philistine still returns, and all too frequently. Those features,
 contorted to resemble Lessing and Voltaire, must relax from time to
 time to resume their old and original shape. The mask of genius falls
 from them too often, and the Master's expression is never more sour
 and his movements never stiffer than when he has just attempted to
 take the leap, or to glance with the fiery eye, of a genius. Precisely
 owing to the fact that he is too lightly equipped for our zone, he
 runs the risk of catching cold more often and more severely than
 another. It may seem a terrible hardship to him that every one should
 notice this; but if he wishes to be cured, the following diagnosis of
 his case ought to be publicly presented to him:-- Once upon a time
 there lived a Strauss, a brave, severe, and stoutly equipped scholar,
 with whom we sympathised as wholly as with all those in Germany who
 seek to serve truth with earnestness and energy, and to rule within
 the limits of their powers. He, however, who is now publicly famous as
 David Strauss, is another person. The theologians may be to blame for
 this metamorphosis; but, at any rate, his present toying with the mask
 of genius inspires us with as much hatred and scorn as his former
 earnestness commanded respect and sympathy. When, for instance, he
 tells us, "it would also argue ingratitude towards my genius if I were
 not to rejoice that to the faculty of an incisive, analytical
 criticism was added the innocent pleasure in artistic production," it
 may astonish him to hear that, in spite of this self-praise, there are
 still men who maintain exactly the reverse, and who say, not only that
 he has never possessed the gift of artistic production, but that the
 "innocent" pleasure he mentions is of all things the least innocent,
 seeing that it succeeded in gradually undermining and ultimately
 destroying a nature as strongly and deeply scholarly and critical as
 Strauss's--in fact, the real Straussian Genius. In a moment of
 unlimited frankness, Strauss himself indeed adds: "Merck was always in
 my thoughts, calling out, 'Don't produce such child's play again;
 others can do that too!'" That was the voice of the real Straussian
 genius, which also asked him what the worth of his newest, innocent,
 and lightly equipped modern Philistine's testament was. Others can do
 that too! And many could do it better. And even they who could have
 done it best, i.e. those thinkers who are more widely endowed than
 Strauss, could still only have made nonsense of it.
 
 I take it that you are now beginning to understand the value I set on
 Strauss the Writer. You are beginning to realise that I regard him as
 a mummer who would parade as an artless genius and classical writer.
 When Lichtenberg said, "A simple manner of writing is to be
 recommended, if only in view of the fact that no honest man trims and
 twists his expressions," he was very far from wishing to imply that a
 simple style is a proof of literary integrity. I, for my part, only
 wish that Strauss the Writer had been more upright, for then he would
 have written more becomingly and have been less famous. Or, if he
 would be a mummer at all costs, how much more would he not have
 pleased me if he had been a better mummer--one more able to ape the
 guileless genius and classical author! For it yet remains to be said
 that Strauss was not only an inferior actor but a very worthless
 stylist as well.
 
                                  XI.
 
 Of course, the blame attaching to Strauss for being a bad writer is
 greatly mitigated by the fact that it is extremely difficult in
 Germany to become even a passable or moderately good writer, and that
 it is more the exception than not, to be a really good one. In this
 respect the natural soil is wanting, as are also artistic values and
 the proper method of treating and cultivating oratory. This latter
 accomplishment, as the various branches of it, i.e. drawing-room,
 ecclesiastical and Parliamentary parlance, show, has not yet reached
 the level of a national style; indeed, it has not yet shown even a
 tendency to attain to a style at all, and all forms of language in
 Germany do not yet seem to have passed a certain experimental stage.
 In view of these facts, the writer of to-day, to some extent, lacks an
 authoritative standard, and he is in some measure excused if, in the
 matter of language, he attempts to go ahead of his own accord. As to
 the probable result which the present dilapidated condition of the
 German language will bring about, Schopenhauer, perhaps, has spoken
 most forcibly. "If the existing state of affairs continues," he says,
 "in the year 1900 German classics will cease to be understood, for the
 simple reason that no other language will be known, save the trumpery
 jargon of the noble present, the chief characteristic of which is
 impotence." And, in truth, if one turn to the latest periodicals, one
 will find German philologists and grammarians already giving
 expression to the view that our classics can no longer serve us as
 examples of style, owing to the fact that they constantly use words,
 modes of speech, and syntactic arrangements which are fast dropping
 out of currency. Hence the need of collecting specimens of the finest
 prose that has been produced by our best modern writers, and of
 offering them as examples to be followed, after the style of Sander's
 pocket dictionary of bad language. In this book, that repulsive
 monster of style Gutzkow appears as a classic, and, according to its
 injunctions, we seem to be called upon to accustom ourselves to quite
 a new and wondrous crowd of classical authors, among which the first,
 or one of the first, is David Strauss: he whom we cannot describe more
 aptly than we have already--that is to say, as a worthless stylist.
 Now, the notion which the Culture-Philistine has of a classic and
 standard author speaks eloquently for his pseudo-culture--he who only
 shows his strength by opposing a really artistic and severe style, and
 who, thanks to the persistence of his opposition, finally arrives at a
 certain uniformity of expression, which again almost appears to
 possess unity of genuine style. In view, therefore, of the right which
 is granted to every one to experiment with the language, how is it
 possible at all for individual authors to discover a generally
 agreeable tone? What is so generally interesting in them? In the first
 place, a negative quality--the total lack of offensiveness: but every
 really productive thing is offensive. The greater part of a German's
 daily reading matter is undoubtedly sought either in the pages of
 newspapers, periodicals, or reviews. The language of these journals
 gradually stamps itself on his brain, by means of its steady drip,
 drip, drip of similar phrases and similar words. And, since he
 generally devotes to reading those hours of the day during which his
 exhausted brain is in any case not inclined to offer resistance, his
 ear for his native tongue so slowly but surely accustoms itself to
 this everyday German that it ultimately cannot endure its absence
 without pain. But the manufacturers of these newspapers are, by virtue
 of their trade, most thoroughly inured to the effluvia of this
 journalistic jargon; they have literally lost all taste, and their
 palate is rather gratified than not by the most corrupt and arbitrary
 innovations. Hence the tutti unisono with which, despite the general
 lethargy and sickliness, every fresh solecism is greeted; it is with
 such impudent corruptions of the language that her hirelings are
 avenged against her for the incredible boredom she imposes ever more
 and more upon them. I remember having read "an appeal to the German
 nation," by Berthold Auerbach, in which every sentence was un-German,
 distorted and false, and which, as a whole, resembled a soulless
 mosaic of words cemented together with international syntax. As to the
 disgracefully slipshod German with which Edward Devrient solemnised
 the death of Mendelssohn, I do not even wish to do more than refer to
 it. A grammatical error--and this is the most extraordinary feature of
 the case--does not therefore seem an offence in any sense to our
 Philistine, but a most delightful restorative in the barren wilderness
 of everyday German. He still, however, considers all really productive
 things to be offensive. The wholly bombastic, distorted, and
 threadbare syntax of the modern standard author--yea, even his
 ludicrous neologisms--are not only tolerated, but placed to his credit
 as the spicy element in his works. But woe to the stylist with
 character, who seeks as earnestly and perseveringly to avoid the trite
 phrases of everyday parlance, as the "yester-night monster blooms of
 modern ink-flingers," as Schopenhauer says! When platitudes,
 hackneyed, feeble, and vulgar phrases are the rule, and the bad and
 the corrupt become refreshing exceptions, then all that is strong,
 distinguished, and beautiful perforce acquires an evil odour. From
 which it follows that, in Germany, the well-known experience which
 befell the normally built traveller in the land of hunchbacks is
 constantly being repeated. It will be remembered that he was so
 shamefully insulted there, owing to his quaint figure and lack of
 dorsal convexity, that a priest at last had to harangue the people on
 his behalf as follows: "My brethren, rather pity this poor stranger,
 and present thank-offerings unto the gods, that ye are blessed with
 such attractive gibbosities."
 
 If any one attempted to compose a positive grammar out of the
 international German style of to-day, and wished to trace the
 unwritten and unspoken laws followed by every one, he would get the
 most extraordinary notions of style and rhetoric. He would meet with
 laws which are probably nothing more than reminiscences of bygone
 schooldays, vestiges of impositions for Latin prose, and results
 perhaps of choice readings from French novelists, over whose
 incredible crudeness every decently educated Frenchman would have the
 right to laugh. But no conscientious native of Germany seems to have
 given a thought to these extraordinary notions under the yoke of which
 almost every German lives and writes.
 
 As an example of what I say, we may find an injunction to the effect
 that a metaphor or a simile must be introduced from time to time, and
 that it must be new; but, since to the mind of the shallow-pated
 writer newness and modernity are identical, he proceeds forthwith to
 rack his brain for metaphors in the technical vocabularies of the
 railway, the telegraph, the steamship, and the Stock Exchange, and is
 proudly convinced that such metaphors must be new because they are
 modern. In Strauss's confession-book we find liberal tribute paid to
 modern metaphor. He treats us to a simile, covering a page and a half,
 drawn from modern road-improvement work; a few pages farther back he
 likens the world to a machine, with its wheels, stampers, hammers, and
 "soothing oil" (p. 432); "A repast that begins with champagne" (p.
 384); "Kant is a cold-water cure" (p. 309); "The Swiss constitution is
 to that of England as a watermill is to a steam-engine, as a
 waltz-tune or a song to a fugue or symphony" (p. 301); "In every
 appeal, the sequence of procedure must be observed. Now the mean
 tribunal between the individual and humanity is the nation" (p. 165);
 "If we would know whether there be still any life in an organism which
 appears dead to us, we are wont to test it by a powerful, even painful
 stimulus, as for example a stab" (p. 161); "The religious domain in
 the human soul resembles the domain of the Red Indian in America" (p.
 160); "Virtuosos in piety, in convents"(p. 107); "And place the
 sum-total of the foregoing in round numbers under the account" (p.
 205); "Darwin's theory resembles a railway track that is just marked
 out... where the flags are fluttering joyfully in the breeze." In this
 really highly modern way, Strauss has met the Philistine injunction to
 the effect that a new simile must be introduced from time to time.
 
 Another rhetorical rule is also very widespread, namely, that didactic
 passages should be composed in long periods, and should be drawn out
 into lengthy abstractions, while all persuasive passages should
 consist of short sentences followed by striking contrasts. On page 154
 in Strauss's book we find a standard example of the didactic and
 scholarly style--a passage blown out after the genuine Schleiermacher
 manner, and made to stumble along at a true tortoise pace: "The reason
 why, in the earlier stages of religion, there appear many instead of
 this single Whereon, a plurality of gods instead of the one, is
 explained in this deduction of religion, from the fact that the
 various forces of nature, or relations of life, which inspire man with
 the sentiment of unqualified dependence, still act upon him in the
 commencement with the full force of their distinctive characteristics;
 that he has not as yet become conscious how, in regard to his
 unmitigated dependence upon them, there is no distinction between
 them, and that therefore the Whereon of this dependence, or the Being
 to which it conducts in the last instance, can only be one."
 
 On pages 7 and 8 we find an example of the other kind of style, that
 of the short sentences containing that affected liveliness which so
 excited certain readers that they cannot mention Strauss any more
 without coupling his name with Lessing's. "I am well aware that what I
 propose to delineate in the following pages is known to multitudes as
 well as to myself, to some even much better. A few have already spoken
 out on the subject. Am I therefore to keep silence? I think not. For
 do we not all supply each other's deficiencies? If another is better
 informed as regards some things, I may perhaps be so as regards
 others; while yet others are known and viewed by me in a different
 light. Out with it, then! let my colours be displayed that it may be
 seen whether they are genuine or not.'"
 
 It is true that Strauss's style generally maintains a happy medium
 between this sort of merry quick-march and the other funereal and
 indolent pace; but between two vices one does not invariably find a
 virtue; more often rather only weakness, helpless paralysis, and
 impotence. As a matter of fact, I was very disappointed when I glanced
 through Strauss's book in search of fine and witty passages; for, not
 having found anything praiseworthy in the Confessor, I had actually
 set out with the express purpose of meeting here and there with at
 least some opportunities of praising Strauss the Writer. I sought and
 sought, but my purpose remained unfulfilled. Meanwhile, however,
 another duty seemed to press itself strongly on my mind--that of
 enumerating the solecisms, the strained metaphors, the obscure
 abbreviations, the instances of bad taste, and the distortions which I
 encountered; and these were of such a nature that I dare do no more
 than select a few examples of them from among a collection which is
 too bulky to be given in full. By means of these examples I may
 succeed in showing what it is that inspires, in the hearts of modern
 Germans, such faith in this great and seductive stylist Strauss: I
 refer to his eccentricities of expression, which, in the barren waste
 and dryness of his whole book, jump out at one, not perhaps as
 pleasant but as painfully stimulating, surprises. When perusing such
 passages, we are at least assured, to use a Straussian metaphor, that
 we are not quite dead, but still respond to the test of a stab. For
 the rest of the book is entirely lacking in offensiveness --that
 quality which alone, as we have seen, is productive, and which our
 classical author has himself reckoned among the positive virtues. When
 the educated masses meet with exaggerated dulness and dryness, when
 they are in the presence of really vapid commonplaces, they now seem
 to believe that such things are the signs of health; and in this
 respect the words of the author of the dialogus de oratoribus are very
 much to the point: "illam ipsam quam jactant sanitatem non firmitate
 sed jejunio consequuntur." That is why they so unanimously hate every
 firmitas, because it bears testimony to a kind of health quite
 different from theirs; hence their one wish to throw suspicion upon
 all austerity and terseness, upon all fiery and energetic movement,
 and upon every full and delicate play of muscles. They have conspired
 to twist nature and the names of things completely round, and for the
 future to speak of health only there where we see weakness, and to
 speak of illness and excitability where for our part we see genuine
 vigour. From which it follows that David Strauss is to them a
 classical author.
 
 If only this dulness were of a severely logical order! but simplicity
 and austerity in thought are precisely what these weaklings have lost,
 and in their hands even our language has become illogically tangled.
 As a proof of this, let any one try to translate Strauss's style into
 Latin: in the case of Kant, be it remembered, this is possible, while
 with Schopenhauer it even becomes an agreeable exercise. The reason
 why this test fails with Strauss's German is not owing to the fact
 that it is more Teutonic than theirs, but because his is distorted and
 illogical, whereas theirs is lofty and simple. Moreover, he who knows
 how the ancients exerted themselves in order to learn to write and
 speak correctly, and how the moderns omit to do so, must feel, as
 Schopenhauer says, a positive relief when he can turn from a German
 book like the one under our notice, to dive into those other works,
 those ancient works which seem to him still to be written in a new
 language. "For in these books," says Schopenhauer, "I find a regular
 and fixed language which, throughout, faithfully follows the laws of
 grammar and orthography, so that I can give up my thoughts completely
 to their matter; whereas in German I am constantly being disturbed by
 the author's impudence and his continual attempts to establish his own
 orthographical freaks and absurd ideas-- the swaggering foolery of
 which disgusts me. It is really a painful sight to see a fine old
 language, possessed of classical literature, being botched by asses
 and ignoramuses!"
 
 Thus Schopenhauer's holy anger cries out to us, and you cannot say
 that you have not been warned. He who turns a deaf ear to such
 warnings, and who absolutely refuses to relinquish his faith in
 Strauss the classical author, can only be given this last word of
 advice--to imitate his hero. In any case, try it at your own risk; but
 you will repent it, not only in your style but in your head, that it
 may be fulfilled which was spoken by the Indian prophet, saying, "He
 who gnaweth a cow's horn gnaweth in vain and shorteneth his life; for
 he grindeth away his teeth, yet his belly is empty."
 
                                  XII.
 
 By way of concluding, we shall proceed to give our classical
 prose-writer the promised examples of his style which we have
 collected. Schopenhauer would probably have classed the whole lot as
 "new documents serving to swell the trumpery jargon of the present
 day"; for David Strauss may be comforted to hear (if what follows can
 be regarded as a comfort at all) that everybody now writes as he does;
 some, of course, worse, and that among the blind the one-eyed is king.
 Indeed, we allow him too much when we grant him one eye; but we do
 this willingly, because Strauss does not write so badly as the most
 infamous of all corrupters of German--the Hegelians and their crippled
 offspring. Strauss at least wishes to extricate himself from the mire,
 and he is already partly out of it; still, he is very far from being
 on dry land, and he still shows signs of having stammered Hegel's
 prose in youth. In those days, possibly, something was sprained in
 him, some muscle must have been overstrained. His ear, perhaps, like
 that of a boy brought up amid the beating of drums, grew dull, and
 became incapable of detecting those artistically subtle and yet mighty
 laws of sound, under the guidance of which every writer is content to
 remain who has been strictly trained in the study of good models. But
 in this way, as a stylist, he has lost his most valuable possessions,
 and stands condemned to remain reclining, his life long, on the
 dangerous and barren shifting sand of newspaper style--that is, if he
 do not wish to fall back into the Hegelian mire. Nevertheless, he has
 succeeded in making himself famous for a couple of hours in our time,
 and perhaps in another couple of hours people will remember that he
 was once famous; then, however, night will come, and with her
 oblivion; and already at this moment, while we are entering his sins
 against style in the black book, the sable mantle of twilight is
 falling upon his fame. For he who has sinned against the German
 language has desecrated the mystery of all our Germanity. Throughout
 all the confusion and the changes of races and of customs, the German
 language alone, as though possessed of some supernatural charm, has
 saved herself; and with her own salvation she has wrought that of the
 spirit of Germany. She alone holds the warrant for this spirit in
 future ages, provided she be not destroyed at the sacrilegious hands
 of the modern world. "But Di meliora! Avaunt, ye pachyderms, avaunt!
 This is the German language, by means of which men express themselves,
 and in which great poets have sung and great thinkers have written.
 Hands off!" [10]*
 
 [Footnote * : Translator's note.--Nietzsche here proceeds to quote
 those passages he has culled from The Old and the New Faith with which
 he undertakes to substantiate all he has said relative to Strauss's
 style; as, however, these passages, with his comments upon them, lose
 most of their point when rendered into English, it was thought best to
 omit them altogether.]
 
 To put it in plain words, what we have seen have been feet of clay,
 and what appeared to be of the colour of healthy flesh was only
 applied paint. Of course, Culture-Philistinism in Germany will be very
 angry when it hears its one living God referred to as a series of
 painted idols. He, however, who dares to overthrow its idols will not
 shrink, despite all indignation, from telling it to its face that it
 has forgotten how to distinguish between the quick and the dead, the
 genuine and the counterfeit, the original and the imitation, between a
 God and a host of idols; that it has completely lost the healthy and
 manly instinct for what is real and right. It alone deserves to be
 destroyed; and already the manifestations of its power are sinking;
 already are its purple honours falling from it; but when the purple
 falls, its royal wearer soon follows.
 
 Here I come to the end of my confession of faith. This is the
 confession of an individual; and what can such an one do against a
 whole world, even supposing his voice were heard everywhere! In order
 for the last time to use a precious Straussism, his judgment only
 possesses "that amount of subjective truth which is compatible with a
 complete lack of objective demonstration"--is not that so, my dear
 friends? Meanwhile, be of good cheer. For the time being let the
 matter rest at this "amount which is compatible with a complete lack"!
 For the time being! That is to say, for as long as that is held to be
 out of season which in reality is always in season, and is now more
 than ever pressing; I refer to...speaking the truth.[11]*
 
 [Footnote * : Translator's note.--All quotations from The Old Faith
 and the New which appear in the above translation have either been
 taken bodily out of Mathilde Blind's translation (Asher and Co.,
 1873), or are adaptations from that translation.]
                                _______
 
                      RICHARD WAGNER IN BAYREUTH.
 
                                   I.
 
 FOR an event to be great, two things must be united--the lofty
 sentiment of those who accomplish it, and the lofty sentiment of those
 who witness it. No event is great in itself, even though it be the
 disappearance of whole constellations, the destruction of several
 nations, the establishment of vast empires, or the prosecution of wars
 at the cost of enormous forces: over things of this sort the breath of
 history blows as if they were flocks of wool. But it often happens,
 too, that a man of might strikes a blow which falls without effect
 upon a stubborn stone; a short, sharp report is heard, and all is
 over. History is able to record little or nothing of such abortive
 efforts. Hence the anxiety which every one must feel who, observing
 the approach of an event, wonders whether those about to witness it
 will be worthy of it. This reciprocity between an act and its
 reception is always taken into account when anything great or small is
 to be accomplished; and he who would give anything away must see to it
 that he find recipients who will do justice to the meaning of his
 gift. This is why even the work of a great man is not necessarily
 great when it is short, abortive, or fruitless; for at the moment when
 he performed it he must have failed to perceive that it was really
 necessary; he must have been careless in his aim, and he cannot have
 chosen and fixed upon the time with sufficient caution. Chance thus
 became his master; for there is a very intimate relation between
 greatness and the instinct which discerns the proper moment at which
 to act.
 
 We therefore leave it to those who doubt Wagner's power of discerning
 the proper time for action, to be concerned and anxious as to whether
 what is now taking place in Bayreuth is really opportune and
 necessary. To us who are more confident, it is clear that he believes
 as strongly in the greatness of his feat as in the greatness of
 feeling in those who are to witness it. Be their number great or
 small, therefore, all those who inspire this faith in Wagner should
 feel extremely honoured; for that it was not inspired by everybody, or
 by the whole age, or even by the whole German people, as they are now
 constituted, he himself told us in his dedicatory address of the 22nd
 of May 1872, and not one amongst us could, with any show of
 conviction, assure him of the contrary. "I had only you to turn to,"
 he said, "when I sought those who I thought would be in sympathy with
 my plans,-- you who are the most personal friends of my own particular
 art, my work and activity: only you could I invite to help me in my
 work, that it might be presented pure and whole to those who manifest
 a genuine interest in my art, despite the fact that it has hitherto
 made its appeal to them only in a disfigured and adulterated form."
 
 It is certain that in Bayreuth even the spectator is a spectacle worth
 seeing. If the spirit of some observant sage were to return, after the
 absence of a century, and were to compare the most remarkable
 movements in the present world of culture, he would find much to
 interest him there. Like one swimming in a lake, who encounters a
 current of warm water issuing from a hot spring, in Bayreuth he would
 certainly feel as though he had suddenly plunged into a more temperate
 element, and would tell himself that this must rise out of a distant
 and deeper source: the surrounding mass of water, which at all events
 is more common in origin, does not account for it. In this way, all
 those who assist at the Bayreuth festival will seem like men out of
 season; their raison-d'etre and the forces which would seem to account
 for them are elsewhere, and their home is not in the present age. I
 realise ever more clearly that the scholar, in so far as he is
 entirely the man of his own day, can only be accessible to all that
 Wagner does and thinks by means of parody,--and since everything is
 parodied nowadays, he will even get the event of Bayreuth reproduced
 for him, through the very un-magic lanterns of our facetious
 art-critics. And one ought to be thankful if they stop at parody; for
 by means of it a spirit of aloofness and animosity finds a vent which
 might otherwise hit upon a less desirable mode of expression. Now, the
 observant sage already mentioned could not remain blind to this
 unusual sharpness and tension of contrasts. They who hold by gradual
 development as a kind of moral law must be somewhat shocked at the
 sight of one who, in the course of a single lifetime, succeeds in
 producing something absolutely new. Being dawdlers themselves, and
 insisting upon slowness as a principle, they are very naturally vexed
 by one who strides rapidly ahead, and they wonder how on earth he does
 it. No omens, no periods of transition, and no concessions preceded
 the enterprise at Bayreuth; no one except Wagner knew either the goal
 or the long road that was to lead to it. In the realm of art it
 signifies, so to speak, the first circumnavigation of the world, and
 by this voyage not only was there discovered an apparently new art,
 but Art itself. In view of this, all modern arts, as arts of luxury
 which have degenerated through having been insulated, have become
 almost worthless. And the same applies to the nebulous and
 inconsistent reminiscences of a genuine art, which we as modern
 Europeans derive from the Greeks; let them rest in peace, unless they
 are now able to shine of their own accord in the light of a new
 interpretation. The last hour has come for a good many things; this
 new art is a clairvoyante that sees ruin approaching--not for art
 alone. Her warning voice must strike the whole of our prevailing
 civilisation with terror the instant the laughter which its parodies
 have provoked subsides. Let it laugh and enjoy itself for yet a while
 longer!
 
 And as for us, the disciples of this revived art, we shall have time
 and inclination for thoughtfulness, deep thoughtfulness. All the talk
 and noise about art which has been made by civilisation hitherto must
 seem like shameless obtrusiveness; everything makes silence a duty
 with us--the quinquennial silence of the Pythagoreans. Which of us has
 not soiled his hands and heart in the disgusting idolatry of modern
 culture? Which of us can exist without the waters of purification? Who
 does not hear the voice which cries, "Be silent and cleansed"? Be
 silent and cleansed! Only the merit of being included among those who
 give ear to this voice will grant even us the lofty look necessary to
 view the event at Bayreuth; and only upon this look depends the great
 future of the event.
 
 When on that dismal and cloudy day in May 1872, after the foundation
 stone had been laid on the height of Bayreuth, amid torrents of rain,
 and while Wagner was driving back to the town with a small party of
 us, he was exceptionally silent, and there was that indescribable look
 in his eyes as of one who has turned his gaze deeply inwards. The day
 happened to be the first of his sixtieth year, and his whole past now
 appeared as but a long preparation for this great moment. It is almost
 a recognised fact that in times of exceptional danger, or at all
 decisive and culminating points in their lives, men see the remotest
 and most recent events of their career with singular vividness, and in
 one rapid inward glance obtain a sort of panorama of a whole span of
 years in which every event is faithfully depicted. What, for instance,
 must Alexander the Great have seen in that instant when he caused Asia
 and Europe to be drunk out of the same goblet? But what went through
 Wagner's mind on that day--how he became what he is, and what he will
 be--we only can imagine who are nearest to him, and can follow him, up
 to a certain point, in his self-examination; but through his eyes
 alone is it possible for us to understand his grand work, and by the
 help of this understanding vouch for its fruitfulness.
 
                                  II.
 
 It were strange if what a man did best and most liked to do could not
 be traced in the general outline of his life, and in the case of those
 who are remarkably endowed there is all the more reason for supposing
 that their life will present not only the counterpart of their
 character, as in the case of every one else, but that it will present
 above all the counterpart of their intellect and their most individual
 tastes. The life of the epic poet will have a dash of the Epos in
 it--as from all accounts was the case with Goethe, whom the Germans
 very wrongly regarded only as a lyrist--and the life of the dramatist
 will probably be dramatic.
 
 The dramatic element in Wagner's development cannot be ignored, from
 the time when his ruling passion became self-conscious and took
 possession of his whole being. From that time forward there is an end
 to all groping, straying, and sprouting of offshoots, and over his
 most tortuous deviations and excursions, over the often eccentric
 disposition of his plans, a single law and will are seen to rule, in
 which we have the explanation of his actions, however strange this
 explanation may sometimes appear. There was, however, an ante-dramatic
 period in Wagner's life--his childhood and youth-- which it is
 impossible to approach without discovering innumerable problems. At
 this period there seems to be no promise yet of himself, and what one
 might now, in a retrospect, regard as a pledge for his future
 greatness, amounts to no more than a juxtaposition of traits which
 inspire more dismay than hope; a restless and excitable spirit,
 nervously eager to undertake a hundred things at the same time,
 passionately fond of almost morbidly exalted states of mind, and ready
 at any moment to veer completely round from calm and profound
 meditation to a state of violence and uproar. In his case there were
 no hereditary or family influences at work to constrain him to the
 sedulous study of one particular art. Painting, versifying, acting,
 and music were just as much within his reach as the learning and the
 career of a scholar; and the superficial inquirer into this stage of
 his life might even conclude that he was born to be a dilettante. The
 small world within the bounds of which he grew up was not of the kind
 we should choose to be the home of an artist. He ran the constant risk
 of becoming infected by that dangerously dissipated attitude of mind
 in which a person will taste of everything, as also by that condition
 of slackness resulting from the fragmentary knowledge of all things,
 which is so characteristic of University towns. His feelings were
 easily roused and but indifferently satisfied; wherever the boy turned
 he found himself surrounded by a wonderful and would-be learned
 activity, to which the garish theatres presented a ridiculous
 contrast, and the entrancing strains of music a perplexing one. Now,
 to the observer who sees things relatively, it must seem strange that
 the modern man who happens to be gifted with exceptional talent should
 as a child and a youth so seldom be blessed with the quality of
 ingenuousness and of simple individuality, that he is so little able
 to have these qualities at all. As a matter of fact, men of rare
 talent, like Goethe and Wagner, much more often attain to
 ingenuousness in manhood than during the more tender years of
 childhood and youth. And this is especially so with the artist, who,
 being born with a more than usual capacity for imitating, succumbs to
 the morbid multiformity of modern life as to a virulent disease of
 infancy. As a child he will more closely resemble an old man. The
 wonderfully accurate and original picture of youth which Wagner gives
 us in the Siegfried of the Nibelungen Ring could only have been
 conceived by a man, and by one who had discovered his youthfulness but
 late in life. Wagner's maturity, like his adolesence, was also late in
 making its appearance, and he is thus, in this respect alone, the very
 reverse of the precocious type.
 
 The appearance of his moral and intellectual strength was the prelude
 to the drama of his soul. And how different it then became! His nature
 seems to have been simplified at one terrible stroke, and divided
 against itself into two instincts or spheres. From its innermost
 depths there gushes forth a passionate will which, like a rapid
 mountain torrent, endeavours to make its way through all paths,
 ravines, and crevices, in search of light and power. Only a force
 completely free and pure was strong enough to guide this will to all
 that is good and beneficial. Had it been combined with a narrow
 intelligence, a will with such a tyrannical and boundless desire might
 have become fatal; in any case, an exit into the open had to be found
 for it as quickly as possible, whereby it could rush into pure air and
 sunshine. Lofty aspirations, which continually meet with failure,
 ultimately turn to evil. The inadequacy of means for obtaining success
 may, in certain circumstances, be the result of an inexorable fate,
 and not necessarily of a lack of strength; but he who under such
 circumstances cannot abandon his aspirations, despite the inadequacy
 of his means, will only become embittered, and consequently irritable
 and intolerant. He may possibly seek the cause of his failure in other
 people; he may even, in a fit of passion, hold the whole world guilty;
 or he may turn defiantly down secret byways and secluded lanes, or
 resort to violence. In this way, noble natures, on their road to the
 most high, may turn savage. Even among those who seek but their own
 personal moral purity, among monks and anchorites, men are to be found
 who, undermined and devoured by failure, have become barbarous and
 hopelessly morbid. There was a spirit full of love and calm belief,
 full of goodness and infinite tenderness, hostile to all violence and
 self-deterioration, and abhorring the sight of a soul in bondage. And
 it was this spirit which manifested itself to Wagner. It hovered over
 him as a consoling angel, it covered him with its wings, and showed
 him the true path. At this stage we bring the other side of Wagner's
 nature into view: but how shall we describe this other side?
 
 The characters an artist creates are not himself, but the succession
 of these characters, to which it is clear he is greatly attached, must
 at all events reveal something of his nature. Now try and recall
 Rienzi, the Flying Dutchman and Senta, Tannhauser and Elizabeth,
 Lohengrin and Elsa, Tristan and Marke, Hans Sachs, Woden and
 Brunhilda,--all these characters are correlated by a secret current of
 ennobling and broadening morality which flows through them and becomes
 ever purer and clearer as it progresses. And at this point we enter
 with respectful reserve into the presence of the most hidden
 development in Wagner's own soul. In what other artist do we meet with
 the like of this, in the same proportion? Schiller's characters, from
 the Robbers to Wallenstein and Tell, do indeed pursue an ennobling
 course, and likewise reveal something of their author's development;
 but in Wagner the standard is higher and the distance covered is much
 greater. In the Nibelungen Ring, for instance, where Brunhilda is
 awakened by Siegfried, I perceive the most moral music I have ever
 heard. Here Wagner attains to such a high level of sacred feeling that
 our mind unconsciously wanders to the glistening ice-and snow-peaks of
 the Alps, to find a likeness there;-- so pure, isolated, inaccessible,
 chaste, and bathed in love-beams does Nature here display herself,
 that clouds and tempests--yea, and even the sublime itself--seem to
 lie beneath her. Now, looking down from this height upon Tannhauser
 and the Flying Dutchman, we begin to perceive how the man in Wagner
 was evolved: how restlessly and darkly he began; how tempestuously he
 strove to gratify his desires, to acquire power and to taste those
 rapturous delights from which he often fled in disgust; how he wished
 to throw off a yoke, to forget, to be negative, and to renounce
 everything. The whole torrent plunged, now into this valley, now into
 that, and flooded the most secluded chinks and crannies. In the night
 of these semi-subterranean convulsions a star appeared and glowed high
 above him with melancholy vehemence; as soon as he recognised it, he
 named it Fidelity--unselfish fidelity. Why did this star seem to him
 the brightest and purest of all? What secret meaning had the word
 "fidelity" to his whole being? For he has graven its image and
 problems upon all his thoughts and compositions. His works contain
 almost a complete series of the rarest and most beautiful examples of
 fidelity: that of brother to sister, of friend to friend, of servant
 to master; of Elizabeth to Tannhauser, of Senta to the Dutchman, of
 Elsa to Lohengrin, of Isolde, Kurvenal, and Marke to Tristan, of
 Brunhilda to the most secret vows of Woden--and many others. It is
 Wagner's most personal and most individual experience, which he
 reveres like a religious mystery, and which he calls Fidelity; he
 never wearies of breathing it into hundreds of different characters,
 and of endowing it with the sublimest that in him lies, so overflowing
 is his gratitude. It is, in short, the recognition of the fact that
 the two sides of his nature remained faithful to each other, that out
 of free and unselfish love, the creative, ingenuous, and brilliant
 side kept loyally abreast of the dark, the intractable, and the
 tyrannical side.
 
                                  III.
 
 The relation of the two constituent forces to each other, and the
 yielding of the one to the other, was the great requisite by which
 alone he could remain wholly and truly himself. At the same time, this
 was the only thing he could not control, and over which he could only
 keep a watch, while the temptations to infidelity and its threatening
 dangers beset him more and more. The uncertainty derived therefrom is
 an overflowing source of suffering for those in process of
 development. Each of his instincts made constant efforts to attain to
 unmeasured heights, and each of the capacities he possessed for
 enjoying life seemed to long to tear itself away from its companions
 in order to seek satisfaction alone; the greater their exuberance the
 more terrific was the tumult, and the more bitter the competition
 between them. In addition, accident and life fired the desire for
 power and splendour in him; but he was more often tormented by the
 cruel necessity of having to live at all, while all around him lay
 obstacles and snares. How is it possible for any one to remain
 faithful here, to be completely steadfast? This doubt often depressed
 him, and he expresses it, as an artist expressed his doubt, in
 artistic forms. Elizabeth, for instance, can only suffer, pray, and
 die; she saves the fickle and intemperate man by her loyalty, though
 not for this life. In the path of every true artist, whose lot is cast
 in these modern days, despair and danger are strewn. He has many means
 whereby he can attain to honour and might; peace and plenty
 persistently offer themselves to him, but only in that form recognised
 by the modern man, which to the straightforward artist is no better
 than choke-damp. In this temptation, and in the act of resisting it,
 lie the dangers that threaten him--dangers arising from his disgust at
 the means modernity offers him of acquiring pleasure and esteem, and
 from the indignation provoked by the selfish ease of modern society.
 Imagine Wagner's filling an official position, as for instance that of
 bandmaster at public and court theatres, both of which positions he
 has held: think how he, a serious artist, must have struggled in order
 to enforce seriousness in those very places which, to meet the demands
 of modern conventions, are designed with almost systematic frivolity
 to appeal only to the frivolous. Think how he must have partially
 succeeded, though only to fail on the whole. How constantly disgust
 must have been at his heels despite his repeated attempts to flee it,
 how he failed to find the haven to which he might have repaired, and
 how he had ever to return to the Bohemians and outlaws of our society,
 as one of them. If he himself broke loose from any post or position,
 he rarely found a better one in its stead, while more than once
 distress was all that his unrest brought him. Thus Wagner changed his
 associates, his dwelling-place and country, and when we come to
 comprehend the nature of the circles into which he gravitated, we can
 hardly realise how he was able to tolerate them for any length of
 time. The greater half of his past seems to be shrouded in heavy mist;
 for a long time he appears to have had no general hopes, but only
 hopes for the morrow, and thus, although he reposed no faith in the
 future, he was not driven to despair. He must have felt like a
 nocturnal traveller, broken with fatigue, exasperated from want of
 sleep, and tramping wearily along beneath a heavy burden, who, far
 from fearing the sudden approach of death, rather longs for it as
 something exquisitely charming. His burden, the road and the
 night--all would disappear! The thought was a temptation to him. Again
 and again, buoyed up by his temporary hopes, he plunged anew into the
 turmoil of life, and left all apparatus behind him. But his method of
 doing this, his lack of moderation in the doing, betrayed what a
 feeble hold his hopes had upon him; how they were only stimulants to
 which he had recourse in an extremity. The conflict between his
 aspirations and his partial or total inability to realise them,
 tormented him like a thorn in the flesh. Infuriated by constant
 privations, his imagination lapsed into the dissipated, whenever the
 state of want was momentarily relieved. Life grew ever more and more
 complicated for him; but the means and artifices that he discovered in
 his art as a dramatist became evermore resourceful and daring. Albeit,
 these were little more than palpable dramatic makeshifts and
 expedients, which deceived, and were invented, only for the moment. In
 a flash such means occurred to his mind and were used up. Examined
 closely and without prepossession, Wagner's life, to recall one of
 Schopenhauer's expressions, might be said to consist largely of
 comedy, not to mention burlesque. And what the artist's feelings must
 have been, conscious as he was, during whole periods of his life, of
 this undignified element in it,--he who more than any one else,
 perhaps, breathed freely only in sublime and more than sublime
 spheres,-- the thinker alone can form any idea.
 
 In the midst of this mode of life, a detailed description of which is
 necessary in order to inspire the amount of pity, awe, and admiration
 which are its due, he developed a talent for acquiring knowledge,
 which even in a German--a son of the nation learned above all
 others--was really extraordinary. And with this talent yet another
 danger threatened Wagner--a danger more formidable than that involved
 in a life which was apparently without either a stay or a rule, borne
 hither and thither by disturbing illusions. From a novice trying his
 strength, Wagner became a thorough master of music and of the theatre,
 as also a prolific inventor in the preliminary technical conditions
 for the execution of art. No one will any longer deny him the glory of
 having given us the supreme model for lofty artistic execution on a
 large scale. But he became more than this, and in order so to develop,
 he, no less than any one else in like circumstances, had to reach the
 highest degree of culture by virtue of his studies. And wonderfully he
 achieved this end! It is delightful to follow his progress. From all
 sides material seemed to come unto him and into him, and the larger
 and heavier the resulting structure became, the more rigid was the
 arch of the ruling and ordering thought supporting it. And yet access
 to the sciences and arts has seldom been made more difficult for any
 man than for Wagner; so much so that he had almost to break his own
 road through to them. The reviver of the simple drama, the discoverer
 of the position due to art in true human society, the poetic
 interpreter of bygone views of life, the philosopher, the historian,
 the aesthete and the critic, the master of languages, the mythologist
 and the myth poet, who was the first to include all these wonderful
 and beautiful products of primitive times in a single Ring, upon which
 he engraved the runic characters of his thoughts-- what a wealth of
 knowledge must Wagner have accumulated and commanded, in order to have
 become all that! And yet this mass of material was just as powerless
 to impede the action of his will as a matter of detail--however
 attractive--was to draw his purpose from its path. For the exceptional
 character of such conduct to be appreciated fully, it should be
 compared with that of Goethe,-- he who, as a student and as a sage,
 resembled nothing so much as a huge river-basin, which does not pour
 all its water into the sea, but spends as much of it on its way there,
 and at its various twists and turns, as it ultimately disgorges at its
 mouth. True, a nature like Goethe's not only has, but also engenders,
 more pleasure than any other; there is more mildness and noble
 profligacy in it; whereas the tenor and tempo of Wagner's power at
 times provoke both fear and flight. But let him fear who will, we
 shall only be the more courageous, in that we shall be permitted to
 come face to face with a hero who, in regard to modern culture, "has
 never learned the meaning of fear."
 
 But neither has he learned to look for repose in history and
 philosophy, nor to derive those subtle influences from their study
 which tend to paralyse action or to soften a man unduly. Neither the
 creative nor the militant artist in him was ever diverted from his
 purpose by learning and culture. The moment his constructive powers
 direct him, history becomes yielding clay in his hands. His attitude
 towards it then differs from that of every scholar, and more nearly
 resembles the relation of the ancient Greek to his myths; that is to
 say, his subject is something he may fashion, and about which he may
 write verses. He will naturally do this with love and a certain
 becoming reverence, but with the sovereign right of the creator
 notwithstanding. And precisely because history is more supple and more
 variable than a dream to him, he can invest the most individual case
 with the characteristics of a whole age, and thus attain to a
 vividness of narrative of which historians are quite incapable. In
 what work of art, of any kind, has the body and soul of the Middle
 Ages ever been so thoroughly depicted as in Lohengrin? And will not
 the Meistersingers continue to acquaint men, even in the remotest ages
 to come, with the nature of Germany's soul? Will they not do more than
 acquaint men of it? Will they not represent its very ripest fruit--the
 fruit of that spirit which ever wishes to reform and not to overthrow,
 and which, despite the broad couch of comfort on which it lies, has
 not forgotten how to endure the noblest discomfort when a worthy and
 novel deed has to be accomplished?
 
 And it is just to this kind of discomfort that Wagner always felt
 himself drawn by his study of history and philosophy: in them he not
 only found arms and coats of mail, but what he felt in their presence
 above all was the inspiring breath which is wafted from the graves of
 all great fighters, sufferers, and thinkers. Nothing distinguishes a
 man more from the general pattern of the age than the use he makes of
 history and philosophy. According to present views, the former seems
 to have been allotted the duty of giving modern man breathing-time, in
 the midst of his panting and strenuous scurry towards his goal, so
 that he may, for a space, imagine he has slipped his leash. What
 Montaigne was as an individual amid the turmoil of the
 Reformation--that is to say, a creature inwardly coming to peace with
 himself, serenely secluded in himself and taking breath, as his best
 reader, Shakespeare, understood him, --this is what history is to the
 modern spirit today. The fact that the Germans, for a whole century,
 have devoted themselves more particularly to the study of history,
 only tends to prove that they are the stemming, retarding, and
 becalming force in the activity of modern society--a circumstance
 which some, of course, will place to their credit. On the whole,
 however, it is a dangerous symptom when the mind of a nation turns
 with preference to the study of the past. It is a sign of flagging
 strength, of decline and degeneration; it denotes that its people are
 perilously near to falling victims to the first fever that may happen
 to be rife --the political fever among others. Now, in the history of
 modern thought, our scholars are an example of this condition of
 weakness as opposed to all reformative and revolutionary activity. The
 mission they have chosen is not of the noblest; they have rather been
 content to secure smug happiness for their kind, and little more.
 Every independent and manly step leaves them halting in the
 background, although it by no means outstrips history. For the latter
 is possessed of vastly different powers, which only natures like
 Wagner have any notion of; but it requires to be written in a much
 more earnest and severe spirit, by much more vigorous students, and
 with much less optimism than has been the case hitherto. In fact, it
 requires to be treated quite differently from the way German scholars
 have treated it until now. In all their works there is a continual
 desire to embellish, to submit and to be content, while the course of
 events invariably seems to have their approbation. It is rather the
 exception for one of them to imply that he is satisfied only because
 things might have turned out worse; for most of them believe, almost
 as a matter of course, that everything has been for the best simply
 because it has only happened once. Were history not always a disguised
 Christian theodicy, were it written with more justice and fervent
 feeling, it would be the very last thing on earth to be made to serve
 the purpose it now serves, namely, that of an opiate against
 everything subversive and novel. And philosophy is in the same plight:
 all that the majority demand of it is, that it may teach them to
 understand approximate facts--very approximate facts--in order that
 they may then become adapted to them. And even its noblest exponents
 press its soporific and comforting powers so strongly to the fore,
 that all lovers of sleep and of loafing must think that their aim and
 the aim of philosophy are one. For my part, the most important
 question philosophy has to decide seems to be, how far things have
 acquired an unalterable stamp and form, and, once this question has
 been answered, I think it the duty of philosophy unhesitatingly and
 courageously to proceed with the task of improving that part of the
 world which has been recognised as still susceptible to change. But
 genuine philosophers do, as a matter of fact, teach this doctrine
 themselves, inasmuch as they work at endeavouring to alter the very
 changeable views of men, and do not keep their opinions to themselves.
 Genuine disciples of genuine philosophies also teach this doctrine;
 for, like Wagner, they understand the art of deriving a more decisive
 and inflexible will from their master's teaching, rather than an
 opiate or a sleeping draught. Wagner is most philosophical where he is
 most powerfully active and heroic. It was as a philosopher that he
 went, not only through the fire of various philosophical systems
 without fear, but also through the vapours of science and scholarship,
 while remaining ever true to his highest self. And it was this highest
 self which exacted from his versatile spirit works as complete as his
 were, which bade him suffer and learn, that he might accomplish such
 works.
 
                                  IV.
 
 The history of the development of culture since the time of the Greeks
 is short enough, when we take into consideration the actual ground it
 covers, and ignore the periods during which man stood still, went
 backwards, hesitated or strayed. The Hellenising of the world--and to
 make this possible, the Orientalising of Hellenism--that double
 mission of Alexander the Great, still remains the most important
 event: the old question whether a foreign civilisation may be
 transplanted is still the problem that the peoples of modern times are
 vainly endeavouring to solve. The rhythmic play of those two factors
 against each other is the force that has determined the course of
 history heretofore. Thus Christianity appears, for instance, as a
 product of Oriental antiquity, which was thought out and pursued to
 its ultimate conclusions by men, with almost intemperate thoroughness.
 As its influence began to decay, the power of Hellenic culture was
 revived, and we are now experiencing phenomena so strange that they
 would hang in the air as unsolved problems, if it were not possible,
 by spanning an enormous gulf of time, to show their relation to
 analogous phenomena in Hellenistic culture. Thus, between Kant and the
 Eleatics, Schopenhauer and Empedocles, AEschylus and Wagner, there is
 so much relationship, so many things in common, that one is vividly
 impressed with the very relative nature of all notions of time. It
 would even seem as if a whole diversity of things were really all of a
 piece, and that time is only a cloud which makes it hard for our eyes
 to perceive the oneness of them. In the history of the exact sciences
 we are perhaps most impressed by the close bond uniting us with the
 days of Alexander and ancient Greece. The pendulum of history seems
 merely to have swung back to that point from which it started when it
 plunged forth into unknown and mysterious distance. The picture
 represented by our own times is by no means a new one: to the student
 of history it must always seem as though he were merely in the
 presence of an old familiar face, the features of which he recognises.
 In our time the spirit of Greek culture is scattered broadcast. While
 forces of all kinds are pressing one upon the other, and the fruits of
 modern art and science are offering themselves as a means of exchange,
 the pale outline of Hellenism is beginning to dawn faintly in the
 distance. The earth which, up to the present, has been more than
 adequately Orientalised, begins to yearn once more for Hellenism. He
 who wishes to help her in this respect will certainly need to be
 gifted for speedy action and to have wings on his heels, in order to
 synthetise the multitudinous and still undiscovered facts of science
 and the many conflicting divisions of talent so as to reconnoitre and
 rule the whole enormous field. It is now necessary that a generation
 of anti-Alexanders should arise, endowed with the supreme strength
 necessary for gathering up, binding together, and joining the
 individual threads of the fabric, so as to prevent their being
 scattered to the four winds. The object is not to cut the Gordian knot
 of Greek culture after the manner adopted by Alexander, and then to
 leave its frayed ends fluttering in all directions; it is rather to
 bind it after it has been loosed. That is our task to-day. In the
 person of Wagner I recognise one of these anti-Alexanders: he rivets
 and locks together all that is isolated, weak, or in any way
 defective; if I may be allowed to use a medical expression, he has an
 astringent power. And in this respect he is one of the greatest
 civilising forces of his age. He dominates art, religion, and
 folklore, yet he is the reverse of a polyhistor or of a mere
 collecting and classifying spirit; for he constructs with the
 collected material, and breathes life into it, and is a Simplifier of
 the Universe. We must not be led away from this idea by comparing the
 general mission which his genius imposed upon him with the much
 narrower and more immediate one which we are at present in the habit
 of associating with the name of Wagner. He is expected to effect a
 reform in the theatre world; but even supposing he should succeed in
 doing this, what would then have been done towards the accomplishment
 of that higher, more distant mission?
 
 But even with this lesser theatrical reform, modern man would also be
 altered and reformed; for everything is so intimately related in this
 world, that he who removes even so small a thing as a rivet from the
 framework shatters and destroys the whole edifice. And what we here
 assert, with perhaps seeming exaggeration, of Wagner's activity would
 hold equally good of any other genuine reform. It is quite impossible
 to reinstate the art of drama in its purest and highest form without
 effecting changes everywhere in the customs of the people, in the
 State, in education, and in social intercourse. When love and justice
 have become powerful in one department of life, namely in art, they
 must, in accordance with the law of their inner being, spread their
 influence around them, and can no more return to the stiff stillness
 of their former pupal condition. In order even to realise how far the
 attitude of the arts towards life is a sign of their decline, and how
 far our theatres are a disgrace to those who build and visit them,
 everything must be learnt over again, and that which is usual and
 commonplace should be regarded as something unusual and complicated.
 An extraordinary lack of clear judgment, a badly-concealed lust of
 pleasure, of entertainment at any cost, learned scruples, assumed airs
 of importance, and trifling with the seriousness of art on the part of
 those who represent it; brutality of appetite and money-grubbing on
 the part of promoters; the empty-mindedness and thoughtlessness of
 society, which only thinks of the people in so far as these serve or
 thwart its purpose, and which attends theatres and concerts without
 giving a thought to its duties,--all these things constitute the
 stifling and deleterious atmosphere of our modern art conditions:
 when, however, people like our men of culture have grown accustomed to
 it, they imagine that it is a condition of their healthy existence,
 and would immediately feel unwell if, for any reason, they were
 compelled to dispense with it for a while. In point of fact, there is
 but one speedy way of convincing oneself of the vulgarity, weirdness,
 and confusion of our theatrical institutions, and that is to compare
 them with those which once flourished in ancient Greece. If we knew
 nothing about the Greeks, it would perhaps be impossible to assail our
 present conditions at all, and objections made on the large scale
 conceived for the first time by Wagner would have been regarded as the
 dreams of people who could only be at home in outlandish places. "For
 men as we now find them," people would have retorted, "art of this
 modern kind answers the purpose and is fitting-- and men have never
 been different." But they have been very different, and even now there
 are men who are far from satisfied with the existing state of
 affairs--the fact of Bayreuth alone demonstrates this point. Here you
 will find prepared and initiated spectators, and the emotion of men
 conscious of being at the very zenith of their happiness, who
 concentrate their whole being on that happiness in order to strengthen
 themselves for a higher and more far-reaching purpose. Here you will
 find the most noble self-abnegation on the part of the artist, and the
 finest of all spectacles --that of a triumphant creator of works which
 are in themselves an overflowing treasury of artistic triumphs. Does
 it not seem almost like a fairy tale, to be able to come face to face
 with such a personality? Must not they who take any part whatsoever,
 active or passive, in the proceedings at Bayreuth, already feel
 altered and rejuvenated, and ready to introduce reforms and to effect
 renovations in other spheres of life? Has not a haven been found for
 all wanderers on high and desert seas, and has not peace settled over
 the face of the waters? Must not he who leaves these spheres of ruling
 profundity and loneliness for the very differently ordered world with
 its plains and lower levels, cry continually like Isolde: "Oh, how
 could I bear it? How can I still bear it?" And should he be unable to
 endure his joy and his sorrow, or to keep them egotistically to
 himself, he will avail himself from that time forward of every
 opportunity of making them known to all. "Where are they who are
 suffering under the yoke of modern institutions?" he will inquire.
 "Where are my natural allies, with whom I may struggle against the
 ever waxing and ever more oppressive pretensions of modern erudition?
 For at present, at least, we have but one enemy--at present!--and it
 is that band of aesthetes, to whom the word Bayreuth means the
 completest rout--they have taken no share in the arrangements, they
 were rather indignant at the whole movement, or else availed
 themselves effectively of the deaf-ear policy, which has now become
 the trusty weapon of all very superior opposition. But this proves
 that their animosity and knavery were ineffectual in destroying
 Wagner's spirit or in hindering the accomplishment of his plans; it
 proves even more, for it betrays their weakness and the fact that all
 those who are at present in possession of power will not be able to
 withstand many more attacks. The time is at hand for those who would
 conquer and triumph; the vastest empires lie at their mercy, a note of
 interrogation hangs to the name of all present possessors of power, so
 far as possession may be said to exist in this respect. Thus
 educational institutions are said to be decaying, and everywhere
 individuals are to be found who have secretly deserted them. If only
 it were possible to invite those to open rebellion and public
 utterances, who even now are thoroughly dissatisfied with the state of
 affairs in this quarter! If only it were possible to deprive them of
 their faint heart and lukewarmness! I am convinced that the whole
 spirit of modern culture would receive its deadliest blow if the tacit
 support which these natures give it could in any way be cancelled.
 Among scholars, only those would remain loyal to the old order of
 things who had been infected with the political mania or who were
 literary hacks in any form whatever. The repulsive organisation which
 derives its strength from the violence and injustice upon which it
 relies--that is to say, from the State and Society--and which sees its
 advantage in making the latter ever more evil and unscrupulous,--this
 structure which without such support would be something feeble and
 effete, only needs to be despised in order to perish. He who is
 struggling to spread justice and love among mankind must regard this
 organisation as the least significant of the obstacles in his way; for
 he will only encounter his real opponents once he has successfully
 stormed and conquered modern culture, which is nothing more than their
 outworks.
 
 For us, Bayreuth is the consecration of the dawn of the combat. No
 greater injustice could be done to us than to suppose that we are
 concerned with art alone, as though it were merely a means of healing
 or stupefying us, which we make use of in order to rid our
 consciousness of all the misery that still remains in our midst. In
 the image of this tragic art work at Bayreuth, we see, rather, the
 struggle of individuals against everything which seems to oppose them
 with invincible necessity, with power, law, tradition, conduct, and
 the whole order of things established. Individuals cannot choose a
 better life than that of holding themselves ready to sacrifice
 themselves and to die in their fight for love and justice. The gaze
 which the mysterious eye of tragedy vouchsafes us neither lulls nor
 paralyses. Nevertheless, it demands silence of us as long as it keeps
 us in view; for art does not serve the purposes of war, but is merely
 with us to improve our hours of respite, before and during the course
 of the contest,--to improve those few moments when, looking back, yet
 dreaming of the future, we seem to understand the symbolical, and are
 carried away into a refreshing reverie when fatigue overtakes us. Day
 and battle dawn together, the sacred shadows vanish, and Art is once
 more far away from us; but the comfort she dispenses is with men from
 the earliest hour of day, and never leaves them. Wherever he turns,
 the individual realises only too clearly his own shortcomings, his
 insufficiency and his incompetence; what courage would he have left
 were he not previously rendered impersonal by this consecration! The
 greatest of all torments harassing him, the conflicting beliefs and
 opinions among men, the unreliability of these beliefs and opinions,
 and the unequal character of men's abilities--all these things make
 him hanker after art. We cannot be happy so long as everything about
 us suffers and causes suffering; we cannot be moral so long as the
 course of human events is determined by violence, treachery, and
 injustice; we cannot even be wise, so long as the whole of mankind
 does not compete for wisdom, and does not lead the individual to the
 most sober and reasonable form of life and knowledge. How, then, would
 it be possible to endure this feeling of threefold insufficiency if
 one were not able to recognise something sublime and valuable in one's
 struggles, strivings, and defeats, if one did not learn from tragedy
 how to delight in the rhythm of the great passions, and in their
 victim? Art is certainly no teacher or educator of practical conduct:
 the artist is never in this sense an instructor or adviser; the things
 after which a tragic hero strives are not necessarily worth striving
 after. As in a dream so in art, the valuation of things only holds
 good while we are under its spell. What we, for the time being, regard
 as so worthy of effort, and what makes us sympathise with the tragic
 hero when he prefers death to renouncing the object of his desire,
 this can seldom retain the same value and energy when transferred to
 everyday life: that is why art is the business of the man who is
 recreating himself. The strife it reveals to us is a simplification of
 life's struggle; its problems are abbreviations of the infinitely
 complicated phenomena of man's actions and volitions. But from this
 very fact--that it is the reflection, so to speak, of a simpler world,
 a more rapid solution of the riddle of life--art derives its greatness
 and indispensability. No one who suffers from life can do without this
 reflection, just as no one can exist without sleep. The more difficult
 the science of natural laws becomes, the more fervently we yearn for
 the image of this simplification, if only for an instant; and the
 greater becomes the tension between each man's general knowledge of
 things and his moral and spiritual faculties. Art is with us to
 prevent the bow from snapping.
 
 The individual must be consecrated to something impersonal--that is
 the aim of tragedy: he must forget the terrible anxiety which death
 and time tend to create in him; for at any moment of his life, at any
 fraction of time in the whole of his span of years, something sacred
 may cross his path which will amply compensate him for all his
 struggles and privations. This means having a sense for the tragic.
 And if all mankind must perish some day--and who could question this!
 --it has been given its highest aim for the future, namely, to
 increase and to live in such unity that it may confront its final
 extermination as a whole, with one spirit-with a common sense of the
 tragic: in this one aim all the ennobling influences of man lie
 locked; its complete repudiation by humanity would be the saddest blow
 which the soul of the philanthropist could receive. That is how I feel
 in the matter! There is but one hope and guarantee for the future of
 man, and that is that his sense for the tragic may not die out. If he
 ever completely lost it, an agonised cry, the like of which has never
 been heard, would have to be raised all over the world; for there is
 no more blessed joy than that which consists in knowing what we
 know--how tragic thought was born again on earth. For this joy is
 thoroughly impersonal and general: it is the wild rejoicing of
 humanity, anent the hidden relationship and progress of all that is
 human.
 
                                   V.
 
 Wagner concentrated upon life, past and present, the light of an
 intelligence strong enough to embrace the most distant regions in its
 rays. That is why he is a simplifier of the universe; for the
 simplification of the universe is only possible to him whose eye has
 been able to master the immensity and wildness of an apparent chaos,
 and to relate and unite those things which before had lain hopelessly
 asunder. Wagner did this by discovering a connection between two
 objects which seemed to exist apart from each other as though in
 separate spheres--that between music and life, and similarly between
 music and the drama. Not that he invented or was the first to create
 this relationship, for they must always have existed and have been
 noticeable to all; but, as is usually the case with a great problem,
 it is like a precious stone which thousands stumble over before one
 finally picks it up. Wagner asked himself the meaning of the fact that
 an art such as music should have become so very important a feature of
 the lives of modern men. It is not necessary to think meanly of life
 in order to suspect a riddle behind this question. On the contrary,
 when all the great forces of existence are duly considered, and
 struggling life is regarded as striving mightily after conscious
 freedom and independence of thought, only then does music seem to be a
 riddle in this world. Should one not answer: Music could not have been
 born in our time? What then does its presence amongst us signify? An
 accident? A single great artist might certainly be an accident, but
 the appearance of a whole group of them, such as the history of modern
 music has to show, a group only once before equalled on earth, that is
 to say in the time of the Greeks,--a circumstance of this sort leads
 one to think that perhaps necessity rather than accident is at the
 root of the whole phenomenon. The meaning of this necessity is the
 riddle which Wagner answers.
 
 He was the first to recognise an evil which is as widespread as
 civilisation itself among men; language is everywhere diseased, and
 the burden of this terrible disease weighs heavily upon the whole of
 man's development. Inasmuch as language has retreated ever more and
 more from its true province--the expression of strong feelings, which
 it was once able to convey in all their simplicity--and has always had
 to strain after the practically impossible achievement of
 communicating the reverse of feeling, that is to say thought, its
 strength has become so exhausted by this excessive extension of its
 duties during the comparatively short period of modern civilisation,
 that it is no longer able to perform even that function which alone
 justifies its existence, to wit, the assisting of those who suffer, in
 communicating with each other concerning the sorrows of existence. Man
 can no longer make his misery known unto others by means of language;
 hence he cannot really express himself any longer. And under these
 conditions, which are only vaguely felt at present, language has
 gradually become a force in itself which with spectral arms coerces
 and drives humanity where it least wants to go. As soon as they would
 fain understand one another and unite for a common cause, the
 craziness of general concepts, and even of the ring of modern words,
 lays hold of them. The result of this inability to communicate with
 one another is that every product of their co-operative action bears
 the stamp of discord, not only because it fails to meet their real
 needs, but because of the very emptiness of those all-powerful words
 and notions already mentioned. To the misery already at hand, man thus
 adds the curse of convention--that is to say, the agreement between
 words and actions without an agreement between the feelings. Just as,
 during the decline of every art, a point is reached when the morbid
 accumulation of its means and forms attains to such tyrannical
 proportions that it oppresses the tender souls of artists and converts
 these into slaves, so now, in the period of the decline of language,
 men have become the slaves of words. Under this yoke no one is able to
 show himself as he is, or to express himself artlessly, while only few
 are able to preserve their individuality in their fight against a
 culture which thinks to manifest its success, not by the fact that it
 approaches definite sensations and desires with the view of educating
 them, but by the fact that it involves the individual in the snare of
 "definite notions," and teaches him to think correctly: as if there
 were any value in making a correctly thinking and reasoning being out
 of man, before one has succeeded in making him a creature that feels
 correctly. If now the strains of our German masters' music burst upon
 a mass of mankind sick to this extent, what is really the meaning of
 these strains? Only correct feeling, the enemy of all convention, of
 all artificial estrangement and misunderstandings between man and man:
 this music signifies a return to nature, and at the same time a
 purification and remodelling of it; for the need of such a return took
 shape in the souls of the most loving of men, and, through their art,
 nature transformed into love makes its voice heard.
 
 Let us regard this as one of Wagner's answers to the question, What
 does music mean in our time? for he has a second. The relation between
 music and life is not merely that existing between one kind of
 language and another; it is, besides, the relation between the perfect
 world of sound and that of sight. Regarded merely as a spectacle, and
 compared with other and earlier manifestations of human life, the
 existence of modern man is characterised by indescribable indigence
 and exhaustion, despite the unspeakable garishness at which only the
 superficial observer rejoices. If one examines a little more closely
 the impression which this vehement and kaleidoscopic play of colours
 makes upon one, does not the whole seem to blaze with the shimmer and
 sparkle of innumerable little stones borrowed from former
 civilisations? Is not everything one sees merely a complex of
 inharmonious bombast, aped gesticulations, arrogant superficiality?--a
 ragged suit of motley for the naked and the shivering? A seeming dance
 of joy enjoined upon a sufferer? Airs of overbearing pride assumed by
 one who is sick to the backbone? And the whole moving with such
 rapidity and confusion that it is disguised and masked-- sordid
 impotence, devouring dissension, assiduous ennui, dishonest distress!
 The appearance of present-day humanity is all appearance, and nothing
 else: in what he now represents man himself has become obscured and
 concealed; and the vestiges of the creative faculty in art, which
 still cling to such countries as France and Italy, are all
 concentrated upon this one task of concealing. Wherever form is still
 in demand in society, conversation, literary style, or the relations
 between governments, men have unconsciously grown to believe that it
 is adequately met by a kind of agreeable dissimulation, quite the
 reverse of genuine form conceived as a necessary relation between the
 proportions of a figure, having no concern whatever with the notions
 "agreeable" or "disagreeable," simply because it is necessary and not
 optional. But even where form is not openly exacted by civilised
 people, there is no greater evidence of this requisite relation of
 proportions; a striving after the agreeable dissimulation, already
 referred to, is on the contrary noticeable, though it is never so
 successful even if it be more eager than in the first instance. How
 far this dissimulation is agreeable at times, and why it must please
 everybody to see how modern men at least endeavour to dissemble, every
 one is in a position to judge, according to, the extent to which he
 himself may happen to be modern. "Only galley slaves know each other,"
 says Tasso, "and if we mistake others, it is only out of courtesy, and
 with the hope that they, in their turn, should mistake us."
 
 Now, in this world of forms and intentional misunderstandings, what
 purpose is served by the appearance of souls overflowing with music?
 They pursue the course of grand and unrestrained rhythm with noble
 candour--with a passion more than personal; they glow with the mighty
 and peaceful fire of music, which wells up to the light of day from
 their unexhausted depths--and all this to what purpose?
 
 By means of these souls music gives expression to the longing that it
 feels for the company of its natural ally, gymnastics--that is to say,
 its necessary form in the order of visible phenomena. In its search
 and craving for this ally, it becomes the arbiter of the whole visible
 world and the world of mere lying appearance of the present day. This
 is Wagner's second answer to the question, What is the meaning of
 music in our times? "Help me," he cries to all who have ears to hear,
 "help me to discover that culture of which my music, as the
 rediscovered language of correct feeling, seems to foretell the
 existence. Bear in mind that the soul of music now wishes to acquire a
 body, that, by means of you all, it would find its way to visibleness
 in movements, deeds, institutions, and customs!" There are some men
 who understand this summons, and their number will increase; they have
 also understood, for the first time, what it means to found the State
 upon music. It is something that the ancient Hellenes not only
 understood but actually insisted upon; and these enlightened creatures
 would just as soon have sentenced the modern State to death as modern
 men now condemn the Church. The road to such a new though not
 unprecedented goal would lead to this: that we should be compelled to
 acknowledge where the worst faults of our educational system lie, and
 why it has failed hitherto to elevate us out of barbarity: in reality,
 it lacks the stirring and creative soul of music; its requirements and
 arrangements are moreover the product of a period in which the music,
 to which We seem to attach so much importance, had not yet been born.
 Our education is the most antiquated factor of our present conditions,
 and it is so more precisely in regard to the one new educational force
 by which it makes men of to-day in advance of those of bygone
 centuries, or by which it would make them in advance of their remote
 ancestors, provided only they did not persist so rashly in hurrying
 forward in meek response to the scourge of the moment. Through not
 having allowed the soul of music to lodge within them, they have no
 notion of gymnastics in the Greek and Wagnerian sense; and that is why
 their creative artists are condemned to despair, as long as they wish
 to dispense with music as a guide in a new world of visible phenomena.
 Talent may develop as much as may be desired: it either comes too late
 or too soon, and at all events out of season; for it is in the main
 superfluous and abortive, just as even the most perfect and the
 highest products of earlier times which serve modern artists as models
 are superfluous and abortive, and add not a stone to the edifice
 already begun. If their innermost consciousness can perceive no new
 forms, but only the old ones belonging to the past, they may certainly
 achieve something for history, but not for life; for they are already
 dead before having expired. He, however, who feels genuine and
 fruitful life in him, which at present can only be described by the
 one term "Music," could he allow himself to be deceived for one moment
 into nursing solid hopes by this something which exhausts all its
 energy in producing figures, forms, and styles? He stands above all
 such vanities, and as little expects to meet with artistic wonders
 outside his ideal world of sound as with great writers bred on our
 effete and discoloured language. Rather than lend an ear to illusive
 consolations, he prefers to turn his unsatisfied gaze stoically upon
 our modern world, and if his heart be not warm enough to feel pity,
 let it at least feel bitterness and hate! It were better for him to
 show anger and scorn than to take cover in spurious contentment or
 steadily to drug himself, as our "friends of art" are wont to do. But
 if he can do more than condemn and despise, if he is capable of
 loving, sympathising, and assisting in the general work of
 construction, he must still condemn, notwithstanding, in order to
 prepare the road for his willing soul. In order that music may one day
 exhort many men to greater piety and make them privy to her highest
 aims, an end must first be made to the whole of the pleasure-seeking
 relations which men now enjoy with such a sacred art. Behind all our
 artistic pastimes-- theatres, museums, concerts, and the like--that
 aforementioned "friend of art" is to be found, and he it is who must
 be suppressed: the favour he now finds at the hands of the State must
 be changed into oppression; public opinion, which lays such particular
 stress upon the training of this love of art, must be routed by better
 judgment. Meanwhile we must reckon the declared enemy of art as our
 best and most useful ally; for the object of his animosity is
 precisely art as understood by the "friend of art,"--he knows of no
 other kind! Let him be allowed to call our "friend of art" to account
 for the nonsensical waste of money occasioned by the building of his
 theatres and public monuments, the engagement of his celebrated
 singers and actors, and the support of his utterly useless schools of
 art and picture-galleries--to say nothing of all the energy, time, and
 money which every family squanders in pretended "artistic interests."
 Neither hunger nor satiety is to be noticed here, but a dead-and-alive
 game is played--with the semblance of each, a game invented by the
 idle desire to produce an effect and to deceive others. Or, worse
 still, art is taken more or less seriously, and then it is itself
 expected to provoke a kind of hunger and craving, and to fulfil its
 mission in this artificially induced excitement. It is as if people
 were afraid of sinking beneath the weight of their loathing and
 dulness, and invoked every conceivable evil spirit to scare them and
 drive them about like wild cattle. Men hanker after pain, anger, hate,
 the flush of passion, sudden flight, and breathless suspense, and they
 appeal to the artist as the conjurer of this demoniacal host. In the
 spiritual economy of our cultured classes art has become a spurious or
 ignominious and undignified need--a nonentity or a something evil. The
 superior and more uncommon artist must be in the throes of a
 bewildering nightmare in order to be blind to all this, and like a
 ghost, diffidently and in a quavering voice, he goes on repeating
 beautiful words which he declares descend to him from higher spheres,
 but whose sound he can hear only very indistinctly. The artist who
 happens to be moulded according to the modern pattern, however,
 regards the dreamy gropings and hesitating speech of his nobler
 colleague with contempt, and leads forth the whole brawling mob of
 assembled passions on a leash in order to let them loose upon modern
 men as he may think fit. For these modern creatures wish rather to be
 hunted down, wounded, and torn to shreds, than to live alone with
 themselves in solitary calm. Alone with oneself!--this thought
 terrifies the modern soul; it is his one anxiety, his one ghastly
 fear.
 
 When I watch the throngs that move and linger about the streets of a
 very populous town, and notice no other expression in their faces than
 one of hunted stupor, I can never help commenting to myself upon the
 misery of their condition. For them all, art exists only that they may
 be still more wretched, torpid, insensible, or even more flurried and
 covetous. For incorrect feeling governs and drills them unremittingly,
 and does not even give them time to become aware of their misery.
 Should they wish to speak, convention whispers their cue to them, and
 this makes them forget what they originally intended to say; should
 they desire to understand one another, their comprehension is maimed
 as though by a spell: they declare that to be their joy which in
 reality is but their doom, and they proceed to collaborate in wilfully
 bringing about their own damnation. Thus they have become transformed
 into perfectly and absolutely different creatures, and reduced to the
 state of abject slaves of incorrect feeling.
 
                                  VI.
 
 I shall only give two instances showing how utterly the sentiment of
 our time has been perverted, and how completely unconscious the
 present age is of this perversion. Formerly financiers were looked
 down upon with honest scorn, even though they were recognised as
 needful; for it was generally admitted that every society must have
 its viscera. Now, however, they are the ruling power in the soul of
 modern humanity, for they constitute the most covetous portion
 thereof. In former times people were warned especially against taking
 the day or the moment too seriously: the nil admirari was recommended
 and the care of things eternal. Now there is but one kind of
 seriousness left in the modern mind, and it is limited to the news
 brought by the newspaper and the telegraph. Improve each shining hour,
 turn it to some account and judge it as quickly as possible!--one
 would think modern men had but one virtue left--presence of mind.
 Unfortunately, it much more closely resembles the omnipresence of
 disgusting and insatiable cupidity, and spying inquisitiveness become
 universal. For the question is whether mind is present at all
 to-day;--but we shall leave this problem for future judges to solve;
 they, at least, are bound to pass modern men through a sieve. But that
 this age is vulgar, even we can see now, and it is so because it
 reveres precisely what nobler ages contemned. If, therefore, it loots
 all the treasures of bygone wit and wisdom, and struts about in this
 richest of rich garments, it only proves its sinister consciousness of
 its own vulgarity in so doing; for it does not don this garb for
 warmth, but merely in order to mystify its surroundings. The desire to
 dissemble and to conceal himself seems stronger than the need of
 protection from the cold in modern man. Thus scholars and philosophers
 of the age do not have recourse to Indian and Greek wisdom in order to
 become wise and peaceful: the only purpose of their work seems to be
 to earn them a fictitious reputation for learning in their own time.
 The naturalists endeavour to classify the animal outbreaks of
 violence, ruse and revenge, in the present relations between nations
 and individual men, as immutable laws of nature. Historians are
 anxiously engaged in proving that every age has its own particular
 right and special conditions,-- with the view of preparing the
 groundwork of an apology for the day that is to come, when our
 generation will be called to judgment. The science of government, of
 race, of commerce, and of jurisprudence, all have that preparatorily
 apologetic character now; yea, it even seems as though the small
 amount of intellect which still remains active to-day, and is not used
 up by the great mechanism of gain and power, has as its sole task the
 defending--and excusing of the present
 
 Against what accusers? one asks, surprised.
 
 Against its own bad conscience.
 
 And at this point we plainly discern the task assigned to modern
 art--that of stupefying or intoxicating, of lulling to sleep or
 bewildering. By hook or by crook to make conscience unconscious! To
 assist the modern soul over the sensation of guilt, not to lead it
 back to innocence! And this for the space of moments only! To defend
 men against themselves, that their inmost heart may be silenced, that
 they may turn a deaf ear to its voice! The souls of those few who
 really feel the utter ignominy of this mission and its terrible
 humiliation of art, must be filled to the brim with sorrow and pity,
 but also with a new and overpowering yearning. He who would fain
 emancipate art, and reinstall its sanctity, now desecrated, must first
 have freed himself from all contact with modern souls; only as an
 innocent being himself can he hope to discover the innocence of art,
 for he must be ready to perform the stupendous tasks of
 self-purification and self-consecration. If he succeeded, if he were
 ever able to address men from out his enfranchised soul and by means
 of his emancipated art, he would then find himself exposed to the
 greatest of dangers and involved in the most appalling of struggles.
 Man would prefer to tear him and his art to pieces, rather than
 acknowledge that he must die of shame in presence of them. It is just
 possible that the emancipation of art is the only ray of hope
 illuminating the future, an event intended only for a few isolated
 souls, while the many remain satisfied to gaze into the flickering and
 smoking flame of their art and can endure to do so. For they do not
 want to be enlightened, but dazzled. They rather hate light --more
 particularly when it is thrown on themselves.
 
 That is why they evade the new messenger of light; but he follows
 them--the love which gave him birth compels him to follow them and to
 reduce them to submission. "Ye must go through my mysteries," he cries
 to them; "ye need to be purified and shaken by them. Dare to submit to
 this for your own salvation, and abandon the gloomily lighted corner
 of life and nature which alone seems familiar to you. I lead you into
 a kingdom which is also real, and when I lead you out of my cell into
 your daylight, ye will be able to judge which life is more real,
 which, in fact, is day and which night. Nature is much richer, more
 powerful, more blessed and more terrible below the surface; ye cannot
 divine this from the way in which ye live. O that ye yourselves could
 learn to become natural again, and then suffer yourselves to be
 transformed through nature, and into her, by the charm of my ardour
 and love!"
 
 It is the voice of Wagner's art which thus appeals to men. And that
 we, the children of a wretched age, should be the first to hear it,
 shows how deserving of pity this age must be: it shows, moreover, that
 real music is of a piece with fate and primitive law; for it is quite
 impossible to attribute its presence amongst us precisely at the
 present time to empty and meaningless chance. Had Wagner been an
 accident, he would certainly have been crushed by the superior
 strength of the other elements in the midst of which he was placed,
 out in the coming of Wagner there seems to have been a necessity which
 both justifies it and makes it glorious. Observed from its earliest
 beginnings, the development of his art constitutes a most magnificent
 spectacle, and--even though it was attended with great
 suffering--reason, law, and intention mark its course throughout.
 Under the charm of such a spectacle the observer will be led to take
 pleasure even in this painful development itself, and will regard it
 as fortunate. He will see how everything necessarily contributes to
 the welfare and benefit of talent and a nature foreordained, however
 severe the trials may be through which it may have to pass. He will
 realise how every danger gives it more heart, and every triumph more
 prudence; how it partakes of poison and sorrow and thrives upon them.
 The mockery and perversity of the surrounding world only goad and spur
 it on the more. Should it happen to go astray, it but returns from its
 wanderings and exile loaded with the most precious spoil; should it
 chance to slumber, "it does but recoup its strength." It tempers the
 body itself and makes it tougher; it does not consume life, however
 long it lives; it rules over man like a pinioned passion, and allows
 him to fly just in the nick of time, when his foot has grown weary in
 the sand or has been lacerated by the stones on his way. It can do
 nought else but impart; every one must share in its work, and it is no
 stinted giver. When it is repulsed it is but more prodigal in its
 gifts; ill used by those it favours, it does but reward them with the
 richest treasures it possesses,--and, according to the oldest and most
 recent experience, its favoured ones have never been quite worthy of
 its gifts. That is why the nature foreordained, through which music
 expresses itself to this world of appearance, is one of the most
 mysterious things under the sun--an abyss in which strength and
 goodness lie united, a bridge between self and non-self. Who would
 undertake to name the object of its existence with any
 certainty?--even supposing the sort of purpose which it would be
 likely to have could be divined at all. But a most blessed foreboding
 leads one to ask whether it is possible for the grandest things to
 exist for the purpose of the meanest, the greatest talent for the
 benefit of the smallest, the loftiest virtue and holiness for the sake
 of the defective and faulty? Should real music make itself heard,
 because mankind of all creatures least deserves to hear it, though it
 perhaps need it most? If one ponder over the transcendental and
 wonderful character of this possibility, and turn from these
 considerations to look back on life, a light will then be seen to
 ascend, however dark and misty it may have seemed a moment before.
 
                                  VII.
 
 It is quite impossible otherwise: the observer who is confronted with
 a nature such as Wagner's must, willy-nilly, turn his eyes from time
 to time upon himself, upon his insignificance and frailty, and ask
 himself, What concern is this of thine? Why, pray, art thou there at
 all? Maybe he will find no answer to these questions, in which case he
 will remain estranged and confounded, face to face with his own
 personality. Let it then suffice him that he has experienced this
 feeling; let the fact that he has felt strange and embarrassed in the
 presence of his own soul be the answer to his question For it is
 precisely by virtue of this feeling that he shows the most powerful
 manifestation of life in Wagner--the very kernel of his strength--that
 demoniacal magnetism and gift of imparting oneself to others, which is
 peculiar to his nature, and by which it not only conveys itself to
 other beings, but also absorbs other beings into itself; thus
 attaining to its greatness by giving and by taking. As the observer is
 apparently subject to Wagner's exuberant and prodigally generous
 nature, he partakes of its strength, and thereby becomes formidable
 through him and to him. And every one who critically examines himself
 knows that a certain mysterious antagonism is necessary to the process
 of mutual study. Should his art lead us to experience all that falls
 to the lot of a soul engaged upon a journey, i.e. feeling sympathy
 with others and sharing their fate, and seeing the world through
 hundreds of different eyes, we are then able, from such a distance,
 and under such strange influences, to contemplate him, once we have
 lived his life. We then feel with the utmost certainty that in Wagner
 the whole visible world desires to be spiritualised, absorbed, and
 lost in the world of sounds. In Wagner, too, the world of sounds seeks
 to manifest itself as a phenomenon for the sight; it seeks, as it
 were, to incarnate itself. His art always leads him into two distinct
 directions, from the world of the play of sound to the mysterious and
 yet related world of visible things, and vice versa. He is continually
 forced--and the observer with him--to re-translate the visible into
 spiritual and primeval life, and likewise to perceive the most hidden
 interstices of the soul as something concrete and to lend it a visible
 body. This constitutes the nature of the dithyrambic dramatist, if the
 meaning given to the term includes also the actor, the poet, and the
 musician; a conception necessarily borrowed from schylus and the
 contemporary Greek artists--the only perfect examples of the
 dithyrambic dramatist before Wagner. If attempts have been made to
 trace the most wonderful developments to inner obstacles or
 deficiencies, if, for instance, in Goethe's case, poetry was merely
 the refuge of a foiled talent for painting; if one may speak of
 Schiller's dramas as of vulgar eloquence directed into uncommon
 channels; if Wagner himself tries to account for the development of
 music among the Germans by showing that, inasmuch as they are devoid
 of the entrancing stimulus of a natural gift for singing, they were
 compelled to take up instrumental music with the same profound
 seriousness as that with which their reformers took up
 Christianity,--if, on the same principle, it were sought to associate
 Wagner's development with an inner barrier of the same kind, it would
 then be necessary to recognise in him a primitive dramatic talent,
 which had to renounce all possibility of satisfying its needs by the
 quickest and most methods, and which found its salvation and its means
 of expression in drawing all arts to it for one great dramatic
 display. But then one would also have to assume that the most powerful
 musician, owing to his despair at having to appeal to people who were
 either only semi-musical or not musical at all, violently opened a
 road for himself to the other arts, in order to acquire that capacity
 for diversely communicating himself to others, by which he compelled
 them to understand him, by which he compelled the masses to understand
 him. However the development of the born dramatist may be pictured, in
 his ultimate expression he is a being free from all inner barriers and
 voids: the real, emancipated artist cannot help himself, he must think
 in the spirit of all the arts at once, as the mediator and intercessor
 between apparently separated spheres, the one who reinstalls the unity
 and wholeness of the artistic faculty, which cannot be divined or
 reasoned out, but can only be revealed by deeds themselves. But he in
 whose presence this deed is performed will be overcome by its gruesome
 and seductive charm: in a flash he will be confronted with a power
 which cancels both resistance and reason, and makes every detail of
 life appear irrational and incomprehensible. Carried away from
 himself, he seems to be suspended in a mysterious fiery element; he
 ceases to understand himself, the standard of everything has fallen
 from his hands; everything stereotyped and fixed begins to totter;
 every object seems to acquire a strange colour and to tell us its tale
 by means of new symbols;--one would need to be a Plato in order to
 discover, amid this confusion of delight and fear, how he accomplishes
 the feat, and to say to the dramatist: "Should a man come into our
 midst who possessed sufficient knowledge to simulate or imitate
 anything, we would honour him as something wonderful and holy; we
 would even anoint him and adorn his brow with a sacred diadem; but we
 would urge him to leave our circle for another, notwithstanding." It
 may be that a member of the Platonic community would have been able to
 chasten himself to such conduct: we, however, who live in a very
 different community, long for, and earnestly desire, the charmer to
 come to us, although we may fear him already,--and we only desire his
 presence in order that our society and the mischievous reason and
 might of which it is the incarnation may be confuted. A state of human
 civilisation, of human society, morality, order, and general
 organisation which would be able to dispense with the services of an
 imitative artist or mimic, is not perhaps so utterly inconceivable;
 but this Perhaps is probably the most daring that has ever been
 posited, and is equivalent to the gravest expression of doubt. The
 only man who ought to be at liberty to speak of such a possibility is
 he who could beget, and have the presentiment of, the highest phase of
 all that is to come, and who then, like Faust, would either be obliged
 to turn blind, or be permitted to become so. For we have no right to
 this blindness; whereas Plato, after he had cast that one glance into
 the ideal Hellenic, had the right to be blind to all Hellenism. For
 this reason, we others are in much greater need of art; because it was
 in the presence of the realistic that our eyes began to see, and we
 require the complete dramatist in order that he may relieve us, if
 only for an hour or so, of the insufferable tension arising from our
 knowledge of the chasm which lies between our capabilities and the
 duties we have to perform. With him we ascend to the highest pinnacle
 of feeling, and only then do we fancy we have returned to nature's
 unbounded freedom, to the actual realm of liberty. From this point of
 vantage we can see ourselves and our fellows emerge as something
 sublime from an immense mirage, and we see the deep meaning in our
 struggles, in our victories and defeats; we begin to find pleasure in
 the rhythm of passion and in its victim in the hero's every footfall
 we distinguish the hollow echo of death, and in its proximity we
 realise the greatest charm of life: thus transformed into tragic men,
 we return again to life with comfort in our souls. We are conscious of
 a new feeling of security, as if we had found a road leading out of
 the greatest dangers, excesses, and ecstasies, back to the limited and
 the familiar: there where our relations with our fellows seem to
 partake of a superior benevolence, and are at all events more noble
 than they were. For here, everything seemingly serious and needful,
 which appears to lead to a definite goal, resembles only detached
 fragments when compared with the path we ourselves have trodden, even
 in our dreams,-- detached fragments of that complete and grand
 experience whereof we cannot even think without a thrill. Yes, we
 shall even fall into danger and be tempted to take life too easily,
 simply because in art we were in such deadly earnest concerning it, as
 Wagner says somewhere anent certain incidents in his own life. For if
 we who are but the spectators and not the creators of this display of
 dithyrambic dramatic art, can almost imagine a dream to be more real
 than the actual experiences of our wakeful hours, how much more keenly
 must the creator realise this contrast! There he stands amid all the
 clamorous appeals and importunities of the day, and of the necessities
 of life; in the midst of Society and State--and as what does he stand
 there? Maybe he is the only wakeful one, the only being really and
 truly conscious, among a host of confused and tormented sleepers,
 among a multitude of deluded and suffering people. He may even feel
 like a victim of chronic insomnia, and fancy himself obliged to bring
 his clear, sleepless, and conscious life into touch with somnambulists
 and ghostly well-intentioned creatures. Thus everything that others
 regard as commonplace strikes him as weird, and he is tempted to meet
 the whole phenomenon with haughty mockery. But how peculiarly this
 feeling is crossed, when another force happens to join his quivering
 pride, the craving of the heights for the depths, the affectionate
 yearning for earth, for happiness and for fellowship--then, when he
 thinks of all he misses as a hermit-creator, he feels as though he
 ought to descend to the earth like a god, and bear all that is weak,
 human, and lost, "in fiery arms up to heaven," so as to obtain love
 and no longer worship only, and to be able to lose himself completely
 in his love. But it is just this contradiction which is the miraculous
 fact in the soul of the dithyrambic dramatist, and if his nature can
 be understood at all, surely it must be here. For his creative moments
 in art occur when the antagonism between his feelings is at its height
 and when his proud astonishment and wonder at the world combine with
 the ardent desire to approach that same world as a lover. The glances
 he then bends towards the earth are always rays of sunlight which
 "draw up water," form mist, and gather storm-clouds. Clear-sighted and
 prudent, loving and unselfish at the same time, his glance is
 projected downwards; and all things that are illumined by this double
 ray of light, nature conjures to discharge their strength, to reveal
 their most hidden secret, and this through bashfulness. It is more
 than a mere figure of speech to say that he surprised Nature with that
 glance, that he caught her naked; that is why she would conceal her
 shame by seeming precisely the reverse. What has hitherto been
 invisible, the inner life, seeks its salvation in the region of the
 visible; what has hitherto been only visible, repairs to the dark
 ocean of sound: thus Nature, in trying to conceal herself, unveils the
 character of her contradictions. In a dance, wild, rhythmic and
 gliding, and with ecstatic movements, the born dramatist makes known
 something of what is going on within him, of what is taking place in
 nature: the dithyrambic quality of his movements speaks just as
 eloquently of quivering comprehension and of powerful penetration as
 of the approach of love and self-renunciation. Intoxicated speech
 follows the course of this rhythm; melody resounds coupled with
 speech, and in its turn melody projects its sparks into the realm of
 images and ideas. A dream-apparition, like and unlike the image of
 Nature and her wooer, hovers forward; it condenses into more human
 shapes; it spreads out in response to its heroically triumphant will,
 and to a most delicious collapse and cessation of will:--thus tragedy
 is born; thus life is presented with its grandest knowledge-- that of
 tragic thought; thus, at last, the greatest charmer and benefactor
 among mortals--the dithyrambic dramatist--is evolved.
 
                                 VIII.
 
 Wagner's actual life--that is to say, the gradual evolution of the
 dithyrambic dramatist in him-- was at the same time an uninterrupted
 struggle with himself, a struggle which never ceased until his
 evolution was complete. His fight with the opposing world was grim and
 ghastly, only because it was this same world--this alluring
 enemy--which he heard speaking out of his own heart, and because he
 nourished a violent demon in his breast--the demon of resistance. When
 the ruling idea of his life gained ascendancy over his mind--the idea
 that drama is, of all arts, the one that can exercise the greatest
 amount of influence over the world--it aroused the most active
 emotions in his whole being. It gave him no very clear or luminous
 decision, at first, as to what was to be done and desired in the
 future; for the idea then appeared merely as a form of
 temptation--that is to say, as the expression of his gloomy, selfish,
 and insatiable will, eager for power and glory. Influence--the
 greatest amount of influence--how? over whom?--these were henceforward
 the questions and problems which did not cease to engage his head and
 his heart. He wished to conquer and triumph as no other artist had
 ever done before, and, if possible, to reach that height of tyrannical
 omnipotence at one stroke for which all his instincts secretly craved.
 With a jealous and cautious eye, he took stock of everything
 successful, and examined with special care all that upon which this
 influence might be brought to bear. With the magic sight of the
 dramatist, which scans souls as easily as the most familiar book, he
 scrutinised the nature of the spectator and the listener, and although
 he was often perturbed by the discoveries he made, he very quickly
 found means wherewith he could enthral them. These means were ever
 within his reach: everything that moved him deeply he desired and
 could also produce; at every stage in his career he understood just as
 much of his predecessors as he himself was able to create, and he
 never doubted that he would be able to do what they had done. In this
 respect his nature is perhaps more presumptuous even than Goethe's,
 despite the fact that the latter said of himself: "I always thought I
 had mastered everything; and even had I been crowned king, I should
 have regarded the honour as thoroughly deserved." Wagner's ability.
 his taste and his aspirations--all of which have ever been as closely
 related as key to lock--grew and attained to freedom together; but
 there was a time when it was not so. What did he care about the feeble
 but noble and egotistically lonely feeling which that friend of art
 fosters, who, blessed with a literary and aesthetic education, takes
 his stand far from the common mob! But those violent spiritual
 tempests which are created by the crowd when under the influence of
 certain climactic passages of dramatic song, that sudden bewildering
 ecstasy of the emotions, thoroughly honest and selfless--they were but
 echoes of his own experiences and sensations, and filled him with
 glowing hope for the greatest possible power and effect. Thus he
 recognised grand opera as the means whereby he might express his
 ruling thoughts; towards it his passions impelled him; his eyes turned
 in the direction of its home. The larger portion of his life, his most
 daring wanderings, and his plans, studies, sojourns, and acquaintances
 are only to be explained by an appeal to these passions and the
 opposition of the outside world, which the poor, restless,
 passionately ingenuous German artist had to face. Another artist than
 he knew better how to become master of this calling, and now that it
 has gradually become known by means of what ingenious artifices of all
 kinds Meyerbeer succeeded in preparing and achieving every one of his
 great successes, and how scrupulously the sequence of "effects" was
 taken into account in the opera itself, people will begin to
 understand how bitterly Wagner was mortified when his eyes were opened
 to the tricks of the metier which were indispensable to a great public
 success. I doubt whether there has ever been another great artist in
 history who began his career with such extraordinary illusions and who
 so unsuspectingly and sincerely fell in with the most revolting form
 of artistic trickery. And yet the way in which he proceeded partook of
 greatness and was therefore extraordinarily fruitful. For when he
 perceived his error, despair made him understand the meaning of modern
 success, of the modern public, and the whole prevaricating spirit of
 modern art. And while becoming the critic of "effect," indications of
 his own purification began to quiver through him. It seems as if from
 that time forward the spirit of music spoke to him with an
 unprecedented spiritual charm. As though he had just risen from a long
 illness and had for the first time gone into the open, he scarcely
 trusted his hand and his eye, and seemed to grope along his way. Thus
 it was an almost delightful surprise to him to find that he was still
 a musician and an artist, and perhaps then only for the first time.
 
 Every subsequent stage in Wagner's development may be distinguished
 thus, that the two fundamental powers of his nature drew ever more
 closely together: the aversion of the one to the other lessened, the
 higher self no longer condescended to serve its more violent and baser
 brother; it loved him and felt compelled to serve him. The tenderest
 and purest thing is ultimately--that is to say, at the highest stage
 of its evolution-- always associated with the mightiest; the storming
 instincts pursue their course as before, but along different roads, in
 the direction of the higher self; and this in its turn descends to
 earth and finds its likeness in everything earthly. If it were
 possible, on this principle, to speak of the final aims and
 unravelments of that evolution, and to remain intelligible, it might
 also be possible to discover the graphic terms with which to describe
 the long interval preceding that last development; but I doubt whether
 the first achievement is possible at all, and do not therefore attempt
 the second. The limits of the interval separating the preceding and
 the subsequent ages will be described historically in two sentences:
 Wagner was the revolutionist of society; Wagner recognised the only
 artistic element that ever existed hitherto--the poetry of the people.
 The ruling idea which in a new form and mightier than it had ever
 been, obsessed Wagner, after he had overcome his share of despair and
 repentance, led him to both conclusions. Influence, the greatest
 possible amount of influence to be exercised by means of the stage!
 --but over whom? He shuddered when he thought of those whom he had,
 until then, sought to influence. His experience led him to realise the
 utterly ignoble position which art and the artist adorn; how a callous
 and hard-hearted community that calls itself the good, but which is
 really the evil, reckons art and the artist among its slavish retinue,
 and keeps them both in order to minister to its need of deception.
 Modern art is a luxury; he saw this, and understood that it must stand
 or fall with the luxurious society of which it forms but a part. This
 society had but one idea, to use its power as hard-heartedly and as
 craftily as possible in order to render the impotent--the people--ever
 more and more serviceable, base and unpopular, and to rear the modern
 workman out of them. It also robbed them of the greatest and purest
 things which their deepest needs led them to create, and through which
 they meekly expressed the genuine and unique art within their soul:
 their myths, songs, dances, and their discoveries in the department of
 language, in order to distil therefrom a voluptuous antidote against
 the fatigue and boredom of its existence-- modern art. How this
 society came into being, how it learned to draw new strength for
 itself from the seemingly antagonistic spheres of power, and how, for
 instance, decaying Christianity allowed itself to be used, under the
 cover of half measures and subterfuges, as a shield against the masses
 and as a support of this society and its possessions, and finally how
 science and men of learning pliantly consented to become its
 drudges--all this Wagner traced through the ages, only to be convulsed
 with loathing at the end of his researches. Through his compassion for
 the people, he became a revolutionist. From that time forward he loved
 them and longed for them, as he longed for his art; for, alas! in them
 alone, in this fast disappearing, scarcely recognisable body,
 artificially held aloof, he now saw the only spectators and listeners
 worthy and fit for the power of his masterpieces, as he pictured them.
 Thus his thoughts concentrated themselves upon the question, How do
 the people come into being? How are they resuscitated?
 
 He always found but one answer: if a large number of people were
 afflicted with the sorrow that afflicted him, that number would
 constitute the people, he said to himself. And where the same sorrow
 leads to the same impulses and desires, similar satisfaction would
 necessarily be sought, and the same pleasure found in this
 satisfaction. If he inquired into what it was that most consoled him
 and revived his spirits in his sorrow, what it was that succeeded best
 in counteracting his affliction, it was with joyful certainty that he
 discovered this force only in music and myth, the latter of which he
 had already recognised as the people's creation and their language of
 distress. It seemed to him that the origin of music must be similar,
 though perhaps more mysterious. In both of these elements he steeped
 and healed his soul; they constituted his most urgent need:--in this
 way he was able to ascertain how like his sorrow was to that of the
 people, when they came into being, and how they must arise anew if
 many Wagners are going to appear. What part did myth and music play in
 modern society, wherever they had not been actually sacrificed to it?
 They shared very much the same fate, a fact which only tends to prove
 their close relationship: myth had been sadly debased and usurped by
 idle tales and stories; completely divested of its earnest and sacred
 virility, it was transformed into the plaything and pleasing bauble of
 children and women of the afflicted people. Music had kept itself
 alive among the poor, the simple, and the isolated; the German
 musician had not succeeded in adapting himself to the luxurious
 traffic of the arts; he himself had become a fairy tale full Of
 monsters and mysteries, full of the most touching omens and
 auguries--a helpless questioner, something bewitched and in need of
 rescue. Here the artist distinctly heard the command that concerned
 him alone--to recast myth and make it virile, to break the spell lying
 over music and to make music speak: he felt his strength for drama
 liberated at one stroke, and the foundation of his sway established
 over the hitherto undiscovered province lying between myth and music.
 His new masterpiece, which included all the most powerful, effective,
 and entrancing forces that he knew, he now laid before men with this
 great and painfully cutting question: "Where are ye all who suffer and
 think as I do? Where is that number of souls that I wish to see become
 a people, that ye may share the same joys and comforts with me? In
 your joy ye will reveal your misery to me." These were his questions
 in Tannhauser and Lohengrin, in these operas he looked about him for
 his equals --the anchorite yearned for the number.
 
 But what were his feelings withal? Nobody answered him. Nobody had
 understood his question. Not that everybody remained silent: on the
 contrary, answers were given to thousands of questions which he had
 never put; people gossipped about the new masterpieces as though they
 had only been composed for the express purpose of supplying subjects
 for conversation. The whole mania of aesthetic scribbling and small
 talk overtook the Germans like a pestilence, and ith that lack of
 modesty which characterises both German scholars and German
 journalists, people began measuring, and generally meddling with,
 these masterpieces, as well as with the person of the artist. Wagner
 tried to help the comprehension of his question by writing about it;
 but this only led to fresh confusion and more uproar, --for a musician
 who writes and thinks was, at that time, a thing unknown. The cry
 arose: "He is a theorist who wishes to remould art with his
 far-fetched notions--stone him!" Wagner was stunned: his question was
 not understood, his need not felt; his masterpieces seemed a message
 addressed only to the deaf and blind; his people-- an hallucination.
 He staggered and vacillated. The feasibility of a complete upheaval of
 all things then suggested itself to him, and he no longer shrank from
 the thought: possibly, beyond this revolution and dissolution, there
 might be a chance of a new hope; on the other hand, there might not.
 But, in any case, would not complete annihilation be better than the
 wretched existing state of affairs? Not very long afterwards, he was a
 political exile in dire distress.
 
 And then only, with this terrible change in his environment and in his
 soul, there begins that period of the great man's life over which as a
 golden reflection there is stretched the splendour of highest mastery.
 Now at last the genius of dithyrambic drama doffs its last disguise.
 He is isolated; the age seems empty to him; he ceases to hope; and his
 all-embracing glance descend once more into the deep, and finds the
 bottom, there he sees suffering in the nature of things, and
 henceforward, having become more impersonal, he accepts his portion of
 sorrow more calmly. The desire for great power which was but the
 inheritance of earlier conditions is now directed wholly into the
 channel of creative art; through his art he now speaks only to
 himself, and no longer to a public or to a people, and strives to lend
 this intimate conversation all the distinction and other qualities in
 keeping with such a mighty dialogue. During the preceding period
 things had been different with his art; then he had concerned himself,
 too, albeit with refinement and subtlety, with immediate effects: that
 artistic production was also meant as a question, and it ought to have
 called forth an immediate reply. And how often did Wagner not try to
 make his meaning clearer to those he questioned! In view of their
 inexperience in having questions put to them, he tried to meet them
 half way and to conform with older artistic notions and means of
 expression. When he feared that arguments couched in his own terms
 would only meet with failure, he had tried to persuade and to put his
 question in a language half strange to himself though familiar to his
 listeners. Now there was nothing to induce him to continue this
 indulgence: all he desired now was to come to terms with himself, to
 think of the nature of the world in dramatic actions, and to
 philosophise in music; what desires he still possessed turned in the
 direction of the latest philosophical views. He who is worthy of
 knowing what took place in him at that time or what questions were
 thrashed out in the darkest holy of holies in his soul--and not many
 are worthy of knowing all this--must hear, observe, and experience
 Tristan and Isolde, the real opus metaphysicum of all art, a work upon
 which rests the broken look of a dying man with his insatiable and
 sweet craving for the secrets of night and death, far away from life
 which throws a horribly spectral morning light, sharply, upon all that
 is evil, delusive, and sundering: moreover, a drama austere in the
 severity of its form, overpowering in its simple grandeur, and in
 harmony with the secret of which it treats--lying dead in the midst of
 life, being one in two. And yet there is something still more
 wonderful than this work, and that is the artist himself, the man who,
 shortly after he had accomplished it, was able to create a picture of
 life so full of clashing colours as the Meistersingers of Nurnberg,
 and who in both of these compositions seems merely to have refreshed
 and equipped himself for the task of completing at his ease that
 gigantic edifice in four parts which he had long ago planned and
 begun--the ultimate result of all his meditations and poetical flights
 for over twenty years, his Bayreuth masterpiece, the Ring of the
 Nibelung! He who marvels at the rapid succession of the two operas,
 Tristan and the Meistersingers, has failed to understand one important
 side of the life and nature of all great Germans: he does not know the
 peculiar soil out of which that essentially German gaiety, which
 characterised Luther, Beethoven, and Wagner, can grow, the gaiety
 which other nations quite fail to understand and which even seems to
 be missing in the Germans of to-day--that clear golden and thoroughly
 fermented mixture of simplicity, deeply discriminating love,
 observation, and roguishness which Wagner has dispensed, as the most
 precious of drinks, to all those who have suffered deeply through
 life, but who nevertheless return to it with the smile of
 convalescents. And, as he also turned upon the world the eyes of one
 reconciled, he was more filled with rage and disgust than with sorrow,
 and more prone to renounce the love of power than to shrink in awe
 from it. As he thus silently furthered his greatest work and gradually
 laid score upon score, something happened which caused him to stop and
 listen: friends were coming, a kind of subterranean movement of many
 souls approached with a message for him--it was still far from being
 the people that constituted this movement and which wished to bear him
 news, but it may have been the nucleus and first living source of a
 really human community which would reach perfection in some age still
 remote. For the present they only brought him the warrant that his
 great work could be entrusted to the care and charge of faithful men,
 men who would watch and be worthy to watch over this most magnificent
 of all legacies to posterity. In the love of friends his outlook began
 to glow with brighter colours; his noblest care--the care that his
 work should be accomplished and should find a refuge before the
 evening of his life--was not his only preoccupation. something
 occurred which he could only understand as a symbol: it was as much as
 a new comfort and a new token of happiness to him. A great German war
 caused him to open his eyes, and he observed that those very Germans
 whom he considered so thoroughly degenerate and so inferior to the
 high standard of real Teutonism, of which he had formed an ideal both
 from self-knowledge and the conscientious study of other great Germans
 in history; he observed that those very Germans were, in the midst of
 terrible circumstances, exhibiting two virtues of the highest
 order--simple bravery and prudence; and with his heart bounding with
 delight he conceived the hope that he might not be the last German,
 and that some day a greater power would perhaps stand by his works
 than that devoted yet meagre one consisting of his little band of
 friends--a power able to guard it during that long period preceding
 its future glory, as the masterpiece of this future. Perhaps it was
 not possible to steel this belief permanently against doubt, more
 particularly when it sought to rise to hopes of immediate results:
 suffice it that he derived a tremendous spur from his environment,
 which constantly reminded him of a lofty duty ever to be fulfilled.
 
 His work would not have been complete had he handed it to the world
 only in the form of silent manuscript. He must make known to the world
 what it could not guess in regard to his productions, what was his
 alone to reveal--the new style for the execution and presentation of
 his works, so that he might set that example which nobody else could
 set, and thus establish a tradition of style, not on paper, not by
 means of signs, but through impressions made upon the very souls of
 men. This duty had become all the more pressing with him, seeing that
 precisely in regard to the style of their execution his other works
 had meanwhile succumbed to the most insufferable and absurd of fates:
 they were famous and admired, yet no one manifested the slightest sign
 of indignation when they were mishandled. For, strange to say, whereas
 he renounced ever more and more the hope of success among his
 contemporaries, owing to his all too thorough knowledge of them, and
 disclaimed all desire for power, both "success" and "power" came to
 him, or at least everybody told him so. It was in vain that he made
 repeated attempts to expose, with the utmost clearness, how worthless
 and humiliating such successes were to him: people were so unused to
 seeing an artist able to differentiate at all between the effects of
 his works that even his most solemn protests were never entirely
 trusted. Once he had perceived the relationship existing between our
 system of theatres and their success, and the men of his time, his
 soul ceased to be attracted by the stage at all. He had no further
 concern with aesthetic ecstasies and the exultation of excited crowds,
 and he must even have felt angry to see his art being gulped down
 indiscriminately by the yawning abyss of boredom and the insatiable
 love of distraction. How flat and pointless every effect proved under
 these circumstances-- more especially as it was much more a case of
 having to minister to one quite insatiable than of cloying the hunger
 of a starving man-- Wagner began to perceive from the following
 repeated experience: everybody, even the performers and promoters,
 regarded his art as nothing more nor less than any other kind of
 stage-music, and quite in keeping with the repulsive style of
 traditional opera; thanks to the efforts of cultivated conductors, his
 works were even cut and hacked about, until, after they had been
 bereft of all their spirit, they were held to be nearer the
 professional singer's plane. But when people tried to follow Wagner's
 instructions to the letter, they proceeded so clumsily and timidly
 that they were not incapable of representing the midnight riot in the
 second act of the Meistersingers by a group of ballet-dancers. They
 seemed to do all this, however, in perfectly good faith--without the
 smallest evil intention. Wagner's devoted efforts to show, by means of
 his own example, the correct and complete way of performing his works,
 and his attempts at training individual singers in the new style, were
 foiled time after time, owing only to the thoughtlessness and iron
 tradition that ruled all around him. Moreover, he was always induced
 to concern himself with that class of theatricals which he most
 thoroughly loathed. Had not even Goethe, m his time, once grown tired
 of attending the rehearsals of his Iphigenia? "I suffer unspeakably,"
 he explained, "when I have to tumble about Wlth these spectres, which
 never seem to act as they should." Meanwhile Wagner's "success" in the
 kind of drama which he most disliked steadily increased; so much so,
 indeed, that the largest theatres began to subsist almost entirely
 upon the receipts which Wagner's art, in the guise of operas, brought
 into them. This growing passion on the part of the theatre-going
 public bewildered even some of Wagner's friends; but this man who had
 endured so much, had still to endure the bitterest pain of all--he had
 to see his friends intoxicated with his "successes" and "triumphs"
 everywhere where his highest ideal was openly belied and shattered. It
 seemed almost as though a people otherwise earnest and reflecting had
 decided to maintain an attitude of systematic levity only towards its
 most serious artist, and to make him the privileged recipient of all
 the vulgarity, thoughtlessness, clumsiness, and malice of which the
 German nature is capable. When, therefore, during the German War, a
 current of greater magnanimity and freedom seemed to run through every
 one, Wagner remembered the duty to which he had pledged himself,
 namely, to rescue his greatest work from those successes and affronts
 which were so largely due to misunderstandings, and to present it in
 his most personal rhythm as an example for all times. Thus he
 conceived the idea of Bayreuth. In the wake of that current of better
 feeling already referred to, he expected to notice an enhanced sense
 of duty even among those with whom he wished to entrust his most
 precious possession. Out of this two-fold duty, that event took shape
 which, like a glow of strange sunlight, will illumine the few years
 that lie behind and before us, and was designed to bless that distant
 and problematic future which to our time and to the men of our time
 can be little more than a riddle or a horror, but which to the fevv
 who are allowed to assist in its realisation is a foretaste of coming
 joy, a foretaste of love in a higher sphere, through which they know
 themselves to be blessed, blessing and fruitful, far beyond their span
 of years; and which to Wagner himself is but a cloud of distress,
 care, meditation, and grief, a fresh passionate outbreak of
 antagonistic elements, but all bathed in the starlight of selfless
 fidelity, and changed by this light into indescribable joy.
 
 It scarcely need be said that it is the breath of tragedy that fills
 the lungs of the world. And every one whose innermost soul has a
 presentiment of this, every one unto whom the yoke of tragic deception
 concerning the aim of life, the distortion and shattering of
 intentions, renunciation and purification through love, are not
 unknown things, must be conscious of a vague reminiscence of Wagner's
 own heroic life, in the masterpieces with which the great man now
 presents us. We shall feel as though Siegfried from some place far
 away were relating his deeds to us: the most blissful of touching
 recollections are always draped in the deep mourning of waning summer,
 when all nature lies still in the sable twilight.
 
                                  IX.
 
 All those to whom the thought of Wagner's development as a man may
 have caused pain will find it both restful and healing to reflect upon
 what he was as an artist, and to observe how his ability and daring
 attained to such a high degree of independence. If art mean only the
 faculty of communicating to others what one has oneself experienced,
 and if every work of art confutes itself which does not succeed in
 making itself understood, then Wagner's greatness as an artist would
 certainly lie in the almost demoniacal power of his nature to
 communicate with others, to express itself in all languages at once,
 and to make known its most intimate and personal experience with the
 greatest amount of distinctness possible. His appearance in the
 history of art resembles nothing so much as a volcanic eruption of the
 united artistic faculties of Nature herself, after mankind had grown
 to regard the practice of a special art as a necessary rule. It is
 therefore a somewhat moot point whether he ought to be classified as a
 poet, a painter, or a musician, even using each these words in its
 widest sense, or whether a new word ought not to be invented in order
 to describe him.
 
 Wagner's poetic ability is shown by his thinking in visible and actual
 facts, and not in ideas; that is to say, he thinks mythically, as the
 people have always done. No particular thought lies at the bottom of a
 myth, as the children of an artificial ulture would have us believe;
 but it is in itself a thought: it conveys an idea of the world, but
 through the medium of a chain of events, actions, and pains. The Ring
 of the Nihelung is a huge system of thought without the usual
 abstractness of the latter. It were perhaps possible for a philosopher
 to present us with its exact equivalent in pure thought, and to purge
 it of all pictures drawn from life, and of all living actions, in
 which case we should be in possession of the same thing portrayed in
 two completely different forms--the one for the people, and the other
 for the very reverse of the people; that is to say, men of theory. But
 Wagner makes no appeal to this last class, for the man of theory can
 know as little of poetry or myth as the deaf man can know of music;
 both of them being conscious only of movements which seem meaningless
 to them. It is impossible to appreciate either one of these completely
 different forms from the standpoint of the other: as long as the
 poet's spell is upon one, one thinks with him just as though one were
 merely a feeling, seeing, and hearing creature; the conclusions thus
 reached are merely the result of the association of the phenomena one
 sees, and are therefore not logical but actual causalities.
 
 If, therefore, the heroes and gods of mythical dramas, as understood
 by Wagner, were to express themselves plainly in words, there would be
 a danger (inasmuch as the language of words might tend to awaken the
 theoretical side in us) of our finding ourselves transported from the
 world of myth to the world of ideas, and the result would be not only
 that we should fail to understand with greater ease, but that we
 should probably not understand at all. Wagner thus forced language
 back to a more primeval stage in its development a stage at which it
 was almost free of the abstract element, and was still poetry,
 imagery, and feeling; the fearlessness with which Wagner undertook
 this formidable mission shows how imperatively he was led by the
 spirit of poetry, as one who must follow whithersoever his phantom
 leader may direct him. Every word in these dramas ought to allow of
 being sung, and gods and heroes should make them their own--that was
 the task which Wagner set his literary faculty. Any other person in
 like circumstances would have given up all hope; for our language
 seems almost too old and decrepit to allow of one's exacting what
 Wagner exacted from it; and yet, when he smote the rock, he brought
 forth an abundant flow. Precisely owing to the fact that he loved his
 language and exacted a great deal from it, Wagner suffered more than
 any other German through its decay and enfeeblement, from its manifold
 losses and mutilations of form, from its unwieldy particles and clumsy
 construction, and from its unmusical auxiliary verbs. All these are
 things which have entered the language through sin and depravity. On
 the other hand, he was exceedingly proud to record the number of
 primitive and vigorous factors still extant in the current speech; and
 in the tonic strength of its roots he recognised quite a wonderful
 affinity and relation to real music, a quality which distinguished it
 from the highly volved and artificially rhetorical Latin languages.
 Wagner's poetry is eloquent of his affection for the German language,
 and there is a heartiness and candour in his treatment of it which are
 scarcely to be met with in any other German writer, save perhaps
 Goethe. Forcibleness of diction, daring brevity, power and variety in
 rhythm, a remarkable wealth of strong and striking words, simplicity
 in construction, an almost unique inventive faculty in regard to
 fluctuations of feeling and presentiment, and therewithal a perfectly
 pure and overflowing stream of colloquialisms--these are the qualities
 that have to be enumerated, and even then the greatest and most
 wonderful of all is omitted. Whoever reads two such poems as Tristan
 and the Meistersingers consecutively will be just as astonished and
 doubtful in regard to the language as to the music; for he will wonder
 how it could have been possible for a creative spirit to dominate so
 perfectly two worlds as different in form, colour, and arrangement, as
 in soul. This is the most wonderful achievement of Wagner's talent;
 for the ability to give every work its own linguistic stamp and to
 find a fresh body and a new sound for every thought is a task which
 only the great master can successfully accomplish. Where this rarest
 of all powers manifests itself, adverse criticism can be but petty and
 fruitless which confines itself to attacks upon certain excesses and
 eccentricities in the treatment, or upon the more frequent obscurities
 of expression and ambiguity of thought. Moreover, what seemed to
 electrify and scandalise those who were most bitter in their criticism
 was not so much the language as the spirit of the Wagnerian
 operas--that is to say, his whole manner of feeling and suffering. It
 were well to wait until these very critics have acquired another
 spirit themselves; they will then also speak a different tongue, and,
 by that time, it seems to me things will go better with the German
 language than they do at present.
 
 In the first place, however, no one who studies Wagner the poet and
 word-painter should forget that none of his dramas were meant to be
 read, and that it would therefore be unjust to judge them from the
 same standpoint as the spoken drama. The latter plays upon the
 feelings by means of words and ideas, and in this respect it is under
 the dominion of the laws of rhetoric. But in real life passion is
 seldom eloquent: in spoken drama it perforce must be, in order to be
 able to express itself at all. When, however, the language of a people
 is already in a state of decay and deterioration, the word-dramatist
 is tempted to impart an undue proportion of new colour and form both
 to his medium and to his thoughts; he would elevate the language in
 order to make it a vehicle capable of conveying lofty feelings, and by
 so doing he runs the risk of becoming abstruse. By means of sublime
 phrases and conceits he likewise tries to invest passion with some
 nobility, and thereby runs yet another risk, that of appearing false
 and artificial. For in real life passions do not speak in sentences,
 and the poetical element often draws suspicion upon their genuineness
 when it departs too palpably from reality. Now Wagner, who was the
 first to detect the essential feeling in spoken drama, presents every
 dramatic action threefold: in a word, in a gesture, and in a sound.
 For, as a matter of fact, music succeeds in conveying the deepest
 emotions of the dramatic performers direct to the spectators, and
 while these see the evidence of the actors' states of soul in their
 bearing and movements, a third though more feeble confirmation of
 these states, translated into conscious will, quickly follows in the
 form of the spoken word. All these effects fulfil their purpose
 simultaneously, without disturbing one another in the least, and urge
 the spectator to a completely new understanding and sympathy, just as
 if his senses had suddenly grown more spiritual and his spirit more
 sensual, and as if everything which seeks an outlet in him, and which
 makes him thirst for knowledge, were free and joyful in exultant
 perception. Because every essential factor in a Wagnerian drama is
 conveyed to the spectator with the utmost clearness, illumined and
 permeated throughout by music as by an internal flame, their author
 can dispense with the expedients usually employed by the writer of the
 spoken play in order to lend light and warmth to the action. The whole
 of the dramatist's stock in trade could be more simple, and the
 architect's sense of rhythm could once more dare to manifest itself in
 the general proportions of the edifice; for there was no more need of
 "the deliberate confusion and involved variety of tyles, whereby the
 ordinary playwright strove in the interests of his work to produce
 that feeling of wonder and thrilling suspense which he ultimately
 enhanced to one of delighted amazement. The impression of ideal
 distance and height was no more to be induced by means of tricks and
 artifices. Language withdrew itself from the length and breadth of
 rhetoric into the strong confines of the speech of the feelings, and
 although the actor spoke much less about all he did and felt in the
 performance, his innermost sentiments, which the ordinary playwright
 had hitherto ignored for fear of being undramatic, was now able to
 drive the spectators to passionate sympathy, while the accompanying
 language of gestures could be restricted to the most delicate
 modulations. Now, when passions are rendered in song, they require
 rather more time than when conveyed by speech; music prolongs, so to
 speak, the duration of the feeling, from which it follows, as a rule,
 that the actor who is also a singer must overcome the extremely
 unplastic animation from which spoken drama suffers. He feels himself
 incited all the more to a certain nobility of bearing, because music
 envelopes his feelings in a purer atmosphere, and thus brings them
 closer to beauty.
 
 The extraordinary tasks which Wagner set his actors and singers will
 provoke rivalry between them for ages to come, in the personification
 of each of his heroes with the greatest possible amount of clearness,
 perfection, and fidelity, according to that perfect incorporation
 already typified by the music of drama. Following this leader, the eye
 of the plastic artist will ultimately behold the marvels of another
 visible world, which, previous to him, was seen for the first time
 only by the creator of such works as the Ring of the Nibelung --that
 creator of highest rank, who, like AEschylus, points the way to a
 coming art. Must not jealousy awaken the greatest talent, if the
 plastic artist ever compares the effect of his productions with that
 of Wagnerian music, in which there is so much pure and sunny happiness
 that he who hears it feels as though all previous music had been but
 an alien, faltering, and constrained language; as though in the past
 it had been but a thing to sport with in the presence of those who
 were not deserving of serious treatment, or a thing with which to
 train and instruct those who were not even deserving of play? In the
 case of this earlier kind of music, the joy we always experience while
 listening to Wagner's compositions is ours only for a short space of
 time, and it would then seem as though it were overtaken by certain
 rare moments of forgetfulness, during which it appears to be communing
 with its inner self and directing its eyes upwards, like Raphael's
 Cecilia, away from the listeners and from all those who demand
 distraction, happiness, or instruction from it.
 
 In general it may be said of Wagner the Musician, that he endowed
 everything in nature which hitherto had had no wish to speak with the
 power of speech: he refuses to admit that anything must be dumb, and,
 resorting to the dawn, the forest, the mist, the cliffs, the hills,
 the thrill of night and the moonlight, he observes a desire common to
 them all--they too wish to sing their own melody. If the philosopher
 says it is will that struggles for existence in animate and inanimate
 nature, the musician adds: And this will wherever it manifests itself,
 yearns for a melodious existence.
 
 Before Wagner's time, music for the most part moved in narrow limits:
 it concerned itself with the permanent states of man, or with what the
 Greeks call ethos. And only with Beethoven did it begin to find the
 language of pathos, of passionate will, and of the dramatic
 occurrences in the souls of men. Formerly, what people desired was to
 interpret a mood, a stolid, merry, reverential, or penitential state
 of mind, by means of music; the object was, by means of a certain
 striking uniformity of treatment and the prolonged duration of this
 uniformity, to compel the listener to grasp the meaning of the music
 and to impose its mood upon him. To all such interpretations of mood
 or atmosphere, distinct and particular forms of treatment were
 necessary: others were established by convention. The question of
 length was left to the discretion of the musician, whose aim was not
 only to put the listener into a certain mood, but also to avoid
 rendering that mood monotonous by unduly protracting it. A further
 stage was reached when the interpretations of contrasted moods were
 made to follow one upon the other, and the charm of light and shade
 was discovered; and yet another step was made when the same piece of
 music was allowed to contain a contrast of the ethos--for instance,
 the contest between a male and a female theme. All these, however, are
 crude and primitive stages in the development of music. The fear of
 passion suggested the first rule, and the fear of monotony the second;
 all depth of feeling and any excess thereof were regarded as
 "unethical." Once, however, the art of the ethos had repeatedly been
 made to ring all the changes on the moods and situations which
 convention had decreed as suitable, despite the most astounding
 resourcefulness on the part of its masters, its powers were exhausted.
 Beethoven was the first to make music speak a new language--till then
 forbidden--the language of passion; but as his art was based upon the
 laws and conventions of the ETHOS, and had to attempt to justify
 itself in regard to them, his artistic development was beset with
 peculiar difficulties and obscurities. An inner dramatic factor--and
 every passion pursues a dramatic course--struggled to obtain a new
 form, but the traditional scheme of "mood music" stood in its way, and
 protested--almost after the manner in which morality opposes
 innovations and immorality. It almost seemed, therefore, as if
 Beethoven had set himself the contradictory task of expressing pathos
 in the terms of the ethos. This view does not, however, apply to
 Beethoven's latest and greatest works; for he really did succeed in
 discovering a novel method of expressing the grand and vaulting arch
 of passion. He merely selected certain portions of its curve; imparted
 these with the utmost clearness to his listeners, and then left it to
 them to divine its whole span. Viewed superficially, the new form
 seemed rather like an aggregation of several musical compositions, of
 which every one appeared to represent a sustained situation, but was
 in reality but a momentary stage in the dramatic course of a passion.
 The listener might think that he was hearing the old "mood" music over
 again, except that he failed to grasp the relation of the various
 parts to one another, and these no longer conformed with the canon of
 the law. Even among minor musicians, there flourished a certain
 contempt for the rule which enjoined harmony in the general
 construction of a composition and the sequence of the parts in their
 works still remained arbitrary. Then, owing to a misunderstanding, the
 discovery of the majestic treatment of passion led back to the use of
 the single movement with an optional setting, and the tension between
 the parts thus ceased completely. That is why the symphony, as
 Beethoven understood it, is such a wonderfully obscure production,
 more especially when, here and there, it makes faltering attempts at
 rendering Beethoven's pathos. The means ill befit the intention, and
 the intention is, on the whole, not sufficiently clear to the
 listener, because it was never really clear, even in the mind of the
 composer. But the very injunction that something definite must be
 imparted, and that this must be done as distinctly as possible,
 becomes ever more and more essential, the higher, more difficult, and
 more exacting the class of work happens to be.
 
 That is why all Wagner's efforts were concentrated upon the one object
 of discovering those means which best served the purpose of
 distinctness, and to this end it was above all necessary for him to
 emancipate himself from all the prejudices and claims of the old
 "mood" music, and to give his compositions--the musical
 interpretations of feelings and passion--a perfectly unequivocal mode
 of expression. If we now turn to what he has achieved, we see that his
 services to music are practically equal in rank to those which that
 sculptor-inventor rendered to sculpture who introduced "sculpture in
 the round." All previous music seems stiff and uncertain when compared
 with Wagner's, just as though it were ashamed and did not wish to be
 inspected from all sides. With the most consummate skill and
 precision, Wagner avails himself of every degree and colour in the
 realm of feeling; without the slightest hesitation or fear of its
 escaping him, he seizes upon the most delicate, rarest, and mildest
 emotion, and holds it fast, as though it had hardened at his touch,
 despite the fact that it may seem like the frailest butterfly to every
 one else. His music is never vague or dreamy; everything that is
 allowed to speak through it, whether it be of man or of nature, has a
 strictly individual passion; storm and fire acquire the ruling power
 of a personal will in his hands. Over all the clamouring characters
 and the clash of their passions, over the whole torrent of contrasts,
 an almighty and symphonic understanding hovers with perfect serenity,
 and continually produces concord out of war. Taken as a whole,
 Wagner's music is a reflex of the world as it was understood by the
 great Ephesian poet--that is to say, a harmony resulting from strife,
 as the union of justice and enmity. I admire the ability which could
 describe the grand line of universal passion out of a confusion of
 passions which all seem to be striking out in different directions:
 the fact that this was a possible achievement I find demonstrated in
 every individual act of a Wagnerian drama, which describes the
 individual history of various characters side by side with a general
 history of the whole company. Even at the very beginning we know we
 are watching a host of cross currents dominated by one great violent
 stream; and though at first this stream moves unsteadily over hidden
 reefs, and the torrent seems to be torn asunder as if it were
 travelling towards different points, gradually we perceive the central
 and general movement growing stronger and more rapid, the convulsive
 fury of the contending waters is converted into one broad, steady, and
 terrible flow in the direction of an unknown goal; and suddenly, at
 the end, the whole flood in all its breadth plunges into the depths,
 rejoicing demoniacally over the abyss and all its uproar. Wagner is
 never more himself than when he is overwhelmed with difficulties and
 can exercise power on a large scale with all the joy of a lawgiver. To
 bring restless and contending masses into simple rhythmic movement,
 and to exercise one will over a bewildering host of claims and
 desires--these are the tasks for which he feels he was born, and in
 the performance of which he finds freedom. And he never loses his
 breath withal, nor does he ever reach his goal panting. He strove just
 as persistently to impose the severest laws upon himself as to lighten
 the burden of others in this respect. Life and art weigh heavily upon
 him when he cannot play wit their most difficult questions. If one
 considers the relation between the melody of song and that of speech,
 one will perceive how he sought to adopt as his natural model the
 pitch, strength, and tempo of the passionate man's voice in order to
 transform it into art; and if one further considers the task of
 introducing this singing passion into the general symphonic order of
 music, one gets some idea of the stupendous difficulties he had to
 overcome. In this behalf, his inventiveness in small things as in
 great, his omniscience and industry are such, that at the sight of one
 of Wagner's scores one is almost led to believe that no real work or
 effort had ever existed before his time. It seems almost as if he too
 could have said, in regard to the hardships of art, that the real
 virtue of the dramatist lies in self-renunciation. But he would
 probably have added, There is but one kind of hardship-- that of the
 artist who is not yet free: virtue and goodness are trivial
 accomplishments.
 
 Viewing him generally as an artist, and calling to mind a more famous
 type, we see that Wagner is not at all unlike Demosthenes: in him also
 we have the terrible earnestness of purpose and that strong prehensile
 mind which always obtains a complete grasp of a thing; in him, too, we
 have the hand's quick clutch and the grip as of iron. Like
 Demosthenes, he conceals his art or compels one to forget it by the
 peremptory way he calls attention to the subject he treats; and yet,
 like his great predecessor, he is the last and greatest of a whole
 line of artist-minds, and therefore has more to conceal than his
 forerunners: his art acts like nature, like nature recovered and
 restored. Unlike all previous musicians, there is nothing bombastic
 about him; for the former did not mind playing at times with their
 art, and making an exhibition of their virtuosity. One associates
 Wagner's art neither with interest nor with diversion, nor with Wagner
 himself and art in general. All one is conscious of is of the great
 necessity of it all. No one will ever be able to appreciate what
 severity evenness of will, and self-control the artist required during
 his development, in order, at his zenith, to be able to do the
 necessary thing joyfully and freely. Let it suffice if we can
 appreciate how, in some respects, his music, with a certain cruelty
 towards itself, determines to subserve the course of the drama, which
 is as unrelenting as fate, whereas in reality his art was ever
 thirsting for a free ramble in the open and over the wilderness.
 
                                   X.
 
 An artist who has this empire over himself subjugates all other
 artists, even though he may not particularly desire to do so. For him
 alone there lies no danger or stemming-force in those he has
 subjugated--his friends and his adherents; whereas the weaker natures
 who learn to rely on their friends pay for this reliance by forfeiting
 their independence. It is very wonderful to observe how carefully,
 throughout his life, Wagner avoided anything in the nature of heading
 a party, notwithstanding the fact that at the close of every phase in
 his career a circle of adherents formed, presumably with the view of
 holding him fast to his latest development He always succeeded,
 however, in wringing himself free from them, and never allowed himself
 to be bound; for not only was the ground he covered too vast for one
 alone to keep abreast of him with any ease, but his way was so
 exceptionally steep that the most devoted would have lost his breath.
 At almost every stage in Wagner's progress his friends would have
 liked to preach to him, and his enemies would fain have done so
 too--but for other reasons. Had the purity of his artist's nature been
 one degree less decided than it was, he would have attained much
 earlier than he actually did to the leading position in the artistic
 and musical world of his time. True, he has reached this now, but in a
 much higher sense, seeing that every performance to be witnessed in
 any department of art makes its obeisance, so to speak, before the
 judgment-stool of his genius and of his artistic temperament. He has
 overcome the most refractory of his contemporaries; there is not one
 gifted musician among them but in his innermost heart would willingly
 listen to him, and find Wagner's compositions more worth listening to
 than his own and all other musical productions taken together. Many
 who wish, by hook or by crook, to make their mark, even wrestle with
 Wagner's secret charm, and unconsciously throw in their lot with the
 older masters, preferring to ascribe their "independence" to Schubert
 or Handel rather than to Wagner. But in vain! Thanks to their very
 efforts in contending against the dictates of their own consciences,
 they become ever meaner and smaller artists; they ruin their own
 natures by forcing themselves to tolerate undesirable allies and
 friends And in spite of all these sacrifices, they still find perhaps
 in their dreams, that their ear turns attentively to Wagner. These
 adversaries are to be pitied: they imagine they lose a great deal when
 they lose themselves, but here they are mistaken.
 
 Albeit it is obviously all one to Wagner whether musicians compose in
 his style, or whether they compose at all, he even does his utmost to
 dissipate the belief that a school of composers should now necessarily
 follow in his wake; though, in so far as he exercises a direct
 influence upon musicians, he does indeed try to instruct them
 concerning the art of grand execution. In his opinion, the evolution
 of art seems to have reached that stage when the honest endeavour to
 become an able and masterly exponent or interpreter is ever so much
 more worth talking about than the longing to be a creator at all
 costs. For, at the present stage of art, universal creating has this
 fatal result, that inasmuch as it encourages a much larger output, it
 tends to exhaust the means and artifices of genius by everyday use,
 and thus to reduce the real grandeur of its effect. Even that which is
 good in art is superfluous and detrimental when it proceeds from the
 imitation of what is best. Wagnerian ends and means are of one piece:
 to perceive this, all that is required is honesty in art matters, and
 it would be dishonest to adopt his means in order to apply them to
 other and less significant ends.
 
 If, therefore, Wagner declines to live on amid a multitude of creative
 musicians, he is only the more desirous of imposing upon all men of
 talent the new duty of joining him in seeking the law of style for
 dramatic performances. He deeply feels the need of establishing a
 traditional style for his art, by means of which his work may continue
 to live from one age to another in a pure form, until it reaches that
 future which its creator ordained for it.
 
 Wagner is impelled by an undaunted longing to make known everything
 relating to that foundation of a style, mentioned above, and,
 accordingly, everything relating to the continuance of his art. To
 make his work--as Schopenhauer would say-- a sacred depository and the
 real fruit of his life, as well as the inheritance of mankind, and to
 store it for the benefit of a posterity better able to appreciate
 it,--these were the supreme objects of his life, and for these he bore
 that crown of thorns which, one day, will shoot forth leaves of bay.
 Like the insect which, in its last form, concentrates all its energies
 upon the one object of finding a safe depository for its eggs and of
 ensuring the future welfare of its posthumous brood,--then only to die
 content, so Wagner strove with equal determination to find a place of
 security for his works.
 
 This subject, which took precedence of all others with him, constantly
 incited him to new discoveries; and these he sought ever more and more
 at the spring of his demoniacal gift of communicability, the more
 distinctly he saw himself in conflict with an age that was both
 perverse and unwilling to lend him its ear. Gradually however, even
 this same age began to mark his indefatigable efforts, to respond to
 his subtle advances, and to turn its ear to him. Whenever a small or a
 great opportunity arose, however far away, which suggested to Wagner a
 means wherewith to explain his thoughts, he availed himself of it: he
 thought his thoughts anew into every fresh set of circumstances, and
 would make them speak out of the most paltry bodily form. Whenever a
 soul only half capable of comprehending him opened itself to him, he
 never failed to implant his seed in it. He saw hope in things which
 caused the average dispassionate observer merely to shrug his
 shoulders; and he erred again and again, only so as to be able to
 carry his point against that same observer. Just as the sage, in
 reality, mixes with living men only for the purpose of increasing his
 store of knowledge, so the artist would almost seem to be unable to
 associate with his contemporaries at all, unless they be such as can
 help him towards making his work eternal. He cannot be loved otherwise
 than with the love of this eternity, and thus he is conscious only of
 one kind of hatred directed at him, the hatred which would demolish
 the bridges bearing his art into the future. The pupils Wagner
 educated for his own purpose, the individual musicians and actors whom
 he advised and whose ear he corrected and improved, the small and
 large orchestras he led, the towns which witnessed him earnestly
 fulfilling the duties of ws calling, the princes and ladies who half
 boastfully and half lovingly participated in the framing of his plans,
 the various European countries to which he temporarily belonged as the
 judge and evil conscience of their arts,--everything gradually became
 the echo of his thought and of his indefatigable efforts to attain to
 fruitfulness in the future. Although this echo often sounded so
 discordant as to confuse him, still the tremendous power of his voice
 repeatedly crying out into the world must in the end call forth
 reverberations, and it will soon be impossible to be deaf to him or to
 misunderstand him. It is this reflected sound which even now causes
 the art-institutions of modern men to shake: every time the breath of
 his spirit blew into these coverts, all that was overripe or withered
 fell to the ground; but the general increase of scepticism in all
 directions speaks more eloquently than all this trembling. Nobody any
 longer dares to predict where Wagner's influence may not unexpectedly
 break out. He is quite unable to divorce the salvation of art from any
 other salvation or damnation: wherever modern life conceals a danger,
 he, with the discriminating eye of mistrust, perceives a danger
 threatening art. In his imagination he pulls the edifice of modern
 civilisation to pieces, and allows nothing rotten, no unsound
 timber-work to escape: if in the process he should happen to encounter
 weather-tight walls or anything like solid foundations, he immediately
 casts about for means wherewith he can convert them into bulwarks and
 shelters for his art. He lives like a fugitive, whose will is not to
 preserve his own life, but to keep a secret-- like an unhappy woman
 who does not wish to save her own soul, but that of the child lying in
 her lap: in short, he lives like Sieglinde, "for the sake of love."
 
 For life must indeed be full of pain and shame to one who can find
 neither rest nor shelter in this world, and who must nevertheless
 appeal to it, exact things from it, contemn it, and still be unable to
 dispense with the thing contemned, --this really constitutes the
 wretchedness of the artist of the future, who, unlike the philosopher,
 cannot prosecute his work alone in the seclusion of a study, but who
 requires human souls as messengers to this future, public institutions
 as a guarantee of it, and, as it were, bridges between now and
 hereafter. His art may not, like the philosopher's, be put aboard the
 boat of written documents: art needs capable men, not letters and
 notes, to transmit it. Over whole periods in Wagner's life rings a
 murmur of distress--his distress at not being able to meet with these
 capable interpreters before whom he longed to execute examples of his
 work, instead of being confined to written symbols; before whom he
 yearned to practise his art, instead of showing a pallid reflection of
 it to those who read books, and who, generally speaking, therefore are
 not artists.
 
 In Wagner the man of letters we see the struggle of a brave fighter,
 whose right hand has, as it were, been lopped off, and who has
 continued the contest with his left. In his writings he is always the
 sufferer, because a temporary and insuperable destiny deprives him of
 his own and the correct way of conveying his thoughts--that is to say,
 in the form of apocalyptic and triumphant examples. His writings
 contain nothing canonical or severe: the canons are to be found in his
 works as a whole. Their literary side represents his attempts to
 understand the instinct which urged him to create his works and to get
 a glimpse of himself through them. If he succeeded in transforming his
 instincts into terms of knowledge, it was always with the hope that
 the reverse process might take place in the souls of his readers--it
 was with this intention that he wrote. Should it ultimately be proved
 that, in so doing, Wagner attempted the impossible, he would still
 only share the lot of all those who have meditated deeply on art; and
 even so he would be ahead of most of them in this, namely, that the
 strongest instinct for all arts harboured in him. I know of no written
 aesthetics that give more light than those of Wagner; all that can
 possibly be learnt concerning the origin of a work of art is to be
 found in them. He is one of the very great, who appeared amongst us a
 witness, and who is continually improving his testimony and making it
 ever clearer and freer; even when he stumbles as a scientist, sparks
 rise from the ground. Such tracts as "Beethoven," "Concerning the Art
 of Conducting," "Concerning Actors and Singers," "State and Religion,"
 silence all contradiction, and, like sacred reliquaries, impose upon
 all who approach them a calm, earnest, and reverential regard. Others,
 more particularly the earlier ones, including "Opera and Drama,"
 excite and agitate one; their rhythm is so uneven that, as prose they
 are bewildering. Their dialectics is constantly interrupted, and their
 course is more retarded than accelerated by outbursts of feeling; a
 certain reluctance on the part of the writer seems to hang over them
 like a pall, just as though the artist were somewhat ashamed of
 speculative discussions. What the reader who is only imperfectly
 initiated will probably find most oppressive is the general tone of
 authoritative dignity which is peculiar to Wagner, and which is very
 difficult to describe: it always strikes me as though Wagner were
 continually addressing enemies; for the style of all these tracts more
 resembles that of the spoken than of the written language, hence they
 will seem much more intelligible if heard read aloud, in the presence
 of his enemies, with whom he cannot be on familiar terms, and towards
 whom he must therefore show some reserve and aloofness, The entrancing
 passion of his feelings, however, constantly pierces this intentional
 disguise, and then the stilted and heavy periods, swollen with
 accessary words, vanish, and his pen dashes off sentences, and even
 whole pages, which belong to the best in German prose. But even
 admitting that while he wrote such passages he was addressing friends,
 and that the shadow of his enemies had been removed for a while, all
 the friends and enemies that Wagner, as a man of letters, has, possess
 one factor in common, which differentiates them fundamentally from the
 "people" for whom he worked as an artist. Owing to the refining and
 fruitless nature of their education, they are quite devoid of the
 essential traits of the national character, and he who would appeal to
 them must speak in a way which is not of the people--that is to say,
 after the manner of our best prose-writers and Wagner himself; though
 that he did violence to himself in writing thus is evident. But the
 strength of that almost maternal instinct of prudence in him, which is
 ready to make any sacrifice, rather tends to reinstall him among the
 scholars and men of learning, to whom as a creator he always longed to
 bid farewell. He submits to the language of culture and all the laws
 governing its use, though he was the first to recognise its profound
 insufficiency as a means of communication.
 
 For if there is anything that distinguishes his art from every other
 art of modern times, it is that it no longer speaks the language of
 any particular caste, and refuses to admit the distinctions "literate"
 and "illiterate." It thus stands as a contrast to every culture of the
 Renaissance, which to this day still bathes us modern men in its light
 and shade. Inasmuch as Wagner's art bears us, from time to time,
 beyond itself, we are enabled to get a general view of its uniform
 character: we see Goethe and Leopardi as the last great stragglers of
 the Italian philologist-poets, Faust as the incarnation of a most
 unpopular problem, in the form of a man of theory thirsting for life;
 even Goethe's song is an imitation of the song of the people rather
 than a standard set before them to which they are expected to attain,
 and the poet knew very well how truly he spoke when he seriously
 assured his adherents: "My compositions cannot become popular; he who
 hopes and strives to make them so is mistaken."
 
 That an art could arise which would be so clear and warm as to flood
 the base and the poor in spirit with its light, as well as to melt the
 haughtiness of the learned--such a phenomenon had to be experienced
 though it could not be guessed. But even in the mind of him who
 experiences it to-day it must upset all preconceived notions
 concerning education and culture; to such an one the veil will seem to
 have been rent in twain that conceals a future in which no highest
 good or highest joys exist that are not the common property of all.
 The odium attaching to the word "common" will then be abolished.
 
 If presentiment venture thus into the remote future, the discerning
 eye of all will recognise the dreadful social insanity of our present
 age, and will no longer blind itself to the dangers besetting an art
 which seems to have roots only in the remote and distant future, and
 which allows its burgeoning branches to spread before our gaze when it
 has not yet revealed the ground from which it draws its sap. How can
 we protect this homeless art through the ages until that remote future
 is reached? How can we so dam the flood of a revolution seemingly
 inevitable everywhere, that the blessed prospect and guarantee of a
 better future--of a freer human life--shall not also be washed away
 with all that is destined to perish and deserves to perish?
 
 He who asks himself this question shares Wagner's care: he will feel
 himself impelled with Wagner to seek those established powers that
 have the goodwill to protect the noblest passions of man during the
 period of earthquakes and upheavals. In this sense alone Wagner
 questions the learned through his writings, whether they intend
 storing his legacy to them--the precious Ring of his art--among their
 other treasures. And even the wonderful confidence which he reposes in
 the German mind and the aims of German politics seems to me to arise
 from the fact that he grants the people of the Reformation that
 strength, mildness, and bravery which is necessary in order to divert
 "the torrent of revolution into the tranquil river-bed of a calmly
 flowing stream of humanity": and I could almost believe that this and
 only this is what he meant to express by means of the symbol of his
 Imperial march.
 
 As a rule, though, the generous impulses of the creative artist and
 the extent of his philanthropy are too great for his gaze to be
 confined within the limits of a single nation. His thoughts, like
 those of every good and great German, are more than German, and the
 language of his art does not appeal to particular races but to mankind
 in general.
 
 But to the men of the future.
 
 This is the belief that is proper to him; this is his torment and his
 distinction. No artist, of what past soever, has yet received such a
 remarkable portion of genius; no one, save him, has ever been obliged
 to mix this bitterest of ingredients with the drink of nectar to which
 enthusiasm helped him. It is not as one might expect, the
 misunderstood and mishandled artist, the fugitive of his age, who
 adopted this faith in self-defence: success or failure at the hands of
 his contemporaries was unable either to create or to destroy it
 Whether it glorified or reviled him, he did not belong to this
 generation: that was the conclusion to which his instincts led him.
 And the possibility of any generation's ever belonging to him is
 something which he who disbelieves in Wagner can never be made to
 admit. But even this unbeliever may at least ask, what kind of
 generation it will be in which Wagner will recognise his "people," and
 in which he will see the type of all those who suffer a common
 distress, and who wish to escape from it by means of an art common to
 them all. Schiller was certainly more hopeful and sanguine; he did not
 ask what a future must be like if the instinct of the artist that
 predicts it prove true; his command to every artist was rather--
 
 Soar aloft in daring flight Out of sight of thine own years! In thy
 mirror, gleaming bright, Glimpse of distant dawn appears.
 
                                  XI.
 
 May blessed reason preserve us from ever thinking that mankind will at
 any time discover a final and ideal order of things, and that
 happiness will then and ever after beam down upon us uniformly, like
 the rays of the sun in the tropics. Wagner has nothing to do with such
 a hope; he is no Utopian. If he was unable to dispense with the belief
 in a future, it only meant that he observed certain properties in
 modern men which he did not hold to be essential to their nature, and
 which did not seem to him to form any necessary part of their
 constitution; in fact, which were changeable and transient; and that
 precisely owing to these properties art would find no home among them,
 and he himself had to be the precursor and prophet of another epoch.
 No golden age, no cloudless sky will fall to the portion of those
 future generations, which his instinct led him to expect, and whose
 approximate characteristics may be gleaned from the cryptic characters
 of his art, in so far as it is possible to draw conclusions concerning
 the nature of any pain from the kind of relief it seeks. Nor will
 superhuman goodness and justice stretch like an everlasting rainbow
 over this future land. Belike this coming generation will, on the
 whole, seem more evil than the present one--for in good as in evil it
 will be more straightforward. It is even possible, if its soul were
 ever able to speak out in full and unembarrassed tones, that it might
 convulse and terrify us, as though the voice of some hitherto
 concealed and evil spirit had suddenly cried out in our midst. Or how
 do the following propositions strike our ears?--That passion is better
 than stocism or hypocrisy; that straightforwardness, even in evil, is
 better than losing oneself in trying to observe traditional morality;
 that the free man is just as able to be good as evil, but that the
 unemancipated man is a disgrace to nature, and has no share in
 heavenly or earthly bliss; finally, that all who wish to be free must
 become so through themselves, and that freedom falls to nobody's lot
 as a gift from Heaven. However harsh and strange these propositions
 may sound, they are nevertheless reverberations from that future
 world, which is verily in need of art, and which expects genuine
 pleasure from its presence; they are the language of
 nature--reinstated even in mankind; they stand for what I have already
 termed correct feeling as opposed to the incorrect feeling that reigns
 to-day.
 
 But real relief or salvation exists only for nature not for that which
 is contrary to nature or which arises out of incorrect feeling. When
 all that is unnatural becomes self-conscious, it desires but one
 thing--nonentity; the natural thing, on the other hand, yearns to be
 transfigured through love: the former would fain not be, the latter
 would fain be otherwise. Let him who has understood this recall, in
 the stillness of his soul, the simple themes of Wagner's art, in order
 to be able to ask himself whether it were nature or nature's opposite
 which sought by means of them to achieve the aims just described.
 
 The desperate vagabond finds deliverance from his distress in the
 compassionate love of a woman who would rather die than be unfaithful
 to him: the theme of the Flying Dutchman. The sweet-heart, renouncing
 all personal happiness, owing to a divine transformation of Love into
 Charity, becomes a saint, and saves the soul of her loved one: the
 theme of Tannhauser. The sublimest and highest thing descends a
 suppliant among men, and will not be questioned whence it came; when,
 however, the fatal question is put, it sorrowfully returns to its
 higher life: the theme of Lohengrin. The loving soul of a wife, and
 the people besides, joyfully welcome the new benevolent genius,
 although the retainers of tradition and custom reject and revile him:
 the theme of the Meistersingers. Of two lovers, that do not know they
 are loved, who believe rather that they are deeply wounded and
 contemned, each demands of the other that he or she should drink a cup
 of deadly poison, to all intents and purposes as an expiation of the
 insult; in reality, however, as the result of an impulse which neither
 of them understands: through death they wish to escape all possibility
 of separation or deceit. The supposed approach of death loosens their
 fettered souls and allows them a short moment of thrilling happiness,
 just as though they had actually escaped from the present, from
 illusions and from life: the theme of Tristan and Isolde.
 
 In the Ring of the Nibelung the tragic hero is a god whose heart
 yearns for power, and who, since he travels along all roads in search
 of it, finally binds himself to too many undertakings, loses his
 freedom, and is ultimately cursed by the curse inseparable from power.
 He becomes aware of his loss of freedom owing to the fact that he no
 longer has the means to take possession of the golden Ring--that
 symbol of all earthly power, and also of the greatest dangers to
 himself as long as it lies in the hands of his enemies. The fear of
 the end and the twilight of all gods overcomes him, as also the
 despair at being able only to await the end without opposing it. He is
 in need of the free and fearless man who, without his advice or
 assistance--even in a struggle against gods--can accomplish
 single-handed what is denied to the powers of a god. He fails to see
 him, and just as a new hope finds shape within him, he must obey the
 conditions to which he is bound: with his own hand he must murder the
 thing he most loves, and purest pity must be punished by his sorrow.
 Then he begins to loathe power, which bears evil and bondage in its
 lap; his will is broken, and he himself begins to hanker for the end
 that threatens him from afar off. At this juncture something happens
 which had long been the subject of his most ardent desire: the free
 and fearless man appears, he rises in opposition to everything
 accepted and established, his parents atone for having been united by
 a tie which was antagonistic to the order of nature and usage; they
 perish, but Siegfried survives. And at the sight of his magnificent
 development and bloom, the loathing leaves otan's soul, and he follows
 the hero's history with the eye of fatherly love and anxiety. How he
 forges his sword, kills the dragon, gets possession of the ring,
 escapes the craftiest ruse, awakens Brunhilda; how the curse abiding
 in the ring gradually overtakes him; how, faithful in faithfulness, he
 wounds the thing he most loves, out of love; becomes enveloped in the
 shadow and cloud of guilt, and, rising out of it more brilliantly than
 the sun, ultimately goes down, firing the whole heavens with his
 burning glow and purging the world of the curse,--all this is seen by
 the god whose sovereign spear was broken in the contest with the
 freest man, and who lost his power through him, rejoicing greatly over
 his own defeat: full of sympathy for the triumph and pain of his
 victor, his eye burning with aching joy looks back upon the last
 events; he has become free through love, free from himself.
 
 And now ask yourselves, ye generation of to-day, Was all this composed
 for you? Have ye the courage to point up to the stars of the whole of
 this heavenly dome of beauty and goodness and to say, This is our
 life, that Wagner has transferred to a place beneath the stars?
 
 Where are the men among you who are able to interpret the divine image
 of Wotan in the light of their own lives, and who can become ever
 greater while, like him, ye retreat? Who among you would renounce
 power, knowing and having learned that power is evil? Where are they
 who like Brunhilda abandon their knowledge to love, and finally rob
 their lives of the highest wisdom, "afflicted love, deepest sorrow,
 opened my eyes"? and where are the free and fearless, developing and
 blossoming in innocent egoism? and where are the Siegfrieds, among
 you?
 
 He who questions thus and does so in vain, will find himself compelled
 to look around him for signs of the future; and should his eye, on
 reaching an unknown distance, espy just that "people" which his own
 generation can read out of the signs contained in Wagnerian art, he
 will then also understand what Wagner will mean to this
 people--something that he cannot be to all of us, namely, not the
 prophet of the future, as perhaps he would fain appear to us, but the
 interpreter and clarifier of the past.
 
 

 
 
 
 
                           *Friedrich Nietzsche*
 
                          *I: The Case Of Wagner*
 
                     *II: Nietzsche *_Contra_* Wagner*
 
                         *III: Selected Aphorisms*
 
                               Translated By
 
                            Anthony M. Ludovici
 
                               Third Edition
 
                                T. N. Foulis
 
                          13 & 15 Frederick Street
 
                            Edinburgh and London
 
                                    1911
 
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 Translators Preface.
 Preface To The Third Edition
 The Case Of Wagner: A Musicians Problem
 Nietzsche _contra_ Wagner
 Selected Aphorisms from Nietzsches Retrospect of his Years of Friendship
 with Wagner.
 Footnotes
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATORS PREFACE.
 
 
 Nietzsche wrote the rough draft of The Case of Wagner in Turin, during
 the month of May 1888; he completed it in Sils Maria towards the end of
 June of the same year, and it was published in the following autumn.
 Nietzsche _contra_ Wagner was written about the middle of December 1888;
 but, although it was printed and corrected before the New Year, it was not
 published until long afterwards owing to Nietzsches complete breakdown in
 the first days of 1889.
 
 In reading these two essays we are apt to be deceived, by their virulent
 and forcible tone, into believing that the whole matter is a mere cover
 for hidden fire,a mere blind of sthetic discussion concealing a deep and
 implacable personal feud which demands and will have vengeance. In spite
 of all that has been said to the contrary, many people still hold this
 view of the two little works before us; and, as the actual facts are not
 accessible to every one, and rumours are more easily believed than
 verified, the error of supposing that these pamphlets were dictated by
 personal animosity, and even by Nietzsches envy of Wagner in his glory,
 seems to be a pretty common one. Another very general error is to suppose
 that the point at issue here is not one concerning music at all, but
 concerning religion. It is taken for granted that the aspirations, the
 particular quality, the influence, and the method of an art like music,
 are matters quite distinct from the values and the conditions prevailing
 in the culture with which it is in harmony, and that however many
 Christian elements may be discovered in Wagnerian texts, Nietzsche had no
 right to raise sthetic objections because he happened to entertain the
 extraordinary view that these Christian elements had also found their way
 into Wagnerian music.
 
 To both of these views there is but one reply:they are absolutely false.
 
 In the Ecce Homo, Nietzsches autobiography,a book which from cover to
 cover and line for line is sincerity itselfwe learn what Wagner actually
 meant to Nietzsche. On pages 41, 44, 84, 122, 129, &c, we cannot doubt
 that Nietzsche is speaking from his heart,and what does he say?In
 impassioned tones he admits his profound indebtedness to the great
 musician, his love for him, his gratitude to him,how Wagner was the only
 German who had ever been anything to himhow his friendship with Wagner
 constituted the happiest and most valuable experience of his life,how his
 breach with Wagner almost killed him. And, when we remember, too, that
 Wagner on his part also declared that he was alone after he had lost
 that man (Nietzsche), we begin to perceive that personal bitterness and
 animosity are out of the question here. We feel we are on a higher plane,
 and that we must not judge these two men as if they were a couple of
 little business people who had had a suburban squabble.
 
 Nietzsche declares (Ecce Homo, p. 24) that he never attacked persons as
 persons. If he used a name at all, it was merely as a means to an end,
 just as one might use a magnifying glass in order to make a general, but
 elusive and intricate fact more clear and more apparent, and if he used
 the name of David Strauss, without bitterness or spite (for he did not
 even know the man), when he wished to personify Culture-Philistinism, so,
 in the same spirit, did he use the name of Wagner, when he wished to
 personify the general decadence of modern ideas, values, aspirations and
 Art.
 
 Nietzsches ambition, throughout his life, was to regenerate European
 culture. In the first period of his relationship with Wagner, he thought
 that he had found the man who was prepared to lead in this direction. For
 a long while he regarded his master as the Saviour of Germany, as the
 innovator and renovator who was going to arrest the decadent current of
 his time and lead men to a greatness which had died with antiquity. And so
 thoroughly did he understand his duties as a disciple, so wholly was he
 devoted to this cause, that, in spite of all his unquestioned gifts and
 the excellence of his original achievements, he was for a long while
 regarded as a mere literary lackey in Wagners service, in all those
 circles where the rising musician was most disliked.
 
 Gradually, however, as the young Nietzsche developed and began to gain an
 independent view of life and humanity, it seemed to him extremely doubtful
 whether Wagner actually was pulling the same way with him. Whereas,
 theretofore, he had identified Wagners ideals with his own, it now dawned
 upon him slowly that the regeneration of German culture, of European
 culture, and the transvaluation of values which would be necessary for
 this regeneration, really lay off the track of Wagnerism. He saw that he
 had endowed Wagner with a good deal that was more his own than Wagners.
 In his love he had transfigured the friend, and the composer of Parsifal
 and the man of his imagination were not one. The fact was realised step by
 step; disappointment upon disappointment, revelation after revelation,
 ultimately brought it home to him, and though his best instincts at first
 opposed it, the revulsion of feeling at last became too strong to be
 scouted, and Nietzsche was plunged into the blackest despair. Had he
 followed his own human inclinations, he would probably have remained
 Wagners friend until the end. As it was, however, he remained loyal to
 his cause, and this meant denouncing his former idol.
 
 Joyful Wisdom, Thus Spake Zarathustra, Beyond Good and Evil, The
 Genealogy of Morals, The Twilight of the Idols, The Antichristall
 these books were but so many exhortations to mankind to step aside from
 the general track now trodden by Europeans. And what happened? Wagner
 began to write some hard things about Nietzsche; the world assumed that
 Nietzsche and Wagner had engaged in a paltry personal quarrel in the
 press, and the whole importance of the real issue was buried beneath the
 human, all-too-human interpretations which were heaped upon it.
 
 Nietzsche was a musician of no mean attainments. For a long while, in his
 youth, his superiors had been doubtful whether he should not be educated
 for a musical career, so great were his gifts in this art; and if his
 mother had not been offered a six-years scholarship for her son at the
 famous school of Pforta, Nietzsche, the scholar and philologist, would
 probably have been an able composer. When he speaks about music,
 therefore, he knows what he is talking about, and when he refers to
 Wagners music in particular, the simple fact of his long intimacy with
 Wagner during the years at Tribschen, is a sufficient guarantee of his
 deep knowledge of the subject. Now Nietzsche was one of the first to
 recognise that the principles of art are inextricably bound up with the
 laws of life, that an sthetic dogma may therefore promote or depress all
 vital force, and that a picture, a symphony, a poem or a statue, is just
 as capable of being pessimistic, anarchic, Christian or revolutionary, as
 a philosophy or a science is. To speak of a certain class of music as
 being compatible with the decline of culture, therefore, was to Nietzsche
 a perfectly warrantable association of ideas, and that is why, throughout
 his philosophy, so much stress is laid upon sthetic considerations.
 
 But if in England and America Nietzsches attack on Wagners art may still
 seem a little incomprehensible, let it be remembered that the Continent
 has long known that Nietzsche was actually in the right. Every year
 thousands are now added to the large party abroad who have ceased from
 believing in the great musical revolutionary of the seventies; that he was
 one with the French Romanticists and rebels has long since been
 acknowledged a fact in select circles, both in France and Germany, and if
 we still have Wagner with us in England, if we still consider Nietzsche as
 a heretic, when he declares that Wagner was a musician for unmusical
 people, it is only because we are more removed than we imagine, from all
 the great movements, intellectual and otherwise, which take place on the
 Continent.
 
 In Wagners music, in his doctrine, in his whole concept of art, Nietzsche
 saw the confirmation, the promotionaye, even the encouragement, of that
 decadence and degeneration which is now rampant in Europe; and it is for
 this reason, although to the end of his life he still loved Wagner, the
 man and the friend, that we find him, on the very eve of his spiritual
 death, exhorting us to abjure Wagner the musician and the artist.
 
 Anthony M. Ludovici.
 
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE TO THE THIRD EDITION(1)
 
 
 In spite of the adverse criticism with which the above preface has met at
 the hands of many reviewers since the summer of last year, I cannot say
 that I should feel justified, even after mature consideration, in altering
 a single word or sentence it contains. If I felt inclined to make any
 changes at all, these would take the form of extensive additions, tending
 to confirm rather than to modify the general argument it advances; but,
 any omissions of which I may have been guilty in the first place, have
 been so fully rectified since, thanks to the publication of the English
 translations of Daniel Halvys and Henri Lichtenbergers works, The Life
 of Friedrich Nietzsche,(2) and The Gospel of Superman,(3) respectively,
 that, were it not for the fact that the truth about this matter cannot be
 repeated too often, I should have refrained altogether from including any
 fresh remarks of my own in this Third Edition.
 
 In the works just referred to (pp. 129 _et seq._ in Halvys book, and pp.
 78 _et seq._ in Lichtenbergers book), the statement I made in my preface
 to Thoughts out of Season, vol. i., and which I did not think it
 necessary to repeat in my first preface to these pamphlets, will be found
 to receive the fullest confirmation.
 
 The statement in question was to the effect that many long years before
 these pamphlets were even projected, Nietzsches apparent _volte-face_ in
 regard to his hero Wagner had been not only foreshadowed but actually
 stated in plain words, in two works written during his friendship with
 Wagner,the works referred to being The Birth of Tragedy (1872), and
 Wagner in Bayreuth (1875) of which Houston Stuart Chamberlain declares
 not only that it possesses undying classical worth but that a perusal
 of it is indispensable to all who wish to follow the question [of Wagner]
 to its roots.(4)
 
 The idea that runs through the present work like a leitmotifthe idea that
 Wagner was at bottom more of a mime than a musicianwas so far an ever
 present thought with Nietzsche that it is ever impossible to ascertain the
 period when it was first formulated.
 
 In Nietzsches wonderful autobiography (_Ecce Homo_, p. 88), in the
 section dealing with the early works just mentioned, we find the following
 passageIn the second of the two essays [Wagner in Bayreuth] with a
 profound certainty of instinct, I already characterised the elementary
 factor in Wagners nature as a theatrical talent which, in all his means
 and aspirations, draws its final conclusions. And as early as 1874,
 Nietzsche wrote in his diaryWagner is a born actor. Just as Goethe was
 an abortive painter, and Schiller an abortive orator, so Wagner was an
 abortive theatrical genius. His attitude to music is that of the actor;
 for he knows how to sing and speak, as it were out of different souls and
 from absolutely different worlds (_Tristan_ and the _Meistersinger_).
 
 There is, however, no need to multiply examples, seeing, as I have said,
 that in the translations of Halvys and Lichtenbergers books the reader
 will find all the independent evidence he could possibly desire,
 disproving the popular, and even the learned belief that, in the two
 pamphlets before us we have a complete, apparently unaccountable, and
 therefore demented _volte-face_ on Nietzsches part. Nevertheless, for
 fear lest some doubt should still linger in certain minds concerning this
 point, and with the view of adding interest to these essays, the Editor
 considered it advisable, in the Second Edition, to add a number of
 extracts from Nietzsches diary of the year 1878 (ten years before The
 Case of Wagner, and Nietzsche _contra_ Wagner were written) in order to
 show to what extent those learned critics who complain of Nietzsches
 morbid and uncontrollable recantations and revulsions of feeling, have
 overlooked even the plain facts of the case when forming their
 all-too-hasty conclusions. These extracts will be found at the end of
 Nietzsche _contra_ Wagner. While reading them, however, it should not be
 forgotten that they were never intended for publication by Nietzsche
 himselfa fact which accounts for their unpolished and sketchy formand
 that they were first published in vol. xi. of the first German Library
 Edition (pp. 99-129) only when he was a helpless invalid, in 1897. Since
 then, in 1901 and 1906 respectively, they have been reprinted, once in the
 large German Library Edition (vol. xi. pp. 181-202), and once in the
 German Pocket Edition, as an appendix to Human-All-too-Human, Part II.
 
 An altogether special interest now attaches to these pamphlets; for, in
 the first place we are at last in possession of Wagners own account of
 his development, his art, his aspirations and his struggles, in the
 amazing self-revelation entitled _My Life_;(5) and secondly, we now have
 _Ecce Homo_, Nietzsches autobiography, in which we learn for the first
 time from Nietzsches own pen to what extent his history was that of a
 double devotionto Wagner on the one hand, and to his own life task, the
 Transvaluation of all Values, on the other.
 
 Readers interested in the Nietzsche-Wagner controversy will naturally look
 to these books for a final solution of all the difficulties which the
 problem presents. But let them not be too sanguine. From first to last
 this problem is not to be settled by facts. A good deal of instinctive
 choice, instinctive aversion, and instinctive suspicion are necessary
 here. A little more suspicion, for instance, ought to be applied to
 Wagners _My Life_, especially in England, where critics are not half
 suspicious enough about a continental artists self-revelations, and are
 too prone, if they have suspicions at all, to apply them in the wrong
 place.
 
 An example of this want of _finesse_ in judging foreign writers is to be
 found in Lord Morleys work on Rousseau,a book which ingenuously takes
 for granted everything that a writer like Rousseau cares to say about
 himself, without considering for an instant the possibility that Rousseau
 might have practised some hypocrisy. In regard to Wagners life we might
 easily fall into the same errorthat is to say, we might take seriously
 all he says concerning himself and his family affairs.
 
 We should beware of this, and should not even believe Wagner when he
 speaks badly about himself. No one speaks badly about himself without a
 reason, and the question in this case is to find out the reason. Did
 Wagnerin the belief that genius was always immoralwish to pose as an
 immoral Egotist, in order to make us believe in his genius, of which he
 himself was none too sure in his innermost heart? Did Wagner wish to
 appear sincere in his biography, in order to awaken in us a belief in
 the sincerity of his music, which he likewise doubted, but wished to
 impress upon the world as true? Or did he wish to be thought badly of in
 connection with things that were not true, and that consequently did not
 affect him, in order to lead us off the scent of true things, things he
 was ashamed of and which he wished the world to ignorejust like Rousseau
 (the similarity between the two is more than a superficial one) who
 barbarously pretended to have sent his children to the foundling hospital,
 in order not to be thought incapable of having had any children at all? In
 short, where is the bluff in Wagners biography? Let us therefore be
 careful about it, and all the more so because Wagner himself guarantees
 the truth of it in the prefatory note. If we were to be credulous here, we
 should moreover be acting in direct opposition to Nietzsches own counsel
 as given in the following aphorisms (Nos. 19 and 20, p. 89):
 
 It is very difficult to trace the course of Wagners development,no
 trust must be placed in his own description of his souls experiences. He
 writes party-pamphlets for his followers.
 
 It is extremely doubtful whether Wagner is able to bear witness about
 himself.
 
 While on p. 37 (the note), we read:He [Wagner] was not proud enough to
 be able to suffer the truth about himself. Nobody had less pride than he.
 Like Victor Hugo he remained true to himself even in his biography,he
 remained an actor.
 
 However, as a famous English judge has saidTruth will come out, even in
 the witness box, and, as we may add in this case, even in an
 autobiography. There is one statement in Wagners _My Life_ which sounds
 true to my ears at leasta statement which, in my opinion, has some
 importance, and to which Wagner himself seems to grant a mysterious
 significance. I refer to the passage on p. 93 of vol i., in which Wagner
 says:Owing to the exceptional vivacity and innate susceptibility of my
 nature  I gradually became conscious of a certain power of transporting
 or bewildering my more indolent companions.
 
 This seems innocent enough. When, however, it is read in conjunction with
 Nietzsches trenchant criticism, particularly on pp. 14, 15, 16, 17 and 18
 of this work, and also with a knowledge of Wagners music, it becomes one
 of the most striking passages in Wagners autobiography, for it records
 how soon he became conscious of his dominant instinct and faculty.
 
 I know perfectly well that the Wagnerites will not be influenced by these
 remarks. Their gratitude to Wagner is too great for this. He has supplied
 the precious varnish wherewith to hide the dull ugliness of our
 civilisation. He has given to souls despairing over the materialism of
 this world, to souls despairing of themselves, and longing to be rid of
 themselves, the indispensable hashish and morphia wherewith to deaden
 their inner discords. These discords are everywhere apparent nowadays.
 Wagner is therefore a common need, a common benefactor. As such he is
 bound to be worshipped and adored in spite of all egotistical and
 theatrical autobiographies.
 
 Albeit, signs are not wantingat least among his Anglo-Saxon worshippers
 who stand even more in need of romanticism than their continental
 brethren,which show that, in order to uphold Wagner, people are now
 beginning to draw distinctions between the man and the artist. They
 dismiss the man as human-all-too-human, but they still maintain that
 there are divine qualities in his music. However distasteful the task of
 disillusioning these psychological tyros may be, they should be informed
 that no such division of a man into two parts is permissible, save in
 Christianity (the body and the soul), but that outside purely religious
 spheres it is utterly unwarrantable. There can be no such strange divorce
 between a bloom and the plant on which it blows, and has a black woman
 ever been known to give birth to a white child?
 
 Wagner, as Nietzsche tells us on p. 19, was something complete, he was a
 typical _decadent_ in whom every sign of free will was lacking, in whom
 every feature was necessary. Wagner, allow me to add, was a typical
 representative of the nineteenth century, which was the century of
 contradictory values, of opposed instincts, and of every kind of inner
 disharmony. The genuine, the classical artists of that period, such men as
 Heine, Goethe, Stendhal, and Gobineau, overcame their inner strife, and
 each succeeded in making a harmonious whole out of himselfnot indeed
 without a severe struggle; for everyone of them suffered from being the
 child of his age, _i.e._, a decadent. The only difference between them and
 the romanticists lies in the fact that they (the former) were conscious of
 what was wrong with them, and possessed the will and the strength to
 overcome their illness; whereas the romanticists chose the easier
 alternativenamely, that of shutting their eyes on themselves.
 
 I am just as much a child of my age as Wagner_i.e._, I am a _decadent_,
 says Nietzsche. The only difference is that I recognised the fact, that I
 struggled against it(6)
 
 What Wagner did was characteristic of all romanticists and contemporary
 artists: he drowned and overshouted his inner discord by means of
 exuberant pathos and wild exaltation. Far be it from me to value Wagners
 music _in extenso_ herethis is scarcely a fitting opportunity to do
 so;but I think it might well be possible to show, on purely psychological
 grounds, how impossible it was for a man like Wagner to produce real art.
 For how can harmony, order, symmetry, mastery, proceed from uncontrolled
 discord, disorder, disintegration, and chaos? The fact that an art which
 springs from such a marshy soil may, like certain paludal plants, be
 wonderful, gorgeous, and overwhelming, cannot be denied; but true
 art it is not. It is so just as little as Gothic architecture is,that
 style which, in its efforts to escape beyond the tragic contradiction in
 its medival heart, yelled its hysterical cry heavenwards and even melted
 the stones of its structures into a quivering and fluid jet, in order to
 give adequate expression to the painful and wretched conflict then raging
 between the body and the soul.
 
 That Wagner, too, was a great sufferer, there can be no doubt; not,
 however, a sufferer from strength, like a true artist, but from
 weaknessthe weakness of his age, which he never overcame. It is for this
 reason that he should be rather pitied than judged as he is now being
 judged by his German and English critics, who, with thoroughly neurotic
 suddenness, have acknowledged their revulsion of feeling a little too
 harshly.
 
 I have carefully endeavoured not to deride, or deplore, or detest says
 Spinoza, but to understand; and these words ought to be our guide, not
 only in the case of Wagner, but in all things.
 
 Inner discord is a terrible affliction, and nothing is so certain to
 produce that nervous irritability which is so trying to the patient as
 well as to the outer world, as this so-called spiritual disease. Nietzsche
 was probably quite right when he said the only real and true music that
 Wagner ever composed did not consist of his elaborate arias and overtures,
 but of ten or fifteen bars which, dispersed here and there, gave
 expression to the composers profound and genuine melancholy. But this
 melancholy had to be overcome, and Wagner with the blood of a _cabotin_ in
 his veins, resorted to the remedy that was nearest to handthat is to say,
 the art of bewildering others and himself. Thus he remained ignorant about
 himself all his life; for there was, as Nietzsche rightly points out (p.
 37, _note_), not sufficient pride in the man for him to desire to know or
 to suffer gladly the truth concerning his real nature. As an actor his
 ruling passion was vanity, but in his case it was correlated with a
 semi-conscious knowledge of the fact that all was not right with him and
 his art. It was this that caused him to suffer. His egomaniacal behaviour
 and his almost Rousseauesque fear and suspicion of others were only the
 external manifestations of his inner discrepancies. But, to repeat what I
 have already said, these abnormal symptoms are not in the least
 incompatible with Wagners music, they are rather its very cause, the root
 from which it springs.
 
 In reality, therefore, Wagner the man and Wagner the artist were
 undoubtedly one, and constituted a splendid romanticist. His music as well
 as his autobiography are proofs of his wonderful gifts in this direction.
 His success in his time, as in ours, is due to the craving of the modern
 world for actors, sorcerers, bewilderers and idealists who are able to
 conceal the ill-health and the weakness that prevail, and who please by
 intoxicating and exalting. But this being so, the world must not be
 disappointed to find the hero of a preceding age explode in the next. It
 must not be astonished to find a disparity between the heros private life
 and his elevating art or romantic and idealistic gospel. As long as
 people will admire heroic attitudes more than heroism, such
 disillusionment is bound to be the price of their error. In a truly great
 man, life-theory and life-practice, if seen from a sufficiently lofty
 point of view, must and do always agree, in an actor, in a romanticist, in
 an idealist, and in a Christian, there is always a yawning chasm between
 the two, which, whatever well-meaning critics may do, cannot be bridged
 posthumously by acrobatic feats _in psychologicis_.
 
 Let anyone apply this point of view to Nietzsches life and theory. Let
 anyone turn his life inside out, not only as he gives it to us in his
 _Ecce Homo_, but as we find it related by all his biographers, friends and
 foes alike, and what will be the result? Even if we ignore his worksthe
 blooms which blowed from time to time from his lifewe absolutely cannot
 deny the greatness of the mans _private practice_, and if we fully
 understand and appreciate the latter, we must be singularly deficient in
 instinct and in _flair_ if we do not suspect that some of this greatness
 is reflected in his life-task.
 
 ANTHONY M. LUDOVICI
 
 London, _July 1911_.
 
 
 
 
 
 THE CASE OF WAGNER: A MUSICIANS PROBLEM
 
 
 A LETTER FROM TURIN, MAY 1888
 
 RIDENDO DICERE SEVERUM.
 
 
 
 
 Preface
 
 
 I am writing this to relieve my mind. It is not malice alone which makes
 me praise Bizet at the expense of Wagner in this essay. Amid a good deal
 of jesting I wish to make one point clear which does not admit of levity.
 To turn my back on Wagner was for me a piece of fate, to get to like
 anything else whatever afterwards was for me a triumph. Nobody, perhaps,
 had ever been more dangerously involved in Wagnerism, nobody had defended
 himself more obstinately against it, nobody had ever been so overjoyed at
 ridding himself of it. A long history!Shall I give it a name?If I were a
 moralist, who knows what I might not call it! Perhaps a piece of
 _self-mastery_.But the philosopher does not like the moralist, neither
 does he like high-falutin words.
 
 What is the first and last thing that a philosopher demands of himself? To
 overcome his age in himself, to become timeless. With what then does the
 philosopher have the greatest fight? With all that in him which makes him
 the child of his time. Very well then! I am just as much a child of my age
 as Wagner_i.e._, I am a decadent. The only difference is that I
 recognised the fact, that I struggled against it. The philosopher in me
 struggled against it.
 
 My greatest preoccupation hitherto has been the problem of _decadence_,
 and I had reasons for this. Good and evil form only a playful
 subdivision of this problem. If one has trained ones eye to detect the
 symptoms of decline, one also understands morality,one understands what
 lies concealed beneath its holiest names and tables of values: _e.g._,
 _impoverished_ life, the will to nonentity, great exhaustion. Morality
 _denies_ life. In order to undertake such a mission I was obliged to
 exercise self-discipline:I had to side against all that was morbid in
 myself including Wagner, including Schopenhauer, including the whole of
 modern _humanity_.A profound estrangement, coldness and soberness towards
 all that belongs to my age, all that was contemporary: and as the highest
 wish, Zarathustras eye, an eye which surveys the whole
 phenomenonmankindfrom an enormous distance,which looks down upon
 it.For such a goalwhat sacrifice would not have been worth while? What
 self-mastery! What self-denial!
 
 The greatest event of my life took the form of a _recovery_. Wagner
 belongs only to my diseases.
 
 Not that I wish to appear ungrateful to this disease. If in this essay I
 support the proposition that Wagner is _harmful_, I none the less wish to
 point out unto whom, in spite of all, he is indispensableto the
 philosopher. Anyone else may perhaps be able to get on without Wagner: but
 the philosopher is not free to pass him by. The philosopher must be the
 evil conscience of his age,but to this end he must be possessed of its
 best knowledge. And what better guide, or more thoroughly efficient
 revealer of the soul, could be found for the labyrinth of the modern
 spirit than Wagner? Through Wagner modernity speaks her most intimate
 language: it conceals neither its good nor its evil: it has thrown off all
 shame. And, conversely, one has almost calculated the whole of the value
 of modernity once one is clear concerning what is good and evil in Wagner.
 I can perfectly well understand a musician of to-day who says: I hate
 Wagner but I can endure no other music. But I should also understand a
 philosopher who said, Wagner is modernity in concentrated form. There is
 no help for it, we must first be Wagnerites.
 
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 Yesterdaywould you believe it?I heard _Bizets_ masterpiece for the
 twentieth time. Once more I attended with the same gentle reverence; once
 again I did not run away. This triumph over my impatience surprises me.
 How such a work completes one! Through it one almost becomes a
 masterpiece oneselfAnd, as a matter of fact, each time I heard _Carmen_
 it seemed to me that I was more of a philosopher, a better philosopher
 than at other times: I became so forbearing, so happy, so Indian, so
 _settled_. To sit for five hours: the first step to holiness!May I be
 allowed to say that Bizets orchestration is the only one that I can
 endure now? That other orchestration which is all the rage at presentthe
 Wagnerianis brutal, artificial and unsophisticated withal, hence its
 appeal to all the three senses of the modern soul at once. How terribly
 Wagnerian orchestration affects me! I call it the _Sirocco_. A
 disagreeable sweat breaks out all over me. All my fine weather vanishes.
 
 Bizets music seems to me perfect. It comes forward lightly, gracefully,
 stylishly. It is lovable, it does not sweat. All that is good is easy,
 everything divine runs with light feet: this is the first principle of my
 sthetics. This music is wicked, refined, fatalistic, and withal remains
 popular,it possesses the refinement of a race, not of an individual. It
 is rich. It is definite. It builds, organises, completes, and in this
 sense it stands as a contrast to the polypus in music, to endless
 melody. Have more painful, more tragic accents ever been heard on the
 stage before? And how are they obtained? Without grimaces! Without
 counterfeiting of any kind! Free from the _lie_ of the grand style!In
 short: this music assumes that the listener is intelligent even as a
 musician,thereby it is the opposite of Wagner, who, apart from everything
 else, was in any case the most _ill-mannered_ genius on earth (Wagner
 takes us as if  , he repeats a thing so often that we become
 desperate,that we ultimately believe it).
 
 And once more: I become a better man when Bizet speaks to me. Also a
 better musician, a better _listener_. Is it in any way possible to listen
 better?I even burrow behind this music with my ears. I hear its very
 cause. I seem to assist at its birth. I tremble before the dangers which
 this daring music runs, I am enraptured over those happy accidents for
 which even Bizet himself may not be responsible.And, strange to say, at
 bottom I do not give it a thought, or am not aware how much thought I
 really do give it. For quite other ideas are running through my head the
 while. Has any one ever observed that music _emancipates_ the spirit?
 gives wings to thought? and that the more one becomes a musician the more
 one is also a philosopher? The grey sky of abstraction seems thrilled by
 flashes of lightning; the light is strong enough to reveal all the details
 of things; to enable one to grapple with problems; and the world is
 surveyed as if from a mountain topWith this I have defined philosophical
 pathosAnd unexpectedly _answers_ drop into my lap, a small hailstorm of
 ice and wisdom, of problems _solved_. Where am I? Bizet makes me
 productive. Everything that is good makes me productive. I have gratitude
 for nothing else, nor have I any other touchstone for testing what is
 good.
 
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 Bizets work also saves; Wagner is not the only Saviour. With it one
 bids farewell to the _damp_ north and to all the fog of the Wagnerian
 ideal. Even the action in itself delivers us from these things. From
 Merime it has this logic even in passion, from him it has the direct
 line, _inexorable_ necessity, but what it has above all else is that which
 belongs to sub-tropical zonesthat dryness of atmosphere, that
 _limpidezza_ of the air. Here in every respect the climate is altered.
 Here another kind of sensuality, another kind of sensitiveness and another
 kind of cheerfulness make their appeal. This music is gay, but not in a
 French or German way. Its gaiety is African; fate hangs over it, its
 happiness is short, sudden, without reprieve. I envy Bizet for having had
 the courage of this sensitiveness, which hitherto in the cultured music of
 Europe has found no means of expression,of this southern, tawny, sunburnt
 sensitiveness. What a joy the golden afternoon of its happiness is to us!
 When we look out, with this music in our minds, we wonder whether we have
 ever seen the sea so _calm_. And how soothing is this Moorish dancing!
 How, for once, even our insatiability gets sated by its lascivious
 melancholy!And finally love, love translated back into _Nature_! Not the
 love of a cultured girl!no Senta-sentimentality.(7) But love as fate,
 as a fatality, cynical, innocent, cruel,and precisely in this way
 _Nature_! The love whose means is war, whose very essence is the _mortal
 hatred_ between the sexes!I know no case in which the tragic irony, which
 constitutes the kernel of love, is expressed with such severity, or in so
 terrible a formula, as in the last cry of Don Jos with which the work
 ends:
 
 Yes, it is I who have killed her,
 Imy adored Carmen!
 
 Such a conception of love (the only one worthy of a philosopher) is rare:
 it distinguishes one work of art from among a thousand others. For, as a
 rule, artists are no better than the rest of the world, they are even
 worsethey _misunderstand_ love. Even Wagner misunderstood it. They
 imagine that they are selfless in it because they appear to be seeking the
 advantage of another creature often to their own disadvantage. But in
 return they want to _possess_ the other creature. Even God is no
 exception to this rule, he is very far from thinking What does it matter
 to thee whether I love thee or not?He becomes terrible if he is not
 loved in return _Lamour_and with this principle one carries ones point
 against Gods and men_est de tous les sentiments le plus goiste, et par
 consquent, lorsquil est bless, le moins gnreux_ (B. Constant).
 
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 Perhaps you are beginning to perceive how very much this music _improves_
 me?_Il faut mditerraniser la musique._ and I have my reasons for this
 principle (Beyond Good and Evil, pp. 216 _et seq._) The return to
 Nature, health, good spirits, youth, _virtue_!And yet I was one of the
 most corrupted Wagnerites. I was able to take Wagner seriously. Oh, this
 old magician! what tricks has he not played upon us! The first thing his
 art places in our hands is a magnifying glass: we look through it, and we
 no longer trust our own eyesEverything grows bigger, _even Wagner grows
 bigger_. What a clever rattlesnake. Throughout his life he rattled
 resignation, loyalty, and purity about our ears, and he retired from
 the _corrupt_ world with a song of praise to chastity!And we believed it
 all.
 
 But you will not listen to me? You _prefer_ even the _problem_ of Wagner
 to that of Bizet? But neither do I underrate it; it has its charm. The
 problem of salvation is even a venerable problem. Wagner pondered over
 nothing so deeply as over salvation: his opera is the opera of salvation.
 Someone always wants to be saved in his operas,now it is a youth; anon it
 is a maid,this is _his problem_And how lavishly he varies his
 _leitmotif_! What rare and melancholy modulations! If it were not for
 Wagner, who would teach us that innocence has a preference for saving
 interesting sinners? (the case in Tannhauser). Or that even the eternal
 Jew gets saved and _settled down_ when he marries? (the case in the
 Flying Dutchman). Or that corrupted old females prefer to be saved by
 chaste young men? (the case of Kundry). Or that young hysterics like to be
 saved by their doctor? (the case in Lohengrin). Or that beautiful girls
 most love to be saved by a knight who also happens to be a Wagnerite? (the
 case in the Mastersingers). Or that even married women also like to be
 saved by a knight? (the case of Isolde). Or that the venerable Almighty,
 after having compromised himself morally in all manner of ways, is at last
 delivered by a free spirit and an immoralist? (the case in the Ring).
 Admire, more especially this last piece of wisdom! Do you understand it?
 Itake good care not to understand it. That it is possible to draw yet
 other lessons from the works above mentioned,I am much more ready to
 prove than to dispute. That one may be driven by a Wagnerian ballet to
 desperation_and_ to virtue! (once again the case in Tannhauser). That
 not going to bed at the right time may be followed by the worst
 consequences (once again the case of Lohengrin).That one can never be
 too sure of the spouse one actually marries (for the third time, the case
 of Lohengrin). Tristan and Isolde glorifies the perfect husband who,
 in a certain case, can ask only one question: But why have ye not told me
 this before? Nothing could be simpler than that! Reply:
 
 That I cannot tell thee.
 And what thou askest,
 That wilt thou never learn.
 
 Lohengrin contains a solemn ban upon all investigation and questioning.
 In this way Wagner stood for the Christian concept, Thou must and shalt
 _believe_. It is a crime against the highest and the holiest to be
 scientific. The Flying Dutchman preaches the sublime doctrine that
 woman can moor the most erratic soul, or to put it into Wagnerian terms
 save him. Here we venture to ask a question. Supposing that this were
 actually true, would it therefore be desirable?What becomes of the
 eternal Jew whom a woman adores and _enchains_? He simply ceases from
 being eternal, he marries,that is to say, he concerns us no
 longer.Transferred into the realm of reality, the danger for the artist
 and for the geniusand these are of course the eternal Jewsresides in
 woman: _adoring_ women are their ruin. Scarcely any one has sufficient
 character not to be corruptedsaved when he finds himself treated as a
 Godhe then immediately condescends to woman.Man is a coward in the face
 of all that is eternally feminine, and this the girls know.In many cases
 of womans love, and perhaps precisely in the most famous ones, the love
 is no more than a refined form of _parasitism_, a making ones nest in
 anothers soul and sometimes even in anothers fleshAh! and how
 constantly at the cost of the host!
 
 We know the fate of Goethe in old-maidish moralin-corroded Germany. He was
 always offensive to Germans, he found honest admirers only among Jewesses.
 Schiller, noble Schiller, who cried flowery words into their ears,he
 was a man after their own heart. What did they reproach Goethe with?with
 the Mount of Venus, and with having composed certain Venetian epigrams.
 Even Klopstock preached him a moral sermon; there was a time when Herder
 was fond of using the word Priapus when he spoke of Goethe. Even
 Wilhelm Meister seemed to be only a symptom of decline, of a moral
 going to the dogs. The Menagerie of tame cattle, the worthlessness of
 the hero in this book, revolted Niebuhr, who finally bursts out in a
 plaint which _Biterolf_(8) might well have sung: nothing so easily makes
 a painful impression as _when a great mind despoils itself of its wings
 and strives for virtuosity in something greatly inferior, while it
 renounces more lofty aims_. But the most indignant of all was the
 cultured womanall smaller courts in Germany, every kind of Puritanism
 made the sign of the cross at the sight of Goethe, at the thought of the
 unclean spirit in Goethe.This history was what Wagner set to music. He
 _saves_ Goethe, that goes without saying; but he does so in such a clever
 way that he also takes the side of the cultured woman. Goethe gets saved:
 a prayer saves him, a cultured woman _draws him out of the mire_.
 
 As to what Goethe would have thought of Wagner?Goethe once set himself
 the question, what danger hangs over all romanticiststhe fate of
 romanticists?His answer was: To choke over the rumination of moral and
 religious absurdities. In short: _Parsifal_. The philosopher writes
 thereto an epilogue: _Holiness_the only remaining higher value still seen
 by the mob or by woman, the horizon of the ideal for all those who are
 naturally short-sighted. To philosophers, however, this horizon, like
 every other, is a mere misunderstanding, a sort of slamming of the door in
 the face of the real beginning of their world,their danger, their ideal,
 their desideratum. In more polite language: _La philosophie ne suffit pas
 au grand nombre. Il lui faut la saintet._
 
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 I shall once more relate the history of the Ring. This is its proper
 place. It is also the history of a salvation except that in this case it
 is Wagner himself who is savedHalf his lifetime Wagner believed in the
 _Revolution_ as only a Frenchman could have believed in it. He sought it
 in the runic inscriptions of myths, he thought he had found a typical
 revolutionary in Siegfried.Whence arises all the evil in this world?
 Wagner asked himself. From old contracts: he replied, as all
 revolutionary ideologists have done. In plain English: from customs, laws,
 morals, institutions, from all those things upon which the ancient world
 and ancient society rests. How can one get rid of the evil in this world?
 How can one get rid of ancient society? Only by declaring war against
 contracts (traditions, morality). _This Siegfried does._ He starts early
 at the game, very earlyhis origin itself is already a declaration of war
 against moralityhe is the result of adultery, of incest. Not the saga,
 but Wagner himself is the inventor of this radical feature, in this matter
 he _corrected_ the saga. Siegfried continues as he began: he follows only
 his first impulse, he flings all tradition, all respect, all _fear_ to the
 winds. Whatever displeases him he strikes down. He tilts irreverently at
 old god-heads. His principal undertaking, however, is to emancipate
 woman,to deliver Brunnhilda. Siegfried and Brunnhilda, the sacrament
 of free love, the dawn of the golden age, the twilight of the Gods of old
 morality_evil is got rid of_. For a long while Wagners ship sailed
 happily along this course. There can be no doubt that along it Wagner
 sought his highest goal.What happened? A misfortune. The ship dashed on
 to a reef; Wagner had run aground. The reef was Schopenhauers philosophy;
 Wagner had stuck fast on a _contrary_ view of the world. What had he set
 to music? Optimism? Wagner was ashamed. It was moreover an optimism for
 which Schopenhauer had devised an evil expression,_unscrupulous_
 optimism. He was more than ever ashamed. He reflected for some time; his
 position seemed desperate. At last a path of escape seemed gradually to
 open before himwhat if the reef on which he had been wrecked could be
 interpreted as a goal, as the ulterior motive, as the actual purpose of
 his journey? To be wrecked here, this was also a goal:_Bene navigavi cum
 naufragium feci_  and he translated the Ring into Schopenhauerian
 language. Everything goes wrong, everything goes to wrack and ruin, the
 new world is just as bad as the old one:Nonentity, the Indian Circe
 beckons  Brunnhilda, who according to the old plan had to retire with a
 song in honour of free love, consoling the world with the hope of a
 socialistic Utopia in which all will be well; now gets something else to
 do. She must first study Schopenhauer. She must first versify the fourth
 book of The World as Will and Idea. _Wagner was saved._ Joking apart,
 this _was_ a salvation. The service which Wagner owes to Schopenhauer is
 incalculable. It was the _philosopher of decadence_ who allowed the
 _artist of decadence_ to find himself.
 
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 _The artist of decadence._ That is the word. And here I begin to be
 serious. I could not think of looking on approvingly while this _dcadent_
 spoils our healthand music into the bargain. Is Wagner a man at all? Is
 he not rather a disease? Everything he touches he contaminates. _He has
 made music sick._
 
 A typical _dcadent_ who thinks himself necessary with his corrupted
 taste, who arrogates to himself a higher taste, who tries to establish his
 depravity as a law, as progress, as a fulfilment.
 
 And no one guards against it. His powers of seduction attain monstrous
 proportions, holy incense hangs around him, the misunderstanding
 concerning him is called the Gospel,and he has certainly not converted
 only the _poor in spirit_ to his cause!
 
 I should like to open the window a little:Air! More air!
 
 The fact that people in Germany deceive themselves concerning Wagner does
 not surprise me. The reverse would surprise me. The Germans have modelled
 a Wagner for themselves, whom they can honour: never yet have they been
 psychologists; they are thankful that they misunderstand. But that people
 should also deceive themselves concerning Wagner in Paris! Where people
 are scarcely anything else than psychologists. And in Saint Petersburg!
 Where things are divined, which even Paris has no idea of. How intimately
 related must Wagner be to the entire decadence of Europe for her not to
 have felt that he was decadent! He belongs to it, he is its protagonist,
 its greatest name. We bring honour on ourselves by elevating him to the
 cloudsFor the mere fact that no one guards against him is in itself
 already a sign of decadence. Instinct is weakened, what ought to be
 eschewed now attracts. People actually kiss that which plunges them more
 quickly into the abyss.Is there any need for an example? One has only to
 think of the rgime which anmic, or gouty, or diabetic people prescribe
 for themselves. The definition of a vegetarian: a creature who has need of
 a corroborating diet. To recognise what is harmful as harmful, to be able
 to deny oneself what is harmful, is a sign of youth, of vitality. That
 which is harmful lures the exhausted: cabbage lures the vegetarian.
 Illness itself can be a stimulus to life but one must be healthy enough
 for such a stimulus!Wagner increases exhaustion_therefore_ he attracts
 the weak and exhausted to him. Oh, the rattlesnake joy of the old Master
 precisely because he always saw the little children coming unto him!
 
 I place this point of view first and foremost: Wagners art is diseased.
 The problems he sets on the stage are all concerned with hysteria; the
 convulsiveness of his emotions, his over-excited sensitiveness, his taste
 which demands ever sharper condimentation, his erraticness which he togged
 out to look like principles, and, last but not least, his choice of heroes
 and heroines, considered as physiological types (a hospital ward!): the
 whole represents a morbid picture; of this there can be no doubt. _Wagner
 est une nvrose_. Maybe, that nothing is better known to-day, or in any
 case the subject of greater study, than the Protean character of
 degeneration which has disguised itself here, both as an art and as an
 artist. In Wagner our medical men and physiologists have a most
 interesting case, or at least a very complete one. Owing to the very fact
 that nothing is more modern than this thorough morbidness, this
 dilatoriness and excessive irritability of the nervous machinery, Wagner
 is the _modern artist par excellence_, the Cagliostro of modernity. All
 that the world most needs to-day, is combined in the most seductive manner
 in his art,the three great stimulants of exhausted people: _brutality_,
 _artificiality_ and _innocence_ (idiocy).
 
 Wagner is a great corrupter of music. With it, he found the means of
 stimulating tired nerves,and in this way he made music ill. In the art of
 spurring exhausted creatures back into activity, and of recalling
 half-corpses to life, the inventiveness he shows is of no mean order. He
 is the master of hypnotic trickery, and he fells the strongest like
 bullocks. Wagners _success_his success with nerves, and therefore with
 womenconverted the whole world of ambitious musicians into disciples of
 his secret art. And not only the ambitious, but also the _shrewd_. Only
 with morbid music can money be made to-day; our big theatres live on
 Wagner.
 
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 Once more I will venture to indulge in a little levity. Let us suppose
 that Wagners _success_ could become flesh and blood and assume a human
 form; that, dressed up as a good-natured musical savant, it could move
 among budding artists. How do you think it would then be likely to express
 itself?
 
 My friends, it would say, let us exchange a word or two in private. It is
 easier to compose bad music than good music. But what, if apart from this
 it were also more profitable, more effective, more convincing, more
 exalting, more secure, more _Wagnerian_? _Pulchrum est paucorum hominum._
 Bad enough in all conscience! We understand Latin, and perhaps we also
 understand which side our bread is buttered. Beauty has its drawbacks: we
 know that. Wherefore beauty then? Why not rather aim at size, at the
 sublime, the gigantic, that which moves the _masses_?And to repeat, it is
 easier to be titanic than to be beautiful; we know that.
 
 We know the masses, we know the theatre. The best of those who assemble
 there,German youths, horned Siegfrieds and other Wagnerites, require the
 sublime, the profound, and the overwhelming. This much still lies within
 our power. And as for the others who assemble there,the cultured
 _crtins_, the _blas_ pigmies, the eternally feminine, the gastrically
 happy, in short the peoplethey also require the sublime, the profound,
 the overwhelming. All these people argue in the same way. He who
 overthrows us is strong; he who elevates us is godly; he who makes us
 wonder vaguely is profound.Let us make up our mind then, my friends in
 music: we do want to overthrow them, we do want to elevate them, we do
 want to make them wonder vaguely. This much still lies within our powers.
 
 In regard to the process of making them wonder: it is here that our notion
 of style finds its starting-point. Above all, no thoughts! Nothing is
 more compromising than a thought! But the state of mind which _precedes_
 thought, the labour of the thought still unborn, the promise of future
 thought, the world as it was before God created ita recrudescence of
 chaos. Chaos makes people wonder.
 
 In the words of the master: infinity but without melody.
 
 In the second place, with regard to the overthrowing,this belongs at
 least in part, to physiology. Let us, in the first place, examine the
 instruments. A few of them would convince even our intestines (they
 _throw open_ doors, as Handel would say), others becharm our very marrow.
 The _colour of the melody is_ all-important here, _the melody itself_ is
 of no importance. Let us be precise about _this_ point. To what other
 purpose should we spend our strength? Let us be characteristic in tone
 even to the point of foolishness! If by means of tones we allow plenty of
 scope for guessing, this will be put to the credit of our intellects. Let
 us irritate nerves, let us strike them dead: let us handle thunder and
 lightning,that is what overthrows.
 
 But what overthrows best, is _passion_.We must try and be clear
 concerning this question of passion. Nothing is cheaper than passion! All
 the virtues of counterpoint may be dispensed with, there is no need to
 have learnt anything,but passion is always within our reach! Beauty is
 difficult: let us beware of beauty! And also of _melody!_ However much in
 earnest we may otherwise be about the ideal, let us slander, my friends,
 let us slander,let us slander melody! Nothing is more dangerous than a
 beautiful melody! Nothing is more certain to ruin taste! My friends, if
 people again set about loving beautiful melodies, we are lost!
 
 _First principle_: melody is immoral. _Proof_: Palestrina.
 _Application_: Parsifal. The absence of melody is in itself
 sanctifying.
 
 And this is the definition of passion. Passionor the acrobatic feats of
 ugliness on the tight-rope of enharmonicMy friends, let us dare to be
 ugly! Wagner dared it! Let us heave the mud of the most repulsive
 harmonies undauntedly before us. We must not even spare our hands! Only
 thus, shall we become _natural_.
 
 And now a last word of advice. Perhaps it covers everything_Let us be
 idealists!_If not the cleverest, it is at least the wisest thing we can
 do. In order to elevate men we ourselves must be exalted. Let us wander in
 the clouds, let us harangue eternity, let us be careful to group great
 symbols all around us! _Sursum! Bumbum!_there is no better advice. The
 heaving breast shall be our argument, beautiful feelings our
 advocates. Virtue still carries its point against counterpoint. How could
 he who improves us, help being better than we? man has ever thought thus.
 Let us therefore improve mankind!in this way we shall become good (in
 this way we shall even become classicsSchiller became a classic). The
 straining after the base excitement of the senses, after so-called beauty,
 shattered the nerves of the Italians: let us remain German! Even Mozarts
 relation to musicWagner spoke this word of comfort to uswas at bottom
 frivolous.
 
 Never let us acknowledge that music may be a recreation, that it may
 enliven, that it may give pleasure. _Never let us give pleasure!_we
 shall be lost if people once again think of music hedonistically. That
 belongs to the bad eighteenth century. On the other hand, nothing would
 be more advisable (between ourselves) than a dose of_cant, sit venia
 verbo_. This imparts dignity.And let us take care to select the precise
 moment when it would be fitting to have black looks, to sigh openly, to
 sigh devoutly, to flaunt grand Christian sympathy before their eyes. Man
 is corrupt who will save him? _what will save him?_ Do not let us reply.
 We must be on our guard. We must control our ambition, which would bid us
 found new religions. But no one must doubt that it is _we_ who save him,
 that in _our_ music alone salvation is to be found. (See Wagners essay,
 Religion and Art.)
 
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 Enough! Enough! I fear that, beneath all my merry jests, you are beginning
 to recognise the sinister truth only too clearlythe picture of the
 decline of art, of the decline of the artist. The latter, which is a
 decline of character, might perhaps be defined provisionally in the
 following manner: the musician is now becoming an actor, his art is
 developing ever more and more into a talent for _telling lies_. In a
 certain chapter of my principal work which bears the title Concerning the
 Physiology of Art,(9) I shall have an opportunity of showing more
 thoroughly how this transformation of art as a whole into histrionics is
 just as much a sign of physiological degeneration (or more precisely a
 form of hysteria), as any other individual corruption, and infirmity
 peculiar to the art which Wagner inaugurated: for instance the
 restlessness of its optics, which makes it necessary to change ones
 attitude to it every second. They understand nothing of Wagner who see in
 him but a sport of nature, an arbitrary mood, a chapter of accidents. He
 was not the defective, ill-fated, contradictory genius that people
 have declared him to be. Wagner was something _complete_, he was a typical
 _dcadent_, in whom every sign of free will was lacking, in whom every
 feature was necessary. If there is anything at all of interest in Wagner,
 it is the consistency with which a critical physiological condition may
 convert itself, step by step, conclusion after conclusion, into a method,
 a form of procedure, a reform of all principles, a crisis in taste.
 
 At this point I shall only stop to consider the question of _style_. How
 is _decadence_ in _literature_ characterised? By the fact that in it life
 no longer animates the whole. Words become predominant and leap right out
 of the sentence to which they belong, the sentences themselves trespass
 beyond their bounds, and obscure the sense of the whole page, and the page
 in its turn gains in vigour at the cost of the whole,the whole is no
 longer a whole. But this is the formula for every decadent style: there is
 always anarchy among the atoms, disaggregation of the will,in moral
 terms: freedom of the individual,extended into a political theory
 _equal_ rights for all. Life, equal vitality, all the vibration and
 exuberance of life, driven back into the smallest structure, and the
 remainder left almost lifeless. Everywhere paralysis, distress, and
 numbness, or hostility and chaos both striking one with ever increasing
 force the higher the forms of organisation are into which one ascends. The
 whole no longer lives at all: it is composed, reckoned up, artificial, a
 fictitious thing.
 
 In Wagners case the first thing we notice is an hallucination, not of
 tones, but of attitudes. Only after he has the latter does he begin to
 seek the semiotics of tone for them. If we wish to admire him, we should
 observe him at work here: how he separates and distinguishes, how he
 arrives at small unities, and how he galvanises them, accentuates them,
 and brings them into pre-eminence. But in this way he exhausts his
 strength the rest is worthless. How paltry, awkward, and amateurish is his
 manner of developing, his attempt at combining incompatible parts. His
 manner in this respect reminds one of two people who even in other ways
 are not unlike him in stylethe brothers Goncourt; one almost feels
 compassion for so much impotence. That Wagner disguised his inability to
 create organic forms, under the cloak of a principle, that he should have
 constructed a dramatic style out of what we should call the total
 inability to create any style whatsoever, is quite in keeping with that
 daring habit, which stuck to him throughout his life, of setting up a
 principle wherever capacity failed him. (In this respect he was very
 different from old Kant, who rejoiced in another form of daring, _i.e._:
 whenever a principle failed him, he endowed man with a capacity which
 took its place) Once more let it be said that Wagner is really only
 worthy of admiration and love by virtue of his inventiveness in small
 things, in his elaboration of details,here one is quite justified in
 proclaiming him a master of the first rank, as our greatest musical
 _miniaturist_ who compresses an infinity of meaning and sweetness into the
 smallest space. His wealth of colour, of chiaroscuro, of the mystery of a
 dying light, so pampers our senses that afterwards almost every other
 musician strikes us as being too robust. If people would believe me, they
 would not form the highest idea of Wagner from that which pleases them in
 him to-day. All that was only devised for convincing the masses, and
 people like ourselves recoil from it just as one would recoil from too
 garish a fresco. What concern have we with the irritating brutality of the
 overture to the Tannhauser? Or with the Walkyrie Circus? Whatever has
 become popular in Wagners art, including that which has become so outside
 the theatre, is in bad taste and spoils taste. The Tannhauser March
 seems to me to savour of the Philistine; the overture to the Flying
 Dutchman is much ado about nothing; the prelude to Lohengrin was the
 first, only too insidious, only too successful example of how one can
 hypnotise with music (I dislike all music which aspires to nothing higher
 than to convince the nerves). But apart from the Wagner who paints
 frescoes and practises magnetism, there is yet another Wagner who hoards
 small treasures: our greatest melancholic in music, full of side glances,
 loving speeches, and words of comfort, in which no one ever forestalled
 him,the tone-master of melancholy and drowsy happiness. A lexicon of
 Wagners most intimate phrasesa host of short fragments of from five to
 fifteen bars each, of music which _nobody knows_. Wagner had the virtue
 of _dcadents_,pity.
 
 
 
 
 8.
 
 
 Very good! But how can this _dcadent_ spoil ones taste if perchance
 one is not a musician, if perchance one is not oneself a
 _dcadent_?Conversely! How can one _help_ it! _Just_ you try it!You
 know not what Wagner is: quite a great actor! Does a more profound, a more
 _ponderous_ influence exist on the stage? Just look at these
 youthlets,all benumbed, pale, breathless! They are Wagnerites: they know
 nothing about music,and yet Wagner gets the mastery of them. Wagners art
 presses with the weight of a hundred atmospheres: do but submit, there is
 nothing else to do. Wagner the actor is a tyrant, his pathos flings all
 taste, all resistance, to the winds.
 
 Who else has this persuasive power in his attitudes, who else sees
 attitudes so clearly before anything else! This holding-of-its-breath in
 Wagnerian pathos, this disinclination to have done with an intense
 feeling, this terrifying habit of dwelling on a situation in which every
 instant almost chokes one.
 
 Was Wagner a musician at all? In any case he was something else to _a much
 greater degree_that is to say, an incomparable _histrio_, the greatest
 mime, the most astounding theatrical genius that the Germans have ever
 had, our _scenic artist par excellence_. He belongs to some other sphere
 than the history of music, with whose really great and genuine figure he
 must not be confounded. Wagner _and_ Beethoventhis is blasphemyand above
 all it does not do justice even to Wagner. As a musician he was no more
 than what he was as a man, he _became_ a musician, he _became_ a poet,
 because the tyrant in him, his actors genius, drove him to be both.
 Nothing is known concerning Wagner, so long as his dominating instinct has
 not been divined.
 
 Wagner was _not_ instinctively a musician. And this he proved by the way
 in which he abandoned all laws and rules, or, in more precise terms, all
 style in music, in order to make what he wanted with it, _i.e._, a
 rhetorical medium for the stage, a medium of expression, a means of
 accentuating an attitude, a vehicle of suggestion and of the
 psychologically picturesque. In this department Wagner may well stand as
 an inventor and an innovator of the first order_he increased the powers
 of speech __ of music to an incalculable degree_he is the Victor Hugo of
 music as language, provided always we allow that under certain
 circumstances music may be something which is not music, but
 speechinstrument_ancilla dramaturgica_. Wagners music, _not_ in the
 tender care of theatrical taste, which is very tolerant, is simply bad
 music, perhaps the worst that has ever been composed. When a musician can
 no longer count up to three, he becomes dramatic, he becomes
 Wagnerian.
 
 Wagner almost discovered the magic which can be wrought even now by means
 of music which is both incoherent and _elementary_. His consciousness of
 this attains to huge proportions, as does also his instinct to dispense
 entirely with higher law and _style_. The elementary factorssound,
 movement, colour, in short, the whole sensuousness of musicsuffice.
 Wagner never calculates as a musician with a musicians conscience, all he
 strains after is effect, nothing more than effect. And he knows what he
 has to make an effect upon!In this he is as unhesitating as Schiller was,
 as any theatrical man must be; he has also the latters contempt for the
 world which he brings to its knees before him. A man is an actor when he
 is ahead of mankind in his possession of this one view, that everything
 which has to strike people as true, must not be true. This rule was
 formulated by Talma: it contains the whole psychology of the actor, it
 also containsand this we need not doubtall his morality. Wagners music
 is never true.
 
 But it is supposed to be so: and thus everything is as it should be. As
 long as we are young, and Wagnerites into the bargain, we regard Wagner as
 rich, even as the model of a prodigal giver, even as a great landlord in
 the realm of sound. We admire him in very much the same way as young
 Frenchmen admire Victor Hugothat is to say, for his royal liberality.
 Later on we admire the one as well as the other for the opposite reason:
 as masters and paragons in economy, as _prudent_ amphitryons. Nobody can
 equal them in the art of providing a princely board with such a modest
 outlay.The Wagnerite, with his credulous stomach, is even sated with the
 fare which his master conjures up before him. But we others who, in books
 as in music, desire above all to find _substance_, and who are scarcely
 satisfied with the mere representation of a banquet, are much worse off.
 In plain English, Wagner does not give us enough to masticate. His
 recitativevery little meat, more bones, and plenty of brothI christened
 _alla genovese_: I had no intention of flattering the Genoese with this
 remark, but rather the _older recitativo_, the _recitativo secco_. And as
 to Wagnerian _leitmotif_, I fear I lack the necessary culinary
 understanding for it. If hard pressed, I might say that I regard it
 perhaps as an ideal toothpick, as an opportunity of ridding ones self of
 what remains of ones meal. Wagners arias are still left over. But now
 I shall hold my tongue.
 
 
 
 
 9.
 
 
 Even in his general sketch of the action, Wagner is above all an actor.
 The first thing that occurs to him is a scene which is certain to produce
 a strong effect, a real _actio_,(10) with a basso-relievo of attitudes; an
 _overwhelming_ scene, this he now proceeds to elaborate more deeply, and
 out of it he draws his characters. The whole of what remains to be done
 follows of itself, fully in keeping with a technical economy which has no
 reason to be subtle. It is not Corneilles public that Wagner has to
 consider, it is merely the nineteenth century. Concerning the actual
 requirements of the stage Wagner would have about the same opinion as any
 other actor of to-day, a series of powerful scenes, each stronger than the
 one that preceded it,and, in between, all kinds of _clever_ nonsense. His
 first concern is to guarantee the effect of his work; he begins with the
 third act, he _approves_ his work according to the quality of its final
 effect. Guided by this sort of understanding of the stage, there is not
 much danger of ones creating a drama unawares. Drama demands _inexorable_
 logic: but what did Wagner care about logic? Again I say, it was not
 Corneilles public that he had to consider; but merely Germans! Everybody
 knows the technical difficulties before which the dramatist often has to
 summon all his strength and frequently to sweat his blood: the difficulty
 of making the _plot_ seem necessary and the unravelment as well, so that
 both are conceivable only in a certain way, and so that each may give the
 impression of freedom (the principle of the smallest expenditure of
 energy). Now the very last thing that Wagner does is to sweat blood over
 the plot; and on this and the unravelment he certainly spends the smallest
 possible amount of energy. Let anybody put one of Wagners plots under
 the microscope, and I wager that he will be forced to laugh. Nothing is
 more enlivening than the dilemma in Tristan, unless it be that in the
 Mastersingers. Wagner is _no_ dramatist; let nobody be deceived on this
 point. All he did was to love the word dramahe always loved fine words.
 Nevertheless, in his writings the word drama is merely a
 misunderstanding (_and_ a piece of shrewdness: Wagner always affected
 superiority in regard to the word opera), just as the word spirit is
 a misunderstanding in the New Testament.He was not enough of a
 psychologist for drama; he instinctively avoided a psychological plotbut
 how?by always putting idiosyncrasy in its place. Very moderneh? Very
 Parisian! very decadent! Incidentally, the _plots_ that Wagner knows how
 to unravel with the help of dramatic inventions, are of quite another
 kind. For example, let us suppose that Wagner requires a female voice. A
 whole act without a womans voice would be impossible! But in this
 particular instance not one of the heroines happens to be free. What does
 Wagner do? He emancipates the oldest woman on earth, Erda. Step up, aged
 grandmamma! You have got to sing! And Erda sings. Wagners end has been
 achieved. Thereupon he immediately dismisses the old lady. Why on earth
 did you come? Off with you! Kindly go to sleep again! In short, a scene
 full of mythological awe, before which the Wagnerite _wonders_ all kinds
 of things.
 
 But the substance of Wagners texts! their mythical substance, their
 eternal substanceQuestion: how is this substance, this eternal substance
 tested? The chemical analyst replies: Translate Wagner into the real, into
 the modern,let us be even more cruel, and say into the bourgeois! And
 what will then become of him?Between ourselves, I have tried the
 experiment. Nothing is more entertaining, nothing more worthy of being
 recommended to a picnic-party, than to discuss Wagner dressed in a more
 modern garb: for instance Parsifal, as a candidate in divinity, with a
 public-school education (the latter, quite indispensable _for pure_
 foolishness). What _surprises_ await one! Would you believe it, that
 Wagners heroines one and all, once they have been divested of the heroic
 husks, are almost indistinguishable from Mdme. Bovary!just as one can
 conceive conversely, of Flauberts being _well able_ to transform all his
 heroines into Scandinavian or Carthaginian women, and then to offer them
 to Wagner in this mythologised form as a libretto. Indeed, generally
 speaking, Wagner does not seem to have become interested in any other
 problems than those which engross the little Parisian decadents of to-day.
 Always five paces away from the hospital! All very modern problems, all
 problems which are at home _in big cities!_ do not doubt it! Have you
 noticed (it is in keeping with this association of ideas) that Wagners
 heroines never have any children?They _cannot_ have them. The despair
 with which Wagner tackled the problem of arranging in some way for
 Siegfrieds birth, betrays how modern his feelings on this point actually
 were.Siegfried emancipated womanbut not with any hope of
 offspring.And now here is a fact which leaves us speechless: Parsifal is
 Lohengrins father! How ever did he do it?Ought one at this juncture to
 remember that chastity works miracles?
 
 _Wagnerus dixit princeps in castitate auctoritas._
 
 
 
 
 10.
 
 
 And now just a word _en passant_ concerning Wagners writings: they are
 among other things a school of _shrewdness_. The system of procedures of
 which Wagner disposes, might be applied to a hundred other cases,he that
 hath ears to hear let him hear. Perhaps I may lay claim to some public
 acknowledgment, if I put three of the most valuable of these procedures
 into a precise form.
 
 Everything that Wagner _cannot_ do is bad.
 
 Wagner could do much more than he does; but his strong principles prevent
 him.
 
 Everything that Wagner _can_ do, no one will ever be able to do after him,
 no one has ever done before him, and no one must ever do after him. Wagner
 is godly.
 
 These three propositions are the quintessence of Wagners writings;the
 rest is merelyliterature.
 
 Not every kind of music hitherto has been in need of literature; and it
 were well, to try and discover the actual reason of this. Is it perhaps
 that Wagners music is too difficult to understand? Or did he fear
 precisely the reversethat it was too easy,that people might _not
 understand it with sufficient difficulty_?As a matter of fact, his whole
 life long, he did nothing but repeat one proposition: that his music did
 not mean music alone! But something more! Something immeasurably more!
 _Not music alone__no_ musician would speak in this way. I repeat,
 Wagner could not create things as a whole; he had no choice, he was
 obliged to create things in bits, with motives, attitudes, formul,
 duplications, and hundreds of repetitions, he remained a rhetorician in
 music,and that is why he was at bottom _forced_ to press this means
 into the foreground. Music can never be anything else than a means: this
 was his theory, but above all it was the only _practice_ that lay open to
 him. No musician however thinks in this way.Wagner was in need of
 literature, in order to persuade the whole world to take his music
 seriously, profoundly, because it _meant_ an infinity of things, all his
 life he was the commentator of the Idea.What does Elsa stand for? But
 without a doubt, Elsa is the unconscious _mind of the people_ (when I
 realised this, I naturally became a thorough revolutionist).
 
 Do not let us forget that, when Hegel and Schelling were misleading the
 minds of Germany, Wagner was still young: that he guessed, or rather fully
 grasped, that the only thing which Germans take seriously isthe
 idea,that is to say, something obscure, uncertain, wonderful; that among
 Germans lucidity is an objection, logic a refutation. Schopenhauer
 rigorously pointed out the dishonesty of Hegels and Schellings
 age,rigorously, but also unjustly, for he himself, the pessimistic old
 counterfeiter, was in no way more honest than his more famous
 contemporaries. But let us leave morality out of the question, Hegel is a
 _matter of taste_. And not only of German but of European taste! A taste
 which Wagner understood!which he felt equal to! which he has
 immortalised!All he did was to apply it to musiche invented a style for
 himself, which might mean an infinity of things,he was _Hegels_ heir.
 Music as Idea.
 
 And how well Wagner was understood!The same kind of man who used to gush
 over Hegel, now gushes over Wagner, in his school they even _write_
 Hegelian.(11) But he who understood Wagner best, was the German youthlet.
 The two words infinity and meaning were sufficient for this: at their
 sound the youthlet immediately began to feel exceptionally happy. Wagner
 did _not_ conquer these boys with music, but with the idea:it is the
 enigmatical vagueness of his art, its game of hide-and-seek amid a hundred
 symbols, its polychromy in ideals, which leads and lures the lads. It is
 Wagners genius for forming clouds, his sweeps and swoops through the air,
 his ubiquity and nullibietyprecisely the same qualities with which Hegel
 led and lured in his time!Moreover in the presence of Wagners
 multifariousness, plenitude and arbitrariness, they seem to themselves
 justifiedsaved. Tremulously they listen while the _great symbols_ in
 his art seem to make themselves heard from out the misty distance, with a
 gentle roll of thunder, and they are not at all displeased if at times it
 gets a little grey, gruesome and cold. Are they not one and all, like
 Wagner himself, on _quite intimate terms_ with bad weather, with German
 weather! Wotan is their God, but Wotan is the God of bad weather. They
 are right, how could these German youthsin their present condition,miss
 what we others, we _halcyonians_, miss in Wagner? _i.e._: _la gaya
 scienza_; light feet, wit, fire, grave, grand logic, stellar dancing,
 wanton intellectuality, the vibrating light of the South, the calm
 seaperfection.
 
 
 
 
 11.
 
 
 I have mentioned the sphere to which Wagner belongscertainly not to the
 history of music. What, however, does he mean historically?_The rise of
 the actor in music_: a momentous event which not only leads me to think
 but also to fear.
 
 In a word: Wagner and Liszt. Never yet have the uprightness and
 genuineness of musicians been put to such a dangerous test. It is
 glaringly obvious: great success, mob success is no longer the achievement
 of the genuine,in order to get it a man must be an actor!Victor Hugo and
 Richard Wagnerthey both prove one and the same thing: that in declining
 civilisations, wherever the mob is allowed to decide, genuineness becomes
 superfluous, prejudicial, unfavourable. The actor, alone, can still kindle
 _great_ enthusiasm.And thus it is his _golden age_ which is now
 dawning,his and that of all those who are in any way related to him. With
 drums and fifes, Wagner marches at the head of all artists in declamation,
 in display and virtuosity. He began by convincing the conductors of
 orchestras, the scene-shifters and stage-singers, not to forget the
 orchestra:he delivered them from monotony. The movement that Wagner
 created has spread even to the land of knowledge: whole sciences
 pertaining to music are rising slowly, out of centuries of scholasticism.
 As an example of what I mean, let me point more particularly to
 _Riemanns_ services to rhythmics; he was the first who called attention
 to the leading idea in punctuationeven for music (unfortunately he did so
 with a bad word; he called it phrasing).All these people, and I say it
 with gratitude, are the best, the most respectable among Wagners
 admirersthey have a perfect right to honour Wagner. The same instinct
 unites them with one another; in him they recognise their highest type,
 and since he has inflamed them with his own ardour they feel themselves
 transformed into power, even into great power. In this quarter, if
 anywhere, Wagners influence has really been _beneficent_. Never before
 has there been so much thinking, willing, and industry in this sphere.
 Wagner endowed all these artists with a new conscience: what they now
 exact and _obtain_ from themselves, they had never exacted before Wagners
 timebefore then they had been too modest. Another spirit prevails on the
 stage since Wagner rules there the most difficult things are expected,
 blame is severe, praise very scarce,the good and the excellent have
 become the rule. Taste is no longer necessary, nor even is a good voice.
 Wagner is sung only with ruined voices: this has a more dramatic effect.
 Even talent is out of the question. Expressiveness at all costs, which is
 what the Wagnerian idealthe ideal of decadencedemands, is hardly
 compatible with talent. All that is required for this is virtuethat is to
 say, training, automatism, self-denial. Neither taste, voices, nor
 gifts, Wagners stage requires but one thing: _Germans!_ The definition
 of a German: an obedient man with long legs. There is a deep significance
 in the fact that the rise of Wagner should have coincided with the rise of
 the Empire: both phenomena are a proof of one and the same
 thingobedience and long legs.Never have people been more obedient, never
 have they been so well ordered about. The conductors of Wagnerian
 orchestras, more particularly, are worthy of an age, which posterity will
 one day call, with timid awe, the _classical age of war_.
 
 Wagner understood how to command; in this respect, too, he was a great
 teacher. He commanded as a man who had exercised an inexorable will over
 himselfas one who had practised lifelong discipline: Wagner was, perhaps,
 the greatest example of self-violence in the whole of the history of art
 (even Alfieri, who in other respects is his next-of-kin, is outdone by
 him. The note of a Torinese).
 
 
 
 
 12.
 
 
 This view, that our actors have become more worthy of respect than
 heretofore, does not imply that I believe them to have become less
 dangerous. But who is in any doubt as to what I want,as to what the
 _three requisitions_ are concerning which my wrath and my care and love of
 art, have made me open my mouth on this occasion?
 
 _That the stage should not become master of the arts._
 
 _That the actor should not become the corrupter of the genuine._
 
 _That music should not become an art of lying._
 
 _Friedrich Nietzsche._
 
 
 
 
 Postscript
 
 
 The gravity of these last words allows me at this point to introduce a few
 sentences out of an unprinted essay which will at least leave no doubt as
 to my earnestness in regard to this question. The title of this essay is:
 What Wagner has cost us.
 
 One pays dearly for having been a follower of Wagner. Even to-day a vague
 feeling that this is so, still prevails. Even Wagners success, his
 triumph, did not uproot this feeling thoroughly. But formerly it was
 strong, it was terrible, it was a gloomy hate throughout almost
 three-quarters of Wagners life. The resistance which he met with among us
 Germans cannot be too highly valued or too highly honoured. People guarded
 themselves against him as against an illness,not with argumentsit is
 impossible to refute an illness,but with obstruction, with mistrust, with
 repugnance, with loathing, with sombre earnestness, as though he were a
 great rampant danger. The sthetes gave themselves away when out of three
 schools of German philosophy they waged an absurd war against Wagners
 principles with ifs and forswhat did he care about principles, even
 his own!The Germans themselves had enough instinctive good sense to
 dispense with every if and for in this matter. An instinct is weakened
 when it becomes conscious: for by becoming conscious it makes itself
 feeble. If there were any signs that in spite of the universal character
 of European decadence there was still a modicum of health, still an
 instinctive premonition of what is harmful and dangerous, residing in the
 German soul, then it would be precisely this blunt resistance to Wagner
 which I should least like to see underrated. It does us honour, it gives
 us some reason to hope: France no longer has such an amount of health at
 her disposal. The Germans, these _loiterers par excellence_, as history
 shows, are to-day the most backward among the civilised nations of Europe;
 this has its advantages,for they are thus relatively the youngest.
 
 One pays dearly for having been a follower of Wagner. It is only quite
 recently that the Germans have overcome a sort of dread of him,the desire
 to be rid of him occurred to them again and again.(12) Does anybody
 remember a very curious occurrence in which, quite unexpectedly towards
 the end, this old feeling once more manifested itself? It happened at
 Wagners funeral. The first Wagner Society, the one in Munich, laid a
 wreath on his grave with this inscription, which immediately became
 famous: Salvation to the Saviour! Everybody admired the lofty
 inspiration which had dictated this inscription, as also the taste which
 seemed to be the privilege of the followers of Wagner. Many also, however
 (it was singular enough), made this slight alteration in it: Salvation
 _from_ the SaviourPeople began to breathe again
 
 One pays dearly for having been a follower of Wagner. Let us try to
 estimate the influence of this worship upon culture. Whom did this
 movement press to the front? What did it make ever more and more
 pre-eminent?In the first place the laymans arrogance, the arrogance of
 the art-maniac. Now these people are organising societies, they wish to
 make their taste prevail, they even wish to pose as judges _in rebus
 musicis et musicantibus_. Secondly: an ever increasing indifference
 towards severe, noble and conscientious schooling in the service of art,
 and in its place the belief in genius, or in plain English, cheeky
 dilettantism (the formula for this is to be found in the
 _Mastersingers_). Thirdly, and this is the worst of all: _Theatrocracy_,
 the craziness of a belief in the pre-eminence of the theatre, in the right
 of the theatre to rule supreme over the arts, over Art in general. But
 this should be shouted into the face of Wagnerites a hundred times over:
 that the theatre is something lower than art, something secondary,
 something coarsened, above all something suitably distorted and falsified
 for the mob. In this respect Wagner altered nothing: Bayreuth is grand
 Operaand not even good opera. The stage is a form of Demolatry in the
 realm of taste, the stage is an insurrection of the mob, a _plbiscite_
 against good taste. The case of Wagner proves this fact: he captivated
 the masseshe depraved taste, he even perverted our taste for opera!
 
 One pays dearly for having been a follower of Wagner. What has
 Wagner-worship made out of spirit? Does Wagner liberate the spirit? To him
 belong that ambiguity and equivocation and all other qualities which can
 convince the uncertain without making them conscious of why they have been
 convinced. In this sense Wagner is a seducer on a grand scale. There is
 nothing exhausted, nothing effete, nothing dangerous to life, nothing that
 slanders the world in the realm of spirit, which has not secretly found
 shelter in his art, he conceals the blackest obscurantism in the luminous
 orbs of the ideal. He flatters every nihilistic (Buddhistic) instinct and
 togs it out in music; he flatters every form of Christianity, every
 religious expression of decadence. He that hath ears to hear let him hear:
 everything that has ever grown out of the soil of impoverished life, the
 whole counterfeit coinage of the transcendental and of a Beyond found its
 most sublime advocate in Wagners art, not in formul (Wagner is too
 clever to use formul), but in the persuasion of the senses which in their
 turn makes the spirit weary and morbid. Music in the form of Circe  in
 this respect his last work is his greatest masterpiece. In the art of
 seduction Parsifal will for ever maintain its rank as a stroke of
 genius. I admire this work. I would fain have composed it myself. Wagner
 was never better inspired than towards the end. The subtlety with which
 beauty and disease are united here, reaches such a height, that it casts
 so to speak a shadow upon all Wagners earlier achievements: it seems too
 bright, too healthy. Do ye understand this? Health and brightness acting
 like a shadow? Almost like an objection? To this extent are we already
 pure fools. Never was there a greater Master in heavy hieratic
 perfumesNever on earth has there been such a connoisseur of paltry
 infinities, of all that thrills, of extravagant excesses, of all the
 feminism from out the vocabulary of happiness! My friends, do but drink
 the philtres of this art! Nowhere will ye find a more pleasant method of
 enervating your spirit, of forgetting your manliness in the shade of a
 rosebush. Ah, this old magician, mightiest of Klingsors; how he wages war
 against us with his art, against us free spirits! How he appeals to every
 form of cowardice of the modern soul with his charming girlish notes!
 There never was such a _mortal hatred_ of knowledge! One must be a very
 cynic in order to resist seduction here. One must be able to bite in order
 to resist worshipping at this shrine. Very well, old seducer! The cynic
 cautions you_cave canem_.
 
 One pays dearly for having been a follower of Wagner. I contemplate the
 youthlets who have long been exposed to his infection. The first
 relatively innocuous effect of it is the corruption of their taste. Wagner
 acts like chronic recourse to the bottle. He stultifies, he befouls the
 stomach. His specific effect: degeneration of the feeling for rhythm. What
 the Wagnerite calls rhythmical is what I call, to use a Greek metaphor,
 stirring a swamp. Much more dangerous than all this, however, is the
 corruption of ideas. The youthlet becomes a moon-calf, an idealist. He
 stands above science, and in this respect he has reached the masters
 heights. On the other hand, he assumes the airs of a philosopher, he
 writes for the _Bayreuth Journal_; he solves all problems in the name of
 the Father, the Son, and the Holy Master. But the most ghastly thing of
 all is the deterioration of the nerves. Let any one wander through a large
 city at night, in all directions he will hear people doing violence to
 instruments with solemn rage and fury, a wild uproar breaks out at
 intervals. What is happening? It is the disciples of Wagner in the act of
 worshipping him. Bayreuth is another word for a Hydro. A typical telegram
 from Bayreuth would read _bereits bereut_ (I already repent). Wagner is
 bad for young men; he is fatal for women. What medically speaking is a
 female Wagnerite? It seems to me that a doctor could not be too serious in
 putting this alternative of conscience to young women; either one thing or
 the other. But they have already made their choice. You cannot serve two
 Masters when one of these is Wagner. Wagner redeemed woman; and in return
 woman built Bayreuth for him. Every sacrifice, every surrender: there was
 nothing that they were not prepared to give him. Woman impoverishes
 herself in favour of the Master, she becomes quite touching, she stands
 naked before him. The female Wagnerite, the most attractive equivocality
 that exists to-day: she is the incarnation of Wagners cause: his cause
 triumphs with her as its symbol. Ah, this old robber! He robs our young
 men: he even robs our women as well, and drags them to his cell. Ah, this
 old Minotaur! What has he not already cost us? Every year processions of
 the finest young men and maidens are led into his labyrinth that he may
 swallow them up, every year the whole of Europe cries out Away to Crete!
 Away to Crete!.
 
 
 
 
 Second Postscript
 
 
 It seems to me that my letter is open to some misunderstanding. On certain
 faces I see the expression of gratitude; I even hear modest but merry
 laughter. I prefer to be understood here as in other things. But since a
 certain animal, _the worm_ of Empire, the famous _Rhinoxera_, has become
 lodged in the vineyards of the German spirit, nobody any longer
 understands a word I say. The _Kreus-Zeitung_ has brought this home to me,
 not to speak of the _Litterarisches Centralblatt_. I have given the
 Germans the deepest books that they have ever possesseda sufficient
 reason for their not having understood a word of them. If in this essay I
 declare war against Wagnerand incidentally against a certain form of
 German taste, if I seem to use strong language about the cretinism of
 Bayreuth, it must not be supposed that I am in the least anxious to
 glorify any other musician. Other musicians are not to be considered by
 the side of Wagner. Things are generally bad. Decay is universal. Disease
 lies at the very root of things. If Wagners name represents the ruin of
 music, just as Berninis stands for the ruin of sculpture, he is not on
 that account its cause. All he did was to accelerate the fall,though we
 are quite prepared to admit that he did it in a way which makes one recoil
 with horror from this almost instantaneous decline and fall to the depths.
 He possessed the ingenuousness of decadence: this constituted his
 superiority. He believed in it. He did not halt before any of its logical
 consequences. The others hesitatedthat is their distinction. They have no
 other. What is common to both Wagner and the others consists in this:
 the decline of all organising power, the abuse of traditional means,
 without the capacity or the aim that would justify this. The counterfeit
 imitation of grand forms, for which nobody nowadays is strong, proud,
 self-reliant and healthy enough, excessive vitality in small details;
 passion at all costs; refinement as an expression of impoverished life,
 ever more nerves in the place of muscle. I know only one musician who
 to-day would be able to compose an overture as an organic whole: and
 nobody else knows him.(13) He who is famous now, does not write better
 music than Wagner, but only less characteristic, less definite music:less
 definite, because half measures, even in decadence, cannot stand by the
 side of completeness. But Wagner was complete, Wagner represented thorough
 corruption, Wagner has had the courage, the will, and the conviction for
 corruption. What does Johannes Brahms matter? It was his good fortune to
 be misunderstood by Germany; he was taken to be an antagonist of
 Wagnerpeople required an antagonist!But he did not write necessary
 music, above all he wrote too much music!When one is not rich one should
 at least have enough pride to be poor! The sympathy which here and there
 was meted out to Brahms, apart from party interests and party
 misunderstandings, was for a long time a riddle to me, until one day
 through an accident, almost, I discovered that he affected a particular
 type of man. He has the melancholy of impotence. His creations are not the
 result of plenitude, he thirsts after abundance. Apart from what he
 plagiarises, from what he borrows from ancient or exotically modern
 styleshe is a master in the art of copying,there remains as his most
 individual quality a _longing_. And this is what the dissatisfied of all
 kinds, and all those who yearn, divine in him. He is much too little of a
 personality, too little of a central figure. The impersonal, those who
 are not self-centred, love him for this. He is especially the musician of
 a species of dissatisfied women. Fifty steps further on, and we find the
 female Wagneritejust as we find Wagner himself fifty paces ahead of
 Brahms.The female Wagnerite is a more definite, a more interesting, and
 above all, a more attractive type. Brahms is touching so long as he dreams
 or mourns over himself in privatein this respect he is modern;he becomes
 cold, we no longer feel at one with him when he poses as the child of the
 classics. People like to call Brahms Beethovens heir: I know of no more
 cautious euphemismAll that which to-day makes a claim to being the grand
 style in music is on precisely that account either false to us or false to
 itself. This alternative is suspicious enough: in itself it contains a
 casuistic question concerning the value of the two cases. The instinct of
 the majority protests against the alternative; false to usthey do not
 wish to be cheated;and I myself would certainly always prefer this type
 to the other (False to itself). This is _my_ taste.Expressed more
 clearly for the sake of the poor in spirit it amounts to this: Brahms
 _or_ Wagner. Brahms is _not_ an actor.A very great part of other
 musicians may be summed up in the concept BrahmsI do not wish to say
 anything about the clever apes of Wagner, as for instance Goldmark: when
 one has The Queen of Sheba to ones name, one belongs to a
 menagerie,one ought to put oneself on show.Nowadays all things that can
 be done well and even with a master hand are small. In this department
 alone is honesty still possible. Nothing, however, can cure music as a
 whole of its chief fault, of its fate, which is to be the expression of
 general physiological contradiction,which is, in fact, to be modern.
 
 The best instruction, the most conscientious schooling, the most thorough
 familiarity, yea, and even isolation, with the Old Masters,all this only
 acts as a palliative, or, more strictly speaking, has but an illusory
 effect, because the first condition of the right thing is no longer in our
 bodies; whether this first condition be the strong race of a Handel or the
 overflowing animal spirits of a Rossini. Not everyone has the right to
 every teacher: and this holds good of whole epochs.In itself it is not
 impossible that there are still remains of stronger natures, typical
 unadapted men, somewhere in Europe: from this quarter the advent of a
 somewhat belated form of beauty and perfection, even in music, might still
 be hoped for. But the most that we can expect to see are exceptional
 cases. From the rule, that corruption is paramount, that corruption is a
 fatality,not even a God can save music.
 
 
 
 
 Epilogue
 
 
 And now let us take breath and withdraw a moment from this narrow world
 which necessarily must be narrow, because we have to make enquiries
 relative to the value of _persons_. A philosopher feels that he wants to
 wash his hands after he has concerned himself so long with the Case of
 Wagner. I shall now give my notion of what is _modern_. According to the
 measure of energy of every age, there is also a standard that determines
 which virtues shall be allowed and which forbidden. The age either has the
 virtues of _ascending_ life, in which case it resists the virtues of
 degeneration with all its deepest instincts. Or it is in itself an age of
 degeneration, in which case it requires the virtues of declining life,in
 which case it hates everything that justifies itself, solely as being the
 outcome of a plenitude, or a superabundance of strength. sthetic is
 inextricably bound up with these biological principles: there is decadent
 sthetic, and _classical_ sthetic,beauty in itself is just as much a
 chimera as any other kind of idealism.Within the narrow sphere of the
 so-called moral values, no greater antithesis could be found than that of
 _master-morality_ and the morality of _Christian_ valuations: the latter
 having grown out of a thoroughly morbid soil. (The gospels present us
 with the same physiological types, as do the novels of Dostoiewsky), the
 master-morality (Roman, pagan, classical, Renaissance), on the
 other hand, being the symbolic speech of well-constitutedness, of
 _ascending_ life, and of the Will to Power as a vital principle.
 Master-morality _affirms_ just as instinctively as Christian morality
 _denies_ (God, Beyond, self-denial,all of them negations). The
 first reflects its plenitude upon things,it transfigures, it embellishes,
 it _rationalises_ the world,the latter impoverishes, bleaches, mars the
 value of things; it _suppresses_ the world. World is a Christian term of
 abuse. These antithetical forms in the optics of values, are _both_
 necessary: they are different points of view which cannot be circumvented
 either with arguments or counter-arguments. One cannot refute
 Christianity: it is impossible to refute a diseased eyesight. That people
 should have combated pessimism as if it had been a philosophy, was the
 very acme of learned stupidity. The concepts true and untrue do not
 seem to me to have any sense in optics.That, alone, which has to be
 guarded against is the falsity, the instinctive duplicity which _would
 fain_ regard this antithesis as no antithesis at all: just as Wagner
 did,and his mastery in this kind of falseness was of no mean order. To
 cast side-long glances at master-morality, at _noble_ morality (Icelandic
 saga is perhaps the greatest documentary evidence of these values), and at
 the same time to have the opposite teaching, the gospel of the lowly,
 the doctrine of the _need_ of salvation, on ones lips! Incidentally, I
 admire the modesty of Christians who go to Bayreuth. As for myself, I
 could _not_ endure to hear the sound of certain words on Wagners lips.
 There are some concepts which are too good for Bayreuth  What?
 Christianity adjusted for female Wagnerites, perhaps _by_ female
 Wagneritesfor, in his latter days Wagner was thoroughly _feminini
 generis_? Again I say, the Christians of to-day are too modest for me.
 If Wagner were a Christian, then Liszt was perhaps a Father of the
 Church!The need of _salvation_, the quintessence of all Christian needs,
 has nothing in common with such clowns; it is the most straightforward
 expression of decadence, it is the most convincing and most painful
 affirmation of decadence, in sublime symbols and practices. The Christian
 wishes _to be rid_ of himself. _Le moi est toujours haissable._ Noble
 morality, master-morality, on the other hand, is rooted in a triumphant
 saying of yea to _ones self_,it is the self-affirmation and
 self-glorification of life; it also requires sublime symbols and
 practices; but only because its heart is too full. The whole of
 beautiful art and of great art belongs here; their common essence is
 gratitude. But we must allow it a certain instinctive repugnance _to
 dcadents_, and a scorn and horror of the latters symbolism: such things
 almost prove it. The noble Romans considered Christianity as a _fda
 superstitio_: let me call to your minds the feelings which the last German
 of noble tasteGoethehad in regard to the cross. It is idle to look for
 more valuable, more _necessary_ contrasts.(14)
 
 But the kind of falsity which is characteristic of the Bayreuthians is not
 exceptional to-day. We all know the hybrid concept of the Christian
 gentleman. This _innocence_ in contradiction, this clean conscience in
 falsehood, is rather modern _par excellence_, with it modernity is almost
 defined. Biologically, modern man represents a _contradiction of values_,
 he sits between two stools, he says yea and nay in one breath. No wonder
 that it is precisely in our age that falseness itself became flesh and
 blood, and even genius! No wonder _Wagner_ dwelt amongst us! It was not
 without reason that I called Wagner the Cagliostro of modernity. But all
 of us, though we do not know it, involuntarily have values, words,
 formul, and morals in our bodies, which are quite _antagonistic_ in their
 originregarded from a physiological standpoint, we are _false_. How
 would a _diagnosis of the modern soul_ begin? With a determined incision
 into this agglomeration of contradictory instincts, with the total
 suppression of its antagonistic values, with vivisection applied to its
 most _instructive_ case. To philosophers the Case of Wagner is a
 _windfall_this essay, as you observe, was inspired by gratitude.
 
 
 
 
 
 NIETZSCHE _CONTRA_ WAGNER
 
 
 THE BRIEF OF A PSYCHOLOGIST
 
 
 
 
 Preface
 
 
 The following chapters have been selected from past works of mine, and not
 without care. Some of them date back as far as 1877. Here and there, of
 course, they will be found to have been made a little more intelligible,
 but above all, more brief. Read consecutively, they can leave no one in
 any doubt, either concerning myself, or concerning Wagner: we are
 antipodes. The reader will come to other conclusions, too, in his perusal
 of these pages: for instance, that this is an essay for psychologists and
 _not_ for Germans. I have my readers everywhere, in Vienna, St
 Petersburg, Copenhagen, Stockholm, Paris, and New Yorkbut _I have none_
 in Europes Flat-landGermany. And I might even have something to say to
 Italians whom I love just as much as I  _Quousque tandem, Crispi_ 
 Triple alliance: a people can only conclude a _msalliance_ with the
 Empire.
 
 Friedrich Nietzsche.
 
 Turin, _Christmas 1888_.
 
 
 
 
 Wherein I Admire Wagner.
 
 
 I believe that artists very often do not know what they are best able to
 do. They are much too vain. Their minds are directed to something prouder
 than merely to appear like little plants, which, with freshness, rareness,
 and beauty, know how to sprout from their soil with real perfection. The
 ultimate goodness of their own garden and vineyard is superciliously
 under-estimated by them, and their love and their insight are not of the
 same quality. Here is a musician who is a greater master than anyone else
 in the discovering of tones, peculiar to suffering, oppressed, and
 tormented souls, who can endow even dumb misery with speech. Nobody can
 approach him in the colours of late autumn, in the indescribably touching
 joy of a last, a very last, and all too short gladness; he knows of a
 chord which expresses those secret and weird midnight hours of the soul,
 when cause and effect seem to have fallen asunder, and at every moment
 something may spring out of nonentity. He is happiest of all when creating
 from out the nethermost depths of human happiness, and, so to speak, from
 out mans empty bumper, in which the bitterest and most repulsive drops
 have mingled with the sweetest for good or evil at last. He knows that
 weary shuffling along of the soul which is no longer able either to spring
 or to fly, nay, which is no longer able to walk, he has the modest glance
 of concealed suffering, of understanding without comfort, of leave-taking
 without word or sign; verily as the Orpheus of all secret misery he is
 greater than anyone, and many a thing was introduced into art for the
 first time by him, which hitherto had not been given expression, had not
 even been thought worthy of artthe cynical revolts, for instance, of
 which only the greatest sufferer is capable, also many a small and quite
 microscopical feature of the soul, as it were the scales of its amphibious
 natureyes indeed, he is the master of everything very small. But this he
 refuses to be! His tastes are much more in love with vast walls and with
 daring frescoes! He does not see that his spirit has another desire and
 benta totally different outlookthat it prefers to squat peacefully in
 the corners of broken-down houses: concealed in this way, and hidden even
 from himself, he paints his really great masterpieces, all of which are
 very short, often only one bar in lengththere, only, does he become quite
 good, great and perfect, perhaps there alone.Wagner is one who has
 suffered muchand this elevates him above other musicians.I admire Wagner
 wherever he sets _himself_ to music
 
 
 
 
 Wherein I Raise Objections.
 
 
 With all this I do not wish to imply that I regard this music as healthy,
 and least of all in those places where it speaks of Wagner himself. My
 objections to Wagners music are physiological objections. Why should I
 therefore begin by clothing them in sthetic formul? sthetic is indeed
 nothing more than applied physiologyThe fact I bring forward, my _petit
 fait vrai_, is that I can no longer breathe with ease when this music
 begins to have its effect upon me; that my foot immediately begins to feel
 indignant at it and rebels: for what it needs is time, dance, march; even
 the young German Kaiser could not march to Wagners Imperial March,what
 my foot demands in the first place from music is that ecstasy which lies
 in good walking, stepping and dancing. But do not my stomach, my heart, my
 circulation also protest? Are not my intestines also troubled? And do I
 not become hoarse unawares?  in order to listen to Wagner I require
 Graudels Pastilles. And then I ask myself, what is it that my whole
 body must have from music in general? for there is no such thing as a
 soul. I believe it must have relief: as if all animal functions were
 accelerated by means of light, bold, unfettered, self-reliant rhythms, as
 if brazen and leaden life could lose its weight by means of delicate and
 smooth melodies. My melancholy would fain rest its head in the haunts and
 abysses of perfection; for this reason I need music. But Wagner makes one
 illWhat do I care about the theatre? What do I care about the spasms of
 its moral ecstasies in which the moband who is not the mob
 to-day?rejoices? What do I care about the whole pantomimic hocus-pocus of
 the actor? You are beginning to see that I am essentially anti-theatrical
 at heart. For the stage, this mob art _par excellence_, my soul has that
 deepest scorn felt by every artist to-day. With a stage success a man
 sinks to such an extent in my esteem as to drop out of sight; failure in
 this quarter makes me prick my ears, makes me begin to pay attention. But
 this was not so with Wagner, next to the Wagner who created the most
 unique music that has ever existed there was the Wagner who was
 essentially a man of the stage, an actor, the most enthusiastic mimomaniac
 that has perhaps existed on earth, even as a musician. And let it be said
 _en passant_ that if Wagners theory was drama is the object, music is
 only a meanshis practice was from beginning to end the attitude is the
 end, drama and even music can never be anything else than means. Music as
 the manner of accentuating, of strengthening, and deepening dramatic poses
 and all things which please the senses of the actor; and Wagnerian drama
 only an opportunity for a host of interesting attitudes!Alongside of all
 other instincts he had the dictatorial instinct of a great actor in
 everything and, as I have already said, as a musician also.On one
 occasion, and not without trouble, I made this clear to a Wagnerite _pur
 sang_,clearness and a Wagnerite! I wont say another word. There were
 reasons for adding; For heavens sake, be a little more true unto
 yourself! We are not in Bayreuth now. In Bayreuth people are only upright
 in the mass; the individual lies, he even lies to himself. One leaves
 oneself at home when one goes to Bayreuth, one gives up all right to ones
 own tongue and choice, to ones own taste and even to ones own courage,
 one knows these things no longer as one is wont to have them and practise
 them before God and the world and between ones own four walls. In the
 theatre no one brings the finest senses of his art with him, and least of
 all the artist who works for the theatre,for here loneliness is lacking;
 everything perfect does not suffer a witness. In the theatre one becomes
 mob, herd, woman, Pharisee, electing cattle, patron, idiotWagnerite:
 there, the most personal conscience is bound to submit to the levelling
 charm of the great multitude, there the neighbour rules, there one
 _becomes_ a neighbour.
 
 
 
 
 Wagner As A Danger.
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 The aim after which more modern music is striving, which is now given the
 strong but obscure name of unending melody, can be clearly understood by
 comparing it to ones feelings on entering the sea. Gradually one loses
 ones footing and one ultimately abandons oneself to the mercy or fury of
 the elements: one has to swim. In the solemn, or fiery, swinging movement,
 first slow and then quick, of old musicone had to do something quite
 different; one had to dance. The measure which was required for this and
 the control of certain balanced degrees of time and energy, forced the
 soul of the listener to continual sobriety of thought.Upon the
 counterplay of the cooler currents of air which came from this sobriety,
 and from the warmer breath of enthusiasm, the charm of all good music
 restedRichard Wagner wanted another kind of movement,he overthrew the
 physiological first principle of all music before his time. It was no
 longer a matter of walking or dancing,we must swim, we must hover. This
 perhaps decides the whole matter. Unending melody really wants to break
 all the symmetry of time and strength; it actually scorns these thingsIts
 wealth of invention resides precisely in what to an older ear sounds like
 rhythmic paradox and abuse. From the imitation or the prevalence of such a
 taste there would arise a danger for musicso great that we can imagine
 none greaterthe complete degeneration of the feeling for rhythm, _chaos_
 in the place of rhythm. The danger reaches its climax when such music
 cleaves ever more closely to naturalistic play-acting and pantomime, which
 governed by no laws of form, aim at effect and nothing more.
 Expressiveness at all costs and music a servant, a slave to attitudesthis
 is the end.
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 What? would it really be the first virtue of a performance (as performing
 musical artists now seem to believe), under all circumstances to attain to
 a _haut-relief_ which cannot be surpassed? If this were applied to Mozart,
 for instance, would it not be a real sin against Mozarts spirit,Mozarts
 cheerful, enthusiastic, delightful and loving spirit? He who fortunately
 was no German, and whose seriousness is a charming and golden seriousness
 and not by any means that of a German clodhopper. Not to speak of the
 earnestness of the marble statue. But you seem to think that all music
 is the music of the marble statue?that all music should, so to speak,
 spring out of the wall and shake the listener to his very bowels? Only
 thus could music have any effect! But on whom would the effect be made?
 Upon something on which a noble artist ought never to deign to act,upon
 the mob, upon the immature! upon the blass! upon the diseased! upon
 idiots! upon _Wagnerites_!
 
 
 
 A Music Without A Future.
 
 
 Of all the arts which succeed in growing on the soil of a particular
 culture, music is the last plant to appear; maybe because it is the one
 most dependent upon our innermost feelings, and therefore the last to come
 to the surfaceat a time when the culture to which it belongs is in its
 autumn season and beginning to fade. It was only in the art of the Dutch
 masters that the spirit of medival Christianity found its expression,
 its architecture of sound is the youngest, but genuine and legitimate,
 sister of the Gothic. It was only in Handels music that the best in
 Luther and in those like him found its voice, the Judeo-heroic trait which
 gave the Reformation a touch of greatness-the Old Testament, _not_ the
 New, become music. It was left to Mozart, to pour out the epoch of Louis
 XIV., and of the art of Racine and Claude Lorrain, in _ringing_ gold; only
 in Beethovens and Rossinis music did the Eighteenth Century sing itself
 outthe century of enthusiasm, broken ideals, and _fleeting joy_. All real
 and original music is a swan songEven our last form of music, despite its
 prevalence and its will to prevail, has perhaps only a short time to live,
 for it sprouted from a soil which was in the throes of a rapid
 subsidence,of a culture which will soon be _submerged_. A certain
 catholicism of feeling, and a predilection for some ancient indigenous
 (so-called national) ideals and eccentricities, was its first condition.
 Wagners appropriation of old sagas and songs, in which scholarly
 prejudice taught us to see something German _par excellence_now we laugh
 at it all, the resurrection of these Scandinavian monsters with a thirst
 for ecstatic sensuality and spiritualisationthe whole of this taking and
 giving on Wagners part, in the matter of subjects, characters, passions,
 and nerves, would also give unmistakable expression to the _spirit of his
 music_ provided that this music, like any other, did not know how to speak
 about itself save ambiguously: for _musica is a woman_. We must not let
 ourselves be misled concerning this state of things, by the fact that at
 this very moment we are living in a reaction, _in the heart itself_ of a
 reaction. The age of international wars, of ultramontane martyrdom, in
 fact, the whole interlude-character which typifies the present condition
 of Europe, may indeed help an art like Wagners to sudden glory, without,
 however, in the least ensuring its _future prosperity_. The Germans
 themselves have no future.
 
 
 
 We Antipodes.
 
 
 Perhaps a few people, or at least my friends, will remember that I made my
 first plunge into life armed with some errors and some exaggerations, but
 that, in any case, I began with _hope_ in my heart. In the philosophical
 pessimism of the nineteenth century, I recognisedwho knows by what
 by-paths of personal experiencethe symptom of a higher power of thought,
 a more triumphant plenitude of life, than had manifested itself hitherto
 in the philosophies of Hume, Kant and Hegel!I regarded _tragic_ knowledge
 as the most beautiful luxury of our culture, as its most precious, most
 noble, most dangerous kind of prodigality; but, nevertheless, in view of
 its overflowing wealth, as a justifiable _luxury_. In the same way, I
 began by interpreting Wagners music as the expression of a Dionysian
 powerfulness of soul. In it I thought I heard the earthquake by means of
 which a primeval life-force, which had been constrained for ages, was
 seeking at last to burst its bonds, quite indifferent to how much of that
 which nowadays calls itself culture, would thereby be shaken to ruins. You
 see how I misinterpreted, you see also, what I _bestowed_ upon Wagner and
 Schopenhauermyself. Every art and every philosophy may be regarded
 either as a cure or as a stimulant to ascending or declining life: they
 always presuppose suffering and sufferers. But there are two kinds of
 sufferers:those that suffer from _overflowing vitality_, who need
 Dionysian art and require a tragic insight into, and a tragic outlook
 upon, the phenomenon life,and there are those who suffer from _reduced_
 vitality, and who crave for repose, quietness, calm seas, or else the
 intoxication, the spasm, the bewilderment which art and philosophy
 provide. Revenge upon life itselfthis is the most voluptuous form of
 intoxication for such indigent souls! Now Wagner responds quite as well
 as Schopenhauer to the twofold cravings of these people,they both deny
 life, they both slander it but precisely on this account they are my
 antipodes.The richest creature, brimming over with vitality,the
 Dionysian God and man, may not only allow himself to gaze upon the
 horrible and the questionable; but he can also lend his hand to the
 terrible deed, and can indulge in all the luxury of destruction,
 disaggregation, and negation,in him evil, purposelessness and ugliness,
 seem just as allowable as they are in naturebecause of his bursting
 plenitude of creative and rejuvenating powers, which are able to convert
 every desert into a luxurious land of plenty. Conversely, it is the
 greatest sufferer and pauper in vitality, who is most in need of mildness,
 peace and goodnessthat which to-day is called humanenessin thought as
 well as in action, and possibly of a God whose speciality is to be a God
 of the sick, a Saviour, and also of logic or the abstract intelligibility
 of existence even for idiots (the typical free-spirits, like the
 idealists, and beautiful souls, are _dcadents_); in short, of a warm,
 danger-tight, and narrow confinement, between optimistic horizons which
 would allow of stultification. And thus very gradually, I began to
 understand Epicurus, the opposite of a Dionysian Greek, and also the
 Christian who in fact is only a kind of Epicurean, and who, with his
 belief that faith saves, carries the principle of Hedonism _as far as
 possible_far beyond all intellectual honesty. If I am ahead of all other
 psychologists in anything, it is in this fact that my eyes are more keen
 for tracing those most difficult and most captious of all deductions, in
 which the largest number of mistakes have been made,the deduction which
 makes one infer something concerning the author from his work, something
 concerning the doer from his deed, something concerning the idealist from
 the need which produced this ideal, and something concerning the imperious
 _craving_ which stands at the back of all thinking and valuingIn regard
 to all artists of what kind soever, I shall now avail myself of this
 radical distinction: does the creative power in this case arise from a
 loathing of life, or from an excessive _plenitude_ of life? In Goethe, for
 instance, an overflow of vitality was creative, in Flauberthate:
 Flaubert, a new edition of Pascal, but as an artist with this instinctive
 belief at heart: _Flaubert est toujours haissable, lhomme nest rien,
 luvre est tout_. He tortured himself when he wrote, just as Pascal
 tortured himself when he thoughtthe feelings of both were inclined to be
 non-egoistic.  Disinterestednessprinciple of decadence, the will to
 nonentity in art as well as in morality.
 
 
 
 Where Wagner Is At Home.
 
 
 Even at the present day, France is still the refuge of the most
 intellectual and refined culture in Europe, it remains the high school of
 taste: but one must know where to find this France of taste. The
 _North-German Gazette_, for instance, or whoever expresses his sentiments
 in that paper, thinks that the French are barbarians,as for me, if I
 had to find the _blackest_ spot on earth, where slaves still required to
 be liberated, I should turn in the direction of Northern Germany. But
 those who form part of _that select_ France take very good care to
 _conceal themselves_; they are a small body of men, and there may be some
 among them who do not stand on very firm legsa few may be fatalists,
 hypochondriacs, invalids; others may be enervated, and artificial,such
 are those who would fain be artistic,but all the loftiness and delicacy
 which still remains to this world, is in their possession. In this France
 of intellect, which is also the France of pessimism, Schopenhauer is
 already much more at home than he ever was in Germany, his principal work
 has already been translated twice, and the second time so excellently that
 now I prefer to read Schopenhauer in French (he was an _accident_ among
 Germans, just as I amthe Germans have no fingers wherewith to grasp us;
 they havent any fingers at all,but only claws). And I do not mention
 Heine_ladorable Heine_, as they say in Pariswho long since has passed
 into the flesh and blood of the more profound and more soulful of French
 lyricists. How could the horned cattle of Germany know how to deal with
 the _dlicatesses_ of such a nature!And as to Richard Wagner, it is
 obvious, it is even glaringly obvious, that Paris is the very _soil_ for
 him, the more French music adapts itself to the needs of _lme moderne_,
 the more Wagnerian it will become,it is far enough advanced in this
 direction already.In this respect one should not allow ones self to be
 misled by Wagner himselfit was simply disgraceful on Wagners part to
 scoff at Paris, as he did, in its agony in 1871. In spite of it all, in
 Germany Wagner is only a misapprehension.who could be more incapable of
 understanding anything about Wagner than the Kaiser, for instance?To
 everybody familiar with the movement of European culture, this fact,
 however, is certain, that French romanticism and Richard Wagner are most
 intimately related. All dominated by literature, up to their very eyes and
 earsthe first European artists with a _universal literary_ culture,most
 of them writers, poets, mediators and minglers of the senses and the arts,
 all fanatics in _expression_, great discoverers in the realm of the
 sublime as also of the ugly and the gruesome, and still greater
 discoverers in passion, in working for effect, in the art of dressing
 their windows,all possessing talent far above their genius,virtuosos to
 their backbone, knowing of secret passages to all that seduces, lures,
 constrains or overthrows; born enemies of logic and of straight lines,
 thirsting after the exotic, the strange and the monstrous, and all opiates
 for the senses and the understanding. On the whole, a daring dare-devil,
 magnificently violent, soaring and high-springing crew of artists, who
 first had to teach their own centuryit is the century of the mobwhat the
 concept artist meant. But they were _ill_.
 
 
 
 Wagner As The Apostle Of Chastity.
 
 
 1.
 
 
 Is this the German way?
 Comes this low bleating forth from German hearts?
 Should Teutons, sin repenting, lash themselves,
 Or spread their palms with priestly unctuousness,
 Exalt their feelings with the censers fumes,
 And cower and quake and bend the trembling knee,
 And with a sickly sweetness plead a prayer?
 Then ogle nuns, and ring the Ave-bell,
 And thus with morbid fervour out-do heaven?
 Is this the German way?
 Beware, yet are you free, yet your own Lords.
 What yonder lures is Rome, Romes faith sung without words.
 
 
 2.
 
 
 There is no necessary contrast between sensuality and chastity, every good
 marriage, every genuine love affair is above this contrast; but in those
 cases where the contrast exists, it is very far from being necessarily a
 tragic one. This, at least, ought to hold good of all well-constituted and
 good-spirited mortals, who are not in the least inclined to reckon their
 unstable equilibrium between angel and _petite bte_, without further ado,
 among the objections to existence, the more refined and more intelligent
 like Hafis and Goethe, even regarded it as an additional attraction. It is
 precisely contradictions of this kind which lure us to life. On the other
 hand, it must be obvious, that when Circes unfortunate animals are
 induced to worship chastity, all they see and _worship_ therein, is their
 oppositeoh! and with what tragic groaning and fervour, may well be
 imaginedthat same painful and thoroughly superfluous opposition which,
 towards the end of his life, Richard Wagner undoubtedly wished to set to
 music and to put on the stage, _And to what purpose?_ we may reasonably
 ask.
 
 
 3.
 
 
 And yet this other question can certainly not be circumvented: what
 business had he actually with that manly (alas! so unmanly) bucolic
 simplicity, that poor devil and son of natureParsifal, whom he
 ultimately makes a catholic by such insidious meanswhat?was Wagner in
 earnest with Parsifal? For, that he was laughed at, I cannot deny, any
 more than Gottfried Keller can. We should like to believe that Parsifal
 was meant as a piece of idle gaiety, as the closing act and satyric drama,
 with which Wagner the tragedian wished to take leave of us, of himself,
 and above all _of tragedy_, in a way which befitted him and his dignity,
 that is to say, with an extravagant, lofty and most malicious parody of
 tragedy itself, of all the past and terrible earnestness and sorrow of
 this world, of the most _ridiculous_ form of the unnaturalness of the
 ascetic ideal, at last overcome. For Parsifal is the subject _par
 excellence_ for a comic opera. Is Wagners Parsifal his secret laugh of
 superiority at himself, the triumph of his last and most exalted state of
 artistic freedom, of artistic transcendenceis it Wagner able to _laugh_
 at himself? Once again we only wish it were so; for what could Parsifal be
 if he were _meant seriously_? Is it necessary in his case to say (as I
 have heard people say) that Parsifal is the product of the mad hatred
 of knowledge, intellect, and sensuality? a curse upon the senses and the
 mind in one breath and in one fit of hatred? an act of apostasy and a
 return to Christianly sick and obscurantist ideals? And finally even a
 denial of self, a deletion of self, on the part of an artist who
 theretofore had worked with all the power of his will in favour of the
 opposite cause, the spiritualisation and sensualisation of his art? And
 not only of his art, but also of his life? Let us remember how
 enthusiastically Wagner at one time walked in the footsteps of the
 philosopher Feuerbach. Feuerbachs words healthy sensuality struck
 Wagner in the thirties and forties very much as they struck many other
 Germansthey called themselves the young Germansthat is to say, as words
 of salvation. Did he ultimately _change his mind_ on this point? It would
 seem that he had at least had the desire of _changing_ his doctrine
 towards the end. Had the _hatred of life_ become dominant in him as in
 Flaubert? For Parsifal is a work of rancour, of revenge, of the most
 secret concoction of poisons with which to make an end of the first
 conditions of life, _it is a bad work_. The preaching of chastity remains
 an incitement to unnaturalness: I despise anybody who does not regard
 Parsifal as an outrage upon morality.
 
 
 
 How I Got Rid Of Wagner.
 
 
 1.
 
 
 Already in the summer of 1876, when the first festival at Bayreuth was at
 its height, I took leave of Wagner in my soul. I cannot endure anything
 double-faced. Since Wagner had returned to Germany, he had condescended
 step by step to everything that I despiseeven to anti-Semitism. As a
 matter of fact, it was then high time to bid him farewell: but the proof
 of this came only too soon. Richard Wagner, ostensibly the most triumphant
 creature alive; as a matter of fact, though, a cranky and desperate
 _dcadent_, suddenly fell helpless and broken on his knees before the
 Christian cross. Was there no German at that time who had the eyes to
 see, and the sympathy in his soul to feel, the ghastly nature of this
 spectacle? Was I the only one who _suffered_ from it?Enough, the
 unexpected event, like a flash of lightning, made me see only too clearly
 what kind of a place it was that I had just left,and it also made me
 shudder as a man shudders who unawares has just escaped a great danger. As
 I continued my journey alone, I trembled. Not long after this I was ill,
 more than illI was _tired_;tired of the continual disappointments over
 everything which remained for us modern men to be enthusiastic about, of
 the energy, industry, hope, youth, and love that are _squandered
 everywhere_; tired out of loathing for the whole world of idealistic lying
 and conscience-softening, which, once again, in the case of Wagner, had
 scored a victory over a man who was of the bravest; and last but not
 least, tired by the sadness of a ruthless suspicionthat I was now
 condemned to be ever more and more suspicious, ever more and more
 contemptuous, ever more and more _deeply_ alone than I had been
 theretofore. For I had no one save Richard Wagner. I was always condemned
 to the society of Germans.
 
 
 2.
 
 
 Henceforward alone and cruelly distrustful of myself, I then took up
 sidesnot without anger_against myself_ and _for_ all that which hurt me
 and fell hard upon me; and thus I found the road to that courageous
 pessimism which is the opposite of all idealistic falsehood, and which, as
 it seems to me, is also the road to _me__to my mission_. That hidden and
 dominating thing, for which for long ages we have had no name, until
 ultimately it comes forth as our mission,this tyrant in us wreaks a
 terrible revenge upon us for every attempt we make either to evade him or
 to escape him, for every one of our experiments in the way of befriending
 people to whom we do not belong, for every active occupation, however
 estimable, which may make us diverge from our principal object:aye, and
 even for every virtue which would fain protect us from the rigour of our
 most intimate sense of responsibility. Illness is always the answer,
 whenever we venture to doubt our right to _our_ mission, whenever we begin
 to make things too easy for ourselves. Curious and terrible at the same
 time! It is for our relaxation that we have to pay most dearly! And should
 we wish after all to return to health, we then have no choice: we are
 compelled to burden ourselves _more_ heavily than we had been burdened
 before.
 
 
 
 The Psychologist Speaks.
 
 
 1.
 
 
 The oftener a psychologista born, an unavoidable psychologist and
 soul-divinerturns his attention to the more select cases and individuals,
 the greater becomes his danger of being suffocated by sympathy: he needs
 greater hardness and cheerfulness than any other man. For the corruption,
 the ruination of higher men, is in fact the rule: it is terrible to have
 such a rule always before our eyes. The manifold torments of the
 psychologist who has discovered this ruination, who discovers once, and
 then discovers almost repeatedly throughout all history, this universal
 inner hopelessness of higher men, this eternal too late! in every
 sensemay perhaps one day be the cause of his going to the dogs himself.
 In almost every psychologist we may see a tell-tale predilection in favour
 of intercourse with commonplace and well-ordered men: and this betrays how
 constantly he requires healing, that he needs a sort of flight and
 forgetfulness, away from what his insight and incisivenessfrom what his
 businesshas laid upon his conscience. A horror of his memory is typical
 of him. He is easily silenced by the judgment of others, he hears with
 unmoved countenance how people honour, admire, love, and glorify, where he
 has opened his eyes and _seen_or he even conceals his silence by
 expressly agreeing with some obvious opinion. Perhaps the paradox of his
 situation becomes so dreadful that, precisely where he has learnt _great
 sympathy_, together with _great contempt_, the educated have on their part
 learnt great reverence. And who knows but in all great instances, just
 this alone happened: that the multitude worshipped a God, and that the
 God was only a poor sacrificial animal! _Success_ has always been the
 greatest liarand the work itself, the _deed_, is a success too; the
 great statesman, the conqueror, the discoverer, are disguised in their
 creations until they can no longer be recognised, the work of the
 artist, of the philosopher, only invents him who has created it, who is
 reputed to have created it, the great men, as they are reverenced, are
 poor little fictions composed afterwards; in the world of historical
 values counterfeit coinage _prevails_.
 
 
 2.
 
 
 Those great poets, for example, such as Byron, Musset, Poe, Leopardi,
 Kleist, Gogol (I do not dare to mention much greater names, but I imply
 them), as they now appear, and were perhaps obliged to be: men of the
 moment, sensuous, absurd, versatile, light-minded and quick to trust and
 to distrust, with souls in which usually some flaw has to be concealed,
 often taking revenge with their works for an internal blemish, often
 seeking forgetfulness in their soaring from a too accurate memory,
 idealists out of proximity to the mud:what a _torment_ these great
 artists are and the so-called higher men in general, to him who has once
 found them out! We are all special pleaders in the cause of mediocrity. It
 is conceivable that it is just from womanwho is clairvoyant in the world
 of suffering, and, alas! also unfortunately eager to help and save to an
 extent far beyond her powersthat _they_ have learnt so readily those
 outbreaks of boundless _sympathy_ which the multitude, above all the
 reverent multitude, overwhelms with prying and self-gratifying
 interpretations. This sympathising invariably deceives itself as to its
 power; woman would like to believe that love can do _everything_it is the
 _superstition_ peculiar to her. Alas, he who knows the heart finds out how
 poor, helpless, pretentious, and blundering even the best and deepest love
 ishow much more readily it _destroys_ than saves.
 
 
 3.
 
 
 The intellectual loathing and haughtiness of every man who has suffered
 deeplythe extent to which a man can suffer, almost determines the order
 of rankthe chilling uncertainty with which he is thoroughly imbued and
 coloured, that by virtue of his suffering he _knows more_ than the
 shrewdest and wisest can ever know, that he has been familiar with, and
 at home in many distant terrible worlds of which _you_ know
 nothing!this silent intellectual haughtiness, this pride of the elect of
 knowledge, of the initiated, of the almost sacrificed, finds all forms
 of disguise necessary to protect itself from contact with gushing and
 sympathising hands, and in general from all that is not its equal in
 suffering. Profound suffering makes noble; it separates.One of the most
 refined forms of disguise is Epicurism, along with a certain ostentatious
 boldness of taste which takes suffering lightly, and puts itself on the
 defensive against all that is sorrowful and profound. There are cheerful
 men who make use of good spirits, because they are misunderstood on
 account of themthey _wish_ to be misunderstood. There are scientific
 minds who make use of science, because it gives a cheerful appearance,
 and because love of science leads people to conclude that a person is
 shallowthey _wish_ to mislead to a false conclusion. There are free
 insolent spirits which would fain conceal and deny that they are at bottom
 broken, incurable heartsthis is Hamlets case: and then folly itself can
 be the mask of an unfortunate and alas! all too dead-certain knowledge.
 
 
 
 Epilogue.
 
 
 1.
 
 
 I have often asked myself whether I am not much more deeply indebted to
 the hardest years of my life than to any others. According to the voice of
 my innermost nature, everything necessary, seen from above and in the
 light of a _superior_ economy, is also useful in itselfnot only should
 one bear it, one should _love_ it. _Amor fati_: this is the very core of
 my beingAnd as to my prolonged illness, do I not owe much more to it than
 I owe to my health? To it I owe a _higher_ kind of health, a sort of
 health which grows stronger under everything that does not actually kill
 it!_To it, I owe even my philosophy_. Only great suffering is the
 ultimate emancipator of spirit, for it teaches one that _vast
 suspiciousness_ which makes an X out of every U, a genuine and proper X,
 _i.e._, the antepenultimate letter. Only great suffering; that great
 suffering, under which we seem to be over a fire of greenwood, the
 suffering that takes its timeforces us philosophers to descend into our
 nethermost depths, and to let go of all trustfulness, all good-nature, all
 whittling-down, all mildness, all mediocrity,on which things we had
 formerly staked our humanity. I doubt whether such suffering improves a
 man; but I know that it makes him _deeper_. Supposing we learn to set our
 pride, our scorn, our strength of will against it, and thus resemble the
 Indian who, however cruelly he may be tortured, considers himself revenged
 on his tormentor by the bitterness of his own tongue. Supposing we
 withdraw from pain into nonentity, into the deaf, dumb, and rigid sphere
 of self-surrender, self-forgetfulness, self-effacement: one is another
 person when one leaves these protracted and dangerous exercises in the art
 of self-mastery, one has one note of interrogation the more, and above all
 one has the will henceforward to ask more, deeper, sterner, harder, more
 wicked, and more silent questions, than anyone has ever asked on earth
 before. Trust in life has vanished; life itself has become a
 _problem_.But let no one think that one has therefore become a spirit of
 gloom or a blind owl! Even love of life is still possible,but it is a
 _different kind_ of love. It is the love for a woman whom we doubt.
 
 
 2.
 
 
 The rarest of all things is this: to have after all another tastea
 _second_ taste. Out of such abysses, out of the abyss of _great suspicion_
 as well, a man returns as though born again, he has a new skin, he is more
 susceptible, more full of wickedness; he has a finer taste for joyfulness;
 he has a more sensitive tongue for all good things; his senses are more
 cheerful; he has acquired a second, more dangerous, innocence in gladness;
 he is more childish too, and a hundred times more cunning than ever he had
 been before.
 
 Oh, how much more repulsive pleasure now is to him, that coarse, heavy,
 buff-coloured pleasure, which is understood by our pleasure-seekers, our
 cultured people, our wealthy folk and our rulers! With how much more
 irony we now listen to the hubbub as of a country fair, with which the
 cultured man and the man about town allow themselves to be forced
 through art, literature, music, and with the help of intoxicating liquor,
 to intellectual enjoyments. How the stage-cry of passion now stings our
 ears; how strange to our taste the whole romantic riot and sensuous
 bustle, which the cultured mob are so fond of, together with its
 aspirations to the sublime, to the exalted and the distorted, have become.
 No: if we convalescents require an art at all, it is _another_ art-a
 mocking, nimble, volatile, divinely undisturbed, divinely artificial art,
 which blazes up like pure flame into a cloudless sky! But above all, an
 art for artists, _only for artists_! We are, after all, more conversant
 with that which is in the highest degree necessarycheerfulness, _every
 kind_ of cheerfulness, my friends! We men of knowledge, now know
 something only too well: oh how well we have learnt by this time, to
 forget, _not_ to know, as artists! As to our future: we shall scarcely be
 found on the track of those Egyptian youths who break into temples at
 night, who embrace statues, and would fain unveil, strip, and set in broad
 daylight, everything which there are excellent reasons to keep
 concealed.(15) No, we are disgusted with this bad taste, this will to
 truth, this search after truth at all costs; this madness of
 adolescence, the love of truth; we are now too experienced, too serious,
 too joyful, too scorched, _too profound_ for that. We no longer believe
 that truth remains truth when it is _unveiled_,we have lived enough to
 understand this. To-day it seems to us good form not to strip everything
 naked, not to be present at all things, not to desire to know all.
 _Tout comprendre cest tout mpriser._ Is it true, a little girl once
 asked her mother, that the beloved Father is everywhere?I think it quite
 improper,a hint to philosophers. The shame with which Nature has
 concealed herself behind riddles and enigmas should be held in higher
 esteem. Perhaps truth is a woman who has reasons for _not revealing her
 reasons?_ Perhaps her name, to use a Greek word is _Baubo_?Oh these
 Greeks, they understood the art of _living!_ For this it is needful to
 halt bravely at the surface, at the fold, at the skin, to worship
 appearance, and to believe in forms, tones, words, and the whole _Olympus
 of appearance_! These Greeks were superficialfrom _profundity_. And are
 we not returning to precisely the same thing, we dare-devils of intellect
 who have scaled the highest and most dangerous pinnacles of present
 thought, in order to look around us from that height, in order to _look
 down_ from that height? Are we not precisely in this respect_Greeks_?
 Worshippers of form, of tones, of words? Precisely on that
 account_artists_?
 
 
 
 
 
 SELECTED APHORISMS FROM NIETZSCHES RETROSPECT OF HIS YEARS OF FRIENDSHIP
 WITH WAGNER.
 
 
 
 
 (_Summer 1878._)
 
 
 
 1.
 
 
 My blunder was this, I travelled to Bayreuth with an ideal in my breast,
 and was thus doomed to experience the bitterest disappointment. The
 preponderance of ugliness, grotesqueness and strong pepper thoroughly
 repelled me.
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 I utterly disagree with those who were dissatisfied with the decorations,
 the scenery and the mechanical contrivances at Bayreuth. Far too much
 industry and ingenuity was applied to the task of chaining the imagination
 to matters which did not belie their _epic_ origin. But as to the
 naturalism of the attitudes, of the singing, compared with the orchestra!!
 What affected, artificial and depraved tones, what a distortion of nature,
 were we made to hear!
 
 
 
 3.
 
 
 We are witnessing the death agony of the _last Art_: Bayreuth has
 convinced me of this.
 
 
 
 4.
 
 
 My picture of Wagner, completely surpassed him; I had depicted an _ideal
 monster_one, however, which is perhaps quite capable of kindling the
 enthusiasm of artists. The real Wagner, Bayreuth as it actually is, was
 only like a bad, final proof, pulled on inferior paper from the engraving
 which was my creation. My longing to see real men and their motives,
 received an extraordinary impetus from this humiliating experience.
 
 
 
 5.
 
 
 This, to my sorrow, is what I realised; a good deal even struck me with
 sudden fear. At last I felt, however, that if only I could be strong
 enough to take sides against myself and what I most loved I would find the
 road to truth and get solace and encouragement from itand in this way I
 became filled with a sensation of joy far greater than that upon which I
 was now voluntarily turning my back.
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 I was in love with art, passionately in love, and in the whole of
 existence saw nothing else than artand this at an age when, reasonably
 enough, quite different passions usually possess the soul.
 
 
 
 7.
 
 
 _Goethe_ said: The yearning spirit within me, which in earlier years I
 may perhaps have fostered too earnestly, and which as I grew older I tried
 my utmost to combat, did not seem becoming in the man, and I therefore had
 to strive to attain to more complete freedom. Conclusion?I have had to
 do the same.
 
 
 
 8.
 
 
 He who wakes us always wounds us.
 
 
 
 9.
 
 
 I do not possess the talent of being loyal, and what is still worse, I
 have not even the vanity to try to appear as if I did.
 
 
 
 10.
 
 
 He who accomplishes anything that lies beyond the vision and the
 experience of his acquaintances,provokes envy and hatred masked as
 pity,prejudice regards the work as decadence, disease, seduction. Long
 faces.
 
 
 
 11.
 
 
 I frankly confess that I had hoped that by means of art the Germans would
 become thoroughly disgusted with _decaying Christianity_I regarded German
 mythology as a solvent, as a means of accustoming people to polytheism.
 
 What a fright I had over the Catholic revival!!
 
 
 
 12.
 
 
 It is possible neither to suffer sufficiently acutely from life, nor to be
 so lifeless and emotionally weak, as to have _need_ of Wagners art, as to
 require it as a medium. This is the principal reason of ones _opposition_
 to it, and not baser motives; something to which we are not driven by any
 personal need, and which we do not _require_, we cannot esteem so highly.
 
 
 
 13.
 
 
 It is a question either of no longer _requiring_ Wagners art, or of still
 requiring it.
 
 Gigantic forces lie concealed in it: _it drives one beyond its own
 domain_.
 
 
 
 14.
 
 
 _Goethe_ said: Are not Byrons audacity, sprightliness and grandeur all
 creative? We must beware of always looking for this quality in that which
 is perfectly pure and moral. All _greatness_ is creative the moment we
 realise it. This should be applied to Wagners art.
 
 
 
 15.
 
 
 We shall always have to credit Wagner with the fact that in the second
 half of the nineteenth century he impressed art upon our memory as an
 important and magnificent thing. True, he did this in his own fashion, and
 this was not the fashion of upright and far-seeing men.
 
 
 
 16.
 
 
 Wagner _versus_ the cautious, the cold and the contented of the worldin
 this lies his greatnesshe is a stranger to his agehe combats the
 frivolous and the super-smartBut he also fights the just, the moderate,
 those who delight in the world (like Goethe), and the mild, the people of
 charm, the scientific among menthis is the reverse of the medal.
 
 
 
 17.
 
 
 Our youth was up in arms against the _soberness_ of the age. It plunged
 into the cult of excess, of passion, of ecstasy, and of the blackest and
 most austere conception of the world.
 
 
 
 18.
 
 
 Wagner pursues one form of madness, the age another form. Both carry on
 their chase at the same speed, each is as blind and as unjust as the
 other.
 
 
 
 19.
 
 
 It is very difficult to trace the course of Wagners inner developmentno
 trust must be placed in his own description of his souls experiences. He
 writes party-pamphlets for his followers.
 
 
 
 20.
 
 
 It is extremely doubtful whether Wagner is able to bear witness about
 himself.
 
 
 
 21.
 
 
 There are men who try in vain to make a principle out of _themselves_.
 This was the case with Wagner.
 
 
 
 22.
 
 
 Wagners obscurity concerning final aims; his non-antique fogginess.
 
 
 
 23.
 
 
 All Wagners ideas straightway become manias; he is _tyrannised_ over by
 them. How can _such a man allow himself to be tyrannised over in this __
 way_! For instance by his hatred of Jews. He _kills_ his themes like his
 ideas, by means of his violent love of repeating them. The problem of
 excessive length and breadth; he bores us with his raptures.
 
 
 
 24.
 
 
 _Cest la rage de voulour penser et sentir au del de sa force_
 (Doudan). The Wagnerites.
 
 
 
 25.
 
 
 Wagner whose ambition far exceeds his natural gifts, has tried an
 incalculable number of times to achieve what lay beyond his powersbut it
 almost makes one shudder to see some one assail with such persistence that
 which defies conquestthe fate of his constitution.
 
 
 
 26.
 
 
 He is always thinking of the most _extreme_ expression,in every word. But
 in the end superlatives begin to pall.
 
 
 
 27.
 
 
 There is something which is in the highest degree suspicious in Wagner,
 and that is Wagners suspicion. It is such a strong trait in him, that on
 two occasions I doubted whether he were a musician at all.
 
 
 
 28.
 
 
 The proposition: in the face of perfection there is no salvation save
 love,(16) is thoroughly Wagnerian. Profound jealousy of everything great
 from which he can draw _fresh_ ideas. Hatred of all that which he cannot
 approach, the Renaissance, French and Greek art in style.
 
 
 
 29.
 
 
 Wagner is jealous of all periods that have shown _restraint_: he despises
 beauty and grace, and finds only his own _virtues_ in the Germans, and
 even attributes all his failings to them.
 
 
 
 30.
 
 
 Wagner has not the power to unlock and liberate the soul of those he
 frequents. Wagner is not sure of himself, but distrustful and arrogant.
 His _art_ has this effect upon artists, it is envious of all rivals.
 
 
 
 31.
 
 
 _Platos Envy._ He would fain monopolise Socrates. He saturates the latter
 with himself, pretends to adorn him ( ), and tries to
 separate all Socratists from him in order himself to appear as the only
 true apostle. But his historical presentation of him is false, even to a
 parlous degree: just as Wagners presentation of Beethoven and Shakespeare
 is false.
 
 
 
 32.
 
 
 When a dramatist speaks about himself he plays a part: this is inevitable.
 When Wagner speaks about Bach and Beethoven he speaks like one for whom he
 would fain be taken. But he impresses only those who are already
 convinced, for his dissimulation and his genuine nature are far too
 violently at variance.
 
 
 
 33.
 
 
 Wagner struggles against the frivolity in his nature, which to him the
 ignoble (as opposed to Goethe) constituted the joy of life.
 
 
 
 34.
 
 
 Wagner has the mind of the ordinary man who prefers to trace things to
 _one_ cause. The Jews do the same: one _aim_, therefore one Saviour. In
 this way he simplifies German and culture; wrongly but strongly.
 
 
 
 35.
 
 
 Wagner admitted all this to himself often enough when in private communion
 with his soul. I only wish he had also admitted it publicly. For what
 constitutes the greatness of a character if it is not this, that he who
 possesses it is able to take sides even against himself in favour of
 truth.
 
 
 
 
 _Wagners Teutonism._
 
 
 
 36.
 
 
 That which is un-German in Wagner. He lacks the German charm and grace of
 a Beethoven, a Mozart, a Weber; he also lacks the flowing, cheerful fire
 (_Allegro con brio_) of Beethoven and Weber. He cannot be free and easy
 without being grotesque. He lacks modesty, indulges in big drums, and
 always tends to surcharge his effect. He is not the good official that
 Bach was. Neither has he that Goethean calm in regard to his rivals.
 
 
 
 37.
 
 
 Wagner always reaches the high-water mark of his vanity when he speaks of
 the German nature (incidentally it is also the height of his imprudence);
 for, if Frederick the Greats justice, Goethes nobility and freedom from
 envy, Beethovens sublime resignation, Bachs delicately transfigured
 spiritual life,if steady work performed without any thought of glory and
 success, and without envy, constitute the true _German_ qualities, would
 it not seem as if Wagner almost wished to prove he is no German?
 
 
 
 38.
 
 
 Terrible wildness, abject sorrow, emptiness, the shudder of joy,
 unexpectedness,in short all the qualities peculiar to the Semitic race! I
 believe that the Jews approach Wagners art with more understanding than
 the Aryans do.
 
 
 
 39.
 
 
 A passage concerning the Jews, taken from Taine.As it happens, I have
 misled the reader, the passage does not concern Wagner at all.But can it
 be possible that Wagner is a Jew? In that case we could readily understand
 his dislike of Jews.(17)
 
 
 
 40.
 
 
 Wagners art is absolutely the _art of the age_: an sthetic age would
 have rejected it. The more subtle people amongst us actually do reject it
 even now. The _coarsifying_ of everything sthetic.Compared with Goethes
 ideal it is very far behind. The moral contrast of these self-indulgent
 burningly loyal creatures of Wagner, acts like a _spur_, like an irritant
 and even this sensation is turned to account in obtaining an _effect_.
 
 
 
 41.
 
 
 What is it in our age that Wagners art expresses? That brutality and most
 delicate weakness which exist side by side, that running wild of natural
 instincts, and nervous hyper-sensitiveness, that thirst for emotion which
 arises from fatigue and the love of fatigue.All this is understood by the
 Wagnerites.
 
 
 
 42.
 
 
 _Stupefaction or intoxication_ constitute all Wagnerian art. On the other
 hand I could mention instances in which Wagner stands _higher_, in which
 real joy flows from him.
 
 
 
 43.
 
 
 The reason why the figures in Wagners art behave so madly, is because he
 greatly feared lest people would doubt that they were alive.
 
 
 
 44.
 
 
 Wagners art is an appeal to inartistic people; all means are welcomed
 which help towards obtaining an effect. It is calculated not to produce an
 _artistic effect_ but an effect upon the _nerves in general_.
 
 
 
 45.
 
 
 Apparently in Wagner we have an art _for everybody_, because coarse and
 subtle means seem to be united in it. Albeit its pre-requisite may be
 musico-sthetic education, and _particularly_ with _moral_ indifference.
 
 
 
 46.
 
 
 In Wagner we find the most ambitious _combination_ of all means with the
 view of obtaining the strongest effect whereas genuine musicians quietly
 develop individual _genres_.
 
 
 
 47.
 
 
 Dramatists are _borrowers_their principal source of wealthartistic
 thoughts drawn from the epos. Wagner borrowed from classical music
 besides. Dramatists are constructive geniuses, they are not inventive and
 original as the epic poets are. Drama takes a lower rank than the epos: it
 presupposes a coarser and more democratic public.
 
 
 
 48.
 
 
 Wagner does not altogether trust _music_. He weaves kindred sensations
 into it in order to lend it the character of greatness. He measures
 himself on others; he first of all gives his listeners intoxicating drinks
 in order to lead them into believing that it _was the music that
 intoxicated them_.
 
 
 
 49.
 
 
 The same amount of talent and industry which makes the classic, when it
 appears some time _too late_, also makes the baroque artist like Wagner.
 
 
 
 50.
 
 
 Wagners art is calculated to appeal to short-sighted peopleone has to
 get much too close up to it (Miniature): it also appeals to long-sighted
 people, but not to those with normal sight.
 
 
 
 
 _Contradictions in the Idea of Musical Drama._
 
 
 
 51.
 
 
 Just listen to the second act of the Gtterdmmerung, without the drama.
 It is chaotic music, as wild as a bad dream, and it is as frightfully
 distinct as if it desired to make itself clear even to deaf people. This
 volubility _with nothing to say_ is alarming. Compared with it the drama
 is a genuine relief.Is the fact that this music when heard alone, is, as
 a whole intolerable (apart from a few intentionally isolated parts) in its
 _favour_? Suffice it to say that this music without its accompanying
 drama, is a perpetual contradiction of all the highest laws of style
 belonging to older music: he who thoroughly accustoms himself to it, loses
 all feeling for these laws. But has the drama _been improved_ thanks to
 this addition? A _symbolic interpretation_ has been affixed to it, a sort
 of philological commentary, which sets fetters upon the inner and free
 understanding of the imaginationit is tyrannical. Music is the language
 of the commentator, who talks the whole of the time and gives us no
 breathing space. Moreover his is a difficult language which also requires
 to be explained. He who step by step has mastered, first the libretto
 (language!), then converted it into action in his minds eye, then sought
 out and understood, and became familiar with the musical symbolism
 thereto: aye, and has fallen in love with all three things: such a man
 then experiences a great joy. But how _exacting_! It is quite impossible
 to do this save for a few short moments,such tenfold attention on the
 part of ones eyes, ears, understanding, and feeling, such acute activity
 in apprehending without any productive reaction, is far too
 exhausting!Only the very fewest behave in this way: how is it then that
 so many are affected? Because most people are only intermittingly
 attentive, and are inattentive for sometimes whole passages at a stretch;
 because they bestow their undivided attention now upon the music, later
 upon the drama, and anon upon the scenerythat is to say they _take the
 work to pieces_.But in this way the kind of work we are discussing is
 condemned: not the drama but a moment of it is the result, an arbitrary
 selection. The creator of a new _genre_ should consider this! The arts
 should not always be dished up together,but we should imitate the
 moderation of the ancients which is truer to human nature.
 
 
 
 52.
 
 
 Wagner reminds one of lava which blocks its own course by congealing, and
 suddenly finds itself checked by dams which it has itself built. There is
 no _Allegro con fuoco_ for him.
 
 
 
 53.
 
 
 I compare Wagners music, which would fain have the same effect as speech,
 with that kind of sculptural relief which would have the same effect as
 painting. The highest laws of style are violated, and that which is most
 sublime can no longer be achieved.
 
 
 
 54.
 
 
 The general heaving, undulating and rolling of Wagners art.
 
 
 
 55.
 
 
 In regard to Wagners rejection of form, we are reminded of Goethes
 remark in conversation with Eckermann: there is no great art in being
 brilliant if one respects nothing.
 
 
 
 56.
 
 
 Once one theme is over, Wagner is always embarrassed as to how to
 continue. Hence the long preparation, the suspense. His peculiar
 craftiness consisted in transvaluing his weakness into virtues.
 
 
 
 57.
 
 
 The _lack_ of melody and the poverty of melody in Wagner. Melody is a
 whole consisting of many beautiful proportions, it is the reflection of a
 well-ordered soul. He strives after melody; but if he finds one, he almost
 suffocates it in his embrace.
 
 
 
 58.
 
 
 The natural nobility of a Bach and a Beethoven, the beautiful soul (even
 of a Mendelssohn) are wanting in Wagner. He is one degree lower.
 
 
 
 59.
 
 
 Wagner imitates himself again and againmannerisms. That is why he was the
 quickest among musicians to be imitated. It is so easy.
 
 
 
 60.
 
 
 Mendelssohn who lacked the power of radically staggering one (incidentally
 this was the talent of the Jews in the Old Testament), makes up for this
 by the things which were his own, that is to say: freedom within the law,
 and noble emotions kept within the limits of beauty.
 
 
 
 61.
 
 
 _Liszt_, the first _representative_ of all musicians, but _no musician_.
 He was the prince, not the statesman. The conglomerate of a hundred
 musicians souls, but not enough of a personality to cast his own shadow
 upon them.
 
 
 
 62.
 
 
 The most wholesome phenomenon is _Brahms_, in whose music there is more
 German blood than in that of Wagners. With these words I would say
 something complimentary, but by no means wholly so.
 
 
 
 63.
 
 
 In Wagners writings there is no greatness or peace, but presumption. Why?
 
 
 
 64.
 
 
 _Wagners Style._The habit he acquired, from his earliest days, of having
 his say in the most important matters without a sufficient knowledge of
 them, has rendered him the obscure and incomprehensible writer that he is.
 In addition to this he aspired to imitating the witty newspaper article,
 and finally acquired that presumption which readily joins hands with
 carelessness and, behold, it was very good.
 
 
 
 65.
 
 
 I am alarmed at the thought of how much pleasure I could find in Wagners
 style, which is so careless as to be unworthy of such an artist.
 
 
 
 66.
 
 
 In Wagner, as in Brahms, there is a blind denial of the healthy, in his
 followers this denial is deliberate and conscious.
 
 
 
 67.
 
 
 Wagners art is for those who are conscious of an essential blunder in the
 conduct of their lives. They feel either that they have checked a great
 nature by a base occupation, or squandered it through idle pursuits, a
 conventional marriage, &c. &c.
 
 In this quarter the condemnation of the world is the outcome of the
 condemnation of the ego.
 
 
 
 68.
 
 
 Wagnerites do not wish to alter themselves in any way, they live
 discontentedly in insipid, conventional and brutal circumstancesonly at
 intervals does art have to raise them as by magic above these things.
 Weakness of will.
 
 
 
 69.
 
 
 Wagners art is for scholars who do not dare to become philosophers: they
 feel discontented with themselves and are generally in a state of obtuse
 stupefactionfrom time to time they take a bath in the _opposite
 conditions_.
 
 
 
 70.
 
 
 I feel as if I had recovered from an illness: with a feeling of
 unutterable joy I think of Mozarts _Requiem_. I can once more enjoy
 simple fare.
 
 
 
 71.
 
 
 I understand Sophocles development through and throughit was the
 repugnance to pomp and pageantry.
 
 
 
 72.
 
 
 I gained an insight into the injustice of _idealism_, by noticing that I
 avenged myself on Wagner for the disappointed hopes I had cherished of
 him.
 
 
 
 73.
 
 
 I leave my loftiest duty to the end, and that is to thank Wagner and
 Schopenhauer publicly, and to make them as it were take sides against
 themselves.
 
 
 
 74.
 
 
 I counsel everybody not to fight shy of such paths (Wagner and
 Schopenhauer). The wholly _unphilosophic_ feeling of remorse, has become
 quite strange to me.
 
 
 
 _Wagners Effects._
 
 
 75.
 
 
 We must strive to oppose the false after-effects of Wagners art. If he,
 in order to create Parsifal, is forced to pump fresh strength from
 religious sources, this is not an example but a danger.
 
 
 76.
 
 
 I entertain the fear that the effects of Wagners art will ultimately pour
 into that torrent which takes its rise on the other side of the mountains,
 and which knows how to flow even over mountains.(18)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 FOOTNOTES
 
 
     1 It should be noted that the first and second editions of these
       essays on Wagner appeared in pamphlet form, for which the above
       first preface was written.
 
     2 Fisher Unwin, 1911.
 
     3 T. N. Foulis, 1910.
 
     4 See _Richard Wagner_, by Houston Stuart Chamberlain (translated by
       G. A. Hight), pp. 15, 16.
 
     5 Constable & Co., 1911.
 
     6 See Authors Preface to The Case of Wagner in this volume.
 
     7 Senta is the heroine in the Flying Dutchman_Tr._
 
     8 A character in Tannhauser._Tr_.
 
     9 See The Will to Power, vol. ii., authorised English edition._Tr._
 
 _   10 Note._It was a real disaster for sthetics when the word drama got
       to be translated by action. Wagner is not the only culprit here,
       the whole world does the same,even the philologists who ought to
       know better. What ancient drama had in view was _grand pathetic
       scenes_,it even excluded action (or placed it _before_ the piece or
       _behind_ the scenes). The word drama is of Doric origin, and
       according to the usage of the Dorian language it meant event,
       history,both words in a hieratic sense. The oldest drama
       represented local legends, sacred history, upon which the
       foundation of the cult rested (thus it was not action, but
       fatality.  in Doric has nothing to do with action).
 
    11 Hegel and his school wrote notoriously obscure German._Tr._
 
    12 Was Wagner a German at all? There are reasons enough for putting
       this question. It is difficult to find a single German trait in his
       character. Great learner that he was, he naturally imitated a great
       deal that was Germanbut that is all. His very soul contradicts
       everything which hitherto has been regarded as German, not to
       mention German musicians!His father was an actor of the name of
       Geyer. That which has been popularised hitherto as Wagners life
       is _fable convenue_ if not something worse. I confess my doubts on
       any point which is vouched for by Wagner alone. He was not proud
       enough to be able to suffer the truth about himself. Nobody had less
       pride than he. Like Victor Hugo he remained true to himself even in
       his biography,he remained an actor.
 
    13 This undoubtedly refers to Nietzsches only disciple and friend,
       Peter Gast_Tr._
 
    14 My Genealogy of Morals contains the best exposition of the
       antithesis _noble morality_ and _Christian morality_; a more
       decisive turning point in the history of religious and moral science
       does not perhaps exist. This book, which is a touchstone by which I
       can discover who are my peers, rejoices in being accessible only to
       the most elevated and most severe minds: the others have not the
       ears to hear me. One must have ones passion in things, _wherein_ no
       one has passion nowadays.
 
    15 An allusion to Schillers poem: Das verschleierte Bild zu
       Sais._Tr._
 
    16 What Schiller said of Goethe._Tr._
 
    17 See note on page 37.
 
    18 It should be noted that the German Catholic party is called the
       Ultramontane Party. The river which can thus flow over mountains is
       Catholicism, towards which Nietzsche thought Wagners art to be
       tending._Tr._
 
 
 
